
"Off-dry, with initial flavors of orange candy and a slight medicinal graininess. It develops some honeyed lemon in the midpalate, and smoothes into a pleasant-drinking, low alcohol and high acid Riesling.",Arena Valley Vineyard,Snake River
"Strong and flashy, not particularly subtle, but impressive in sheer volume, which is a mark of many Santa Lucia Highlands wines. In this case, the wine shows brisk acidity that lends clean balance to the huge orange, mango, apricot, vanilla and buttered toast flavors.",Highland,Morgan
"With its toast and vanilla flavors, balanced with notes of green apple and plum, this is an attractive, ready-to-drink wine that rolls ripely around the mouth.",Reserva,Quinta da Alorna
"Perhaps it is this wine's elevated proportion of Carignan (15%) that gives it such a lovely and distinctive perfume, incorporating hints of ground pepper, cinnamon or clove, and ripe cherries. It's medium in body, verging on creamy in texture because of the supple tannins, and features plenty of spice on the long finish. Drink now_2015.",Séduction Cairanne,Domaine Saint Andéol
"Ca' Coato opens with a very inviting bouquet of sweet spice, vanilla, nutmeg and dried ginger followed by luscious wild berry and cherry. The 17% alcohol is high, but integrated, and although the wine is powerful and determined, it won't burn your palate if paired with a hearty meat dish.",Ca' Coato,Antolini
"The grapes for this wonderful Sauvignon Blanc come from the cooler Oak Knoll region. They were partially barrel-fermented, which gives a creamy, smoky pie crust sweetness to the citrus, tropical fruit, pear and green apple flavors. Production was only 750 cases.",Limited Release,Artesa
"Aromas of bold black cherry, leather, bacon and sandalwood scream __odern,_ yet its age renders it a bit classical. The palate is mildly woody but the flavors or creamy vanilla, dill and balsamic berry fruits are excellent. Toasty and full of coffee and depth on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Reserve,Baigorri
"Gordon Brothers Tradition is a reserve made only in select vintages. In 2007 everything comes together, creating a wine with genuine elegance and grace. The fruit blends blackberry, cassis, plum and black cherry; all dusted with barrel spice and finished with a toasty shell. The tannins are supple and fine, and the balance impeccable. Give this another 6_8 years in the cellar if possible.",Tradition Red,Gordon Brothers
"An impressive, serious wine that shows great ripe fruits, concentrated tannins and a solid edge of wood aging. It is finely structured, its richness not taking away from its balance, although it certainly is no wimp. Enjoy with hearty meals.",Marquês de Borba Reserva,J. Portugal Ramos
"This strong and supple Merlot brings finesse and power to play, mixing black fruits with veins of coffee, dark chocolate, and a hint of pepper. Small percentages of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc add muscle, but Merlot is the star here, firm and persistent, streaked with smoke and finished with butterscotch.",,Januik
"This is 75% Tempranillo and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon. It's got an unusual structure, and dramatically displays this biodynamic vineyard's funky, herbal, earthy character, with plenty of acidity from the Tempranillo, and a little bit of the tomato leaf character also. A complex, unique, distinctive wine that does not show fruit so much as earth and terroir. It keeps going, adding weight and depth through the midpalate, with a strong tomato component.",El Jefe En Chamberlin,K Vintners
"There's a very nice, succulent quality to this wine that is enhanced by smooth cherry flavors, sweet spice, chocolate, leather, tobacco and barbecue sauce. It would pair well with boiled beef and mint chutney.",,Brunelli
"Primarily '08 Merlot, Syrah, and Cab Franc with some '07 Cab Sauv also. Once again this wine rocks; it has fruit power, punch and presence. The flavors mingle seamlessly, young fruit with an attitude. Spicy, highlighted berry and plum flavors, with baking spice details, and some finishing heat.",Rough Justice Red,Barrister
"Aged in large oak casks for up to three years, Begali is an estate that carefully follows Valpolicella tradition. Although the wine speaks highly of its territory, it also delivers a deliciously modern, bright and succulent approach.",,Begali
"Beautifully fragrant, with intense, polished berry and currant fruit flavors, more than a light sniff of fresh mushroom and lovely herbs. This is a truly remarkable effort, elegant and complex. There are nuances of blood,  and garrigue, and just the right amount of whole cluster (about 20%) giving definition and texture through the finish.",,Amavi
"Ripe and succulent expression, with deep tones of blackberry, exotic spice, leather, moist tobacco and Spanish cedar. There's also a smoky, barbecue note at the back; the wine is thick, sweet and luscious in the mouth.",Cinque Stelle Ca' del Pipa,Castellani Michele & Figli
"This classy Amarone spends 36 months in French oak to shape its compelling aromas of barbecue spice and soy sauce. There are background tones of cured meat, ripe berry and Indian spice that help color a long-lasting, soft and velvety mouthfeel.",,Villa Monteleone
"Made in a leaner, drier, lighter style than most Russian River Pinots, but the elegance and complexity are very attractive. Shows a white pepper and herbal note to the sour cherry candy fruit, and is balanced with perfect acidity. A beautiful wine to accompany, not overwhelm, fine foods. Production was an astounding 109,000 cases.",Estate Vineyards,Rodney Strong
"Made in the ultraripe style that is Williams Selyem Chardonnay, this wine almost needs to be enjoyed by itself as a cocktail. It's explosive in apricot jam, pineapple tart, pear crême brûlée, buttered toast and cinnamon spice flavors that feel fat and dry and slightly hot in alcohol. Not particularly subtle, but earns points for sheer power.",Hawk Hill Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Most of the grapes come from this cool-climate growing area, giving the wine a peppery aroma and flavor. The winemaker included 15% Syrah from the warmer home ranch in the Santa Ynez Valley. A good choice, as that adds a fat, soft richness. Finishes fully dry, firm in acidity and finely tannic, with ripe flavors of blackberries. Drink now.",Limited Selection,Gainey
"Antolini is an Amarone producer to watch. This clean and elegant expression shows power and determination that is skillfully played off feminine aromas of wild raspberry and sweet spice. The wine is full and generous on the palate with a long, berry-driven finish.",Morópio,Antolini
"The combination of stainless-steel and oak-barrel fermentation has been good for this wine. It's bright and steely in acidity, and lifts the variety's mineral and citrus flavors to new heights, adding a rich level of smoky cream. Just beautiful and versatile at the table, a sommelier's dream wine. Production was a mere 850 cases.",Limited Release,Artesa
"Lorenzo Begali's base Amarone delivers warm spice notes, mature fruit and a touch of smoked jerky or bresaola. It's an earthy, rich wine with generous density and loads of lingering clove and pepper on the close.",,Begali
"Aged 18 months in oak, this plump, generous Amarone opens with a mixed bouquet of red fruit, blackberry, cinnamon, molasses and toasted almond. It tastes smooth and ripe with a sophisticated, but slight sweet mouthfeel.",,Allegrini
"A little tight on the nose, with earthy characteristics as well as raspberry and plum aromas. The palate is juicy and offers good flow, while the flavors of raspberry and plum are classic and touched up by vanilla, spice, dill and toastiness. Long on the finish, with tobacco, spice and cocoa. Drink now through 2012.",Mayor de Ondarre Reserva,Bodegas Ondarre
"Aged in French oak for 30 months, this bright Amarone shows good integration between ripe fruit and spice aromas. The wine is smooth and velvety on the close and would pair with lamb stew and potatoes.",,Marchesi Fumanelli
"Two-thirds Cabernet and one-third Syrah, this is a creative blend of Cayuse grapes, with the pungent, herbal, earthy character that the En Cerise vineyard delivers in spades. The fruit is a mix that hints at peaches, citrus and more, with an undercurrent of black olive and smoke. But the overriding flavors come from spice, herb, earth and rock.",Ovide En Cerise,K Vintners
"Though varietally labeled, this intriguing white Rhône includes 12% each Marsanne and Grenache Blanc. Rich and satisfying, it brings the buttery density of a ripe Chardonnay, but mixes the fruits for more drama__antaloupe, apricot, banana, and a bit of papaya. A total yum-fest.",,McCrea Cellars
"This offering from Mount Langi Ghiran displays trademark Syran notes of leather, roasted meat, cracked pepper and violets, balanced by a foundation of cherry fruit. It's silky in texture and long on the finish, making it an excellent wine and a superb value. Drink it over the next 4_5 years.",Billi Billi,Mount Langi Ghiran
"Very pretty aromatics of blackberry, vanilla, tobacco, spice and coffee draw you in. The palate is lush and deep, with black fruit, cola and integrated spice flavors. Concentrated and smooth, and already approachable with roasted fig and an extra dose of black fruit on the finish. Drink from 2011_2015.",,Pico Cuadro
"Tommasi's Ca' Florian Amarone delivers loads of ripe, jammy fruit expressed as dried plum, prune and candied berry. The wine feels rich and dense on the palate and imparts a touch of sweetness that makes for a perfect support to the softness of the tannins.",Ca' Florian,Tommasi
"Plush, ripe, round and very intense, Corte Vaona is a dense, modern Amarone that is packed tight with spice, blackberry, chocolate, leather and tobacco. It shows impressive softness and concentration on the close.",Corte Vaona,Novaia
"Thick black cherry, ripe raspberry, Indian spice, toasted almond, molasses, Spanish cedar and sweet vanilla open the nose of this beautiful Riserva Amarone. It's a smooth, rich wine with loads of mature berry intensity on the close.",Le Balze Riserva,Novaia
"An attractive spice- and wood-flavored effort that has rich blackberry fruit. Its tannins are soft and round, with its acidity giving structure to a wine that is ready to drink.",,Quinta Vale de Fornos
"Nice yet quiet on the opening, with lime, apple and minerally aromas. Feels tangy, maybe a touch sharp and pointed, with standard Casablanca flavors of lime, bell pepper and green apple. Short and tangy on the finish, with washing acidity.",Clava Coastal Reserve,Quintay
"This is one of the more drinkable Sangioveses in California, and while it's no blockbuster, it does have a certain charm. Dry and balanced, it has easy to like cherry, tobacco, bacon and spice flavors.",Alto Vineyards,Pedroncelli
"Rich scents carry a subtle hint of leather and barnyard, but the fruit is still abundant. The slightly funky character adds weight and depth, and the impression is of a round, full bodied red, with plenty of charm.",,Acrobat
"This vintage of Valle d'Oro presents almost exaggerated aromas of violet, dried rose and cinnamon potpourri. Definitely more floral than it is fruity, the wine closes with sweet spice flavors, density and polished tannins.",Valle d'Oro,Cantina Tollo
"Tintilia is a little-known red grape from central Italy that is made into wine by a handful of boutique producers. This expression shows aromas of red cherry, soft cinnamon spice and ripe blackberry. It doesn't have long staying power, but it does deliver freshness.",Macchiarossa,Cantine Cipressi
"Don Vincenzo is a sharp, brambly red wine from the blackened slopes of the dangerous Vesuvius volcano. It offers bright aromas of wild berry, cassis, currant and mocha. With its crisp acidity, this wine should pair well with pizza or cheesy pasta.",Don Vincenzo,Casa Setaro
"Opens with dark-berry aromas, spice and varietal herbal hints. Feels full and flush, with good balance and slightly creamy tasting blackberry and cherry flavors running side by side with potent oak. Peppery, resiny and full on the finish.",Reserve,Cornellana
"A whiff of tomato opens the wine, which moves into a light cherry core with a hint of brine. The middle quickly finds a conclusion, and the tannins are authoritative and chewy.",Mount Jefferson Cuvée,Cristom
"Sharp scents of rind and perfume seem almost Viognier-like. The bright flavors echo the aromas, with citrus rind, oranges and apples. Nicely focused.",,Del Rio
"This saturated, golden Pecorino (a native white grape of central Italy) drinks like a red wine and would pair with roast chicken or veal in cream sauce. It shows density and determined flavors of apricot, melon and pineapple.",Casale Vecchio,Farnese
"One of two Tempranillos from Fenestra (the other from Lodi), the Livermore Valley version is bright, tasting of cherry spice, with good acidity. Nearing the finish the taste turns to toasty dark molasses; a nice wine overall.",,Fenestra
"A palate-friendly wine tasting like chocolate-covered cherries and raisins, Cinder's Idaho-sourced Syrah has a refined, elegant balance. Fruity and forward, it makes for enjoyable drinking right now.",,Cinder
"Soft and fruity, this Cabernet has fruit-forward flavors of blackberry, cherry pie and smoky oak. It's a tasty wine whose firm tannins suggest decanting for a few hours before service. Drink over the next few years.",,Emblem
"Chunky black-fruit aromas come with strong notes of coconut, chocolate and cedar. Feels fresh, zesty and voluminous, with sweet oak, coconut, mocha and herbal flavors to go with standard berry and cassis. Long and mildly herbal tasting on the finish.",Single Vineyard,Errazuriz
"Husch was a pioneer of Gewürztraminer in Anderson Valley, and after all these years they still produce one of the more dependable bottlings in California. It's a clean, dry, spicy wine at a good price. Great to pair with today's ethnic-inspired fare, from Indian to Vietnamese.",,Husch
"Five Roses was one of Italy's first quality rosé wines. The blend is 90% Negroamaro and 10% Malvasia Nera; its bouquet is redolent of ripe blueberry, raspberry and white almond. The fresh fruit component is pure and clean.",Five Roses,Leone de Castris
"A pretty, floral nose introduces this nicely made Dolcetto from southern Oregon. Raspberries abound, with a subtext of light, clean earth. Tannins are modest, the acids natural and subdued.",,Melrose
"Pear and peach fruit flavors are front and center, highlighted with lemon oil and a hint of honey. It's not sweet, just imparts a honeyed sensation. Medium long, a flash of citrus rind adds to the finish.",,Methven Family Vineyards
"Earth, olive and ample berry aromas vie with herbal scents to create a textbook Maipo Valley bouquet. The palate is packed and full, with olive, sweet oak, herb and cassis flavors. Finishes long but herbal tasting, with lasting flavors of olive and tobacco.",,Haras
"A nice wine, especially for the price. It's dry and elegantly balanced, with polished blackberry, cherry and cedar flavors that lead to a spicy finish.",,Kenwood
"This bright red blend from southern Italy offers modest aromas of black cherry, blackberry pie and crushed black pepper. The mouthfeel manages to be plush, clean and crisp at the same time.",,La Corte
"La Valentina shows the innovative side of winemaking in Abruzzo. The wine is plush and rich, with ripe cherry and blackberry aromas that are backed by touches of bitter almond and spice.",,La Valentina
"The name of the wine refers to the almost-unknown ancient varieties of vines that have been rediscovered by the Plaimont cooperative. The blend shows a perfumed mix of yellow fruit and citrus, with a tight tang of final acidity.",Les Vignes Retrouvées,Producteurs Plaimont
"With forward flavors of raspberries, cherries, cola and cloves, this Pinot has become mellow over the years. It's a little too soft, and could use greater structure, but it's still a pretty wine. Drink up.",Horseshoe Bend Vineyard,Occidental Road Cellars
"A perfumed, crisp wine that is very aromatic. Citrus and grapefruit meld with kiwi-like acidity to give a brilliantly fruity but dry wine for instant pleasure.",,Quinta do Tamariz
"An attractive, rounded raspberry flavored wine that is clean, fruity and soft in the mouth. A good streak of acidity keeps the crisp character, which is enhanced by a pink-grapefruit aftertaste.",Rose Bruto,Raposeira
"Calabria's Statti offers one of the best and purest expressions of Gaglioppo found in the United States today. This unique offering has a bright garnet color, and shows clean acidity and distinctive aromas of wild berry and burnt almond.",,Statti
"Full and fruity smelling, with plum, berry and sweetness as opposed to being dry, lean and spicy. Feels snappy and racy, with cherry, oak and peppery spice flavors. Finishes with warmth and kick, with lasting flavor.",Limited Edition,Rios de Chile
"Floral and light on the nose, with cocoa, cherry, red-plum and orange-peel aromas. Feels almost Burgundian on the palate, which offers reticent flavors of spice, red plum and raspberry. Dry, lightly oaky and mildly buttery tasting on the finish.",Reserve,Siegel
"This wine has a great track record and the 2006 is staunch and ready to go, with shoe polish, licorice nib, sandalwood and spice aromas to go with big black-fruit scents. The palate is smooth and easy, with blackberry, fig, tobacco and herbal flavors. Cedary and woody late, with some mocha. Still flush and healthy more than four years removed from harvest; drink now through 2012.",Orzada,Odfjell
"Rich, velvety wine, with its firm tannins smothered in opulent fruit. This is a concentrated wine, packing sweet fruits and tannins together with acidity. Black plum skins give a good firm edge and suggest aging potential.",Quinta dos Aciprestes Reserva,Real Companhia Velha
"An almost racy, aromatic wine, all fresh acidity before the spice and tropical fruits kick in. In a curious way, it is the most readily drinkable of the three Gewürztraminers that Rieflé produces, precisely because the richness of the fruit is balanced with the acidity.",Grand Cru Steinert Gewurztraminer,Rieflé
"Scarnocchio is a savory, spicy Amarone with aromas of black pepper, cured meat, black fruit and soft leather. Wood-driven flavors of vanilla, cigar box and cinnamon appear on the wine's slight sweet finish.",Scarnocchio,Monte del Frá
"Aged for eight years in oak cask, this is a magical, meditative wine from the grandfather of Valpolicella tradition. The wine opens with a bright ruby hue with lively aromas of apple skin, white cherry, cranberry and delicate shadings of soft spice, smoke and licorice.",,Quintarelli
"Buller's entry-level Muscat blend sourced from inside and outside Rutherglen itself is a terrific value. It's perfumed yet full bodied and rich, with sweet notes of golden raisins and dried figs, as well as darker hints of dates and molasses.",Fine,R.L. Buller & Son
"With aromas of moss, balsam wood, baked berry and earth, this is a complex, interesting Rioja that's overdelivering for $20. The palate is lush, soft and easy, but also pure and flavorful as the fruit runs deep and meaty. Finishing notes of licorice, dark spice and lasting berry fruit will make you happy you went here. Drink now through 2013.",Reserva,Ramirez de la Piscina
"Complicated in flavor, and totally dry, this Syrah has flavors of wild blackberries and cherries, licorice, herbs and spices that grow in the glass. It's a soft wine made for drinking now.",Viking Estate Vineyard Reserve,Adelaida
"An impressive wine, dense and structured, with great concentration of bitter coffee, dark fruits, ripe acidity. The tannins are powerful, embraced by the richness of the fruit. This is a wine that could age 3_4 years.",Grande Reserva,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"The Hellion is three-quarters Primitivo and the rest Petite Sirah, sourced from a pair of excellent Washington vineyards. An explosion of ripe berries, it coats the palate with effusive fruit, but retains a balance and structure that includes details of spice, espresso, and bitter chocolate. Really well done, and an exceptional value.",The Hellion Red,Angel Vine
"Artesa's dual fermentation approach, in which oak-barrel and stainless-steel-tank fermentation are used, has resulted in this startlingly appealing Chardonnay. Braced with Carneros acidity, it shows mineral-infused orange, lemon and mango flavors, with a smooth coating of toasty oak.",,Artesa
"This could be called the signature white for Barnard Griffin, for it always delivers astonishing flavor for the modest price. A small percentage of Sémillon is in the blend, but the sappy, spicy, penetrating herbaceousness of Sauvignon Blanc is showcased, not disguised. Done in a Sancerre-like style, under 13% alcohol, this is a gorgeous food wine, but you may just want to sip on it all by itself.",,Barnard Griffin
"A perfect framing of fruit and skin and acid, this screams out for the perfect food match. It's a mouthful of orange fruit and orange rind, with lemony highlights and impressive power. It resonates from start to finish, adding notes of herbal tea and orange liqueur as it rolls through a long finish. Outstanding winemaking.",,Barnard Griffin
"With its rose-petaled, dark-red hue, this old-vine Carignan is not for the faint of heart, but delivers to anyone in search of the unusual, with intense tannins and rich red fruit nicely topped with impressive layers of acidity, making it a good wine choice with a range of spicy, multilayered foods. This wine's got some serious bite, especially on the finish, and though already four years in bottle, could age another 3_5 years.",Caballo Blanco Vineyard,Baxter
"The extra richness of a Grand Cru shows well in this wine. The texture is intense, with some good concentrated green and white fruit flavors supplemented by minerality, steel, structure and a taut, vibrant finish.",Schoenenbourg Grand Cru,Dopff & Irion
"Smooth, unctuous and rich, this is a gorgeous wine that offers ripe peach and pineapple fruits to go with the fine acidity and hint of spice. Ready to drink now, it could age.",Esporão Reserva,Herdade do Esporão
"This is immediately drinking very well. It is a textbook Washington Cabernet__irm, muscular and layered__ut with immediate appeal. The blend is 93% Cabernet Sauvignon, 3% Merlot, 2% Cab Franc and 2% Malbec. The tannins are silky and mouthcoating; and the elegant fruit flavors lay out beautifully with plenty of fat in the back.",,Januik
"The Reynolds family has been in Portugal since the 19th century and also owns the legendary Mouchão wine estate in Alentejo. This wine, homage to Julian Reynold's mother is a dark, brooding complex wine, packed with blackberry acidity and a solid backbone of tannin.",Gloria Reynolds,Julian Reynolds
"Amarone Acinatico is a thick and syrupy wine with mature berry nuances followed by loads of sweet spice, toasted almond and cinnamon stick. The wine imparts a heavy, succulent feel and would make a great companion to winter dishes such as game or beef stew.",Acinatico,Stefano Accordini
"The hot vintage and careful oak aging have helped shape this plump, ripe, jammy and sophisticated Amarone. The wine's aromatic intensity is carried forth by bright aromas of blackberry, clove, leather, crushed peppercorn and crushed mineral.",Monte Fante Riserva,Remo Farina
"The Rieflé style of Pinot Gris is to emphasize the ripe apricot flavors. This wine does that, but adds an extra complexity with its smoky aromas, and its dense spice and tropical fruit character. It isn't sweet, but it is certainly rich.",Côte de Rouffach,Rieflé
"Unbelievably rich, almost over the top, with ultraripe cherry, blackberry and raspberry flavors and a caramelized brown sugar, pie-filling opulence. Saved at the last minute from simple fruit bombiness by thick, gentle tannins and just in time acidity. Drink now.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Siduri
"Packaged in a heavy but handsome bottle, this well-extracted Amarone ushers forth massive concentration and power. Redolent of black cherry, cola, steak sauce and teriyaki, this is a natural choice for smoked meat or barbecued prime rib. It shows sweet, chewy tannins on the close.",,Tommasi
"Surprisingly full bodied and rich for a wine at this price, the 2007 Catapult is at the same time savory in style, with notes of dry cedar, roasted meat, black olive, cracked pepper and fine espresso. Finishes long, with velvety tannins. Best with herbed lamb, simply grilled or roasted. Drink now_2020.",Catapult,Wirra Wirra
"Tedeschi's base Amarone is a beautiful wine with integrated flavors of spice and dark fruit that are evenly spread over its smooth, supple mouthfeel. Soft tannins and rich density make this wine a good choice for steak with creamy mushroom sauce.",,Tedeschi
"This is 100% estate Merlot from the original 1981 planting. It's very tight, and immediately showing a lot of barrel flavor, including some spicy pickle accents. The wine has excellent balance, with a firmness that is almost Cabernet like. Smooth, polished, cranberry and cherry fruit is threaded with black olive and red licorice.",Herb's Block Windrow Vineyards,Tero Estates
"This is a focused, pristine Amarone that ends with firm tannins and a velvety mouthfeel. It is redolent of red cherry, coffee, road pavement, leather and licorice. You could imagine a successful pairing with soft osso buco cooked on the bone.",,Monte dall'Ora
"Big and juicy, this full throttle Grenache screams across the palate with a load of spicy cherry, brambly berry, and bourbon-soaked plum flavors. Tannins are toasty and the finish leaves a pleasingly bitter coffee impression.",,McCrea Cellars
"From one of the coolest vineyards on the Central Coast, this Chardonnay's acidity is brisk and bright. It provides a balance to the enormously rich, long hangtime flavors of pineapples and other fruits that are tropical in their exotic richness. New oak provides the perfect touch of caramel and vanilla toast. A great price for a Chardonnay this good.",Estate,Laetitia
"Another solid Syrah from specialist Novy. The wine is notable for its delicious flavors of berries, roasted meats, pepper and cedar, and is elevated by a fine structure. Beautiful tannins, fine acidity, completely dry, and with a smooth, elegant, spicy finish.",Christensen Vineyard,Novy
"Solenero (__lack sun_) is a hearty blend of Magliocco (a grape native to Calabria) and Merlot. The Magliocco grounds the wine in local tradition, and offers bright acidity and wild berry aromas. The addition of Merlot adds softness and a black cherry note.",Solenero,Spadafora
"Mature, gritty and tight, this Montepulciano offers warm-climate aromas of ripe berry, spice and tobacco. It's soft and smooth on the palate, with a long, cherry-driven finish.",Torre Migliori,Tenuta Cerulli Spinozzi
"With nonaggressive, lightly oaked aromas of raspberry, tea and spice, this bargain-priced Pinot gets off to a nice start. The palate is bright and has good flow, while flavors of tomato, red plum, raspberry and saline are full but reserved.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"Schiaccianoci (__utcracker_) is a dark, brooding wine with bold aromas of spice, ripe fruit, rum cake, leather and tobacco. The wine is smooth and soft, with a touch of bitter almond on the close.",Schiaccianoci,Vigne & Vini
"Opens with grapy black-fruit aromas that come across chunky and jammy but don't elicit complaints. Feels round and meaty, with condensed flavors of blackberry and grilled beef. Finishes with a creamy feel, medium length and lasting darkness.",Toro de Piedra Reserva,Viña Requingua
"A little too soft, but otherwise this is a rich red wine, packed with flavor. Tastes of ripe blackberries, cherries and red currants, with pleasant complications of licorice and bacon. Drink now.",Obsidian Ridge Vineyard,Obsidian Ridge
"Aromas of olive, juniper, pepper and berry are tight and a lot like Carmenère or Chilean Cabernet. The feel is gritty and tannic, while flavors of herbal berry fruit blend with pepper, licorice and clove. Tastes minty and feels a bit hot on the finish.",Orzada,Odfjell
"Classic Carmenère aromas of oregano, basil and tomato vie with ripe plum and spice to create an herbal-leaning but honest bouquet. Feels good, with balance and lift to flavors of berry, olive, tobacco and herbs. Mild and short on the finish, but nice for $10.",,oops
"A soft, lush Cabernet that's been blended with a little Merlot. While it doesn't have quite the concentration of Round Pond's more expensive Cabs, its blackberry, cherry and toast flavors are delicious. Drink now.",,Round Pond
"Dry Creek Valley is a great place to grow Syrah, and this blush wine is one of the better ones out there. It's dry, crisp in acidity and clean, with raspberry sorbet, rosehip tea and white pepper flavors. What a natural for bouillabaisse.",Ivy Rosé de Syrah,Pech Merle
"An intriguing blend that includes Cabernet Sauvignon as well as Castelão and Trincadeira. gives a firm yet full black fruited wine. It's packed with firm tannins, and its full black-fruit flavors are structured and layered with acidity. The perfumed aftertaste suggests a more plummy character.",Terra de Lobos,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Textbook Maipo aromas of herbal berry fruit, olive, tobacco and earth carry the nose. Feels good and tastes sweet and ripe, with herbal-leaning flavors of cassis and blackberry. Finishes smooth, with carob and more herbal character.",Clava Coastal Reserve,Quintay
"Structured and dark, this wine's warm fruits are enmeshed in the firm tannins. It has richness and weight, with good sweet berry fruit flavors, and a juicy plum note on the finish.",Romeira Colheita Seleccionada,Caves Velhas
"A challenging name for a pretty good wine, given the frost and smoke issues so many North Coast producers faced in 2008, not to mention consumers' tendency to stay away from wines that might give them headaches. This 50% Petite Sirah-based blend (there's Malbec and Cabernet Sauvignon, too) is a sledgehammer of a wine, all savory leather and dark blue fruit, with a velvety structure that'll linger a long time.",O-Eight Headache!,Chacewater
"Divus is a bold, earthy expression of Montepulciano with ripe aromas of forest fruit and red cherry, followed by spice and black peppercorn. There's a touch of cherry sourness and bitterness on the finish as well.",Divus,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"The entry level wine from Clos Troteligotte, K-Nom is soft and very juicy, with light tannins and black-currant fruit. Made to be drunk young.",K-Nom,Clos Troteligotte
"An attractively fresh wine made from the rare hybrid Segalin grape. It offers a rustic charm, juicy red-fruit flavors and acidity, and an open finish.",Domaine Saint-Sernin Rouge,Château Saint-Sernin
"A blend of Montepulciano, Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine is partly aged in American oak, which adds a spicy patina of clove and cinnamon to a luscious, fruit-filled core. The wine finishes with dark flavors of prune, plum and blackberry.",Kult,Cantina Tollo
"Fresh and salinic on the bouquet, with lime, grapefruit and melony aromas. Feels more tangy and citric than it smells, with tangerine, lemon-lime and grapefruit flavors. Fresh, lean and cut on the citrusy finish.",Gran Reserva,Carmen
"With the structure of 2007, this is a firmly textured wine, with its fruits hanging off its firm tannins. Bright acidity and black-currant flavors lend interest.",,Domaine du Prince
"A wine whose firm tannins have softened into sweet blackberry fruit and ripe structure. It's full and broad, very ripe and powerful, with a restrained finish.",Demain,Domaine le Bout du Lieu
"Ferrari-Carano grows the grapes in the high hills above the Anderson Valley, unproven ground for Pinot Noir. The wine is rich and rather heavy. It's fruit-forward and delicious in cherry pie, cola and sandalwood flavors, yet lacks zest. Drink now.",Sky High Ranch,Ferrari-Carano
"Dry and spicy on the opening, with berry aromas, shoe polish and crusty notes. Feels solid but narrow, with slightly abrasive acidity pushing herbal-leaning flavors of blackberry, chocolate and spice. Turns decidedly herbal and more olive-like on the finish.",Limited Edition,Echeverria
"Lots to like in this Cabernet, which has ripe, juicy flavors of blackberry, plum, dark chocolate and flashy oak. Made thoroughly in the modern style, it's marked by soft tannins and a certain uniformity. Drink now.",Oso Vineyard,Emblem
"This broadly fruity Viognier is full across the palate, with a ripe mix of Meyer lemon and pink grapefruit. It's bolstered by matching acidity, and the core of tangy fruit runs into a fresh and balanced finish.",Sundown Vineyard,Dobbes Family Estate
"Made from organically grown grapes, this thick, creamy Viognier has great perfume and weight and shows an expertly handled balance between ripeness and oak.",,Bonterra
"From a certified organic producer, this bright wine opens with a pretty garnet color and aromas of forest berry, bramble, white almond and cassis. There's a touch of softness in the mouth, followed by a bitter almond finish.",Giancarlo Ceci Parco Marano,Agrinatura
"Sangiovese is one of the hardest red wines to get right in California, but Frank Family gives it their best. The wine is dry, acidic and rewarding in cherry, tobacco, white pepper and sandalwood flavors. Pack in a little more complexity, and the score soars.",Reserve,Frank Family
"Soft and spicy, this Zin shows concentrated flavors of wild berries, tobacco, olive tapenade and sandalwood, liberally spiced and smoky on the finish. It's a little overripe. Enjoy with lusty fare, such as beef stews.",Reserve,Frank Family
"You'll find ripe, sweet pineapple, peach and pear fruit in this wine, as well as crisp Carneros acidity. But the oak has been heavily applied, with overpowering buttered toast and caramel flavors.",Lewis Vineyard,Frank Family
"Very deep, very dark, with high-toned aromatics and dense black cherry and black fruits. Smoke, toast, dark chocolate, mocha flavors all through it. Good length; the volatility is most apparent in the nose, not in the flavors. Exceptional fruit ripeness and depth.",Champoux Vineyard,OS Winery
"A tannic and powerful black berry fruit driven wine, its weight and concentration fitting well with the overall richness. It is a powerful expression, hinting at minerality while enjoying its opulent character.",Duas Quintas Reserva,Ramos-Pinto
"Sourced from the Wallula vineyard, this pure Syrah opens with a pretty, floral top note over flavors of purple berries. Hints of dried herb and lavender bring complexity into the lightly chocolaty finish.",,Boudreaux Cellars
"An exciting Gewürz, one of the best out there. Shows the variety's exotic spiciness and muskiness, with underlying orange, honeydew melon, lychee, pear and kumquat flavors, brightened by wonderful acidity. No oak was used in the production, and the finish is totally dry.",Floodgate Vineyard,Cartograph
"Wines from the windswept vineyards of Colares, where vines are planted almost in the sand, are rare. This Malvasia is fascinating, a wine that has perfumes, a touch of spice and kumquat as well as smoky acidity. Much more than a curiosity.",Monte Cascas,Casca Wines
"Smoky and smooth up front, with bacon, rubber and pure black-fruit aromas. The palate is equally pure and deep, with lush blackberry, cassis, tannins and proper balance. Spicy and tasting of licorice on the finish, with an overall appeal that justifies its price. Excellent Chilean Cabernet that can compete with Napa and elsewhere. Drink now through 2015.",Terrunyo Vineyard Selection Block: Las Terrazas,Concha y Toro
"A distinctly sweet, or chewy element distinguishes this Amarone and carries forth aromatically as Christmas spice, jammy fruit and mature blackberry. There is complexity as well thanks to the pretty background shadings of clove, mesquite and tobacco.",Cinque Stelle Ca' del Pipa,Castellani Michele & Figli
"Meaty, earthy and dark, with a powerful consitution along with briar and sharpness. In the mouth, it's a touchy customer with biting tannins, but as it unfolds you get a dark palate of black fruit, coffee, chocolate and spice. Big in flavor but not as complete or lush as in the past, which is a reflection of the vintage. Drink now through 2016.",,Dominio de Atauta
". Big, lively and very intense, this powerful Amarone opens with a blast of blackberry, spice, vanilla, chocolate, leather and tobacco aromas. It shows sticky, extracted concentration in the mouth and ripe, succulent flavors of jammy fruit and cherry liqueur. It's a huge wine from all points of view.",,Corte San Benedetto
"Pungent aromas of concentrated stone fruits, bubble gum, a whiff of diesel and pine tar introduce a multidimensional wine with lip-smacking acidity. All stainless fermented, no malolactic, no acidification__ust a clean, pure, natural and richly delicious wine, loaded with ripe, luscious peach, pear, papaya and apricot fruit.",Bacchus Vineyard,Arbor Crest
"This is a ripe, plush expression of Amarone (made with a traditional blend of local grapes before being air-dried for extra power and intensity) that delivers loads of jammy fruit followed by toasted nut, leather and moist pipe tobacco.",,Arduini
"A first rate Zinfandel. It shows the classic structure, dryness and tannins of a fine Napa Valley Cabernet, yet the pepper, baking spice and wild berry fruit and currant flavors are uniquely Zin. And look at that alcohol, under 14%. Drink this robust, complex wine with steaks, beef stew, tamales.",,Frog's Leap
"Campedel is a smokey and sophisticated Amarone from Gamba that opens with saturated tones of black cherry, leather, pipe tobacco and dark chocolate. It's a fine, wood-aged expression that shows plushness and richness in the mouth.",Campedel,Gamba
"Smooth as Aragonês should be, here is a concentrated wine with obvious power. Its richness gives a velvet character, but underneath that is a series of dark tannins, brooding black fruits. Age for 3_4 years.",A,Herdade do Esporão
"From the vineyard high up on Atlas Peak comes this delicious, well-made wine. At more than four years of age, it's still fairly tannic, but fresh and accessible in blackberry and cherry fruit. Just beginning to dry out and show mellow bottle age. A lovely, masculine wine that should develop over the next six years.",Veraison Stagecoach Vineyard,Krupp Brothers
"Big, tough tannins and dark brooding fruits give this wine a great sense of restrained power. It has firm muscles, offering support to the plush blue berry, currant and dark plum skins. It need good aging, at least over three years.",Vila Santa Reserva,J. Portugal Ramos
"Wood-fermented, lees-stirred, superrich wine. It is complex, the acidity adding to the nectarine and pineapple flavors. With the wood element carefully judged, it does have power but never oversteps the mark. A real success, and worth aging.",Branco,Vale d'Algares
"Dark, spicy tones of clove, cured meat, teriyaki sauce and black pepper open the nose of this richly-textured Amarone. It's an austere, masculine expression with loads of lingering spice and smoke on the close.",Vigneto Tremenel,Villa Erbice
"Starts off with clean integration and elegant aromas of ripe cherry, forest berry, vanilla bean, clove and ginger. It continues its impressive performance with smooth tannins and a velvety texture.",,Tedeschi
"A precise and penetrating mix of black cherry fruit, cut tobacco, and blended barrel notes that mix in streaks of clove, cinnamon, coffee and bitter chocolate, this wine has the structure and depth to age gracefully for another 6_8 years.",Reserve,Barnard Griffin
"A fine expression of Washington Syrah, this is a lighter style, and therefore more detailed with subtle notes of herb, citrus, earth, tart berries and more. There is plenty of acidity, the tannins are polished into the background, and the barrel notes bring in mocha and milk chocolate flavors. Accessible and elegant, this is a fine value.",,Barnard Griffin
"This wine hides its 14.9% alcohol well under layers of plush cassis and blueberry fruit. Cedar, vanilla and cinnamon add to its complexity, enhanced by hints of cracked pepper and marinated beef. This is supple in texture and broad in the mouth without being overly weighty. Drink now_2017.",,Barossa Jack
"A tasty, round, nicely-balanced, fruity style. Flavors are fruit driven, with lots of melon, apple and pear dominating. The acids are just right, and the wine is as clean and fresh as it can possibly be.",Klipsun Vineyard,Barrister
"The 14% Sauv Blanc really brightens up the Sémillon. Round and fruit driven, barrel fermented in neutral oak, broad and delightfully fruity and open; the flavors mix Satsuma orange, some citrus rind, a bit of peach and buoyant acidity. A very accessible and immediately delicious wine.",,Amavi
"Here's a meaty, savory wine with loads of ripe fruit, plum and prune followed by moist earth and smoked ham. The wine has polished, almost squeaky tannins and a rich mouthfeel.",,Bonazzi Dario e Fabio
"All Talcott vineyard, but not labeled as such. This shows the alcohol a bit more than the others, but it also has the sculpted tannins, the density and structure, and the intensity of berry-fruit flavors that characterize the entire K Syrah lineup. There is an interesting spicy top note that adds a bit of perfume to the flavor also.",M.C.K.,K Vintners
"Winemaker Rob Newsom has defined a Chardonnay style that pushes the grape to its ripening limits. Straw gold and bursting with ultraripe scents and flavors, it's a jumble of apples, orange marmalade, and lemon candy. A buttery finish brings olive oil, caramel and butterscotch.",Bishop's & Celilo Vineyards,Boudreaux Cellars
"Immediately approachable, with beautiful fruit flavors right up front, though it has the depth to age also. Boasts blueberry, very pretty berry fruits, just a hint of barrel and the classic Cadence terroir-driven impression of chalk in the tannins that runs through all Cadence wines as a defining characteristic. Finishes with iron filings, more berry and just a smidge of balsamic.",Cara Mia Vineyard Bel Canto,Cadence
"There's a smooth, elegant quality to this Amarone that translates as black stone, exotic spice, cola and soft black fruit. The wine is also very plush and rich on the close with firm, but velvety tannins.",,Domìni Veneti
"This is a really nice Amarone that opens with sweet notes of spice and black fruit that make a beautiful introduction to the wine's plump concentration and overall intensity. It's a modern, soft interpretation with loads of fruit, cola and tobacco on the close.",Tirinto,Genio del Pago
"Here's a soft and plush Montepulciano d'Abruzzo that should pair well with meat dishes or oven-cooked pasta, such as lasagna. Concentrated flavors of black cherry, cassis and berry flavors are followed by a polished finish.",Ilico,Illuminati Dino
"Crusty, herbal aromas form a typical Maipo opening; add in eucalyptus, dry berry notes, char and olive aromas and it's straight from the textbook. Feels full, chewy and meaty, with cassis, herbal accents and toasty flavors. Shows good length and herbal, chocolaty finishing flavors.",Gran Reserva,Indomita
"Tart apple and pear fruit, accented with light green herbs and underscored with vivid acidity mark this wine. The finish is lightly spicy, and it goes down easily.",,Iris Vineyards
"This soft, easy to drink Zinfandel has likeable flavors of raspberries, cherries, cola and spices. It's a little on the sweet side, but the drying tannins provide balance.",Montecillo Vineyard,Keating
"Vibrant aromas of spice, cranberry and plum lead into a vivid, juicy, youthful wine with plenty of tangy fruit. The acids are way out in front, but the fruit has a zip to it, and there is little or no suggestion of new wood to get in the way.",,Kudos
"A little coarse in the mouth, with grippy tannins, but it sure is ripe, offering a wealth of cherry, raspberry, sweet oak and spice flavors. It's soft enough to drink now.",,Straight Line
"This is Talbott's minor bottling of Chardonnay, but it shows the house style. The 2010 vintage was fine, resulting in strong, forward apricot, tangerine, honey and oak flavors, made bold by Central Coast acidity.",Kali Hart,Talbott
"A fruity red, with jammy plum flavors and a smooth texture. The wine shows some of the elegance for which Taylor Fladgate is famed, while also offering a rich aftertaste.",Fine Ruby,Taylor Fladgate
"This bright Fiano is very well put together, with a tight, linear mouthfeel that is backed by opulent aromas of pear, white peach, crushed mineral and lemon zest. A very fresh, food-friendly wine.",Refiano,Tenuta Cavalier Pepe
"The round mouthfeel is balanced by medium acidity and an orange-oil lift on the palate. Nuanced and refined, with delicate notes of apple skin and firm fresh-cut peach slices. A nice woody spice flavor remains on the finish. Drink now.",Toques et Clochers Autan,Sieur d'Arques
"The 2009 Torii Mors are not widely separated in style or substance. The Select is smooth and fruity, with citrusy acids and light red-berry flavors. It's ready to drink, but does not show the depth or detail for long-term aging.",Dundee Hills Select,Torii Mor
"Aromas of cola, blackberry, cherry and mild herbs are cool and collected. Feels good, chunky and round, with plum, raspberry and more than enough herbal essence in the backdrop. Finishes herbal, spicy and peppery, which is textbook for this variety.",Single Vineyard Plot: Malva,Anakena
"Just two barrels were made of this wine, a new release based upon a vineyard selection and a decision to use no new oak. Admirable in concept, but not quite there in execution, this wine is soft and earthy, with plum and a whiff of cocoa. The midpalate seems to have a slight dip in it, not a hole, but not a smooth ride either.",Heather's Vineyard,Anam Cara
"This wine boasts a bright and youthful ruby-red color. Its nose is crammed with exuberant scents of red cherries and fresh blueberries, along with just-picked rosemary and thyme. There is a faint whiff of vanilla and cocoa pointing to some new oak influence. Moderately viscous, this wine is soft in texture, with supple tannins and supporting acidity. Short on the finish.",Le Secret de Frère Nonenque,Abbaye de Valmagne
"Aromatically earthy, this wine is attractively structured, with chalky minerality, ripe strawberry flavors and acidity on the finish.",Vinha da Defesa Tinto,Herdade do Esporão
"From old vines in Puglia, this hearty wine shows deep concentration and bold aromas of jammy fruit and blackberry preserve. There are both sweet and sour traces on the finish, and the wine is almost too much of a good thing.",Solyss Old Vines,La Corte
"Fresh red-apple and nectarine slices abound on the nose and palate, while a lively floral character adds lift and depth to the bouquet. A touch of citrus pith and peach pit stay through the medium-length finish. Medium weight and fleshy, but vibrant and balanced.",Nord Sud,Laurent Miquel
"This is a solid, medium-bodied wine that should pair well with pizza and pasta. Colle dei Venti offers bright berry nuances with light shadings of spice and tobacco.",Colle dei Venti,Caldora Vini
"Dark and saturated out of the blocks, with blackberry and other rich, black-fruit aromas. Feels smooth and solid, with a mix of blackberry, buttery oak and light herb flavors. Fairly long on the finish, with a note of mint. Very nice for an uncommon blend.",Estate Malbec-Petit Syrah,Estampa
"Lots of gooseberry flavors in this wine, alongside notes of lemons, grapefruits and limes. It's accented with fresh, citrusy acidity, and is entirely dry. If that tart, somewhat green taste appeals to you, it's quite elegant.",,Grieve
"A wine with a dark, inky appearance, it offers ripe fruit aromas of black cherry, bitter almond and prune. The wine is soft and simple, with a cheerful blast of jammy fruit on the close.",,Feudi di San Marzano
"A powerful wine that shows berry fruits, with dark tannins and layers of acidity. It is structured while being fruity and juicy; a great pasta wine that is ready to drink now.",Vega,DFJ Vinhos
"Shows plenty of ripe pineapple, peach and pear flavors, enhanced with toasty vanilla and oak; rounded out with clean acidity. It's solidly in the modern California style.",,Darms Lane
"Solidly fruity, with a mix of apple, pear and peach, this pleasant, easy-drinking Chardonnay plays out broadly across the palate. It is immediately accessible, ready and appears to be at its peak. Light baking spices enhance the finish.",Carabella Vineyard,Blakeslee
"Waxy smelling, with mild baked apple aromas. Feels smooth, with a good texture and creamy flavors of peach and apple cut by just enough acidity to keep it fresh. Finishes in good form, with a round body and acidic bite.",Gran Reserva,Carmen
"Made from a blend of Negroamaro and Malvasia Nera, this Riserva from southern Italy opens with a sweet bouquet of candied cherries, cola, almond paste and cinnamon. The wine is linear, compact and clean on the close.",Sine Nomine Riserva,Torrevento
"Syrupy smelling, with dark-berry aromas mixing with olive, herbal hints and leather. Feels a bit narrow, with sharp acidity at the center. Flavors of raspberry, plum, cocoa powder and tea are typical of the variety, while mocha and vanilla flavors work the finish.",Queulat Gran Reserva Single Vineyard,Ventisquero
"Earthy black-cherry aromas are offset by balsam wood and cedary notes. Feels juicy and solid, with tannic grip and snappy flavors of berry fruit and currant offset by chocolate and herbal shadings. Smooth and medium-long on the finish.",El Caballero,Veramonte
"Soft, supple and seductive, Mod_ is a simple wine that is propped up by notes of mature cherry fruit, spice and tobacco. It's easy in the mouth, with a rich, velvety texture.",Mod_,Talamonti
"Give this tart, dry wine a brief decanting before you drink it. Although it's nearing four years of age, it's still acidic and fresh, with black cherry and pomegranate fruit flavors brightened with a squeeze of lime.",Adastra Vineyard,Talisman
"Amarone Terre di San Zeno shows impressive elegance and beautiful integration of its fruit, mineral and oak-related aromas. This is a precise and focused wine with shadings of graphite and slate behind more opulent tones of cherry, blackberry, plum, cinnamon, clove, mesquite and cedar wood. It's incredibly long lasting and powerful on the finish.",Terre di San Zeno,Corteforte
"This Tempranillo is firm, tight, acidic and compact, a difficult wine to assess. It's got the Cayuse funk, with sharper acidity and a wet stone foundation. The fruit is very tart and tight, with a base of cement and some spice and herb.",Impulsivo,Cayuse
"A wine that blends intense acidity with a rich and dense texture to give a fruit and mineral driven wine. The flavors come from plums, taut tannins to create a wine that is firmly structured as well as concentrated.",Monte Cascas Reserva,Casca Wines
"This new wine from the Limarí Valley is a head-turner. The color is black but it's not overweight or overdone. The nose has mild animal and leather notes along with savory blackberry, and the palate is full of boysenberry, dark plum, licorice, pepper, chocolate and espresso. Long and lingering, with thick legs. Drink now through 2011.",20 Barrels,Cono Sur
"There is a ripe, jammy element to this dark, concentrated Amarone but beyond that, this wine offers huge aromatic intensity and loads of personality. It is redolent of black spice and mature blackberry, and the mouthfeel is rich, chewy and long-lasting.",Colle Cristi Ca' del Pipa,Castellani Michele & Figli
"Mineral and stone flavors abound, with perfumed aromas and fruit totally textured by the terroir. White currant fruits are here, built around a firm core and piled with acidity. Will benefit from aging for several more years, but can be enjoyed now.",Rosacker Grand Cru,Mittnacht Frères
"This is a clean, polished and rich wine that delivers pristine aromas of black cherry, leather, cedar, mesquite, ground pepper and moist tobacco. Pair this wine with a hearty meat dish such as lamb chops or meatloaf.",,Monte dall'Ora
"A powerful, rich and creamy wine that has a soft texture, hinting at wood aging and attractive spice and yellow fruits. It fills the mouth easily with ripe fruits, toast and rich acidity.",Quinta de Cidrô Reserva,Real Companhia Velha
"This Amarone from the hot 2003 vintage delivers wonderful intensity and personality. It's a bold, thick and meaty wine with aromas of mature blackberry, chocolate, spice and leather.",Le Vigne di Turano,Tenuta i Saltari
"This blend of 83% Cabernet Sauvignon, 12% Merlot and 5% Petit Verdot includes fruit from five Walla Walla Valley vineyards. It shows plenty of muscle and bigger, rounder fruit than the single-vineyard Cabernet from Tero. Loaded with lush cherry and plum flavor, with a milk chocolate accent, it's very appealing, nicely balanced and lingering.",Walla Walla Valley,Tero Estates
"Dark as night, with mildly leafy, herbal, varietally appropriate aromas of olive, earth, tea and black fruits. The palate is big but nicely chiseled, with good acidity and tannic support for roasted berry, plum, fig and peppery flavors. A smooth, correct high-end Carmenère. Drink now through 2013.",Herencia,Santa Carolina
"Amarone Proemio shows mature fruit aromas of black cherry and blackberry jam backed by elegant tones of clove, pepper, cola and cedar wood. The wine represents a smooth, clean and traditional style that would pair with grilled steak or roast pork.",Proemio,Santi
"Nice, smooth and dry, a small-production bottling of great charm. But needs time to resolve certain difficulties. Tasted in the summer of 2010, it was young and closed down, unyielding. But the lush texture and generous core of mooshu plum sauce, blackberries, licorice, pepper and sandalwood seems just waiting to bust out. Best mid-2011 and for a couple years afterward.",Donna's,Melville
"Thick oak and spice aromas emerge from the bouquet, slowly revealing a solid base of cherry fruit, blackberry and prune. This is a rich and very extracted, dark and chewy wine with an impressively long finish.",Casa dei Bepi,Viviani
"Full-bodied, soft and cuddly, this is a comfortingly familiar Shiraz__asily accessible, filled with blackberry and plum fruit and with just enough complexity to bring drinkers back for second and third sips. Hints of licorice, cinnamon and mocha linger on the velvety finish. Drink now_2014.",Redstone,Coriole
"This Amarone opens with very mature and smoky aromas of bresaola, dried blackberry and currants. It imparts sweet, chewy tones in the mouth and offers loads of barbecue spice, cedar and mesquite. This wine would make an obvious pairing partner to meat cooked on a charcoal grill.",Brolo del Figaretto,Corte Figaretto
"Here's a rich, sumptuous expression of Amarone with bright aromas of black cherry, chocolate fudge, leather and savory cured meat. The wine feels smooth and dense with long-lasting cherry flavors.",Monte Danieli,Corte Rugolin
"Intriguing but expensive sweet wine, with leather and dried cheese aromas as well as dusty, rubbery black fruits and licorice. It's not that unusual or exciting in terms of mouthfeel, but the flavors of cassis liqueur, stewed cherry and black licorice are tight and powerful. Structured to last another decade, with meaty tannins and molasses on the finish.",Dolç de l'Obac,Costers del Siurana
"Slightly more concentrated and structured than the Jaboulet's regular bottling of Crozes-Hermitage, the 2007 Nouvelère features fresh cherry and berry fruit admirably supported by hints of oak. It's medium to full in body, with soft tannins and a slightly dusty finish. Drink now_2020.",Nouvelère,Domaine Philippe & Vincent Jaboulet
"This Riserva Amarone opens with sweet intensity and bold aromas of ripe berry, cured meat, barbecue smoke and dark Indian spice. It tastes rich and velvety and delivers a very long, succulent finish.",Riserva,Fratta Pasini
"With careful oak aging, this bright Amarone delivers loads of fruit and spice intensity. There's depth and dimension to the mouthfeel thanks to rich padding of mature fruit, soft tannins and thick extract.",,Brunelli
"Villa Arvedi is an excellent start-up Amarone for those who love this distinctive Italian wine without the exaggerated brawn and bulk it sometimes shows. This expression delivers elegant intensity that comes forth as cassis syrup, blackberry, spice, leather and smoked redwood.",Villa Arvedi,Bertani
"Barnard Griffin is family-owned, yet competes, both in terms of price and quality, with the biggest wineries in the state. This Chardonnay is reliable year in and year out, but is especially fine in 2009, with wonderful definition. Fresh herbs, crisp green apple and citrus fruit, a full, spicy, tangy mouthfeel, and above all, a lingering and clean finish, make this a terrific value.",,Barnard Griffin
"This is pure Sangiovese, from the estate vineyard. This captures the varietal character nicely, with very pretty cherry and cranberry fruit, high acids, and a bright, accessible style. It tastes like young vines, but shows enormous potential, with a pleasing earthiness to the finish. The first Sangio from Barrister.",Kiona Vineyard,Barrister
"Amarone Di Carlo adds a touch of cinnamon, ginger and ground clove to a bouquet that is already redolent of vanilla and sweet cherry fruit. This is not a meaty or overextracted expression; in fact, it feels compact and bright on the close.",Di Carlo,Cantine Lenotti di Lenotti
"Ripe, concentrated, perfumed fruit give this remarkable wine both richness and character. It has pear juice, star fruit and a hint of apricot, made richer by a smooth texture. There is plenty of acidity for a fresh finish.",Monte Cascas,Casca Wines
"Here's a plush, rich Amarone that imparts raw notes of grape, cherry, cassis and blackberry. The nose is much more complex with spice, leather, barbecue, cured meat and toasted nut. The mouthfeel is finely textured and long.",,Allegrini
"Rich and medium dry, presenting considerable freshness as well as spice, tropical fruits and intense acidity. The texture is dense and concentrated, full and fruity, just showing signs of maturity.",Pfingstberg Grand Cru,Lucien Albrecht
"You'll be hard pressed to find a better wine at this price. A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Zinfandel, sourced only from coastal counties, it's totally dry, full bodied, firm in tannins and drinkable now for its wealth of blackberry, currant, black cherry and oak flavors. Production was 52,000 cases.",Vintner's Reserve Summation,Kendall-Jackson
"The Octavius Riserva shows the heat of the 2003 vintage in its powerful aromas of cherry liqueur, blackberry jelly and exotic spice. There's a sweet note in the mouth backed by chocolate, tobacco and spice.",Octavius Riserva,Marchesi Fumanelli
"Arrocco is a faithful and pure expression of one of Puglia's native grapes, Nero di Troia. It delivers notes of wild berry, bramble, and chopped rosemary and mint. The mouthfeel shows a sweet-and-sour theme, with ripe fruit and bitter almond.",Arrocco,Tenuta Fujanera
"Ripe and fruity, this forward, candied wine is for those who love ultraripe Zinfandel berry flavors, set in rich baking spices. It's full, forward and powerful, but carries a whiff of burnt rubber and some serious heat in the finish.",Old Vine,Sineann
"A bit too hot for complete balance, the result of high alcohol. Other than that, it's rich, full bodied and delicious in berry, cassis and oak flavors.",Estate,Spring Mountain Vineyard
"Citrusy aromas of lemon, grapefruit and orange blend with grass and herbs. Feels tangy, crisp and correct, with lime, grapefruit and fresh green-bean flavors. Mellow on the finish, but as a whole it's quite good and honestly reflects the qualities of Chilean Sauvignon Blanc.",Puerto Viejo Reserve,Viña Requingua
"A drier style of white Port, its richness coming from concentrated flavors of spice, almond and vanilla. There is some good acidity to give the wine a refreshing aftertaste, leaving a flavor of dried oregano along with the spirit.",Dry White,Niepoort
"Good, rich Zinfandel here, dry and slightly high in alcohol, with a blast of berry, cherry, cola and spice flavors. Enjoy it now with hearty meats or cheese-based, tomatoey veggie dishes.",Helen's Ridge Vineyard,Occidental Road Cellars
"This is a fruity wine, with tight acidity and a smooth texture. It's full of pear and green-apple flavors, and a warm, rich feeling. Very clean, ready to drink.",Terra de Lobos Branco,Quinta do Casal Branco
"The latest release from Vallado is a value wine named after a four-leaf clover found on the estate. Soft and spicy, it is full of berry flavors, with just a hint of Douro power. This 2010 is ready to drink for its fruit and its structure.",Quadrifolia,Quinta do Vallado
"Moderately full and roundly fruity, with an undertone of mineral or concrete. This is a nicely managed blend, with the balance and grip to age for another five years.",99W,RouteStock Cellars
"Pungent and punchy on the nose, with nettle, passion fruit and tangerine aromas. Zesty and well-cut in the mouth, with citrus, green herb, lime and bitter flavors of raw kale or collards. Finishes green, spunky and full.",Secreto de Viu Manent,Viu Manent
"A brawny, dusty Petite with ripe flavors of plum and black fruit enveloped by sticky tannins.",,Chacewater
"A wine that shows it is possible to make a good Riesling at a reasonable price, the 2010 from Clean Slate offers up basic apple and citrus flavors. Hints of crushed stone and spring flowers elevate it above the ordinary, as does the mouthwatering finish of this off-dry wine. Drink now.",,Clean Slate
"Pungent but green up front, with a mix of citric and vegetal aromas that includes lime, peas and canned beans. Feels good and bright, with zesty acidity propelling passion fruit, grapefruit and bell pepper flavors. Finishes both green and crisp, with a blend of tropical and cool-climate character.",Estate Reserva,Errazuriz
"A blend of Merlot and Duras, the red grape of Gaillac. The combination creates a meaty and chewy wine, with pepper and red-currant flavors. While the Merlot supplies the warmth, the Duras offers acidity and fruitiness. Drink now.",,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Solid and chunky, a wine that fills the mouth with its attractive red fruits, structured tannins and a general juicy feel. A fine barbecue wine.",Bigode,DFJ Vinhos
"Good acidity in this wine, with a pleasant minerality, but it's really too fruity and buttery. Shows little subtlety beyond pineapple, peach and pear jam flavors.",HMR Estate Vineyard,Adelaida
"Airlie calls this dry, despite the wine's 1.9% residual sugar, and it's hard to argue. The hint of sweetness simply rounds out the bracing acidity, with grapefruit and lemon fruit flavors.",,Airlie
"This seems like one of those old field blends where the Zin is blended with Carignan and Petite Sirah. It's hot in alcohol, very ripe in jammy berry, prune and chocolate flavors, and rather rustic. Grill up the ribs, slather them in barbecue sauce and enjoy.",Limited Reserve,Azzaro
"A streak of tart, citrusy acidity cuts right through this wine, giving the sweet raspberry and cherry flavors a jammy bite. Easy to drink now with a nice lamb chop.",,Buena Vista
"This is a fresh, fruity young wine, marked by ripe, jammy blackberry, cherry, cola and cedar flavors. It's spicy and tannic and easy to drink now.",Estate Vineyards,Burgess
"Light aromas of tea, briary raspberry and field notes are mild as a whole. Feels juicy, lean and transparent, with agile dry-fruit flavors, cocoa and modest buttery oak. Light in weight and tasting on the tail end.",Reserva Privada,Caballo Bravo
"There's a ripe note of strawberry jam or blackberry pie that opens this darkly concentrated effort. It shows a soft, plush texture that would be nicely offset by a piece of charcoal-grilled red meat.",,Caldora Vini
"This blend of Cab Sauvignon, Merlot and Cab Franc is a little heavy for a rosé. It's rich in cherry, currant and spice flavors. Could almost substitute for a red wine.",Arriviste,Blackbird Vineyards
"In playful packaging with a screwcap, Tanto is a fresh and informal wine that should pair well with pizza or take-out. There are berry and spice notes here followed by a sweet, lush mouthfeel.",Tanto,Cantine Galasso
"Smells waxy and soft, with fleshy but not very demonstrative aromas of papaya and white peach. Feels lifted and lively, with lemon curd, pithy citrus, apple and toasted flavors. Basic on the finish, which is zingy but short on flavor.",Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Borra is having fun in Lodi experimenting with both red and white blends of varieties not usually put together __ere, it's 89% Viognier and 11% Gewürztraminer__ith worthwhile results. White Fusion starts with a severe lemony crispness, segues into oaky caramel and finishes bittersweet.",White Fusion,Borra
"There's a raw, woody element to this Montepulciano d'Abruzzo that recalls forest floor and exotic spice. In fact, other than currant and dried berry, there's not much fruit left behind. The wine closes with sour, firm tannins. Drink now.",,Bosco Nestore
"This is clean and subdued wine, without the overtly jammy and cooked aromas you sometimes find in southern Italian reds. The alcohol feels warm in the mouth; and the finish is marked by polished tannins and dark fruit.",Orion,Li Veli
"Showing ripe cherry, cola and spice flavors, this pleasant Merlot has a nice touch of smoky oak. It's dry and softly tannic, although there's a brisk backbone of acidity. Drink now.",,Keating
"Softer than some Vinho Verdes, this wine from the Loureiro grape has a baked-apple character, its acidity laced into the ripe grapefruit flavors. It is crisp, dry, yet soft.",Via Latina,Vercoope
"A little heavy and dense now. Not showing well for its dry tannins. Almost rustic, with sour candy raspberry, cherry, cranberry and cola flavors weighted with tart astringency. Could surprise. Try after 2013.",Ten,Sea Smoke
"Venturini offers a lively, sweet-smelling Amarone with bright aromas of black cherry, cinnamon, vanilla, sweet barbecue sauce and clove. It imparts a polished, smooth feel with pretty accents of smoke and spice.",,Venturini Massimino
"There's a nice streamlined quality to this Amarone that comes forth as sassy spice, mature fruit, leather, moist pipe tobacco and toasted almond. In the mouth, it shows freshness and a thick, but compact feel.",,Villa Monteleone
"A pity this wine was released so young. It's not showing well now, tasting like a simple fruit bomb, with cherry and raspberry jam flavors and lots of sweet, caramelized oak. But the tannin-acid balanced is very good. Should be better in a year or two.",Pisoni Vineyard,Siduri
"A well-balanced and nicely aged Amarone from the hot 2003 vintage; shows aromas of mature fruit offset nicely by spice, molasses and toasted nut. It's a smooth, thick wine with chewy density and a surprising touch of crisp freshness on the close.",Riserva Cent'Anni,Trabucchi d'Illasi
"Aromas of canteloupe and spice set the scene for a powerful expression of Gewürztraminer. Everything is here__he rose petals and spice, the lychee and star fruit flavors, the sense of the exotic, and finishing with some distinct acidity, a product of the cooler 2004 growing season.",Côte de Rouffach Gewurztraminer,Rieflé
"With its impressive depth of flavor, this has all the right aromatic, mineral and pure fruit character of Alsace Riesling. There is structure, dry tannins, green fruits, currants and a great lifted, vibrant character. This will age well__ive it five years.",Côte de Rouffach Riesling,Rieflé
"Pasqua presents a very approachable and less extracted Amarone that offers elegance and smoothness instead of bulk and density. Indeed, this is a food-friendly wine with soft tannins that would work wonders next to lamb, beef or pork.",,Pasqua
"Few Pinots at this price are this nice to drink so soon. The wine is dry and elegant, crisp and silky, offering deep flavors of cherries, raspberries, cola, cinnamon spice and sweet, smoky oak.",Reliz Creek,Wente
"Bright berry notes of black cherry and raspberry are followed by cinnamon, clove and dried ginger. It feels smooth, silky and offers softly textured tannins.",,Zeni
"Full bodied, even a bit chunky in build, this 100% Syrah Côtes du Rhône features blueberry, vanilla and black olive aromas complemented by dense, slightly chewy fruit on the palate. Concentrated and long, if not terribly elegant; pair it with steak or roasts.",Cuvée Shyrus,Domaine Fond Croze
"Here's a hearty, dark and inky expression of Amarone that opens with pretty aromas of mature fruit, polished black stone and loads of Indian spice. There's a slightly sweet or soft point on the close that is followed by dense flavors of mature black fruit.",,Domìni Veneti
"Although this hearty Amarone delivers a whopping 17% alcohol, the heat and power is well integrated within the wine's juicy berry fiber and spicy aromas of clove and pepper. Pair this wine with thick pasta and creamy blue cheese sauce.",Case Vecie,Brigaldara
"Fresh and vibrant, with perfumed, orange-like aromas, this is an excellent introduction to the Rutherglen Muscat style. It's not as full bodied or rich as some versions, but instead shows off the youthful components of the blend, ending with pronounced citrus notes.",,Campbells
"This is a brawny, masculine expression of Amarone with a thick and hearty mouthfeel that matches the natural intensity of the black fruit and exotic spice aromas that characterize the nose. Sweet, dense fruit flavors would make a great match to sharp, aged cheese.",,CampoReale
"Ripe and smoky aromas of mature fruit, jammy cherry or blackberry and exotic spice characterize the intense bouquet of this powerful Amarone. The wine is succulent, sweet and chewy in the mouth with impressive persistency on the finish. It would make a great pairing partner to pork or lamb.",Rocca Sveva,Cantina di Soave
"Here's a plush and rich Amarone with notes of chocolate, wild berry, blackberry jam, exotic spice, leather and tobacco. It feels generous and soft in the mouth with supple tannins and thick density.",,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"Full-bodied almost to the point of excess, this boldly flavored Shiraz features hints of tar and cola on the nose, but more mainstream flavors of blackberries and vanilla on the palate. Savory, meaty nuances provide just enough complexity, folding in hints of maple syrup on the finish. Drink now_2014.",Uncut,Gemtree
"While the wine is obviously rich, there is a sense of the natural style of Touriga Nacional. The tannins are present, although enveloped by the ripe berry and plum fruits. Touches of dark chocolate go with acidity to finish.",TN,Herdade do Esporão
"With tremendous strength and determination, it's apparent that the heat and power of the 2003 vintage has shaped this masculine interpretation of Amarone. The wine opens with a dark ruby-garnet color and imparts strong aromas of mature cherry, raspberry jam, spice, cinnamon and barbecue smoke.",XX Anni in Due Secoli,Corteforte
"An excellent mix of Wahluke Slope, Columbia Basin and Royal Slope vineyards go into this blend. A rich nose is loaded with chocolate, sandalwood, and cherry confit. In the mouth this has firm tannins, cassis and plum fruit, a lovely wrap of mocha and a lick of caramel.",Five Vineyards,Arbor Crest
"Rich and smooth wine, with a velvet texture despite the strong core of tannins. The wine is solid, dense, full of black plum and chocolate flavors, layered with fine acidity. It could be aged for one to two years, but is ready to drink.",Reserva,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Strongly flavored, lacking perhaps some nuance but makes up for it in sheer power. Mainly Cabernet Sauvignon, with some Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc, it wows with blackberry, cassis, blueberry and cherry flavors that finish dry and spicy. A good structure of tannins and acids suggests limited time on the cellar. Drink now through 2014.",,Allegiance
"A fresh and appealing style of Rioja with aromas of dried cheese, dill, cedar, tobacco and kirsch. The palate has a pleasing juiciness and layered flavors of cherry, rapsberry and vanilla. Mocha and coffee flavors accent the well-oaked finish, and overall this is pure and kicking, but not too hefty or extracted. Drink now through 2013.",Crianza,Baigorri
"A big, muscular Pinot, in the manner of this vineyard. It's dry but sweetly rich and dense in cherries, black raspberries, mulberries, cola and cedar, with thick tannins. The silky texture and bright acidity make it drinkable now, yet it should develop in the bottle over the next six years.",Sleepy Hollow Vineyard Block A,La Rochelle
"Defines a coastal style of ripe full bodiedness and bold fruit, although there's a certain generic quality. Offers masses of cherry and blueberry pie, root beer, orange zest, red licorice and pie spices, with a lovely overlay of sweet, smoky oak. Yet could offer a little more individuality and identity. Drink now.",,J Vineyards & Winery
"A nice value in a ready-to-drink Côtes du Rhône, with the suppleness of a few years' bottle age married to plummy, black cherry fruit and savory elements of coffee, black olive and roasted meat. Drink now_2018.",,Mas du Goudareau
"Showing softly sweet raspberry, cherry and cocoa flavors, with a luxe coating of smoky oak. Acidity and tannins are melted, making it a gentle Cabernet to drink now and for the next few years. Tasted twice.",Aurelio's Selection,Napa Angel
"A beautiful wine with a spine of steel and trenchant acidity that demands savory, spicy foods. It's brilliantly ripe in mineral-infused Meyer lemon and spicy green melon, and while it's technically dry, has a rich, honeyed sweetness. Entirely unoaked.",Paragon Vineyard,Zocker
"There is slight sweetness or chewiness and the finish is marked by thick cherry and blackberry flavors. A huge jump forward compared to recent vintages, this meaty Amarone would make a perfect partner to hearty winter foods like game meat or beef stew.",,Tommaso Bussola
"Made mostly from Mendocino County fruit, this is a really good value in a Cabernet. It's dry, tart and grippy in tannins, and savory in blackberry, blueberry, espresso and cedar flavors.",,Trim
"Drink this Syrah with the best burger you can build. It's too soft for aging, but offers plenty of deliciously sweet fruit and spice flavors, with good Monterey structure.",,Morgan
"Some lightly reductive aromas of rubber yield to decanting, though the wine remains rather hard and compact. Bourbon barrel flavors highlight the middle and continue on through the finish. This young wine seems to have good stuffing, but needs more years in bottle.",,RoxyAnn
"Front-loaded with raspberry, cherry and mocha flavors, this wine's mouthfeel is soft and lush. Oak adds a nice touch of caramel.",,Qualia
"Fresh flavors of pear and apple are the highlights here. This is a high-acid, sharp-tasting wine with a slightly bitter, pear skin-flavored finish.",,Wine by Joe
"Straightforward berry aromas come with modest herbal shadings. Feels edgy, lively and alert, with briny red-berry, spice and oaky flavors. Finishes minty and meaty, with mild oak bringing it home. Standard but good.",La Palma Reserva,Viña La Rosa
"Susumaniello is a little-known indigenous red grape from southern Italy that has recently been rediscovered and replanted in Puglia. This expression is simple, with a bitter almond finish, and a touch of smoke behind the red fruit flavors.",Piu'Su,Vita Italia
"Licorice and dark chocolate flavors combine with blackberry to give a smooth, balanced wine. A herbal undertow yields a green and stalky finish.",,Domaine du Prince
"Nicely polished and bright, here's an excellent value. Pressed violet and lavender aromas are followed by notes of red cherry and almond skin. This fruity wine is aged in stainless steel to maintain its fresh, easy approach.",,Caldora Vini
"Casablanca is the new source for this winery's Sauvignon Blanc, which smells prickly and spicy, with lychee and melon notes. Feels smooth, fleshy and round, with green flavors of lime and lychee offset by mild bitterness. Peppery on the finish.",Reserva,Echeverria
"Sporting a pretty rosé color, this blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Sangiovese and Aleatico offers bright aromas of cranberry, raspberry and white almond. This is a perfect warm-climate wine to pair with fresh fish dinners.",Vitiano,Falesco
"This is a terrific wine to pair with pizza or a heaping plate of spaghetti and meat sauce. Informal, bright and fruity, this Montepulciano d'Abruzzo delivers clean blackberry aromas and an easy but sufficiently extracted finish.",,Farnese
"A touch of sweet spice jazzes up the nose, giving lift to the lightly baked apple and yellow peach characteristics. The round, medium-bodied palate has lively acidity and a sweet orange-oil flavored finish.",Réserve Spéciale,Gérard Bertrand
"Sud, named in homage to the beautiful southern tip of Italy, is a tight, polished effort, with prickly aromas of wild berry, bitter almond and fresh dill. There's a sharp, direct quality to the wine that would match chile rellenos.",Sud,Feudi di San Marzano
"Lightly strawberry colored and flavored, this is a wine with a hint of tannin as well as bright, fresh fruit. While it could age for another year in bottle, it is a food-friendly sparkler that should pair well with rich seafood.",Vertice Rosé,Caves Transmontanas
"Neutral on the nose, with modest sweet berry aromas but not much more. Feels heavy and buttery, with baked berry flavors bolstered by loud oak that tastes buttery and creamy. Chunky, ripe, buttery and sweet on the finish.",,Amayna
"So ripe and fruity in blackberries and cherries, with additional umami richness of tangy bacon and spices, that you hardly notice the texture is a little rustic. It's a solid wine for drinking now.",,Aquinas
"This Idaho entry has been fermented in stainless steel and was not put through malolactic. It's bone dry and yeasty, with a beery flavor and tart acidity.",Dry,Cinder
"From a mix of southern Oregon vineyards, this vintage was harvested at pretty low sugar levels (22.7º brix). It is light, and elegantly designed__efinitely a wine for every day drinking. Along with spare berry fruit is a hint of nougat from a tiny percentage of new oak.",,Abacela
"A bit hot and heavy. Alcohol gives it a glyceriney sweetness, while the flavors themselves are very ripe in blackberry and cherry pie filling, with a superripe finish of prunes.",Viking Estate Vineyard Reserve,Adelaida
"A blend of Touriga Nacional and Syrah has produced an intriguing mix of earth, mint and red-fruit flavors. The wine is rich and concentrated, laced with intense acidity. Drink now.",Tinto,Além
"Don Bosco offers gritty aromas of crushed stone, leather and spice, followed by blackberry and cherry liqueur. There are touches of smoke, cola and barbecue sauce; and it finishes slightly short.",Don Bosco,Bosco Nestore
"A fine and fruity wine that is tangy, dry, packed with citrus and lively acidity that has benefited from a year's aging. The aftertaste is full, always fresh.",AT,Borges
"This is a robust Pinot Noir, marked by excessive alcohol that gives it a peppery burn throughout. Beyond that, it's dry and silky, with flavors of very ripe cherry, red currant and Dr. Pepper.",Laughlin Road Ranch,Mara
"With ripe flavors of black cherry, cola, licorice and sandalwood, this Merlot doesn't disappoint in the deliciousness department. It's soft on the finish, and ready to drink now.",Jack London Vineyard,Kenwood
"Very rich in orange, lemon and peach flavors, with a tangy gooseberry, green pea tartness that gets the mouth watering. The acidity is just about perfect. Would score higher except for some sugary sweetness.",Allomi,Hess
"Inalto's Montepulciano d'Abruzzo shows soft, almost sweet tones of ripe fruit, plum cake and honey-covered almond. It's simple and tight in the mouth with a fresh, clean close.",,Inalto
"Concentrated aromas of blackberry, cherry and mashed fig abound, while flavors of black plum skins dominate the palate and coat the mouth with a firm texture. Medium tannins linger on the finish alongside a hint of roasted cocoa nib.",,La Noble
"Bold, chewy and huge in both mouthfeel and aromatic intensity, there's nothing subtle about this jammy wine. Its finish is driven by blackberry and exotic spice, and is soft and syrupy.",Passamante,Li Veli
"New French oak dominates this wine with buttered toast and caramel flavors. Despite this heavy hand, the underlying wine somehow shines through, with orange, mango, pear and peach flavors, brightened with brisk acidity.",Wulff Vineyards,Lobo
"Mint and wood aromas go well with this smooth, wood-aged wine. Blending Touriga Nacional and Petit Verdot (resulting in its intense color), the impressive wine is concentrated with very ripe black fruit, which still retains good levels of acidity. Age for 2_3 years.",Selection Tinto,Vale d'Algares
"Monti Garbi is a beautiful expression of Ripasso with just the right touch of heft and intensity to pair with roast lamb or grilled steak. Aromas of sweet spice and red fruit fill the mouth and the wine ends with a soft, velvety texture.",Monti Garbi,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"A wonderful Cabernet, rich and complex, that advances the cause of this inland Santa Barbara Valley for Bordeaux varieties. Tasted against fine Cabs from Napa Valley, it did just fine, with intricate blackberry, cassis and currant flavors. Work needs to be done on the tannins, to give them greater definition, although it's hard to tell if that's a function of the grapes or the barrels.",Estate,Vogelzang
"This is a full-bodied, richly textured Barossa Shiraz that steers a traditional course. Bold blackberry fruit leads the way, framed by American oak notes of vanilla, coffee and baking spices, even a hint of dill. The tannins are plush, suggesting a drinking window between now and 2015.",Blackwell,St Hallett
"This is a gem_40% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Merlot and 30% Cab Franc. Dense, fruity and salty, it also carries concentrated chocolate and coffee flavors, surrounding very rich cassis and black cherry fruits. A superb value.",Red,OS Winery
"Classy and elegant,  with tight, polished tannins and bright aromas of red cherry, exotic spice and tobacco. A very food-friendly wine, this could match dishes from lasagna to lamb chops.",,Sartori
"Nicely complex, with elements of rancio combining seamlessly with hints of hickory-smoked nuts, honey and citrus. Shows a bit of warmth on the lingering finish.",Para Grand Tawny,Seppeltsfield
"Yes, this is a big, bulky wine, but it also shows a particularly elegant edge thanks to its polished aromas of black stone, exotic spice, chocolate fudge and mature berry fruit. It feels velvety, smooth and soft on the long close.",,Montecariano
"Bursting ripe fruit aromas of cherry, black currant, cassis, plum and prunes are backed by fine mineral tones of slate, granite and loads of exotic spice. You'll taste chocolate, cinnamon, sweet fruit and crushed clove: The wine's extra long finish is powered by smooth, silky tannins.",,Montezovo
"Full and attractively spicy, this is also elegant even in its richness. There is weighty lychee, Chinese gooseberries and softness rather than sweetness. It feels rich and full in the mouth.",Les Petits Grains,Mittnacht Frères
"Made from equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot. It's quite good and rich, with strong, upfront blackberry, cherry, currant and oak flavors and a dry, spicy finish. The softness mitigates against aging, so drink now_2013. Only 806 cases produced.",Fifty/Fifty,Peju
"Beautifully balanced, this offers the perfect expression of Washington State brightness and a Bordeaux-like herbal component. The tannins are fine and drying, and the wine is polished, with plenty of astringent, herbal flavors in the finish. Don't look for big fruit here, but for a Euro style, this is a sure bet.",,Amavi
"Corvina, Rondinella, Corvinone and Oseleta grapes make up the formula for this rich and very velvety Amarone. There's a very nice, smooth quality to this wine that is supported by bright berry and spice aromas.",,Arduini
"A lovely wine to drink now. It's soft, dry, balanced and complex, with berry, cherry, beef jerky, black pepper and spice flavors, and a sweet coating of smoky oak. Zinfandel, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon, in roughly equal parts.",The Vault,Banknote
"Forward and tasty, with violets on the nose and a friendly mix of plum, cherry and cassis fruit, dotted with cut tobacco, and finished with exceptionally smooth and polished tannins. There are chocolaty barrel notes and a seamlessness to the whole wine that shouts quality all the way.",,Barnard Griffin
"Le Origini Amarone offers light and elegant touches of cherry, blackberry, prune, plum and mature fruit. This expression is not overripe or jammy, setting it apart. In fact, although there are big fruit flavors in the mouth, they are framed nicely by polished mineral and exotic spice.",Le Origini,Bolla
"Bonazzi's nicely aged 2004 Amarone offers an elegant and intense experience with well-toned aromas of black cherry, blueberry pie, mesquite and root beer. There's a touch of cherry liqueur on the close with lingering spice and smoke.",,Bonazzi
"Lush yellow fruits shimmy through the toast character of this wine. It is certainly rich and full, but structured with a good dose of acidity. This is ripe, rich, suggesting increasing complexity in the next few years.",Monte Cascas Grande Reserva,Casca Wines
"The standout feature of this handsome Amarone is the softness of its texture and smoothness of its supple finish. Along the way, however, you will be treated to sweet red-fruit aromas of cassis and blackberry with loads of exotic spice.",,Farina
"A nicely balanced Barossa Shiraz, the 2008 The Watcher avoids any sense of raisining or overripeness that may sometimes be found in wines from this vintage. Plum and savory notes are complemented by subtle oaking, and the overall impression is of ripe, creamy-textured fruit balanced by crisp acids. Drink now_2018.",The Watcher,Fetish
"This wine has been a perennial favorite, but it does offer a very Rhône-inspired set of characteristics, being meaty and somewhat feral in aroma. There are green peppercorn scents as well, and the flavors are intensely savory, spicy and herbal, with a foundation of plum and blackberry fruit. Drink now_2016.",,Domaine Terlato & Chapoutier
"A serious Cab with red-fruit disposition, spice notes and earthy, smoky, mossy aromas. The palate is good and aggressive, with cassis, snappy acids, softening butter notes and vanilla. Lighter on the finish, with no excess weight or fat; more driving and jousting rather than lush, heavy or lumpy.",Limited Edition,Echeverria
"You might want to give this young Zin a year or two in the cellar. Right now, it's forward and jammy in berry, cherry, chocolate and spice flavors, and feels a bit heavy and soft. The vineyard interestingly faces west, toward the hottest afternoon sun.",Somers Ranch,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Notes of chocolate powder and carob are followed by aromas of crushed mineral, cherry, plum, prune and blackberry jam. This is an elegant Amarone with a very fine and focused personality. The tannins are drying and polished and help offset the chewy succulence of the wine's naturally ripe fruit.",,Marchesi Fumanelli
"Aged in traditional oak casks, this bright Amarone shows great balance between its natural spice and ripe fruit components. It feels compact and streamlined with loads of berry fruit on the long close.",Podere Le Marognole,Le Bertarole
"The Art Series's little sibling is this lush, full-bodied Chardonnay that packs in a lot of flavor. Hints of buttered toast, nuts, vanilla and tropical fruit (guava?) all gently caress the palate, framed by just enough focus to hold it all together. Drink now.",Prelude Vineyards,Leeuwin Estate
"A bright, spicy Cabernet from this famous vineyard better known for Pinot Noir and Chardonnay. Made from a small, older block of vines, it's dry and appealing, with ripe cherry, blackberry, cedar, anise and pepper flavors. Drink now for freshness.",Rochioli VIneyard,Longboard
"A step far above your standard Valpolicella, this thick, dense and chocolaty wine shows enormous depth and personality. It also delivers beautifully balanced aromas of ripe fruit, exotic spice and leather.",,Marion
"As delicious as a pastry dessert, although it's fully dry, showing chocolate-infused blackberries, raspberries and beef jerky, sprinkled with white pepper and anise. The tannic structure is beautiful on this elegant Syrah.",Stagecoach Vineyard Black Bart,Krupp Brothers
"This Cairanne bottling is a solid addition to the Perrin family's operation, featuring slightly lifted aromas of crushed herbs, cracked pepper and ripe cherries. Flavors of cherries and dried spices fill the mouth, with just enough dusty tannins to provide structural integrity and modest longevity. Drink now_2017.",Peyre Blanche Cairanne,Perrin & Fils
"Tart raspberry fruit, highlighted with peppery spices, makes this bright and sharp-toned wine a good match for poultry. The acidity is substantial and the tannins show a hint of green woody flavor.",Citizen's Cuvée,Methven Family Vineyards
"Dried currant opens the nose of this savory wine. There's a raw and slightly rustic element to this lean, informal wine that recalls the beautiful terroir of Abruzzo.",,Masciarelli
"Bright and easy, this wine would pair beautifully with grilled shrimp or lightly fried calamari. It is crisp and fresh, with loads of zesty citrus on the finish.",,Mastroberardino
"An easy-drinking, nicely priced Pinot Noir. Its bright cherry notes make it a fine choice anytime you need an affordable, straightforward fruity wine without too much oak or tannin.",Small Lot Blend,Parducci
"Powdery smelling, with green melon and a lightness to the nose. Feels good, with adequate layering, balance and minerality. Nothing complicated about the flavors, but it's dealing nice notes of apple, lime and orange. Finishes dry, pithy, long and slightly bitter.",,Paso Grande
"A blend of Colombard and Ugni Blanc, this is crisp and lively. It has a wonderfully fruity tang, and is packed with flavors of citrus fruit and green apple juice. Screwcap.",Colombelle L'Original Blanc,Producteurs Plaimont
"A deliciously fruity rosé, brimming with smiling red-berry flavors and enhanced by a lime-like tang. It is just what a light summer rosé should be. Screwcap.",Colombelle L'Original,Producteurs Plaimont
"The mid-14% alcohol gives this wine a solid fruit core, much like a California Pinot. Cherry cola flavors hit the palate immediately, then quickly fall away. Bottle shock maybe, but the wine doesn't show the stuffing of past versions.",JV Estate,Stoller
"Here's a terrific value wine that would pair with ground beef, grilled sausage or oven-baked lasagna with meat sauce. The wine has a dark, concentrated color, and it opens with generous aromas of black berry and tobacco.",Mod_,Talamonti
"This is a soft, somewhat one-dimensional Cab. It has jammy flavors of blackberries and cherries, with the vanilla and toast of oak barrel aging. Drink now.",Blend #5,Tyler Florence
"Lacrima is a native red grape variety found in central Italy. It delivers a dark, rich ruby color, with aromas of sweet forest berry, violet, cassis and a touch of cinnamon spice. It has generous floral aromas that almost recall Pinot Noir, and an easy finish.",Fonte del Re,Umani Ronchi
"Much like this producer's Pinot Blanc, this wine offers apple and pear fruit, with just a little more flesh and a hint of cinnamon.",,Wine by Joe
"Creamy with ripe apricot and peach fuzz flavors, this Sauvignon Blanc has a wet stone quality to it as well, with an oak presence and lightly sweet finish.",,Page Mill Winery
"Rich in tropical fruit and citrus flavors and generously oaked, this Chardonnay is made in the modern style, designed to appeal. It's dry and properly crisp, with a fine minerality, but is overworked. You can feel the heavy hand of the winemaker.",Reserve,Robert Mondavi
"Somewhat rustic and coarse, with sweet, jammy berry and new oak flavors and a soft, melted mouthfeel. It's an easy wine for everyday fare.",Pavo Estate,Qualia
"Toasty oak yields a smoky nose, but the fruit aromas are mild and hidden, showing only basic apple notes. With ample oak, the wine is slightly resiny in feel, with tropical fruit flavors followed by a wave of oak flavor. Ditto on the finish, which feels solid and good.",Clava Coastal Reserve,Quintay
"A wine that reveals the warmth of the Alentejo in 2009. It is gentle and smooth, with flavors of spice, red fruit and a touch of wood. Not for aging, this is a great barbecue wine.",Montes Claros,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Spritzy and off-dry, this low-alcohol Riesling has a beery, just-out-of-the-vat aftertaste. The fruit flavors are of light citrus, with a hint of honey.",Wedding Dance,Amity
"A wood-aged wine that feels weighty, soft and rich. It's spiced with a hint of cinnamon, and offers rounded apple and apricot flavors.",,Château K
"Slightly spritzy and low in alcohol, this dry Riesling has light peach and apricot fruit, spread broadly across the palate. It would be prudent to drink it sooner rather than later.",Estate,Blakeslee
"A straightforward, well-priced wine with hints of cola spice, dark cherry and strawberry vanilla that'll go down easy and pair with all kinds of lighter fare. Made from organic grapes.",,Bonterra
"A slight vanilla accent glimmers through the fresh fruit aromas of pear and apple flesh. Round and ripe on the palate, the finish takes a seductive tropical-fruit turn before finally landing on a clean, clementine citrus note.",,Cap Cette
"Earthy and leathery smelling, with strong olive, eucalyptus, spice and plum aromas. Feels solid, if a bit clampy and scratchy, with herbal baked-berry flavors matched against spice and carob. Peppery on the finish, with spicy oak and not much fruity follow-through.",Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Soft and ripe, this wine has an easy, approachable character. It brings out the warmth of the Alentejo with a rounded character, rich black-cherry flavors and enticing acidity. Drink now.",Terras d'El Rei,Cooperativa Reguengos de Monsaraz
"This Sangiovese-based blend is a solid red wine with some extra features that lift it out of the everyday category. It's bone dry and tannic, with herb-infused cherry flavors.",Siena,Ferrari-Carano
"Smells dark and compact, with black-fruit aromas, floral notes and a minor herbal influence. Feels mild and lean, with soft tannins and dry flavors of berry fruit and barrel spice. Short and not overly flavorful on the finish.",Reserva,Chilensis
"There is just a touch of wood here, adding spice to the warm tropical-fruit flavors. It's round, with hints of pepper and rich melon and peach.",Le Grand Blanc,Henri Milan
"Solid and composed on the bouquet, with aromas of black fruit, dry earth, dust and tobacco coming together as a good whole. Features proper flow and balance, with flavors of cola, burnt toast and blackberry. Falls off on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Indomita
"Pretty good price for such a nice Sauvignon Blanc. It's a little one-dimensional in ripe tangerine, mango and lime flavors, but the acidity is bright and clean, and the finish is long and spicy.",,Koehler
"A toasty streak frames the overall character of this wine, resulting in aromas and flavors of wood-grilled peaches and lightly roasted walnut shells. The texture is round and fleshy, but a sweet spice and orange-oil lift help to keep the palate fresh and balanced.",Réserve Spéciale,Gérard Bertrand
"The very limited (50 case) Nodland Reserve is all fruit from the excellent McClellan vineyard. A tasty mix of fig, plum and black cherry fruit, it sails on through the mouth, adding layers of coffee, cherry liqueur and dried leaf. Excellent concentration and depth.",Reserve,Nodland
"A finely perfumed wine, its ripe fruits given extra style by wood aging. Made from the local Baga, this shows the potential of what can be a tannic grape. It has richness, structure, bramble and red stone fruits and a core of minerality. Drink now.",Vinhas Velhas de Santa Maria,Quinta de Foz de Arouce
"Quinta Nova is downriver of Pinhão, still in the heart of Douro vineyards. The wine is sold, firm, with a fine balance of dark tannins and concentrated fruit. It should be aged for 3_4 years.",Reserva,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"Very dry, fairly tannic and acidic, with a tart bite that makes the flavors even more austere than they are. But it's a complicated, interesting wine, obviously pedigreed. Shows discrete, elusive black cherry, crushed pepper, mineral and sandalwood flavors that linger. Should develop over the next 3_4 years.",Nielson Vineyard,Qupé
"A rich, smooth and spicy Chardonnay, very minerally and crisp, with flavors of wet stone, peach, citrus, white pepper and smoky wood. Feels tight and elegant and complex in the mouth. More food friendly than some of the creamier, sweeter Chards out there.",Arcadia Vineyard,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"Typical for Tardieu-Laurent, this wine is strongly marked by its barrel treatment, which may be enough to put off traditionalists. But the quality and concentration levels of the black cherry fruit underneath are high, and this rather full-bodied, muscular Crozes should develop nicely over the next 5_7 years.",Vieilles Vignes,Tardieu-Laurent
"Santa Sofia is a stellar producer with landmark cellars that stand as a proud ambassador for Valpolicella winemaking tradition. This wine is redolent of spice, smoked meat, rum cake, leather and loads of chewy black fruit and prune.",,Santa Sofia
"Aged three years in large oak casks, this bright Amarone shows a traditional and very food-friendly style. You could pair it with all kinds of meat dishes thanks to the wine's soft tannins and lively berry and spice flavors.",,Sartori
"A crisp style of Alvarinho, packed with green fruits, apples and lemon along with richer pink grapefruit. There is an attractive tangy minerality as well, giving a satisfying full-in-the-mouth wine.",Quinta de Cidrô,Real Companhia Velha
"This is not just a late harvest wine, because there are definite dry flavors of botrytis grapes. While the obvious spice of the Gewürztraminer is subdued by the richness and sweetness, it still has all the fat, opulent character of the grape. It almost certainly needs to age, to bring the powerful botrytis character into balance with the wine's structure; in 5_6 years, it will be impressive.",Vendanges Tardives Gewurztraminer,Rieflé
"A plump and generous Amarone that will appeal to those who like big, bold wines. In the mouth, it is accented by sweet berry flavors; there are pretty nuances of spice, cola, mesquite wood and cedar.",,Riondo
"One of the spiciest wines of the year, this Syrah is clearly from a cool climate, to judge by its explosive white and black pepper aromas and flavors. It's very dry and full bodied, with powerful blackberry, pepper steak and smoky wood flavors. Give it a good decant before drinking with Santa Maria-style barbecued tri-tip.",,Sobriquet Winery
"A good, brisk Chardonnay that provides nice drinking now and has extra layers of elegance and complexity. The wine shows the fresh acidity of its cool-climate origin, and very ripe pineapple and peach flavors that come from a long, clean vintage. Don't drink it too cold, as it gets better near room temperature.",,Sobriquet Winery
"In 2009, it's the Pinot Gris (at 60%) that dominates this two-grape blend; the rest is Viognier. It's always a delicious wine, and here again the two grapes match up beautifully, with the Pinot Gris bringing flesh and rind from a variety of citrus fruits, and the Viognier adding orange blossom and tangerine.",PGV,Thurston Wolfe
"A well-balanced, taut Syrah, walking the tightrope between juicy and astringent, with a forceful minerality under the fresh berry fruit. Like a bite of fresh boysenberry pie, with a hint of pie crust along with the delicious fruit. The acidity and overall balance suggest that aging this wine another 6_8 years will continue to improve it.",Morrison Lane Vineyard,Walla Walla Vintners
"A really good Zinfandel that not only shows delicious flavors, but a wonderful structure. Smooth and balanced, its briary blackberry and cherry-pie filling, cocoa, licorice, beef jerky and pepper flavors are wrapped into fine tannins. The alcohol is high, but in keeping with the wine's plush opulence.",Old Vines,Wild Oak by St. Francis
"This is a classy and rich Ripasso that opens with distinctive tones of mature fruit, spice, tobacco and smoked mesquite wood. You could pair this wine with stewed lamb or grilled beef thanks to the natural thickness of the mouthfeel.",Semonte Alto,Venturini Massimino
"This is a compelling and rich Ripasso that opens with intense aromas of mature fruit, plum, prune, cassis, clove, cardamom and smoked spice or cured ham. There's very nice complexity here the the wine hits the palate with determination and intensity.",,Villa Erbice
"Big. ripe and generous, showing some mineral character while also having concentrated apricot, peach and pineapple flavors, leavened with honey and layers of acidity. Like all fine Rieslings, this needs to age. Hold for at least four years.",Les Fossiles,Mittnacht Frères
"A big and meaty Syrah that separates itself from the competition via inviting aromas of blackberry and lemon peel. It's even better in the mouth, where dark, smoky, generous black-fruit flavors rule. Finishes classy, with coffee, chocolate and fig notes. Robust and rewarding Syrah from Chile.",Axel,La Playa
"This softly structured, user-friendly Chard boasts prototypical barrel-fermented notes of cashews, buttered toast and grilled peaches, carried along by a full-bodied, lush mouthfeel. Finishes long, with well integrated oak. Drink now.",No. 11,Philip Shaw
"Montecorna is a wonderful Ripasso that tastes soft and velvety without being too heavy or chewy. Elegant layers of spice, wild berry and roasted nut form a bright aromatic bouquet and the wine imparts long-lasting berry flavors.",Montecorna,Remo Farina
"Aged in wood (there is no doubt about that from aroma and palate), this is potentially a rich, smooth, oily textured wine. At the moment, the wood dominates so give it a year for the fruit to broaden out to make a rich and delicious wine.",,Quinta de Foz de Arouce
"Amply endowed at 15.5% abv, this is a full-bodied, rich and velvety example of McLaren Vale Shiraz from winemaker Chris Ringland. The menthol, vanilla and black cherry notes are straightforward but pure, with nothing to distract from the bold fruit and tasty oak. Drink now_2015.",First Class,R Wines
"This dense and extracted Amarone offers jammy fruit aromas of blackberry and ripe cherry, followed by suede, spice and smoked mesquite. The mouthfeel is chewy and rich, making this a good pairing partner to hearty winter cuisine.",,CampoReale
"A nice, powerful Cab with mocha, truffle, forest floor, cassis and vanilla aromas preceding a pretty palate of cassis, coffee and toast. The texture is just right and the finish is long and easy, with furry tannins that don't bite. A supple wine that shows the best side of Maipo Cabernet. Drink now_2013.",20 Barrels,Cono Sur
"Toasty as they come, with all the French oak a wine can take and still smell good. There's also vanilla, melon and baked apple aromas in front of a zesty, clean palate that's packed with salty, ocean-influenced apple, pineapple and citrus flavors. Crisp as a lime on the finish, and that's because it did not go through malolactic fermentation. Drink now.",20 Barrels,Cono Sur
"A really nice Syrah, especially at this price. It's dry, softly tannic and enormously rich in blackberry and cherry-pie filling, red licorice, beef jerky, black pepper and sandalwood flavors. A real pleasure to drink now if you're looking for a medium-bodied red.",,Ancient Peaks
"So dry and racy, so mouthwateringly interesting in citrus fruits, green grass and minerals, it makes you think of all sorts of foods to drink it with. Try with vegetable tempura, smoked meats, garlic mashed potatoes, roasted chicken. Production was more than 4,500 cases.",,Beringer
"The winery says this very rich 100% Cabernet comes from the Beckstoffer Georges III vineyard, which is in between Highway 29 and the Silverado Trail, although it doesn't say so on the label. The wine is marked by gigantic and somewhat sweet fruit, in the form of blackberry, cherry and raspberry jam. It's awkward now, but seems to have a useful lifespan. Try after 2013, and could be one for the long haul.",Clone 6,Bell
"Fruity, tart and blocky, this delivers bold flavors of lemon and apple. There is plenty of acid under the tangy fruit, and medium persistence. A good quaffer.",,Kudos
"Nuanced toasty aromas augment the red apple and peach pit notes in the bouquet. Medium acidity picks up the palate, with an attractive nuttiness to the solid finish. Well balanced and very accessible now.",Barrel Selection,La Forge Estate
"On the lean, severe side, this shows more structure than fruit. It has chocolate and dark-wood flavors that seem to push the fruit on one side.",La Lande Cavagnac,Domaine de Cause
"Earth, olive, dusty spice and roasted red-berry aromas are honest and backed by coffee and mocha notes. Feels easygoing and mellow, with plum, berry, herb and peppery flavors. Finishes with a light feel along with notes of olive and herb.",Reserva Carmenère-Merlot,Oveja Negra
"This is a fairly ordinary Merlot. It's dry and pleasantly oaked, with some modest cherry and spice flavors. Yet it's a bit off in texture, with jagged tannins.",,Robert Mondavi
"This offers soft, slightly sweet aromas of cherry and cinnamon, with touches of leather and tobacco. It shows an easy, smooth mouthfeel.",Montipagano,Umani Ronchi
"This is showing light black cherry fruit, forward and moderately chewy. Other hints of black fruits and coffee grounds add some interest, with smoke and pepper filling out the finish.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"An easy-drinking wine, it shows ripe aromas of raspberry, black cherry and moist pipe tobacco. It's made from Primitivo, and shows bold fruit notes and a soft, slightly sweet mouthfeel.",Tatu,Vigne & Vini
"This is a ripe, jammy red wine with sweet cherry aromas and plump background notes of blackberry preserve and exotic spice. It offers an easy, approachable personality, with a touch of chewy sweetness on the finish.",,Matané
"A heavy dose of petrol is the aromatic greeting, and it comes with hints of rubber, latex and waxy white fruits. Feels tangy and fresh due to blazing acidity, while it tastes both of tropical fruits and diesel. Long and chiseled on the finish.",,Meli
"Pointy aromas of citrus, red berry and juniper are nice but a little sharp. The palate is similar; it's closed, snappy and juicy but fresh, with cherry tomato, herb and raspberry flavors. Long but basic tasting come finishing time.",Reserva,Morandé
"Yellow tinted, which announces that this wine was barrel aged. And that barrel character is huge on the nose, which smells of raw oak, vanilla and dried cheese. Feels creamy, but the acidity is lively as well. Shows flashes of brilliance but also fights to absorb all the wood that's been thrown at it. A quality wine but definitely not for everyone.",Alfa Centauri,O. Fournier
"Jammy, this Zin has softened and mellowed as it nears five years of age. With raspberry, cherry and cola flavors, it's ready to drink now.",Helen's Ridge Vineyard,Occidental Road Cellars
"Dry smelling, like a wild field in summer, meaning it's a bit brambly. Feels thorough and full, with tea, spice and oaky flavors supporting sweet berry fruit. Crusty and toasted on the finish, but clean and solid as a whole.",Reserva,Rios de Chile
"Good price for a clean, solid Cabernet, properly varietal and easy to drink now. It has pleasant berry, cherry, cola and herb flavors that have some complexity.",,Rodney Strong
"Clean, crisply defined green apple and pear fruit flavors anchor this high-acid Pinot Gris. A fine choice with cream-based sauces or seafood that needs something to cut through the flavor. More bottle age could round it out.",Tikka's Run,Lemelson
"Calina has changed its sourcing of this Chardonnay from Casablanca to Aconcagua, and the result is good. This wine is round, yeasty and fleshy on the nose, with applesauce and peach aromas. Feels mild, with apple and citrus flavors. Finishes with acidic cut.",,Calina
"Crisp apple aromas are light and minerally. Feels citrusy and lifted on the palate, with melon, apple and barrel spice flavors. Mildly oaked but not heavy on the finish, with a fresh overall approach.",Reserva,Chilcas
"Young rosé suits the fruit range from Clos des Terrasses very well. With its fresh and strawberry-fruited acidity, it is bright and clean with just a light zing of structure.",Rosé le Fruit,Clos des Terrasses
"Straight-ahead cranberry fruit takes center stage, with light tannins. It's well balanced and everything is proportionate__ood winemaking. But there is not a lot of depth or detail to the finish.",,Colter's Creek
"Initially dominated by new wood, this juicy wine then rounds out with flavors of black cherry and spice. It is young at this stage, with its fruit tannins showing, and its wood and acidity still calming down. Give it 2_3 years.",,Château Coutinel
"An attractive entry level Port, fruity with a light tannic structure and a sweet character. Blackberry jam dominates the fruit flavor of this everyday Port.",Fine Ruby,Croft
"A mellow, well-rounded Petite that could almost be mistaken for blueberry tea, so prominent are those two strains of flavor in this wine.",Ghielmetti Vineyard,Fenestra
"Made from Aglianico grapes, this fresh rosé is a garnet-pink color, with savory aromas of forest floor, bramble, wild berry and white almond. A touch of sassy spice defines the finish.",Ros'Aura,Feudi di San Gregorio
"A delicious, ripe but dry wine with good acidity and attractive flavors of apple and white currant. The wine has some depth as well as crispness. Screwcap.",Hera Grande Escolha,Adega Cooperativa Ponte de Barca
"Flavors of yellow fruits and pink grapefruit are balanced in this wine. There's a hint of spice, with attractive, taut acidity that adds structure to the wine.",Vinha da Defesa Branco,Herdade do Esporão
"Quite tart, with dominant lemony tea and green-apple flavors. This recalls the Rieslings of Western Australia, though without their bracing minerality. Definitely for those who love high acid wines.",,Kudos
"Dry and somewhat herbaceous, this Chardonnay has some good pear, melon and orange fruit, but otherwise is missing out on opulence, especially at this price. New oak, to the tune of 40%, contributes buttered toast and caramel, but the wine needs more than that.",Estate Grown,Grgich Hills
"Simple and bright, filled with crisp berry nuances, this easygoing effort offers tones of blackberry, cherry and spicy tobacco.",,Valle Reale
"There's a raw, syrupy element to this wine. It suggests aromas of cherry liqueur, spice and roasted coffee bean, and finishes on a bright note.",,Villa Schinosa
"Very fine, full and fruity, this is a remarkably flavorful wine. It captures just a hint of the floral/soapy side of the grape, but brings in delicious fruit flavors of peach and pear and melon and more, a luscious mix that continues to resonate right on through a powerful finish. It's just slightly off-dry, but not really sweet.",,Hogue
"Not a big, serious wine to earn the big points, just a nice, friendly sipper that is frankly delicious. So clean in acidity, so pure in cherry, raspberry, spice and sandalwood flavors, it's irresistible. Elegant with everything from the perfect burger to an intricate ahi tuna tartare construction.",,Jaffurs
"This is also a Milbrandt vineyard, but quite different flavors emerge from the other Milbrandt wines. Plenty of black cherry fruit, with a minerality that suggests iron ore. Penetrating, ripe and potent (15% alcohol), yet well balanced and complex, with wild herbs lurking in the background.",Pheasant Vineyard,K Vintners
"Pegrandi is an impressive Amarone that speaks highly of the territory that shaped it. The wine delivers aromas of jammy fruit, cherry, raspberry and blackberry. But there are also sophisticated toast and spice notes that add brightness and personality. Creamy, cheesy risotto would make a perfect pairing match.",Pegrandi,Vaona
"Tedeschi presents a beautifully balanced Ripasso with a successful contrast between elegance and power. The aromas here recall mature fruit, spice, leather and Spanish cedar and the wine offers a long, thick and soft finish.",Capitel San Rocco,Tedeschi
"Malbec is a real success at this pioneering Walla Walla winery, and in 2008 they made two different bottlings. This one is simply labeled Columbia Valley, and the grapes were entirely sourced from Sagemoor vineyard. It's a rich, round, toasty, highly enjoyable wine, with generous amounts of butterscotch and toast from the barrel aging. The fruit is a bit subdued, a mix of sour cherry, raspberry and red currant.",,Walla Walla Vintners
"This is a very attractive Amarone that offers a smooth, supple mouthfeel accented by bright aromas of red cherry, Indian spice, cedar and vanilla bean. It shows soft tannins with a very polished, clean fade.",Vigneto Calandra di Romagnano,Zecchini
"This Amarone opens with an oak-driven bouquet of sweet spice, vanilla, toasted almond and cigar box. There's enough bright fruit, such as plum and cassis, to promise a good aging future ahead for this bottle.",,Tezza
"Here's a rich, complex and utterly delightful Sauvignon Blanc whose flavors range from Meyer lemons and papayas to green melons and figs. The richness is balanced by fine acidity and minerals, and the finish is nice and dry.",,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"Amarone Acinatico opens with jammy, ripe fruit aromas and candied fruit followed by cured meat, moist pipe tobacco and beef jerky. It's a big, bold, meaty wine with sweet spice flavors and loads of plump, dense fruit flavors and overall richness.",Acinatico,Stefano Accordini
"A complex and compelling mix of citrus rind, pineapple, apple and pear, both in the nose and in the mouth. This gathers strength in the mouth, kicking flavors into a higher gear with juicy acidity. A long, tailing finish has a hint of mint and pepper.",,Barnard Griffin
"Angove's deserves credit for its effort to step up the quality of its wines in the Vineyard Select series. The 2007 Shiraz is a medium-bodied, reasonably structured example of McLaren Vale fruit, balancing bright raspberry and cherry fruit against savory notes of cedar and black olive. Drink 2012_2018.",Vineyard Select,Angove's
"A soft, silky scent to open, weaving a tapestry of floral, musk, lemon polish and apple notes. The wine has excellent concentration, a dense midpalate bringing vanilla cream and banana and other tropical fruit flavors to the front. Powerful, with a hint of volatility.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Arbor Crest
"This very soft, ripe wine is forward and lush in black cherry, blackberry, blueberry and milk chocolate flavors, with a rich veneer of caramelized oak. It's delicious now, and should remain appealing for the next 4_5 years.",,Aurielle
"An opulent, rich wine, spice and wood fitting well into a concentrated texture, packed with juicy berries, red fruits, hints of coffee. It is an impressive, ripe wine, worth aging another 1_2 years.",Montes Claros Garrafeira,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Aldegheri released this smooth Amarone almost one decade after the harvest. The focus here is on elegance and complexity; aromatic highlights include polished stone, candied fruit and smoky overtones of mesquite, cedar and barbecue sauce. Succulent, chewy fruit characterizes the mouthfeel.",,Aldegheri
"There's a textbook quality to this Zinfandel. You could use it in a teaching class as expressing the classic California attributes of the variety. It's perfectly dry, not too high in alcohol, firm in tannins, and deeply flavored in dark stone fruits and berries. And then there are the freshly crushed peppercorns, black, red, green and white. Could be the perfect barbecue wine.",,Bonterra
"Held back for four years, this Merlot is fully drinkable now. It's a lush, fancy wine whose rich cherry, currant, cocoa, red licorice, spice and sandalwood flavors are enhanced by finely ground mountain tannins. The vineyard is high up on Atlas Peak.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Krupp Brothers
"Brilliant, mouthwatering acidity marks this refreshingly clean wine. It's very ripe, showing pineapple and lemon sour candy, papaya, green melon and vanilla spice flavors. Straddles the border between bone dry and just off-dry, although the honeyed sweetness might not show up officially. Great with Thai, Vietnamese and Asian-fusion fare.",Mark's Vineyard,La Rochelle
"There's a nice, streamlined feel to this Amarone that distinguishes it from the otherwise bulky and overripe wines of this category. It moves over the palate with crispness and determined flavors of blackberry, cassis and molasses.",Podere Le Marognole,Le Bertarole
"There's a modern twist to this traditional wine of northern Italy that comes forward aromatically as spice, vanilla, leather and loads of black fruit. It shows fine texture and density and would make a good match to oven-roasted pasta.",I Progni,Le Salette
"Tight when first opened, with polished fruit flavors of blackberry and cassis, mingling with barrel accents of anise and clove. The alcohol, listed at 13.5%, does not indicate the weight and power of the wine. One caveat__here is a chalky aftertaste from the combination of very dry tannins and citrusy acids.",Champoux & Loess Vineyards Reserve,Boudreaux Cellars
"Elegant and tight with a bright cherry bouquet, this well-integrated Amarone shows nice balance between its ripe fruit flavors and its natural acidity. In fact, this is a food-friendly option that would pair with spicy pork or beef and broccoli.",,Brigaldara
"One of the most drinkable Tokays is this entry-level offering from Campbells. It's only light amber in color, suggesting its youth, while the fruit comes through as citrus and apricot laced with clove and caramel. It's sweet but not overbearing.",,Campbells
"This is an expressive and intense Amarone with bright tones of black cherry, candied fruit, exotic spice, leather and tobacco. It washes over the palate with smooth and soft fruit intensity. The long fade offers lingering notes of clove and peppercorn.",,Fabiano
"Here's a very well-shaped and generous wine with layers of ripe berry, smoke and spice that peel off slowly as the bouquet evolves in the glass. There's a nice, polished mineral note as well; the wine delivers the thickness and overall intensity that is characteristic of Amarone.",,Fratta Pasini
"Some Australian wineries are still __verdelivering,_ as they like to say, and this round of Gemtree releases are a good example of that. The 2008 Bloodstone features flagrant vanilla aromas, but balances those with cracked pepper and grilled meat notes, red berries and traces of coffee and olive. The tannins of this full-bodied red are creamy soft, turning just slightly dusty on the finish. Drink now_2016.",Bloodstone,Gemtree
"Sweet spice and brambly notes of forest floor and white mushroom open the nose of this interesting Amarone. You'll appreciate the savory notes that set this wine apart from many of the jammy, over-sweet expressions on the market today.",,Giuseppe Lonardi
"A little soft and heavy, but dry, with rich, extracted flavors of berry jam, red licorice, milk chocolate and pepper spice. It's a very good, robust Zinfandel for drinking with barbecue and short ribs.",Old Vine,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Very dry and tannic, showing the freshly-crushed Asian spices of the Santa Maria Valley. Full-bodied and a little heavy at this point, offering ripe raspberry, cherry, currant and anise flavors. Give it a few years to mellow.",Estate,Dierberg
"Smoky, charred and dark on the surface, with underlying cassis and berry aromas. Feels tight, compact and scratchy due to hard tannins, with black-fruit flavors, sauciness and herbal notes. Finishes toasty and herbal, but with a solid feel.",Cefiro Reserva,Viña Casablanca
"Like Talisman's other 2008s, this is an easy, gentle wine, marked by ripe, candied raspberry and cherry fruit, enhanced with the sweet caramel and vanilla of oak barrels. Drink now.",Gunsalus Vineyard,Talisman
"Plum, berry and milk chocolate aromas are not too aggressive. The palate is round and friendly feeling, with flavors of wild berry, sweet oak and carob. Finishes with solid oaky flavors. Good Syrah that's uncomplicated and generally well made.",Crucero,Siegel
"Pleasantly fruity, with candy flavors of strawberry and cherry. Light, forward, fruity and simple, with a bit of Dr. Pepper on the finish.",,Torii Mor
"Off-gold in color, this wine bares aromas of candied fruit, pineapple, pear and exotic fruit. The wine's texture is naturally round and smooth thanks to the rich glycerin.",,Statti
"Not often does a 2003 Chilean wine come onto the market now, but that's the case with this earthy, mature Cabernet. Smells fully mature and tastes of stewed plum, caramel and brown sugar, then finishes with tobacco and smoothness. Has lost most of its pulse so drink now.",Reserva Especial,Santa Monica
"Given its modest price and weighty alcohol, this wine should find many admirers. Thick and tannic, it could pass for a heavier red than Pinot Noir, and it offers bulky, rustic fruit flavors, with some heat on the finish.",,Alchemist
"A blend of fruit from across the southwest yields a very fresh wine. It is crisp, textured, full of white fruit with an herbal edge. Drink now.",Villa Grand Cap,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"Iris offers a modestly priced, fruity Pinot Noir, with berry and black cherry fruit at its core. A hint of volatility and a slight suggestion of vinegar keep the score from going any higher, but it is a perfectly pleasant wine for everyday drinking.",,Iris Vineyards
"Lots of zesty acidity in this fruity Sauvignon Blanc. It's ripe and forward in lemon, lime, green apple, vanilla and spice flavors. Easy to drink with Asian fare.",Block 21,Kelleher
"Lava Cap Sauvignon Blanc is made from estate-grown grapes, then barrel ferments for a tropical, nutty, round version of the wine, with lots of creamy, tropical flavors. The finish shows off the wine's time in oak.",Estate Bottled,Lava Cap
"Dusty accents of dried carnations add character to the blackberry- and cassis-flavored core. Rich and textured, with gripping but manageable tannins and a plum-skin-driven finish. Drink now.",,Les Jamelles
"Cabot's Cab is probably very much of its place, along the Klamath River in Humboldt County: quite savory, with flavors of leather, tobacco and cranberry around a middleweight texture and tight tannins.",,Cabot Vineyards
"Light pink to the eye, then fresh and vital on the nose, with a touch of stalkiness. Refreshing, lip-smacking acidity drives the palate, pushing tangy, basic citrus flavors.",Reserva,Calcu
"Gets going with tropical aromas and notes of fresh apple. Feels smooth but not that substantial, with pithy flavors of white fruits and sweet citrus. Similar on the finish.",Estate Reserva,Errazuriz
"After sulfuric and match stick aromas muddle the nose, things turn for the better via prickly green-fruit scents. Feels wet and fleshy, with stalky, somewhat bitter flavors that offer mild notes of apple and peach. Melony on the finish, but there's still some bitterness and a stalky, oily character.",Single Vineyard,Errazuriz
"This is a sound Merlot. It has some good fruit flavors, along the lines of cherries and blackberries, with earthier notes of olive tapenade and sweet, spicy tobacco. Despite firm tannins, it's fully ready to drink now.",,Ferrari-Carano
"Here's a modest blend of Primitivo and Merlot that offers subtle aromas of ripe fruit and spice, backed by leather and toasted nut. There's a sweet note of cherry liqueur on the soft finish.",Sud,Feudi di San Marzano
"Smells scratchy and lemony, with hints of vanilla, coconut and other barrel-driven scents. Feels scratchy like the nose, with a decent mouthfeel and tangy red-fruit flavors blended with sweeter vanilla and candied notes. Oaky, sweet and short on the finish.",Single Vineyard,Cremaschi Furlotti
"A soft, mellow style that veers on the sweet side, but has a good tang from its wood aging. The Port has a touch of orange peel, just a hint of spirit and soft final tannins.",Fine Tawny,Croft
"The color resembles roasted beets. The simple fruit-forward nose wafts between red and blackberry aromas. Its easygoing tannins, moderate acidity and short finish suggest that this wine should be enjoyed now to mid-2013.",Via Secreta,Château le Devoy Martine
"With its Sauvignon Blanc in the blend, this is an herbaceous tasting wine, with green apple, and hay aromas. It finishes bright and fresh; drink now.",Le Fruit Blanc,Clos des Terrasses
"A simple, pleasant red, blending equal portions of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with a splash of Cabernet Franc. The fruit is one dimensional, but clean and fresh, with buoyant acidity.",Koos-Koos-Kia,Colter's Creek
"You can't beat the everyday low price of this savory wine. There's a fresh element of ripe fruit and exotic spice that is backed by touches of crushed black pepper, tobacco and leather.",Cretara,Carlo Mario Margiotta
"There's a slightly aged quality to this Montepulciano d'Abruzzo that comes forth as notes of smoke, mineral and cola despite the wine's relatively young age. It's also elegant and polished, with a clean, bright close.",Codici,Mondo del Vino
"There are subtle tones of brimstone, pear, apricot and citrus on this wine. You can feel the alcohol here, although it is pretty well integrated within the wine's crisp, smooth mouthfeel.",,Rocca del Principe
"A bright, saturated rosé with a pink raspberry color and bright berry aromas, this Cerasuolo from central Italy will pair with shellfish or white meat. The wine finishes with a crisp, easy close.",Vigneto Vigne Nuove,Valle Reale
"Rubber, tar, coffee grounds and crusty dark-fruit aromas set up a chewy, full palate with meaty flavors of blackberry, toasted oak and herbs. Round on the tongue and thick, but controlled on the finish, with a mild licorice flavor and herbal leftovers.",Selección,Viña Chocalan
"Packaged in a thick, heavy glass bottle, this hearty Montepulciano d'Abruzzo opens with oaky tones of spice and wood shop, backed by notes of ripe fruit and exotic spice.",Tolos,Terra d'Aligi
"Aromas of hard spices, black licorice, dark plum and herbs are in sync. The palate feels a bit high-toned and jumpy, but the structure is there and so are flavors of toasty oak, black fruits, herbs and spices. Broad but woody tasting on the finish.",Crucero,Siegel
"This thick, meaty Amarone opens with distinct notes of root beer and teriyaki backed by black fruit and blueberry tart. The wine is smooth and rich with polished tannins and a long fruit-driven fade.",La Rosta,Degani
"Chambers's entry-level Rutherglen Muscat is a wonderful wine in its own right, and a relative bargain among sweet wines. It's floral and berry-like on the nose, with a viscous mouthfeel and caramel flavors that carry hints of berry fruit, honey and citrus.",,Chambers Rosewood Vineyards
"This is an elegant and well-crafted Amarone that reveals itself slowly in the glass with aromas of spice, mature fruit and greenish nuances of forest floor and bramble. You'll taste mature blackberry and cherry on the finish followed by spicy notes of black pepper and clove.",Rocca Sveva,Cantina di Soave
"A luxury cuvée aged in oak for up to two years, this is marked by the barrel, but it's most intriguing feature is an intricate herbal overlay to the plummy fruit. This blend of Grenache and Syrah is chunky and extracted, meant for aging, although not unapproachable. Drink now_2015.",Eole Rouge,Château de la Tuilerie
"Stands out for its fruit quality, balance and structure. The nose is strong and piercing, with charred notes, black-fruit aromas and depth. Ripe and clean in the mouth, with elevated blackberry flavors and a chewy, meaty mouthfeel. Toasty and tasting of black licorice on the finish. A serious, well-made Chilean Cab to drink now through 2012.",Marques de Casa Concha,Concha y Toro
"From the hot 2003 vinatge, this is a bold, chewy expression of Amarone with deep layers of mature fruit and cherry. It delivers plush background notes of cinnamon, leather, chocolate and smoked cedar wood as well.",Stropa,Monte dall'Ora
"Pretty and balanced fruit nuances speak volumes about the quality of this vintage. Montezovo's 2004 Amarone shows an excellent exchange between its cherry, spice and black mineral characteristics.",,Montezovo
"Dark, thick extraction and an inky, black appearance characterize this powerful Amarone Riserva. It's a chewy, succulent wine that delivers soft tannins and rich flavors of maraschino cherries, blackberry preserves, Indian spice, ground clove, cinnamon, dark chocolate and moist pipe tobacco.",Trionfo Riserva,Riondo
"This is a more compact and elegant expression of Amarone that lets the quality of its ripe fruit shine through. You'll recognize tones of cherry and cassis. But there are also balanced mineral, almond and spice notes at the back. The mouthfeel is bright, focused and persistent.",,Vigneti Villabella
"La Bandina is a bold, oak-driven blend that opens with sweet notes of spice, vanilla, campfire and tons of berry fruit and mature cherry. It tastes plush and rich in the mouth: This is by no means your standard Valpolicella.",La Bandina,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"Golden honey, tangerines and orange blossoms perfume this silky smooth late harvest Riesling. Lush stone fruit and honey flavors melt onto the palate, but are anchored by an elegant black tea note and a bright tangerine acidity that make this sweet ambrosia a delightfully long sip.",Late Harvest,Sheldrake Point
"Aged two years in barrique, this is a plush and modern Amarone with deep layers of spice, ripe fruit, cola, tobacco, leather and mesquite. It shows, soft, sweet intensity and loads of cherry on the close.",,Tezza
"Here's a modern Amarone that will appeal to those who like bold, chewy and slightly sweet red wines. Aromas include cinnamon, nutmeg, candied fruit and raspberry jam. This would be a good wine to pair with aged cheeses.",La Bastia Ca' de' Rocchi,Tinazzi
"A pure, all-out Zinfandel with enticing black and red fruit on the nose followed by spicy, black peppery undertones and rich berry and plum. Tannins are nicely integrated yet still pronounced yet the finish is long and incredibly smooth.",Big John Zin - Vineyard Select Series,Newsome-Harlow
"Instantly gratifying, with a smoky wreath around the bright cherry/cassis fruit. Lots of pretty baking spices add detail as well, adding up to a full, round, forward, spicy, flavorful wine.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"Robust, full bodied and frankly delicious, this is a great value in an upscale Syrah. It's bone dry, but exceptionally rich in blackberry and cherry-pie filling, currant, licorice, bacon, sandalwood and pepper flavors that are deep and long in the finish. Amazing how good it is for the price. A sommelier's dream, but production was only 248 cases.",,Novy
"A pretty, polished and crisp Riesling that straddles the line between dry and off-dry. It's high in acidity, making the citrus, green apple, peach and jasmine flavors mouthwatering and clean. A beautiful wine to drink now.",Kick On Ranch,Ojai
"This is a dry Syrah to drink now with upscale fare. It feels classy and important, although it's not a blockbuster. Prefers elegance over power, with firm tannins and acidity framing sour cherry candy, mineral and white pepper flavors. Drink now.",Alisos Vineyard,Qupé
"Filled with layers of red and black berries and accented with hints of vanilla and chocolate, this creamy-textured Shiraz shows some muscle as well, suggesting that while it is approachable now, it will age nicely over the next 10 years or so.",Bin 28 Kalimna,Penfolds
"A huge jump forward in quality compared to the last release of this wine, here is a polished, clean and elegant wine that shows signs of tradition and territory. It is redolent of black cherry, spice, slate roof and roasted nut.",,Roncolato
"The 2006 vintage of this Cabernet blew me away. This '07 is considerably more difficult to evaluate. Fresh out of the bottle, it's dry, tannic and raw in acids. The black cherry sour candy and Dr. Pepper cola flavors have an unrelieved toughness. Yet the balance seems to be there for aging. The score is entirely tentative, and could well rise in coming years. But it could also go down. Roll the dice.",Estate,Sabina Vineyards
"Amarone Costasera is the perfect choice for those who are not already familiar with this unique category of Italian wine. The wine is extremely balanced and well integrated with elegant tones of ripe berry fruit and spice. It also promises to pair with beef, lamb or pork.",Costasera,Masi
"Purple in color, with big, grapy aromas that fold in meatiness, warmth and power. The palate is a jammy blast of concentrated black fruit, herbs and lighter citrus along the edges. Lush on the back side, and probably more bold and forceful as opposed to refined or elegant. Drink now through 2012.",Corralillo,Matetic
"Sirocco is 46% Grenache, 31% Mourvèdre, 15% Syrah, 4% Counoise and 4% Cinsault__s anyone else in Washington doing such complex Rhône blends? The model, of course, is Châteauneuf-du-Pape, and this is a worthy New World take on that wine. Still youthful and very spicy, with tight red fruits, firm tannins, and alcohol pushing 15%, it needs more bottle age and/or decanting to smooth out.",Sirocco,McCrea Cellars
"There's an elegant, toned quality that shifts focus to the purity of its wild berry and dark spice aromas. It's not one of those massive, chewy fruit bombs and that's ultimately what sets this wine apart.",Vigne Alte,Zeni
"Here's a vibrant and sweet-smelling Amarone with aromas of Christmas spice, nutmeg, vanilla, chocolate and loads of vibrant berry fruit. There's a touch of natural rubber as well and the wine is smooth, silky and firm on the close.",,Cent'Anni
"Thickly textured and potently sweet, this dark brass-colored wine presents hints of dried fig and citrus, turning almost honey-like on the slightly warm finish.",Muscadelle,Chambers Rosewood Vineyards
"Here's a sweet, rich and pulpy Amarone that offers thick extraction and distinct aromas of candied fruit, cola, leather, tobacco and sweet spice. The wine imparts dense richness and a velvety texture that would pair with aged pecorino cheese.",Crosara de le Strìe,Corte Rugolin
"A fine addition to Churchill's Douro wines, this is rich, perfumed with hints of violets, layers of soft tannins and jammy red berry fruits. It has a tannic firmness, but this is cushioned by the generous fruit.",Churchill Estates,Churchill's
"A massive, sweet and hugely ripe style of Carmenère that leans toward fat and raisiny, even buttery. Interestingly, the palate shows a streak of sharp acidity along with highly concentrated flavors of black olive, prune, raisin and fig. Big and emphasizing size and heft more than total harmony. Drink now through 2012.",Kai,Errazuriz
"Sweet, grapy, raspberry-candy fruit flavors are set against suggestions of dried leaf. Tannins are grainy, with a rough, earthy finish.",Arena Valley Vineyard,Snake River
"Grassy, green aromas are suggestive of honeydew and lychee but also canned beans and peas. Feels round while showing medium intensity and lightly vegetal flavors of fresh asparagus mixed with bitter greens.",Amplus,Santa Ema
"Mellow and friendly on the nose, with plum and cherry aromas and not too much herbal activity. Feels fresh, with cassis, raspberry and plum flavors followed by herbal notes. Finishes smooth and resiny, with just enough juiciness to maintain freshness.",,Paso Grande
"This small-production Carmenère hails from magnesium-rich soils, hence the __ark earth_ name. Opens with severe aromas of burnt oak, asphalt and blackberry. Feels hard, tannic and gritty, with burnt meat and roasted berry flavors. Herbal and extreme as a whole. 500 cases made.",Tierras Moradas,San Pedro
"Attractive and fragrant aromas of yellow peach, honeysuckle and white grape juice lead, while the citrus-driven palate ends crisp and lifted. Medium weight, with balanced acidity and a tangy finish; drink now.",Les Piliers,Michel Gassier
"Pretty soft, in the manner of Paso Robles, and a little overripe, with a raisiny taste. But it's nice and dry and smooth in tannins, with rich blackberry fruit.",,Castoro Cellars
"This delivers jammy aromas of blackberry, cherry liqueur and light clove. It's easy, with a quick, fresh finish.",Ancilla,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"Aromas of baked black fruit, rubber and herb set up an edgy, zesty palate with a buttery oak flavor running side by side with roasted berry and cassis. Short, oaky and basic on the finish, with drying tannins.",Reserve Assemblage Cabernet Sauvignon-Carménère-Petit Verdot,Estampa
"Here's a fantastic value wine with a clean, simple delivery and a fruit-driven mouthfeel that is fueled by raspberry, cassis and cranberry. It's crisp and fresh on the close and will pair with grilled vegetables or fish couscous.",,Farnese
"Red berries dominate this juicy, concentrated wine. It is packed with fruit flavors, while the tannins from the ripe Merlot are soft and well integrated into the background.",Diablère,Domaine les Riquets
"Smoky and toasty on the nose, which isn't something you normally find in a $10 wine. The palate feel is tomatoey and pinched, with narrowing acidity driving tomato, baking spice and zesty berry flavors. Finishes with herbal notes and acid-driven length.",,Cono Sur
"Attractive flavors of red fruit mixed with soft tannins give this wine a very approachable feel. With spice notes from having been aged in wood and its fruity character, this wine is ready to drink now.",Monte Velho Tinto,Herdade do Esporão
"Riesling's growing popularity has led to a number of recent brand introductions, like this one. It's light in body, with a wiry intensity to its acids and crisp green apple, lime and wet stone notes. Drink it over the next year.",Medium Sweet,blüfeld
"Here's a solid and satisfying Merlot, boasting bright notes of blackberry and plum laced with accents of carnation potpourri. Medium tannins give structure to the palate, and the slightly lifted finish ends clean.",,Barrière Frères
"Produced from organically farmed grapes, this wine opens with aromas of black fruit, spice, wet earth and tobacco leaf. It shows a bright, crisp point of red cherry on the close.",Bricco al Sole,Cantine Volpi
"Pineapple and mango flavors lead off a wine that is soft and rounded. Its acidity is muted by the ripe fruit, although there is a good zingy mineral edge. A seafood friendly style of wine.",Branco,Alente
"A ripe, soft, fruity wine that has red-berry flavors, with a hint of spice from having spent time in wood, and attractive acidity. It's immediately appealing and needs no further aging.",Meia Encosta,Borges
"There's a nice yellow-flower character to the red-apple and nectarine aromas. The medium-weight mouth turns a bit sweeter than the nose suggests, with ripe tropical-fruit flavors that continues through to the finish. Drink now.",Réserve St. Martin,Les Vignerons de la Méditerranée
"An everyday sort of Pinot Noir, soft and juicy in raspberries and cherries, with a kiss of oak. It has a nice, silky mouthfeel.",Heritage Reserve,Lyeth
"Thin fruit, with a canned pea scent and a hint of the veggies.",Arena Valley Vineyard,Snake River
"Aggressively oaky in the nose, it follows with a buttery, oaky palate that shows little fruit beyond green-apple tartness.",,Torii Mor
"Thanks to a large case production and low retail price, Podere is a classic Italian value wine to drink with pasta or pizza. It shows easy aromas of spice, cherry and white pepper, and closes with sour, fresh fruit.",Podere,Umani Ronchi
"Tart to the point of sour, this has highly acidic grapefruit and lemon flavors dominating. With the right food__erhaps oysters__t could work nicely. As a standalone it is strictly for acid-lovers.",,Methven Family Vineyards
"Mixed and unintegrated scents of cracker, mint, apple and soap lead into a fruity wine of modest proportions.",,William Augustus
"An herbal, vegetal wine, its acidity is very citrusy and crisp. There is a bite of asparagus and bell pepper.",,Domaine Vico
"Dainty wisps of white flower scents come and go in the bouquet, fighting for recognition beyond the ripe pear and melon aromas and flavors. A pinch of sweet spice flavor unfolds on the close, mixing with a sweet orange-oil essence.",Val de L'Ours,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"Lightly toasted aromas of lemon and tropical fruits meet all the basic requirements of good Chardonnay. The palate is quite tangy and forward, with lemony acidity and flavors of lemon, orange rind and nettle. Average on the finish.",Special Selection,El Huique
"Leafy and herbal on the nose, with light berry aromas, tomato and basil. Shows pretty good body and balance despite some stickiness, with herb, red bell pepper, spice and berry flavors. A little oaky on the finish.",Estate Reserva,Errazuriz
"Fruit stars front and center in this crisply clean, young Pinot Grigio. The mouth is flooded with ripe pineapples, Meyer lemons, kiwis, white peaches and honey.",,Ferrari-Carano
"This blush wine shows plenty of Merlot fruit in the form of cherries and raspberries. It's slightly sweet to off-dry, with pleasant acidity providing balance.",White,Forest Glen
"Degani's youthful base Amarone opens with smoky aromas of exotic spice, leather and cured meat. In the mouth, the wine shows loads of luscious, sweet fruit with cinnamon and vanilla highlights.",,Degani
"The Caterina Zardini Valpolicella shows a modern touch with richly textured tannins and loads of bright fruit intensity. Pair this soft, dense wine with steak and pepper sauce.",Caterina Zardini,Giuseppe Campagnola
"California Riesling seems to be making a comeback and if it is, it's thanks to inexpensive but wonderful wines like this. It's dryish to off dry, with beautiful acidity and delicious flavors of citrus fruits, green apples, pears, honeyed jasmine tea and vanilla bean. Just beautiful for drinking now.",,Firestone
"Amarone I Quadretti opens with loads of ripe fruit, strawberry and exotic spice. The wine is packed tight with power and intensity and the mouthfeel is accented by luscious cherry, clove, leather, mineral and cola.",I Quadretti,La Giaretta
"Medium bodied and firmly structured, this stands apart from many Australian Shiraz for those characteristics. It also boasts scents of leather, cedar and vanilla on the nose, backed by flavors of plum and black cherry. The leathery notes re-emerge on the finish alongside mouth-watering fruit. Drink now_2020.",,Taltarni
"Tough, dry and gritty in tannins and acids, a young, fresh wine with jammy raspberry, cherry, buttered oak and spice flavors. Tastes a bit direct, like a fruit cola drink. But there's an elegant purity and inherent finesse that suggest this Pinot Noir might do interesting things over the next six years. Could improve dramatically.",La Encantada Vineyard,Saudade
"Here's a solid, thickly extracted Amarone that opens with sweet aromas of black cherry, vanilla, chocolate fudge and cinnamon stick. Aging in large oak casks has given this wine a soft, supple feel on the close.",La Bastia Ca' de' Rocchi,Tinazzi
"A unique and rare varietal expression of this obscure southern Rhône grape, here blended with 20% Syrah. It's tart and racy, somewhat Italian in style, a bit like a young Dolcetto. Cranberry fruit, baking spices, powdered sugar and bitter chocolate notes dot the flavor landscape. It's the strong natural acidity that really sets the wine in motion and keeps the alcohol at bay.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,McCrea Cellars
"A good exemplar of Cabernet grown in this important winegrowing region south of San Francisco. It's a perfect wine to drink now for its dryness, tannic balance and classic blackberry, black currant and raisin flavors.",Saratoga Cuvee,Mount Eden
"This opulent Amarone goes over the top with high alcohol and incredibly intense aromas of cherry liqueur, white mushroom, exotic spice and A1 steak sauce. Wood flavors of vanilla and toast sit heavy on the palate.",,Montecariano
"This young tawny, actually garnet in color, is warm and supple. And although this easygoing tawny lacks a bit of complexity, it boasts ample, mouthfilling flavors of black cherry, plum and chocolate.",Tawny,R.L. Buller & Son
"Among the heavier, softer and more extracted of the winery's fall offerings. It shows the ripeness and full-bodied richness of the block, with powerful cherry, pomegranate, cola and spice flavors, and is very dry and classically proportioned. But it's not the greatest Riverblock ever. Drink now_2015.",Rochioli Riverblock,Williams Selyem
"An intense, fruity wine, with concentrated steely, stony flavors. Initially austere, it opens into fine, ripe aromas. But it remains on the dry, crisp side, a definite food wine. Needs 2_3 years of aging.",Les Murailles,Dopff & Irion
"This sees 12 months of oak aging for extra layers of spice, leather and tobacco that sit over a solid base of red fruit and cherry cola. A really nice wine. this is plush and dense in the mouth with a long, succulent finish.",Caterina Zardini,Giuseppe Campagnola
"Full and lush in the mouth, Grant Burge's 10 Year Old is incredibly easy to drink. The toffee and dried fruit notes are lively and fresh, accented by a hint of peppery spice on the finish. A nice change up for those used to tawny Port.",10 Year Old Oak Matured Port Wine,Grant Burge
"Despite its alcohol, this is actually a delicate, stylish, lemon-scented wine. There is an attractive perfume that shines through the oil and mineral texture. A great food wine.",V,Herdade do Esporão
"Oaky on the nose, but with the ripe firm fruit to support the barrel flavors, this hits the palate bang on with a powerful load of ripe apple, stone fruits, toast, spice and plain old oak. It's a style that is becoming standard for Ste. Michelle Chardonnays, a forceful, very ripe, big flavor approach that may benefit from decanting in order to smooth it out.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Released only in exceptional vintages, Cave Spring's Beamsville CSV is a model expression of Canadian Riesling. Perfumed, but not at all cloying, the scent of white, waxy florals and fresh lavender combine effortlessly with notes of honey and petrol on the nose. Florals and petrol persist on the palate as well, melting into sweet white grapefruit juice and a slightly saline, lime pith finish that proves exceptionally refreshing.",CSV,Cave Spring
"There's a perfumed, oaky quality to this wine that translates into mesquite, barbecue, sandalwood and fragrant church incense. Loads of black fruit appears at the back and Mithas shows firm texture with polished tannins.",Mithas,Corte Sant' Alda
"Shows the exoticness of Viognier, with crisp acidity and a dry minerality that gets the tastebuds whistling. The lime, quince, apricot, white flower and woodspice flavors finish with the tart briskness of a Sauvignon Blanc, only more opulent.",3CV Vogelzang Vineyard,Cimarone
"A delicious example of Costières de Nîmes, this blend of 80% Syrah and 20% Grenache combines bright raspberry fruit with hints of garrigue for a taste experience that's notable for its complexity. The tannins are supple, while the long finish features hints of chocolate. The review is of the __hite label_ wine, but the importer claims the wine is identical to that under the Cuvée Elisabeth label.",,Domaine Bahourat
"A potent powder keg of a PN with floral aromas, black cherry and toasty oak. The palate is textured but angular, with black cherry flavors, toast and acidic tang. Seems like it plays one note for a bit too long to be considered excellent, but it's showing fine vibrancy and potential.",Ocio,Cono Sur
"An impressive Carmenère for the price. The nose is true to the variety, with tobacco, olive, carob and herbal aromas mixing with ripe berry aromas. It's jammy as well as juicy, and the flavors of black cherry, plum and mocha are healthy and bright. Clean and long on the finish.",Visión,Cono Sur
"This is an elegant, streamlined Amarone with sharp notes of cherry, blueberry, exotic spice, toasted almond and cola. It's tight and raw in the mouth with good power and density.",,Albino Armani
"Long aging in oak has helped give this bright Amarone a smoky, spicy feel. There's plenty of ripe fruit here, mostly cherry and blackberry, and the wine offers pretty mineral tones on the close.",,Aldegheri
"Big, bold wine, with few concessions, this is richly fruity, its ripe fruits bolstered by tannins. The pepper from the alcohol does intrude, giving an overheated feel to what is otherwise a powerful, fruit-driven wine.",Cape Roca Lighthouse,Casca Wines
"A smoothly rich wine, dry but rounded with tropical peach and apricot flavors that roll off the tongue. There's a smoky character, while the acidity only shows through in the aftertaste. Richness pervades throughout.",Clos Rebberg Aix Vignes,Marc Kreydenweiss
"Very black in color, this is a dark and powerful wine. Its texture is treacly, opulent, the big spice, plum juice and raisin character powering through the tannins. Like most of the Julian Reynolds range, it has an old-fashioned barnyard feel, making it a great food wine, but not for sipping.",Reserva,Julian Reynolds
"Here's a solid Cabernet for drinking now and over the next few years. It's dry and full-bodied, with classic flavors of blackberries and cassis, liberally oaked. It's tight right out of the bottle, so give it a long decant.",,Kuleto Estate
"This is a hearty and determined wine that is characterized by a sweet vein of raspberry jam, candied fruit, cinnamon and Christmas spice. It feels soft and velvety on the close and would pair with a fragrant meat dish such as caramelized onion and sausage with fennel seed.",,L'Arco
"A wine with only natural sulfur, it feels lean, with piercing acidity and firm tannins. It is young and all the elements should fall into place, but with the fruit's stalky character the wine will always be dry.",Sans Soufre Ajouté,Henri Milan
"Bearing in mind that pink Ports lend themselves as a cocktail ingredient, the neutral character of this sweet wine is just right. Hinting at strawberry flavors and a soft texture, it is ready to drink.",Pink,Croft
"Bubble gum and hard-candy aromas open things up, and after that the nose is pretty sharp and piercing. Feels zesty and forward, with ample oak creating flavors of mocha and vanilla to go with standard berry. Dry, peppery and a little scratchy on the finish.",Reserva,Casa Silva
"There's a sour note in this wine that is followed by aromas of forest fruit and spice. It's simple and clean, with an easy, no-fuss personality.",Fonte Venna,Il Feuduccio Di S. Maria D'Orni
"Creamy and sweet on the bouquet, with pear and apple aromas and toasty oak that includes the scent of cinnamon. Feels weighty, maybe a bit mealy, with matching flavors of melon and citrus that are sweet and pithy. Modest on the finish, it's pleasant as a whole.",Gran Reserva,Indomita
"A middle-tier wine that's honest and good for the money. Smells of spunky citrus fruit and vanilla, then offers a tight, minerally palate with a mix of white peach, lemon and lime flavors. Crisp and quick on the finish, with a lemony aftertaste.",Wetland Winemaker's Selection,Yali
"Broad across the palate, this brings flavors of orange soda and orange candy, with a grainy impression. It's fruit forward, with a quick fade.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"Light and reserved on the nose, with a hint of green apple and minerality but that's it. Feels citrusy and tangy, with lean, fresh flavors of lemon-lime and lettuce. Mild citric acidity keeps things lively on the finish.",Culpeo Made with Organic Grapes,Viña La Fortuna
"Neutral up front except for sweet cherry and plum aromas. Feels full and grabby, with biting tannins pushing dark, baked flavors of earthy black fruits and chocolate. Grabby and resiny on the oaky but short finish. Feels hard but tastes good.",Urban Maule,O. Fournier
"The chilly 2010 vintage was not kind to Spring Mountain's Sauvignon Blanc. The wine is unripe, despite oak and sur lie aging, featuring green flavors that can charitably be described as gooseberry. This is a frequent problem with this wine, which is so vintage dependent.",Estate,Spring Mountain Vineyard
"A lean, rather severe wine initially that pushes its bitter chocolate and tannic character. Only slowly does its ripe berry fruit come through to give a fuller texture. At the end, more juicy cranberry flavors appear.",,Quinta do Casal Branco
"A blend of Douro grapes, this wine is earthy and lightweight. While it does make an attractively fruity wine, it misses the extra dimension of wood.",Unoaked,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"Blackberry and cassis flood the nose and mouth of this blend, with a touch of greenness and earthy spice adding depth. Gripping tannins take hold on the palate but fade nicely into the tobacco-leaf-tinged finish.",Lily Pad Red,Arrogant Frog
"Bricco al Sole is proudly made with organically grown grapes and exhibits aromas of black fruit, sweet spice and black olive. It's streamlined and fresh on the finish, with a bright berry aftertaste.",Bricco al Sole,Cantine Volpi
"This wine is mild and lightly fruity up front, with aromas of pear, apple, vanilla and other warm-climate standards. Feels round, with pear, peach and white pepper flavors. Turns bitter on the short finish.",Reserva,Casa Silva
"A smooth and soft wine that shows some weight to its ripe apricot and lime flavors. It is rounded, with a slight apple-skin texture, and is ready to drink. Screwcap.",Cape Roca Fish,Casca Wines
"This Sangiovese shows a dark-ruby color and sweet aromas of berry fruit, strawberry and blueberry. It tastes soft and ripe, with a hint of toasted nut on the close.",,Farnese
"With a dark, old gold color and rich aromas of apricot honey, this wine promises to reward with opulence. But it doesn't live up to the advance billing. It's extraordinarily sweet, yet the citrus and apricot fruit is curiously thin and fleeting.",El Dorado Gold,Ferrari-Carano
"A light, bright and breezy wine with an attractive citrus character and tight acidity. Great for an apéritif or with shellfish.",Monte Velho Branco,Herdade do Esporão
"A fresh wine that's ready to drink now with bright notes of red cherry and currant. Juicy and easy on the palate, with a finish that offers the slightest hint of mocha richness.",,Les Jamelles
"Scented with green gooseberry aromas, this 100% Sauvignon Blanc isn't for everyone. It's enriched by citrus and peach fruit, and by creamy lees and a touch of oak.",Estate Grown Dry,Grgich Hills
"Pretty good for a California-appellated Pinot Noir at this price. Dry and silky, it shows pretty flavors of cherries and spices, with a nice, silky texture.",,Hangtime
"Light and tart, this simple and fruity style has hard candy flavors of sour cherry and raspberry. A fun wine, straightforward and good for chilling.",,Devorah Creek
"A perfect example of what's fueling the Moscato craze in America. This wine is pretty sweet in citrus, peach, honey and vanilla flavors that are brightened by zesty acidity. Easy to drink glass after glass.",,Forest Glen
"Reasonably accurate on the nose for Leyda Sauvignon Blanc, but also a little pickled smelling. Feels chunky and a little flat, with mild flavors of green apple and citrus. Finishes somewhat bitter, like walnut or almond skins, with a green-banana flavor.",Centauri,O. Fournier
"It's a bit chunky for a Mosel Riesling, but this wine also offers enough in the way of semisweet lime and pineapple flavors to compensate. There's a hint of struck flint on the nose and a slightly custardy texture. Drink now.",,St. Gabriel
"This wine opens with ripe berry tones and light touches of moist earth and dried beef. It's simple but clean, and finishes with a bright cherry accent.",Il Poggio dei Vigneti,Natale Verga
"A light and fruity style of Vinho Verde, its acidity balanced with pear and white-currant notes. Lemon flavors cut through, adding brightness.",Terras de Felgueiras,Vercoope
"A soft and creamy wine. It has baked apple and perfume notes, with an attractive, crisp aftertaste. Made from Alvarinho grown in the northern subregion of Vinho Verde, this wine could age a few months.",Estreia Grande Escolha,Viniverde
Sharp aromas of white cherry and bramble open the nose of this ruby-colored Negroamaro. The wine does boast bright acidity and some sourness that should pair with fried rice balls stuffed with cheesy mozzarella.,,Vita Italia
Elegantly wood-aged wine that has fresh acidity along with toasty pear juice and a rich cream texture. It has an attractive nutmeg edge to go with its tangy aftertaste.,Vila Santa Reserva Branco,J. Portugal Ramos
"From a vineyard right in the middle of the valley comes this dry, smooth Pinot Noir. It's front-loaded with raspberry, cherry and strawberry flavors, enriched with new oak and structured with firm tannins. Yet the mouthfeel is silky and light. Drink now and through 2013.",Orsi Vineyard,Perception
"A very good Pinot Noir, bone dry and full-bodied, with a clean mouthfeel and a long, spicy finish. It's tannic, giving an astringent bite to the cherry, cola, mushroom, tobacco and balsam flavors. Give it a year or two to mellow.",Sea Change,Vine Hill
"With just a hint of oak, this Chardonnay is all about fruit and acidity. It's dry and crisp, with a firm, clean mouthfeel, and pleasant citrus, apple, pear and mineral flavors.",Karia,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"This smooth, full-bodied wine offers plum jam flavors, concentration, with hints of herbs, sweet berries, laced with acidity. From the Herdade das Servas vineyards near the marble quarries of Estremoz, this is worth aging for two years.",Monte das Servas Escolha,Serrano Mira
"This is a tame Amarone that delivers intensity but not too much heft or density, and that ultimately makes this a very food-friendly option. It drinks very well with loads of berry freshness and a soft, velvety finish.",,Rubinelli Vajol
"This is unlike any other Valpolicella Superiore available. It drinks like a Ripasso, or even an Amarone, with soft, luscious flavors and ripe aromas of black cherry and chocolate. The density and intensity are impressive indeed.",,Marion
"Monteci's base Amarone delivers better integration of alcohol with strong aromas of black cherry, Indian spice, suede and toasted chestnut. It's a smooth, rich and finely-textured wine with a long, luscious finish.",,Monteci
"A linear, dry style of Port, structured and assured. It has richness, of course, with flavors of dried fruits, dark black cherries and acidity. Even though it is an LBV, it could certainly age for a few years.",Late Bottled Vintage,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"Big and forceful, with dark, penetrating aromas of oak, cedar, stocky blackberry and spice. The palate is pure and deep, with savory plum, berry, herb, vanilla and tea flavors. Finishes smooth and classy, with a dry, clean ending. Gets it right; a very good Bierzo red for under $20.",Roble,Abad Dom Bueno
"There are few points of reference for this hugely intense sweet Monastrell. It's deep and purple, with concentrated, fresh raisin aromas, licorice and berry syrup. Entirely rich and unctuous, with caramel, toffee and reduced berry flavors. Like P.X. but red; serve with chocolate and/or a smooth, potent cheese.",Dulce,Bodegas Silvano Garcia
"There's a pretty smoky element to this wine that comes off as cured beef or bresaola backed by graphite and ground slate. From the faraway 2001 vintage, the wine boasts elegant tertiary aromas of cola, black licorice and candied fruit with some sweetness on the close. Drink now.",,Bonazzi
"A very round wine that offers a luscious, lip-smacking experience of rich fruits, sweet berries and soft tannins. The wine certainly has power, but even as a Grande Reserva, is unlikely to age. At the end, it is showy, not complex.",Monte Cascas Grande Reserva,Casca Wines
"Rich and soft, very smooth, this Alentejo version of Tinta Roriz in the Douro is ripe, rounded, full. It has tannins, although these integrate well with the rounded texture. There is a sense of power, but not overwhelming.",Vila Santa,J. Portugal Ramos
"Opens oakier than the younger '05, with coffee, toffee and mocha aromas along with touches of olive and green tobacco. The wine has a full, robust, tannic feel and deep, sweet berry and cassis flavors. Huge, saturated and rocky due to the tannins, but really good. Cabernet Sauvignon, Carmenère, Monastrell and Tempranillo is the mix.",Conde de Superunda,Miguel Torres
"A richer than usual  Crémant, ripe and full-bodied, with great pear and ripe apple flavors over soft acidity. There is a delicious mouthfeel, very mellifluous and rounded, with just the right acidity to give final crispness.",,Mittnacht Frères
"Toasty, floral, big and full, with dark-cherry aromas, herbal notes and a touch of astingency. The palate is bold and firm, while the flavors of black cherry, black currant, cocoa and tea are likable and bring only a moderate amount of herbal character. Finishes smooth, rich and chocolaty.",Cuvée,Misiones de Rengo
"A delicious Pinot Noir. Few wines in the world are as rich as this in fruit. Just dazzles with an explosion of raspberries and cherries, so sweet and refined, sprinkled with cinnamon, brown sugar and white pepper. Nothing complicated, but easy to drink now.",Emily's Cuvée,Mueller
"A pretty lemon yellow, this organically-grown estate reserve has juicy natural acidity, and tight, tart citrus fruit that zips around lemon, lime, white peach and a hint of pineapple. The barrel flavors are generous but not overblown, and the structure suggests it will keep well for 6_8 years.",Reserve,Gordon Brothers
"Villa Rizzardi offers a traditional interpretation of Amarone with a leaner consistency than most and brighter aromas of forest berry, white cherry, raspberry and almond. It feels smooth and clean and would pair with spicy sausage.",Villa Rizzardi,Guerrieri Rizzardi
"This ripe and plump Amarone delivers mature berry aromas with loads of raspberry, blueberry and cherry. The wine is soft and velvety with very good staying power and density.",Le Quare,Gamba
"The Tadpole Shiraz is Gemtree's entry-level offering, but it's still a fine effort, with predominantly plummy flavors, but enough of a savory edge to keep it from being simply jammy. Tannins are creamy-soft, making for immediate accessibility. Drink now.",Tadpole,Gemtree
"Not showing well now, a dry, tartly acidic wine with jammy blackberry and cherry flavors. Feels sharp and angular and fresh. The grapes come from the mountain estate vineyard, and the wine could develop bottle complexity over the years. Best to cellar for a good 5_6 years and try again.",Native Son,Kuleto Estate
"Here's a very nice Amarone that moves slowly over the palate imparting aromas of red fruit, plum, cinnamon and clove along the way. Only that bitter touch of acidity on the end is slightly out of place.",,La Giaretta
"Rich and sweet, with raisin and mushroomy notes and a fair bit of rancio character. Long and sticky on the finish.",Grand,Seppeltsfield
"This hearty Valpolicella opens with meaty tones of cured beef, cola, teriyaki sauce and mesquite smoke. It's a rich, smooth wine with a polished finish and loads of fruit intensity on the very long fade.",,Roccolo Grassi
"Amarone Il Sestante from the Monte Masua vineyard cru delivers loads of jammy fruit with plush tones of cherry maraschino, blackberry, spice, leather and moist earth. There's a plush organic feel and the wine glides over the palate with sweet, syrupy persistency.",Il Sestante Monte Masua,Tommasi
"Black currant and white plums give this wine its fresh edge and its richness. It has an opulent feel to it, with concentrated spice inside the round texture. The end brings out the relief of crisp acidity.",Réserve,Willm
"Aged in large oak casks, this dark and thickly extracted Ripasso does a nice job of integrating mature black fruit aromas with spice and tobacco. The oak element is nicely tucked in the background and the wine shows bright fruit flavors in the mouth as well.",,Vigneti Villabella
"This is a masculine and austere Amarone with deep tones of blackberry, prune, black chocolate, clove, cardamom and smoky touches of tar and resin. Drying mineral notes appear in the mouth and provide for a very pretty contrast against the wine's succulent, sweet fruit flavors.",Vigneto Calandra di Romagnano,Zecchini
"Minty aromas include whiffs of cola, bramble, animal fur and berry fruit. Feels creamy and solid, with standard berry fruit flavors, minty herbal notes and blatant oak. Finishes green and simple; a good representation of basic Carmenère.",Reserva,Rios de Chile
"There is a somewhat disjointed aspect to the mouthfeel of this wine, and some light and unusual floral scents that don't follow through as flavors. Clean, simple fruit and light cracker flavors come and go rather quickly. Two bottles tasted.",Truffle Hill,Left Coast Cellars
A lovely floral streak adds interest to the bright red-berry and ripe rhubarb aromas. Cherry-skin and rich strawberry flavors fill the palate and remain through the clean finish. Light weight with soft tannins and an easy demeanor.,Réserve St. Martin,Les Vignerons de la Méditerranée
"This is a crisp, fresh and fruity rosé, made from Touriga Nacional in the same region where Vinho Verde is produced. It's vivid acidity is bright, with raspberry flavors and low alcohol.",,Quinta de Santa Maria
"Here's a fresh, informal and food-friendly wine that begs for pizza or take-out. The wine shows simple but pristine aromas of red cherry and plum.",,Capestrano
"Raspberry aromas mix with herbs and earth to give off a typically Chilean Cabernet bouquet. Feels sticky and a little grabby, with mild acidity and rubbery flavors of black cherry and herbs. Blends sweet fruit with green, herbal notes.",Gran Toqui,Casas del Toqui
"Very herbaceous and green, this wine has intense aromas of grapefruit and white currant. Some softer flavors come from kiwi and bright green apples. Drink now.",,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Quite aromatic and fruit-forward, with seductive scents of ripe lychees and peaches in syrup alongside some crushed rose-petal accents. The palate shows a bit more balance, with lemon peel flavors that mingle on the slightly astringent finish.",,Cuvée de Peña
"Simple and a bit light, this brings brambly berry and garrigue-like herbal flavors, all done in a clean, approachable style. It lacks the concentration and meatiness of the better Northwest Syrahs, but it's perfectly serviceable for everyday consumption.",,Del Rio
This dessert wine is richly honeyed in raspberries and cherries. It appeals to the human taste for its sweetness and modest fruity concentration.,El Dorado Noir,Ferrari-Carano
"The lightly intense bouquet is laced with nuances of hard, underripe peach, yellow flower and a soft mineral streak. Medium weight but fresh and lively, with a clean, slightly tart finish reminiscent of lemon and green plum flavors.",La Violette,Jean-Luc Colombo
"Light and chocolaty, this carries a strong and distinctive scent and flavor of cinnamon spice. On the palate, the flavors suggest strawberries, with a quick-to-fade finish.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"Dense and dark, with a full wave of herbs, leather and wild-berry aromas. Feels snappy and a touch high in acidity, thus the overall mouthfeel is clacky. Tastes of tomato, red plum and herbs, while the finish is saucy like an Italian ragu.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"The deep red-black color reaches from core to rim. The fragrant nose centers around hot chocolate and candied cherries. Dry on the attack with adequate acidity, the wine shows moderate extraction and medium alcohol that lead to a short finish.",,Villa Noria
"Dark, toasty and leathery on the nose, but also earthy, rubbery and herbal. Shows good body on the palate, with oaky, lightly medicinal flavors of herbal plum and raspberry. The finish lingers, with herbal flavors and a healthy feel.",La Palma Reserva,Viña La Rosa
"The flavors of cherry pie, sandalwood and spice are ripe and delicious, but this Pinot is a little off in the mouthfeel. It's jagged and rude. Decent, but ready to drink now.",Spring Hill Vineyard,Waxwing
"This no-fuss Montepulciano d'Abruzzo should pair with pizza or grilled sausages, thanks to its simple array of fresh berry aromas. There's are sweet touches of ripe cherry and cinnamon on the close.",,Spinelli
"Jammy strawberry and raspberry notes fill the nose and mouth, and a soft accent of chocolate-covered cherry adds just the right amount of decadence. A slight peppery lift keeps things vibrant on the finish.",,The Frenchhouse
"A solid everyday Chardonnay, showing good pineapple, peach and pear flavors, with a nice edge of buttered toast and vanilla.",,Stickybeak
"Earthy aromas lead to a wine that is closed, tight and very firm. It has tough tannins that mask the jellied red-fruit flavors, but should soften in a year, revealing a more juicy character.",Bridão,Adega Cooperativa do Cartaxo
An unfussy Syrah with black raspberry flavors and subtle use of oak. It finishes short.,,Bonterra
"A soft, somewhat simple wine, with earthy flavors of cherries, herbs and oak. Easy to drink with everyday fare.",,Lang & Reed
"Is there a harder variety to get right in California than Grenache? Probably not. This wine tries hard, but it can't rise above a certain simplicity of cherry fruit.",,Feliz Noche
"So sugary sweet, it might be a dessert wine. A blend of Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc, Muscat Canelli and Gewürztraminer, it's fruity and spicy and honeyed, brightened with crisp acidity.",Bella Luna,Ferrari-Carano
"A big-hearted wine, despite its modest alcohol. This character comes from the bold fruitiness__lackberry and sweet plum flavors__nderpinned with acidity and a light touch of tannins. Ready to drink.",Paxis Tinto,DFJ Vinhos
"Made from Malbec, this is a full-bodied, dry rosé, with ripe strawberry fruit. It has the acidity that carries the wine, but is more of a food rosé than an apéritif.",Bouquet de Cavagnac,Domaine de Cause
"Aromatic and crisp wine, with refreshing green and pineapple fruit flavors. This wine is as bright as a button; it's light, refreshing and ready to drink. Screwcap.",,Domaine de Ménard
"Full in style, with sweet aromas of black fruit. Feels chunky, with fatty tasting oak leading herbal, simple flavors of blackberry and dark plum. A ripe wine with a round mouthfeel but not much in the way of elegance or refinement.",Single Vineyard,Chilcas
"A blend of mostly Montepulciano, with a small percentage of other indigenous varieties, this wine offers easy berry aromas of ripe raspberry and blackberry, backed by a soft, velvety mouthfeel. It finishes with a bright feeling.",Venas,Cantine Cipressi
"Sweet opening aromatics suggest a box of animal crackers along with lemon peel, banana and vanilla bean. Feels full, but good acidity prevents it from seeming flabby. Flavors of vanilla, lychee and melon are interesting, while the finish turns bitter and pithy.",Reserva,Casa Silva
"A smooth operator with peach, botrytis and flower-blossom aromas. The palate offers flow and a fine mouthfeel, and the flavors of orange, apricot and mango are fresh and tasty. A thorough late-harvest wine that should elicit a smile.",Late Harvest,La Playa
"Opens sweet and borderline syrupy, but also dark, earthy and candied, with nothing offensive or too herbal. The palate is jammy and rich, with soft tannins, saturation, black-fruit flavors, chocolate and herbal flavors. Finishes sweet and sticky, with coffee and some mint. Very nice wine but also so ripe that the varietal character is vague.",Cuvée Alexandre Apalta Vineyard,Lapostolle
"Here's a base Amarone that shows more balance and elegance than this estate's Riserva expression. Meaty notes of ripe cherry and blackberry jam are matched by lively tones of spice, tobacco and leather.",,Musella
"Capitel della Crosara opens with polished berry nuances as well as cinnamon, ginger, cola and herb. It's a lighter, brighter interpretation of Amarone with a crisp, clean close.",Capitel della Crosara,Montresor
"A big, chewy Zinfandel that'll throw you on the ground and lather you in berry-incased tannins, peppery body and all-out lusciousness. All the fruit comes from Shake Ridge Ranch, Ann Kraemer's rock-star vineyard, from a trio of clones (Heart's Desire, Mendo and Monte Rosso) and the 12% Petite Sirah adds a dusty backdrop to the finish, which also surprises with a touch of licorice. The oak is present, in a good way.",Vineyard Select Series,Newsome-Harlow
"Novelty Hill's Merlot includes 6% Cabernet Sauvignon and a splash of Cab Franc; the wine is beautifully proportioned and silky in the mouth. Smooth fruits mix berries with chocolate, all buoyed up on just the right amount of acidity. This is elegant and pretty, more than a powerful wine, but there is plenty of ripe fruit flavor and a pat of buttery toast in the finish.",,Novelty Hill
"Roccolo Grassi has produced a beautifully concentrated and oak-aged Valpolicella that shows sophisticated aromas of mature fruit, spice, cola and barbecue sauce. The wine is rich and supple with a long, smooth finish.",,Roccolo Grassi
"Light, elegant and hinting at lemon-lime on the bouquet. The mouth is mellow, complete and not the least bit aggressive, with peach and melon flavors that turn drier and mildly pithy on the finish. Well-executed and elegant cava, but simple in its totality because it's brut nature.",Leopardi Brut Nature,Llopart
"Aromas of prunes and figs introduce a big, thick, chewy Cabernet with plenty of fruit power. Black raspberry, black cherry and black currant fruits swirl through layers of smoky wood. Tannins are quite astringent and drying.",,Boudreaux Cellars
"Ripe and luscious, with flavors of pear and peach, this is rather fleshy for Riesling. Moderate acidity and a hint of sugar in the full-bodied finish.",Gamache Vineyard,Boudreaux Cellars
"Amarone San Giorgio has shown great improvement over the past few vintages and this expression is redolent of blackberry, spice, leather, mature cherry and Spanish cedar. There's harmony and elegance here, followed by a big, chewy mouthfeel.",San Giorgio,Carlo Boscaini
"This medium-bodied red displays an array of dried spices alongside ample black-cherry fruit. It's fresher and firmer than the 2007 (also reviewed this month), featuring some slightly dusty tannins on the finish. Drink now_2015 or so.",Rasteau,Château du Trignon
"The Quiot family's Château du Trignon is located in Gigondas, but has holdings in several nearby villages. The 2007 Rasteau is rather fruit driven (cherries and plums), but manages to fold in hints of chocolate, anise and French roast. Supple on the finish. Drink now_2015.",Rasteau,Château du Trignon
"The bouquet of cassis, blackberry and controlled oak is welcoming, while the palate shows a spot of piercing acidity along with snappy black cherry, cassis and light olive flavors. This is a quintessential Chilean Cab with a hint of herbal character but also bold color, power and very good fruit quality.",Los Vascos Reserve,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"This is an average of 21 years old, making it the rough equivalent of a 20-year-old tawny Port, but in a softer, fruitier style. Brown sugar and baking spices mark the nose, followed by flavors of fig, date, cinnamon and walnut. It's full bodied and richly concentrated, spicy and warming on the finish.",Old Boys Very Old Fine Tawny,De Bortoli
"Farina's sweet-smelling Amarone spends time in large oak casks for additional aromas of spice, leather and toasted walnut. At the core are bright fruit tones of blackberry, cassis and lingering cherry cola that add flavorful accents to what is a smooth and silky mouthfeel overall.",,Farina
"Thank goodness some wineries continue to be dedicated to Gewürz, and Firestone deserves special mention for producing this dry, elegant and affordable bottling. There's nothing like its spicy, exotic fruit and flower flavors.",,Firestone
"Amarone Corte Giara offers an informal but very approachable alternative to more austere and muscular interpretations of the wine. This is a smooth, food-friendly blend from Verona with bright aromas of cherry, dried cassis and spice.",Corte Giara,Allegrini
"A densely tannic wine, chocolate and bitter coffee layered with dark fruit and a ripe, spicy edge. Pepper comes from the alcohol, but this is still a richly juicy wine, full of fruit, finishing with acidity.",Premium,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Starts off with scents of smoke and yellow plums, then folds in flavors of toasted marshmallow and peach on the palate. This is a medium- to full-bodied Chardonnay that manages to be ripe yet cool and reasonably structured at the same time. It should drink well for the next few years.",Sexton Vineyard,Giant Steps
"Slightly on the jammy and overripe side, this thickly concentrated Amarone offers deep layers of exotic spice, strawberry marmalade, blackberry, tobacco and cedar wood. There's a touch of sweetness in the mouth that is backed by smooth, but thick texture.",Fracastoro,Vigneti Villabella
"A pale tawny in color, this complex sweet wine features notes of honey, fig and citrus. It's silky in texture, even if the alcohol does show through a bit on the finish.",Museum Reserve Antique Tawny,Yalumba
"Tommasi's elegant Ripasso represents an alternative to many of the more densely extracted and exaggerated wines you will find in this category. Aromas include cherry and spice and the wine shows a point of ripe, sweet fruit on the close.",,Tommasi
"Not on a par with the inaugural 2007, but for a rough year this wine brings about as much as it can. The nose is woody, deep, balsamic and herbal, while the body is thick and saturated, with roasted berry, coffee and bitter chocolate flavors. The finish lacks length and character, but it has heft and feel. A commendable effort for a poor vintage.",Almirez,Teso La Monja
"Named after Romanus Albrecht who started the family wine business in 1425, this is a finely perfumed wine, with spice, a rich, soft texture and flavors of pineapple and quince.",Cuvée Romanus,Lucien Albrecht
"This classic Amarone offers characteristic aromas of ripe berry fruit, spice, leather, mesquite and barbecue sauce. Pair this luscious wine with rolled pork and roasted potatoes or another succulent meat dish that meets the consistency and power of this wine.",,Manzini
"A juicy, fruit-forward rendition of Crozes-Hermitage, with game- and herb-tinged cherries and berries. It's medium bodied, with silky tannins that make it immediately approachable. Drink now_2015.",,Domaine Philippe & Vincent Jaboulet
"Attractive in a lush, superripe sort of way, with notes of prune and chocolate amid the brandied cherries. Hints of coffee emerge on the slightly warm finish. Drink this full-bodied red over the next few years.",Prestige Cairanne,Domaine Saint Andéol
"Brick in color, turning tawny at the rim, this plump blend of a half-dozen grape varieties displays ample complexity in its notes of caramelized nuts, dried cherries and baking spices. It's a pleasant post-dinner drink, with just the right touch of tannins remaining on the finish.",Old Codger Fine Old Tawny,Dutschke
"There's a bold, extracted and meaty quality to this wine that also exhibits aromas of leather, pipe tobacco, cured meat and jammy blackberry. Oak-driven aromas of spice and wood shavings are very evident and the wine will appeal to those who love a big, masculine style.",La Coeta,Corte Lenguin
"Bright and fresh Vinho Verde, with attractive citrus character and a light fizz over dryness. The wine is just right for summer drinking. Screwcap.",Cape Roca Fisherman,Casca Wines
"Musky, spicy and reasonably complex on the nose, this recent entrant into the ranks of realistically priced Riesling is a bit chunky in the mouth, but offers satisfying apple, melon and citrus flavors.",,Redbreast
"A tart take on Pinot Blanc, with sour peach and pear fruit flavors, finishing slightly bitter with pear skin and a hint of spice.",,Torii Mor
"Buttered toast, caramel, vanilla bean, spice and pineapple and orange jam aromas and flavors mark this wine. It's a little sweet and white sugary on the finish.",,Valley of the Moon
"Crisp apple-green wine with just the right amount of acidity to balance the palate prickle. The wine is dry, laced with citrus.",Via Latina,Vercoope
"While this is lightweight for a Douro wine, it does have a backbone of tannin. It is warm, with its damson jelly flavors giving a reassuring winter feel. The texture shows dusty tannins and a final juicy character. Screwcap.",,Vidigal
"Smells mildly herbal and brambly but overall the nose is composed. Feels textured, creamy and resiny, with flavors of berry and plum accented by sweet oak. Light in feel, but juicy on the finish, with additional oak flavor.",Puerto Viejo Reserve,Viña Requingua
"A respectable effort, Raimund Prüm's 2009 Essence displays fine aromas of honey, citrus and clove blossom. The melon and citrus flavors lack a bit of intensity, yet still finish clean and refreshing. Drink this lightweight wine over the next six months or so.",Essence,S.A. Prüm
"Blended with a splash of Sangiovese and Petite Sirah, presumably for complexity, this is a flavorful wine. It's forward in raspberries, cherries, cola and spices. It's also soft, sweet and simple. Drink up.",,Meadowcroft
"This very dark colored wine is all about young fruit__lack cherries and berries__nd vivid acidity. The tannins are soft, and the wine will be ready to drink this autumn.",Le Fruit,Clos des Terrasses
"Storks have traditionally nested in the tall chimnies of DFJ's winery, and this wine celebrates that. Soft, ripe and easily fruity, it has a light tannic touch, followed by some bright acidity and red-berry flavors. Screwcap.",Storks Landing Tinto,DFJ Vinhos
"Piercing and strange on the bouquet, with pine resin, bathroom cleanser and air freshener. Feels flat and demanding, with melony weight and weird flavors of lychee, green melon and anise. Finishes chalky.",Trisquel,Aresti
"Barnyard aromas offer a wine that is spicy and ripe, with the somewhat hard tannins lending a rustic feel. There is some juicy red fruit that blends with the acidity.",Bridão,Adega Cooperativa do Cartaxo
"There are some rich cherry and raspberry granola flavors in this wine, but it's tired. It lacks the vibrancy to give it life and structure. Drink up.",,Indigené
"This is a light, fresh expression, with foxy notes of fresh grapes, violets, wild strawberries and blueberries. Its bright berry freshness makes this a good appetizer or lunch red wine.",,Capestrano
"A solid and very drinkable wine, the forward black fruit elements are accented by hints of fudge and sweet spice on the finish Drink now.",Réserve St. Martin,Les Vignerons de la Méditerranée
"A common, rustic Merlot. While it shows plenty of jammy cherry and blackberry fruit, it's tannins are jagged, and finishes soft.",Limited Production,Magistrate
"A soft, simple and ripe wine, with attractive notes of white-fruit. The texture is open, with a light touch of acidity and citrus flavors.",Capoeira Branco,Quinta do Casal Branco
__ans Soufre Ajouté_ means without added sulfur; the wine has a considerable sediment that needs time to settle. It is a wine full of ripe fruit and toasted popcorn. It has a round mouthfeel.,Sans Soufre Ajouté,Henri Milan
"A medium-sweet rosé, attractively balanced between strawberry and cream and bright acidity. The wine is soft and rounded and ready to drink.",Domaine Saint-Sernin Rosé Moelleux,Château Saint-Sernin
"Gold in color, with an oily, mealy nose that starts out with petrol and funk and settles if given time. Feels round, with good acidity and oak-led flavors of pithy citrus and melon that finish bitter and stalky. Roughly one-third each of Viognier, Riesling and Chardonnay.",Ona Viognier-Riesling-Chardonnay,Anakena
"A blend of Chardonnay and Fernão Pires, this is light, fruity and ready to drink. Its citrus and white-fruit flavors are soft, open and approachable. Screwcap.",Storks Landing Branco,DFJ Vinhos
"A young, fruity wine with soft tannins and juicy berry fruits. It is forward, very approachable, and is ready to drink with pasta or spicy food.",Coudel Mor,Adega Cooperativa do Cartaxo
"Vanilla and raspberry notes flavor this rosé, with its acidity lending a bright, fresh character. A blend of Castelão and Aragonez, it has the spicy Castelão character with the Aragonez lending this wine some weight.",,Alente
"Rather sweet in style, it has simple, sugary peach, pear, vanilla and honeysuckle flavors.",I=MB2,Indigené
"The little-known Mosel village of Reil is the source of this perplexing wine. It possesses attractive and slightly stony, citrus aromas, and starts off on the sweet side, with bright pineapple fruit. But somewhere on the palate it shifts gears, turning dry and tart almost to the point of being sour.",Reiler Mullay-Hofberg Molun,Melsheimer
"The first impression is of grain and soda crackers. The wine is tart, with a mix of orange peel, baby aspirin and lemon custard flavors. It finishes rather sharp-edged, with a hint of heat, and a lot of acid.",,Methven Family Vineyards
"Roasted and rubbery up front, with additional aromas of grilled beef and black olive. Feels scratchy, with midlevel berry flavors. It finishes with an oaky flavor.",Reserva Privada,Una Uva
"Too oaky, dominated by butterscotch, caramel and buttered popcorn. Somewhere underneath all that you'll find a good, pineapple- and orange-flavored Chardonnay.",,V. Sattui
"As fresh as possible, a wine with some soft sweetness but more of the crisp acidity of Vinho Verde. Bright, lemon scented and clearly ready for the summer.",Pavão,Vercoope
"In keeping with winemaker Steve Webber's moderate-alcohol, food-friendly style, this 2008 is medium in weight, with a silky-textured finish. Although labeled as Shiraz-Viognier, the Viognier component isn't really apparent in the wine, which features more classic Shiraz notes of tar, beef and tapenade. Drink it over the next several years.",Estate Grown,De Bortoli
"Stocky and kind of big on the bouquet, with broad, fat berry fruit aromas and some jamminess. The palate is saturated and jammy, with thick blackberry flavors and roasted fig. Chunky and on the verge of being syrupy, but still really nice in a rich, easy way. Drink now and over the next couple of years.",Señorío de Cuzcurrita,Castillo de Cuzcurrita
"This expressive Amarone is characterized by a distinct mineral tone of slate roof or lead pencil that really sets it apart. Beyond those drying graphite tones are layers of berry fruit, mesquite, cherry cola, spice and even a milky feel. It's a smooth, soft and velvety wine that would pair with stewed lamb or beef.",,Monte Faustino
"With 17.5% alcohol, this is a big, brawny Amarone that should be paired with an appropriately dense and wintery meat dish (like beef or game stew). The vineyard-designate wine is sweet and very succulent with loads of ripe and candied fruit flavors on the chewy, soft finish.",Vigneto Alto,Tommaso Bussola
"Here's a very different, modern approach to Valpolicella in which this otherwise thin and crisp red blend from northern Italy has been transformed (thanks to careful oak aging) into a rich, modern wine. Lingering tones of black cherry and Indian spice flavor the long finish.",La Bandina,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"A beautiful late release from winemaker Steve Shaw, this multifaceted wine is redolent with white flowers and hints of smoke, stones and slate. Dry, but softened by a touch of white peach and limeade sweetness, the palate is refreshing and floral, but balanced by bracing acidity and a backdrop of petrol, smoke and minerality.",,Shaw
"One of the best values on the market now. Totally delicious in raspberries, cherries and pie spices, and so silky. Lovely tannins, crisp acidity, everything about it is likeable. What a great by-the-glass wine for restaurants.",,Siduri
"A wood-aged white, rich and creamy as a consequence of the toast. There is also an attractive perfume from the Moscatel in the blend. White fruits, a hint of nutmeg and fresh final acidity.",Branco,Quinta de Ventozelo
"There's a fresh, buoyant quality to this Amarone that comes across as forest-ripened raspberry and blueberry. Austere aromas of spice, leather and tobacco fill in the background and the wine is dense but not too heavy or thick on the close.",Carnera,Roncolato
This is a very pretty Amarone that shows medium intensity in terms of aromas and elegant tones of ripe fruit and spice. There's a slight tannic bite on the close and the wine spreads long and consistently over the palate.,,Monteci
"Pretty aromatics that include floral notes, light coffee, berry and cherry are just right, and the mouth is juicy and driving, with slightly astringent acids that propel strawberry, raspberry, vanilla and dill flavors. Smooth on the finish despite the wine's vital acidity, and ready to drink with an array of foods.",Crianza,Marqués de Vitoria
"Made with partially dried grapes, Ripassa is a full and generous wine packed tight with ripe fruit, spice and tobacco aromas. It imparts a rich, smooth feel with lingering notes of cinnamon and cherry on the finish.",Ripassa,Zenato
"Vintner Ettore Righetti presents an extremely food-friendly Ripasso that boasts power and concentration, without being too heavy or chewy. Aromas here include cherry maraschino, licorice, tar and dark chocolate.",La Casetta,Domìni Veneti
"Edging towards mineral, this is a perfumed Riesling, its white fruits bright and delicate, fitting well into the crisp acidity. It has a textured bite to it, bringing out the stony character. Worth aging 2_3 years.",,Dopff & Irion
"Corte Rugolin presents an elegant and not overdone Ripasso with pretty aromas of roasted almond, wild berry, cola, leather and tobacco. There's a warm, wintery feel to the wine that would make it a perfect companion to rolled pork or meatloaf.",,Corte Rugolin
"Corte San Benedetto is a small, family run winery and its 2003 Amarone shows ripe notes of black cherry, mesquite, blackberry and soft vanilla. The oak element is evident here; the wine is soft and supple on the close.",,Corte San Benedetto
"Here's a thinner style of Amarone with bright aromas of wild berry, white cherry and toasted almond. The wine is crisp and sharp on the close, with a focused, streamlined feel in the mouth.",,Cottini
"A nicely balanced, easy-drinking tawny, with scents of toffee, dried fruit and nuts, with flavors that still retain a hint of cherries to go with the caramel-like sweetness. This hides its alcohol well, finishing with a sensation of fresh, lipsmacking fruit.",8 Year Old Tawny,De Bortoli
"With about 6% Viognier in the blend, this tart, dry, racy take on Pinot Gris has unusual complexity. Crisp citrus and pear skin, green apple and lemon verbena roll across the palate. There's a crisp minerality to the acids, and a clean, refreshing finish.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"The 2007 Les Launes starts off with a harmonious mix of Mexican chocolate, clove, leather and cherry aromas, and the flavors closely mirror them. The wine is mouthfilling yet fresh, and the only quibble is that the flavors fade a bit quickly on the finish. Drink now_2015.",Les Launes,Delas Frères
"This is 100% varietal, spicy and tart, with fine balance and focus. The fruit trends toward cherry and prune, with an earthy, tannic finish.",Four Vineyards,Arbor Crest
"Rich, soft and fruity, this Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre blend is delightful to drink now. It's totally dry, with interesting berry, cherry, smoked meat, black pepper and sandalwood flavors that are deep and long-lasting.",,Autonom
"Happily the fumé has been discarded and it's simply labeled Sauvignon Blanc, as it should be. The blend includes 6% Sémillon, the wine is finished with a screw cap, and the flavors are crisp and quite refreshing. Melon, grapefruit, a little snippet of pineapple and overall a mouth-cleaning liveliness make this an excellent wine for sipping or with lighter entrées.",,Hogue
"A nice, refreshing Riesling, clean and crisp, with rich flavors of citrus fruits, minerals, honeysuckle and jasmine. The residual sugar is .63%, making it just a litt off-dry. No oak on this polished gem.",Limited Selection,Gainey
"Instead of brawn and muscle, this ruby Ripasso offers elegance and finesse. The nose is redolent of polished black stone, Indian spice and loads of dried cassis and wild berry. There's a playful hint of sweet almond and cinnamon at the end.",Le Quare,Gamba
"An easily accessible, easy-drinking style of Crozes-Hermitage, Ferraton's 2007 La Matinière displays a lovely balance between clean red fruit (cherries, raspberries), baking spices, cracked pepper and a faintly herbal tinge. Drink it now and over the next few years.",La Matinière,Ferraton Pere et Fils
"Pojega is an expressive and polished Ripasso that shows a united aromatic front composed of spice, mature blackberry, leather and sweet tobacco. It delivers power and intensity but not in a heavy or exaggerated way.",Pojega,Guerrieri Rizzardi
"Surprisingly soft for a Riesling, which gives the wine an easy attractiveness. Lively, fresh acidity and green apple and melon flavors follow through to the end, perhaps softened by a sense of the wine being off-dry.",Réserve,Gustave Lorentz
"Hugely black in color, a big-hearted wine that tames the rustic Alicante Bouschet character to produce a densely tannic, spice and damson fruit driven wine. There is perhaps just a touch too much extraction, but there is no question about the force of the wine.",AB,Herdade do Esporão
"Made with fruit from 12-year-old vines, this compact and sharp Amarone shows brambly aromas of wild berry, forest floor and herb. There is mature fruit here, and loads of sweet spice with piquant spice on the close.",,Ca' Rugate
"With its roundness, this wine shows the character of the Loureiro grape. Giving a tweak to the softer element is a burst of fine acidity, a lime juice note and a fresh aftertaste.",Estreia Grande Escolha,Viniverde
"Neutral up front except for some pine and minerality. Feels grippy but highly regular, with apple cider and stalky white-fruit flavors. Resiny and mildly bitter on the finish.",Culpeo Made with Organic Grapes,Viña La Fortuna
"Opens with charred, toasted, leathery aromas. The feel, however, is mild, with herb flavors that incorporate berry and lots of burnt oak. Finishes toasty, with notes of bitter chocolate, clove and a touch of greenness.",,San Elias
"Smooth and rounded with light, perfumed sweetness, this is an easy and approachable wine. Its pear and kiwi flavors come together easily. Screwcap.",Hera,Adega Cooperativa Ponte de Barca
"A wine whose real quality lies in its great fruitiness and open, soft tannins. With just a touch of wood, its stalky black-fruit flavors are all ready to drink. Screwcap.",Cape Roca Fish,Casca Wines
"Vintages of this wine have been variable, and this 2010 is like the so-so 2009, which earned the same score. It's an okay Pinot Noir, dry and earthy, but rather aggressive in acids and tannins. Ready to drink now.",,Crossbarn by Paul Hobbs
"This red blend is dry, tannic and coarse. It's also packed with cherry and blackberry jam flavors.",Philanthropist,Indigené
Forward fruit aromas of raspberry and strawberry follow through to the lightweight palate. Easy-drinking with a fresh and lifted finish. Drink now.,,Le Drunk Rooster
"Starts off with aromas of struck flint, heating oil and even some sweaty-sock notes before delivering melon and apple flavors on the palate. Offers decent complexity, but lacks focus and length. Drink now.",,Mozelle
"This is a very light, rather modest wine. Hints of pear and apple show some varietal character, but the flavors are quite mild.",,Jovino
"The opening boasts fresh red-berry aromas and prickle. Feels racy and energetic, with zesty red-cherry and red-plum flavors. Edgy, jumpy and mostly harmonious, but more tangy than deep, rich or complex.",Babor,Odfjell
"A ripe and lush style of Chardonnay that's widely available, this has assertive characteristics of pineapple, mango and sweet citrus that are plentiful throughout the nose and mouth. Medium weight, with a straightforward style and a brisk, clean finish.",Fortant de France,Skalli
"Oak, in the way of vanilla and buttered toast, dominates. Underneath are simple pineapple and apricot flavors that are watered down on the finish.",,Waterstone
"Mouth-puckering in its youth, with possible aging potential, this wine's black currant flavor has a stalky character that's pretty dominant.",G (Sol),Lannac Saint-Jean
"This Pinot Blanc is a soft sparkling wine, rustic around the edges and missing the acidity. It is rounded, feels ripe and finishes on a yeasty note.",Extrème de Pinot Blanc Bruto,Murganheira
"Crisp, light and redolent of red apple and forest berry, this wine should pair with fried chicken or easy pasta dishes. There's a sharp bitter berry note on the close.",,Natale Verga
"Suggestions of dried white flowers accent the ripe Anjou pear and melon aromas. Round and flush in the mouth, the fruit flavors are ripe and lend heft to the weighty finish. Drink now.",,Le Drunk Rooster
"A mild Sauvignon Blanc, with white grapefruit, grass and mild asparagus aromas. Feels chunky and round, with soft acids creating sweet, green flavors of grapefruit and grass. Round on the finish, with a modest variety of flavor.",Babor,Odfjell
"A hint of honey gives a lush impression to the peach and melon notes in this wine. There's a soft toastiness to the palate, helping to lift the fleshy fruit core. Drink now.",,Les Jamelles
"Neutral smelling except for stalky hay and straw notes and a touch of pear and/or peach. Feels citrusy and alive, with flavors of green herbs, orange and tropical fruits. Flattens out on the finish, where things turn chunky and yeasty.",,Paso Grande
"This is a distinctly simple Chardonnay. It's marked by pineapple, pear and peach flavors. Will satisfy America's basic Chardonnay craving.",,Chessman
"A simple, proper Pinot Noir, dry and silky in the mouth. It shows modest raspberry and cherry flavors, with an edge of oak.",,Chime
"Flavors of pear and kiwi balance together to give a crispness and roundness to this warm, fruity wine. There is an attractive touch of nutmeg for added complexity.",Amourette,Domaine les Riquets
Here's a solid value wine that should pair with take-out pizza or grilled panini. It delivers easy fruit aromas of cherry and raspberry followed by crisp acidity.,,Cortenova
"Dense and murky on the nose, with green aromas, rubber and peppery berry scents. Feels vibrant but scratchy, with olive, green herbs and plum and berry flavors. Finishes slightly green.",Classic Collection,Echeverria
"A hint of talcum dusts the red cherry and blueberry aromas in the bouquet, followed by tighter flavors of plum skin in the medium-bodied mouth. Finishes dry and slightly dusty.",,Domaine de Coussergues
"The fruit is hard and shows some earthy flavors of seed and stem, but this serviceable red has been enhanced with spicy, toasty oak flavors.",Fools Gold,3Fools
"It is unusual to find the northern Portuguese Alvarinho grape in the southern Alentejo__nd it doesn't quite work. With the heat, the intense flavors of the grape are transmuted into flabbiness with only hints of acidity.",Senses,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"This unusual offering is a cross of two hybrids: Schuyler and Seyval Blanc. It immediately shows noticeable sweetness, opening with sugary flavors of honey and orange marmalade. Once in the mouth the acids kick in, and the wine turns tart.",Estate Grown,Girardet
"This bright Italian red offers simple berry aromas, with hints of white almond and tobacco. It's a no-fuss wine that should pair with mini-pizza bites or grilled-sausage appetizers.",,Il Faggio
"Super smooth and open, this loose and lovely Merlot coats the palate with pretty cherry and raspberry fruit, slathered in tasty milk chocolatey oak. Not a deep wine, but deeply enjoyable, and ready to drink right now.",,Barnard Griffin
"For an Alentejo wine, this is surprisingly light, fresh and poised. Yes, there is rich raisiny fruit. but it is easily balanced by a thread of acidity that winds through. The tannins are soft, the fruit juicy.",Monte Cascas Reserva,Casca Wines
"A delicious middleweight red for drinking over the next few years, Trignon's 2007 Sablet is a lushly fruited wine with creamy-textured tannins, ample black cherry and plum flavors and just a touch of spice for complexity.",Sablet,Château du Trignon
"This Ripasso delivers very nice fullness and intensity with well-integrated aromas of black fruit, suede, spice, nut, cola and leather. It's soft and velvety with a clean, slightly fresh menthol close.",Collezione Ca' del Pipa,Castellani Michele & Figli
Bright acidity firm tannins are backed by jammy fruit aromas and a healthy dose of spicy oak tones. The intensity is here but the integration is slightly off for a wine of this importance.,I Quadretti,La Giaretta
"Thick, chewy and succulent, this is a bold, full-bodied red wine with intense aromas of black fruit and Indian spice box. This wine will appeal to those who enjoy loads of heft, muscle and personality in their Amarone.",Campo Leòn,Latium di Morini
"Campo Leòn is a jammy, chewy wine with raw notes of black cherry, Indian spice, cedar wood and melted chocolate. It's thick, syrupy and it's hard to imagine a balanced food pairing outside succulent red meat.",Campo Leòn,Latium di Morini
"This Riserva Amarone shows a meaty, bold, sweet and jammy personality with loads of aromatic intensity. It's almost too much of a good thing with overripe flavors of prune and berry marmalade.",Riserva,Musella
"This easy-drinking Riesling finishes dry, but still it's relatively soft, with green apple fruit and some spicy skin phenolics. Good balance and gentle persistence through a clean finish.",Bebop,Nodland
"This has a little bit of Cabernet Sauvignon (5%) and Merlot (2%), winemaker Mike Januik say it's there __o beef up the structure._ The Sangiovese brings the acid, and tart fruits with a hint of leaf and tomato. Still young vines, but showing great promise.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"Ripe, jammy aromas of cooked cherry, blackberry tart, cinnamon, mesquite smoke, chocolate fudge and ground clove emerge from the nose of this powerful Amarone Riserva in a very direct and immediate manner. The wine boasts a ripe, succulent style with loads of chewy, syrupy fruit on the long close.",Riserva 1888 Plenum,Villa Canestrari
"Sweet tobacco and overripe cherry open the nose of this thick, jammy Amarone. The wine exhibits a syrupy, bold mouthfeel with lingering tones of smoke, beef jerky and spice on the finish.",Opere di San Pietro,Villa Girardi
"Rich and spicy, this is a fine, dry, peppery Pinot Gris. In the mouth there's weight and ripeness, as well as some fat, yellow fruits. There's a touch of lychee as well, giving an exotic edge to the finish.",Pinot Gris Bonheur Convivial,Rieflé
"Delicious in blackberry and cherry jam, currant and sweetly smoked cedar wood, with a rich edge of milk chocolate, sprinkled with anise and cinnamon. Could be firmer in structure, as it's a little soft and melted, and probably best now.",,Rivera
"A very good value-priced Cab with fresh tomato, herb, black cherry, blackberry and earthy aromas. The palate is healthy and stands up to scrutiny, while the flavors of cassis, berry, chocolate and pepper are correct and more than pleasant. Long and lasting on the finish. The best Root: 1 Cab to date.",,Root:1
"Shows lots of new oak in the buttery toast and sweet vanilla char flavors that ride high over the pineapple jam, soft ripe pear and papayas. A clean, creamy Chardonnay for drinking now.",Sangiacomo Vineyard,Perception
"Austero is indeed an austere wine with thick intensity and loads of fragrant aromas of spice and ripe cherry. In the mouth, it proves an elegant and perhaps slightly thinner interpretation of Ripasso that would work well with pork or lamb chops.",Austero,Pietro Zardini
"This is a very intense and compelling Ripasso with bright tones of currant berry and blackberry that rise above a spicy base of cinnamon, chocolate and dried tobacco. The wine is smooth and soft although it finishes with power and determination.",Castelliere delle Guaite,Montresor
"A lively, balanced wine at an accessible price point, Marquee's 2008 Signature Chard boasts aromas of smoke, vanilla and stone fruit and flavors that follow along similar lines, with white peach and pineapple coming to the fore. Drink now_2012.",Signature,Marquee
"With a dark ruby-garnet color and loads of aromatic personality, this is the style of ripe and plump Ripasso you could pair with succulent cuts of grilled steak. The wine is soft and smooth in the mouth and it imparts bright aromas of black cherry, exotic spice, cola, barbecue smoke and toasted almond.",,SalvaTerra
"San Rustico is a steady, quality-minded producer from Valpolicella and their newest Ripasso offers a very nice blend of chocolate, spice and red cherry aromas. In the mouth, the wine is rich and smooth with various points of fruity sweetness along the way.",,San Rustico
"Opens with mild green, minty aromas that suggest tobacco, Middle Eastern spice and basic black fruit. The palate seizes control with grabby tannins and monolithic but unwavering grape and black-fruit flavors. Hard and tannic especially on the finish, with lingering lemony oak. A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Carmenère, Monastrell and Tempranillo.",Conde de Superunda,Miguel Torres
"This complicated, soft Pinot Noir is very rich in cherry, red currant, cola, licorice and spice flavors, but it's a little heavy. It shows the Williams-Selyem fingerprint of impeccable growing and winemaking technique, but it's hard to tell where it's going.",Flax Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"A mature, serious wine, showing toasty flavors that are rounding out the fruit. A definite food wine, its richness tempered with a bite of acidity and delicious final crispness.",Cuvée Prestige Brut,Dopff & Irion
"Pa' Riondo is a fresh, fruit-forward Ripasso with loads of cherry, blackberry and cassis on the bouquet. That natural freshness continues to the mouth, where the wine shows good acidity backed by hearty concentration and density.",Pa' Riondo,Brunelli
"The bouquet blends tropical aromas with popcorn, and the palate is toasty as well, but not cloying or thick. Flavors of green banana, orange, melon and pineapple are spicy and zesty, and there's pineapple and woodspice to the finish. A natural-yeast Chard with balance and zest to go along with tropical sweetness.",Wild Ferment,Errazuriz
"Possessed of mouthfilling plum and black cherry fruit, this supple-textured Gigondas doesn't offer a ton of nuance but is well made and satisfies for its persistent and authoritative flavors. Drink it over the next 4_5 years.",Domaine de Longue Toque,Gabriel Meffre
"A big Pinot Noir; it's a little heavy for the variety, with the weight of a Rhône, but no denying the deliciousness factor. Floods the mouth with concentrated pie-filling black cherry, red currant, licorice and beef jerky flavors. Best opened soon for freshness.",Barrel Select,Foley
"Raisin and other sweet, soft aromas are friendly but don't really bring it. The palate follows suit; it's chubby and jammy, with sweet berry flavors, a touch of raisin and a roasted, candied finish. Very nice and true to the region, albeit on the soft and easy side.",,Heredad Soliterra
"The second label of Duorum, this is a wine packed with vivid black berry, spice and herbal flavors. There is a fine juicy character, full of ripe acidity and a delicious fruity aftertaste.",Tons de Duorum,Duorum
"Mushy black fruit characteristics lead on the nose and mouth, and don't really subside until the slightly astringent finish takes hold. Medium weight with a firm structure; drink now.",Unfiltered,La Forge Estate
"A smoothly textured wine that shows red-berry flavors, with very soft tannins along with a farmyard character. It feels ripe and fruit; a fine barbecue wine.",NBNC,Vidigal
"This blend of Lodi Petite Sirah, Dry Creek Syrah and Dry Creek Zinfandel is dry, rustic and fruity. The tannic astringency suggests drinking with everyday fare, such as pasta with meatballs or pizza.",Collection Field Blend,Stonegate
"A bit shy, with notes of tight black fruit and herb. The medium-weight mouth offers a decent structure with firm tannins and a solid close. Give it a good decant before drinking now.",Fortant de France,Skalli
"A traditional-style Carmenère with minty aromas backed by roasted-fruit scents, tea and earthiness. Feels surprisingly clacky and high in acid for Maipo Carmenère before showing green pepper, green bean and red-plum flavors. Finishes quick.",Reserva,Chono
"Aged only in stainless steel in order to preserve its jammy berry aromas, this should pair perfectly with lasagna or meat-stuffed tortellini. The finish is dominated by a rusty, earthy tone.",Ancilla,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"Quite green upon first impression, with bell pepper and a potpourri of green herbs on the front end. Feels healthy and crisp, with bite and structure to support the herbal flavors of tomato leaf, oregano, bell pepper and red berry fruit. Finishes with a minty, herbal aftertaste.",Terroir Selection Gran Reserva,Casas del Toqui
"Lemon and Anjou pear take the lead in this easy-drinking white, with secondary hints of faint toast and citrus rind adding depth and interest. It's balanced but there's a slight sharpness to the finish with a slightly pithy bitterness.",,The Frenchhouse
"Minty and smelling of sawdust on the nose. This is oaky for a $10 wine, with berry aromas and flavors touched up by green notes, resiny oak and milk chocolate. The finish tastes herbal and feels chewy.",Puerto Viejo Reserve,Viña Requingua
"With its black currant intensity and a soft, slightly stalky texture, this fruity red is for summer drinking. Screwcap.",Colombelle L'Original Rouge,Producteurs Plaimont
"A blend of Syrah and Touriga Nacional, this strawberry-flavored wine has fine acidity and an attractive soft yet tangy texture.",,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"A bright, floral wine that offers light citrus and apricot flavors. It is a perfect apéritif wine, fruity and ready to drink.",,Quinta do Casal Branco
"This is intensely juicy, with acidity that cuts through the black-currant flavors, creating a wine that's brimming with fruitiness. There is a slight distracting hint of oxidized tomato, but it's otherwise enjoyable.",Private Selection,Mouras de Arraiolos
"A soft, rather clumsy wine. Despite some rich, ripe cherry jam and spice flavors, it's too sweet and melted.",,Meadowcroft
"The clever label reads __riginal Flavor__noaked_ and the wine has not a hint of anything other than bare-bones apple-flavored fruit. It's simple, light and balanced.",,Wine by Joe
"Dark and ripe, beyond Port-like, with flavors of raisin, prune, brown sugar and molasses. It has a base of tart acids, but the fruit tastes scorched.",Row 17 Deerwood Vineyard,Girardet
"Clammy and pickled smelling on first take, with melon and apple in the background. Feels choppy, with pithy citrus and mealy apple flavors. More or less the same on the finish, but with acidic bite and tang.",,Haras
"Light and brambly smelling, with leathery red-fruit aromas. Feels juicy and lifted but tastes tart, with medicinal flavors of spunky raspberry and sour red plum. Finishes with medium length and a minty, herbal aftertaste.",,Maniña
"Blended from Syrah, Tempranillo and Cabernet Franc, this is a soft, seemingly sweet wine. It has cherry flavors and is fine for drinking with burgers and the like.",Syrage,Mara
"Lightly tawny in color (presumably from the brief skin contact rather than premature aging), this seems to be a casualty of the vintage, as far as fruit ripeness is concerned. It's a sour, bone-dry wine, which could be almost anything from anywhere.",Blanc de,Novy
"Stalky, burnt aromas settle on herbal cherry and cassis along with leather. Feels chewy and a touch heavy, with murky berry flavors matched by herbal accents and buttery oak. Finishes oaky and creamy feeeling, with herbal flavors.",,oops
"Way too soft and featureless, lacking the structure to give it balance. But the cherry, spice and oak flavors are good.",,Thomas Henry
"An o.k. everyday Cabernet. It's a little scoury in the mouth, with some green flavors alongside the sweet blackberries.",Top Chef,Quickfire
"This is a soft, caramel-flavored rosé that has a wild-strawberry freshness, and a limpid texture.",Terra de Lobos,Quinta do Casal Branco
"A crisp, off-dry Vinho Verde with a good prickle on the tongue. Flavors of lemon and green apple are well balanced in this ready-to-drink summer wine. Screwcap.",Estreia,Viniverde
"This small-production Pinot is dark in color, with warm berry and cherry aromas. However, it feels resiny and heavy in the mouth, with hickory-driven oak leading baked berry flavors to a drying, all-oak finish. Overly toasted and heavy, it lacks Pinot Noir elegance.",Hacienda Araucano Humo Blanco,François Lurton
"This is a cleanly made rosé from Cabernet, with a caramel flavor that falls alongside attractive red-berry flavors.",Le,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Along with its strawberry flavors, this wine is soft and dry, with structured, tangy acidity. Screwcap.",Hera,Adega Cooperativa Ponte de Barca
"Blatantly appeals to the popular style, with pineapple jam, vanilla, honey and buttered popcorn flavors. Shows brisk acidity and a certain minerality.",,Bianchi
"There's a slight overripeness to the red apple scents in the bouquet, while the medium-weight palate falls a bit flat on the astringent, pithy finish. Drink now.",Cuvée Stéphi,Bourgeois Family
"This 100% Cabernet was grown in a hilly part of the eastern valley. It shows very ripe, jammy flavors of cherries and raspberries. Saved from simplicity by smooth tannins and a kiss of dusty earth. Drink now.",Cooney Vineyard,Dutcher Crossing
"Bright orange and pretty white floral aromas meld luxuriously with a sultry petrol undertone on this Niagara Peninsula Riesling. The off-dry palate offers a refreshing shower of lime and sour tangerine flavors accented by earthy heather and slate notes. For such a bargain price, it's hard to beat this beauty.",,Cave Spring
"This promises to be a hearty, food-friendly wine that offers a distinct vein of cherry sweetness followed by oak-driven tones of vanilla, leather and spice. Winter foods such as beef stew and game meat would fit the bill nicely here.",,Corte San Benedetto
"This is thinner and more compact in the mouth than most wines in this category, but it does also offer extremely bring and tonic aromas of white cherry, cassis and dried cranberry. There's a playful touch of berry bitterness on the close that would work with cheesy risotto or pasta.",,David Sterza
"Substantial and tannic, this affordable Cabernet has genuine grip and a fair amount of muscle. The fruit runs to sour cherry and plum; there is also a suggestion of dry earth and black olive. A lovely finish with a kiss of sweet fruit.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Bold and spicy, with a lot of cinnamon, licorice and toasty aromas. Quite intense in the mouth, where black cherry, toast and vanilla flavors lead the charge. The finish is tangy and long, with coffee and citrus accents coming along late in the game. Made from whole berries fermented in open-top vats.",20 Barrels,Cono Sur
"Dark concentration and a deep garnet color make a great first impression and the wine follows through with ripe aromas of dried blackberry, spice, tar, resin and cola. This is a dense and determined Ripasso and the sweet fruit flavors it releases on the palate shape the wine's soft, supple finish.",Soraighe,Bennati
"As always, Beringer's Alluvium blend is a complex white wine, meant to pair with good food. The '08 is comprised of Sauvignon Blanc, Sémillon, Chardonnay and Viognier. It's fruity, crisp and dry.",Alluvium Blanc,Beringer
"This is a lean, less formal expression of Amarone that seems to focus nicely on freshness and wild berry nuances. Cherry, blackberry, spice, cola, almond and tobacco all come to mind.",Corte Giara,Allegrini
"Just a single barrel was made, pure Sangiovese from the Candy Mountain Vineyard. Tight, tart and dark, it captures black cherry fruit with black licorice and a whiff of smoke. At this point in time the tannins and acids seem to be fighting it out for control.",,Boudreaux Cellars
"Good price for a zesty, sweet dessert wine. It's a nice way to finish dinner over something with white and yellow fruit, vanilla and custard ingredients. Shows rich, honeyed orange, apricot and honey flavors, with tingly acidity.",Bartolucci Vineyard,Bonterra
"This is a soft, feminine expression of Amarone with tones of cinnamon, rum cake and Christmas spice followed by simple berry fruit. Liquid vanilla, molasses and caramel overtones appear on the finish.",,Luciana Cordioli
"This is a smooth and rich Amarone with equal parts jammy fruit set against a smokey oak component. The wine slides nicely over the palate with a lavish, velvety texture and imparts more oak spice and mesquite on the close.",Capitel de' Roari,Luigi Righetti
"This is a mature example of Hunter Shiraz, showing the leathery notes that made the region famous, combined with hints of cinnamon, clove and dried cherries. It's soft, velvety and ready to drink, whereas the 2005 appears to have greater potential ahead of it.",Kester,Keith Tulloch
"Both the nose and palate on this lovely dry Riesling bring to mind freshly pressed apples and pears, white florals and petrol. Zippy acidity and a persistent lime juice midpalate lead to a long, marzipan and bitter almond finish.",Goldman Vineyard Dry,Keuka Lake Vineyards
"Here's a compact, focused Amarone that shows detailed aromas of wild berry, mesquite, bramble, cola and Spanish cedar. It's lean in terms of extraction and intensity, making this wine a good pairing partner to white meat or honey-roasted ham.",Podere Cariano,Le Bertarole
"Marked by violet-like scents and touches of pepper-cured meat, this is an intriguing Shiraz. It's full bodied and creamy in texture, with flavors of blackberry liqueur and licorice. Its only failing is that it seems to fade a bit quickly on the finish. Drink this luscious Shiraz over the next year or two.",Signature,Marquee
"Pricy for Chilean SB, but clean, good and spunky, with citrus, nettle and bell pepper on the nose. The palate is wet, fresh and snappy, and the flavors exhibit grassiness along with tropical fruit and lime. Cleansing and crisp on the finish, and ready to drink now.",EQ,Matetic
"Castel adheres to Amarone tradition with aromas of red cherry, dried apple skin, exotic spice, cured meat and leather. The wine sits on the palate with heavy density and some sweet flavors but soft tannins and a bright touch of acidity help cap a refreshing mouthfeel.",Castel,Mazzi
"Here is a clean, easy expression of Amarone that promises to make an easy match to roast beef or ravioli in meat sauce. The wine shows medium density and power with loads of jammy fruit on the close.",Villa Borghetti,Pasqua
"Amarone usually delivers soft, smooth tannins but Capitel Monte Olmi, on the other hand, exhibits tight, astringent firmness followed by sweet, jammy fruit. Give this wine another five years to soften in the bottle.",Capitel Monte Olmi,Tedeschi
"This is an oak-influenced Ripasso that opens with sweet aromas of vanilla, dark chocolate and espresso bean. Beyond those tones are more traditional elements of cherry, mesquite, Spanish cedar and cinnamon. Sweet fruit nuances run smoothly over the palate and the wine is clean and lively on the close.",Tenuta Valleselle Rovertondo,Tinazzi
"This Ripasso feels less intense compared to past vintages and offers clean notes of black cherry, ripe blueberry, exotic spice, root beer and dried apple skin. The wine is smooth and supple with light smoke and mesquite on the fade.",Campo San Vito,Villa Monteleone
"Crisp and steely, touched by white perfumes and intense acidity, this is a wine with a sharp blade of flavors that cut through the texture. Apples, citrus and kumquat all blend attractively together.",Réserve,Willm
"This is a little rugged, a little more raw and less concentrated than the other releases from this new Walla Walla winery. The wood sticks out a bit, though it's a very tasty wine with supple red fruit, an soft earthiness, and light suggestions of sandalwood and spice.",Tero Red,Tero Estates
"Dark and charred like so many of TerraNoble's red wines. There's lemon peel, black coffee, black fruit and herbs on the nose, while the palate shows tomato, herbs, smoked meat, basic black fruit and a snappy texture. A little more racy than most, but heavily oaked and blackened.",Gran Reserva,TerraNoble
"Just sweet and soft enough to temper the wine's more citric, minerally side. Aromas of green pear and melon are basic and welcoming, while the snappy, forward palate is cleansing and fresh. Flavors of green melon, apple, saline and honey scream Rías Baixas.",Peitán,Nora
"Speri is a great producer to watch out for because it consistently offers good quality at competitive prices. This is a tasty, rich wine with deep layers of cherry, spice and tobacco aromas. Its smooth, penetrating mouthfeel would stand up to hearty meat dishes.",,Speri
"Aromatics of yellow peach and slate are common for a Finger Lakes Riesling, but this one ups the ante with a bold, incense-inspired spice note that makes for a curious sip. Dry in style, the lime and lemon palate is round and focused with a nice, minerally silkiness on the tongue.",Reserve Dry,Red Newt Cellars
"Smoky, rubbery and sweet on the nose, with mocha and caramel shadings. The palate, however, is more tight and narrow; the feel is fresh and blazing, while the flavors are piercing and suggest red fruits like cranberry and cherry. Citric but with just enough weight to register as true Cabernet (with 18% Carmenère and 7% Cab Franc).",Catalina,Santa Ema
"Pretty common Cabernet, dry, toughly tannic and overripe in prune flavors alongside the blackberries.",,Line 39
"Soft, simple and a little tired, lacking structure. But it does have a nice, silky texture, and the cherry, cola and spice flavors have authentic Pinot Noir character.",,Jacella
"Lemony and sort of chemical smelling, with green herbs, graphite and berry aromas. Feels compact, without much layering or body. Tastes herbal, with red currant and berry fruit in the background. Minty and resiny on the finish.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"A second label for Velocity Cellars. A light wine, with modest characteristics.",,William Augustus
"Light in kick, with mealy white-fruit aromas. Feels wet but doesn't sport much texture or complexity, while the flavors are neither here nor there as the palate settles on stalky peach. Finishes with bitterness.",,Viña el Aromo
"Dry and melony on the bouquet, with shy peach aromas. The slightly pithy flavors reflect mature, slightly maderized white fruits. A touch flat and bready on the finish.",Reserva Privada,Arbol de Vida
"For those who like their white wines distinctly sweet, this tastes like apricot and orange jam, with the stimulating heat of alcohol.",,Bianchi
"Not much going on besides lots of toasty oak, buttered popcorn and caramel aromas and flavors. Somewhere down there is pineapple and lime fruit.",,Chime
"Stewy on the nose, with reduced, jammy aromas of blueberry and sweet, grassy scents of alfalfa. Shows high acidity and a clampy mouthfeel in front of tomato and herbal red-fruit flavors. Feels sharp and tastes herbal on the finish.",,Paso Grande
"A bright and fruity wine that has plenty of acidity, but a slightly distracting tomato flavor. It's slightly unbalanced as the fruit is too juicy for the rest of the wine.",Capoeira Tinto,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Soft, fleshy and neutral smelling, with mild plum and strawberry aromas. Feels rather heavy for rosé, with flavors of cherry and red plum. Finishes round, weighty and sweet.",Cefiro Reserva Syrah,Viña Casablanca
"Oily and hard on the nose, with slightly syrupy apricot and/or peach aromas. Feels round and capped, with no layering and slightly mealy flavors of peach followed by mild bitterness and a nutty flavor. Chunky stuff; drink right away.",Gran Reserva,Morandé
"Lively and vibrant, bright scents of apple and fresh orange supremes quickly fade on the light-weight palate and on the clean but short finish.",,Les Jamelles
"A very dry wine, firmly tannic and feeling overextracted. It is hard and unlikely to yield much fruit.",Tinto,Cooperativa Reguengos de Monsaraz
"With enormously high alcohol, this Zin tastes as sweet as a dessert wine. It's soft and simple, with raspberry and cherry flavors.",,Bianchi
"Stylistically, this is a racy, no-oak wine that smells of pineapple and tastes of citrus and passion fruit. The mouthfeel is citrusy, like fruit juice, with a lean, linear, citric finish that's bright in feel but tastes tangy and simple.",Reserva Unoaked,Apaltagua
"Your basic California Chardonnay, soft, with oak-infused pear and orange flavors, brightened by pleasant Carneros acidity.",,Buccio
"Barely ripe, with strong flavors of herb and leaf, this is a rough, chewy wine whose stemmy tannins will need a hearty cut of beef to tame them.",,Del Rio
"Take an acidic grape like Sauvignon Gris and combine it with a cool year like 2011 and what you get is a tart, tight, steely wine like this. It's neutral on the nose, then sheer and scouring on the palate. Tastes of lemon and sour apple before ending in an acidic wash.",,Casa Silva
"Here's a simple, soft little Bordeaux blend. Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, it offers pleasant flavors of blackberries and oak.",,Thomas Henry
"This easy Sangiovese should pair with a pizza or a grilled ham and cheese sandwich. There are mild fruit flavors here, followed by sun-drenched aromas of leather and spice.",,Spinelli
"Fleshy, soft and uncommitted on the bouquet, with sulfur aromas along with basic apple and pineapple. Feels wet but nothing more, with modest flavors of citrus and grass. Shy on the finish, with a spot of acidity.",La Palma Reserva,Viña La Rosa
"The first impression was of plastic, Band-Aid, a bit off-putting. A second bottle showed better, though distinctly minty. The flavors suggest grapes that barely got ripe.",,Oak Knoll
"A full, soft wine, with hints of toast and spice to go with the warm peach flavors. With only light acidity, it is clean but feels soft.",Reserva Branco,Mouras de Arraiolos
"Seems old due to mild vegetal aromas infiltrating the wine's core aromas of banana, vanilla and melon. Still zesty in feel despite 2011 being the current vintage; tastes of mature orange, grapefruit and pith, with lime on the finish. Drink now.",,San Elias
"Not entirely together flavors of sour cherry, cracker and seed mark this as a wine that may require some further bottle age. The components are here, but they do not come together.",,Melrose
"This is a rustic, soft Cabernet. It tastes hotter than the official alcohol level, which is 14.5%, giving heat to the blackberry and prune flavors.",,Chessman
"Soft, with slightly dilute flavors of blackberry and currant, surrounded by oak. Turns vegetal as it opens.",,Hesperian
"Smells perky, prickly and tart, with sharp plum and raspberry aromas. Feels citrusy and pithy, with a cutting mouthfeel, and snappy flavors of berry and red plum. Tastes rubbery and slightly bitter on the finish.",Hacienda Araucano Reserva,François Lurton
Twin unbalanced notes of vegetables and raisins mar this Cabernet. It's very soft and finishes with notes of prunes and milk chocolate.,Signature Selection,Bianchi
"This is a sophisticated and powerful rendition of Ripasso that offers big intensity and a blast of heat on the close. There are aromas of mature cherry, Indian spice, cinnamon and dark chocolate and the mouthfeel is rich and chewy.",,Montecariano
"Opens with mature fruit aromas of prune and plum and follows up with sophisticated notes of leather and dark spice. It shows soft, velvety tannins on the close.",,Montezovo
"Upscale and pedigreed, but not showing well now. Too tannic, with an astringent lockdown that accentuates the acidity. Underneath are fine black cherry, cola, pepper and oak flavors. The suggestion is ageability, but the future of this wine is unpredictable no matter what anyone says.",Sawyer Lindquist Vineyard Sonnie's,Qupé
"Smooth, lightly oily-textured wine, with a vivid citrus character over the more emollient pear flavors. It has attractive acidity, carrying through the rich texture. It is ready to drink now, but will profit from aging.",Duas Quintas Branco,Ramos-Pinto
"Not a lot of glaring aromas of a sweet wine here; in fact, it's showing fresh tomato, cherry and more dryness on the nose than candy or syrup. The palate is tight and a little clipped, with sweet cassis and reduced black plum flavors. Short on the finish, but good and grabby overall.",_tim Varema Tardana Negre,Agricola Falset-Marca
"This blend of all five Bordeaux varieties hails from a smaller, high elevation appellation bridging Sonoma County and Napa Valley. It's jammy and spicy in red fruit, berry and cocoa flavors. Drink now.",Alluvium,Beringer
Ripasso Il Vegro offers a rich and meaty bouquet with aromas of cured beef and honey roasted ham. There are also bright fruit tones of cherry and blackberry and the wine adds a crisp touch of sour cranberry at the very end.,Il Vegro,Brigaldara
"Tapteil, Ciel and Cara Mia vineyard fruit, a blend of 35% Cabernet Sauvignon, 31% Merlot, 28% Cab Franc and 6% Petit Verdot. Young and tight, with the characteristic Cadence chalk and stone undertone. The fruit is pretty strawberry, with a peppery herbal streak, good length and fine balance.",Coda,Cadence
"Rich and steady, with loads of ripe fruit, exotic spice, leather, chocolate and smokey barbecue sauce. This wine does a very nice job of balancing its sweet cherry flavors against warm, oak-driven aromas.",Ca' Camparsi,Bonazzi Dario e Fabio
"Fruit for this ruby-colored Amarone comes from an organically-farmed vineyard and shows bright aromas of black cherry, raspberry, prune and plum. In fact, the clean quality of the berry nuances on display are what set this wine apart. It is smooth, sweet and sticky on the close.",,Cantina di Negrar
"Great intensity and purity are the first things you will notice from this dark, ruby-colored Ripasso. The wine's appearance is thick and velvety and its aromas recall black fruit, plum, prune, spice and a touch of graphite or mineral. It has soft tannins, long persistency and a very smooth feel overall.",Duca del Frassino,Cantina di Soave
"This hearty Amarone introduces aromas of cola, candied fruit, cured beef and mesquite. It's very heavy and thick in the mouth with sweet overtones that are backed by tons of clove, pepper and cinnamon.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"A hearty, luscious wine with clean and well-integrated aromas of spice, toasted almond, suede, cola and black fruit. It delivers an elegant, toned feel and could pair with roast chicken or pork.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
Campo Magri is a bright and lively Valpolicella Superiore with crisp tones of cherry and wild berry backed by slight smoke and spice. The natural acidity will cut through the density or ossobuco or beef stew.,Campi Magri,Corte Sant' Alda
"For a vintage-style fortified, this wine's color is appropriately intense and dark, but the tannins are somewhat tame. Hints of mint and chocolate pop up, adding modest complexity, but the bold cassis and plum fruit is framed instead by its crisp acids, suggesting a rather early drinking window, perhaps 2013_2020 or so.",Vintage Declared,D'Arenberg
"This is a bit chunkier and less suave than De Bortoli's more expensive estate bottled Shiraz-Viognier, but it's still a very nice wine. Peppery spice marks the nose, while the flavors feature a nice blend of plum with savory notes of coffee and black olives. Drink now_2015.",Gulf Station,De Bortoli
"De Bortoli continues to turn out highly restrained Chardonnays from its own Yarra Valley vineyards. This is lean and crisp, with smoke accenting pear and pineapple fruit. Pretty unique among Australian examples, but exemplifying winemaker Steve Webber's approach.",Reserve Release,De Bortoli
"This is a hearty, rich Ripasso with loads of dark intensity and smooth flavors of ripe cherry, spice, leather, dark chocolate and barbecue sauce. The wine feels opulent and rich and leaves a long impression of ripe cherry flavors.",Vigneti di Torbe,Domìni Veneti
"An interesting and unsual wine for Chile. Hailing from grafted vines originally planted to Chenin Blanc in 1956, this Viognier is superfloral, with oily aromas along with apple blossom, nectarine and apricot. The palate has nice natural acidity and sweet flavors of melon, mango and citrus. A little big and unfocused and sweet, but still intriguing and nicely made.",Visión,Cono Sur
"This pretty Amarone is aged two years in large oak to help shape aromas of spice, cinnamon and vanilla. Those ethereal tones are held up by a strong base of red berry fruit and the wine is thick and long-lasting in the mouth.",Vignenuove,Luciana Cordioli
"With almost Chardonnay richness, this is a ripe, smooth, creamy apple-like wine. The palate is concentrated and spicy, with only a light showing of acidity to give a final bite.",Cuvée Balthazar,Lucien Albrecht
"Big, chunky and dark on the nose, but smells monotone except for a floral hint. The palate shows nice body, saturation and grabby tannins to go with oak-infused flavors of black plum, cola and spice. Savory and rooty on the finish. A good restaurant wine, either by the glass or bottle.",Finca La Cuesta,Luna Beberide
"Marqués de Cáceres intentionally lowered the amount of new oak on this barrel-fermented Viura, and the result is positive. The nose is smooth and slightly creamy, but not oaky or resiny smelling. Composed and balanced across the tongue, with orange, lime, nectarine and toasty flavors. Quite good for barrel-fermented white Rioja.",Antea,Marqués de Cáceres
"Dominated by aromas of dried spices, cedar and leather, this full-bodied, lusty red shows more oak than fruit, although the tannins are clearly ripe and the body of the wine adequately supports the ample cedar and vanilla flavors. You could drink it now for its bold flavors, or wait 2_3 years to see if it attains greater harmony over time.",Cairanne,Mas du Goudareau
"Opens with mossy aromas that are soon replaced by foresty oak and murky black-fruit notes. The palate has enough thickness and concentration to register as true Toro, while the flavors of berry fruit, herbs and spice cover the bases. Oaky and lightly tannic on the finish, and just beefy and chewy enough.",Prima,Maurodos
"This is a wine that doesn't mess with niceties, but is right in your face. Intensely perfumed, almost a caricature of Gewürz, this is rich, moving into sweetness, concentrated and very spicy.",Les Terres Blanches,Mittnacht Frères
"There's a distinct note of eucalyptus or dried herb here followed by root beer, red berry fruit, bramble, leather and moist tobacco. The wine is bright and thick on the palate thanks to a twofold delivery of freshness and natural concentration.",Tenuta Lena di Mezzo,Monte del Frá
"Tenuta Lena di Mezzo delivers juicy, thick aromas of sweet fruit and spicy black pepper and clove. It's a smooth, supple wine with a correct, albeit one-dimensional, mouthfeel.",Tenuta Lena di Mezzo,Monte del Frá
"This is a bold and modern Ripasso with toasted aromas of nut and exotic spice that are followed by chocolate, cola, leather, resin and black licorice. It's a soft, generous wine with finely textured tannins.",,Monteci
"Dark, muscular and very oaky, especially early on where it smells charred and bacony, with black fruit in the background. Airing unleashes chewy, roasted berry, plum, carob and herbal flavors, and throughout there is a strong oak element. Finishes big and thick, with toast and leafy, herbal Pinot Noir nuances.",Tobiano,Kingston Family
"Forced oak and baked apple aromas work the nose on this challenged, wheaty Chardonnay. Voluminous in the mouth but cloying, with banana, toffee and pudding-like flavors. Heavy and oaky on the finish, which is all about butterscotch and resin covering up marginal fruit character.",,Amayna
"A strange wine that's not very aromatic beyond basic pear fruit and grass. Feels basic and tastes both green and oddly sweet, with a short, oily feeling finish that ends bitter. Tasted twice with similar findings.",,Amayna
"Smells vegetal, with aromas of canned peas and beans vying for attention with mature tropical fruit. Feels mealy despite decent acidity, while the flavor profile is from the garden, meaning it's mostly about asparagus and green beans.",Selección,Viña Chocalan
"This rating is probably as much a reflection of tasting the wine too late in its evolution as anything else. At this mature state, the wine is heavy and syrupy, with stalky, almost bitter red-fruit flavors. Finishes with matchstick and grassy flavors. Wait for the 2011.",Cherub Rosé of Syrah,Montes
"This southern Oregon Syrah has red-fruit aromas, with notes of perfume and plastic.",Del Rio Red,3Fools
"Feels flat and syrupy feeling, with sweet, herb flavors that suggest blueberry and baked plum. Finishes herbal.",,Arauco
"This rustic wine is overripe in prunes and raisins, and hot in alcohol. It's also as sweet as a minor Port.",Altes Vineyard,Willowbrook
Spun sugar scents lead into a wine with modest fruit flavors. The mouthfeel and finish are a touch dilute.,Anna Maria,Valley View
"Aggressively stemmy on the nose and on the palate, with a strong streak of canned peas.",5 Block,Lumos
"A perfumed wine with wood aging flavors over citrus. From the Vinho Verde region, it's a curious hybrid of a wine, neither crisp enough nor rich enough.",Monte Cascas Reserva Branco,Casca Wines
"Soft and thin, with rustic berry, tobacco and spice flavors that finish sweet.",,Waterstone
"Soft, with a severe cut of acidity slicing through modest blackberry-jam flavors.",,Anatomy
"A simple Chard, with vanilla, buttered popcorn and pineapple jam flavors.",,Castoro Cellars
"A bit unripe, with some vegetal flavors along with the blackberries. There's also a lot of sweet heat from high alcohol.",Zinfusion Reserve,Castoro Cellars
"Not quite ripe, with a green, vegetal streak cutting through the thin flavors of cherries. It's a soft, simple country wine.",,Stickybeak
"Plenty of zesty Central Coast acidity on this Pinot, and it's nicely dry. But it's thin and unrewarding in richness.",Top Chef,Quickfire
"The vintage was terribly difficult, with cold and rain everywhere, leading to widespread mold, especially along the coast. This Pinot seems to suffer from that problem despite some good raspberry and cherry fruit flavors.",,Roth
"Dilute, with simple strawberry flavors and a disjointed finish.",,Melrose
"Funky and odd smelling, with exotic aromas that are unfamiliar and not that inviting. Feels thick and soupy, with black fruit flavors, cumin, candy and some bitterness on the finish.",,Arauco
"Overripe and Porty, with raisin, prune and chocolate flavors that finish hot and slightly sweet. The heat simply overwhelmed this Merlot.",Reserve,Cerro Prieto
"Sugary sweet and medicinal, like cherry cough syrup.",,YN
"Crisp but bland, with sharp edges and some bitterness on the finish.",,Cousiño-Macul
"Flat aromas of red licorice candy, grass and maderized fruit are none too inviting. Feels chunky for rosé, with sweet, wayward fruit flavors that come with a burnt stalkiness. Finishes bitter.",Reserva Cabernet Sauvignon-Syrah,Oveja Negra
"Fluffy, sweet aromas of peach, pear and vanilla are as good as it gets. Tastes of powdered sugar and the most forced oak you can imagine. Not at all surprising that it's resiny on the finish.",Reserve,Cuevas del Sur
Aromas of strawberry sherbet are followed by sweet candy-shop flavors on the palate. Chill it thoroughly before drinking. Screwcap.,Estreia,Viniverde
"96-98. Barrel sample. The fruit is very pure with a great depth of flavor. This wine has weight, and intense flavors of dark plum and sweet fruit. Impressive.",Barrel Sample,Château Pontet-Canet
"95-97. Barrel sample. A powerful wine with dark and dry tannins. It has a great depth of fruit flavor, with immense and concentrated weight, and a structure that is for long-term aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Lafite Rothschild
"95-97. Barrel sample. Smooth, opulent tannins lend a velvety texture. This wine shows weight and spice, with potential power.",Barrel Sample,Château Mouton Rothschild
"95-97. Barrel sample. A wine that has density, structure and firm tannins, with touches of wood. At this stage, it is solid and impressive; and the tannins draw the great fresh fruit into the heart of the wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Palmer
"95-97. Barrel sample. This wine shows sheer opulence; it's beautifully rich and ripe, powered by complex flavors of orange zest and superripe mango. It's fresh, showing this vintage's character.",Barrel Sample,Château Rieussec
"Muscular and fruity on the nose, with coffee, mocha and smoky accents. The palate is concentrated and deep, with a jammy mouthfeel and flavors of black fruits, olive, exotic spices and sweetness. Not overly complex but nice in a bullish, black-fruit way. With 13% Carmenère.",Reserva,Koyle
"This powerfully built Gigondas appears to have 5_8 years of aging potential, so perhaps in time this rating will look conservative. For the moment, the wine displays balanced aromas and flavors of garrigue, leather and plum along with a firm tannic structure. The blend is 80% Grenache, 10% Syrah and 10% Mourvèdre.",Saveur des Dentelles,Domaine des Florets
"This is quite a good Zinfandel showing lots of classic varietal character, and enough elegance to drink with an upscale meal. It's dry and robust in berry and cherry jam, fruit liqueur, Dr. Pepper cola, peppery spice and sandalwood flavors. Best now for freshness and vivacity.",,Perception
"The best Paso a Paso white yet; it's ripe and smells of pineapple and melon, while the palate is pure and has a solid feel. Flavors of apple, peach and pithy citrus are honest, and the finish is clean. Delivers what it should and more.",,Paso a Paso
"A very pretty and polished Pinot Noir, soft, silky and delicious, and lovely for drinking now. It shows raspberry, cherry, vanilla and cinnamon flavors, with a kiss of rose petal.",,Sebastiani
"This is an aged and elegant Amarone that shows a dark garnet color with slight amber highlights. Tertiary aromas of spice, leather, dried tobacco, lavender and candied fruit fill the bouquet and the wine shows lively sweetness and fullness on the palate. The 2003 vintage was very hot and you can feel the wine's power and determination.",Ca' Bertoldi,Recchia
"Not the best Monte Bello to emerge in recent years. There's a sharpness of acidity that cuts the palate, and it accentuates the fresh fruit, giving it a jammy zing. More troubling is an overripe raisiny flavor. This bottling is, of course, one of the most ageable in California, but the inherent imbalance seems to mitigate against long time in the cellar.",California Monte Bello,Ridge
"Herb and spice aromas are followed by a rich, black-fruited, now mature wine. Concentrated, the soft dusty tannins are well rounded to give a mellifluous, smooth texture, with just a hint of black plums and acidity.",,Roquevale
"Thick in tannins, and with a sweet, tart taste of blackberry jam, this Cabernet isn't offering much subtlety now. It feels tough and gritty, a wine with plenty of youthful, primary fruit. Could develop in the bottle. Give it a good decant if you drink now. Tasted twice.",,Napa Angel
"A well-made blend of Spanish and Portuguese red varietals, with the majority Tempranillo, with bright red cherry and cranberry and high acidic tones that's also got a touch of lovely minerality, olive, toffee and vanilla. The 2007 is ready to drink now, a well-balanced easy drinker with great aromatics and not too much tannin.",Zarzuela,Murrieta's Well
"Compared to the 2006 vintage of this same wine, this expression offers a greener personality with bright aromas of cut grass and herbs over loads of dark fruit and exotic spice. There's a soft, sweet and chewy quality to the wine's thick texture.",La Fabriseria,Tedeschi
"Blending Alvarinho and Verdelho with Viognier, here is a rich, intense wine. There is no doubting its weight, although it also has fine acidity from its citrus and green plum fruits. Age for another year.",Selection Branco,Vale d'Algares
This smokey Amarone opens with woody tones of forest floor and bramble followed by savory notes of cured beef and wild mushroom. Dark fruit flavors fill in the background and the wine ends with distinct layers of leather and dried tobacco leaf.,Paverno,Vaona
"Apricot, nectarine and mellow botrytis aromas are welcoming, while the palate is intense and citrusy, with full acidity. Flavors of orange, pineapple and mango are strong and tasty, while the finish is honeyed and layered. This is a punchy dessert wine that will age well for several years; drink now through 2013.",Vendimia Tardía Late Harvest,Miguel Torres
"Tastes a little heavy and straightforward, although it's nicely dry, and shows rich blackberry, cherry, anise and herb flavors that veer into dried currants. Turns even richer on the finish, with the sweetness of liqueur. Drink now.",Silverwood Vineyard,Miro
"Classic, soft, easy and broad Pinot Blanc. There is an attractive buttery character to go with the peach and lime flavors. The wine is ripe, with pure fruit and a final tang of acidity.",Terre d'Etoiles,Mittnacht Frères
"This historic estate with ties to the immense heritage of Dante Alighieri presents a very well made wine with intact aromas of cherry, root beer, spice and touches of new leather. The wine is soft and smooth and the quality of its fruit is evident in the pristine nature of its flavors.",Serego Alighieri 650 Anniversario,Masi
"More up the ladder from Vitoria's crianza, but also more raisiny and oaky. The wine develops nicely with air, shedding raisin for more of the fruit spectrum. Meanwhile, the oak is strong and obvious, leaving vanilla, toast and spice on the finish. Otherwise, it has the same flavor profile and acidic kick as the crianza. Drink now through 2013.",Reserva,Marqués de Vitoria
"From a cooler region than its Bin 28 stablemate, Penfolds' 2007 Bin 128 is a medium-bodied Shiraz that features touches of peppery spice, raspberry-cherry fruit and a darker edge of chocolate and coffee. The tannins are supple without being soft, giving this a drinking window that should extend through 2017 or so.",Bin 128,Penfolds
"Like in past vintages, this wine presents very vibrant aromas of apple and dried apricot followed by red berry fruit and spice. It shows a traditional, compact style that is firm and bright without being too dense or heavy.",,Pietro Clementi
"Made with 74% Zin and additions of Petite Sirah and Carignane, this wine is bone dry and a little rustic in the edgy tannins that have hints of bitter greens. Yet it's complexly flavored, offering waves of berries, currants, cola, anise and pepper.",Lytton Springs,Ridge
"Clean and lean in both power and execution, this lively Amarone shows pretty aromas of red cherry, tobacco, root beer and Spanish cedar. It also delivers warming, generous texture on the finish.",Villa Borghetti,Pasqua
"A young (average age 5 years) tawny sourced from the Riverlands, this makes for a tasty and affordable after-dinner drink. There's some berry fruit remaining, but also touches of honey, caramel and molasses. It's very supple and smooth in the mouth, yet finishes on a slightly earthy or savory note, which keeps it from being cloying.",Classic Tawny,Patritti
"A beautiful Syrah. It's very dry and softly tannic, with complex blackberry, black cherry, cola and sandalwood flavors. Could be firmer in structure, but a lovely wine to drink now.",Purisima Mountain Vineyard,Qupé
"Il Bugiardo (liar in Italian) is an intense and richly concentrated Ripasso with deep layers of chocolate, mature red fruit, smoke and barbecue sauce. It's a modern, plush rendition with soft, smooth tannins on the close.",Il Bugiardo,Buglioni
"Dense, sweet and burly, with prune, coconut and blackberry on the nose. The palate is lush, chewy and not at all hard, while the flavors of berry, prune and tea are slightly herbal. Full on the finish, with just enough acidity and freshness to keep it moving in the right direction.",Tributo Single Vineyard,Caliterra
"You'll love the density and richness of this dark, velvety Ripasso. Bright aromas include mature berry, moist earth, tobacco and ground white pepper. It's a smooth, enduring drink with soft tannins and texture.",,CampoReale
"Here's a perfect match to sausage and white beans. This bright and clean Ripasso offers easy notes of spice and mature fruit with a distinctive note of almond nut. It delivers a lean, but firm mouthfeel with a light alcoholic push at the end.",Rocca Sveva,Cantina di Soave
"Ripasso Le Crosare is a nicely balanced wine that does a good job of contrasting territory-driven notes of cherry and blackberry against oak-driven notes of spice and vanilla. The wine concludes in the mouth with soft, tight tannins.",Le Crosare,Cantine Lenotti di Lenotti
"A lot of olive and herbs upfront, with cumin and other exotic, arguably unusual aromas. The palate is soft and a little low on structure, but the flavors are big and sweet, almost overripe and syrupy. There's cola, blackberry, coffee and mulchy herbal flavors from start to finish. A big wine that needs to be drunk now; it's not going to get better.",Microterroir de los Lingues,Casa Silva
"Loads of aromatic intensity comes through on the bouquet with lovely layers of ripe cherry, spice, mesquite wood, Indian spice and cola. The oak element is evident here and will integrate with a bit more time in the bottle. In the mouth, this rich, ruby-colored wine offers jammy fruit and soft, velvety texture.",Verjago,Domìni Veneti
"Quite ripe and dark, with blackberry, raisin and aromas of woody spice manifested as cinnamon. The palate shows a controlled sharpness and then flavors of saturated berry fruit accented by oak-based notes of vanilla and dill weed. A powerful, deep style of crianza with a lot of oak.",Crianza,Cruz de Alba
"A little rusty in color and somewhat transparent, with raisin as the key aroma. There's not a lot going on in the mouth, but the wine is mellow and deep, with sweet flavors of molasses, berry syrup and baked black fruits. Rich and candied, but rather sweet and a touch dull for Priorat. Drink now.",Montgarnatx,Francesc Sanchez Bas
"Limited production, tight and interesting. This 100% Petite Sirah is one of just a handful of varietal versions of the grape made in Washington. It features ripe berry flavors__lueberry in particular__rapped in well-managed tannins with hints of caramel running through the finish. Still young, primary fruit, with a sharp edge to the tannins. Give it a couple more years in the cellar for optimal drinking.",Stonetree Vineyard,Angel Vine
Villa Novare offers a light and bright expression of Ripasso that ties nicely into Valpolicella tradition where the focus is on balance and elegance. You'll also enjoy the wine's food-friendly qualities such as its medium structure and smooth finish.,Villa Novare,Bertani
"Spice, apple, light peach and a gentle fruitiness characterize this Riesling. There are deeper notes as well, skin phenolics that add texture and earthiness. But fruit is front and center, with crisp acidity right behind it.",,Barnard Griffin
"Petit Verdot is a character actor who's never really grabbed the spotlight for itself, but makes an interesting appearance now and again. This McLaren Vale example is oaky but backed by ample plum and cassis fruit and framed by tannins that seem soft for the variety. Cedar and spice come through on the finish. Drink now.",The Phantom,Gemtree
"Fairly pale in color, this Pinot Noir is made in a lighter, drier, more elegant style than many. It's crisp in acids, with the flavors of sweet cherry pie, cola, tangerine peel, cinnamon, anise and sandalwood. Grows increasingly complex as it warms in the glass, changing by the minute. A fascinating wine that should evolve over the next five years.",Stony Point Vineyard,James Family Cellars
"This is a rich, complicated Cabernet Sauvignon, brimming with ripe, outgoing blackberry, cassis, blueberry and dark chocolate flavors, liberally coated with smoky sweet oak. It's very dry, with the firm but refined tannins you'd expect from a Joseph Phelps bottling. Just a hair rustic. Best now_2015.",,Joseph Phelps
"Zonin's 2006 Amarone opens with very ripe aromas of raspberry and strawberry jam followed by spice, leather and tobacco. Those raisin and dried fruit flavors appear again on the palate, pushed forward by the wine's thickness and soft sweetness.",,Zonin
"Wakefield is a reliable producer of Clare Valley wines, and the Chard is no exception. Toasted nuts mingle easily alongside grilled pineapple and peach notes, and the almost plush texture of this wine gives it another dimension. Contains 4% Viognier. Drink now.",,Wakefield Estate
"Totally delicious and so easy to like for its soft mouthfeel and luscious upfront fruit. Just wows with raspberries and cherries, with polished tannins, balancing acidity and a touch of smoky oak.",Sandstone,Wente
"Savory on the nose with enough sweet blueberry to make it varietally enticing, this light purplish Syrah is well-balanced, pleasing and well-made, ready to drink now with a range of foods, its alcohol in proportion and acidity right on target. Wente blends in small percentages of Counoise, Petite Sirah, Mourvèdre and Tempranillo into this great-value Syrah. Delicious.",Shorthorn Canyon,Wente
"Properly spicy, this is smooth and rich, a wine that has a broad texture along with some sweetness to bring out its lychee and pear flavors. It is ripe, though well balanced.",Réserve,Willm
"This lively Ripasso opens with distinctive notes of spice, clove and dried tobacco. There is ripe fruit here, mostly plum and prune, and the wine ends with a spicy blast of flavor.",Vigneto Calandra di Romagnano,Zecchini
"This medium- to full-bodied Shiraz features a welcoming mix of mulberries and vanilla, overtaken by cedary flavors on the finish, where the fruit turns crisp. A slab of charred steak would match the woody notes nicely. Drink now_2013.",Shotfire,Thorn Clarke
"Here's a powerful, mature and jammy Amarone that explodes with thick, raw and chewy aromas of blackberry pie and cherry confiture. You'll feel the high alcohol in the mouth, as well as the wine's thick extraction.",,San Cassiano
"A little on the soft side, but very dry, with smoky oak and blackberry fruit dominating. Feels good and chewy and rich, with interesting herb and spice notes. Will age for a few years, but not for a long time. Give it a good decant.",Claret,Bell
"Bold and flavorful, this cool-climate Chard rocks with straightforward fruity notes of pear, peach and pineapple. It's medium in body, reined in by bright acids on the tart, citrusy finish.",,42°S
"Distilleria Bottega is one of Italy's most important producers of Grappa that has also recently started making wine such as Prosecco and Amarone. This is a bright and focused expression with sharp aromas of wild berry, green herb and spice.",Il Vino degli Dei,Bottega
"The popular Marquês de Borba brand is a soft, ripe, very accessible wine. With a light touch of wood aging, it follows easily through with cherry and red plum fruits, a deliciously mouthwatering aftertaste.",Marquês de Borba,J. Portugal Ramos
"Another fine effort in a continuing series of outstanding PGs from Hogue. This is tart and stylish, loaded with citrus and bracingly acidic. Flavors meld lemon, lime, lemon verbena, orange peel and a slice of pear.",,Hogue
"A ripely smooth, lime- and white-pear flavored PB, soft and creamy, with hints of almonds. This is delicious apéritif wine; a pleasure to drink.",Les Charmes Kritt Pinot Blanc,Marc Kreydenweiss
"Fabiano's newest Ripasso opens with bright cherry aromas followed by spice, clove, black pepper and pressed rose petal. The wine boasts a soft, steady feel in the mouth and relatively smooth texture overall.",,Fabiano
"Here's a new producer from Valpolicella who presents a sharp and angular Amarone with fine aromas of spice, wild berry, black tobacco and tea leaf. The wine is bright and compact with soft tannins and natural freshness.",,Falezza
"A stylish wine, with mineral tannins and a dusty texture. It is cool, elegant and with a tight layer of acidity. There's plenty of firm structure, with berries and sweet fruit to finish. Age for 2_3 years.",,Falua
"Made in a very big, heavy and ripe style, this Pinot Noir offers waves of grilled blackberry, cherry, raspberry and cola flavors, with sweet, smoky influences from oak barrels. It's delicious, but lacks delicacy and subtlety. Drink now.",Bar Lazy S,Foley
"Creamy in texture and deceptively easy to drink, this Barossa Shiraz features a veneer of baking spices and vanilla layered over a fruity foundation of ripe blueberries. Drink it over the next several years.",,Earthworks
"This vineyard-designate Ripasso opens with dark concentration and lush aromas of mature fruit, spice, leather, chocolate and dried beef or cured ham. This is a rich and velvety wine that could stand up to barbecued short ribs smothered in spicy sauce.",Podere Bertarole,Corteforte
"A bit austere, with an astringent edge, this requires pairing with rare beef or lamb to show its best. There's a lifted, slightly floral aspect to the aromas, followed by crisp cherry fruit and a dusting of firm tannins. Drink now, but this also could be a wine that makes for a pleasant surprise in 4_5 years.",Deen De Bortoli Vat 4,De Bortoli
95-97. Barrel sample. A powerful wine that's full of wood and ripe tropical-fruit flavors. It also has an intensely mineral structure that powers the wine right through to the concentrated finish.,Barrel Sample,Domaine de Chevalier
"95-97. Barrel sample. A beautifully-perfumed wine with ripe, soft tannins and sweet fruit. It has density yet the tannins are so velvety and ripe.",Barrel Sample,Vieux Château Certan
"95-97. Barrel sample. This wine has a juicy character and firm tannins. Its fruit is packed around the dense core, showing weight and intensity.",Barrel Sample,Château Latour
"95-97. Barrel sample. The wine is immensely dark, powered by black plum and a ripe, complex structure. Already, the elements are molding into place. Expect great things of this wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Léoville Barton
"95-97. Barrel sample. This wine is rich with flavors of tropical fruit and citrus, with judicious wood aging and fine concentration.",Barrel Sample,Château Malartic-Lagravière
"95-97. Barrel sample. Opulent and finessed, this has great weight, and scents of ripe fruit and botrytis. Stylish flavors of yellow fruit, citrus and cinnamon combine with bright acidity on the rich palate.",Barrel Sample,Château Suduiraut
"95-97. Barrel sample. A deliciously-perfumed wine, with a dark and intense tannic structure. It is spiced and concentrated, with a plum character and great richness on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Ausone
"95-97. Barrel sample. This wine is immensely dark, powered by black plum and a ripe, complex structure; its elements are already molding into place. Expect great things of this wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Léoville Las Cases
"95-97. Barrel sample. Showing new wood spice, this rich and full-bodied wine also has weighty fruit, with creamy and herbaceous qualities.",Barrel Sample,Château Pape Clément
"95-97. Barrel sample. This has sweet and soft tannins, with a smoky flavor that lingers on the ripe, opulent finish. Its initial richness suggests it could almost be consumed now, until you taste the massively-structured finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Cheval Blanc
"95-97. Barrel sample. A gorgeous wine that offers a firm, botrytis character, with aromas of spice, apple and orange zest. It's powerful and meant for long aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Doisy-Védrines
"95-97. Barrel sample. Rich, with intense flavors of botrytis, lemon and Seville orange peel. This wine has both freshness and sweetness, with a light touch.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Yquem
94-96. Barrel sample. A finely balanced wine__ts immense tannins are mitigated by the fruit and dark chocolate flavors. It finishes with a hint of smoky wood.,Barrel Sample,Clos Fourtet
"94-96. Barrel sample. Like so many wines in this vintage, this shows black-currant acidity. It's lively and fruity, with the firm tannins providing a counterpoint.",Barrel Sample,Château Lynch-Bages
"94-96. Barrel sample. This is elegant, fresh and structured, with its blackberry fruit shining right through the wood. Style trumps power in this wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Pétrus
"94-96. Barrel sample. There is great freshness in this wine, which also has ample weight and complex, rich fruit. It's powered by acidity, remaining lively and bright, and is likely to age well.",Barrel Sample,Château de Rayne Vigneau
"94-96. Barrel sample. This is taut and tight, with so much spice and pepper from the high alcohol and wood aging. But it's the intensity of fruit that makes this wine such a blockbuster.",Barrel Sample,Château La Mission Haut-Brion
"94-96. Barrel sample. An impressively silky wine. Dry yet intensely fruity, the palate shows big fruit, smooth tannins and a perfumed character.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Brion
"94-96. Barrel sample. An intensely herbaceous wine, with delicious flavors of grapefruit, apricot juice and spice. The finish is lively and fruity, with mineral acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château la Louvière
"94-96. Barrel sample. Dry with a firm core of dark tannins and solid fruits. It is packed with tannins, showing tight acidity as well as a forward black-currant flavor. It dances with the appellation's classic lightness.",Barrel Sample,Château Margaux
"94-96. Barrel sample. Powerful yet still fruity, this is a true wine of 2011. It shows dark tannins and juicy fruit in equal measure. The wine has weight, complexity and power. A real success.",Barrel Sample,Château Montrose
"94-96. Barrel sample. Showing a judicious blend of new wood and ripe fruit, this is a wine that has a creamed-apple texture. It's full of bright grapefruit, sweet apple and green plum flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Smith Haut Lafitte
"94-96. Barrel sample. Powerful tannins are embedded into this wine's huge velvet cushion of ripe black plum, spiced fruit and chocolate. The wine shows the juicy character of the vintage, which follows right to the end with firm tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Cos d'Estournel
"94-96. Barrel Sample. An intense wine that is rich, rounded, dense and solid. Along with its weighty, ripe fruit, there are suggestions of acidity. Layered with botrytis flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Guiraud
"94-96. Barrel sample. Big and powerful, this is a wine that is supported by dense tannins. The feeling is dry and firm, with a brooding black-currant character.",Barrel Sample,Château Beausejour-Duffau-Lagarrosse
"94-96. Barrel sample. This wine dances so easily on the palate, yet still has the weight and richness of the year. There is a delicacy here, followed by an even denser intensity. It charms now, but will surely age over many years.",Barrel Sample,Château Rabaud-Promis
"94-96. Barrel sample. This wine is big, dense and impressive with plenty of concentration as well as acidity. It is balanced, bringing the big, ripe black-fruit flavor and firm tannins together with great style.",Barrel Sample,Château Ducru Beaucaillou
"93-95. Barrel sample. This is a structured and complex wine, with dominating sweet tannins. At the same time, there is fruitiness and juiciness that add freshness to the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Clerc Milon
"93-95. Barrel sample. Spice from new wood and the superripe, botrytized fruit show strongly in this powerful, impressive wine. It has weight, structure and intensity. It will surely age for many years.",Barrel Sample,Château Clos Haut-Peyraguey
"93-95. Barrel sample. A finely balanced wine, with a ripe mix of mango, apricot and pink grapefruit flavors. It has a fresh edge along with a rich, full character.",Barrel Sample,Château de France
"This is a thick and nicely concentrated Amarone with loads of inherent fruit and spice intensity. The wine sits well on the palate, with a heavy texture, soft tannins and a long, smoky close.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"In a richer style of Vinho Verde but nevertheless retaining plenty of cool, fresh characters. The wine has vivid grapefruit, lime and green apple flavors, rounded out attractively.",Monte Cascas Colheita,Casca Wines
"A firm and lively Cab with aromas of tobacco, cassis, spice cake and chocolate. It's ripe and forward on the palate, where the bouquet is reflected via flavors of cassis, vanilla, coffee and tobacco. Fresh on the finish and never herbal despite the 15% Carmenère in the blend.",Visión Block: El Recurso,Cono Sur
"Brown-gold in color, with a staunch, ripe bouquet of syrupy peach, apricot and caramel. The palate is rich and full bodied, with peach, apricot and sweet melon flavors. Thick and satisfying on the finish, but still fairly juicy due to good core acidity.",Late Harvest,Morandé
"This is a powerful but not exaggerated style of Amarone that delivers ripe cherry and blackberry aromas followed by new leather, cigar box, spice and rum cake. It imparts a very smooth, rich and supple feel.",Tenuta Lena di Mezzo,Monte del Frá
"A 70-30 blend of Corvina and Rondinella, this bright Amarone offers simple but genuine aromas of forest berry, toasted almond, cherry cola and vanilla bean. The wine is smooth, polished and crisp on the close.",Giacomo Montresor,Montresor
"A racy, light wine, fresh and floating with white and green pear fruits flavors, and just a touch of perfume. This is classic, fresh, fruity Riesling, delicious to drink, with crisp acidity at the end.",,Rieflé
"This vineyard-designate Ripasso opens with sweet aromas of cherry and Christmas spice followed by soft fruit tones and a smooth texture. It's an easy, food-friendly expression that would pair with meatloaf or roast pork and potatoes.",Il Sestante Vigneto I Pianeti,Tommasi
"Here's a light and well-toned Amarone that boasts bright aromas of white cherry, cranberry, spice, dried tobacco and tea leaf. It's a food-friendly alternative that would pair with roast chicken or roll pork stuffed with prunes.",Corte Majoli,Tezza
"This is a very sweet Viognier, with lots of honey, brown sugar, vanilla and cream flavors. It's rich and unctuous, but the orange and peach flavors could be a little more concentrated.",Roll Ranch,Ojai
"With its lemon and peach flavors, this is a ripe wine. It still has plenty of acidity, but its main focus is on its smooth texture, just given a light edge by a fruit-skin bite.",,Quinta de Santa Maria
"A lovely, dry, complex Pinot Noir to drink now and over the next several years with a great steak, lamb chop or roasted salmon. It's silky and smooth, with waves of cherries, raspberries, currants and cola, wrapped into silky tannins.",,Perception
"Very friendly and clean cava with good fruit and a pinch of aromatic toast. It's far from out of the ordinary, but it is extremely fresh and clean, with pure lemon-lime and green apple on the palate. Finishes fruity and with finesse. Really good in an uncomplicated way.",Marrugat Brut,Pinord
"Monte Gradella is an elegant and austere Valpolicella that represents the best of this traditional category of wine. The wine speaks highly of its territory, with aromas of maraschino cherry, cedar smoke and sweet aromas of vanilla bean and espresso. It shows firm, but polished tannins with sweet jammy fruit flavors on the close.",Monte Gradella,Santa Sofia
"This is a blend of Viognier, Grenache Blanc and Roussanne. It's extraordinarily rich in peach, pear, citrus and honeysuckle flavors, and is marked by zesty acidity, with a buttercreamy, oaky note. Interesting and complex. Try as an exotic alternative to a big Chardonnay.",Santa Barbara Highlands Vineyard,Nadia
"Lots of wood on the nose, and some scents of pickle that reflect the American oak barrels. The flavors follow along, spicy cranberry and raspberry fruit, with streaks of pickle and wood and a burst of alcoholic heat in the finish. The blend includes 17% Mourvèdre.",Amerique,McCrea Cellars
"A bit mulchy and swampy for Manso, with earthy tobacco and generic berry fruit aromas. The palate is flush and a little heavy, with creamy flavors of vanilla, dill weed and cassis. Soft and sweet late, with chunkiness and a medium to basic structure. A very good wine but not great as in past years.",Manso de Velasco Viejas Viñas Old Vines,Miguel Torres
"Wente continues to impress with fine wines at fair price points, and this 2007 is a case in point, a high-end offering at a still reasonable price. A rich, red Cabernet Sauvignon, with Petite Verdot and Petite Sirah in here, too, it delivers intense flavors of dark, ripe plums and brown sugar, a very agreeable Cabernet that will pair well with rich red meats.",Charles Wetmore,Wente
"Made in a big, overripe, soft and slightly sweet style, this will appeal to fans who like a more flamboyant Zinfandel. It's very ripe in berry jam, orange pekoe tea, cola and spice flavors. Almost a food group in itself. Drink with powerful, rich fare, such as spicy Vietnamese beef, Mexican tamales and tacos, or good old rubbed beef barbecue.",Papera Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This is a very pleasurable Ripasso that opens with attractive aromas of sweet spice, nutmeg and ground clove. But don't discount the fruit element because it's here too, loud and strong, as cherry and blackberry. The wine is smooth, silky and slightly sweet at the very end.",Marogne,Zeni
"Beefy, stocky aromas also bring herb, tomato and berry notes. The palate is jumpy and slightly medicinal, with currant, tomato, herb and plum flavors running the show. Medium in size, with level tannins and a juicy, good overall feel to it.",Baltos,Dominio de Tares
"Lightly perfumed and floral, this is classic mineral and gunflint Riesling. It is light in texture, clean and refreshing, with some crisp pear fruit and green plum skin tannins.",,Dopff & Irion
"Guigal customarily releases many of the firm's red wines after additional cellaring, so this 2006 is still on the market. It's nicely balanced for current drinking despite some slightly drying tannins on the finish, which only serve to accentuate the mouthwatering black cherry fruit. Leather and spice notes add welcome nuance.",,E. Guigal
"This is a light and streamlined Ripasso that offers the elegance of Valpolicella with the power and intensity of this traditional school of winemaking. The wine delivers interesting aromas of black fruit, cola and resin but there's also a touch of green olive or caper at the back.",Acini Ameni,Corte Figaretto
"An honest effort that tastes as the these varieties should taste. Light red-fruit flavors suggest brambly berries and cranberries with an undertone of forest floor and wild mushroom. Acids taste natural, tannins are proportional, and the mouthfeel is charmingly Bordeaux-like.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"A highly aromatic wine. Lychee is the prime scent along with white flowers, and the palate is oily but right, with lychee, ginger, spice and orange flavors. Plump but short on the finish, but clean as a whole. Very nice for Chilean Gewürz.",Visión,Cono Sur
"This is a big, rich, oaky Chardonnay. It's a little heavy with all that caramel and buttered toast, but acidity brightens the pineapple and peach flavors, and the finish is clean and spicy.",Réserve Spéciale Unfined,Arrowood
"A fine balance between green fruits and very fresh acidity and a ripe full, lightly oily texture. There is a fine citrus tang as well on this ripe full-bodied wine.",Sense,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Leafy, roasted and herbal up front, with modest ripe-fruit aromas sitting below. The palate smacks down hard with tannin and acidity, while the flavors are leafy, herbal and suggest raspberry and cherry. Prieto Picudo is a unique grape with a natural rubbery bite, but give Peregrino credit for presenting it well.",Peregrino Crianza,Gordonzello
"Something of a disappointment in this vintage, a wine that has an awkward bitter character. The wine is fine enough, with rich berry fruits, but misses the style of previous vintages.",Esporão Reserva,Herdade do Esporão
"93-95. Barrel sample. A dark and brooding wine, its fruit is firmly embedded in the tannins. The wine seems to hold its fire, and is both dense and concentrated.",Barrel Sample,Château Talbot
"93-95. Barrel sample. Smoky aromas and new-wood flavors mark this wine. It has weight, as well as a concentrated core of tannins; and it shows long-term aging potential.",Barrel Sample,Château Lagrange
"93-95. Barrel sample. Big tannins, smoky wood notes and prominent fruit mark this wine, along with acidity and freshness. It's powerful, with the most gentle structure of concentrated dusty tannins and intensely-fresh blackberry-juice flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Pichon Longueville
"93-95. Barrel sample. This is a crisp-textured wine, with a complex structure of rich, dense fruits, spice and wood. The wine is only just coming together, promising many years of aging ahead.",Barrel Sample,Château la Tour Blanche
"93-95. Barrel sample. The wine shows dryness and concentration, with a core of austere tannins. Its juicy character slowly emerges.",Barrel Sample,Château Bélair-Monange
"93-95. Barrel sample. A powerful wine__ts concentrated tannins contrast its underlying juicy fruit. This is a flavorful medley of prunes, dark plums and blackberries; the finish is marked with juiciness.",Barrel Sample,Château Gloria
"93-95. Barrel sample. This wine has an intense herbaceous quality, with fruit and nutmeg flavors. It feels and tastes powerful, with alcoholic warmth and a taut and nervy character.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Brion
"93-95. Barrel sample. A firm and tannic wine, it has the weight to support its tannins. It's balanced, solid and dense, with a powerful shot of black fruits.",Barrel Sample,Château Canon
"93-95. Barrel sample. An impressive wood- and tannin-laden wine, with intense, solid fruit. It's powerful, very dry and complex.",Barrel Sample,Château La Mission Haut-Brion
"93-95. Barrel sample. Very rich in botrytis, this is a dense, opulent wine that's charged and hugely ripe. The acidity is there in the background.",Barrel Sample,Château Lamothe Guignard
"93-95. Barrel sample. This wine is powerful and concentrated, with its tannins showing. It is perfumed, ripe and offers density that's impressive for the year.",Barrel Sample,Château Langoa Barton
"93-95. Barrel sample. Spice and green apple flavors dominate the palate of this crisp yet creamy wine. It has a fine, dense texture, and the fruit comes through with great intensity. The wood is neatly in support.",Pavillon Blanc de Margaux Barrel Sample,Château Margaux
"93-95. Barrel sample. The wine shows depth and richness while also being very structured, almost severe. Weight and density is followed by extreme juiciness and blackberry fruits.",Barrel Sample,Clos du Marquis
"93-95. Barrel sample. A ripe, balanced wine, with a structure that's well-integrated into its rich, sweet fruit. It has an edge of spice and bitter-orange flavors to go with the opulent front texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Caillou
"93-95. Barrel sample. A rich, smooth and velvety wine, this has richness and weight along with delicious acidity. There is a good depth of texture and structure along with a ripe feel.",Barrel Sample,Château Figeac
"93-95. Barrel sample. A wine that shows rounded, opulent fruit. Its structure has a dark side that's melded into its rich fruits. Weight and juiciness combine on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Grand-Puy Ducasse
"93-95. Barrel sample. A perfumed wine that's soft and ripe. It has delicious flavors of juicy fruit and black currant, as well as lively acidity. Its depth of flavor comes with layers of fruit rather than tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Batailley
"93-95. Barrel sample. Very herbaceous in character, this is a wine that is packed with powerful acidity yet remains elegant in style. It has minerality and tight acidity, and should benefit from aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Carbonnieux
"93-95. Barrel sample. Dense and ripe, this wine boasts sweet tannins and flavors of ripe plums. With the vintage's tight, taut acidity, the aging potential is there.",Barrel Sample,Château Kirwan
"93-95. Barrel sample. This wine has richness, weight and dark tannins, with balanced fruit and a ripe mouthfeel. It's powered by spice and blackberry flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Lafon-Rochet
"93-95. Barrel sample. Ripe, fruity and powerful, this wine has intense Cabernet black-currant flavors, with plenty of richness and concentration. It shows the acidity and the bright fruit of the year.",Barrel Sample,Château Léoville Poyferré
93-95. Barrel sample. This is powered by tannins while also keeping its fresh fruit intact. There is a mineral texture that's layered with a juicy fruit character on the finish.,Comtesse de Lalande Barrel Sample,Château Pichon Longueville Comtesse de Lalande
"93-95. Barrel sample. A fine wine that shows crisp fruit and a dense, dry structure. This is solid, fruit-packed and firm.",Barrel Sample,Château Trotanoy
"93-95. Barrel sample. Rich fruit flavors of spiced orange are layered into its structure. With a smooth texture and fine balance, it is opulent, crisp and dense. A wine for long-term aging.",Barrel Sample,Château de Myrat
"92-94. Barrel sample. Very dry, firm and hard, this is heavily dominated by new wood. It's only the underlying weight that suggests the black fruit potential.",Barrel Sample,Château Angélus
"92-94. Barrel sample. A smooth and rich wine that also shows depth of flavor. Wrapped in its tight texture are notes of peach and mango, bitter orange and lemon zest. It's a fine wine that should age for many years.",Barrel Sample,Château de Fargues
"92-94. Barrel sample. A ripe and spicy wine, with crisp fruit. The wine has an attractive fruitiness, and its tannins are not aggressive. This shows great final acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Lalande-Borie
92-94. Barrel sample. Creamed fruit aromas are followed by a herbaceous quality. The wine has some richness and new-wood flavors; mouth-watering acidity marks the finish.,Barrel Sample,Château Larrivet Haut-Brion
"92-94. Barrel sample. This is a dense wine, with complex and concentrated flavors of sweet plum, chocolate and licorice. It's powerful, showing its extraction.",Barrel Sample,Château Lynch-Moussas
"92-94. Barrel sample. Firm and complex, it shows both ripe fruit and weighty tannins, and is still very closed and tight. This is a powerful expression of the vintage__ wine that should age well.",Barrel Sample,Château Prieuré-Lichine
"Rich and dense, a spicy wine, dominated by a smooth, concentrated character. The acidity is present and gives an essential antidote to the ripe black fruits, leaving a wine that is powerful without being excessive.",Carlos Reynolds,Julian Reynolds
"Heavy and dense in the mouth, with rich flavors of grilled blackberries, pepper and a lovely addition of toasted oak. Nice and dry, but a bit too soft, and would benefit from greater structure.",Colson Canyon Vineyard,Brander
"Calina usually makes a nice value Chardonnay, and this vintage is no different. The wine has a chunky dry-peach opening, which is backed by a round, smooth palate and flavors of sweet pear, baked apple and roasted corn. Honey and orange notes make cameo appearances. Good for the price.",Reserva,Calina
"Green, mildly vegetal and lightly tropical, with a tangy, acid-driven palate and citrusy, sharp flavors of grapefruit, tangerine and orange. Quick on the finish but sizzling, with an abundance of mouth-washing acidity. Very food friendly even toward the end of its prescribed lifespan.",Tributo,Caliterra
"An intoxicating bouquet of Indian spices, rose water and lychee, this lovely dry wine is full of soft, plush pink grapefruit and lychee flavors. Like many full bodied Gewürz's, it is a bit broad in the midpalate, but its gorgeously spiced ceylon tea finish makes a lasting impression. A match made in heaven with lighter South Indian, Thai or Chinese fare.",Dry,Bloomer Creek
"A bit mulchy but also displaying power and quality for an under-$10 wine. The nose is initially murky but evolves toward sweet, simple berry fruit. Meanwhile, the palate is ripe, bouncy, lively and solid, with cherry, plum and chocolaty flavors. Slightly big and rubbery but convincing as a whole.",Val Montium,Bodegas Adriá
"Satisfying from the purple color to the sweet bouquet to the clean palate to the long finish. It's a little simple and syrupy, but overall there's plenty of freshening acidity and flavors of plum, berry and chocolate to make it a complete and balanced wine. And that's really all you should hope for in this price category.",Luzon Verde Organic Grapes,Bodegas Luzón
"Rubbery and roasted, but not too much so. Otherwise one should look for medicinal berry aromas followed by flavors of baked plum, prune and black pepper. The finish is dense, a touch flat, and chocolaty; overall this is a chunky, sweet performer.",,Bodegas Tarima
"Here's a wine that seems to have experienced a bit of a transformation in past vintages. The 2008 expression is lighter and crisper than in the past, but the price tag has also been lowered considerably. Begali is a consistent, quality-minded producer and this wine would pair with all kinds of casual home-cooked meals.",La Cengia,Begali
"A rich, smooth Cabernet for drinking soon. Made from a blend of vineyards through the appellation, it shows blackberry, currant, cassis and oak notes, wrapped into firm tannins.",,Bell
"In the past, Allegrini adopted a vocal stand against Ripasso (a middle ground wine between Amarone and Valpolicella) and for this reason Corte Giara Ripasso comes as a big surprise. Despite the controversy, this historic producer presents a very acceptable wine with pretty tones of sweet spice and bright berry.",Corte Giara,Allegrini
"Bright, polished and packed tight with bright berry aromas, this easy-going Ripasso offers an informal interpretation of what is often a bulky, big wine. Instead, Aldegheri offers a food-friendly wine with just the right level of acidity and tannin to pair with cheese or meat.",,Aldegheri
"This elegant Riesling smells beautifully of honey, fresh apples and petrol. Dry and austere, but not the least bit bony in style, its refreshing lime juice palate and saline finish would pair wonderfully with sashimi or raw oysters.",,Château des Charmes
"Amarone Capitel de' Roari delivers a crisp, lean expression that showcases Valpolicella winemaking tradition. The only out-of-place elements are the oak shadings that comes across as toasted nut, leather and dried tobacco.",Capitel de' Roari,Luigi Righetti
"Pretty orange blossom and yellow peach aromas against a backdrop of petrol make this __ently dry,_ light-bodied Riesling a classic expression of the grape. Lots of ripe stonefruit and florals shower the palate, leading to a persistent finish marked with vibrant acidity and a bright lime skin finish.",Keuka Lec Reserve Gently Dry,Keuka Lake Vineyards
"Good price for a Cabernet of this quality, and one that's been aged for four-plus years. It's soft and mellow and drinkable now, with enjoyable blackberry, currant, licorice, spice and cedar flavors.",Kiara Private Reserve,Le Vigne
"A huge advancement over the precious vintage, representing new decisions by the winery. It's a rich, easy-drinking wine, showing delightful lime, peach, melon and lemongrass flavors, brightened with crisp acidity.",The Fumé,Murphy-Goode
"Made from 100% Syrah and aged in 100% new French oak, this wine is currently hard, astringent and oaky, with caramel, vanilla and buttered toast aromas and flavors. The actual Syrah itself is clean and pure in ripe blackberry jam. Might do something over the years, but probably best now, with a decant.",Waxing Poetic,Sanguis
"Blended to an average of five years of age, this wine is a soft, easy-drinking Australian tawny, with subtle nutty aromas and flavors of orange zest and caramel.",Cellar No. 7 Tawny,Seppeltsfield
"Ripasso Pegrandi is a polished and squeaky clean wine with fine aromas of wild fruit, spice, natural rubber and toasted almond. It tastes crisp, tight and would make a great companion to green peppers or zucchini stuffed with rice and ground veal.",Pegrandi,Vaona
"The Howling Wolfe Zinfandel is a bowl of berries and chocolate, soft in the mouth, full across the palate, and ready for near-term drinking.",Howling Wolfe,Thurston Wolfe
"From the Valpantena subzone of Valpolicella, this easy Ripasso opens with a thin ruby color and bright aromas of white cherry, raspberry candy and vanilla. The wine closes with a fresh, tonic feel and lively berry flavors.",,Tezza
"Dark, full-bodied and a little ponderous, showing firm tannins and blackberry, blueberry, plum, mocha and spice flavors that finish dry and spicy. Lacks some complexity, but overall a good red to wash down grilled meats.",,Star Lane Vineyard
"A bit thin and acidic, but charming for its dryness and firm tannins, which call for rich, marbled beef. The pepper-inspired blackberry and cassis flavors are fine. Not an ager, but will benefit from a few hours of decanting.",York Creek,Ridge
"The simplest wine in Alsace is often Pinot Blanc, meaning, as in this case, the wine is pure drinking pleasure, with fresh apricot and pineapple. An excellent apéritif wine.",,Rieflé
"From two vineyards located in the warmer part of Santa Ynez Valley, this Sauvignon Blanc was mostly fermented in stainless steel, with a portion in neutal oak. The result is a nice, rich and creamy wine, slightly sweet in citrus, apricot and vanilla bean flavors, and balanced with crisp acidity.",,Rock Hollow
"One of the most cutting, acid-intense Albariños out there. The nose in minerally and tight as a drum, with green melon and green apple scents. The palate is razor sharp and driving, with tangy, high-toned lemon and Granny Smith apple flavors. Totally citric and zesty; it will last another few years.",,Palacio de Fefiñanes
"A softly delicious Pinot made for drinking now with upscale fare. It's pale in color and dry, with very rich flavors of Dr. Pepper, raspberry jam and sweet smoky oak, folded into a silky texture.",Windsor Oak Vineyard,Miro
"A blend of Pinot Blanc and Auxerrois created to go with Japanese food, Gyotaku is a soft, easy wine, very balanced and harmonious, with just a light hint of sweetness and spice. Definitely a wine for sushi. Screw cap.",Cuvée Gyotaku,Mittnacht Frères
"Clean and inviting, but simple, with apple and fresh-herb aromas. The palate is properly crisp yet not sharp, and the flavors of green apple and white grapes are snappy. Regular and a little better than good in every way, but ultimately more basic than special.",Brut,Mont Paral
"92-94. Barrel sample. While the wood is prominent, so is its concentrated, perfumed fruit. With its immense structure, this wine is spicy and very intense.",Barrel Sample,Le Dôme
"92-94. Barrel sample. A powerful wine, with dark fruits and structured tannins. Impressively rich, it is dense and black in character.",Barrel Sample,Vieux Château Mazerat
"92-94. Barrel sample. There is weight, richness and firm spice flavor here. The wine has a juicy character along with firm tannins. It shows the pure fruit freshness of the vintage, with a little extra weight.",Les Forts de Latour Barrel Sample,Château Latour
"92-94. Barrel sample. This wine is tight and taut, with minerality. Its fruit is heavily citrusy, with a character that cuts like steel through the nervy texture. This shows aging potential.",Barrel Sample,Château Latour-Martillac
92-94. Barrel sample. Ripe and sweet tannins combine easily with this wine's juicy fruit and spice notes. All of the elements hang comfortably together.,Barrel Sample,Château les Ormes de Pez
"92-94. Barrel sample. DA dark, dry wine that shows its strong, firm tannins. The wine is well structured, with flavors of mint, new wood and a layer of blackberry fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Magdelaine
"92-94. Barrel sample. This wine shows its crisp side immediately, followed by flavors of rich fruit. The wine has weight that lies underneath its deliciously fresh character, and there is a final note of spiced orange.",Barrel Sample,Château Nairac
"92-94. Barrel sample. Mint flavors make the initial impression, with its fruit buried deep in the concentrated structure. Wood tannins dominate this polished wine, but its finish shows a juicy character.",Barrel Sample,Château Beau-Séjour Bécot
"92-94. Barrel sample. This is a dark wine that's dominated by firm and dry tannins. It has weight and power, with juicy plum flavors showing slowly under the tannins. Shows long-aging potential.",Barrel Sample,Château Belgrave
"92-94. Barrel sample. Mint, smooth fruit and new-wood flavors overlay the firm tannins. Juicy and attractive, this wine has structure, complexity and an innate fresh character.",Barrel Sample,Château Croizet-Bages
"92-94. Barrel sample. An intensely powerful wine__o rich that it overwhelms with its weight. At the same time, there is a great core of fine acidity that cuts the richness well.",Barrel Sample,Château de Malle
"92-94. Barrel sample. A big wine that's packed with ripe dark-plum flavors, smoky tannins and richness. It shows a powerful, balanced structure.",La Chapelle d'Ausone Barrel Sample,Château Ausone
"92-94. Barrel sample. A very firm and closed wine, it shows its tannins rather than its fruit. With its weight, this dark wine should become rounded with age.",Barrel Sample,Château Beychevelle
"92-94. Barrel sample. Firm and concentrated, this wine has great structure and density along with acidity and berry flavor. There is an attractive final spicy element.",Barrel Sample,Château Certan de May de Certan
"92-94. Barrel sample. Packed with dark tannins and spicy wood, the wine is rich, dark and very structured. It is powered as much by its tannins as its wood.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Armailhac
"92-94. Barrel sample. A solid, chunky wine that feels powerful and dense. Its tannins overlay the ripe fruit, and the finish has a juicy character.",Barrel Sample,Château Petit-Village
"92-94. Barrel sample. A smooth, richly textured wine, with flavors of sweet orange and spice that combine with dark wood and pomegranate.",Barrel Sample,Château Romer
92-94. Barrel sample. Herbaceous aromas are followed by nutmeg and crisp fruit. This has the great ripe fruit of the year without the huge intensity; it's a wine that has subtlety as well as complexity.,Barrel Sample,Château Doisy-Daëne
"92-94. Barrel sample. This wine is based on tannins, yet it also has weight and a complex fruit structure. Its power lies in the density of its texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Branaire-Ducru
"92-94. Barrel sample. Mint and new wood aromas lead to a palate that has dark and concentrated tannins. The wine is bright and fresh, with juicy black-currant and plum flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Troplong Mondot
"92-94. Barrel sample. Made in an elegant style, this wine has richness without weight. It is stylish with some freshness, bearing black fruits and a perfumed finish.",Barrel Sample,Château la Fleur-Pétrus
92-94. Barrel sample. This wine has both weight and a light touch. Its weight is driven by the powerful botrytis character and ripe apricot fruit; its lightness comes from a straight line of intense acidity that cuts through the wine. It should age a long time.,Barrel Sample,Château Sigalas Rabaud
"92-94. Barrel sample. A smooth, mellifluous wine, with its intensity masked by tight acidity. It shows the weight of the vintage, and the power of the botrytis that's interspersed with flavors of orange zest and lime. It should age magnificently.",Barrel Sample,Château Coutet
"92-94. Barrel sample. A big, fruity wine that manages to balance its ripe tropical-fruit flavors with notes of spice and grapefruit. It has weight and is still settling down. Concentrated and intense.",Barrel Sample,Château de Fieuzal
"92-94. Barrel sample. A very firm and closed wine. It has intense tannins, with the fruit following slowly behind. The structure is impressive, while the black-currant flavors are still to show.",Barrel Sample,Château de Pez
"92-94. Barrel sample. Packed with dense tannins and firm fruit, this is a big, powerful wine. It is initially austere, but with time it becomes more rounded, with layers of wood tannins and rich fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Bailly
"92-94. Barrel sample. An impressive and powerful wine, with its tannins packed into rich flavors of bitter chocolate and black fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Hosanna
"92-94. Barrel sample. Serious and structured, this is a concentrated dark-hued wine. It has all the acidity of the vintage while also showing firm tannins. A dry and powerful second wine.",Carruades de Lafite Barrel Sample,Château Lafite Rothschild
"92-94. Barrel sample. Very concentrated, this has dark tannins and dense fruits. It has power, intensity and the essence of black plum skin.",Barrel Sample,Château Larmande
"92-94. Barrel sample. This wine is powered with acidity, dark tannins and smoky wood. Concentrated and dense, it has weight along with the delicious, juicy fruits.",Barrel Sample,Château Trottevieille
"At a whopping 17.5% alcohol, this powerful Amarone delivers heat, brawn and loads of mature cherry, ripened blackberry and tobacco. You can feel the burn on the close so be careful to pair this wine with a hearty winter dish that will soak it all up.",Costa delle Corone,Monteci
"Qupe reaches into the Edna Valley for this finely crafted Grenache. It's pale in color and has the silky texture of Pinot Noir, but there's an earthy, Provençal herb tug to the cherry and cola flavors. A dry, polished and complex wine with a crisp edge of cool-climate acidity.",Sawyer Lindquist Vineyard,Qupé
"From the family behind Bosquet des Papes in Châteauneuf, this is a solid Côtes du Rhône, with modest tannins but decent structure and typical notes of leather, dried cherries, chocolate and cinnamon. Drink it over the next few years.",,Domaine Nicolas Boiron
"For a Gewürz, this is restrained, a soft, open and attractively easy wine, lightly hinting at lychee and pear juice. Drink now.",,Dopff & Irion
"Named for the practice of aging the Shiraz on Chardonnay lees, Gemtree's 2007 White Lees features plenty of plummy fruit and vanilla oak, with enough savoriness to keep it in check. It's a full-bodied effort with soft tannins and a slightly warming finish. Drink now.",White Lees,Gemtree
"Big, fat Pinot Gris, with the typical spice and ripe fruit. The wine is full and round, attractively filled with peach fruits and a hint of fine acidity. Screw cap.",Réserve,Gustave Lorentz
"This dark and extracted Ripasso opens with an inviting, inky color and aromas of toasted nut, spice, red cherry and cola. There's a touch of new rubber and moist earth in there as well and the wine feels weighty but smooth on the close.",Alfio Moriconi Selection,Antica Corte
"Ripasso Cicilio shines bright with personality and freshness. This territory-driven wine boasts clean aromas of berry fruit, light shadings of spice and a touch of sweet cinnamon. It's easy, crisp mouthfeel washes clean over the palate.",Cicilio,Degani
"Very dense in the mouth and full-bodied, with a dry, soft feeling. Lots of toasty oak, too. Feels somewhat inert, but the delicious cherries, toast and spices make it a pleasant sipper.",,Dierberg
"A lighter style Pinot made to drink now, and the price makes it a good value. It's elegant and silky, with nice raspberry, cola and cherry flavors. Production was 50,000 cases, making it easy to find.",,Castle Rock
"A restrained and somewhat backward reserve, this is hiding its fruit behind a dry, somewhat earthy, wall of tannin. There are interesting nuances of seed, leaf and stem, along with a base fruit flavor of raspberry/cranberry, and the wine persists into a slightly bitter finish, but it seems to be holding itself back. A second bottle was better, with a little more fruit.",Reserve,Columbia Crest
"What's really nice about this wine is that it offers mellow, soft structure behind its vibrant cherry flavors. If you're looking for a good, solid Valpolicella to pair with all kinds of easy, home-cooked meals, Villa Novare is a sure bet.",Villa Novare Vigneto Ognisanti,Bertani
"From the Valpantena subzone of Valpolicella, this is a well-balanced and easy-going Ripasso that opens with bright aromas of wild berry, forest floor, exotic spice and leather. It has a compact but fresh mouthfeel and would pair with a medium intensity meat dish such as rolled veal involtini with cheese and sage.",Secco Bertani,Bertani
"A nice, flavorful and dry Syrah for drinking now with barbecue or a rich lamb or beef stew. Soft and gentle, it's rich in blackberries, cherries, currants, beef jerky, pepper and smoky oak.",Clover Creek Vineyard,Brander
"Campo Progn_i is a gracefully oak-aged Valpolicella Superiore that shows surprising density and persistency with lively aromas of cherry, blackberry, toasted almond and exotic spice. Pair this wine with roasted chicken or meatloaf.",Campo Progn_i,Latium di Morini
"This Merlot is strong and jammy in cherries and blackberries, with some herbs and spices for interest. It's dry and crisp, a nice wine for drinking now.",DaKine Vineyard,Longboard
"Crisper and tighter than most other Australian Chards in this bracket, this value-priced offering from McWilliams features ample flavors of pear, citrus and toasty hints of wood. Drink now.",,McWilliam's Hanwood Estate
"Tart in acidity, this has strong flavors of caramelized oak, pineapple jam, green apples and buttered toast. It will satisfy your Chardonnay sweet tooth.",Herrick Vineyard Reserve,Martin Ray
"This is a fine, supple Pinot Noir for drinking now. It shows authentic Russian River fanciness in the smooth tannins, good acidity and complex cherry, cola, pomegranate and persimmon flavors, touched with sweet smoky oak.",,Mueller
"Yering Station makes a regular Chardonnay and a Reserve Chardonnay as well; this is its entry-level Chard, and quite a good one. Bright pineapple notes and a hint of grilled fruit are clean and fresh if somewhat straightforward in this medium-bodied wine. Drink now.",Little Yering,Yering Station
Here's a ripe and jammy expression of Amarone that shows some of the heat of the 2003 vintage. Red cherry and raspberry jam are backed by gritty spice and firm tannins.,,Tommaso Bussola
"Fastened with a pretty pink wax capsule, Taso Valpolicella is a fresh and informal wine that would pair beautifully with pasta or pizza. The wine is redolent of white cherry, blueberry and almond paste.",Taso,Villa Bellini
Here's a less formal expression of Ripasso that would work nicely next to a home cooked meal of meatloaf or pasta with meat ragù. The wine shows integrated acidity next to bright aromas of cherry and white chocolate.,Bure Alto,Villa Girardi
"High alcohol of 20% makes this dessert wine hot in the mouth. That's the main impression, because the sweetness and fruit aren't quite strong enough to balance the heat. Nonetheless it's pretty sweet, with blackberry jam and chocolate flavors.",Mistral Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This vintage of Tezza's Corte Majoli Ripasso offers much more intensity on the nose that comes forward as smoky-spice, leather, tobacco and mature berry. The wine is aged in oak and this process had imparted background tones of vanilla and toasted nut.",Corte Majoli,Tezza
"A Rhône-style blend that's rich in cola, blackberry and cherry jam and oak flavors. The tannins are fine and ripe, while acidity is on the soft side, giving the wine a certain directness. Yet it's nicely dry and clean. Drink now.",Aurelio's Selection,Star Angel by Montes
"This Zin is made from a combination of four of Newsome-Harlow's vineyard sources, including Locke, Big John's, Dalton and Shake Ridge Ranch, the latter three of which are all single-vineyard bottlings, and incorporates 12% Petite Sirah. It's solid, with pretty raspberry flavors and hints of spice and admirable acidity. A little sweeter and tighter than the winery's single-vineyard efforts.",,Newsome-Harlow
"This is drinking very well, with plenty of peppery spice around mature, soft, light fruit. It's a nicely-balanced effort, with tart red fruits, pepper, dried leaf, and just a little heat from the (surprisingly high) alcohol, listed at 14.9%. Drink up.",Private Blend,Nodland
"Dark, smoky, heavily oaked and resiny, with aromas of char, leather and burnt toast. The palate is big and forceful, with a lot of oak character and also snappy blackberry, plum and buttery flavors. Modern and creamy, with enough quality fruit to back things up.",,Obalo
"An exotic, dry and crisp Chardonnay, with plenty of toasty oak. Shows a mélange of dried orange, pineapple and pear fruit, with a minerally note. There's a feral quality that may be the result of native yeasts. Drink now.",Tweek Block,Old World
"92-94. Barrel sample. An impressive wine that has weight and intense botrytis notes. Its acidity gives a delicious lift to its powerful flavors of yellow fruits, tangerines and light wood spices.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Arche
"92-94. Barrel sample. While the wine does have firm tannins, these are layered with open, ripe fruits. There are blackberry flavors, and the wine shows good acidity and a firm finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Gruaud Larose
"92-94. Barrel sample. A herbaceous wine that has ripe yellow-fruit flavors. It is rich and fruity, and layered with grapefruit and sweet peach notes. It finishes tight, with minerality.",La Clarté de Haut-Brion Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Brion
"91-93. Barrel sample. A lively, bright wine that's not too weighty. It has notes of mineral and citrus, with attractive acidity and just the right amount of balancing weight.",Barrel Sample,Château Bouscaut
"91-93. Barrel sample. A beautifully-fresh wine, with its acidity cutting through the weight of its smooth fruit__ike scissors cutting through velvet. Intense, with spice and acidity showing through on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Lafaurie-Peyraguey
"91-93. Barrel sample. Very floral, this soft wine has smooth fruits and black-currant acidity; it represents Margaux's elegant side.",Pavillon Rouge de Margaux Barrel Sample,Château Margaux
"91-93. Barrel sample. A delicious wine, with ripe plum and berry flavors. It pairs acidity and firm tannins with its fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Moulin Saint-Georges
"91-93. Barrel sample. This wine has density, with very dry, massive tannins. This is a wine for long-term aging; it has a solid texture, with its fruit well buried.",Barrel Sample,Château Smith Haut Lafitte
"91-93. Barrel sample. Rich, spicy and dense, this wine shows a serious side. It has power and concentration, and the wood offers dryness as well as spice. Its fruit seems to be a separate layer at this stage.",Barrel Sample,Château Duhart-Milon
"91-93. Barrel sample. A very smoky wine, with firm tannins, intense spice and a dry bitter-chocolate character. Its freshness is currently overlain by the wood and fruit tannins.",Le Clarence de Haut-Brion Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Brion
"91-93. Barrel sample. This wine has firm, solid tannins, but enough rich dark fruit to sustain all of the dryness.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Sarpe
"91-93. Barrel sample. Dry and dense, this wine has weight and a juicy character that slowly surfaces. A final burst of tannins marks the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château la Cabanne
"91-93. Barrel sample. This wine shows white and yellow fruits with a note of spice. It's warm and rich, with mouthwatering acidity and a crisp lemon finish.",Barrel Sample,Château la Garde
"91-93. Barrel sample. A wine that shows excellent structure, with ripe fruit and soft, warm tannins. It has weight while retaining its crisp acidity and intense black-currant flavor.",Alter Ego de Château Palmer Barrel Sample,Château Palmer
"91-93. Barrel sample. A bright, fruit-forward wine that already shows its delicious blackberry flavors. It is ripe and juicy, with a layer of finely integrated tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Pavie Macquin
"91-93. Barrel sample. Initially this is just a seductive effort; but then its intensity and structure emerge, creating a wine of great complexity. Its botrytis character adds considerable weight.",Barrel Sample,Château Suau
"91-93. Barrel sample. Blackberry fruits dominate this ripe wine. It is already delicious, with a round and well-cushioned structure.",Barrel Sample,Château Clinet
"91-93. Barrel sample. An attractive and fruity wine that offers soft, cushioned tannins, along with ripe, easy fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Grand-Puy-Lacoste
"91-93. Barrel sample. Initially severe, this wine shows weight coupled with firm, dry tannins. Dense and complex black-currant flavors dominate.",Barrel Sample,Château Beaumont
"91-93. Barrel sample. Solid and dominated by dry tannins from both wood and fruit, this wine has intense, juicy black-fruit flavors. It's open and lively, but shows a core of dense dryness.",Barrel Sample,Château Brane-Cantenac
"91-93. Barrel sample. Lean and austere on the surface, this wine shows a bitter chocolate edge. It feels extracted, very dark and concentrated.",Barrel Sample,Château la Gaffelière
"91-93. Barrel sample. Firm tannins, smoky fruits and a rounded character coming from wood aging. This is smooth, rich, with fruitiness showing strongly at the end.",Le Petit Lion Barrel Sample,Château Léoville Las Cases
"91-93. Barrel sample. This has an herbal character along with spice. It's juicy, with intense acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Providence
"91-93. Barrel sample. With a dominant austere minerality, this wine has weight but not the delicious fruitiness of the vintage. The finish is marked by a steely texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Ferrande
"91-93. Barrel sample. This is a big, concentrated wine that shows intensity of well-balanced tannins and juicy fruit. It's ripe, with obvious aging potential.",Barrel Sample,Château Cantenac Brown
"91-93. Barrel sample. A smooth, rounded wine, this shows opulence with its rich blackberry fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château le Bon Pasteur
"91-93. Barrel sample. Mouton Rothschild's second wine is showing increasing stature. This vintage shows spice, new wood and Mouton's signature acidity. It has a soft, rounded texture, with a plump, warm feel.",Le Petit Mouton Barrel Sample,Château Mouton Rothschild
"91-93. Barrel sample. A wine with weight and richness, there is considerable concentration, with citrus flavor and ripe fruit densely set in the background.",Barrel Sample,Château Olivier
"91-93. Barrel sample. Ripe and spicy, with delicious open fruit, this wine is rounded yet has a straight line of pure acidity. It has a light touch while showing depth of flavor for the future.",Barrel Sample,Château Saint-Pierre
"91-93. Barrel sample. Along with its Saint-Estèphe tannins, this wine proves to be richly fruity and complex, with notes of spice. The finish shows the acidity of the year.",Barrel Sample,Château Cos Labory
"A bit lemony and tight to start with; aromas of roasted berry, coffee, shoe polish and tar are hard and dark. In the mouth, it's fresh and tannic, with forward flavors of black fruit, herbs, dark chocolate and toast. Shows some heat and burn on the finish, but it's a concentrated, full-force wine.",Crucero Reserva,Siegel
"Rieflé is one of the rare Alsace producers who indicates the sweetness and richness levels of their wine. This wine rates a level just below the median of the chart, a fair assessment of the medium-sweet taste, emphasizing the richness of the grape and giving flavors of lychee and spice.",,Rieflé
"This ruby-colored Valpolicella opens with bursting tones of red cherry and blackberry with nice spice and toasted almond accents. The mouthfeel is not too rich or bold, but the wine does deliver pretty flavors of jammy fruit and pressed violet.",Vigneti di Montegradella,Sartori
"This is a fresh, lively Pinot Noir for drinking now. It's elegantly silky and dry, with crisp acids and pure flavors of cherries, cola, spices and oak. A touch of oak adds smoky richness.",,Scott Family
"Here's a thin and easy-going Ripasso that starts with bright fruit aromas of cherry, blueberry and dried raspberry. There are hints of sourness, but also sweetness, and the mouthfeel is compact and bright overall.",La Traversagna,Monte Faustino
"This Ripasso will appeal to those who enjoy a bold, meaty style of wine. Definitely a solid choice for grilled steak, there are bold aromas of cured beef, spice, mature fruit and old leather.",Costa delle Corone Tenazio,Monteci
"Tight, taut, mineral-driven wine, lively with a light prickle on the tongue. This is very fresh, with citrus and grapefruit flavors. Delicious, bone-dry Vinho Verde.",Quinta do Tamariz,Quinta de Santa Maria
"For an inexpensive wine, this is a pretty good investment. The alcohol is high, but it's in keeping with the cherry, berry, currant, dark chocolate and spice richness, giving a fat, glycerol oiliness to the fruit. Easy to like this soft, dry, heady wine.",Estate Grown,2 Cocky Sisters
"Made in the modern style, with lots of upfront, jammy flavors of blackberries, cherries and raspberries. It's a drily tannic wine, with good acidity. Fully drinkable now after a brief decant.",Odyssey Estate Reserve,Arger-Martucci
"Here's a soft, fruity and sweet Cabernet, rich and spicy in raspberry, cherry and blackberry jam. Lots of new oak adds smoky vanilla and caramel notes. It's delicious, but pretty direct, lacking some complexity and structure.",Talianna,Bell
"Hitting the tongue with a slight spritz, this is another elegant, beautifully perfumed Riesling. On the nose, it's billowing with white, waxy floral perfume, honey, fresh apples and a tinge of petrol. The perfume persists on the palate as well, combining with fresh lime juice and notes of slate and wet stone.",Beamsville Bench,Cave Spring
"Fiery to start, with spice and herbal fruit aromas. The palate is juicy, lively and healthy in feel, with berry, plum and spice flavors. Finishes herbal and a little leafy, and there's not as much stuffing as you'd expect for a Toro red. On the plus side, it's manageable and not overweight.",,Campiña
"This is a Bordeaux blend, based on Merlot, with some Petite Sirah mixed in. It's very dry, quite full-bodied and a little rustic, with some tough, edgy tannins. Doesn't seem like an ager, but it will benefit from a few hours in a decanter.",The McNab,Bonterra
"A delicious Chardonnay made in the California style of ripeness. It's fortunately balanced with acidity, which balances the sweet pineapple and honey flavors, but needs to be a bit drier.",Nueva,Carneros Highway
"Wines from Plan de Dieu are rarely seen in the U.S., but this is an attractive offering from the Quiot family's holdings in that region. It's dark in profile, with aromas and flavors that veer from black cherry toward black olive and coffee. It's medium bodied, with some fine, slightly dusty tannins on the finish. Drink it over the next few years.",Plan de Dieu,Château du Trignon
There's a deep smoky element here that is offset by bright tones of cherry and blackberry. This is a wine that would pair beautifully at an outdoor barbecue with hamburgers and baby back ribs.,,Corte Lenguin
"Yellow-gold in color, with baked fruit, butterscotch, creamed corn and wood resin aromas. Forcefully oaked and massive in the mouth, with enough sporty acidity to prop up the woodspice, nutmeg and resiny flavors that render the fruit secondary. Much like chewing on an oak plank, structured and layered.",Blanco,Finca Allende
"The fruit is fresh and crisp with a lightly perfumed floral character, its pear and green apple flavors still young. It needs a couple of years more to fully blend together.",Millésime L'Exception Brut,Dopff & Irion
"Scents of blueberries and darker fruits come with a curious floral/citrus top note, but in the mouth the wine is all fruit and berries. The blend includes a splash of Syrah and Lemberger, along with a little bit of Merlot, but it's clearly Cab dominated. Black olive, smoke, earth and firm tannins give it a feeling of authority in the mouth and through the finish.",,Hogue
"What helps make this Ripasso stand out in a crowd are its polished mineral notes of slate and crushed stone. Those drying aromas are followed by wild blueberry and light spice. The close is bright and fresh, albeit simple.",,Luciana Cordioli
"Opens with rubber, smoke, leather and coffee aromas, then the fruit comes in on the palate, which is juicy and correct, with tight, fresh red-fruit flavors and notes of ripe tomato and pepper flake. Finishes spicy and dry, with a crispness that'll make it 100% food-friendly.",Campo Burgo Crianza,Marqués de Campo Nuble
"A beautiful Petite Sirah that takes the variety's wild berry and spice flavors and big tannins and tames them down to elegance. It's dry and moderate in alcohol, which is always a consideration with Petite Sirah. A minor quibble is excessive softness. Drink now.",,Miro
"The nose on Keuka Lake's Evergreen Lek Vineyard is wonderfully intriguing with dark notes of smoke, petrol and brine accented by hits of ripe, yellow peach. Dry on the palate with nuances of dark steel, smoke and orange peel, this medium-bodied Riesling is brightened by a flash of fresh orange acidity and sweet grapefruit pith on the finish.",Evergreen Lek Vineyard Dry,Keuka Lake Vineyards
"A good, everyday Chard. It's sweet in caramelly oak, vanilla, buttered toast, pineapple jam and butterscotch flavors, with just in time acidity to make it finish clean and brisk.",,Frog's Leap
"This __asic_ Tierra de León wine made from the obscure Prieto Picudo grape outshines Pricum's higher-priced bottlings. It has a leathery nose with mild baked-berry flavors, while the palate is tight but not astringent. Flavors of toamto, red currant, raspberry and herbs are snappy, and overall it's textured and long in the mouth.",,Pricum
"A good, useful Cabernet, made for balance in large quantities from vineyards up and down the valley. It's dry, tannic and complex in blackberry, black currant, herb and new oak flavors. Drinking well now. Production was 17,843 cases.",,Sequoia Grove
"A strong, concentrated and ultimately rustic wine, a flavor that derives from the Alicante Bouschet in the blend. This gives it power and alcohol that shows in a pepper character. The final juicy palate feels solid and heavy.",Herdade das Servas Vinhas Velhas,Serrano Mira
"A lighter, more elegant style of Cabernet, dry and classy. Likeable for its balance of acids, tannins, alcohol and oak, and rich blackberry, cassis and cedar flavors. Drink now.",,Simple Math Cellars
"Named for the winery dog (a rescue dog named Chance), this 80-20 Lemberger-Grenache blend is a lovely cherry/sunset color, and tastes like tangy pie cherries and rhubarb. Quite dry and showing more tannin than most rosés, it could stand up to simple grilled meats or burgers.",Second Chance,Thurston Wolfe
"Good price for a nicely complex Cabernet for drinking now. Dry and smooth in tannins, it shows ripe blackberry, cherry, licorice and herb flavors, with a kiss of oak.",,St. Francis
"91-93. Barrel sample. This is a dark and dense wine, with big tannins and a solid structure. It shows great weight, with an intense minerality.",Barrel Sample,Les Astéries
"91-93. Barrel sample. This wine's concentrated tannins match the sweet fruit and ripe acidity. It shows structure and density, with its blackberry flavor already showing well.",Barrel Sample,Domaine de Chevalier
"91-93. Barrel sample. This is big and solid wine, with firm tannins and juicy fruit. It shows spice and intense acidity followed by black-currant freshness.",Barrel Sample,Croix de Beaucaillou
"91-93. Barrel sample. With great swathes of spice, this is a wine with fruit that's still emerging. It has weight and delicious intensity. With its layered structure of acidity and tannin, this is for long-term aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Bastor-Lamontagne
"91-93. Barrel sample. Big, bold and fruity, this shows plenty of rich blackberry-juice flavor and fine tannins. The fruit and tannins are well balanced, with a juicy character on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Lascombes
"91-93. Barrel sample. Showing the acidity and fresh fruit of the vintage, this wine has both structure and density. It's well-made, showing just the right amount of fruit and a judicious use of wood.",Barrel Sample,Château Malartic-Lagravière
"91-93. Barrel sample. This wine shows dense fruit and concentrated tannins. It has richness without great complexity; but it boasts spice, fresh fruit and tingling acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Pibran
"91-93. Barrel sample. Despite some reductive character on the nose, the fruit on the palate shows good weight and richness. It should become a rich, citrus-flavored wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Rahoul
"90-92. Barrel sample. Rich and ripe, the wine has delicious Cabernet flavors. It offers ripe and rounded fruits with juiciness rather than great density.",Barrel Sample,Château Coufran
"90-92. Barrel sample. This is a light and fruity wine, with prominent wood. It has a crisp texture that's very bright, with some weight showing on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château de Chantegrive
"90-92. Barrel sample. Dense and concentrated; the tannins are a worthy partner to the firm flavors of black plum skin. This wine is solid and chunky, with the year's crisp fruit showing through.",Barrel Sample,Château Le Boscq
"90-92. Barrel sample. A complex, firm wine, with its tannins on the surface and fruit underneath; it will be a slow wine to develop.",Barrel Sample,Château Monbrison
"90-92. Barrel sample. This is a closed wine, dominated by dark, dry tannins and spice. The wine misses fruit with its solid core of dryness.",Barrel Sample,Château Pape Clément
"90-92. Barrel sample. Here is a ripe and juicy wine that pushes forward with delicious blackberry fruits. There is a tense edge of acidity that then brings out denser tannins, but juiciness characterizes this wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Pavie
"90-92. Barrel sample. Big and serious, with a well-balanced wood and spice character. The tense tannins provide a nervy, tight counterpoint.",Barrel Sample,Château Fombrauge
"90-92. Barrel sample. This wine is laden with tannins yet shows juicy, crisp red-berry flavors. It finishes with great structure.",Barrel Sample,Château Latour _ Pomerol
"90-92. Barrel sample. This is a soft wine, with dominating fruit. It has flavors of black currant and spice, firm tannins and an attractive ripe center.",Les Tourelles de Longueville Barrel Sample,Château Pichon Longueville
"90-92. Barrel sample. A herbaceous, fruity wine, with its acidity well integrated into the ripe, bright fruits. The wine is light, fresh and crisp, with an attractive lemon-curd note.",Barrel Sample,Château Picque Caillou
"90-92. Barrel sample. Dense, with up-front tannins, this feels quite severe, with an austere, mineral character and a solid finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Rauzan-Ségla
90-92. Barrel sample. This is a wine that's likely to age relatively quickly. It shows sweet wood and black-currant flavors that combine with a spicy element.,Barrel Sample,Château Carbonnieux
"90-92. Barrel sample. Big and firm tannins are palpable from the start, with a ripe and fruity core underneath. It has concentration along with the typical juicy character of the vintage.",Barrel Sample,Château Chasse-Spleen
"90-92. Barrel sample. With all the freshness of the year, the wine is ripe and soft. It has acidity and juicy black currant fruits. The wine is spiced; well integrated with ripe tannins.",Les Pagodes de Cos Barrel Sample,Château Cos d'Estournel
"90-92. Barrel sample. With big sweet fruits from the Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine has weight, structure and the juicy charm of the year.",Barrel Sample,Château Fonbadet
"90-92. Barrel sample. Sweet new-wood flavors smooth this wine. It is rich and ripe, with juicy fruits surrounding the firm core of tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Franc Mayne
"90-92. Barrel sample. This wine shows a powerful new-wood character, with a ripe, rich and very smooth texture lying underneath.",Barrel Sample,Château Broustet
"90-92. Barrel sample. This is a big, ripe and fruity wine that's packed with flavors of spice and blackberry. It needs to age for its dry core of dense tannins to soften.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Arsac
"90-92. Barrel sample. This is a big, ripe, fruity wine, filled with smoky wood, spice and black-currant acidity. It is rich and fruit filled.",Barrel Sample,Château de Fieuzal
"90-92. Barrel sample. A powerhouse of dark tannins, this wine is black in color and dark in taste. It has bitter chocolate flavors, with notes of new wood and intense spice.",Barrel Sample,Château la Couspaude
"90-92. Barrel sample. Firm tannins, a wine with a solid structure, the weight packed tightly into its firm structure. Concentrated tannins are very present while still fruity.",Barrel Sample,Château Potensac
"90-92. Barrel sample. The tannins show in this wine's very dry and firm core. There is minerality and a tight texture. Under the tannins, there is a juicy fruit layer with a black-currant character.",Barrel Sample,Château Tronquoy-Lalande
"A bit heavy for a Pinot Noir, lacking the lively zest the grape needs in California to balance the ripe fruit. Flavors range through blackberries and plums, with oak complications. Quite good, but doesn't seem like an ager.",Annadel Estate Vineyard,Westwood
"Rather heavy in texture, a big, full-bodied and tannic Pinot that seems overly extracted and oaky. The vintage was very difficult due to early September heat waves, and everything depended on exquisite timing. It's very good, despite the rusticity. Drink now through 2012.",Coastlands Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Here's an easy and affordable Ripasso that makes an excellent choice for informal, home-cooked meals. Pasta, risotto or fried pork chops would work well against the wine's fresh acidity, medium build and bright fruit flavors.",Ma Roat,Tezza
"A bit tart, with a bite that comes from irregular tannins and zesty acidity. Yet it's dry and elegantly silky, with good cherry, berry, cola and spice flavors. Give it a good decant.",,Vine Hill
"Massively ripe in pineapples, limes, green apples and lemons, this Sauvignon Blanc is clean and brisk in acidity. It's an upscale, fancy white wine that finishes just a little sweet in jam.",,Vogelzang
"With honest PN aromas of cherry, rhubarb, currant and spice, this registers as something Pinot drinkers can relate to. There's modest weight and good acidity, with spicy, tea-influenced flavors of plum and raspberry. Dry with some cocoa on the finish. Surprisingly nice for a $9 Chilean Pinot.",Reserva,Luis Felipe Edwards
"A bit hot and crusty on the nose, with black fruit and herbal notes of olive and bramble. The palate is full but hard as nails, with a tannic bite that is wicked like a shark. Flavors are full and drying due to the tannins, with herbal accents. Finishing flavors of coffee and spice cement its dark, muscular status.",Cuvée,Misiones de Rengo
"Very ripe in fruit, with good acidity and lots of smoky oak. Made in the jammy style of California Chardonnay, it has sweet flavors of pineapples, papayas and buttered toast. Drink now as a cocktail, or try with a rich shellfish risotto.",LB,Mueller
"This blend of Petit Verdot (40%), Grenache (29%), Shiraz (29%) and Mataro (2%) ends up being a pleasing recipe at an even more pleasing price. Mulberry, plum and vanilla flavors emerge from the glass, while the mouthfeel is full and lush. Probably best over the next year or so.",Ass Kisser Fine Red Wine,Rocland Estate
There is nice heft and density in the mouth and the wine offers generous cherry and blueberry tones in the mouth. This ripe and earthy smelling wine would make a great companion to tortellini in chicken broth and Parmigiano cheese or steak with creamy mushroom sauce.,,Rubinelli Vajol
"Wet, salinic, oceanic and appley on the nose, with snappy, crisp, almost tart flavors of apple and citrus. A pure wine with juicy acids and a monotone finish that sports lemon and green apple. Powerful, pure, acidic and zesty for Chilean Chardonnay.",Classic,Leyda
This is a light and informal Ripasso with plenty of sweet spice followed by bright blueberry and raspberry. There's a touch of sweetness in the mouth and vanilla bean flavors appear on the close.,Vignenuove,Luciana Cordioli
"Shows the classy elegance of all Qupe's Syrahs, although it's thinner and rougher than the more expensive bottlings. Still, for the price, this wine is nicely dry and intricate in blackberry and crushed pepper flavors.",,Qupé
"The bouquet of cherry and raspberry is sprightly and mildly leafy, with hints of leather and dried cheese. The palate is whispy, with red-fruit flavors of raspberry and plum along with mild herbal notes, cocoa powder and dry spice. A basic, lighter-bodied Rioja with a traditional tilt.",Crianza,Campo Viejo
"A firmly tannic wine, with a woody core. It shows stalky black currant fruit along with tense acidity. At this stage, it is rough round the edges and could use  another year.",Monte Cascas Colheita,Casca Wines
"Lemon grass, lime and intensely crisp acidity identify the wine as definitely from the cool north of Portugal. A strong apple-skin texture dominates, leaving a wine that really needs shellfish type foods.",Monte Cascas Reserva,Casca Wines
"A blend of 60% Grenache and 40% Syrah, this is another example of the fine values coming out of the Costières de Nîmes. It's a medium-bodied wine with a velvety texture and a fine balance between herbs and raspberry fruit on the one hand and dark berries and earth on the other. Drink it over the next 2_3 years.",,Château Grande Cassagne
"A true Riesling from the deep south of Chile with petrol and peach pit aromas and then sweeter citrus flavors. It's full, fresh and balanced, with a friendly, easy finish that suggests mango and pineapple. Starts out Germanic but finishes tropical.",,Cono Sur
"A classic whiff of green bell peppery meets the nose along with passion fruit and honeyed aromas. The palate is fresh but has some weight, a possible reflection of the use of American Davis clones, which produce fatter wines than French clones. Beyond that look for melon, nectarine and tropical primary and finishing flavors.",Visión,Cono Sur
"This feels light and rather dilute. It has varietal pepper and some spice, but the main effect is one of acidity, crispness and freshness. The lychee tropical fruit element is underplayed in favor of crispness. It should certainly work with food.",Les Maquisards,Dopff & Irion
"This 70-30 Corvina and Rondinella Amarone blend is slightly disjointed on the nose with contrasting aromas of toasted oak and ripe fruit. It makes a nice impression in the mouth, however, thanks to its smooth, rich texture.",,Corte Lenguin
"A drying mineral note of slate or graphite runs through the middle of this plush and rich red Ripassato wine from Valpolicella. Background notes of spice and cherry cola come through as well, especially in the mouth where the wine boats a soft, compact feel. Pair this wine with lamb or light beef dishes.",Podere Bertarole Ripassato,Corteforte
"Full bodied, lush and slightly liquorous in style, the 2008 Footbolt is also packed with peppery, slightly herbal blackberry fruit. There's also a hint of menthol. Drink it over the next 12 months.",The Footbolt,D'Arenberg
"Searching for New World Chardonnay that's restrained, crisp and only 12% abv? Steve Webber at De Bortoli is your man. This medium-bodied Chardonnay displays a hint of custard to its texture, while the flavors are citrus driven and refreshing.",Estate Grown,De Bortoli
"The leg here refers to the red-legged partridge which is native to southern Portugal. The wine is certainly red enough, a blend of Aragonês and Shiraz (they use the Australian spelling). It is firm, richly tannic, attractively full of rich berry, plum and spice.",Red Leg,Falua
"At the age of five-plus, this 100% Sauvignon Blanc is showing some mileage. It's losing freshness, with dried pineapple, apricot and peach flavors emerging, and an edge of cashews and dried herbs. Yet it remains lively and clean. If you're unfamiliar with an older Sauvignon Blanc, try it. Fully ready now.",Hunnysuckle,Fiddlehead
"Classic Gewürztraminer aromas of fresh lychee, pink grapefruit and roses abound on Dr. Frank's lovely bargain Salmon Run. Although full bodied with a plush, broad profile, it's spritzed with a gentle lemon acidity and bitter lime pith and rose potpourri finish. Would pair beautifully with spicy, herbacious Thai dishes, but might be hard to resist savoring on its own.",Salmon Run,Dr. Konstantin Frank
"Quite good and rich in jammy berry, cherry, cassis and oak flavors, but there's a certain obvious appeal that lacks complexity, and it's not what you expect from a wine of this reputation and price. This bottling has been falling off from the glories of the 1990s for some years now. A pity. Hopefully the trend will reverse. Production was 9,008 cases.",Private Reserve,Beringer
"A shade off the 2005, being leaner and more tannic, and more akin to the 2001. It's a dry, taut Cab, marked by a drying astringency accompanying the blackberry and mineral flavors. Drink now_2012.",,Arger-Martucci
"Hints of smoke and wet stone combine with sweet Granny Smith apple and stonefruit aromas on the nose of this inviting dry Riesling. Smoke seeps through on the palate as well, melding with brighter flavors like orange peel and underripe tangerine, making for a refreshing yet deeply compelling sip.",Dry,Atwater
"90-92. Barrel sample. Firm and complex, this wine is smoothed by some new wood, but dominated by flavors of ripe black plum and berry. It has weight, its tannic core surrounded by a rich, soft texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Ferrière
"90-92. Barrel sample. With all the freshness of the year, this wine is ripe and soft. It has acidity and juicy black-currant flavor. The wine is spiced, with its ripe tannins well integrated.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Marbuzet
"90-92. Barrel sample. Powerful, ripe and dense with its tannins, spice and sweet fruit, this wine is juicy with blackberry notes and a dark, solid texture.",Barrel Sample,Le Carré
"90-92. Barrel sample. Aromas of new wood mark this wine. On the palate, the tannins are gentle, with flavors of ripe black plum, nutmeg and milk chocolate.",Barrel Sample,Château Beauregard
"90-92. Barrel sample. A juicy and forward wine, with attractive spice and sweet tannins. It's soft and gentle on the palate.",Barrel Sample,Château Canon la Gaffelière
"90-92. Barrel sample. Dense and concentrated, this is a massive wine that's packed with tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château la Dominique
"90-92. Barrel sample. While certainly powered by tannins, this wine does have a rich, fruity character as well. The finish brings juicy flavors that cut right through the tannins.",La Chapelle de la Mission Haut-Brion Barrel Sample,Château La Mission Haut-Brion
"90-92. Barrel sample. This wine is very warm and rich. It shows spicy fruit with the weight and dark tannins to match. Opulent, juicy and ripe.",Le Petit Cheval Barrel Sample,Château Cheval Blanc
90-92. Barrel sample. A dense wine that's full of black plums and firm tannins. It has weight at the front and juicy freshness on the finish.,Barrel Sample,Château d'Issan
"90-92. Barrel sample. There are some reductive, meaty aromas on this barrel sample, but the palate still shows the fine potential of this wine. It has all the weight and richness of the vintage, with underlying crisp acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Filhot
"90-92. Barrel sample. Ripe, rich and soft, this wine has open, juicy fruit and attractive red plum flavors; it already shows its fruity character.",Barrel Sample,Château Giscours
"90-92. Barrel sample.  This is a brooding, dark wine; its tannins are evident, with a complex series of dark, dense flavors. Its fruit is buried under all of its tannic scaffolding.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut Bages Libéral
"90-92. Barrel sample. This has some weight and richness, with chunky fruit and sweet tannins. This wine is concentrated and very firm.",Barrel Sample,Château Bourgneuf
"90-92. Barrel sample. A rounded rich wine, showing the juicy fruit of the year along with rich tannins. It is spicy, lively and impressive.",Barrel Sample,Château Citran
"90-92. Barrel sample. This wine is powered by its perfumed Cabernet Franc character. It's rich, with a well-integrated structure.",Barrel Sample,Château La Tour Figeac
"90-92. Barrel sample. Initially, this wine shows spice and round fruit notes, followed by a tannic structure. The wine has weight, with a feeling of balanced wood and plenty of juicy flavors on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Larrivet Haut-Brion
"90-92. Barrel sample. This wine feels solid, with its tannins forming a base for the juicy red- and dark-berry flavors. It shows a dry side and a dense finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Malescot Saint-Exupery
"90-92. Barrel sample. Initially this seems soft, but with time the more powerful fruit character comes through. It has weight, with a dark chocolate and spice intensity.",La Dame de Montrose Barrel Sample,Château Montrose
"90-92. Barrel sample. Powerful tannins and a distinct, solid core distinguish this very dark wine, showing sweet fruit notes with a blackberry juice flavor. It's very fruity at the end.",Barrel Sample,Château Nenin
"90-92. Barrel sample. Powerful and concentrated, this is a wine with smoky flavors__ery dark and intense. The fruit weight is well under the very firm and dry tannic character.",Barrel Sample,Château Villemaurine
90-92. Barrel sample. This is an impressively rich wine that's packed with forward fruit and spice flavors. It has power and dark tannins while retaining a fine sense of style.,Barrel Sample,Château Grand Corbin-Despagne
"89-91. Barrel sample. The tannins are tough, although the fruit character is juicy in this wine. This makes for a well-structured, solid expression, with intense and crisp acidity at the end.",Barrel Sample,Château Berliquet
"89-91. Barrel sample. Here is a smoky, juicy wine, its tannins soft and gentle while also showing ripe spice and mouthwatering acidity. The dry tannins at the end provide structure.",Barrel Sample,Château la Croix de Gay
"89-91. Barrel sample. Firm and dark, with tannins dominating the ripe fruit, this wine's wood aging shows strongly now; and the fruit weight is not yet there.",Barrel Sample,Château Labégorce Margaux
89-91. Barrel sample. Mint and plum-juice flavors mingle easily in this densely fruity wine. It combines sweet tannins and dark fruit with spice imparted from wood aging. It's already juicily attractive.,Barrel Sample,Château Soutard
"89-91. Barrel sample. A wine that has the richenss of a Pomerol, it's very ripe and concentrated, with the addition of chocolaty and smoky flavors. The fruit is ripe, edging towards extracted.",Barrel Sample,Château la Fleur de Boüard
"89-91. Barrel sample. This is a solid wine with a dense texture and powerful tannins. Its big structure supports ripe fruits, with sweet berries and fine density at the end.",Barrel Sample,Château Olivier
"89-91. Barrel sample. This wine feels relatively light. It has juicy fruit and dark tannins, with a considerable note of new, smoky wood.",Barrel Sample,Château Poujeaux
"89-91. Barrel sample. Hugely tannic, this wine powers through the dry structure leaving fruit lost in its wake. There is a final dark bite on the palate.",Barrel Sample,Château Cap de Mourlin
89-91. Barrel sample. There is a good balance here between the ripe blackberry fruits and the solid tannins. This wine shows new wood and a touch of green flavor.,Barrel Sample,Château de Chantegrive
"A full-bodied wine, structured and textured. It lacks acidity and crispness,  instead giving honey and ripe yellow fruits. It is so rich, there are hints even of late harvest grapes here. The finish is spoiled by pepper.",Schlossberg Grand Cru,Audrey et Christine Binner
"Another fine Best Buy from a winery that knocks 'em out year after year. This Monastrell-Syrah blend delivers full, rustic aromas of tomato, baked berry and salsa. The palate is saucy and smooth, with blackberry flavors mixed with herbs and tomato. Textured, healthy, snappy and a good partner for full-  flavored foods.",Luzon,Bodegas Luzón
"If you aren't familiar with Ripasso (a hybrid wine that borrows elements from austere Amarone and informal Valpolicella), this selection from Bolla is an excellent introductory wine. It opens with a deep-ruby color and bright aromas of red cherry, cola, spice and leather. It ends with both sweet and spicy nuances.",Le Poiane,Bolla
"For a Syrah, this is soft, offering more of the smooth tannins than any bigger structure. It does have weight, with a dusty character and some juicy sweet plums and raisins, leavened by acidity.",Senses,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Slightly fiery and hot on the nose, but there's enough berry, cherry and dusty leather to keep it positive. The palate is more sheer and sharp than expected, with piercing raspberry, razor's edge acidity and only a touch of back-end sweetness. Juicy but short and searing.",Ecològic,Genium Celler
"This late-release Riesling from Seneca Lake wafts with the delicate perfume of sweet peas, ripe stonefruits and a petrol undertone. Dry, but with a touch of white peach sweetness, refreshing lime juice flavors and a high toned acidity keep this wine refreshing and brisk.",Oughterson Family Estates,Highland Cellars
"A lively, surprising bargain made from Viognier, Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay. That it costs merely $8 makes the melon and apple aromas and flavors all the better. Citrusy as it evolves, and clean throughout, with no wavering. A very nice white quaffing wine.",Viognier-Sauvignon Blanc-Chardonnay,Korta
"The typical burly character of Trincadeira is evident here. It is smoothed by wood aging and given extra richness with the powerful berry fruits and dark tannins. An attractive, early drinking, juicy wine.",Vila Santa,J. Portugal Ramos
"Dry and acidic, this Sauvignon Blanc has flavors of citrus fruits, apricots, green grass, vanilla, buttered toast and white pepper. It's quite a good wine, if a little expensive.",,Joseph Phelps
"Opens with common Carmenère aromas such as herbal red fruits, olive paste, balsamic vinegar and berry jam. The palate is fairly lush and full, with sweet, spicy, herbal flavors along with dark berry and bramble. Sweet, toasty, herbal and licorice-laden on the finish.",Queulat Gran Reserva,Ventisquero
"Shows enough fanciness to make it worth the price. Although it has no possibilities of improving with age, it's a fine, softly gentle Cabernet to drink now. Shows correct blackberry, black currant and oak flavors.",Grand Reserve,Villa Mt. Eden
"A purplish Cab with smatterings of Petit Verdot, Petite Sirah, Grenache and Merlot that starts out quite tannic, mellowing into a nicely balanced dinner-table wine, with hints of cranberry and black currant and subtle oak. A great deal for a well-made Cab that should get even better with another 2_3 years in bottle.",Southern Hills,Wente
"Good complex flavors, and nicely dry, with intricately layered black cherry tart, red licorice, cherry liqueur, milk chocolate, pepper and sandalwood flavors that finish long and spicy. Feels a bit too soft for aging, but nice now.",Annadel Estate Vineyard,Westwood
"This is a very rich Zinfandel that veers toward the soft, high alcohol end of the spectrum. It's ripe in berry and cherry flavors that have an edge of currants and raisins, but the finish is dry. Drink now.",Forchini Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This is a thickly extracted Amarone with a black, inky appearance and powerful aromas of black fruit, exotic spice, bresaola, mesquite wood and cola. It's almost too much of a good thing and the palate becomes overwhelmed by the wine's muscle, power and overall sweetness.",Vigneti dei Coali,Savoia
"Soft, silky and rich, this Pinot combines a drink-me-now style with coastal elegance. It's tasty in raspberry and cherry jam, blueberry, vanilla granola and toasty oak flavors.",,Sebastiani
"Corvina, along with smaller percentages of Rondinella and Molinara, is the base for this meaty expression of Ripasso. Aromas here include raw cherry, blackberry tart, dark vanilla bean and barbecue spice.",Monterè C_ de' Rocchi,Tinazzi
"Packaged in a very heavy glass bottle, this bright Ripasso opens with mature aromas of prune, raspberry, cherry and cassis. Tones of leather and tobacco fill in the rear and the wine is compact on the close with a touch of bitter almond.",Monterè C_ de' Rocchi,Tinazzi
"This taut, dry Grenache shows better structure than most California Grenaches, with its firm texture and bite of acidity. It shows the variety's cherry flavors. Tasty now, it's a good substitute for any medium-bodied wine, such as Zinfandel or Merlot.",,Sobriquet Winery
"This 100% Tempranillo will linger with you for a while, a real thinking wine that takes time to reveal its power. Properly tannic__ave a hearty meal at the ready__he St. Amant is structurally sound and yet concentrated with sweet notes of toffee, vanilla and brown sugar on the finish, its dark fruit both subtle and ripe. From the foothills of Amador County on a relatively cool site, the wine is aged in both French and American oak (35% new).",The Road Less Travelled,St. Amant
"Concentrated aromas of lychee, rose petals and black tea leaves perfume this delicious golden yellow wine. The palate is dry, but with just a touch of pink grapefruit softness. Although full and rich in the mouth, balanced acidity and a spiced, grapefruit pith finish keeps the wine from getting flabby.",,Standing Stone
"Aged in large oak casks, this fresh Ripasso makes good use of minimal wood intervention that comes forth as light spice and cinnamon. The core of this wine, however, consists of pulsing black fruit and mature cherry.",,Santa Sofia
"There's a clean and polished nature to this pretty Ripasso that delivers aromas of bright red berry, raspberry, cola, leather, tar and a touch of white pepper. It's equally toned and simple in the mouth with good persistency without the chunky consistency.",Solane,Santi
"Compared to the 2003 vintage, the fruit is slightly more vibrant and polished here. There's also a slightly green note of herb or dill that we didn't notice in the past. The mouthfeel is, however, bright, crisp and refreshingly informal.",I Saltari Le Vigne di Turano,Sartori
"This 100% Viognier shows the variety's exotic side, with delicious tropical fruit, citrus, pear, melon, lychee and smoky oak flavors. It's a bit one-dimensional, but appeals for its fresh acids and richness.",Saralee's Vineyard,Arrowood
"Arduini's oak-aged Ripasso opens with raw cherry and blackberry flavors followed by spice, clove and mesquite wood. The wine's build is tight and consistent and the tannins are soft and polished.",,Arduini
"The components of this wine are all over the place, with blackberry and currant fruit, 100% new oak, brisk tannins and acidity needing to come together for harmony. Whether or not they will is a guess. Right now it's rustic, but dry and complex enough to drink after a good decant.",Law of Proportions,Autonom
"Though richly perfumed with rose petals and elderflower, the flowery aromatics are reined in by bright lemon and citrus peel notes. The palate is plush and rich with flavors evocative of earl grey tea served with rose petal jam, with a gentle acidity to keep things fresh.",,Atwater
"Here's a fresh and fruity Ripasso that opens with lively aromas of black cherry, cassis, spice and dark vanilla bean. The wine also shows a touch of heat and jammy red fruit on the close.",,Bottega
"Intensely perfumed and very spicy, with a core of dryness in the richness. The wine feels weighty, with some pepper, honey and sweet fruits; very full in the mouth.",Réserve,Lucien Albrecht
"89-91. Barrel sample. Initially lean, this wine then shows severe, firm tannins followed by rich blackberry fruits. Its dark intensity should offer good aging in a wine that will always have a serious side.",Barrel Sample,Chateau Dauzac
"89-91. Barrel sample. A very tannic, bone-dry wine, this shows a hard edge that doesn't marry well with the fruit. Always likely to be austere, it's powerful and dense.",Barrel Sample,Château de France
"89-91. Barrel sample. This wine has a classic fruit structure, very black currant in character. The wine is rich with a smoky core, with bitter chocolate notes and sweet tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château La Grave _ Pomerol
"89-91. Barrel sample. While there is 100% new wood, the weight of fruit in this expression is sufficient to power through. It will be an impressive wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Péby Faugères
"89-91. Barrel sample. This wine shows mint and spice flavors, new wood and soft tannins. Fruity, attractively forward and ripe.",Barrel Sample,Château Faugères
"89-91. Barrel sample. Ripe, smooth and creamy in texture, this wine has rich flavors of spice and green fruit.",Barrel Sample,Le Nardian
"89-91. Barrel sample. This wine shows firm tannins, yet is also fruity. It feels light and fresh with attractive acidity and a crisp touch.",Barrel Sample,Château La Serre
"89-91. Barrel sample. With a firm edge and some bitterness, this wine does have softer tannins in the center, followed by juicy acidity and bright berry fruits.",Barrel Sample,Château la Tour de Pin
"89-91. Barrel sample. Initially hard edged, this wine evolves to show a more accessible, fruity character. There is weight here, powered by fruit tannins and a solid texture on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Les Carmes Haut-Brion
"89-91. Barrel sample. This wine is ripe and juicy, with full, soft tannins, jammy fruit and sweet plum flavors. It shows the acidity of the year with final notes of tobacco and smoke.",Barrel Sample,Château Quintus
"89-91. Barrel sample. This has a taut and very herbaceous character, with a crisp green-apple flavors and creamy feel.",Barrel Sample,Château Cos d'Estournel
"89-91. Barrel sample. Spicy wood cuts through the ripe blackberry fruit. This wine is smooth and polished, with balancing acidity. Juicy fruits show on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Agassac
"89-91. Barrel sample. Here is a warm, ripe wine with dark tannins. It's well spiced and fruity, showing crisp black currant fruits.",Barrel Sample,Château Fleur Cardinale
"89-91. Barrel sample. An apple-fresh wine, with its richness coming through slowly. It has weight as well as a touch of marmalade spice and lemon acidity. With its light character, it's delicious.",Barrel Sample,Château Lamothe
"89-91. Barrel sample. Full-bodied and warm, this is a smooth wine. It's very accessible with blackberry fruit and delicious acidity. An attractive wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Larose-Trintaudon
"89-91. Barrel sample. Spicy new wood dominates this wine, with the weight of fruit to justify it. It's solid, full-bodied and already balanced.",Barrel Sample,Château Lassègue
"89-91. Barrel sample. Forward, with juicy fruit that offers plenty of acidity and seemingly-soft tannins, this is a wine that should develop easily and quickly.",Barrel Sample,Château du Tertre
"89-91. Barrel sample. Firm and dense with dark, dry fruits, this is a powerful wine for the year, while keeping an elegant, delicious style.",Barrel Sample,Château Fontenil
"89-91. Barrel sample. This is a fruity wine that's packed with citrus flavor. With its light, bright and crisp mouthfeel, this is likely to develop quickly.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Bergey
"88-90. Barrel sample. Offering great swathes of tannins and black-currant flavors, this is a wine with great freshness as well as a more spicy character.",Barrel Sample,Château Bellegrave
"88-90. Barrel sample. Spice and new wood are the prominent elements. This wine's fruit is bright and black-currant flavored, with its dry core still buried.",Barrel Sample,Château d'Angludet
"88-90. Barrel sample. Spicy new-wood flavors and dry tannins characterize this wine, with only a hint of dark berry fruits. This is smoky, toasty and dominated by its structure.",Barrel Sample,Château la Garde
"88-90. Barrel sample. Very heavily laden with wood, the wine shows extraction and dark tannins. The fruit lies under the dominant toast.",Barrel Sample,Château Phélan-Ségur
"88-90. Barrel sample. This wine is structured with firm tannins, ripe plum fruits and a touch of coffee, though acidity is also present.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Simard
"88-90. Barrel sample. Juicy and fruity, this wine shows attractive black currant flavors, rounded with the tannins already well integrated.",Barrel Sample,Château La Conseillante
"88-90. Barrel sample. This wine is on the lean side, although there is attractive black-currant fruit at the core. The wine is developing its weight into an expression that will be more substantial.",Barrel Sample,Château la Louvière
"88-90. Barrel sample. This is a ripe, extracted wine, with chocolate and firm tannins layered over the blackberry fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Villegeorge
"88-90. Barrel sample. Generously fruity, packed with sweet tannins and ripe fruits, this wine shows wood aging with licorice notes and a final burnt character.",Barrel Sample,Château Balestard la Tonnelle
"88-90. Barrel Sample. Soft tannins and a dense texture help to create a forward, fruity wine with a very juicy and spicy finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Deyrem Valentin
"88-90. Barrel sample. Light, fresh and fruity, this is a wine that shows a delicate character that's unusual for the vintage. It has blackberry fruits, some soft tannins and new-wood flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Bouscaut
"Campolieti is a fresh and fruity Ripasso with layers of dried blueberry, rum cake and spice followed by some very light mineral shadings. It boasts a crisp, clean mouthfeel and ends with a hint of vanilla and toasted almond.",Campolieti,Luigi Righetti
"A medium-bodied wine with gentle tannins, this is a savory offering, with notes of plum, meat, tapenade and peppery spices accented by cedary oak, particularly apparent on the mouth-watering finish. Drink now_2015.",,Innocent Bystander
"Pretty and polished, an elegant, lighter style Pinot Noir to drink now with rich pork, lamb and beef dishes or grilled salmon. It's silky and satiny, with pleasant wild strawberry, cherry, red currant, licorice, cola and cedar flavors.",,J Vineyards & Winery
"Dry and refreshing with clean, pure notes of white peach, orange blossoms and petrol on the nose and palate, this shows off Riesling's pristine side. A splash of tart, underripe starfruit and fresh limes on the palate combine with a brisk acidity and wet stone minerality, giving this wine an invigorating feel.",Falling Man Vineyard Dry,Keuka Lake Vineyards
"La Dama offers a subdued and elegant Ripasso with soft layers of ripe cherry, blackberry, Indian spice, clove, nutmeg and touches of moist pipe tobacco. The feel it imparts in the mouth is soft, fine and bright. In fact, the wine offers enough natural freshness to pair with cheesy lasagna or oven roasted pasta.",,La Dama
"Here's an Amarone with raw notes of cherry and root beer backed by mesquite smoke, spice, leather and cigar box. It's a very sweet, succulent wine with soft tannins and a long, chewy finish.",Le Guaite di Giulietta,Le Guaite
"Brander's basic Syrah is a good, dry wine, and while it's a little on the light side, it has pretty flavors of blackberries, black pepper, cola and black currants. The alcohol is nice and low, under 14%.",,Brander
"Fabiano's pretty Valpolicella Classico Superiore offers very nice aromas of plump red cherry followed by spice, leather, tobacco and moist earth. It's a simple wine in the mouth but it's not without its own distinct personality and appeal.",,Fabiano
"There's a sweet, inviting aspect to the nose here that recalls Christmas spice, nutmeg, rum cake and mature blackberry. The wine feels compact and firm on the close and would pair with roasted ham with clove under the skin.",Campedel,Gamba
"This is a dry, racy wine. It fulfills Sauvignon Blanc's first duty of mouthwatering cleanliness and savory acidity. Drink it now as a cocktail sipper, with a shrimp cocktail or with spicy Thai and Vietnamese fare.",,Firestone
"A solid Chardonnay, dry, oaky and rich, with nice, crisp acidity. Satisfies for its creamy wealth of pinapples, limes, pears and minerals.",,Foppiano
"Here's a spicy, hot Valpolicella Superiore (the alcohol can be felt) that opens with mature notes of prune, blackberry and syrupy cassis. There's a touch of toasted almond and the mouthfeel picks up speed and intensity thanks to its long fruity flavors.",Morari Torre d'Orti,Cavalchina
"Crisp and spicy, with juicy apple and pear fruit flavor, this easy-drinking Chardonnay was aged sur lie in mostly used barrels. There's a subtle suggestion of vanilla and butter woven into the finish.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A juicy wine, showing ripe fruit and sweet acidity. It feels soft and fresh, the lively fruit much more important than the lean structure.",Churchill Estates,Churchill's
"This is a curious Amarone with a distinct nose of root beer, toasted almond and medicine cabinet. It delivers a well-toned, mellow close with soft tannins and more cherry cola flavors on the finish.",,Cantine Lenotti di Lenotti
"Brilliantly crisp lemon-flavored wine with vivid herbaceous character, tinged with white fruits and apple skin freshness.",Cape Roca Fisherman,Casca Wines
"Gewürz is always the easiest of grapes to spot, and this wine has all the right varietal characteristics__he floral character, the lychee flavors and the surprising pink grapefruit and sugary acidity. It is not sweet, but is definitely rich.",,Rieflé
"Ripe and soft, shot through with some minerality, this has attractive honey and green apple flavors, touching on almond. The aftertaste keeps the softness, but adds good, fresh acidity.",Pinot Blanc Bonheur Convivial,Rieflé
"This vintage of Ripasso Ca' del Laito opens with meaty aromas of bresaola and cured beef followed by mature cherry and blackberry. The wine is soft and chewy, with succulent fruit pulp and a distinct note of sweet spice on the close.",Ca' del Laito,Tommaso Bussola
"Made in a lighter, more accessible and candied style, this Pinot has pleasant cherry, raspberry, cinnamon sugar and sandalwood flavors. Easy to find, with 5,000 cases produced.",,Valley of the Moon
"Aromas of pineapple, grapefruit, juniper berry and dust are slightly sharp but do manage to fold together into a solid whole. The palate is correct, with green-leaning, semiherbal flavors of melon, papaya and mango. A good to above-average Albariño that should be drunk right away.",,Señorío de Rubiós
"Here is a full-bodied, somewhat rustic, ripe, slightly pruny red blend. It's a unique effort_34% Primitivo, 30% Lemberger, 22% Syrah, 10% Petite Sirah and 4% Cabernet Sauvignon. Made into a broad, fruity, soft and lightly chocolaty red, it's a perfect wine for pizza, picnics and parties.",Dr. Wolfe's Family Red,Thurston Wolfe
"An easy-going Ripasso, opening with bright tones of cherry, spice, blackberry and plum. There's a touch of piquant crispness in the mouth followed by soft, easy tannins.",,Novaia
"Delicious, dry and complex, with wild blackberry, Provençal herb, white pepper and sandalwood flavors. Feels elegant, but too soft, lacking the structural integrity a fine wine needs. Drink now.",Bien Nacido Hillside Estate,Qupé
"This rich, oaky Chardonnay has aromas and flavors of buttered toast, buttered popcorn, vanilla and pineapple jam. It's very rich and creamy, and appeals for sheer deliciouness.",,Perception
"Here's a cheerful vineyard-designate Valpolicella that would make a perfect partner to easy pasta or take-out pizza. The wine opens with zesty fruit and clean aromas of blueberry, raspberry and spice. The mouthfeel is compact and crisp with medium density.",I Saltari Le Vigne di Turano,Sartori
"Vigneti di Montegradella is a well-priced Valpolicella with more intensity and density than you'd expect. In fact, the wine offers determination and personality with enough natural extraction to pair with bean soup or barbecued hamburgers.",Vigneti di Montegradella,Sartori
"Starts off rather Rhônish, with hints of white pepper and grilled meat, then offers tart cherry fruit on the palate, accented by those same savory elements. The tannins are modest but silky, and the acids turn up while the flavors thin out just a bit on the finish. Drink now_2014.",Cliff Edge,Mount Langi Ghiran
"There's a crisp, pointed note of fresh fruit and red apple that gives this dense Amarone a bright and buoyant feel. The wine shows spicy tones of black pepper and spice with loads of berry fruit and currants at the back.",Colline di Moron Rabieto,Salgari
"Roberto Mazzi's family has produced a spicy and thick vineyard-designate Valpolicella with lush tones of mature fruit followed by toasted nut and old leather. Crisp berry tones, a thin mouthfeel and fresh acidity are framed against a background of ripe berry fruit.",Vigneto Poiega,Mazzi
"88-90. Barrel sample. A rounded, soft and rich wine, it shows sweet tannins and a ripe blackberry fruit character. This expression is juicy, ripe and fruity.",Barrel Sample,Château la Pointe
"88-90. Barrel sample. Firmly tannic on the initial taste, this wine shows bell pepper and juicy black-fruit flavors. It is light and fruity, and finishes with dry tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Latour-Martillac
"88-90. Barrel sample. A wine with deep tannins and a very dry character, this is big and solid, but maybe lacking fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Lilian Ladouys
"88-90. Barrel sample. A wine that's about structure and presence, it has velvety tannins and flavors of mint, spice and black currant.",Barrel Sample,Château Preuillac
"88-90. Barrel sample. A firm wine with a black currant character, it's fruity, solid and chunky with gripping tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Cadet-Bon
"88-90. Barrel sample. There is some warmth here, with the tannins providing a firm base for the crisp fruit. This wine shows some richness as well as intense acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Lafleur-Gazin
"88-90. Barrel sample. A wine that seems lean__t doesn't have the fruit weight to support the tannins, offering instead a more structured character.",Barrel Sample,Château Malescasse
"88-90. Barrel sample. Full and juicy, it has sweet tannins that parallel the intensely-juicy fruit. It's layered, with acidity that keeps the dryness at bay. Lively and fresh on the finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Rauzan-Gassies
"88-90. Barrel sample. A solid, dark and complex wine, with intense tannins that are powered by wood spice and black currant. It has ample weight while showing some of the vintage's poise and crispness.",Barrel Sample,Chateau Desmirail
"88-90. Barrel sample. Fresh acidity dominates here. This wine is light in texture and the tannins have a rounded edge. While it is dry, the wood imparts notes of caramel.",Barrel Sample,Château Ferrande
"88-90. Barrel sample. This firmly tannic wine has a dry character that lays over lighter fruits. With soft spice and some sweetness, this wine is developing already.",Barrel Sample,Château Gazin
"88-90. Barrel sample. This wine shows flavors of smooth new wood and black plum. It's soft and fruity, with sweet, ripe tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Peyrabon
"88-90. Barrel sample. A huge, extracted wine, it shows very ripe fruit dominated by dark tannins and a big black plum skin texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Quinault L'Enclos
"88-90. Barrel sample. This light-bodied wine shows ripe fruit, some spice and wood. Not a great weight but it's fruity.",Barrel Sample,Château Corbin Michotte
"88-90. Barrel sample. Filled with new wood, spice and toast, this wine is open and rich, moving more to fruit than tannin.",Barrel Sample,Château Grand Barrail Lamarzelle Figeac
"88-90. Barrel sample. Showing spicy wood with firm, black-currant tannins and gentle fruit, this wine is rounded, soft and accessible.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut-Bergey
"87-89. Barrel sample. Here is a wine with weight and richness, aided by new-wood aging. It has toast and ripe black-plum flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Clos de Sarpe
"87-89. Barrel sample. This is a soft and fruity wine, its acidity prominent and its tannins well behind. Not for aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Lamothe-Cissac
"87-89. Barrel sample. Concentrated, with bitter fruit and wood characters, this wine feels hard and extracted, with a burnt finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Larcis Ducasse
"87-89. Barrel sample. Tobacco and smoke aromas mark the nose. On the palate, there is weight and solid, extracted tannins; its fruit is just showing through the dense, compact structure.",Barrel Sample,Château Marquis de Terme
"87-89. Barrel sample. Smoothed by new wood, this wine has a ripe, almost creamy texture. Its blackberry flavors are ripe, juicy and forward.",Barrel Sample,Château Maucaillou
"87-89. Barrel sample. While the wood flavor dominates here, it does support the ripe blackberry fruit. This wine's fruitiness will eventually be what marks the wine out.",Barrel Sample,Château Reysson
"87-89. Barrel sample. Structured and firm with cassis and spice, this wine is layered with wood, acidity and a delicious freshness.",Barrel Sample,Château Teyssier
"87-89. Barrel sample. Caramel aromas from new wood dominate this wine. It's all burnt, toasty wood and dense tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Dassault
"87-89. Barrel sample. Mint and eucalyptus aromas signal the new wood in this wine. The wood has smoothed out its tannins, yielding a wine with juicy fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Mongravey
"87-89. Barrel sample. This is a juicy, fresh wine with a layer of spice. It has blackberry juice, sweet tannins and an intense acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Fonbel
"87-89. Barrel sample. Here is a well-made, accessible wine, full of blackberry fruits, sweet tannins and a soft, spicy texture. Not for long aging.",Barrel Sample,Château Rahoul
"87-89. Barrel sample. This wine shows very firm, very dense tannins. It is solid, with its fruit well buried beneath its dry surface. This will likely always be a dry wine.",Barrel Sample,Château Siran
"87-89. Barrel sample. This is a rich, soft, full-bodied wine with smooth tannins and fat plum fruits.",Barrel Sample,Château Fonplégade
87-89. Barrel sample. This dark-hued wine shows some fine tannins and has a solid fruit character and a bitter chocolate note.,Barrel Sample,Château Guadet
"Here's a fresh, delicious Syrah for drinking now. It's lush and smooth in black raspberry and cherry purée, fennel, beef jerky and black pepper flavors, backed up with a juicy hit of acidity.",,McManis
"Fairly pungent, with apple and lemon aromas that are typical for the variety. The palate has an edge to it and jacked-up acidity that pushes citrus and pineapple flavors toward tangy. With so much citrus character and acidity, it's lasting and scouring.",Limited Release,Vionta
"This is a blend of Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre. It's a bit soft in structure, but nice and dry, and the blackberry, leather, pepper and cedar flavors are elaborate. Drink now.",Troublemaker Blend 1,Westside Red
"Soft and creamy, with pear and melon flavors dominating the bright acidity. It's an attractive wine, easy on the palate with a light touch of nuttiness to finish.",Brut,Dopff & Irion
"A bit rustic and heavy, with extracted jammy fruit but lacking a certain vivacity and sharpness in the mouth. Good enough for the price. Production was 12,500 cases.",Heritage,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Portuguese grapes are blended with Cabernet Sauvignon in this earthy, aromatic wine. It is dense and concentrated, very solid and chunky. The plum-skin fruits and flavors of red pepper and radish have spice added from wood aging.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Seleccionada,Falua
"Fresh in style, especially for the hot, dry 2007 vintage, reflecting the slightly higher elevation of the Massif d'Uchaux, this medium-bodied wine offers oodles of cherry-berry fruit. It's nothing too serious or complex, just good, quaffable pleasure to consume over the next 2_3 years.",Massif d'Uchaux,Domaine de la Renjarde
"This Horse Heaven Hills Merlot has a powerful clove flavor running right up the middle; along with it come streaks of vanilla and tobacco. What elevates it above cheaper wines with similar flavors is the structure and the penetration of the fruit, which has the vivid berry character of the region. The tannins are quite astringent.",H3,Columbia Crest
"Opens with honey, orange and a bit of harsh matchstick. The palate is sticky and comes up just short of cloying, with candied melon, citrus and mango flavors. Finishes sweet and sugary, with caramel and toffee notes. Tasty but unctuous.",Late Harvest Special Selection,Echeverria
"A solid rendition of Verdejo with apple and pear aromas along with basic minerality. The palate is standard and firm, with good acidity pushing apple and citrus flavors. Perfectly competent but not showing the nuances and higher qualities that would justify a $17 outlay.",,El Pensador
"On the lean, citrusy side, but the flavors of pineapple and lemon are married to hints of vanilla and smoke for added complexity. Could use a touch more flesh, but some will enjoy the crispness.",Citrine,Gemtree
"Fullish and broad in the mouth without going overboard, this is textbook Chardonnay with mass appeal. Peach and vanilla flavors persist nicely on the finish, pointed up with finely judged acids. Drink now.",,Jacob's Creek
"Don't discount this Pinot Noir because it's in a screw top and the price is under $20. It's quite a nice wine, dry and silky. Made in a lighter style to be opened now, it has pleasant cherry, cola and sandalwood flavors.",,Jekel
"Standard berry and cherry aromas are clean and round, while the palate is full and honest, with medium tannins and controlled acidity. For basic Merlot it's nice because there's sweetness, ripe fruit flavors, cola and juicy snap to the finish.",,Calcu
"Too much oak on this Chardonnay. It's dominated by the aromas and flavors of buttered toast and caramelized, vanilla accented wood. Underneath all that are some pretty good pineapple, peach and pear flavors.",Private Reserve,Beringer
"Fresh, appley and floral with a touch of tangy yogurt cream, this is an approachable yet elegant Virginia pick. Delicate apple and pear flavors shine through on this full-bodied wine with fresh acidity, supple texture and balanced alcohol.",Reserve,Barrel Oak
"A soft, lightly floral wine, with an oily texture, the ripe pear and apricot fruits edged with citrus. A hint of walnuts goes with the final acidity.",Monte Cascas Colheita Branco,Casca Wines
Allegrini presents a very likable and smooth Valpolicella with bright berry tones and lively shadings of spice and white almond that appear in the background. Pair this wine wine with grilled sausage or lamb shish kabob.,,Allegrini
"There's a nice, easy-drinking quality to this informal Valpolicella that comes across as vibrant cherry and forest berry. It's lean and compact on the palate with bright acidity on the close.",,Allegrini
"Cherry candy and cola aromas emerge from the nose of this simple, but very bright Ripasso. There's a tiny hint of dried apple skin or citrus at the back and the wine is smooth and lively on the close.",,Manzini
"From the 2004 vintage, this is a thin and slightly sour Valpolicella that would pair with cheesy pizza or ravioli filled with ricotta. The natural freshness and brightness of the fruit will cut through fatty dishes.",,Marchesi Fumanelli
"A little rugged in the mouth, with some fierce tannins, but otherwise a pretty good Cabernet-based wine. The berry-cherry and currant flavors will benefit from an hour or two of airing.",Santa Barbara Highlands Vineyard,Nadia
"Valpolicella Vigneto Sant'Urbano offers very bright, albeit, one-dimensional aromas of red cherry and blueberry. The mouthfeel is crisp and smooth and the wine promises to pair with light meat or pasta.",Vigneto Sant'Urbano,Speri
"Smooth, soft wine, very accessible and up-front. The stewed fruit flavors and fresh acidity give an attractive lift to this open wine.",Evel,Real Companhia Velha
"Clove and pepper spice the dark red cherry aromas on this lovely Montepulciano. Judicious use of French oak makes for a smooth, full-bodied wine with rustic tobacco and smoke notes that highlight the wine's concentrated black fruit and sturdy tannins.",,Raffaldini
"Basic and a little sweet and confected, but consider the price and you should be smiling. There's some bramble and pepper to the nose, but mostly it's just ripe and full of blackberry and black plum character. Candied and almost cloying, but remains flush and happy. Good in the midlevel category.",,Wrongo Dongo
"Soft, peach and pear dominated wine, this has a ripe and rich character, its flavors packed with ripe acidity and a tangy texture. It is full-bodied with good acidity to keep it all fresh.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Seleccionada,Falua
"Made with organically-farmed grapes, this Valpolicella blend offers meaty aromas of ripe cherry, moist pipe tobacco and light shadings of dark spice. It delivers medium length and intensity with a very crisp, almost bitter fade.",Ca' Fiui,Corte Sant' Alda
"There's a modern touch of vanilla bean, chocolate and soft spice that comes on the heels of bright cherry and plum. You'll also recognize tones of mesquite and cherry cola and this ruby-colored Valpolicella Classico Superiore offers very good intensity with sour cherry flavors on the finish.",,Dall'Abaco Fedrigoni
"You absolutely can't go wrong with a wine like this. Valpolicella Torre d'Orti is an easy, fresh wine that would pair with anything from lasagna to cheeseburgers. It's crisp and thin with a nice quality of cherry, raspberry and cassis fruit.",Torre d'Orti,Cavalchina
"87-89. Barrel sample. This is a big, fruity and soft wine. It is rich and opulent, with firm tannins and some extract.",Barrel Sample,Goulée
"87-89. Barrel sample. Smooth and rich, this wine is dominated by firm tannins, tarry fruit and new wood.",Barrel Sample,Château Bellefont-Belcier
"87-89. Barrel sample. A fruity wine with plenty of dense tannins and a solid structure, this expression is powered by acidity, black fruit and a dark, dry finish.",Barrel Sample,Château Laforge
"87-89. Barrel sample. A wine with serious tannins and intense acidity. It has tobacco and spice flavors, with its fruit in the background.",Barrel Sample,Château Dutruch Grand Poujeaux
"87-89. Barrel sample. Here is a very tannic, extracted wine. It's dark, full of bitter chocolate, all structure and no flesh.",Barrel Sample,Château Grand Mayne
"86-88. Barrel sample. Here is a light, juicy wine with intense acidity. There is some green fruit here along with firm tannins and tight black currants.",Barrel Sample,Château Plince
"86-88. Barrel sample. A wine that's likely to develop quickly. It has spice and sweet fruit flavors, with its acidity forming a layer between its tannins and wood.",Barrel Sample,Château Pontac-Lynch
"86-88. Barrel sample. This wine is dominated by new wood, with caramel and sweet fruit flavors. It feels unbalanced, with the acidity way behind the fruit.",Barrel Sample,Château Haut Breton Larigaudière
86-88. Barrel sample. There is attractive juicy fruit with a soft layer of tannins in this wine. It's bright with very crisp acidity and a fruity finish.,Barrel Sample,Château Simard
"86-88. Barrel sample. Dark, dense and lean in character, this wine misses real fruit weight. The year's crispness is evident.",Barrel Sample,Château Bergat
"86-88. Barrel sample. Soft and fruity, the tannins offer a light counterpoint to the red- and dark-berry flavors. Its acidity is very present.",Barrel Sample,Château les Ormes Sorbet
"86-88. Barrel sample. Dark with spicy fruit, tense tannins and very firm fruit, this wine is rather lean in texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Tour de Pin Figeac
"86-88. Barrel sample. Soft and fruity with red currant fruits and forward light tannins, this wine is attractive and already drinkable.",Barrel Sample,Château la Dauphine
"86-88. Barrel sample. A wine that shows attractive acidity and soft red-berry flavors, as well as dark, edgy tannins.",Barrel Sample,Château Fourcas Dupré
"86-88. Barrel sample. Very concentrated and dominated by acidity, this wine is on the dry side. It misses weight and opulence, offering an austere texture.",Barrel Sample,Château Picque Caillou
"86-88. Barrel sample. Heavy on the toasty new wood, the wine has a rough character that comes through. It feels firm and very dry.",Barrel Sample,Château Fonréaud
"86-88. Barrel sample. Smooth, rounded, fresh wine with attractive black- currant acidity. The wine is bright, fruity and forward in character.",Barrel Sample,Pezat
"85-87. Barrel sample. This is a light wine that will develop quickly. It has red-berry flavors, with notes of spice and bell pepper in the background.",Barrel Sample,Château Greysac
"85-87. Barrel sample. Here is a big and solid wine, dominated by dark wood tannins. It is heavy on the toast.",Château Cheval Noir Barrel Sample,Mähler-Besse
85-87. Barrel sample. Here is an attractive fruity wine with good acidity and lively black currant notes. It's soft and low in tannins.,Barrel Sample,Château Coutet
"85-87. Barrel sample. Ripe, soft and fruity, this wine feels light. It's enjoyable for its juicy berry flavors and open acidity.",Barrel Sample,Château Paveil de Luze
"With its concentrated yellow fruits, this is already a powerful wine. It is packed with acidity, toast, peach flavors and minerality, starting out as a gorgeously rich wine from a ripe vintage. Of course, it will age over many years; open in 10 years.",,Domaine Leflaive
"Amazingly rich, offering deep, complex layers of cherries, black raspberries, cola, anise biscotti, pomegranates, persimmons, black tea, orange zest, mushrooms, you name it, but don't forget the spices, everything from cloves and black pepper to cinnamon. Utterly delicious, with a silky, briskly clean mouthfeel. But the tannins are pronounced. They're not so strong as to lock the wine down, but do suggest time in the cellar. Give it four years, and it could be wonderful after 10 or more.",Klopp Ranch,Merry Edwards
"Cerretalto delivers aromas of natural complexity and oak-driven tones of cinnamon, clove, chocolate and exotic spice. The fruit is dark, dense and ripe. There's extra roundness and density in the mouth that holds together the wine's firm tannins and its crisp, acidic component. Hold 10_20 more years.",Cerretalto,Casanova di Neri
"This beautiful riserva shows enormous thickness and blackness, like midnight of a new moon. The wine delivers impenetrable density, extraction, black fruit, spice, berry preserves, licorice, asphalt, ground black pepper, cherry liqueur and crème de cassis. There are seemingly no limits to the intensity and complexity here. The mouthfeel is dense, plush, firmly structured and very long. Keep this Brunello safely in your cellar 20 years or more.",Madonna del Piano Riserva,Valdicava
"Gorgeous, opulent and rich, Tenuta Nuova is an unforgettable wine. It has body, power, persistence and loads of plush personality. It is layered with chocolate, cherry, blackberry, spice, leather and savory notes. There's a deep mineral layer as well. Compelling and lovely.",Tenuta Nuova,Casanova di Neri
"Luce della Vite opens with an opulent, generous style and is packed with black cherry, black currant, cola, leather and pipe tobacco. This is a plush, rich and deeply textured wine, with plenty of intensity and staying power. It shows dense tannins with a touch of youthful astringency. Age 10 more years.",,Luce della Vite
"Definitely on a top 10 list of Italian icons, Solaia affirms the massive potential of Italian winemaking, from vineyard to cantina to cellar and beyond. Superrich and polished, but never over the top, this gorgeous super Tuscan shows deep layers of chocolate, black cherry, rum cake and spice. The secret lies in its balance: Everything is in place, from intensity and complexity to persistency.",Solaia,Marchesi Antinori
"Capanna's offering in 2007 is extremely bold, dark and opulent. Loads of aromatic momentum in the form of blackberry, cherry liqueur, spice, leather, tobacco, rum cake, cinnamon, vanilla bean and bitter chocolate characterize the bouquet. The wine also shows a soft, ripe, generous texture, yet remains well-contained and balanced.",,Capanna
"This vineyard-designated riserva delivers perfumed notes of red rose, pressed flower and a bright, berry-driven bouquet. In the mouth, this is a plump, bold wine with thick concentration and loads of dark fruit such as blackberry and plum. The tannic firmness suggests at least 10 years of cellar aging. Overall, it is beautiful, elegant and bold.",Riserva Vigna Paganelli,Il Poggione
"Surprisingly full bodied, fruit loaded and instantly appealing, this new Chardonnay from Hogue mixes generous flavors of apple and butter, toasted almonds and a little spice.",,Hogue
"A good, clean Pinot that shows cool-climate acidity and dryness, and long hangtime raspberry, cherry and cola flavors. It's on the simple side, but a lovely wine to drink now.",,Inception
"Soft and approachable, this Petite Sirah has easy tannins and rich blackberry, funky meat, cola and cedar flavors. Ready now.",,Miro
"Fancy and oaky, with crisp acidity balancing strong pineapple, green apple and new oak flavors. A modern style Chardonnay to drink now.",Fermata,Wrath
"This easy-going Valpolicella offers medium heft and density with fresh notes of cherry, blueberry, white almond and cola. Pair this wine with bruschetta topped with wild mushrooms and olive oil.",,Zenato
"Clancy's is a reliable Barossa blend that in 2008 is 50% Shiraz, 34% Cabernet Sauvignon and 16% Merlot. It's a supple wine, the bright cherry fruit framed by tart acids rather than firm tannins. Drink it over the next couple of years.",Clancy's Shiraz-Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot,Peter Lehmann
"Good Cabernet Sauvignon, spicy, full  bodied and fruity. It's a little gritty and rustic in the mouth, with the blackberry and cherry flavors turning jammy sweet. Drink now.",,Pomar Junction
"Available at an attractively low price, this ruby-colored Valpolicella offers bright cherry notes followed by cola and white almond. The wine imparts a sharp, crisp feel in the mouth.",Capitel dei Nicalò,Tedeschi
"Valpolicella Vigneto Rafaèl opens with bright cherry and wild berry aromas followed by cola and white almond. The wine is crisp, informal and easy going in terms of form and substance.",Vigneto Rafaèl,Tommasi
"Slightly rubbery on first impression, but cleaner and better as it opens up. Zesty and full of acidic punch, with juicy black cherry and plum flavors. Registers as healthy and ripe, with a spot of medicinality. Quite good for the price.",,Vega Sindoa
"Gentil is used in Alsace to describe a blended wine. This is soft and smooth, making a great apéritif, with just an edge of crispness to go over the rich pear and green plum flavors. Finishes with a burst of pineapple.",Gentil Réserve,Willm
"A strong Zinfandel, tannic, high in alcohol and fruity, and brimming with wild forest cherry and raspberry liqueur, exotic spices and sweet sandalwood. Drink it with a juicy cheeseburger, a spicy beef burrito and just a nice roast chicken.",Old Vines,St. Francis
"A nice Cabernet for drinking now. It's rich in berries, cherries, currants and oak, with smooth tannins and soft acidity. Shows an elaboration that makes it upscale and elegant.",,Simple Math Cellars
"Aromas of crusty blackberry are dark and herbal, while the palate is zesty and fresh, with tight acidity supporting flavors of cassis, black cherry, cola nut and pepper. Toasty, herbal and licorice-like on the finish. A good yet common wine.",Reseve Barrel Select,Santa Ema
"A medium-bodied Rutherglen Muscat, lacking the richness and complexity of old examples, but offering raisin and orange zest flavors and admirable freshness.",Cellar No. 9,Seppeltsfield
"Shows all the hallmarks of a fine Chard, except complexity. It's dry, creamy and smoky in oak and lees influences, with flavors of pineapples and peaches. Easy to find, with 250,000 cases produced.",,Rodney Strong
This Valpolicella Classico Superiore shows aged aromas of licorice and tar followed by candied fruit and ripe cassis. It delivers medium density and persistency and would make a good companion to pork or roast chicken.,,Rubinelli Vajol
"Here's a light and informal Ripasso that opens with bright berry tones, forest floor, mesquite wood and cedar. The wine's consistency is thin and bright and there are sour cherry flavors at the end.",,San Cassiano
"Pungent aromas of asparagus, sea grass and lime are pure Leyda, and while the wine seems to be softening with age, it does offer enough acids to keep it moving. Flavors of lime and green bean are green in nature, and there's seltzer and more lime on the finish. May already be past its sell date.",,Amaral
"Ceylon tea, fresh pineapple and tangerines perfume this off-dry blend of predominantly Vidal, Sauvignon Blanc and Viognier grapes. Simple yet fresh, with pretty white floral and peach notes, this wine would be a lovely companion to lemongrass accented Thai and Vietnamese dishes.",Bowhaus White Table Wine,Barrel Oak
"Rio Albo is an easy, fresh Valpolicella that recalls those nostalgic days of chequered tablecloths at the neighborhood Italian eatery. It offers loads of fresh fruit flavors and nice acidity on the close that will cut through pasta or potato gnocchi.",Rio Albo,Ca' Rugate
"Mild apple and pear aromas are the starting point. The palate is lively and high in acidity, with citrus, lemon, orange and pithy flavors. Citric fruit is the point of reference, while pith and related bitterness work the edges. Zesty but modest in terms of varietal Chardonnay flavor and weight.",Reserva,Caliterra
"This is a good, everyday Pinot Noir whose cherry and rhubarb flavors and silky mouthfeel make it a pretty good value for the price. It's nice and dry, with a spicy finish.",,Bonterra
"Attractive lemon-flavored citrus character with light acidity. This is a classic, creamy wine with a fresh aftertaste. A drink now wine. Screw cap.",Cape Roca Fish,Casca Wines
"Spiced berry aromas are dense and suggest raisin, but overall this is a clean, inexpensive blend of Garnacha and Tempranillo that is satisfying and highly competent. Flavors run smoky, rubbery and dark, but not baked or too heavy. Toasty and roasty on the finish, too.",,Don Ramón
"Firm, earthy and fruity, this is a chunky wine, with a core of tannins to go with the fruit. It is not for aging, its black berry juice demanding attention now. A great barbecue wine.",Châo das Rocas,Herdade da Comporta
"A crisp wine, dry and clean, with citrus, green apple and lemongrass flavors. A small percentage of new oak adds toast, while sur lie aging brings a tart creaminess. Pretty good, but it's a little too unripe and green to earn a higher score.",,Illumination
"A good Pinot Noir for the price, showing classy Central Coast dryness and acidity. The raspberry, cherry, cola and spice flavors pair well with smoked meats, grilled steak, or just a great juicy burger.",,Inception
"A pleasant mix of coffee grinds, char and spiced black cherries perfume this Cabernet Franc. Full bodied and rich with ripe black plum fruit and soft mocha and cinnamon notes, it's faintly reminiscent of a mug of Mexican hot chocolate. Soft tannins and a vibrant acidity contribute to a tart, sour cherry finish.",Josie's Knoll,Lovingston
"A soft, open style of Riesling, just hinting at a steely core. It has perfumed white fruits, a youthful texture of apple skins, followed by ripe acidity. It needs a few more months in bottle to bring it into balance.",Réserve,Lucien Albrecht
"This riserva is simply gorgeous, with loads of fresh fruit, mineral, spice, leather, tobacco and long aging potential. The freshness and structure is definitely present, while the mouthfeel is luscious and opulent with vanilla, espresso and dried herb or menthol overtones.",Riserva,Capanna
"This gorgeous Vin Santo from the Carmignano subzone of Tuscany is made with 90% Trebbiano and 10% Sancolombano. With a luscious, dark amber color, this sweet wine offers smooth, long tones of raisin, dried apricot, honey and toasted nut. It's a true masterpiece with amazing intensity and complexity.",Riserva,Capezzana
"This riserva shows gorgeous intensity and a beautiful, dense texture. There's just enough softness to cushion the naturally high acidity of 2006. It's firm, silky, rich, powerful and super long. In fact, the extraordinary length is what sets this wine apart. Age 10_15 years.",Le Due Sorelle Riserva,Tenuta La Fuga
"Absolutely stunning, a testament to the vintage, the terroir and to the winemaker's impeccable hand. It's delicious beyond description, offering wave after wave of cherry pie, blackberry confit, red currant, persimmon and cola flavors, finished with exciting spices. Already throwing sediment, it's so balanced in acids and tannins that it's gorgeous now, but should develop effortlessly over the next six years at the very least.",La Masía Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"This dark Brunello opens with thick concentration and balsam notes of cola, humus and eucalyptus. Despite the thick extraction, the berry aromas are delicate, with lingering wild raspberry and forest fruit. The wine shows a nice juxtaposition between its bold, masculine side and an elegant feminine one. The mouthfeel is bold, plush and powerful.",,Corte Pavone
"A gorgeously rich wine, powered by tannins but just as importantly by ripe berry fruit and crisp acidity. Smoky wood flavors blend with juicy fruit, powerful dark tannins and an intensely fresh finish. Age for seven years or more.",,Louis Jadot
"Here's a Pinot to put into your cellar. That's if you can keep from opening it now and savoring the deep, spicy flavors that are so captivating. Offers up layers of cherries, cola, pomegranates, mushrooms, Indian spices and minerals, not to mention a deft touch of sweet, smoky oak. Wonderful tannins and brisk acidity provide balancing structure to the richness. The finish is long. Drink anytime from now through 2017.",Meredith Estate,Merry Edwards
"Artist Sandro Chia and his team have delivered a lush, modern, approachable and opulent riserva with aromas of spice, ripe fruit, chocolate fudge and red cherry. This is a round and supple wine, with a soft, generous mouthfeel backed by firm structure and bright acidity.",Riserva,Castello Romitorio
"Made from 100% Cabernet, this wine hits all the right notes. It's fantastically rich and ripe, with flavors of sweet cherries, cassis and dark chocolate, while oak brings delicious notes of buttered toast. The tannins are complex, but so soft you can enjoy this wine now, although it should develop for at least a decade.",,Hunnicutt
"From Tuscany's celebrated Frescobaldi wine family, Brunello Castelgiocondo opens with dark, inky concentration and bold aromas of pressed rose, black cherry, exotic spice, leather and unsweetened chocolate. It is beautifully put together, with ample intensity, balance, complexity and silkiness on the finish.",,Castelgiocondo
"La Rasina has hit a winning formula with Il Divasco. This wine is bold and opulent, with lavish layers of bright fruit, spice, cola and leather. It is one of those Brunellos that seems to have melted chocolate fudge at its core with a round, soft mouthfeel. Impressive intensity and complexity are both there.",Il Divasco,La Rasina
"A pretty and lusciously layered Brunello with dark fruit, spice, leather, tobacco and rum cake aromas. The wine is dense and chewy, with a tight, velvety feel. Dark fruit and spice push the wine across the palate, and both the acidity and tannins are softer than in other 2006 riservas.",Riserva,Verbena
"Not an obvious wine by any stretch, this riserva opens slowly and bashfully to deliver small pulses of cherry, chocolate and smoked bacon that build in intensity and power as the wine gains momentum in the glass. The tannins are present but are soft and firm without any bitter astringency. Age 10 years or more.",Riserva,Siro Pacenti
"San Polo delivers a stellar 2007 Brunello with incredible density, concentration and personality. It starts off soft, smooth and supple until those still-young tannins appear on the close, giving the wine a firm backbone. Black fruit, cherry, rum cake, plum, black pepper and cured meat characterize the bouquet. In all, this is a beautiful ensemble with layers of beauty and freshness.",,San Polo
"From an all-female winery, this riserva opens with a deep garnet color. Black espresso bean, vanilla pod, toasted chestnut and dark, brooding fruit characterize the bouquet. It is bright and crisp in the mouth, with a sharply defined edge and polished tannins.",Riserva,Donatella Cinelli Colombini
"Tasted at more than four years of age, this is a standout effort in a series that dates back to the mid-1990s. A complex nose greets you with a floral, dusty tickle, leading into a fruit-packed wine, with blueberry and black cherry most evident. Notes of black olive and graphite come through on the long finish, with exceptional grip and polish.",XIII,Dunham
"From the Tuscan estate of Angelo Gaja, Promis delivers all the gorgeous intensity and complexity you should expect. The wine oozes dark chocolate, cherry liqueur, spice, blackberry and moist tobacco. The mouthfeel is soft and smooth; absolutely delicious.",Promis,Ca' Marcanda
"A top-rank Pinot Noir, dry, silky and elegant, with moderate alcohol despite great richness. The flavors of cherries, cola, plums and herbs are simply delicious, while the structure displays great integrity of acids and tannins. A bit tight now in youth, it should unfold over the next eight years. If you pop the cork now, give it a few hours of airing.",Fe Ciega Vineyard,Longoria
"Ripe fruit and red cherry, with spice, cinnamon and wood shop aromas, characterize the youthful bouquet of La Gerla's latest Brunello. But there's also a pretty mineral tone that gives the nose backbone and definition. It is delicate and feminine in the mouth, with elegant flavors of wild berry and blue flower that will surely grow in intensity as the wine evolves. Give it 10 more years.",,La Gerla
"Here is a very plush, dark and decadent riserva with soft and luscious tones of ripe fruit, blackberry, moist earth and pipe tobacco. The wine is smooth, dense and enduring. It can be either aged or consumed in 3_5 years. The style reflects a soft, round approach to the crisp 2006 vintage.",Riserva,PianCornello
"Here's a bright and bold Brunello with loads of ripe cherry, inky density and a beautifully polished feel with crushed mineral and wet river stone elements. It's a truly beautiful wine with stunning purity and intensity. All elements are balanced__rom the fruit, to the spice, to the ethereal balsam notes. The mouthfeel is lively and intense and the finish is packed with berry, almond and savory persistence. Age 10_15 years.",,Padelletti
"Poggio all'Oro (a wine only produced in the best vintages) is a sophisticated and austere Brunello with just a tiny dab of sweet spice and red rose aromas on the bouquet. Beyond those are steady, savory pulses of tobacco, leather and dark cedar. The wine is plush, textured and rich, with a polished firmness that keeps it grounded on the palate.",Poggio all'Oro Riserva,Castello Banfi
"The walled Clos de la Barre is a Jadot monopoly. This 2009 has great depth of flavor, hinting at the Volnay richness while remaining structured. That makes it a concentrated wine, red and black fruits mingling with wood and intense acidity. For long-term aging over six years and more.",Clos de la Barre Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"A gorgeous Brunello, with bountiful and intense aromas of red fruit, blackberry, spice, leather and cedar wood that go on and on. The wine is pristine, chiseled and sharp__ut bold and generous at the same time. There's a touch of bitter almond followed by softer tones of red berry and spice.",,La Mannella
"Put this beautiful Brunello in your cellar for at least 10_15 more years. Rennina opens with bold oak and cherry tones (that need more time to integrate), followed by plump, rich blackberry flavors, chocolate, leather and dark spice. It's a wine characterized by impressive density and opulence.",Rennina,Pieve Santa Restituta
"This attractive Brunello presents a wild, brambly side, with aromas of wild mushroom, forest floor, small berry and crème de cassis. It boasts a beautiful, deep color and plenty of concentration, with endnotes of spice, leather and dried tobacco leaf. The mouthfeel is solid, well defined and superbly structured.",Val di Suga,Tenimenti Angelini
"Venge's superb 2008 Bone Ash was a tough act to follow, but this 2009 pulls it off. Made entirely from Cabernet and aged for nearly two years in mostly new French oak, it shows massively rich flavors of blackberries, cassis and sweet buttered toast, with a lush, smooth mouthfeel, courtesy of ripe, sweet tannins. So easy to like, and an ideal partner to a perfectly grilled steak. Drink now and over the next six years.",Bone Ash Vineyard,Venge
"A distinguished Pinot Noir, notable for its pure, refined structure. Although it's entirely dry, the cherry, licorice and pomegranate flavors are so rich, the wine tastes sweet. The earthiness of the soil shows up in a taste of sautéed wild mushrooms, splashed with balsamic. A brilliant wine, capable of aging for a decade. Perfect with roast lamb.",Flax Vineyard,Merry Edwards
"This is a smooth, balanced and intense wine that opens with a deep, saturated appearance and plush aromas of sweet spice, rum cake, leather, tobacco and ripe blackberry. This bold, modern expression of Brunello shows acidity and tannins that are firm, but not biting.",Riserva Gemini,La Serena
"Poggio Nardone's 2006 riserva is a neverending journey of opulence and excellence. Everything is delivered in supersized intensity__he cherry, chocolate, spice, cola, cassis, leather and cedar. The mouthfeel is soft, finely textured, shapely and long-lasting. This is a beautiful wine that will age many years to come.",Riserva,Poggio Nardone
"There's a raw, chewy quality to this simple Valpolicella that recalls black cherry and vinous grape. The wine proceeds with a mellow, soft feel and offers much more fruity intensity and personality in the mouth than it does on the nose.",,Le Guaite
"The bouquet delivers snap, clarity and a pure Leyda character, which revolves around ocean-influenced notes of asparagus and green bean. The palate has scour and sizzle, and the flavors suggest lime, green apple and asparagus. Zesty and tangy but also green and leaning toward vegetal.",Garuma Vineyard,Leyda
"Rubber and prune are the lead aromas, and overall the nose is big but flat. Conversely, the palate is clacky and tough on the surface, with herbal, roasted-berry flavors. Dark and herbal on the finish as well, with a clunky, somewhat awkward fade. Not as clean and pure as the 2007 version.",Edición Limitada,Morandé
"A classic, there's no mistaking this spicy confection of a wine. It has a great blast of lychee, Chinese gooseberries and spice, with just a hint of acidity in the background.",Réserve,Gustave Lorentz
"Starts off slightly tarry or rubbery, but soon unfolds to reveal hints of jammy fruit and chocolate balanced against olive notes. A bit chunky, but solid, with a dusting of fine tannins like cocoa on the finish. Drink now_2013.",,Domaine du Bois de Saint-Jean
"On the dusty, earthy side of the Rhône spectrum, with hints of cordite accenting cherry fruit. It's undeniably fresh and vibrant, just lacks some of the richness characteristic of the 2007 vintage.",L'Andéol Rasteau,Perrin & Fils
"Wonderful flavors in this dry Syrah, ranging from blackberries and cherries through cola to dried herbs and anise. The tannins are gentle. The big problem is excessive softness, which mars the wine's structural integrity. Ready now.",Persephone Vineyard,Peju
"Soft and simple, with herb-infused blackberry, cherry, cola, beef jerky and pepper flavors. Finishes dry and nicely spicy, but needs greater structure, especially at this price.",,Star Angel by Montes
"A bit soupy to begin with; the nose is herbal and a touch brambly, with a certain grittiness. In the mouth, it's grabby and tannic, with full black cherry and blackberry flavors. Dark, toasty and charred as well, with more size than elegance. A good wine but nothing out of the ordinary.",Vernus,Santa Helena
"From a family-run, boutique winery, this well-aged expression of Valpolicella (from the excellent 2004 vintage) delivers tertiary aromas of soft spice, leather and dried tobacco. The fruit nuances are still there in the form of dried prunes and plums.",Vigneto I Pipioni,Savoia
"A quick first nosing suggests a vegetal quality, and yes, the wine does have a green streak to it. But overall it rounds out and opens to show herbal black-fruit flavors, tobacco, coffee and earth notes. It's tannic and clacky, maybe a touch aggressive, but it does improve with airing. Good Chilean Cab with typical Maipo herbal notes.",1865 Single Vineyard,San Pedro
"Heavily charred, with aromas of black coffee, earth, leather and dark-berry fruit. The palate has a starchy, firm feel and flavors of wild berry, toasted barrel, cola and herbs. Stays toasty through the finish, with minty, almost green/herbal notes closing things out.",Reserva,TerraNoble
"Measured aromas of wild berry and exotic spice are followed by smoky flavors of cured beef in this easy, crisp Ripasso. Offers more depth in the mouth than it does the nose.",Corte Majoli,Tezza
"Aromatic with notes of petrol, smoke and apple on the nose, this sprightly semisweet Riesling teases the tongue with the slightest tickle of effervescence. The palate balances sweet pink grapefruit with honey, carrying through to an elegant finish.",,Two Rivers
"Here's a luscious and full Valpolicella that sees both barrique and oak casks for a full, round and modern feel. The wine imparts long lasting notes of cherry, ripe raspberry and spice.",Il Tabarro,Valentina Cubi
"Bonacosta is a thin and easy-going Valpolicella that makes a food-friendly companion to pasta, sliced ham appetizers and barbecued hamburger. It offers sharp fruit tones follows by crisp freshness.",Bonacosta,Masi
"Good price for a nice, everyday Cab. It's made in a lighter, accessible style, with jammy pie-filling blackberry, cherry, blueberry and raspberry flavors, brightened with citrusy acidity.",Spirit Hawk,Lander-Jenkins
"This is a simple, correct Valpolicella with clean aromas of cherry, blueberry, white almond and raspberry cola. It has a smooth, soft mouthfeel with one-dimensional fruit flavors.",,L'Arco
"Bursting with bold, fully ripe fruit notes of pear and peach, followed up with tropical notes, this is a lush fruit bomb of a Chardonnay to drink over the near term (3_4 months).",Flying Piano Hand Select,Ozwell Vintners
"An attractive wine that is herbaceous, with a hint of citrus and with a richer texture that also offers fresh pears and cream. A good, fresh apéritif.",Quinta de Cidrô,Real Companhia Velha
"Easy, fruity and softly tannic, showing which shows fresh redcurrant fruits. Like many Alsace Pinot Noirs, it lacks power, but replaces that with a vibrant fruity, juicy character.",Côte de Rouffach,Rieflé
"Apple, grapefruit and citrus aromas are neither hard nor pushy, while the palate is fleshy and offers standard citrus, grapefruit and passionfruit flavors. Pithy on the finish but it holds steady. Made for everyday drinking.",Reserva,Caliterra
"Here's a simple, correct Ripasso (made with partially air-dried grapes) that offers clean aromas of toasted almond, red berry and exotic spice. It's thin, short but smooth in the mouth so serve this red wine on informal occasions.",,Cent'Anni
"Surprisingly lean and light bodied, this doesn't show typical characteristics of a late harvest wine, but its a clean, refreshing dessert wine evocative of dewy, fresh wildflowers, melon and lemons with just a hint of petrol. Bitter lime pith and pleasant notes of slate and stone add some complexity as well.",Late Harvest,Chateau Lafayette Reneau
"Forward and spicy, this puts some muscle into the Merlot with earthy, tongue-gripping tannins. The fruit has a sweet tomato flavor, with a streak of cherry candy. Though not entirely knit together, it's a pleasant drink best enjoyed young.",Indian Wells,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Dark and rubbery on the nose, but also lightly leafy and herbal, with oak and coffee for cover up. The palate is good but slightly rough and narrow, and the flavors are not as deep and developed as they have been in the past. Plum, berry and herbal flavors are good but lead to a short, modest finish. Vintage 2008 was not a good one, and this wine reflects that.",,Elias Mora
"This Pinot Noir is quite dry and acidic, and while it has some polished cherry, mushroom and oak flavors, they could be a little richer. Still, it's an elegant wine that will drink well with a grilled steak.",,Beringer
"The blend is 59% Merlot, 33% Syrah, and 8% Cabernet Sauvignon, and the flavors mix well. There's some not unpleasant volatile acidity and very tart, tangy red fruit flavors. All nicely integrated, and drinking pleasantly right now.",Rock Lake,Kamiak
"There's a dessert wine sweetness to this wine that may be due to extremely high alcohol, to residual sugar, or both. Either way, it's not really a table wine, despite delicious flavors of blackberry and cherry jam and caramelized oak. Better as a late night sipper, or with a chocolate pastry.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Jaffurs
"Genuine, honest and straightforward, this ruby-colored Valpolicella Superiore from the Valpantena area boasts aromas of red fruit and blueberry with pretty accents of spice, leather and cola. It's smooth and velvety on the palate with a buoyant, cheerful touch of acidity on the finish: Pair this wine chicken or pork.",Vigneto Calandra di Romagnano,Zecchini
"Just up the slope from the grand cru of La Romanée, Les Petits Monts has produced a wine that combines structure with a more opulent character. That gives rich damson and red plum fruits along with exhilarating acidity and a firm core of tannin. The wine needs aging for 5_6 years.",Les Petits Monts Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Strong Oakville tannins mark this 100% Cabernet, although they're so ripely sweet, you can negotiate them now, especially considering the opulence of the fruit. Blackberries, cassis and dark chocolate just begin to describe the flavors. They're as sweet as a dessert pastry, but the finish is utterly dry, a magic trick the best red wines pull off. Beautiful now after decanting, and should develop through 2018.",,Hunnicutt
"Here is a generous, modern and bold expression of Sangiovese Grosso whose soft layers of chocolate and dark cherry fruit help soften the natural acidity and structure of the 2006 vintage. A polished mineral note adds attractive definition on the finish. Tight and very firm; age this wine 10_20 years.",Riserva,Canalicchio di Sopra
"A wine that brings out intense minerality, a tight citric tang and a beautiful structure. With its lime and grapefruit acidity laid over ripe yellow fruits shot through with toast, this is a wine that should age many years, mellowing into an open, generous richness.",Les Folatières Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"This 2007 Brunello is a big, opulent pleasure bomb with lavish layers, loaded thickly on top of each other: Chocolate fudge, dark cherry, blackberry preserves, rum cake, prune, exotic spice, pipe tobacco, cola, humus and leather. It shows huge personality, intensity and staying power, too. All that density is backed by solid tannins and a steady firmness. Hold 10_15 years.",,Casanova di Neri
"A beautifully composed and well-constructed Brunello, with bright berry tones of cassis and cherry backed by ethereal notes of root beer and eucalyptus. The wine shows a clean, crisp and structured sensation in the mouth__ith a touch of bitter almond on the close__hat revives and refreshes the palate.",,Podere Brizio
"The artist label Syrah is usually Dunham's best, as this vineyard is well-established as one of the premier sites in Washington for Syrah. Scents of violets and black cherry introduce a dense, hard, tightly wound, muscular effort that needs a generous amount of breathing time. It rolls through the palate on a train of well-defined fruit, spice and chocolate, all nicely integrated. Supple and long.",Lewis Vineyard,Dunham
"While the texture of this Pinot is silky and light, it's dramatic in flavor. The cherries, plums, pomegranates and persimmons are packed together into a dense core of taste, all spiced up with cinnamon, cloves and anise. Feels dramatic and complex, but young and fresh in acids and tannins. Give it 5_6 years.",Diopside,Coghlan
"Vintner Elisabetta Geppetti's Saffredi is part cult wine and part mainstream blockbuster in that the wine enjoys worldwide fame, but few know it well. This vintage is soft and luscious, with loads of dark chocolate, cherry, blackberry, tobacco and spice. It's gorgeous down to the last delicious drop.",Saffredi,Fattoria Le Pupille
"This rich wine balances ripe yellow fruits with intense citrus acidity in a harmonious whole. Its structure is laden with minerality, toast and a smooth, delicious creamy aftertaste.",Les Pucelles Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"Rich and rounded, packed with yellow fruits and pineapple flavors, this is a warm, opulent wine, combining toast and fruit. True, there is some minerality, but this Meursault revels in its ripe fruit and generosity.",Sous le Dos d'Ane Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"Armanino's 2010 shows a welcome return to form after the 2009. Indeed, it's more like the '08, vastly rich in raspberry and cherry compote, gingersnap cookie, sweet, caramelized oak and exotic spice flavors. Feels like pure silk and satin in the mouth, making it perfect for drinking now.",Amber Ridge,Armanino Family Cellars
Opens with dark concentration and extra flesh and density in terms of texture. There's an extra padding of softness that helps buffer the vintage's high acidity and natural firmness. Not ready to drink for another 10 years at least.,Riserva,Fornacina
"This is one of the best red wines at this price in California. A Bordeaux blend with a splash of Syrah, it's so rich and opulent, it just dazzles from start to finish. Floods the mouth with sweet cherries, raspberries, milk chocolate and red licorice, yet gets structure from firm tannins and bracing acidity. Lives up to its name, a Cabernet-based wine to feast on with your favorite foods.",Maximus,Bennett Lane
"This is an austere and sophisticated expression of Sangiovese Grosso, with dried tobacco and spice backed by prune and currant. The fruit is ripe and mature without being overtly jammy, chewy or too sweet. In fact, it presents a savory-sophisticated front with ample concentration and a polished texture. Good aging potential.",,Caprili
"An intense and opulent Brunello, with bold brush strokes of ripe cherry, blackberry, chocolate, coffee and mocha. Concentrated fruit and firm tannins are marked by a pretty touch of dusty mineral on the finish.",Riserva,Castelgiocondo
"At this stage, the wine is all dark structure and very firm. It will need time to develop its full potential as an intensely rich wine. Concentrated and firm, it is powered by tannins as well as sweet red fruits. So age for five years at least.",Petite Chapelle Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Selezione Massimo is a dense and concentrated Brunello that delivers dark fruit, espresso, cola, blackberry and licorice. It's a beautiful interpretation of the Montalcino territory, executed with a bold, modern flair. Oak tones characterize the wine.",Selezione Massimo,Villa Le Prata
"Tenuta di Sesta is run by a perfect father-mother-daughter-son team and is located in one of the least-traveled corners of Montalcino. The 2007 Brunello delivers sweet oak tones that drive the initial bouquet and are soon followed by bright cherry, vanilla bean, sweet mocha and rum cake. Pretty balsam notes at the back will undoubtedly increase and evolve with age. Cellar this wine 10 years.",,Tenuta di Sesta
"Gorgeous, beautiful Brunello. Dark concentration and excellent intensity. Loads of complexity that peels back slowly layer after layer as the wine evolves. Rock-solid structure and freshness that point to a happy cellar evolution. Aromas of dark fruit, cola, cured meat, balsam, dried herb, tobacco and leather.",,Tenuta La Fuga
"This wine has some big shoulders. There's a dusty, aged quality, with sophisticated, silky tannins and tertiary aromas of black licorice, dried tobacco, peppercorn and dried berry fruit. It's firm, tight and compact; age 10 more years.",Riserva,Podere Brizio
"Made from 100% Cabernet, this is a worthy followup to the extraordinary 2006 and 2007 vintages. Feels fine in the mouth, with rich tannins and dry, elegant flavors of blackberries, cassis, dark chocolate and French oak. The tannins are pure Napa, smooth and complex. Not ready to drink now, but give it a good six years, and it could develop over the next fifteen.",Alexander,Volker Eisele Family Estate
"This interpretation of Sangiovese Grosso is clean, polished, ripe and elegant. It opens with dark concentration and berry notes of cassis and candied cherry, and then rum cake, leather and tobacco show up on the finish, backed by firm tannins and bright acidity.",Riserva,Gianni Brunelli
"One thing you can depend on concerning Clos du Val's Cabernets is that they're elegant. The winery resolutely refuses to kowtow to the modern style of ultraripe, extracted fruit, high alcohol and massive oak. This lovely Cab, which contains a drop of Merlot, defines their style, and is a joy to drink. It has rich, complex cherry and blackberry flavors, flecked with earth and herbs, and is just beginning a long journey. Now_2021, at least.",,Clos du Val
"Here is a particularly impressive wine from one of Montalcino's top estates. The wine opens with ethereal balsam notes of eucalyptus, humus, dried fruit and dried mint. Beyond those elegant tones are sturdier layers of cured meat and savory spice. It shows bold concentration, thick power and firmness on the close, with a drying mineral finish. Let it age five more years.",,Col d'Orcia
"This is a lovely Brunello with black cherry, plum, smoke, bacon, leather and a drying touch of crushed mineral on the nose. It is rich and concentrated, with a slightly sweet-smelling bouquet. The mouthfeel is compact, tight and polished__ut there is excellent length too.",,Castello Romitorio
"Dark fruit aromas of cherry, blackberry and exotic spice comprise the bouquet. There's inky density, contrasted against delicate aromas of lead pencil, cola and cured meat. The wine is plush, rich and extracted, with dusty, firm tannins.",Assunto Riserva,Bellaria
"La Magia Brunello is a brooding, masculine wine filled with tobacco smoke and cigar box. At the back are tones of dried fruit, blackberry preserves, crème de cassis and prune. It shows wonderful intensity and elegance with loads of personality. Spice, black pepper and bitter chocolate also appear on the long, silky finish. It promises to age well.",,La Magia
"A bold, plump and soft expression of Brunello, with sweet berry fruit, chocolate fudge, cinnamon spice and marzipan. The wine's appearance is dark and well extracted. Despite the grandeur of the nose, the mouthfeel is compact, tight and firm.",,La Velona
"Opens with dark concentration and ripe berry fruit with layers of plum, blackberry, dark chocolate, pipe tobacco, cherry liqueur, cola and underbrush. It offers a wonderful 360-degree portrait of Sangiovese Grosso. Tight structure, integration and loads of fruity intensity. Drink after 2018.",,Pietranera
"Saturated purple in color and grapy on the nose. The palate is mouthfilling but carries semisharp acidity, and the flavors run in the direction of standard black fruit. Notes of mocha and coconut soften the finish, and overall this is a good but rather generic wine.",Reserve Barrel Select,Santa Ema
"Mossy aromas of prune and earth lead the way, followed by a juicy, almost edgy palate that houses herbal berry and toast flavors. Mildly creamy tasting on the finish, with herbs and red-fruit zest and acidity. Regular and herbal, but entirely drinkable.",Castillo de Molina,San Pedro
"A nice, smooth Chardonnay, with ripe fruit and cream and lots of oaky buttered toast. Made in the popular California style.",,Beringer
"Very aromatic wine, perfumed, wearing its ripe fruit on its sleeve. It has weight and richness, perhaps too much, because it has lost its varietal character. More restraint would help. Glass stopper.",Vignoble de Katzenheim,Audrey et Christine Binner
"The wine makes a raw, sharp first impression that suggests a paring with a dish that is rich in cheese or butter. Fresh aromas of wild berry and white almond follow suit and the wine's overall texture is soft but lean.",,Antolini
"Soft, attractive wine whose lightness is belied by its 14% alcohol. That makes it balanced, the black cherry flavors well integrated with the easy tannins, light spice and acidity. Drink this year.",Loios,J. Portugal Ramos
"Rubbery and a little gaseous on first pass, with medicinal berry emerging later on the nose. The palate is structured and reasonably good, with cherry and raspberry flavors that are fresh, lightly extracted and well spiced. Finishes with just a hint of creaminess.",,Hazaña
"Good price for a clean, zesty Sauvignon Blanc. Shows sweet and sour candy flavors of pineapples, lemons and limes, with a touch of vanilla.",,Lake Sonoma
"This bright and crisp Valpolicella Classico delivers clean aromas of cherry, blackberry and plum. The wine sees no oak and for that reason, its fruity characteristics really shine on the finish.",,Marchesi Fumanelli
"Here's a simple and correct Valpolicella that opens with vibrant tones of cherry and ripe raspberry. There's not much depth here, but that's not the point of this wine. Employ it as an easy-drinking red to pair with home cooked pasta.",,Marchesi Fumanelli
"Crisp and soft, backed with bone-dry acidity. Green apple, green plums, it's all about freshness and light. Refreshing, with just a shot of spice and pepper.",,Dopff & Irion
"Raisin, black plum and peppery aromas make for a good bouquet, and the palate is healthy and dark, with snappy black cherry and blackberry flavors floating on a current of zesty acidity. Full on the finish, but still there's some acidic scour. Best with food.",,El Pensador
"Earthy and mossy smelling, which is true to the variety. In addition, there's mild balsamic and dark-berry aromas. The palate is full and easy, with black-fruit flavors that carry herb and peppery qualities. Sweet and sizable for a $9 wine, with toast, coffee and controlled bitterness on the finish.",Eco Balance,Emiliana
"La Corte del Pozzo is an easy-going Ripasso with bright berry nuances and loads of natural freshness and crispness. The wine would pair with easy, fatty foods like pizza or lasagna with melted mozzarella.",La Corte del Pozzo,Gino Fasoli
"A young wine from a high-acid year, and it's showing a fair amount of earth and green, herbal flavor. The fruit seems just on the edge of ripe, with hints of brambly berry. Well balanced in a tough year.",,Gordon Brothers
"Opens with aromas of burnt leaves, roasted bell pepper and tomato and finally secondary red fruit. The palate is saturated but hard, with herbal, leafy, dry red-fruit flavors and a backing of cured meat. Herbal late, with some old-school cherry and tobacco. A tough wine, but at least it's something different.",Peregrino Roble,Gordonzello
"Gli Archi Ripasso is a simple, honest and easy red wine that would pair with rosemary-marinated lamb and roast potatoes. The no-fuss bouquet is redolent of wild berry and roasted almond and there's a good amount of heft and power on the finish.",Gli Archi,Corte Campagnola
"A good, everyday Pinot marked by dryness, softness and raspberry, cherry and cola flavors. Nice with salty ham, lamb chops or roasted salmon.",,Castle Rock
"Aromas of tobacco, mild raisin, dry oak and berries are simple and pleasant, while the palate is light in weight, a touch dilute but very fresh and easy, with cherry, plum and even some citrus for flavor. Light and transparent on the finish, with barely any excess.",Ursa Maior Crianza,Bodegas Ondarre
"Aromas of black cherry, freshly brewed coffee and violets perfume this plush, plummy, full-bodied Syrah. It's unabashedly fruit forward and easy to drink, but spice and coffee grinds kick in at the finish to keep things interesting.",,Coiled
"Here's a simple and lean Ripasso that could pair with white beans and grilled sausage. There are bright fruit flavors here and enough acidity to cut through meat dishes, yet the wine is fundamentally easy and informal overall.",La Preosa,Carlo Boscaini
"Here's a bold and jammy Valpolicella with loads of power and alcohol that would pair with stewy meat dishes or game meat. You'll feel the heat on the nose followed by determined aromas of exotic spice, cherry maraschino and amaretto liqueur.",,Tommaso Bussola
"Sweet on the nose, with a lot of mocha, vanilla and candied fruit. The palate is tannic and very oaky for a wine of this level. Flavors of toffee, cocoa, mocha and generic berry fruit show more oak than purity. A good wine but heavy handed with the oak. Contains 15% Syrah.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"Initially, sweet, feminine violet notes and juicy, ripe blueberries on the nose and palate make this seem innocent and coquettish. But full body, big, chunky tannins and a vibrant acidity against a backdrop of smoke and char make this wine a compelling pick, and potentially one that could benefit from a few years in the cellar.",,Tarara
"A typical southern Rhône blend of 60% Grenache, 30% Syrah and 10% Mourvèdre mixed up behind a modern label, this is creamy and supple in texture, with colluding notes of cherry and black olive. Drink now.",,The Rhôning Stones
"A little soft and showing warmer-climate aromas of passionfruit and tropical citrus. The palate is starting to fade just a bit, but it's still pumping out grapefruit, lime and green apple. Perfectly fine to drink now or wait for the 2010 version.",Urban Maule,O. Fournier
"A good Syrah, dry and firm in tannins, although it lacks the richness and structure of Qupe's better bottlings. Shows easy flavors of blackberries, black cherries, cola, funky smoked meat and oak. Drink now.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Qupé
"At more than four years of age, this Syrah is very dry. It's also tannic, with a hard, astringent bite to the blackberries. Somewhat rustic, it seems unlikely to develop in the bottle.",Block Eleven,Mueller
"Honest, citrusy aromas are simple and nice, while the palate is spritzy, zesty and tastes mildly sweet but also correct with mango, lime, apple and orange flavors. Clean, fun and leaning toward sweet. A good value white to drink immediately.",Reserva,Palo Alto
"A medium-sweet, spicy wine that offers good fresh guava flavor to balance the ripe texture. The finish is fresh. Screw cap.",,Domaine Zinck
"Another terrific Scion from Robert Young. Blended this year from Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, it's rich in blackberry and cherry fruit, with caramel from oak barrels. Feels soft and gentle in the mouth, in the way of Alexander Valley Cabernet. An authentic wine of place, it deserves a place on the best tables.",Scion,Robert Young
"Who wouldn't love this Pinot Noir? It's zippy in acidity and ripe in briary raspberry and cherry fruit, with spicy, smoky oak complexity. Really defines the luxurious silkiness of the appellation. The grapes are mostly from the Fiddlestix Vineyard, with the balance hailing from Rio Vista Vineyard. Drink now-2015.",Reserve,Rusack
"This is a beautiful wine with opulent aromas of chocolate fudge, cherry, vanilla bean and bright berry fruit. Yet in the mouth, it's is very focused, with enough structure and acidity to promise a long future. The finish is silky and fine.",Riserva,San Polo
"Duval used to make Grange, so it is no surprise that his current luxury Shiraz is so successful. The 2008 Eligo oozes with oaky sweetness__anilla, maple syrup and brown sugar notes__ut balances that with potent cassis fruit and somehow ends on dry, savory notes of tobacco and spice. Drink now-2018, although it could surprise and go longer.",Eligo,John Duval Wines
"This Brunello delivers an intense and complex bouquet featuring beautifully integrated aromas of dark fruit, spice, leather and tobacco. Tight tannins promise a long future ahead.",Riserva,Mocali
"Sweet oak tones of cinnamon, ripe cherry and raspberry are delivered via a beautifully intense bouquet. This is a Brunello with tight tannins, fresh acidity and solid structure.",Riserva,Cupano
"While the aromas of this young wine reveal considerable toast, on the palate the wine brings forward the ripe apricot and mango flavors to go with that wood. As it matures, these elements will coalesce with the taut, tense mineral texture into an superb, ageworthy terroir-driven wine.",Les Combettes Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"Inky-dark concentration segues to bold berry notes and loads of dark, deep fruit: plum, prune, blackberry and rum cake. There are also pretty dustings of dry mineral and dried herb at the back. This is a bold Brunello with power, determination, structure and balance. It needs at least 10 years of cellar aging.",,Citille di Sopra
"This landmark Italian wine continues to show the best of Tuscany, as it faithfully does year after year. The quality is obvious, thanks to rich notes of chocolate, black cherry and spice that are wrapped tight within a lush, soft and texture. The close is velvety and very long.",Tignanello,Marchesi Antinori
"Made from eight vineyards located throughout this sprawling appellation, this wine showcases the art of the blend, and is an extraordinary achievement for its sheer opulence. Offers wave after wave of Pinot flavor, with superb tannins and mouthwatering acidity. The fact that this is Merry Edwards's least expensive Pinot Noir is amazing and makes it a special buy. Production was 2,370 cases.",,Merry Edwards
"Well stitched together with a broad, wide assembly of dark fruit, spice and cola-like aromas. All the wine's elements sing loud as a single chorus; bold, plush, chewy. Ends with ripe fruit, rum cake, pipe tobacco and dark espresso bean. Firm, great length.",,Molino di Sant'Antimo
"This is one of the most Chablis-style Chardonnays on the market. It's bone dry, and has a steely, minerally elegance made complex with layers of pineapples and limes, and even a honeysuckle richness. The oak, interestingly, comes from Hungary. A terrific wine, far from the overoaked, buttered popcorn style so popular now. Production was only 227 cases.",Boon Fly's Hill,Kazmer & Blaise
"Always a beautiful wine, this edition of Riserva gli Angeli is austere, sophisticated, lean and elegant. It shows a fine, silky texture with bright aromas of wild berry, cola and mint. There are also interesting tertiary aromas of leather, dusty mineral and cured meat at the back.",Riserva gli Angeli,La Gerla
"A whiff of fresh flowers from a rose garden or a lavender field makes for a nice first impression. Beyond that is dark fruit, black cherry and crème de cassis. Shadings of lead pencil, leather and tobacco fill in the rear. This Brunello presents a soft, round mouthfeel with cherry flavors capped by tight structure.",,Poggio Antico
"Madre is the name of a beautiful vineyard parcel on the Poggio Antico estate, with views that extend from Montalcino to the Mediterranean Sea. This hearty blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon is intense and rich, with long-lasting notes of blackberry, smoke, spice and black pepper. The mouthfeel is lush and velvety.",Madre,Poggio Antico
"Surprisingly subtle, yet maddeningly complex, this is a rare treat to unravel slowly, sip by sip. Sweet and honeyed on the nose with scents of freesia, orange peel and stone fruit, but accented with just a hint of sun-dried hay. The palate is deeply concentrated with undulating waves of honey, beeswax and fruit, but balanced with striking tangerine acidity. Remarkably long on the finish.",Essencia,Royal Tokaji
"A lovely Pinot, dry, crisp and silky, with ripe raspberry, strawberry and cherry fruit flavors, grounded by notes of grilled mushrooms, exotic spices and forest undergrowth. Sweetly delicious now, it should blossom over the next six years.",Rancho Ontiveros Vineyards,Native 9
"A dark inky wine with a bold garnet color and some amber highlights on the rim. The wine is soft, plush and rich with candied fruit, leather, spice, licorice, crushed mineral and asphalt.",Pian Bossolino Riseva,Poggio il Castellare
"Bold and elegant at the same time. Packs a powerful punch in a silk glove. Intense aromas of ripe fruit, spice, cherry liqueur, cola, dried sage and cigar box. The mouthfeel is pristine and structured, with a precise, tonic and streamlined impact.",Sugarille,Pieve Santa Restituta
"The grapes obviously were well grown, as this wine shows a particular intensity of red cherry fruit, as well as minerality. The acidity is just about perfect, the tannins brisk and fine. Yet it's too young to offer full enjoyment. Cellar this polished Pinot Noir for 4_6 years to let it change in interesting ways.",Savoy Vineyard,Chronicle
"Named after one of the most beautiful stone castles in Europe, Poggio alle Mura is a dark and compelling wine that shows a clean quality, a fresh mouthfeel and excellent length. Beautiful fruit intensity with cherry, blackberry, spice, leather and tobacco describe the bouquet. Good aging potential.",Poggio alle Mura,Castello Banfi
"A terrific Pinot Noir, from a winery compiling a serious track record. Grown on the Napa side of Carneros, the wine shows classic Primo's Hill character, with the blackberry pie, cola, mushu plum and sandalwood flavors accented by a little more acidity than usual. Defined by elegance and complexity, it's an ager, although it's beautiful now right out of the bottle. Should easily develop through 2015.",Primo's Hill,Kazmer & Blaise
"La Fortuna Brunello shows a distinctive nose with a vein of sweet spice that holds up the plump fruit. You'll find rum cake, cinnamon bun, Christmas spice and chocolate-covered cherry. It's soft, plush and rich on the finish, with a lingering note of sweetness that drives its cheerful personality.",,La Fortuna
"Austere, tight and sophisticated, this well-extracted Brunello shows dry aromas of crushed granite along with ethereal tones of dried ginger, black licorice and root beer. Inky appearance with chewy richness. The mouthfeel is round, chewy and packed with sweet fruit and spice. Drink after 2015.",,Uccelliera
"This full-bodied wine opens with compelling aromas of black fruit, smoked bacon, leather, cinnamon and crushed clove. There's a sassy, spicy characteristic here that is further underlined by the wine's natural sweetness and roundness.",Vigna Spuntali Val di Suga,Tenimenti Angelini
"The aromas feature beautiful tones of black mineral, licorice, peppercorn and ripe fruit. This is a dark, brooding Brunello with an elegant, dry nose and layers of opulence that build momentum. Overall, it's round, rich and well structured. Drink after 2018.",Riserva,Tenuta Vitanza
"Dense, bold and beautiful, with notes of plush cherry, blackberry, clove, cinnamon, cola and dried rosemary. Polished, with a dusty, silky feel to the long finish.",Le Lucére Riserva,San Filippo di Giannelli
"The vineyard is in the coolest part of the Green Valley of the Russian River Valley. The wine, which is totally dry, is marked by brilliant acidity and long hangtime flavors of oranges, Meyer lemons and kiwi fruit, enriched by barrel fermentation and aging.",Dutton Palms Vineyard Dutton Ranch,Dutton Estate
"A huge difference from last vintage, this is soft, supple, dense and enduring, with loads of fruit intensity and a plush, spicy richness. Black fruit, rum cake, cherry liqueur and smoked bacon on the close. Modern, bold and very bright.",Molino della Suga,Bonacchi
"Inky color, with a broad array of aromas, including earth, candied fruit, plum cake and cinnamon spice. Smooth and luscious in the mouth, where its tight structure shows promising potential for longevity.",Il Mio Brunello Riserva,Il Poggiolo E. Cosimi
"A fresh, crisp wine, designed (as the seafood-laden label graphically shows) to be drunk with shellfish. Blending crisp Sylvaner with a little fattening Pinot Blanc, bone-dry flavors of pink grapefruit, the wine does the job perfectly.",Crustaces,Dopff & Irion
"The question is: How scouring and razor's edge do you like it? If you like it sharp but clean, then this is a winner. It's minerally and green in style, with Granny Smith apple and lime on the palate and finish. Juicy, crisp and bone dry Viura.",Blanco Joven,Covila
"There's a raw, sharp element to this Amarone that comes off aromatically as fresh dill, forest floor, cured meat, bresaola and cooked cherry. The wine closes on a fresh, bitter note.",,Fattoria Garbole
"Dry, spicy and rugged, with a sharp mouthfeel and uneven tannins. Saved by intensely fruity flavors of cherries and blackberries. Calling all hamburgers.",,Chateau Meroux
"Quiet on the bouquet except for a dusting of oak and banana. The palate is heavy and wide, if a bit flabby, and the flavors of melon and mango run sweet, much like fruit punch. Soft and sweet on the finish as well, and overall it's good but generic. Not many Chards in the price range will fare better.",Xplorador,Concha y Toro
"Dusty cherry aromas are slightly spiky and feature some tomato, while the palate is solid, a touch sharp and prickly, but good overall. Snappy raspberry is the one and only flavor, while the finish offers heat and some mild oak. Average to good, and fully drinkable.",Reserva,Echeverria
"On the nose, this charming wine is aromatic, with pretty lemon and orange blossoms mingled with darkly toasted oak and butter notes. Dry and full bodied with a rich, creamy mouthfeel, floral notes and a soft salinity on the finish keep the broad palate from verging toward flabbiness.",Reserve,Barrel Oak
"Ca' Camparsi opens with sweet aromas of mature cherry and raspberry and an easy feel in the mouth. The wine delivers crisp berry flavors and a compact, fine texture.",Ca' Camparsi,Bonazzi Dario e Fabio
"A rustic, rugged and perfectly good red wine, full-bodied enough to drink with robust meat stews. It's tannic and dry and strong in blackberry jam flavors.",Double Decker Red,Tamás Estates
"This wine varies in quality and perception based on when in its lifespan you taste it. Now, toward the end of the line, it's tropical and hanging in there, with green apple, citrus and other typical SB aromas and flavors. Even with 15% Carmenère in the blend for kicks, it's standard and workmanlike.",,oops
"Bruised apple and high-toned apple cider notes on the nose. It's an appley wine with familiar hints of ginger and apple pie spice, but brisk acidity and a supple mouthfeel keeps it from being overtly homespun in style.",Riesling-Vidal Blanc,Veramar
"I Lasi is a thin and informal Ripasso with easy layers of blueberry and cherry backed by light spice and smoke shadings. There's a slightly sour note in the mouth and the wine ends with a lean, crisp close.",I Lasi,Villa Canestrari
"Bright and correct with clean berry flavors, this is a perfect red wine to pair with meat appetizers or pâtè. It delivers a thin, watery feel with loads of crisp berry freshness in the mouth.",La Roverina,Speri
"Citrus and pear notes lead the way in this bargain-priced Chardonnay from Down Under. It's reasonably tight and crisp for a wine in this bracket, carrying hints of well integrated vanilla through the lemony finish. Drink now.",,St. Kilda
"On the lighter side of the Côtes du Rhône spectrum, with a slightly briary note to the cherry fruit. Turns more olivaceous on the silky-textured finish. Drink now.",,Michel Picard
"Dusty and dry on the nose, with raspberry and peppery spice notes that are true to the variety. Relatively solid in the mouth, with peppy red fruit flavors, tea and a tartness suggesting citrus or apple skins. Snappy juice that makes the grade.",Reserva,Morandé
"A boldy flavored, tropical-fruit-laden wine that brings back memories of the late '80s Chards that helped put Australia on America's wine map, for style and price. Amply textured, with mouthwatering peach and mango notes. Drink now.",,Queensgate
"Sweaty and sharp on the nose, with punchy, oily, green aromas. The palate is wet and basic in feel, with nettle, grapefruit and passionfruit flavors. Good in terms of core qualities but not all that intense or layered. A basic wine for general consumption.",Albamar,William Cole
"Peachy up front, with a pithy, dry, diluteness to the nose. The palate is wet but a little bland and innocuous, with nectarine, generic citrus and pith flavors. For a blend of Viura, Viognier and Sauvignon Blanc, it works well enough.",,Volteo
"Although subdued both aromatically and on the palate, this refreshing, dry Gewürztraminer smells sweetly of waxy white florals and lemons with a hint of bruised apples. There's not a lot of concentration of flavor, but its fresh apple and lemon flavors are clean and brisk, ending with a pleasant grapefruit pith finish.",Dry,Wagner
"Imparting distinct notes of cola, root beer, black fruit and teriyaki sauce, this is an easy, informal wine. If offers moderate heft and weight in the mouth that could work with Chinese chicken or white meat.",,Zenato
"This Bordeaux blend is a little rough around the edges. It has a sharp, jammy feeling, and seems too sweet in raspberry- and cherry-pie filling. Will appeal to fans of an easy drinking, accessible style of a Cabernet-based wine.",Mon Amour,Coquelicot
"Hints of freshly pressed apples and pears in a darkly toasted oak barrel come through. Deft use of new French oak results in a full-bodied wine with a lush, buttered toast richness that highlights sweet apple and lemon flavors. The finish is clean and lemony with a slight saline touch.",Barrel Fermented,Barrel Oak
"Zesty on the nose and pulsing with white-fruit aromas, and that opening is backed by a spritzy, lively body that brings lemon-lime and soda-like flavors. Melony and green on the finish, and good overall in a simple, tropical sort of way.",Mesta,Bodegas Fontana
"This Merlot-Cab Franc blend is a lovely mélange of sweet sour cherries and vanilla spice combined with scents of darkly toasted oak and barnyard. On the palate as well, soft, rich, red fruit melds into earthy barnyard and black pepper spice notes, backed by gripping grape tannins. There's a hint of sweet tomato in the mid palate, but otherwise, a strong contender from Virginia.",Estate Reserve Josie's Knoll,Lovingston
"Opens with aromas of burnt leaves and gritty berry fruit. The palate is fleshy and simple, with herbal roasted-berry flavors. Finishes with more herbal flavor and a lightly scratchy feel. Good enough for the money, but a little short in ripeness, character and structure.",Barrel Selection Reserve,Korta
"A modern, popular Chardonnay made with very ripe tropical and pear fruit flavors and a strong oaky influence. Not very subtle, but will satisfy fans of the style.",,Inception
"This friendly Ripasso opens with sweet and slightly overripe aromas of strawberry, spice, honey-roasted nut, cassis syrup, new leather and cola. It's simple and straightforward in the mouth however with a raw, sharp feel.",,La Giaretta
"Tropical on the nose, with lychee fruit and tangerine aromas. The palate is easygoing and fairly thorough, while the flavor profile suggest Argentine Torrontés as it deals lychee, powdered sugar and papaya. Clean, light, quaffable and that's about it.",,Las Valles
"Sweet in honey and caramel flavors, but balanced with crisp acidity, this everyday Chard delivers strong pineapple, lemon meringue pie and peach flavors.",,Little Black Dress
"This riserva is silky, firm and polished, with bright fruit nuances of wild berry, almond skin, cola and lingering menthol overtones. The mouthfeel is bright and crisp, with a very fine, smooth texture. Dusty mineral notes appear on the finish.",Riserva,La Fortuna
"There's a sassy, spicy quality here, with clove and spice, cola, root beer and black licorice. Smooth, dark extraction with bold structure.",Poggio Abate Riserva,La Poderina
"This Brunello opens with an intense, dark garnet color and shows lush softness and ripe blackberry fruit with perfumed notes of blue flower, plum cake and sweet spice. The mouthfeel is characterized by firm structure and yielding tannins.",,Donatella Cinelli Colombini
"A pleasurable, opulent wine with rich tones of cherry and sweet chocolate backed by dense concentration and extraction. Plush, ripe, modern, soft and dense; a real crowd-pleaser. Soft, thick texture with loads of spice, dark fruit and staying power.",,Fattoria Scopone
"This Brunello offers bright aromas with lively cherry, cola, humus, dark spice and pipe tobacco, as well as savory tones of beef bresaola and even a touch of white peppercorn. Impressive complexity. Elegant and streamlined on the close.",,Fornacina
"One sip is all it takes to know this is a terrific Pinot Noir. It's dry, silky and complex, and not only that, it will develop bottle nuance over the next six years. Rich and flamboyant in cherry pie filling, persimmon and mushu-plum sauce flavors, yet layered with earthy, foresty notes of mushrooms, soy sauce and balsam. You can drink it now, but give it an hour or two of decanting.",Cerise Vineyard,Chronicle
"This successful riserva displays opulence and a bold, modern style that focuses on bright cherry and savory spice aromas. The wine is loaded with density and richness, and combines a ripe soft feel with a lively berries on the finish.",Riserva,Collosorbo
"Here's a gorgeous wine with a deep, inky color and super extraction that is elegant but powerful at the same time. This is a balanced wine, but it's also an intense wine, with loads of ripe fruit, spice and tobacco. It feels smooth and rich, with a finely crafted texture that is velvety and supple.",,Verbena
"This beautiful riserva opens with dark concentration and bold berry notes spanning from cassis to blackberry. It's a ripe, extracted wine with savory spice and cured meat aromas that fill in the back. Crushed black pepper and cardamom also make a brief, but lively, appearance.",Riserva,Quattroventi
"You know you're dealing with a great Pinot Noir when it's this delicious right out of the bottle, yet will age. This wine is enormously rich and sweet in cherries, blackberries, blueberries and cola, a wine that almost everyone will find delicious. Yet with thick tannins and brisk acidity, it has the protective structure to evolve over at least six years, and possibly longer.",Four Boys Vineyard,Pessagno
"A terrific Cabernet Sauvignon, dramatically structured in smooth mountain tannins, with lush, complex blackberry, cassis and dark chocolate flavors. Satisfies on every level you could ask of Napa Valley. Good as it is, it will age over a decade.",Estate Reserve,Pestoni Family
"A nice surprise. Great density and richness with layers of dark fruit and spice. Thick concentration and a bold, confident presentation. Plush texture, length and density. Age 5_10 more years.",,Poggiarellino
"Loads of balsam intensity with eucalyptus, ground ginger, cola, dried fruit and crème de cassis. This wine also adds a pretty floral note of red rose petal or potpourri that really steals the show. Loads of balance and complexity. Smooth, long finish, good length. Drink after 2015.",,Poggio il Castellare
"Just wonderful, showing the great richness and complexity of a top Santa Rita Pinot Noir. Partial whole-cluster fermentation gives the wine a spicy earthiness and full-bodied tannins, yet the underlying red berry and cherry fruit shines through. Showing well now and over the next six years.",Kessler-Haak Vineyard,Samsara
"From one of Tuscany's most celebrated wine areas, this luscious wine is soft, beautifully textured and plush. It shows ripe red fruit, plus leather, tobacco, sweet cinnamon and marzipan on the bouquet.",Bramante Riserva,San Lorenzo
"A rich and sophisticated wine, with loads of dark fruit and exotic spice. It's bright ruby-garnet appearance, with bright acidity and a fresh, lively finish.",Riserva,San Polino
"The ripe fruit element is perfectly contained and just short of seeming overdone or jammy. It's soft and round, with loads of oak-driven spice, like cinnamon and ground clove, and plump tones of red cherry, blackberry and plum. What's really nice is the freshness and overall supple texture.",,Máté
"Toasted, tight, even gritty in spots, with firm tannins and bold aromas. The wine shows power and personality, with ripe fruit, spice, leather, tobacco and thick density.",Prime Donne,Donatella Cinelli Colombini
"Bright, textbook, loads of Sangiovese intensity with complexity and tight aromas of wild berry, blueberry, almond, white pepper, spice and rum cake. Tight and streamlined in the mouth. Needs more time to soften with cellar aging.",L'Olivare,Fattoria Scopone
"A beautifully ripe wine, with the new wood just a hint in the background. The wine has rich red plums and black cherries, laced with the most intense acidity. It is a dense, firmly concentrated wine with a long ahead.",Les Damodes Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"More spice than ripe fruit characteristics here. There's a dark, savory note of smoked ham or bacon as well, with back-end notes of cola and root beer. Warm, wintery personality. Streamlined and polished in the mouth.",,Il Paradiso di Frassina
"So softly delicious, it's probably not an ager, but what a terrific wine to drink now and over the next few years. Really luscious, showing modern-style ripe blackberry, black cherry, cassis and mocha flavors that sink deep and last long into the finish. The tannins and overall structure lift it into classy elegance.",Hillside Reserve,Flora Springs
"This is the most expensive Pinot Noir from Gundlach Bundschu in many years, maybe ever, but it's also easily their best. It's absolutely delicious in cherries, pomegranates and spices, with a wonderful earthiness that grounds it. So silky and complex, so rewarding to drink now. Great to see this veteran winery coming out with a wine this fine.",Heritage Selection Estate,Gundlach Bundschu
"This wine kept improving in the glass over a period of hours, and as it did so, the score kept rising. Initial scents of Bourbon barrel gave way to rich blueberry and black cherry fruit, set in a roasted, potent mix of darker flavors. Smoke, coffee liqueur, a whiff of stem, a streak of vanilla, all tightly wound and elevated with scents of citrus peel.",,JM Cellars
"Well etched, defined and crisp, this is a strong, determined wine with loads of power, acidity and firmness. The wine shows all the criteria for a long cellar life, softening slowly as the wine evolves. Age 10_20 more years.",Riserva,Canneta
"A plump and juicy Brunello with bold, fresh fruit and loads of aromatic intensity. Cherry, plum and blackberry are backed by evolved tones of leather, spice and cola. Shows delicate details of wild berry and almond paste on the close. Smooth and velvety.",Riserva,Capanne Ricci
"Stands out for its complexity and length, showcasing cherry liqueur, blackberry preserves, root beer, dried ginger and Spanish cedar. There's an exotic Asian quality to this Brunello that adds interest. Solid, shapely and velvety in the mouth.",,Lisini
"Here's an austere, sophisticated wine, with a pretty garnet color and finely polished aromas of cassis, wild berry, cola, wet river stone, barbecue smoke and bresaola. There's good complexity and integration and this Brunello delivers satisfying freshness and balanced acidity.",,Le Potazzine
"This block selection from the estate vineyard is planted to the old Pommard clone. It's an elegantly dry wine, dense in black and red cherry fruit, with hints of cola, wild herbs and spices. Feels very fine and silky in the mouth, and gets better with airing. Drink now and over the next six years.",Earthquake Block Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"Deep garnet in color, with dark amber highlights. There's loads of intensity here, with ripe, syrupy fruit, blackberry preserves, prune and dark plum. On the savory side, the wine presents an even succession of leather, tobacco and cedar. It's soft, generous and thickly textured on the luscious finish.",La Togata,Tenuta Carlina
"Pineapples, pears and citrus fruits fall over each other in this soft, fruit-driven Chardonnay. It's medium in body, with just enough citrus on the finish to keep it together. A solid effort, especially for the price.",Reserve,Yellow Tail
"A fruity, soft, enjoyable red wine for drinking now. It's medium bodied and lightly oaked, with sour cherry candy and pepper spice flavors.",,Pietra Santa
"Pretty black cherry, char and menthol aromas gently perfume Tarara's Cab Franc. On the palate, soft black fruit flavors are not deeply concentrated, but ripe with firm grape and wood tannins for balance. Bright acidity carries through on a tart, sour cherry finish.",,Tarara
"Cherry cola, vanilla and chocolate perfume this spicy, plush blend of Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon. There's a tinge of green on the pulpy, dark-cherry palate, but the finish ends with a twist of tar, granite and spice notes.",Vintner's Blend,Two Rivers
"Monte Tombole Valpolicella opens with easy cherry and blueberry aromas backed by light nuances of spice and sweet vanilla. The wine is fresh, lean and crisp on the close.",Monte Tombole,Villa Erbice
"Tomato, savory spice and earthy, mildly stewed red-fruit aromas lead to a crisp palate with firm acids and flavors of tomato, raspberry, herbs, vanilla and dried cheese. Lasting but light on the finish. Contains 30% Gracianio, which helps explain the sheer, red-fruit character.",Crianza Made With Organic Grapes,Viña Los Valles
"Hefty and rubbery on the bouquet, with black-fruit aromas and some dustiness. The palate is fresh feeling, with full acidity and a mildly stretched set of lively berry and roasted flavors. Comes up a bit short and hollow on the finish, but good all totaled.",Garnacha-Tempranillo,Ochoa
"This blend of 45% Grenache, 28% Shiraz and 27% Mourvèdre does show a trace of heat in its finish, but is otherwise a pleasant, medium-bodied sipper at a realistic price. Tart, slightly minty cherries feature undercurrents of chocolate and coffee, turning crisp and lemony on the finish. Drink now.",GSM Grenache-Shiraz-Mourvèdre,Oxford Landing
"Opens with burnt, rubbery aromas that eventually cede to asphalt, roasted peanut and leather. The palate is soft and a bit hollow in the middle, with earthy, rubbery flavors of black plum and berry. Finishes with cola, bitter coffee and root beer flavors. Decent and full overall, but rubbery.",Gotín del Risc,Abad
"A soft, gentle Zinfandel, a little sweet, like a raspberry and cherry mocha drink sprinkled with cocoa and cinnamon. Easy to drink with spicy meats, soft cheeses, everyday fare.",,Ancient Peaks
"Basic and aromatic, but not what you'd label complex. This is easygoing Gewürz with a sweet, honeyed set of flavors that offer a modicum of spice. Honeysuckle and spice notes work the finish, and as a whole it's a nice wine for simple occasions.",Estate Selection,Aresti
"The blast of late August and early September heat seems to have victimized this wine. It has a raisiny sharp imbalance, and although it's very dry and silky, does not rise to the level of a great Sonoma Coast Pinot Noir.",Split Rock Vineyard,Cartograph
"Good, but a bit tamped down and dull in character, although it's very dry, and the tannins are nice and smooth. Not much going on flavor-wise except for modest blackberry and spice flavors. Drink now.",White Hawk Vineyard,Damian Rae
"Dry, thin and astringent. At the age of five years plus, the fruit is largely gone, leaving behind bitter cherryskin and tobacco flavors and the heat of alcohol. Still, it's an elegant wine with some complexity.",,Dascomb Cellars
"With its earthy aromas and soft palate, this is a rustic wine, the sort designed for pairing with grilled meat. It has black plum flavors along with spice and bright red fruits. Drink now.",Tâmara,Falua
"Thin, informal and packed tight with crisp wild berry flavors, this bright Valpolicella will slice through fatty or cheesy dishes. In the mouth, it shows an easy, no-fuss approach with a citrus twist on the fade.",Sanperetto,Mazzi
"No doubt, this is a simple and sharp wine from northern Italy but it would make a perfect pairing partner to easy grilled lamb or pork chops. It offers clean aromas of wild berry and almond and the mouthfeel is thin and compact.",,Giuseppe Lonardi
"This light and easy-going Valpolicella Classico opens with a light, lean mouthfeel and clean aromas of cherry and ripe raspberry. It's a perfect wine to serve with appetizers or bruschetta.",,Fratta Pasini
"Although still a respectable effort, this is a weak link in the Buller arsenal of fortifieds, with a minty, slightly medicinal edge to the modest berry fruit and dark, earthy undercurrents. Turns tart and crisp on the finish.",Premium Fine Tawny,R.L. Buller & Son
"A little sharp in acidity, and the white pepper spice adds to the impression of zippiness in this bone-dry Zin. It's deep and likeable in raspberry, cherry, blackberry and sandalwood flavors.",,Tamás Estates
"This ruby-colored Valpolicella is distinguished by hot notes of cherry liqueur and spice backed by subtle tones of wild berry and fresh blueberry. It's an easy, soft wine in the mouth.",,San Cassiano
"Known more for its red wines, Wolf Blass nevertheless makes a creditable Chardonnay for $12. hints of vanilla and toasted almond mark the nose, while the fruit flavors veer toward citrus and stay there, turning lemony on the finish.",Yellow Label,Wolf Blass
"High-toned apple cider notes dominate the nose on this concentrated blend of Riesling, Vidal Blanc and Chardonnay from Virginia's Veramar. Full bodied but dry with a rich viscosity and a brisk, lemony acidity, it's straightforward, but enjoyable for a casual night's fare.",Tres Blanc,Veramar
"Valpolicella is an informal but friendly wine that pairs with a long list of easy foods like pasta and pizza. This expression opens with bright cherry, blueberry and almond aromas.",Monte Tombole,Villa Erbice
"Slightly mulchy at first, with coffee grinds, leafy notes and mildly soupy red-fruit aromas. Airing helps it out, and it evolves into a sweet, herbal wine with baked berry fruit flavors and olive accents. Standard Chilean Cabernet that's a touch syrupy and herbal.",La Palma,Viña La Rosa
"A nice Cab for the price due to the full-bodied richness and ripe fruity flavor. It's big in blackberry jam and spices, with a coating of smoky oak. Easy to find, with 115,000 cases produced.",,McManis
"This is a bottling that has lost or given up considerable quality over the years. It now has a mass-produced, industrial feel. Made in the popular style, it's creamy, sweet and ripe in citrus, tropical fruit and oak flavors, with no particular complexity.",Overlook,Landmark
"For a sweet wine, it's clean, light and airy, with pear and powdered sugar on the nose. The flavors are definitely sweet but the feel isn't particularly sticky, and the finishing flavors of candied fruit, vanilla and honeydew are good. Made from late-harvest Viura and Malvasia.",Satinela Medium Sweet,Marqués de Cáceres
"A typical medium-bodied Côtes du Rhône, the 2007 Bastide de Beauvert features aromas of cherry, clove and sweaty leather, and flavors that run along similar lines. Mature; drink now.",Bastide de Beauvert,Les Vignobles Foncalieu
"Starts with a funky smell that doesn't go away despite lots of airing. Underneath that is a very dry, very tannic and deeply flavored Zinfandel, rich in berries, cola and spices. That barnyardy smell is troubling.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,Perception
"Shows balance and integration and a dark, inky appearance. Blackberry, plum cake, cinnamon bun, leather and tobacco aromas. Chewy, ripe mouthfeel frames plush fruit, while the dusty, structured finish features loads of dried tobacco leaf.",,Terralsole
"Full-bodied and richly textured, with Penfolds' hallmark weight and structure on full display, the 2008 RWT shows a touch of the vintage's characteristic warmth, but only a touch. The cassis and blackberry fruit is plush, velvety and superripe, ending with hints of tobacco, mint and vanilla. It should drink well for at least a decade.",RWT,Penfolds
"Dark, inky and thick, this hearty Brunello begs for grilled steak. It opens with ripe fruit__lackberry, plum and prune__nd has a background rendering of spice, leather and cigar box. It shows a big, bold style, with loads of soft density and opulence. Good structure, too. Drink after 2015.",,PianCornello
"Morgan's Pinot Noirs tend to be dark, full-bodied and dense. They're not for fans of a more delicate interpretation, but winemaker Dan Lee is a master of the big California style. This '09, from one of the most famous vineyards in the Highlands, certainly has heft, packed as it is with cherries, plums, dark chocolate and exotic spices. It's very dry, and will pair well with rich dishes such as lamb and steak.",Garys' Vineyard,Morgan
"A beautiful Cabernet, dry and rich, with wonderful tannins. They're firm, yet soft and sweet, an apparent contradiction the palate loves. Shows near perfect ripeness, an impressive range of blackberries, plums and cassis, and an earthy herbaceousness. May be a little too young for proper enjoyment, so give it a few years in the cellar.",Pestoni Family Estate,Rutherford Grove
"There's a barnyardy funkiness to this Pinot Noir that is frankly fascinating. Call it Burgundian, but it's emphatically Californian in the richness of raspberries and cherries, with their jammy sweet finish. Earthy tannins and brisk acidity guarantee that this wine will age well through 2016.",Melville Vineyard,Samsara
"Pretty ensemble of bright fruit, spice and cured meat, with ample concentration. Plump and round in the mouth, with loads of aromatic intensity. The mouthfeel is tight and chiseled.",Altero,Poggio Antico
"A perennial favorite, Wakefield's St. Andrews bottling shows how good certain parts of Clare can be for Cabernet Sauvignon. The 2006 displays a masterful blend of cedar, chocolate, mocha, cassis, baking spices and leather, all wrapped in an elegant coat of dusty but supple tannins. Drink 2015_2025.",St. Andrews,Wakefield Estate
"While the wine does have richness, it's the mineral and citrus side that is coming through at this stage. The balance with the wood aging is so right that you feel the toast rather than tasting it. As it matures, the wine will deepen in intensity and power, certainly over the next 5_10 years.",Sous le Dos d'Ane Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"A deliciously fruity wine, its bright apricot, pineapple and peach flavors open and generous. Of course, there is a more serious core of structure, lemon zest and dryness to promise aging. At the end, though, fruit and a light toastiness give immediate pleasure.",Clavoillon Premier Cru,Domaine Leflaive
"Holds back just a bit initially, but then evolves slowly and steadily. Delivers a very firm, polished and linear feel in the mouth. Dusty aromas of crushed stone and crushed white pepper are backed by cola, cassis and red currant. An elegant and sophisticated Brunello.",Gualto Riserva,Camigliano
"This fine and delicate Brunello shows soft elegance and sophistication in the form of cassis, wild berry, white pepper, root beer, toasted nut and cigar tobacco. The mouthfeel is firm and clean, with elements of tannic structure and fresh acidity that work well together. The oak element still needs time to integrate.",,Fanti
"Sweet spice and dark fruit aromas offer all the telltale signs of a top-notch riserva. The wine is bright with etched acidity and strong tannins. Let it age 10 years or more. Defined, compact mouthfeel.",Riserva,Fuligni
"A new entry in the Dusted Valley lineup, this offering is co-fermented with Viognier and includes a small amount of Petite Sirah as well. It shows real depth and power, a concentrated explosion of boysenberry and black cherry fruit, annotated with clove and anise. A delicious underpinning of mineral and graphite anchor the lengthy finish.",Rachis,Dusted Valley
"Full-bodied and lush in style, with aromas of cherries and spice. On the palate, it delivers waves of fresh fruit and hints of cocoa, but also enough complexity to hold your interest before finishing on a long, mouthwatering note. Drink now_2016.",Romas,Clarendon Hills
"Youthful, bright and direct in its bold cherry and blueberry aromas. Vinous, chewy and raw with more evolution ahead. Chewy density with bold concentration and ripe fruit. Give it 4_6 more years.",Campo del Drago,Castiglion del Bosco
"Richness defines this ripe Syrah. It dazzles with blackberry and cherry jam, dark chocolate and exotic spice flavors, while firm tannins provide supportive structure. Oak adds additional tannins and a smoky, toasty coat. Drink now and through 2015.",Thompson Vineyard,Blair Fox
"A lovely riserva, with bold, opulent notes of cherry and plum. Leather, tobacco, rum cake, cola and dried sage add complexity.",Riserva,Caprili
"Pure strawberry and red cherry fruits with a twist of acidity make this a wine that is already delicious. Just under the surface is a firm wood-and-tannin character and a dense, if juicy, structure. Age for 4_5 years.",Beaune Bressandes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Opulent and floral, with pressed rose and blue violets. Soapy aromas with church incense and cinnamon potpourri. Very enduring and intense with tight, firm tannins and good length.",I Poggiarelli,La Mannella
"Merry Edwards doesn't just slap this regional blend together. This is a combination of her best vineyards. It's a wonderful wine, dry, balanced and deep in berry, spice, cola and earthy flavors. In many ways, it's the consummate Russian River Valley Pinot Noir. Drink now_2015.",,Merry Edwards
"Sharply defined aromas of spice, chiseled mineral, dried tobacco and cassis open the bouquet of this dark, concentrated wine. There's a floral note of spicy potpourri and cinnamon stick, tight tannins and bright acidity.",Riserva,Poggio Antico
"What a wine. It tries to intimidate. At first, by its bottle size and alcohol level, but in the glass this 100% Garnacha is like a purring kitten__ell a purring 20-pound Maine Coon cat, joyous in its pretty red fruit, and its earthy, meaty, vanilla and cinnamon toast range of goodness. All lush, Twisted Oak's Torcido is, like a retro soap opera, brave and beautiful.",Torcido,Twisted Oak
"Pressed rose, slightly dusty mineral shadings, spice and black fruit make up the bouquet of this elegant, harmonious wine. This expression is astringent and firm, with bright acidity and a solid tannic backbone. Let it soften with more cellar aging.",Riserva,Terralsole
"Bill Easton doesn't make this dessert wine every year, so when he does, especially of this caliber, it's a good time to pick up some of this deliciously balanced dessert delight. It's a very nuanced rendering of crisp, clean peach, pear and honey flavors that would go well with fruit desserts or anything involving almond paste.",Muscat a Petits Grains Vin Doux Naturel,Terre Rouge
"Shows sweet blackberry or cherry liqueur aromas, followed by spice, leather and moist pipe tobacco. Coffee or dark espresso, too. Well structured, firm and extracted, with good intensity and staying power. Drink after 2018.",,Palazzo
"Here's a big, thick, tannic, ripe wine, impressive for its sheer power and fruit. In other words, it's classic Petite Sirah. The flavors are just wild, suggesting blackberries, plums, bacon, orange tea and exotic spices. Absolutely delicious, with classic Napa balance. Shows why Petite Sirah has such momentum. Will age easily for at least a decade.",Spring Creek Vineyard,Rutherford Grove
"Rich, extracted and dramatic, dazzling in blackberry, currant, anise and smoky aromas and flavors. It's a big, tannic, flamboyant young wine, just at the start of its journey. Will hold well through 2015 and possibly beyond.",Melville Vineyard,Samsara
"The winery has been producing more and more low-production block bottlings from their estate vineyard. This one is entirely from the Dijon clone 115. It's soft, sweet and utterly captivating, a feminine wine of enormous charm, with raspberry, cola and pomegranate flavors, enhanced, of course, by smoky new oak. The acidity is fine, and will protect the wine as it develops over the next six years.",Stony Block Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"It's unbelievable that this Chardonnay is unoaked, it's so incredibly rich and creamy. Just packed with layers of tropical fruits, peaches, Asian pears and oatmeal cookies. All that butter and cream must be from the malolactic fermentation and aging on the lees. One of the best unoaked Chardonnays ever.",Acero Don Miguel Vineyard Unoaked,Marimar Estate
"Lean and crisp in style, this is citrusy through and through. Although a bit one-dimensional, it's clean and refreshing, with a pleasantly affordable price tag.",,Peter Lehmann
"Attractive, crisp, raspberry-flavored wine with a touch of structure and vivid acidity. This is a great food rosé, for salads or fish.",Touriga Nacional,Quinta de Santa Maria
"An attractive, fruity, unoaked wine. It reveals red berry fruits, light acidity and a fine, firm tannic concentration. To drink now.",Colheita,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"This light and easy Ripasso gears up aromatically over time thanks to its aromas of spice and mature fruit. There's a raw, slightly bitter note on the end but the wine makes a natural partner to roast pork or beef.",,Ca' Rugate
"Here's an easy, bright and lively Valpolicella that would make a great companion to bean soup with heaps of grated Parmigiano cheese on top. It's a crisp, fresh wine with an informal but inviting personality.",,CampoReale
"Slightly minty and grassy on the nose, and that mild green character persists. The palate is a bit clacky and acidic, yet the flavors evolve and ultimately rest at candied and medicinal. A touch biting but it tastes pretty good and it's decidedly not sour. A blend of 55% Monastrell with 25% Cabernet Savuignon and 20% Syrah.",,Caracol Serrano
"This is a relatively lightweight Costières de Nîmes, despite being 100% Syrah. Modest cherry and black pepper notes are pretty enough, just lack intensity and fade a bit quickly on the finish.",,Château de la Tuilerie
"A rooty style of warm-climate Pinot with sarsparilla, tomato leaf, beet and black cherry on what is a hot, slightly fiery nose. The palate is juicy, with cola, sweet cherry, herb and stemmy flavors, while the finish is snappy, with an aftertaste of caramel and berry liqueur. From vines planted in 1968.",Visión Block: 68 Old Vine Single Vineyard,Cono Sur
"A simple, quaffable Gigondas, with bright cherry fruit on the nose and on the palate, modest tannins and an easygoing personality. Drink it over the next few years.",,Domaine des Florets
"Sharp in acidity and a little green, but pleasant enough in blackberry and cherry flavors, with a hit of sweet oak. Finishes totally dry and brisk. Drink now.",,Dascomb Cellars
"Amply displays the charms and shortocmings of the 2008 vintage: complex if slightly herbal cherry fruit, medium body and great freshness. Drink now_2013.",Samorëns,Ferraton Pere et Fils
"Fresh, dry and juicy in acids, showing peppery flavors of berry and cherry jam. A good value in a pleasant, everyday red wine.",,Fetzer
"Heady white florals and tropical fruit perfume this charming Gewürztraminer. Full bodied and luscious with lots of fresh, white grapefruit juice and a mild, limeade acidity, the midpalate might feel a bit sluggish, but a pleasant grapefruit pith and white tea astringency kicks in on the finish.",,Fox Run
"Mildy green tobacco aromas lead the way along with forest floor, fern notes and standard berry aromas. The palate opens with forceful acidity, while the flavors are a bit underdeveloped as they lean toward blackberry. Mild bitterness is also part of the picture as the wine flattens out on the back side.",Dama de Toro,Bodegas Fariña
"Another good value from Bogle. This Chardonnay is creamy and sweet in pineapples, pears and buttered toast, but has zesty acidity. Production was 250,000 cases.",,Bogle
"Earthy and rubbery on the nose, and rather dark for a $10 Rioja. The palate is jammy and solid, with berry flavors, a hint of toast and heat. The finish is somewhat burning, but overall it's a legit blend of Tempranillo and Garnacha that fits the __alue_ mold.",Solnia,Ilurce
"Soft and tannic, with jammy flavors of blackberries, cherries, dark chocolate and spices. Not showing much structure, and not going anywhere, so drink up.",,Valley Legend
"Heavy, soft and dense, like melted black cherry and raspberry marmalade, sprinkled with cinnamon, brown sugar and nutmeg. Rich, but lacks vitality. Drink now.",Laetitia Vineyard,Verve
"Villalta's Ripasso opens with simple aromas of spice, dried fruit and forest berry. Although the intensity and overall staying power is very nice, the wine definitely represents the less formal side of the Ripasso spectrum.",,Villalta
"Nanfrè is an easy-going Valpolicella blend of 70% Corvina and 30% Rondinella grapes that offers fresh berry tones of raspberry and blueberry backed by a touch of almond paste and white chocolate. It's thin, compact and very refreshing on the close: Pair it with ravioli stuffed with ricotta and spinach.",Nanfrè,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"On the nose, this is a bit unique, offering unusual scents of pineapple, baked apple and white florals. Just slightly off-dry with loads of sweet, fresh apple flavors and a brisk, lemony acidity, the finish ends on an elegant jasmine tea note.",Semi Dry,Wagner
"Soft and forward, with jammy flavors of cherries, berries and herbs. Tastes a bit overripe toward the finish, with some raisins. Drink now.",,Beringer
"Here's an easy, fresh Valpolicella that opens with cherry, raspberry, dried herbs and a touch of sweet dill. The mouthfeel is clean and lean: You could envisage a successful pairing with chicken, pasta or veal.",Campo Lavei,Ca' Rugate
"A soft and open wine, with a charm and delicacy; green fruits lie over bright acidity. It is a lively, bright, uncomplicated,  easy-sipping wine.",,Dopff & Irion
"An attractively balanced wine, its flavors of wild strawberry and white peach giving some richness, while the crisp acidity tightens its texture. Attractive and fruity ; would work well as an apéritif or with food.",Rosé,Dopff & Irion
"Rounded and soft, this is immediately attractive and ready to drink. It has pear-fruit flavors, with a hint of spice and light acidity. Treat this as an apéritif wine. Screw cap.",Réserve Pinot Blanc,Gustave Lorentz
"This blend of Zinfandel, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon is soft and slightly sweet, like a dessert. Tastes like a melted mélange of blackberry and cherry jam, milk chocolate granola and dusty spices. Drink now.",,Fiesta del Pomar Junction
"A simple and snappy style of Rioja with just enough weight and ripeness along with light berry aromas. The palate is perky and fresh, with young, medicinal, semisharp flavors of cherry and plum. More than competent, with verve and acidic scour.",Ursa Maior,Bodegas Ondarre
"Very soft, perfumed with bright red cherry fruits, this is a lively rosé, light and bright, lilting on the mouth, finishing with mineral acidity. Screw cap.",Cape Roca Fisherman,Casca Wines
"Comes across like a straightforward warm-climate Viognier, meaning it's full and waxy, with peach and nectarine aromas and flavors, a touch of searing heat, and pithiness to the back palate and finish. It's also juicy and zesty due to plenty of acids.",,Cono Sur
"A lovely, lush wine with bold, direct aromas of ripe cherry, cured meat, blackberry preserves and exotic spice. It presents a clean and fresh mouthfeel, with solid structure on the long finish.",Casalino,Bonacchi
"A Brunello with broad shoulders and a powerful bouquet that delivers bright, bold aromas of ripe fruit, dark spice, leather and dried tobacco. The wine's structure and dark fruit flavors move evenly over the palate with smoothness and harmony.",,Fattoi
"Delicate embroidered with sage, eucalyptus, cola, wild berry, white cherry, rum cake and savory spice, this wine shows the kind of pretty berry aromas that are brighter than they are intense. In fact, the wine shows elegant restraint with the potential for a beautiful evolution in the bottle.",Vigna del Fiore,Fattoria dei Barbi
"A vineyard-designated Brunello with sharp clarity and purity. Sangiovese aromas of wild berry, earth, pressed blue flower and forest floor. Lively and direct on the palate, with integrated acidity and firm structure.",Vigna Manapetra,Fattoria La Lecciaia
"The 2007 vintage was generally a great one for Bordeaux-style reds in Stellenbosch, and the Els Signature definitely demonstrates it. Sure, it's ripe and sexy with a lot of sweet oak characteristics like cocoa powder and smoky wood, but it's got the ripe fruit core of black plum and dark forest berries to back it up. Spicy layers of leather, cigar box and black tea leaves add complexity to the palate, while chewy tannins provide a firm structure. A bit young now, so try after 2015.",Signature,Ernie Els
"A bold, plush pleasure bomb with thick layers of bright cherry and chocolate. Loads of tobacco, spice and new leather. Huge intensity and bold aromas. Fresh oak notes of vanilla and cinnamon show first signs of integration. A bold, modern Brunello with some tannic astringency.",,Il Valentiano
"Shows a pretty, polished nose with dusty mineral notes backed by elegant tones of dried berry, spice and leather. Nice complexity and balance. Loads of tobacco-like sensations on the close.",Riserva,Lisini
"Inky, ripe, nicely extracted and loaded tight with blackberry, spice and cherry aromas, this is a beautiful Brunello that delivers intensity, staying power and promises easy food-pairing potential. Velvety, soft, rich and plush in the mouth.",Vigna Loreto,Mastrojanni
"This riserva is loaded with fruit. It's a dark, inky wine that oozes black cherry, exotic spice, leather and moist pipe tobacco. After the tightness and firmness of the mouthfeel, the wine offers a playful endnote of blackberry jam.",Vigna delle Raunate Riserva,Mocali
"Opens with dark concentration and syrupy aromas of cherry liqueur, blackberry preserves and cassis concentrate. The wine is soft, plump and chewy, with a smooth, thick quality to its texture that makes it a natural pairing partner to red meat.",,La Poderina
"Pretty savory tones and barbecue aromas combine to create a bold Brunello. Ripe fruit, black pepper, rum cake, black currant and blackberry preserves all appear in the background. Silky-smooth and firm, it shows a clean, sharp, bold close.",,Fossacolle
"Juicy red fruits are the veneer on a wine that is structured and complex, full of tight tannins, intense acidity and the promise of a long-term future. The dry center of the wine holds the exuberant fruit flavors together, while the aftertaste is all freshness.",Corton les Renardes Grand Cru,Pierre André
"From an especially cool vintage that favored acidity and citrus, this Poet's Leap is a pretty wine, vibrant and full across the palate, with a mix of apple and peach flavors. Clean and balanced, it adds nuances of tea and finally a hint of honey in the extended finish.",,Poet's Leap
"Absolutely delicious, an addictive dessert wine. Brisk in acidity and clean in the mouth, it offers fabulously sweet flavors of oranges, vanilla, honey and buttered toast. Drink it with cheesecake and go to heaven.",Essensia,Quady
"What a pretty, polished Pinot for drinking now. It shows its pedigree in the silky mouthfeel, brisk acidity and powerful flavors of persimmons, red plums, cola and dusty exotic spices. You can taste the briny minerals of this cool coastal appellation, making it a real wine of terroir.",Fiddlestix Vineyard,Summerland
"Ripe and complex, offering a wealth of cranberry, cherry, cola and pomegranate fruit flavors, spiced with clove and cinnamon. Silky and tart now, with some furry tannins. Just lovely, but should develop over the next 6_8 years.",Rancho La Vina Vineyard,Samsara
"Luscious dark fruit and huge aromatic complexity: dark red cherry, crème de cassis, black licorice, dried ginger and ground pepper. Defined and tight in the mouth, with a long finish.",,San Polino
"Features sweet fruit, plum, prune and a savory element of spice and smoke; loads of leather and tobacco as well. Deep rich, concentration and a plush, velvety feel. Oak tones must still integrate, but promise a nice future.",Ugolforte,Tenuta San Giorgio
"Thick and dark, with generous fruit, spice, leather and tobacco. This is a wine that does not hold back from an aromatic point of view. Mouthfeel is tight, firm and ends with polished tannins.",Tradizione,Tenuta Vitanza
"Linear, focused and bright, with rich, fleshy fruit in the form of cherry, blackberry and spiced plum cake. This is a fleshy pretty wine with an elegant mouthfeel.",Riserva,Molino di Sant'Antimo
"Ripeness marks this Pinot. It floods the mouth with jammy raspberries and cherries, brightened with acidity. Seems a bit straightforward by virtue of sheer dazzle, but it is a superb example of the Santa Rita Hills, at a good price.",Verna's Estate,Melville
"Shows the lush richness, dryness and complexity you want in a fine Napa Valley Cabernet. At more than six years of age, the tannins are just beginning to resolve, although they're still pretty fierce. But the flavors are beautiful, showing classic blackberries, cassis, dark chocolate, plums and cedar. Drink now_2015.",Miriam Reserve,Mario Perelli-Minetti
"Symmetry is Rodney Strong's most important red wine, the one they pull out all the stops on. It's usually a hit, and so is this 2008, which is a blend of all five Bordeaux red varieties, but primarily on Cabernet Sauvignon. It's extraordinarily rich in blackberries, plums, blueberries and cassis, with a surprising meatiness, like beef tartare. The mouthfeel is very soft, suggesting that this wine's best days are now.",Symmetry Red,Rodney Strong
"This wine offers loads of coffee and soft intensity, with ripe fruit, blackberry, rum cake and exotic spice. That extra roundness works well with this wine's high acidity and tannic structure.",Pinone Riserva,Pinino
"Loads of lush cinnamon, spice, dark fruit and overall intensity. Supple and velvety with cherry, raspberry, vanilla and espresso bean.",,Quattroventi
"Black cherry and coffee notes come to the fore and are followed by softer layers of spice, clove and cardamom. Pressed roses too. Firm and linear in the mouth with a tight tannic bite on the close. Drink after 2018.",Villa al Cortile Riserva,Piccini
"Opulent tones of toasted espresso bean and soft chocolate fudge play a supporting role to bold berry and dried raspberry. Background floral tones of dried lavender and red rose. There's a touch of earthiness, too, with button mushroom and forest floor. Tannins are nicely polished and firm. Streamlined, elegant.",,Canalicchio di Sopra
"Big, bold and dark in style. Loads of exotic spice, soy sauce, Teriyaki, cured meat, ripe fruit and savory peppercorn. The mouthfeel is thick and soft. Definitely for those who like bold personality in their Tuscan red.",Vigna Poggio Ronconi,Citille di Sopra
"Opens with a dry, dusty firmness that comes through both on the nose and in the mouth. This is fresh and tightly woven with very fine aromas of cassis, spice, crushed stone and milled white pepper. Very firm and tight; age 10 years.",Riserva,Fattoria La Lecciaia
"Pure Cabernet Sauvignon, deep and sappy, with the dark, licorice and coffee-infused complexity of Walla Walla's best bottles. Sharp and young, with a potent, liquorous finish, this explosive bottle of cassis-driven fruit should cellar well for a decade or more.",V.R. Special,Dusted Valley
"A controlled and clean white wine with apple and tropical fruit aromas and flavors. The palate feel is dry, snappy and zesty because the acidity is fresh and blazing. Not complex or complicated; hits you with green apple and citrus. A blend of 50% Viognier with 35% Chardonnay and 15% Sauvignon Blanc. Imported by Ecovalley Quality Wine Group and National Refrescos Import Company, LLC.",VCS,Tamaya
"Apples and pears dominate the nose and palate of this blend of Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc and Pinot Gris. Full bodied and fermented in stainless steel, this slightly off-dry wine is rich in texture, but stays fresh with a vibrant lemon-lime acidity.",Charval White Table Wine,Tarara
"This cheerful, screw cap Valpolicella offers crisp raspberry and cherry flavors over a lean, compact body. It's a lightweight, easy-going wine that would pair with soups or sandwiches.",La Roverina,Speri
"Medicinal, sweet and short on complexity for a wine of this price. The palate has a choppy, rough feel and then comes an onslaught of medicinal berry flavor that leads to a tight, biting finish that's big on acid and low on depth of flavor and intracacies you might expect for $80. More of a novelty wine; 160 cases made.",Valdemuz,Pricum
Alicante Bouschet gives a definite farmyard character to this wine. It also offers juicy berry fruits and balanced acidity. The two characteristics put the wine firmly on a food friendly side.,Tinto da Talha Grande Escolha,Roquevale
"A soft, simple but pretty wine, with slightly sweet, pie-filling cherry, raspberry, Dr. Pepper cola and baking spice flavors. Drink now.",Liar's Dice,Murphy-Goode
"The wine__erhaps named in honor of Homer Simpson (Doh!)__s soft, light and freshly fruity. It has an attractive final core of tannin and acidity.",D'_,Adega Cooperativa da Batalha
"This is an elegant wine, with concentration of black currants and juicy sweetness. The downside is the pronounced barnyard character. If you like that, or even can live with it, then this is a great value.",Tinto Real,Julian Reynolds
"Neutral on the nose to the point of dull and mute. The palate is more wet than complex, and the flavors of apple, candy and toffee are basic at best. For a half-bottle priced at $25, this is underwhelming and far too simple in all facets.",Hacienda Araucano Kochii Late Harvest,François Lurton
"On the nose, high-toned pineapple and tropical fruit dominate Casa Larga's Gewürz. The palate is refreshing but simple with lots of apple juice flavors laced with a hint of wax and jasmine blossoms.",,Casa Larga
"Lovingston's medium-bodied Bordeaux Blend is pleasantly grapy on the nose with an undertone of darkly toasted oak, nuts and savory spices. The palate holds a decent amount of black fruit, but with a green, underripe vein and fairly high level of acidity and tannins.",Rotunda Red,Lovingston
"The mocha, toasted oak and sugared violet scents are lovely. There's a fairly good core of black fruit and creamy mocha on the palate as well, but green leaves and tomato peek through the midpalate, accompanied by some gripping grape tannins. The finish is marked by tart sour cherry and some floral notes.",Long-Bomb Edition Two,Tarara
"A tad cloying on the nose with pungent orange-flavored tea, bruised apple and billowing florals, this bright lemon yellow Viognier is broad and full bodied with lots of fresh orange and lemon peel notes and a hint of spice.",,North Gate
"Brambly red-fruit aromas of currants and pie cherry are on the sharp side, while the palate is clacky and tannic, with crisp red-plum, herb and wayward oak flavors. Finishes full and rugged, with toasty heat and an herbal aftertaste. Not a bad wine but it's fairly typical for Chilean Merlot.",Queulat Gran Reserva,Ventisquero
"A little harsh and irregular in tannins, with strong, ripe flavors of cherry and raspberry jam that finish sweet. It's a rustic wine for drinking with easy fare.",Estate,Pietra Santa
"Bright red fruits achieve a decent amount of ripeness, but unfortunately, there's not a lot of concentration. The spice-laced finish is long, aided by soft tannins and notes of leather, tobacco and earth.",Category 5 Red Wine,RayLen
"Fairly candied and sweet at first, with marshmallow and vanilla extract as the lead aromas. The palate is very tannic, with excess weight and chunkiness but only basic flavors of generic black fruits, herbs and olive. Tannic as nails on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Viña Tarapacá
Campo Morar is a sophisticated and rich Valpolicella that sees 18 months of oak aging for extra intensity and density. The wood tones add softness and lingering aromas of vanilla and spice but don't completely eliminate a sour note on the close.,Campo Morar,Viviani
"Easy, fresh and bright, this lean Valpolicella opens with aromas of sour cherry and forest berry. You could pair this no-fuss wine with sliced ham and cheese or bruschetta with wild mushrooms.",,Domìni Veneti
"A blend of Syrah and Touriga Nacional , this has a vivid pink color, and a soft, aromatic character. It is ripe and crisp, packed with strawberry juice fruit.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Seleccionada,Falua
"Pretty standard Merlot. It's dry and tannic, with blackberry, earth and cedar flavors. There are some unripe notes that approach asparagus. Drink now.",,Clos Pegase
"Smoky aromas on a wine that is curiously lacking in flavor. It is soft, light, missing acidity, just hinting at pear fruits. Boring could be a word.",Monte Cascas Reserva,Casca Wines
"Yalumba's 2008 Y Series Shiraz-Viognier is a very quaffable, light- to medium-bodied effort, with only a faint dusting of silky tannins. Flavors of cherry, mint and a hint of cracked pepper finish clean and fresh. Drink now.",Y Series,Yalumba
"Here's a simple, relatively complex Valpolicella that opens with berry tones, spice and a touch of bitter almond. The wine is crisp and compact in the mouth, making it a good companion to fried finger foods.",,Pietro Zardini
"Less successful than some previous bottlings under this label, the 2008 seems earthier and less fruit-forward, with coffee and tree bark notes dominating this medium-bodied wine. The blend is 55% Grenache, 30% Syrah and 15% Mourvèdre.",Côté Jardin,Vignobles Boudinaud
"A light and cheerful Valpolicella that offers easy aromas of wild berry and raspberry followed by a crisp, thin mouthfeel. Pair this wine with sweet and sour pork or other spicy meat dishes.",Figari,Villa Spinosa
"Soft and simple. The berry and cherry fruit has a vegetal tug of asparagus, and the absence of structure makes the wine taste sweet. Drink now. Tasted 3 times.",Reserve,Waterstone
"This fresh 70-30 blend of Corvina and Rondinella benefits from oak aging that helps showcase the wine's spice and smoke aromas. At its core, however, this ruby-colored wine offers tonic flavors of sour cherry and raspberry.",Campo Morar,Viviani
"Loved the 2008 but at this point in time I can't say the same about this bottling. It's vegetal, with heavy bell pepper and asparagus aromas and flavors. Low-volume zest and kick indicates that it has turned; best to wait for the 2010 because this is too green and flat.",Centauri,O. Fournier
"This négociant wine, made at a large custom crush facility in Mattawa, Washington, shows traces of the crisp fruit and lively flair of more substantial efforts. But it feels a little faded, and falls a little flat. Not bad, just vin ordinaire.",,Pacific Flyway
"Pretty textbook Brunello with smooth bright berry nuances packed in a traditional, tight body. Good acidity and firmness with well structured, silky tannin.",Le Chiuse,Gianni Brunelli
"Pleasurable and modern, with a dense opulence that makes a wine like this attractive on so many levels. It delivers deep layers of ripe fruit, blackberry, vanilla bean, espresso and black pepper.",Beato Riserva,Il Poggiolo E. Cosimi
"Winemaker Hank Beckmeyer goes where his vinous muses take him and this new wine of his is a perfect example of his __hy not_ attitude. It contains 56% Nebbiolo from the Sumu Kaw Vineyard as well as 30% Syrah from the same, 9% Mourvèdre, 2.5% Viognier and 2.5% Roussanne. It's jam-packed in a lilting way with fresh, bright strawberry and intense aromas of perfume and freshly picked herbs.",Piedi Grandi,La Clarine Farm
"Tight, linear and compact. Clean, crisp and precise. Small berry aromas of cassis, wild berry and cherry are framed by firm, dusty tannins and a touch of toasted oak.",Riserva,La Mannella
"This well extracted wine is loaded with ripe fruit, cassis, tobacco, leather and chocolate-covered cherry. The wine is still young and astringent, so let those tannins soften over the next 5_10 years.",,Tenuta Vitanza
"A wine that speaks of territory and tradition, it's clean, polished and pristine, with a nice balance between fruit and spice. Thick tannins need more time to age and soften",,Siro Pacenti
"In youth, this Pinot Noir is brisk and appealing for its array of raspberry, cherry and cola fruit. Delicious as it is, it really needs time in the cellar to let the parts, including hefty tannins, resolve and come together. Best after 2015.",Turner Vineyard,Samsara
"Dark, brooding, thick, masculine, this wine shows loads of big Brunello personality. It offers thick concentration, a velvety and plush mouthfeel, followed by dark flavors of blackberry, prune, spice, leather, cedar and pipe tobacco.",Campogiovanni Il Quercione Riserva,San Felice
"A distinguished Cabernet, rich in fruit and impeccably oaked. But it's young. There's a fresh, jammy taste to the blackberries, cassis and dark chocolate, and the tannins are brisk and fuzzy. Don't drink it until at least 2015, and it should develop for years afterward.",Reserve,Bennett Lane
"An elegant showcase for the Boushey fruit, this new JM Cellars release displays refined raspberry fruit, coated in silky cocoa and almond butter. Firmly acidic, sleek and racy, it gains complexity and texture through a lingering, tobacco-laden finish.",Boushey Vineyard,JM Cellars
"Sophisticated, with tertiary aromas of crushed mineral, asphalt, cola, dried mint, wild berry and cassis. On the palate, it's tight, compact and linear, with a long, polished finish.",Riserva,Lazzeretti
"This beautiful Brunello opens with lavish tones of dark fruit, exotic spice, espresso bean and crushed black pepper. The mouthfeel is interesting because it starts off bold and rich, but ends with the focused or chiseled sharpness that is typical of Sangiovese Grosso.",Riserva,Le Chiuse
"Richer and more grapey than the Valdorramiro 2008, but also friendlier, deeper and more complete. Aromas of blackberry, vanilla and sweet spices lead to a structured, weighty palate full of spicy, oak-driven berry and plum flavors. Clove notes and length define the finish. Drink from 2014_2019",Malleolus de Sanchomartin,Emilio Moro
"This riserva opens with a textured, granular mouthfeel that is packed tight with leather, tobacco, dried berry and cola flavors. The close is fresh and menthol-driven.",Vigna Manapetra Riserva,Fattoria La Lecciaia
"Textbook Brunello nose from a warm vintage. It grabs from a wide array of elements at its disposal, with balsam, cola and humus, backed by ripe fruit and dark cherry. More layers appear as leather, earth and cured meat. Great complexity and balance. Closes elegant, fresh and clean.",,Capanne Ricci
"Tradizione is a soft and luscious Brunello with inky dark concentration and intense aromas of dark fruit, rum cake and currant. The wine is smooth and supple, with a finish that can be counted in minutes.",Tradizione,Tenuta Vitanza
"There's an exotic, almost Indian personality, with aromas of dark spice, clove and cardamom. Black fruit, prune and currant are also in evidence. Bold, black and inky thick. It's soft, round and long on the close with pretty freshness, too.",,Poggio Nardone
"Loads of balsam intensity and an array of dried herb, red fruit, wild berry, cedar wood and forest floor aromas. It's very full and generous in the mouth, with firm, but polished tannin.",Le Lucére,San Filippo di Giannelli
"This Chardonnay was blended from several vineyards in Dutton's extensive portfolio. It's not only a great example of the art of blending, it's a fine wine in itself, showing brisk acidity and dryness, with rich, complex orange, Meyer lemon, kiwi fruit, honeysuckle and buttered toast flavors.",Kyndall's Reserve,Dutton Estate
"Smoke and dark fruit, with a touch of drying mineral and softer background tones of chocolate and rum cake. There's a very polished, dry feel to this wine. The oak notes are still integrating, and the finish is tight and firm.",,Castiglion del Bosco
"Cedarville's ode to Priorat, this is a mix of 45% Grenache, 30% Syrah and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon. The three get along swimmingly, amusingly mixing into a triad of dark blackberry, dark licorice and dark chocolate. The rich texture is on the mark, and the wine provides just the right heft for any spicy, brawny meal.",Turnabout's,Cedarville Vineyard
"Opens with a sweet opulent nose driven by aromas of plump cherry, moist pipe tobacco, chocolate fudge, vanilla bean and ground espresso. But the wine is not modern or overtly international in terms of its style. It shows deep roots in Montalcino tradition and a bold, overt personality. Earth, leather and dried tobacco drive the finish.",,Cordella
"Depending on the vintage, any of Clarendon Hills' Grenaches can excel. In 2008, Kangarilla offers a lovely texture somewhere between fine silt and silk. Brandied cherries give an impression of warmth, balanced by herbal nuances and reined in by that fine-grained texture. Drink now_2015.",Kangarilla,Clarendon Hills
"This wine features thick, luscious tones and bright notes of forest fruit and underbrush. There's a tight, bold quality to the tannins that suggests this wine needs more time to age. Give it 10 more years, as its very dense and masculine in the mouth.",,Collemattoni
"An attractive, rich style of Brunello with loads of aromatic intensity. There's cherry liqueur, rum cake, cola, toasted almond, savory spice, cured meat and tobacco. A pure, clean, long, silky close displays good structure and acidity. Drink after 2016.",,Conti Costanti
"Dense, lush and bold, this wine shows red cherry, blackberry, rum cake, cinnamon spice and dark chocolate. The wine's concentration is particularly attractive and adds momentum to the already long finish. Easy, soft and almost ready to drink now.",Bramante Cosimi,Il Poggiolo E. Cosimi
"Marked by chocolate, leather, tobacco, espresso, dark licorice and loads of pretty blackberry fruit, this is a defined, focused wine with a crisp, pristine personality.",,Innocenti
"Raspberry, cranberry, schist and wild brush aromas are about as correct for Priorat as you'll find. In the mouth, this wine from Sara Pérez and René Barbier Jr. is lively, racy and pure, with red berry, vanilla, coconut and tobacco flavors. Finishes long and elegant. Drink through 2016; 166 cases made.",Partida Bellvisos,Gratallops
"Sweet, soft and delicious, this is a rich Zinfandel to savor with barbeque. It's tasty in blackberry, cherry and blueberry fruit, with a coating of smoky oak. Earns extra points for a long, exotically spicy finish. Great now and over the next four years.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,John Tyler
"A very dusty, dry expression of Brunello, with tones of crushed stone and talcum powder. It's nice when a wine adds that mineral touch at the back of red fruit and spice, as it gives the bouquet firmness and backbone. Cherry, blackberry, cola and rum cake are all there. The mouthfeel is structured, dry and compact.",,Brunelli
Villa Novara presents easy aromas of fresh forest berry and almond paste. The wine is informal and sharp making it an ideal companion to pizza with mozzarella or pasta stuffed with ricotta cheese.,Villa Novare,Bertani
"Here's a simple and tart Valpolicella that would pair with easy stay-home meals. The wine is redolent of white cherry, cranberry and violet. It's crisp, fresh and one dimensional in the mouth.",,CampoReale
"Aged only in stainless steel, this opens with fresh berry nuances, white almond and cola. It's a thin, bright, easy wine that could pair with any informal meat dinner.",,Cantine Lenotti di Lenotti
"Made solely from old-vine Carignan, this wine does stand out as being unique among a flight of Costières de Nîme wines. It's slightly pruny, marked by dried fruit, leather and clove, turning a touch metallic on the finish.",Qu'es Aquo,Château d'Or et de Gueules
"A soft, off-dry wine, full of lightweight currant fruits. It is gentle, in a fruity, apéritif style.",Gentil,Dopff & Irion
"Like most bargain Chilean Cabs, the wine is a bit green and herbal, with scratchy red-fruit aromas helping it along. The palate has reasonably good depth and saturation, with flavors of roasted berry, stewed fruits, tobacco and green veggies. Good but challenged.",Reserva,Luis Felipe Edwards
"Shows good blackberry and currant flavors, but there's something off in the mouthfeel. It's a sharpness, a rugged, tart green chlorophyll feeling that suggests unripe tannins.",,Le Vigne di Domenico
"Sweet, tart and simple, like the filling on a black-cherry pie. Not much else going on. Drink now.",Reserve,Martin Ray
Monte dall'Ora is an easy-going wine that would pair with informal foods or appetizers. There's a note of sour cherry that appears on both the nose and in the mouth. The close is appropriately quick and crisp.,Monte dall'Ora,Monte dall'Ora
"An okay wine that's light in color and aromatics, traceable in part to its cooler-climate heritage (95% of the grapes were grown in Mendocino, the rest in Sonoma, Monterey and Santa Barbara), which does give it some subtly pleasing red fruit and spice notes. But 2008 was also for much of Mendocino a vintage from hell and this wine may in truth be reflecting that year's challenges.",Jackson Estates Grown Vintner's Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"If a buttery, oaky, roasty, toasty Viognier is what you seek, Virginia's Tarara Vineyards has it. Toasted oak, buttered popcorn and fresh apples dominate both the nose and palate of this dry, full-bodied wine. It's a straightforward wine with fairly high alcohol, but balanced with a vibrant acidity.",,Tarara
"The Guarda Rios, or kingfisher, lives in the vineyards that produce this wine, which is bright pink, strawberry flavored, attractively dry and crisp.",Guarda Rios,Vale d'Algares
"Iperico is a tight, mellow Valpolicella with lean structure and medium intensity. There are lively forest berry aromas here of raspberry and blueberry and the wine is short, simple and crisp overall.",Iperico,Valentina Cubi
"Neutral on the nose, and then crisp but bland tasting. There's apple and green hints of fresh bell pepper and lettuce, while the finish shows lime, citrus pith and mild bitterness. Light and basic; made from 50% each of Airen and Macabeo (Viura).",White Wine Made With Organic Grapes,Vermador
"Figari is a simple and tight Valpolicella that opens with bright berry nuances and a touch of bitter almond. There's also an herbal, medicine like note at the back.",Figari,Villa Spinosa
"The low-level __ood_ rating is more a reflection of the wine's age than its core qualities. It's flat and wayward now, with no real direction to the nose or palate. It tastes bland and semisweet, with dying acids and simple flavors of apple and melon. Go with the '09, then look for the '10.",EQ,Matetic
"A simple Merlot, soft and sweet in raspberries, cherries and red licorice. At this price, it's perfectly fine for casual fare and big parties.",,McManis
Le Salette's Valpolicella Classico offers bright berry and cherry notes followed by crisp acidity and a touch of citrus zest. Pair this wine with meatloaf and mashed potatoes.,,Le Salette
"Lemony and citrusy from the get-go, with floral notes to the nose. The palate is sheering and tart, with edgy tannins. As a whole, it's angular, with tomato and red-fruit flavors. A natural, jacked-up example of Prieto Picudo that's a bit underwhelming.",Paraje de El Santo,Pricum
"Mostly Sangiovese with a small dose of Petit Verdot, this has attractive vanilla, dark cherry and spice aromatics, but a green, stalky note that lingers throughout. Supple tannins mingle pleasantly with tobacco and smoke on the palate.",Riserva,Raffaldini
"Light and fruity, with cherry notes and touches of clay-like earthiness. Simple and clean, and priced accordingly.",Pont du Rhône,Clerget
"A soft, fat, caramel-flavored wine, showing strawberry fruits and a creamy texture. It lacks acidity, leaving a wine that needs to be drunk soon.",,Dopff & Irion
"This is a sound, rustic red wine. It's comprised of undisclosed varieties, but tastes basically like a Rhône blend, with simple cherry, cola, herb and oak flavors.",Lucca,Courtney Benham
"Dry, minty and spicy, with cool, lightweight berry and cola aromas. The palate is fairly light and easy, with lean red-fruit flavors, dry spice and a creamy tasting accent. Spice more than fruit carries the finish. Pedestrian wine that's competent.","Tempranillo, Garnacha, Mazuelo",Baron de Escal
"Earthy and mildly medicinal smelling, with a healthy, not too stark palate that's dealing pointed cherry flavors and some dry oak. It's a touch sharp and angular, with a dry, peppery finish that's lean, acid-driven and starching.",Otoñal,Bodegas Olarra
"Veramar's Estate Club Viognier has a high-toned apple scent. Fat and full bodied with lots of rich cream, butter and apple cider notes, it's fairly low in acid, but high in alcohol, contributing to a finish that feels a bit dense and hot.",Estate Club,Veramar
"Here's a find for lovers of big, buttery wine. Dripping with cream and butter, Tarara's darkly toasted, full-bodied Chardonnay screams new French oak. Rich and viscous, there's just a hint of fresh lemon and apple flavors hiding behind all of the oak.",,Tarara
"Smells oily, stemmy and a bit funky, while the palate is sweet in the extra dry mold, with candied white-fruit, vanilla and powdered sugar flavors. The finish is warm and sweet, with a fast fade. More candied and sweet than fruity or exact.",Aria Estate Extra Dry,Segura Viudas
"This is a bright and easy-going wine would make a great companion to whole grain pizza or pasta with fresh cream and mushrooms. It ends with sharp, crisp cranberry flavors.",I Quadretti,La Giaretta
"Soft and simple, this has apricot, peach and cream flavors that finish sweet and jammy.",Spirit Hawk,Lander-Jenkins
"This Brunello opens with a sweet nose of bright cherry fruit, mocha and vanilla bean. The wine's flavors are more savory, with some background notes of forest floor and wild mushroom. The mouthfeel is firm and steady, but also fresh and compact.",,Camigliano
"This beautiful Semillon-dominant blend that shows great finesse, depth and power. Rich and opulent in every way, notes of baked red apple, lemon verbena, honey-drizzled peach and sweet orange oil flood the nose and mouth, while additional flavors of hazelnut cream, fig bread and soft sweet spice carry into the long finish. Round, but with enough acidic lift to keep it from being flabby. Drink now_2015.",Henrietta,Bizoe
"This Brunello Riserva is defined by a layer of coffee and espresso that peels back nicely to reveal dark fruit, cassis, leather and tobacco. It's smooth, ripe, fresh and structured.",Riserva,Altesino
"Bright and plump, very lively Sangiovese fruit. There's smooth richness and great staying power to the wine's black fruit and exotic spice.",,Castelli Martinozzi
"This wine presents a dark wall of inky concentration with aromas of ripe fruit and raw cherry. There are earthy tones in the background that are characteristic of Sangiovese, with floral and menthol nuances as well. The tannins are firm and polished.",Riserva,La Collina dei Lecci
"With a translucent ruby color and a light, silky body, this Pinot captivates for its ethereal mouthfeel. But there's nothing light about the flavors, which are cherries, cola, pomegranates, bacon and the sweet, spicy vanilla of toasted oak. It is, in a word, delicious. Seems at its best now.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,Summerland
"This unique expression of Sangiovese Grosso is influenced by oak tones to produce aromas of Spanish cedar and sandalwood, giving the bouquet a rich personality. Bold fruit tones of cherry and blackberry also come into focus, and the wine is surprisingly firm in the mouth.",Franci Riserva,Tassi
"Youthful fruit tones of cherry and raw blackberry set the stage. Those bold fruit layers will evolve slowly with more cellar aging, integrating with the light spice, tobacco, cedar and earth. The mouthfeel is bold, round and long-lasting.",Vigna Soccorso,Tiezzi
"One of the best vintages of Rubicon to date, and for the price it's a fantastic value that's great for building up your cellar. Right now, the wine is still young and tight, with firm, gripping tannins that need some time to mellow. Fortunately, there's a great concentrated black-fruit core and enough acidity alongside the tannins to support long-term aging. Spicy and earthy, with accents of black tea, cedar and crushed violets. Try after 2016.",Rubicon,Meerlust
"An older vintage, the 2004 Rendola opens with notes of ripe fruit, pressed flowers, exotic spice, leather and licorice, with a clean, polished mouthfeel.",,Rendola
"This rich Syrah leaves little to the imagination. It's dramatic in blackberry and cherry fruit and exotic spices, sweetened with new oak. Delicious now and for the next few years.",Ballard Canyon Estate Reserve,Rusack
"There is a lot of power in this wine. It has great weight and richness and an intense structure. Hanging from the frame of the wine are dark plum fruits, layers of wood, sweet spice, complex acidity and dry tannins. Age for 6_7 years.",Les Cazetiers Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"A lovely wine, soft and charming, but far from simple. Although it has complex layers of cherries, blackberries, cassis and cedar, it also shows a fine structure of ripe, smooth tannins and supporting acidity. Drink now_2015 while it's fresh and forward.",Trilogy,Flora Springs
"Winemaker Daryl Groom has crafted an expansive Shiraz that's full bodied and lushly textured but not unstructured. Flavors of blackberry and mocha weave in and out with notes of cola, chocolate and black olive on the softly lingering finish. Drink now_2018.",,Groom
"Hamilton Russell just knows how to do Chard right, striking superb balance and finesse in a wine that's drinkable now but can age for another five-plus years. Baked apple, barely-ripe honeydew, lemon custard and a touch of beeswax dance in the bouquet and transition seamlessly into the softly-toasted palate. A beautiful seam of acidity threads it all together and lifts the lengthy finish.",,Hamilton Russell
"Soft and velvety, this super Tuscan blend delivers intense and pure notes of chocolate, cherry, blackberry and spice. It balances a dense, rich texture with loads of bright fruit on the finish.",,Collazzi
"Acciaiolo is a super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon that opens with concentrated and opulent aromas of dark cherry, chocolate and exotic spice. The mouthfeel shows heft and depth. Give the wine a few more years in the cellar to soften those toasted oak influences.",Acciaiolo,Castello d'Albola
"Tight and brittle now, with acidity and dryness starring. The thing to understand about this Pinot is that it's quite modest in alcohol and understated in flavor, showing rhubarb, pomegranate and cherry Lifesaver flavors with a minerally edge. Elegant now, it should develop over the next six years.",Silver Pines Vineyard,Bailiwick
"Darkly concentrated, boldly aromatic and intense, this pretty Brunello delivers modern aromas of chocolate, espresso bean, ripe fruit, blackberry and rum cake. The mouthfeel is smooth and rich, and the wine maintains its momentum thanks to the softness of its texture.",Campo di Marzo,Il Valentiano
"The wine gives an impression of being supple and soft, at least on the nose, but you can feel the firm structure in the mouth. The quality of the tannins is dusty, firm and unyielding at this early stage. Drink in 5_10 years.",Riserva,Innocenti
"A Brunello on the bold and ripe side, with smoked bacon, blackberry, sweet spice, rum cake and black licorice. It shows impressive staying power. It's tannic, firm and ready for a long aging future ahead.",Riserva,La Fiorita
"A slight name change in 2009 for what previously was labeled Tre Fanciulli. It is still a blend of old vine Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, and Syrah, clean and pure with pretty cherry fruit. It's focused and full-bodied, a bit blocky, but perfectly balanced and drinking nicely already.",Tre,JM Cellars
"This elegant Brunello opens to a lean, streamlined style. The garnet color is true to the Sangiovese variety and so are the wine's aromas of forest berry, earth and pressed flower. You'll like the bright, soft close, with its tiny touch of fruity sweetness.",Riserva,Tenuta di Sesta
"This Brunello opens with inky, dark concentration and ripe aromas of prune, plum and blackberry. It's packed tight with savory spices, such as ground clove and cardamom, and it also offers a full load of ripe (but not jammy) black fruit. It feels thick and textured on the palate, with tannins that will soften with 5_10 more years of bottle aging. There's a touch of cherry sweetness on the close.",,Valdicava
"A ripe sweet style, with blackberry and cherry liqueur, leather, tobacoo, rum cake and graham cracker. This wine's polished, distinctive finish features a rich, velvety feel.",,Sesta di Sopra
"Seems to have hardly aged over nearly six years, still showing massive blackberry, cherry, cassis and dark chocolate flavors, sweet and fresh. Lots of oak, too, bringing even more caramelized sweetness. Yet the finish is dry, long and spicy. Made from 100% Cabernet, but sometimes these wines surprise. Give it another six years.",Reserve,Rubissow
"Bold fruit and oak-driven notes display broad brush strokes of cherry, clove, cinnamon and vanilla bean. Smooth, rich velvety mouthfeel. This is still young, fruity and vinous; let it age 10 years or more.",Vigna delle Raunate,Mocali
"With nearly 20% residual sugar, this wine is enormously sweet in honey and black cherry flavors, balanced by brilliant acidity. It's delicious and savory and so easy to like. For something unusual, try with a runny cheese, like a soft Gorgonzola.",Elysium,Quady
"Brunello Voliero is a dark and savory wine that is packed tight with red berry, cherry liqueur, toasted spice, leather and lasting tones of dried tobacco and cigar box. Three years of aging in large oak casks has helped shape a soft, velvety and polished mouthfeel.",Voliero,Casato1
"Garnet-ruby in color, with hues of amber at the rim. Oak tones of spice and toasted nut still need time to integrate. The wine is bright and slightly astringent, with a firm, polished disposition, but has nice fruit tones of currant and cassis. Give it a few more years in the cellar.",,Castello Banfi
"Smells clipped, tough and oily, with a hardness to the bouquet. The palate is fleshy and wet, with reasonably fresh melon and papaya flavors. Finishes pithy and slightly bitter, and overall it's barely a good wine on its best day.",Estate,Errazuriz
"Green smelling, with lettuce, oregano and other herbal aromas. The palate is also green and starchy, while the structure screams hard, big tannins and fierce acidity. Does not mesh that well; too much green character and hardness to rate better. A blend of 67% Cabernet Sauvignon and 33% Syrah.",Opera Prima,Fernando Torres Torrent
"Quiet and shy on the nose, with generic white-fruit notes. For a medium-dry white, it offers requisite sweetness along with soft fruit notes, candied flavors and a green, lightly vegetal accent. A bit spritzy but not that lively or precise.",Fuente Milano,Bodegas Escorihuela
"Grassy on the nose, and for a brut nature this is decidedly flat in aromas, with ultradry flavors of lime and tangerine along with powdery vanilla. Super light on the finish, which dissipates in no time. Almost tart and lacking in the long run.",Brut Nature,Miquel Pons
"Aromas of toasted oak, green leaves, vanilla and spice waft from this medium-bodied North Carolina Bordeaux-style blend. The palate is ripe and plush with plenty of sweet dark cherry fruit, but there's a tinge of green in the backdrop. Tobacco, smoke and supple tannins on the finish add an edge to this otherwise soft sipper.",Eagle's Select Red Wine,RayLen
"Blowsy and mustardy, like it's starting to turn south. The palate is loud, jumbled and heavy, with mustardy orange flavors, a touch of flowery honey and then bitterness. Big and powerful, but not very poised.",,Robalino
"On the nose, there's lots of warm, toasted wood and vanilla spice notes on this, cheerful, cherry-laden Colorado Syrah. There's a slight green, stalky vein that runs throughout, but overall, it's an easy drinking, fruit forward wine sprinkled with mocha and chocolate.",,Two Rivers
"On the nose, this full of spice, char, and black fruit with a hint of barnyard. There's a hint of green bramble, however, that persists on the soft black cherry palate as well, adding a sour, stalky note in the mid palate.",,Veramar
This Valpolicella shows a nice level of heft and density with ripe cherry and blueberry aromas. There's a slight tannic touch here and enough natural acidity to pair with cream cheese and chives on crackers.,,Pietro Clementi
"An offbeat blend of red and white varieties, this is a simple, fruity, tart wine. The raspberry and cherry flavors have an edge of lime acidity.",redFOUR,Westwood
"The grapes for this immense, rich blueberry jammy Syrah come from NFL's John Madden's ranch. It's as big and loud as he can be, with not quite enough fruit or acid to overcome the alcohol, which even gets in the way of the nose. With a small percentage of Grenache blended in and the whole aged in 100% American oak (1/3 new), this style may appeal to some;, but can be interpreted as overly voluptuous, even on a second tasting eight hours after the first. Decant or, preferably, give it another 3_5 years.",Madden Ranch,Wood Family Vineyards
"Apple is about the only aroma you'll find, and after that things run flat, honeyed and heavy. There's heat and a cloying sensation to the finish, which is pithy, sweet and ultimately heavy and slightly bitter.",,Cousiño-Macul
"Although the nose offers darker notes of petrol, bruised apples and cooked green peppers, the palate on this semisweet wine is prettier with hints of sugar-laced oolong tea and white florals.",Lot 807 Reserve,Debonné
"There's a meaty element of cured beef or bresaola upfront that is followed by thick aromas of mature cherry and blackberry tart. You'll also detect some earthy or animal like notes and the wine is informal, thin and crisp in the mouth.",,Giuseppe Lonardi
"Easy and straightforward, this ruby-colored wine offers one-dimensional aromas of white cherry, almond skin and blueberry. The mouthfeel is light, tonic and crisp.",,Santa Sofia
"Rustic in the texture, with unevenly ripened tannins, and the cherry and berry flavors have a touch of raisins. Pretty standard stuff.",Reserve,Red Rock
"Tanning in color, with stalky, semimealy aromas that lack zap and citric crispness. The body is heavy, although there's adequate acidity, while the flavors lean toward mealy citrus and ripe melon. Pithy and bitter on the finish, like almond skins.",Old Vines,Yasa
"Vigne Alte is a fresh, easy Valpolicella blend that could pair with a lunch of roof beef or a ruben sandwich with French fries. The wine is clean and linear with bright berry tones and fresh acidity.",Vigne Alte,Zeni
"Here's a thin, easy-going wine that opens with a bright ruby color and easy aromas of cherry and wild raspberry. It's an informal, no-fuss wine to pair with stay-home family meals.",La Corte del Pozzo,Gino Fasoli
"Sweet and funky smelling, with a weird set of aromas that suggest Middle Eastern spice and hard-to-gauge fruit. The palate feel is barely acceptable, while the flavors are jumbled and overtly spicy and strange. Maybe it's the oak? Or maybe it's just not very good wine.",Crianza,Bodegas Qumrán
"Aged in traditional large oak casks, this easy wine offers bright berry tones with touches of toasted almond and spice. It's lean, crisp and informal overall.",Vigne Nuove,Musella
"Aged only in stainless steel, this well-priced blend of Corvina, Molinara and Rondinella washes over the palate with ease and good cheer. Pair it with take-out pizza and spicy sausage.",,Stefano Accordini
"Char, smoke and black fruit with a whiff of barnyard perfume this Cab Franc. It's spicy and soft on entry with lots of earthy moss and leather notes, but has a jagged acidity and choppy grape tannins.",Estate Club,Veramar
"For Chilean Cab, this is forced and rocky. The nose is mulchy and sour, with coffee grinds, herbal notes and heavy turned earth. The palate is tannic and biting, with herbal berry flavors and a woody cover. Meaty on the finish but hard in texture. This is not a friendly wine.",Reserva,TerraNoble
"The dark, black fruit on the nose and palate of Ray Len's Carolinus red blend is ripe, but a bit tired and dusty, competing for attention with all the dark, toasted oak. It's a straightforward Carolina red with a hint of tomato leaf and not a lot of structure, but fine for everyday fare.",Carolinius,RayLen
"Aged in stainless steel, this fresh wine presents a correct bouquet of cherry and wild berry aromas. There's a touch of almond paste and cola in the back and the wine is compact and crisp on the close.",Saseti,Monte dall'Ora
"A thin, watery wine that does a great job of keeping the mouth refreshed and clean. Would pair well with sliced cheese or cured meat.",,Begali
"Brambly with a mild vineagary sourness to the nose. The palate is tart, crisp and scratchy, with sweet-and-sour flavors of plum, herbs and even grass. Finishes green and challenged. Kind of weak for $17.",Grand Reserve,Catrala
"A rustic wine that blends Cabernet Sauvignon with local fruit. It has a layer of wood, uncomfortable black currant acidity and a core of tannins.",Conde d'Ervideira Reserva,Ervideira
Valpolicella Tenuta Lena di Mezzo is a crisp and lean wine that would wash down easily with a hearty plate of pasta with spicy sauce and cubed bacon. It offers cleansing acidity and easy fruit aromas.,Tenuta Lena di Mezzo,Monte del Frá
"Rich and ripe in blackberry, cassis and smoked meat flavors, this big, bold Syrah is fairly high in alcohol, but wears it well. It has a full-bodied, warm mouthfeel, and is best enjoyed over the next year or two.",Rodney's Vineyard,Fess Parker
"Poggio al Vento (from the 2004 vintage) shows smoky and savory notes of forest floor, bramble, cured meat, barbecue spice and teriyaki sauce. The wine is compact in the mouth, with polished tannins.",Poggio al Vento,Col d'Orcia
"Tasty and toasty, young and compact, this is a wine to cellar for a few more years at least. The bright fruit flavors run from berry to Bing cherry, not as dark as in some years, but vibrant and crisp. The new oak is not yet fully integrated, so give it some extra bottle age for optimal enjoyment.",Lewis Vineyard,Dunham
"Good acidity in this Chardonnay provides a brisk balance to the ripe pineapple, passion fruit, pear and spice flavors. Made in the modern style, it has a minerality that lifts it and provides interest.",,Hunnicutt
"This is one of those Petite Sirahs that will benefit from a little time in the cellar. Even though it's made in the modern style, with softer, sweeter tannins than the variety has shown the past, it's still a bruiser. Yet with a gigantic core of blackberries, blueberries and chocolate, it should negotiate the next 5_6 years easily.",Barberis Family Reserve,Madrigal
"This full-bodied, creamy-textured Shiraz from the Lyndoch subregion of the Barossa starts off with vanilla, raspberries and a dusting of confectioner's sugar, but turns darker and more savory with air, adding dark berry and hickory notes. The long finish is richly textured, yet simultaneously marked by crisp acids.",Miamba,Grant Burge
"A wonderful wine that's rich and delicious. The raspberry and cherry fruit is dusted with exotic spices and finished with sweet, smoky oak. With its silky texture and good acidity, it's a brilliant evocation of a warm part of the valley.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,John Tyler
"This Brunello opens with floral notes of pressed red rose and clay soil. Bright fruit, blackberry, leather and tobacco aromas are framed by firm tannins.",Riserva,La Fornace
"Smoky overtones of barbecue and pipe tobacco fill in the background and provide a platform for all the busy cherry and ripe berry notes presented on the nose. It's a big, bold style with loads of savory spice, black pepper and smoked bacon. Drink after 2015.",,La Serena
"Bright, buoyant delivery with the kind of aromas that pop. Think cola, balsam, eucalyptus, dried ginger and crushed black pepper. The fruit is subtle and delicate, reminiscent of forest berry and cassis. The wine's structure is firm and solid without being too biting and there's fresh acidity, too.",Villa al Cortile,Piccini
"Mineral tones and oak tones will integrate with time. With the wine's other notes of black cherry, licorice, bresaola, white pepper and black currant. Beautiful harmony and intensity, with a firm, silky signature on the finish.",,Podere Paganico
"This wine offers some cola, sage and fresh menthol notes. It's an elegant package with aromatic intensity, balanced acidity and firm, tight structure. The wine is lean, compact and tight and needs another 5_10 years to come into focus.",Pian di Conte Riserva,Talenti
"Dark fruit and fresh oak tones still need time to integrate__ive this Brunello a few more years of bottle age. Chocolate, exotic spice, cherry, blackberry, leather and pipe tobacco on the nose; smooth berry richness and a tight, firm feel in the mouth.",,San Filippo di Giannelli
"Pretty floral notes rise to the top: lavender and pressed rose. That intense floral element gives the wine an elegant, sophisticated personality that's tight and structured, with great balance between firm tannins and bright acidity.",,Tenuta Crocedimezzo
"Bold and concentrated, with a dark, extracted appearance and tones of ripe fruit and spice. There are savory notes of barbecue sauce and cured bacon as well. The wine is thick and full in the mouth, with textured tannins and an extroverted personality. Drink after 2018.",,Tenuta Oliveto
"This is a broad, masculine Brunello with layers of spice, leather, Spanish cedar, cola and cured meat. The mouthfeel is streamlined and elegant, with crisp acidity and a solidly tannic base.",Riserva,Villa Poggio Salvi
"This wine saw no oak barrel aging, but it's so rich and satisfyingly clean, it's probably better off not being weighed down by caramel and buttered toast. Brimming with brisk acidity, it shows brilliantly pure citrus fruit, tart gooseberry, Asian pear, green apple, mineral and white pepper flavors. The vineyard is in Green Valley.",Cohen Vineyard Dutton Ranch,Dutton Estate
"There's an earthy note of cola that grounds the ripe cherry and pomegranate fruit, giving it depth and complexity. Made from one of the vineyards closest to the coast, this wine provides plenty of Pinot character. Thick tannins and vital acidity suggest aging until at least 2013.",,Mistress
"Here's an oak-driven Brunello that needs time to evolve__ive it five years or more. Glimmers of bright fruit emerge despite the presence of toasted almond, cedar wood and vanilla extract. The wine is concentrated with soft tannins and a lovely rich feel in the mouth.",,Mocali
"Is that a touch of botrytis on the nose? Or does that apricot come from the Rued clone of Chardonnay? Either way, this dry wine offers vastly complex layers of fruits, spices, minerals, white flowers and smoky new oak. It's exotic, a Chardonnay that marches to a different beat and demands some understanding on the part of the taster.",La Masía Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"Very structured, as befits a Vosne-Romanée, even a village wine. The black cherry fruit and layered acidity are combined with a firm and dry tannic core. There is power here, and some aging potential.",,Louis Jadot
"Notes of root beer, dried sage, wild berry and bramble with menthol overtones define this wine. There are subtle wood tones of spice, clove and black pepper, and the finish is crisp and streamlined with a touch of cherry sweetness.",Riserva,Podere Paganico
"A new wine from Poggio Antico, Lemartine is a hearty blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot that offers intense and pristine aromas of black fruit, spice, rum cake, pepper and black pipe tobacco. It shows both substance and freshness on the long finish.",Lemartine,Poggio Antico
"San Benito County is just north of Monterey, and subject to similar coastal influence. This Pinot shows the cool climate in its zesty acidity and firm tannins, as well as the dryness that accompanies the fruit. Those flavors include cherries, cola and pomegranates. It's a complex wine that will do interesting things over the next six years.",Idyll Times Vineyard,Pessagno
"Beautiful and sophisticated aromas of dried sage, eucalyptus, cola, wild berry and forest floor lead into a wine with a linear, long, polished and pretty berry nuances on the finish.",Le Cacce in Villa,Donna Olga
"Dark in color and thickly extracted, with savory notes of cured meat, beef jerky, tobacco and leather. Fruit tones resemble dried strawberry, prune and dark plum, giving this wine a ripe, earthy feel. Closes soft, plush and spicy.",,Cupano
"This brunello offers a pretty bouquet, showing elegance and restraint at the same time. There are layers of small berry fruit, spice and leather, with dusty, dry tannins. The wine's overall astringency should soften with time.",Riserva,Fattoria dei Barbi
"Bright cherry cola and root beer notes veer beautifully onto the balsam side, with dried ginger and chopped mint. Some firm tannic astringency needs to soften with time, and there's a drying mineral tone that holds it all together.",,Belpoggio
"So savory and easy to like, you might miss the complexity, but it's there. Offers flashy raspberry and cherry pie, red plum, pie spice and sandalwood flavors, packed into firm but gentle tannins, and brightened with crisp acidity. The finish is entirely dry despite all the sweet fruit. Really defines the modern coastal California style, even if there's no particular Marin County signature.",Borderline,Bailiwick
"Grown in the cool Coombsville area, this fruit-forward 100% Merlot has considerable charm. Dominated by rich flavors of cherry tart, blueberries, anise and butterscotch, it's a softly tannic wine to drink over the next few years.",,Hunnicutt
"Easy on the nose and mouth, offering simple aromas of cherry, blueberry and white almond. In the mouth, it delivers an informal, lean approach.",Campo Santa Lena,Villa Monteleone
"A ruby-colored Valpolicella that opens with charred almond or crushed granite aromas followed by bright cherry and wild berry. It's thin and crisp with a thin, watery close.",,Monte del Frá
"Valpolicella Vigne Nuove is composed of a blend of Corvina, Rondinella, Corvinone and a touch of Berbera for extra crispness. It's an easy, informal wine with tonic berry and cherry flavors.",Vigne Nuove,Musella
"With a bit more color and extract, this easy-going Valpolicella offers informal aromas of cherry, almond and cassis. Pair it with easy finger foods or appetizers.",,Nicolis
"Rather lean, with high acidity, the wine has red currant fruits, a taut texture and a light spice character.",Tinto da Talha,Roquevale
"This sweet, oaky and simple Chardonnay has soft flavors of pineapple and caramel.",Reserve,Pavilion
"Embodies all the easy-drinking informality of the Italian wines we knew 20 or 30 years ago. It's clean and crisp and would pair with lasagna, pasta or fried eggplant.",Il Valpolicella,Buglioni
"An average, everyday Cabernet, okay for the price. It's soft and a little sweet, with sugared blackberry tea flavors.",Reserve,Cherokee Vineyards
"A dark, nicely concentrated Valpolicella Superiore with slightly offbeat and muddled aromas of spice, jammy fruit and sweet nutmeg. The nose is a bit awkward, but the feel it imparts in the mouth is smooth and velvety.",,Fattoria Garbole
"Short on aromatics, with only a whiff of pear and corn. The palate is soft and fleshy, with dry, limited papaya and melony flavors. Lettuce and other green notes carry the finish, which is bland and dilute. Will have a very short lifespan.",,Echeverria
"A passionfruit-dominated wine without much else besides a fresh, almost watery palate feel. This is a one-trick pony that's all passionfruit except for some pineapple juice and mango sorbet. Wet, zesty and tropical but only moderately pleasant.",Vivanco Viura-Malvasía,Dinastía Vivanco
"A little sweet and rustic, but rich in pineapple jam and buttered toast flavors. Brisk acidity helps to balance out the sugary taste.",Reserve,Angeline
A wood-aged Valpolicella that opens with sour tones of of white cherry and bitter almond. This expression taste tart and crisp with forest berry flavors on the close.,Fontana del Fongo,Arduini
"Roasted, rubbery primary aromas turn herbal, while the palate is classic Navarran in that it's tomatoey, with herbal cherry flavors and a leafy juniper character. Simple and short late, with a slightly sour, herbal finish.",Abril de Azul y Garanza,Azul y Garanza
"Vegetal on first blush, with aromas of green bean and asparagus. The green character becomes less obvious with time, but there's still a bell pepper element to the palate, which offers mildly stewy flavors. Finishes bland, and as a whole it's not exactly cutting the mustard.",Selected Varietal,Indomita
"A thin, sweet-smelling Valpolicella with aromas of cherry, wild berry, white almond and cola. It ends with crisp cherry and citrusy flavors.",I Roccoli,Vigneti Villabella
"Aged only in stainless steel in order to maintain its fresh fruit aromas, this is a simple, food-friendly wine that would pair with tuna or chicken salad. The wine is fresh, clean and short.",Campo Santa Lena,Villa Monteleone
"Based on experience, Zumaya's wines just aren't at the high level that Ribera del Duero is known for. This is herbal and foxy, with roasted, leafy aromas leading to an underwhelming palate of tomato, stewed red fruit and vanilla. Saucy on the finish, and ultimately okay but not up to par.",Crianza,Zumaya
"The nose on this bright red blend from Sanders Ridge is spicy and smoky with abundant red fruit, leather and tobacco. The cheery red fruits carry through on the palate as well with a plush, but pleasant demeanor. There's not a lot of structure or depth, but it's an easy, fun wine.",Big Woods,Sanders Ridge
"Aged only in stainless steel to preserve its fresh fruit aromas, this is redolent of white cherry, raspberry and bitter almond. It's an easy wine to pair with appetizers or mixed cheese platters.",,Begali
"Simple and fruity, with pie-filling berry and cola flavors and smoky oak. It's dry, with good tannins, but pretty acidic.",,Angeline
"Sharp and jammy, like blackberry and cherry jam wine. Lots of freshness and acidity, not much elegance. Drink up.",,Angeline
"A light exposure to oak aging has helped shape a satisfying Valpolicella that presents aromas of wild berry, almond and cured meat. Thanks to its sharp acidity you could pair this wine with grilled lamb or chicken.",Fontana del Fongo,Arduini
"There's an awkward note of alcohol here backed by toasted chestnut or hazelnut. After a few minutes in the glass however, the wine regains its confidence in the form of cured meat and ripe blackberry aromas.",,Le Bertarole
"This easy, thin Valpolicella opens with one-dimensional aromas of cherry and almond skin. It's crisp and clean in the mouth and would pair with Chinese food like spicy beef and broccoli.",,Falezza
"Easy, clean and fresh, pair this wine with ravioli and meat sauce or lasagna with béchamel. The wine's sharp acidity will cut through the fat in those dishes.",,Guerrieri Rizzardi
"Thin, easy and informal, this light Valpolicella would pair with cheesy pizza or pasta. There's fresh acidity here followed by bright cherry and blueberry flavors.",,Monte del Frá
"Awkward, showing overripe, Porty flavors and undesirable sweetness. There's a sugary undertow to the blackberry jam, prune and raisin flavors.",Pagani Ranch,Ridge
"The nose on this medium-bodied Cab Franc is spicy with bright red plum and cherry notes with a hint of tomato sauce. On the palate, there's pleasant red cherry flavor and smooth, mild tannins, but it's tart and underripe with bracingly high acidity and a green stalky undertone.",,Veramar
"Hard, acrid and sweaty smelling, with a plump but dilute-feeling palate that shows flavors of bitter peach pit, white grapefruit and citrus. Hard and bitter on the finish. Harmony is questionable; overall quality is sketchy.",Private Reserve,Viña el Aromo
"Bold fruit layers of red cherry, plum, blackberry, spice, cola and chocolate mark this wine. The quality of the fruit is still raw and bright and could use several years of cellar aging.",Madonna delle Grazie,Il Marroneto
"This vintage of La Togata has a dark, brooding garnet color, and compelling aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry, rum cake, spice, leather, dried ginger and pipe tobacco. If offers a soft, plush texture and a velvety finish.",La Togata,Tenuta Carlina
There's a nicely perfumed element to the nose that recalls pressed blue flower or lavender potpourri. Bold berry and currant undertones form a base of plumpness and richness. Light shadings of spice and toasted nut drive the mouthfeel. Structured and firm.,,Tornesi
"This drinks ripe, though the alcohol is under 14%. Deep and chewy flavors of black cherry and cassis, hinting at raisin and prune, anchor a substantial wine with muscle and verve. Spicy and chocolaty, this opens up nicely over the course of several hours.",Upland Vineyard Old Vine,Smasne Cellars
"Ripe fruit, prune, sticky pipe tobacco and rum cake notes are bold and big, with thick aromatic embroidery and broader brush strokes. Structured and incredibly smooth on the finish. This wine shows a fine, velvety texture.",Bramante,San Lorenzo
"Balsam notes of cola, deep spice, forest floor, sage and eucalyptus are long and ethereal. This is polished and bright with fine, firm tannins.",Helichrysum,San Polino
"Hot and fiery at first, but then it tames itself while revealing jammy blackberry and roasted plum aromas. Feels extracted and full, with a mix of baked berry, herb and peppery flavors that run deep and delicious. Spicy and chocolaty on the oaky finish, with smooth tannins, sweetness and oaky length. Drink now through 2014.",Cobos Marchiori Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"Oak spice, bramble, toasted almond, chocolate, spice, dark fruit and rum cake all make appearances. This is tight, firm, straightforward yet generous. The oak element will soften with more years of cellar aging. Save for 5_10 years.",Montosoli,Altesino
"Good for Atlas Peak for holding this Cabernet for more than five years before releasing it. It's still tannic and young, with intense blackberry, blueberry and cassis flavors that are dry and spicy. Showing an elegant mouthfeel, it needs a little more time. Hold until 2015, but it could develop over the next decade.",,Atlas Peak
"This gorgeous Brunello is packed tight with personality and intensity. The wine is redolent of candied cherry, blackberry, rum cake, cinnamon bread and dried ginger. It shows steely, firm structure and a tightly knit texture. Compact, sharp and decisive.",,Il Poggiolo E. Cosimi
"Very rich and opulent, with maybe a touch of botrytis giving the apricot, orange and buttercream flavors a honeyed decadence. Bright acidity keeps it all clean and balanced. Showing exceptionally well for a white wine at 4½ years of age.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,J. Wilkes
"There's an exotic, spicy element here that gives this riserva a unique and compelling quality. Coffee, espresso and bitter chocolate also identify it. The mouthfeel is dry and tight, suggesting long aging potential. More than fruit, this wine shows tertiary aromas and crushed mineral in the mouth.",Riserva,Marchesato degli Aleramici
"Marimar's first Albariño is unquestionably one of the best ever to hail from California. Made without oak, it's modest in alcohol, giving it a light, transparent mouthfeel that transmits pure, bone dry flavors of peaches, grapefruits and guava, with a touch of Sauvignon Blanc-like gooseberry and enough acidity to make the palate whistle. A real beauty, especially with Asian fusion fare.",Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"This Brunello offers interesting complexity in its cola and balsam notes. The wine has a big, bright intensity, with crisp acidity and a lean, compact mouthfeel that's rather austere and stern. Ultimately the wine is more generous on the nose than in the mouth and finishes with lasting freshness.",Riserva,Brunelli Martoccia
"Serious wine for serious Ribera lovers, even if it's from a generally weak vintage. Smells of bacon grease, graphite and dark berry fruits. Feels tight and youthfully tannic, with hickory, smoked meat, clove, toast and blackberry flavors. Clove and spice rest heavily on the woody finish; needs time to evolve and absorb its oak treatment. Best from 2013_2018.",Malleolus de Valderramiro,Emilio Moro
"Gorgeous, deep, inky-black and intense. What sets this wine apart is the drying mineral tone of crushed granite that gives it direction and backbone. It's soft and plush on the palate, with round tones of ripe fruit and sweet spice. Nice density and structure, too, with a spicy aftertaste.",,Geografico Castello Tricerchi
"Dense, earthy and rich upfront, with bold black plum and berry flavors that hit the right chords. Feels slick, deep and polished, with blackberry, cassis, coffee and coconut flavors that feed into a simmering finish that runs for miles. An excellent blend of Cab, Malbec and Syrah to drink now and over the next five years.",Dedicado,Finca Flichman
"Thick, oaky and loaded with toasty highlights, this substantial Syrah slathers its fruit in a heavy coat of caramel, buttered nuts and spice. Delicious and supple, its naturally juicy acidity keeps the wine lively. With substantial breathing time, boysenberry fruit melds with streaks of roasted coffee, clove and tobacco.",,Dunham
"Dark as night, with charcoal, campfire, sweet berry and jammy notes to the alluring bouquet. Lively on the palate, with tangy acidity propelling black fruit, sweet oak, licorice and spice flavors. Solid, well built and generally smooth. Excellent Ribera from a very good year. Drink through 2019.",Corimbo I,Bodegas La Horra
"A traditional style of riserva, this wine shows aromas of spice, candied berry, smoked bacon, cinnamon, white pepper and dried sage. There's also a floral element of red rose or lavender. It is light and crisp, with a firm finish.",Riserva,Cantina di Montalcino
"This Brunello shows a feminine and bright personality, with aromas of leather, small berry fruit, cassis and licorice. It's structured and crisp, with good freshness and a silky mouthfeel.",Riserva,Tornesi
"Always a knockout Brunello, Uccelliera's 2006 Riserva seems on the ripe side, with jammy fruit aromas and savory beef jerky notes at the back. The firmness and natural acidity associated with Sangiovese is present, but the aromas show hints of candied fruit and spicy plum cake.",Riserva,Uccelliera
"Huge, dark concentration makes this wine almost too much of a good thing. It offers inky density, with cured meat, spice, dark fruit, prune, blackberry and blackberry pie. Its bold astringency needs more time to soften.",Podere Bellarina Riserva,Tenute Niccolai
"An unusual and compelling effort, this opens with lush, generous fruit flavors of both red and black berries, highlighted with orange peel. Excellent depth and texture, with a full-bodied middle and palate-pleasing minerality. Gains complexity through a lingering finish.",StoneTree Vineyard,Steppe Cellars
"Full bodied and richly tannic, Lehmann's 2006 Mentor is dark, chocolaty and intense, with further nuances of cassis and cigar box. The finish is chewy and juicy, simultaneously drying and mouthwatering. Drink 2015_2023.",Mentor,Peter Lehmann
"Made mostly with Bordeaux varieties based on Cabernet Sauvignon, with a dash of Syrah, this is a fine wine. It's dry, full-bodied and packed with blackberry, cassis, bacon and spice flavors, leading to a long, impressive finish. Give it a decant and enjoy as it warms in the glass.",Secolo,Sebastiani
"Ebulliently floral on the nose, this decadently creamy Tokaji bursts with characteristic honey, peach preserve and dried fig sweetness. A streak of citrusy acidity adds balance, while subtle hints of caramelized sugar and tea leaves add twists to the long, honey-kissed finish.",Red Label Aszú 5 Puttonyos,Royal Tokaji
"Here's a dark, austere expression of Brunello, with layers of exotic spice, toasted nut, cardamom and forest underbrush. Small berry fruit comes through as raspberry and black currant. In the mouth, the wine is bright, defined and firm, showing solid tannic structure.",,Mastrojanni
"This fruity Syrah is rich in cherries, raspberries, white chocolate and spices. Syrah hardly gets more flamboyant. And yet its structure is firm and pleasant. Drink now_2016.",Verna's Estate,Melville
"Beefy black-fruit aromas are inviting for their accents of licorice, coconut and crushed minerals. Feels lush, layered and intense, the perfect framework for lusty blackberry, toast, mineral and espresso flavors. Long, warm and dense on the finish. Drink now through 2016; made from Malbec, Bonarda and Cab Sauvignon.",Corte A,Vistalba
"Heavy and smelling a bit of creamed corn and wax. The palate is oddly spritzy and big, with sweet, chunky apple and pineapple flavors. Finishes with sweet pineapple as well, and overall it's probably too tropical and chunky.",Winemaker's Selection,Viña el Aromo
"Bright red cherries and a charred, herbacious oak scent perfume this light bodied North Carolina Sangiovese. Red cherry flavors continue on the palate as well, along with some pleasant tobacco and vanilla spice notes, but the acidity is fairly high, and there's some green in the background too.",,Raffaldini
"No oak on this simple, fairly sweet Pinot Grigio. It has pineapple, peach, lemonade and mineral flavors, with a suggestion of unripeness.",,Pietra Santa
"A simple, crisp Valpolicella Classico that offers nice, bright berry notes followed by plump cherry and blueberry. It's a thin, crisp wine with chewy fruit tones on the end.",,Monteci
"A sharp, rustic wine, sweet in sugary raspberry, cherry and crunchy almond granola flavors.",,Pavillion Crossing
"Charred oak, green herbs and vanilla spice notes mix oddly. The palate is soft and plush, with notes of sweet mocha and chocolate, but also a bit tired and chalky with faint tannins in the background.",In a Heart Beat,Divine Llama
"Here's a thin, crisp, no-fuss Valpolicella that would pair with pepperoni pizza or spaghetti and meat ragù. The natural acidity can cut through spicy meat and cheese, and the wine is lean but clean on the close.",,Antolini
"Marked by a touch of nail polish on the nose and a slight pickle-brine note on the palate, this is otherwise a medium-bodied, cherry-fruited blend of 70% Grenache and 30% Syrah.",,Andrieux & Fils
"Candied cherry and raspberry aromas are anything but complex or serious, while the palate is lean, sheering, crisp and more tart than flavorful. Scouring on the finish, and not really offering much of anything.",,Rioja Vega
"Pepperwood's first foray into Chilean Pinot Noir leaves a bit to be desired, even at $7. The nose is mulchy and candied, while the palate is clumsy, with candied berry, cocoa powder, vanilla and other sweet flavors.",,Pepperwood Grove
"A disappointing effort This is earthy and dank, with dark, leathery notes contrasting sharply with bright acids on the finish.",La Grivelière Tete de Cuvee,Père Anselme
"Simple and neutral, with sweetness to the nose. It's soft and flabby in the mouth, with candied vanilla and melon flavors. Sweet and low in intensity, and already it's dull despite being a new release.",Selection,Quasar
"This is an easy, extremely thin Valpolicella that offers bright cherry and berry aromas and a lean, citrusy finish. Those informal qualities gear this wine to a pairing with cheesy pizza and sausage.",,Brigaldara
"Falezza's Ripasso opens with an awkward nose that shows hints of burnt match and sulfur. Those pungent tones do blow off but the fruit flavors you normally look for in a wine like this never completely recover. The mouthfeel is sharp, clean and easy.",,Falezza
"A problematic wine, with unripe, green flavors. The citrus fruits are marred by the herbal taste of boiled vegetables.",Happy Canyon,Fiddlehead
"Heavy and mealy on the nose, with stalky white-fruit aromas. The palate is weighty and sticky, with a cloying feel and sweet, baked flavors of apple and honey. Then it turns distinctly bitter and pithy on the finish. Generally speaking, Calatayud is not white wine country.",,Tres Ojos
"This is a simple, thin expression of Valpolicella that could pair with take-out pizza or corned beef sandwiches. There's a slightly sweet, spice-like note on the close.",Corte Majoli,Tezza
"Although initially the bouquet is inviting with scents of dark fruit, chocolate and mocha, notes of tomato and tomato leaf carry through to the palate as well. Lots of tart acidity and chunky grape and wood tannins leave the mouth feeling jagged.",,North Gate
"Lots of oak on this Chardonnay, but it's awkward, and feels overworked and sweetly simple, despite some pretty pineapple jam flavors.",Vintner's Selection,Rock Hollow
An everyday Cabernet that's just barely worth the price. It's soft and sweet in pie-filling cherry and blackberry flavors.,,Castle Rock
"Smells like tarmac and tire rubber initially, and it remains stemmy and staunch even with air. The feel is dilute yet edgy, and the flavors suggest generic red berry and a dash of spice. Fades quickly on the finish, which is probably a good thing.",Vendimia Seleccionada,Conde de Jauregui
"Bright, simple, pure this no-fuss Valpolicella drinks like one of those informal carafe wine served at the local Italian restaurant. There are bright cherry and berry aromas over a very lean mouthfeel.",,Nicolis
"Easy, thin and watery, this ruby-colored Valpilicella has the natural crispness to pair with pizza with sausage and mozzarella. There's a touch of bitter almond on the close that would be nicely offset by sweet butter or cheese.",,Zecchini
"Quite dry and thin, with an odd mix of unripe fruit, sugary fruit, toasted seed and plastic. Just doesn't sit well in the mouth.",Alder Ridge Vineyard Inspiration,Heaven's Cave
"There's a very sweet, chewy element to this wine that is followed by biting_ almost bitter__cidity. Pair this wine with cheese and crackers.",,Nicolis
"This easy Valpolicella opens with sharp green notes of grass and herb, followed by white cherry and cranberry. The mouthfeel is thin and very simple.",,Villa Spinosa
"Disjointed, sharp, astringent and thin, this shows little of the varietal character usually associated with grapes from the outstanding Destiny Ridge vineyard. There's a whiff of funk in the nose, but only tart, generic and unripe fruit in the mouth.",The Dweller,Heaven's Cave
"Soft, sweet and dull, with Life-Saver candy flavors of cherries. Okay in a pinch.",Reserve,Cherokee Vineyards
"Yellow in color, with heavy aromas of toasted oak and popcorn. There's oxidation and mealy qualities, and the fruit is baked while the acidity is high, and thus overall it's not well balanced. Saving graces include lemon, baked corn and a so-so mouthfeel.",Gran Reserva,Morandé
"Youthful and fresh, this ruby Valpolicella is thin and lacking in intensity. That said, it's an easy-drinking option that you could pair with appetizers of finger food.",Terre di Lanòli,Villa Canestrari
"A blend of 69% Cabernet and 31% Shiraz, Yalumba's 2004 The Reserve is still firm and dusty on the finish, suggesting at least another 2_3 years of cellaring are warranted. Cassis, caramel, earth and vanilla notes are all nicely integrated into a cohesive whole, with the result being a dark, chocolaty wine that's savory as much as it is fruity.",The Reserve,Yalumba
"This is a GSM blend__bout two-thirds Syrah__oaded with juicy acidity. The sappy, deep raspberry fruit sinks into the palate, racy and penetrating. It suggests that this is a wine to cellar for awhile. At the moment it suddenly hits a hard stop__ wall of slate and graphite.",Wallywood Red,Dusted Valley
"Coldisole opens with oak-driven aromas of coffee bean, smoked bacon, dark spice and savory bresaola and fruit aromas that resemble dried prune, cassis and plum cake. The wine excels in the mouth where it displays silky, polished feel.",,Coldisole
"A dry, tannic young Pinot Noir. It's not a big, gushy wine, but comes down more on the elegant side, with low alcohol and an earthiness to the cherry and cola fruit. You want to age it for at least five years, to let it show its stuff.",Michaud Vineyard,Bailiwick
"Inky-black appearance. Ripe, concentrated notes of blackberry and raspberry jam are framed by bold tannins with an astringent bite at the end.",,Il Poggione
"Here's a youthful expression of Sangiovese Grosso in which the grape's trademark acidity and fruity brightness shine through. Cherry, white almond, dried raspberry and rum cake notes present a soft, chewy feel in the mouth, although the overall structure is solid.",,Fuligni
"All six Bordeaux grapes__es, including Carmenère__re in this fruity blend, aged for 21 months in 80% new French oak and 20% once-used French oak. Plums and cherries, a distinctive whiff of cola, and highlights of cinnamon spice all come together. Tannins are round, almost silky, and the wine fades in a graceful finish.",Longevity Red,JM Cellars
"A terrific value, the 2009 Killerman's Run Shiraz is full bodied, creamy in texture and endowed with a long, velvety finish. The dark berry-black cherry fruit is big, but balanced by notes of cedar, mocha, chocolate and vanilla. Drink it over the next few years.",Killerman's Run,Kilikanoon
"Hard and crusty on first impression, with smoky, leathery, meaty aromas along with hints of wild herbs and dark berry fruit. Feels racy and ultraslick, with cherry, plum and mineral flavors. Hits all the right notes while not pushing any buttons too hard or too often; long on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Clos Abella,Marco Abella
"A superb value, this wine's weighty presence and rich texture convey the warmth of the Barossa without ever stepping over into overripeness. Instead, it delivers mixed berry fruit, peppery spice and overtones of vanilla and chocolate. Drink now and over the next few years.",Cat Amongst the Pigeons Nine Lives,Rosedale Wines
"Similar in style to the higher-priced Cobos wine from the same vineyard. Bramare delivers cassis, plum and berry aromas rolled into a pleasant and familiar whole. Feels rich but refined, with meaty flavors that hit on leather, berry, black plum and chocolate. Spicy and chocolaty on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Bramare Marchiori Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"Firm raspberry fruit, tight and concentrated, is swathed in a generous coat of deliciously toasty oak. Tart and youthful, the wine's depth comes through as it breathes open in the glass, adding licorice, coffee grounds, and buttered nuts to the toasty finish.",Lewis Vineyard,Dunham
"A stunning Pinotage that shows great varietal character in its aromas and flavors of black cherry and currant infused with spicy notes of biltong, bark, clay, cinnamon and soft tar. The wine is firmly structured, with gripping tannins and medium acidity, striking a balance between the astringency of the tannins and freshness of the fruit. Nuances of baking spice and fudge linger on the close. Tight now; try after 2015.",Primo,Fairview
"Spice and bright notes of dried tobacco, ginger, cola and black pepper mark this wine, which displays deep richness and intensity. Crisp, clean finish.",,Fattoria La Lecciaia
"A delicious Zinfandel, one of Fritz's best in years. It shows Zin's robust, briary character, with a peppery, brambly mouthfeel. Yet the long, cool vintage has resulted in sweetly ripe flavors of wild berries.",Estate,Fritz
"This is a very rich, creamy wine. Fermented in stainless steel, the creaminess must come from lees aging. The flavors of orange and apricot jam and zesty lemon tart are dominant, but vital acidity also stars, giving the finish a spicy punch.",Tourmaline,Coghlan
"Warm spice and dark fruit tones with cured meat, bresaola, licorice, black pepper, leather and tobacco define this expression. The wine is plush rich, structured and firm.",Riserva,Collelceto
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Sangiovese opens with plush layers of cherry and blackberry and touches of spice and toast that are never overdone. In fact, the wine shows power and determination allied to delicacy.",Camartina,Agricola Querciabella
"Very oak driven, with notes of cinnamon, vanilla, exotic spice, toasted coconut and dark chocolate. There is dark fruit, like cherry and blackberry, at the back. Ripe tannins impart a plush, rich mouthfeel and loads of dense, chewy intensity.",Terra Rossa,Il Poggiolo E. Cosimi
"This wine displays pretty, feminine aromas and a bright mouthfeel. A polished mineral note follows red berry, cassis and plum. Drying tannins provide ample structure.",,La Fornace
"A sweet nose of oak spice, almond marzipan and cherry cola makes for a nice first impression. It boasts loads of balsam intensity with cola, ginger and black licorice. It's ripe, chewy and covers the palate while delivering tight structure on the long finish.",Riserva,Le Gode
"Rich and ripe in berry jam and spice flavors, this Pinot is enjoyable now for its silky texture and bright acidity. At the same time, it should develop bottle notes over the next six years.",Estate,Melville
"What a nice Syrah for drinking now. It shows that firm structure of Highlands reds, with fine acidity and dusty tannins, and is rich in blackberry, currant, licorice, bacon, black pepper and cedar flavors. Too bad more Syrahs aren't this good.",Manzoni Estate Vineyard,Pessagno
"Bright delivery with aromas of cola, root beer, humus, crème de cassis, forest berry and wild raspberry. It shows finely textured tannins with a bitter almond or bitter chocolate aftertaste. Brambly, sharp, acidic and well defined.",,Tenuta Friggiali
"Lean, compact and crisp, this Brunello is redolent of oak spice, ripe fruit, cured meat, rum cake and leather. It shows a sharply focused mouthfeel with tight structure and a streamlined feel.",,Tiezzi
"Lead pencil and mineral dryness upfront followed by dark fruit, blackberry and rum cake. The wine presents a soft round mouthfeel, with ample structure and length. Lingering barbecue and ripe fruit mark the close.",,Villa Le Prata
"Aromas of blackberry, plum cake, leather, Indian spice, crushed stone, black pepper and teriyaki sauce. The extraction is incredibly dense, making this wine almost above food pairing (try it with aged cheese). Very structured, but ripe tannins. Age 10 years or more.",Podere Bellarina,Tenute Niccolai
"Interestingly, Sidewood's 2008 Reserve Shiraz comes in considerably lower in alcohol than the regular bottling. It features a complex interplay of herb, spice and olive that gives it a stylistic resemblance resemblance to northern Rhône Syrahs. The tannins are silky, the finish long and balanced. Drink now_2018.",Reserve,Sidewood
"This Rhône-style red blend plays out broadly across the full palate, filling the mouth with tangy flavors of mixed berries and plums. Generously applied oak brings on a wash of baking spices, coconut and cinnamon, giving a sweetness to the moderate tannins.",Carl Reserve,Robert O. Smasne
"Tobacco, dried fruit, cassis, currant, blackberry and old leather notes mark the nose. Finely textured and polished, with a mineral tone, leather, ripe fruit and prune flavors. A pretty, elegant expression of Montalcino and of Sangiovese. Bright acidity, too.",,Sesti
"Lazy smelling, oddly spiced and off the grid in an artificial, strange sort of way. Flavors of apple, spice and banana are mulled and cidery, while the finish is grabby and hot. Not as good as prior vintages. Imported by Ecovalley Quality Wine Group and National Refrescos Import Company, LLC.",Reserva Viognier-Chardonnay,Tamaya
"A creamy, faux-smelling-and-tasting wine with loads of bogus oak character and limited stuffing or quality backing it up. Smells like a berry marshmallow or county fair cotton candy, yet the palate is hollow and sour. A masked wine that's trying to be tricky and isn't.",Reserve,Santa Ema
"From the beginning this '08 seems as though it has turned; the nose is mildly oxidized and corny, and there's a shortage of freshness. The palate is dull and narrow, with limited apple and sour lime flavors. Acceptable but not at its peak anymore.",,Meli
"The nose is a tad high-toned, like apple juice concentrate from a can. It's full bodied and dry, with just a touch of sweetness on the palate, with a savory apple flavor that ends with a tart, green apple skin note.",,Veramar
"Tar, tobacco and smoke can't mask the green tomato leaf characteristics on this ruby red Sangiovese. There are some interesting spice notes, but not a lot of ripeness or concentration in the fruit.",,Ventosa
"This marks two years in a row that this wine ranks low. It's dull, devoid of aromas and sour. Tastes green and bland, with little to latch onto. Just never gets going.",Edición Limitada,Morandé
"Dark char, spicy black plums and cherries, and an undertone of earthy barnyard make for an intriguing nose, but the palate on this red blend is soft and tired. Too many green notes and a hint of Band-Aids and rubber kick in on the midpalate.",Big Woods,Sanders Ridge
"Heavy, chunky and waxy, and really not that appealing. There's more than enough baked notes, corn and mealy qualities. Not much else to say.",,Asunto de Vino
"Smells strange, with a mix of unknown spice and odd fruit aromas. The palate is snappy and sharp, with light fruit and oaky, resiny flavors that leave a lasting, confounding aftertaste. Rather pointless given all the good value-priced wines on the market.",Juan de Valdelana,Valdelana
"Dull and cidery, with mealy apple aromas and similar flavors. Offers almost nothing besides a pale straw color, generic white fruit and corny side notes.",,Sassy Bitch
"Oddly tropical and floral, like an Argentine Torrontés. Spritzy in the mouth but weird tasting and funky, with cloying, unusual flavors that frankly don't taste very good.",Natura,Emiliana
"Roasted, herbal and blunt, with an acrid stemminess. The palate lacks ripeness and elegance as it delivers burnt, leafy, herbal flavors. Underwhelming.",,Vega Murillo
"Relatively broad on the palate and lush in texture, this Riesling's ripe melon and pear flavors are partially balanced by hints of citrus pith. Yet it remains sweet overall, and probably should be paired with spicy dishes or cheese to show at its best.",,Grey's Peak
"Picolit is a precious and uniquely Italian dessert wines that relies on a variety of special conditions to produce overwhelming elegance and concentration. Livio Felluga does a wonderful job with this wine that opens with a luminous golden color and segues to luscious, creamy flavors of honey, white flower and almond paste.",Picolit,Livio Felluga
"A true labor of love, this fabulous Vin Santo opens with beautiful intensity and infinite aromas of roasted chestnut, maple syrup, caramel, butterscotch and candied orange. It's divine in the mouth, with thick, luscious layers of glycerine and succulent sweetness. This is what Italians call a meditation wine that can easily be consumed alone after dinner.",Sant'Andrea Corsini,Principe Corsini Fattoria Le Corti
"Sourced from old-vine Bacchus and Weinbau fruit, this also includes 20% grapes from the estate's Heather Hill vineyard. The aromas are dense and penetrating, with a powerful mix of black fruits, ripe berries, smoke, earth, olive and coffee. From the first sniff to the last swallow, the flavors are beautifully integrated and the effect symphonic.",Reserve,Abeja
"Luscious, rich, balanced and intensely fruity, this stunning effort may well be the best Chardonnay ever produced in Washington. Two-thirds old- vine Celilo vineyard grapes are blended with estate-grown fruit from even older vines that were planted in 1976. Candied citrus, especially Meyer lemon, lemon verbena and other fruity herbs, stone fruits and subtle layers of caramel and toast burst from the glass. But the most amazing thing is that this wine stays fresh after being opened for literally days, much like a grand cru Burgundy.",,Woodward Canyon
"An exotic Pinot Noir, feral and exciting in its appeal. Wildly complex, with the scents of a summertime walk through a coastal California woodland. Forest floor, mushroom, wild cherries and raspberries, roasted shank bone, licorice, sandalwood__he flavors go on and on, balanced with crisp acidity. So dry; a joy to experience.",Las Hermanas Vineyard,Samsara
"Beauty and purity emerge from the nose of this highly complex and delicate dessert wine. Aromas include pressed flowers, honey, white peach and a touch of mustiness that adds depth and dimension at the back. It's a smooth, succulent drink that delivers sweetness, but never too much of it. Gorgeous.",Picolit,Livio Felluga
"Big and tannic, while at the same time potentially rich and smooth, this is, as always, an impressive wine. It has weight and dense texture. A solid wine that shows great potential; for now, revel in the plum juice and final acidity that provide a bright counterpoint to the solid, brooding structure.",,Clos de Tart
"Tannic and structured, chunky in style and texture. There are smoky flavors, acidity, berry fruits and black cherries as well as richness. There is a certain severity here, the wine passing through a firm stage before developing further complexity. Age for another six years.",Clos des Chênes Premier Cru,Domaine Michel Lafarge
"Though the blend includes small portions of other grapes_9% Syrah, 3% Merlot and 5% Cabernet Franc__his really champions the essential character of great Washington Cabernet. Its core fruit is supple and compact cassis and black cherry, with a spicy top note that resonates well into the finish. Concentrated and beautifully proportioned, with black olive and just a hint of leaf in the finish.",RiverBend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"A superb wine, the tannins carrying along the dense structure with ease and grace. The purity of the ripe berry fruit is very marked, with acidity giving freshness to the sweet wine. The whole ensemble is developing well, but will need many years' aging.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Aux Malconsorts Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"One of Austria's great Rieslings, Loimer's Steinmassl is a wonderful, elegant and restrained statement. At two years, it is very young, as the rich peach and honey flavors are just waiting to come out. It is just off dry, but the intense structure keeps the wine beautifully focused on minerality.",Langenlois Steinmassl Reserve,Loimer
"This is a wonderful wine, very ripe, the blackberry and sweet fruits all here, While the tannins are solid and concentrated, they are in the center of a lush, beautifully rich series of flavors that range from fruit to licorice to spice. The wine shows great aging potential.",Les Baudes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"With entrancing smoky aromas, this is a ripe, intense and powerful wine. The tannins are dry, contrasting with the black fruit-juice flavors, black chocolate and a dry final taste. For long-term aging.",Clos Saint-Jacques Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This is one of the great Rieslings from the Wachau, a wonderful panoply of ripe, tropical fruit, pierced with flint, spice and minerality. It is rich and opulent, while never losing sight of the core tautness of a fine Riesling.",Ried Schütt Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"Rounded and fat, with the weight and power of white wines from Corton. The texture is taut, still very young, waiting to allow the full richness of the fruit to come through. Impressive, it needs a minimum of four years aging.",Domaine Héritiers Paul Chanson,Chanson Père et Fils
"Pure Cabernet from some of Washington's oldest vines at Champoux and Sagemoor, this is a superb bottle, dense, compact and textural. A full mix of black fruits underscored with clean, moist earth and polished, silky tannins, finishes with pretty barrel flavors of spice and vanilla. Broad, deep and immensely pleasurable.",Old Vines,Woodward Canyon
"With residual sugar at about 1.35%, this balances the acidity without seeming sweet. Hand-picked and whole-cluster pressed, this immaculate, fresh, generous and stylish Riesling is always at the top of the list of Washington's best. Loaded with grapefruit, citrus and stone flavors, it cleans the palate and piles on the details as it rolls into a finish that lingers for well over a full minute.",,Poet's Leap
"A lovely restaurant-style Pinot Noir, showing lots of class and elegance, yet with enough modesty to step aside and let the food star. Dry and silky, it shows raspberry, cherry, red currant and cola flavors, accented with sweet, smoky oak. Suggested pairings include steak, lamb chops and grilled ahi tuna.",Reserve,Rodney Strong
"For $20, this bargain basement Tokaji is pretty unbelievable. Abundantly floral and honeyed on the nose, it's deeply concentrated on the palate, with layers of luscious figs and peaches, accented by lanolin and beeswax. Creamy and unctuous on the tongue, yet clean and fresh on the finish, with orange-inflected acidity that lingers.",Mád Cuvée Late Harvest,Royal Tokaji
"A youthful, oak-driven Brunello that needs more time to integrate. Ripe, plummy fruit shows chewy, rich density, then folds in blackberry, cherry, spice, leather and tobacco. Still tight in the mouth.",,Argiano
"What a lovely Riesling. The grapes were grown near the coast, and you can taste the zesty natural acidity, which gives a lift to the orange, lime, mineral and honeysuckle flavors. It's a little sweet, but the finish is dry and spicy. Great to drink now.",Riven Rock Vineyard,Cutruzzola
"This beautiful dessert wine from southern Tuscany (representing a blend of equal parts Traminer, Sauvignon and Sémillon) opens with ripe apricot, honey, toasted almond and candied fruit aromas. The chewy, rich sweetness of the wine is the main protagonist.",SolAlto,Fattoria Le Pupille
"Shows all the hallmarks of a modern Napa wine of high quality. Although it's quite dry, it's rich in crushed ripe blackberries, in good alignment with smoky new oak. The tannins are smooth and complex, the acidity just fine. Really a lovely bottle of red wine, although a touch of superripeness may limit ageability.",Reserve Cuvée,Clone 7
"This stunning Bordeaux-style blend opens with ripe aromas of black fruits like cherry, currant and plum, laced with a serious licorice and spice streak that shows staying power. The seductive mouthfeel boasts a slightly creamy texture with mouthfilling tannins. The palate is loaded with mulled boysenberry. Hints of tobacco, mocha and sweet spice all linger on the long close.",Five,Constantia Glen
"Soft and lush, this is a decadent mouthful of blackberries and plums framed by ample vanilla. It's balanced, in its own open-knit, easy-drinking style, with a sexy, drink-me-now immediacy that some may find too obvious.",Bishop,Glaetzer
"A ripe and forward style with upfront notes of pineapple, softly-grilled peach, juicy melon and a touch of spice. The mouthfeel is round and rich, but with enough acidic cut to keep the palate fresh and lively through the long finish. Flavors of sweet orange citrus and ripe green fig linger endlessly.",Bowed Head,Graham Beck
"This vineyard has been source to wildly variable Pinot Noirs, but Garnet, has succeeded in wresting a fine Pinot Noir. It shows the dry silkiness and acidity you want from a coastal Pinot, with elaborate, oak-influenced cherry, cola and pomegranate flavors that finish dry and spicy. Enjoy it over the next five years.",Rodgers Creek Vineyard,Garnet
"For the price, this is one of the best Santa Lucia Highlands Pinots of the vintage. Just a lovely wine to drink now, showing fine dryness, acidity and silkiness. The flavors are of rose hip tea, cola, sour cherry candy, toasty oak, tobacco and exotic spices.",Lucia Highlands Vineyard,Pessagno
"A dark, garnet-colored appearance with brooding, masculine tones of spice, ripe fruit, dark cherry, as well as beautiful balsam notes of cola, dried mint and ginger. Balanced, not overdone. Let the tannins soften with age.",,Podere La Vigna
"It's easy to like this smooth, clean sparkling wine, which hails from the Petaluma Gap, an increasingly important area in the cool, foggy south of the Russian River Valley. It's very rich in raspberries and strawberries, with notes of sweet vanilla and yeast. The mouthfeel is smooth and elegant.",Two Pisces Vineyard Reserve Blanc de Noir,One Hope
"Opens with dark, savory layers of Indian spice, candied fruit, plum, licorice and graham cracker. The texture is thick, viscous and rich, but a bright touch of acidity washes over the palate and keeps it refreshed. The endnote features tertiary aromas of leather, cola and crushed mineral.",Riserva,Palazzo
"Nutty as they come, with a dose of honey on the bouquet. Tastes extremely nice and powerful, with cleansing acids and complex flavors of salted peanuts, almond, baked peaches and toffee. Layered in terms of feel and delivery, with a nutty, crisp finish.",Prestige 50 Palo Cortado Viejísimo,Pedro Romero
"This Brunello has a warm, earthy personality embodied by its wild mushroom, leather, tobacco and ripe fruit notes. There's crème de cassis and cherry liqueur as well. The wine's mouthfeel is bright and crisp.",Riserva,SassodiSole
"The 2009 Shirazes from South Australia have been grading out well, and Shingleback's is no exception, representing an excellent value. It's dense and jammy, with rich black cherry fruit framed by oaky notes of baking spices and cocoa. This intense, extracted wine can stand up to hearty braises or stews.",,Shingleback
"If you think you don't like Merlot, try this one. It shows classic Napa Valley structure, with smooth, firm tannins and seductive flavors of sweet cherries, plums and currants. Delicious now with a good steak.",Estate,Rutherford Grove
"This 2006 Brunello delivers loads of rich intensity, chocolate fudge, ripe cherry and tobacco, with soft, velvety tones at the back. It's a bold, masculine wine with an attractive personality.",Podere Bellarina,Tenute Niccolai
"Black licorice, cola and cherry liqueur open the nose and segue to black currant and crème de cassis aromas, then forest floor, bramble and Spanish cedar. This wine is linear, crisp and tight on the palate, with firm tannins. Give the wine five more years to soften.",,Tenute Silvio Nardi
"Gewürztraminer is a great success at this Snipes Mountain winery, here done in a full-bodied, fleshy style that discards any hint of floral soap. Vanilla bean, lemon cream, graham cracker and a thoroughly yummy core of ripe fruit mark this as nonclassic, but incredibly delicious.",,Upland Estates
"Concentrated and dense, with bold red fruit, deep spice notes and overtones of tobacco, bresaola, leather and cigar box. It's a bold, masculine wine but restrained and elegant at the same time. Despite the bold bouquet, the mouthfeel is rather compact and firm. It leaves the palate refreshed.",,Lambardi
"This Brunello offers a distinctive note of spice, leather, moist earth or porcino mushroom at the start that slowly segues to dried fruit, prune and black currant. There's also cured beef and smoked bacon fat. It offers, big, plush and bold tones with chewy concentration and sweet cherry fruit on the close.",,La Pieve
"Cabernet simply doesn't get richer or riper than this. It's a massive explosion of sweet cherry and blackberry jam, cassis, dark chocolate and caramelized oak, wrapped into firm tannins. Tastes like a candy bar now, nowhere near ready to drink. Hold until 2015, at least.",Reserve,Rubissow
"This Brunello opens with elegantly on the nose, with small berry, cassis and wild blueberry aromas. Beyond the steady, feminine bouquet is a wine that has power, determination and personality, with savory endnotes of spice and fresh pipe tobacco.",Greppone Mazzi,Ruffino
"Named after five stone pine trees that stand over the vineyards, this small-production Chard is lush and toasty, offering great weight and richness followed by a long, nutty finish. Notes of red apple skin and peach are accented by hints of white clover and honeysuckle that unfold with time in the glass. Brisk lime-flavored acidity lifts the mouth and provides freshness to the palate.",Five Soldiers,Rustenberg
"A stunning Chard that shows the greatness of the vintage in the wine's superb balance between ripe fruit flavors of pear and melon and vibrant acidity. Soft floral accents add depth to the nose, while well-integrated oak flavors infuse the palate and spice up the long finish. Delicious now, but shows promise for some aging.",,Rustenberg
"It's slightly oversized to be truly a classic representation of Coonawarra Cabernet, but this wine still punches all the buttons, from cassis and cedar to mint and earth. It's firmly structured, with a finish that manages to be dry, velvety and mouthwatering, all at the same time. Drink now_2020.",Reserve Estate Grown,Penley Estate
"This ripe Grenache is full-bodied and fruit-driven, but seems to have the stuffing to last at least 3_4 years. Cherry-berry flavors are punched up by herb and spice shadings that linger on the finish.",Bush Vine,Chapel Hill
"Featuring some dusty tannins on the finish, this is fairly structured for Aussie Grenache. Dried herbs and dried cherries are balanced by hints of dusty earth on the long finish. Drink 2013_2017.",Blewitt Springs,Clarendon Hills
"This is a big, age-worthy 100% Cabernet Sauvignon. Tasted now, it's dryly tannic, with the black currant and crème de cassis flavors buried under a cloak of astringency. New oak, which comprises 80% of the barrels, adds even greater tannins. Give this wine at least six years, and it should continue to blossom in a good cellar for another decade.",Alexander,Volker Eisele Family Estate
"This 100% Merlot is sourced from Sagemoor Farms' Bacchus and Dionysus vineyards. For the first time, there is no Cabernet Franc in the blend. Richly fruity, with loads of cherry, raspberry compote and black currant flavors, this melds in grace notes of chocolate and caramel, seamlessly. Thick and flat-out luscious, yet structured with a tannic spine that gives definition and focus all the way through.",,Abeja
"A big, rounded wine, its acidity a foil to the ripe fruit and dusty texture. The structure is chunky and corpulent, the fruit strawberry and red plum fruit packed tightly. It is still integrating, definitely promising some long-term aging.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"Deep gold, the color of honey, picked at 53° brix, this is unbelievably dense and concentrated. Yet with the acidity in place, this wine has balance, support, and depth. It's not a fat, sugary blob. This drinks like a Canadian icewine. Honey, tropical fruits, candied orange, butterscotch, butter and toasted nuts__t just keeps on going.",Ice Wine,Poet's Leap
"With its solidly dry tannins, this is a powerhouse, very dark in texture, very structured. The fresh fruit is just showing from all this intensity. Still very youthful, this is an impressive wine for aging over many years.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"Ben Ryé is always a fabulous dessert wine from Pantelleria (an island off the coast of Sicily) and this expression shows beautiful liveliness and personality. You'll get aromas of stone fruit, apricot, honey, almond paste and even a spicy touch of fresh ginger. It feels smooth, rich and totally decadent.",Ben Ryé,Donnafugata
"Passiró is a gorgeous dessert wine from Lazio in central Italy that shows enormous beauty and harmony. The wine is thick and creamy and brightens the palate with its bouquet of honey, creamy vanilla, candied fruit and apricot. Pair it with pâté or aged cheese.",Passirò,Falesco
"A wine that makes you take notice. The bouquet is intense, with minerality, char, huge black-fruit aromas and handsome shadings of chocolate and coffee. Power and purity come on like gangbusters, and the flavors are a classic mix of blackberry, cassis and fine Swiss chocolate. Heady, smooth and impressive. My highest rated wine yet from Carlos Pulenta's Vistalba label. Drink now through 2014. Composed of 87% Malbec with Bonarda and Cabernet Sauvignon.",Corte A,Vistalba
"True to the dense, muscular style of Woodward Canyon's Merlots, this elevates the complexity in a near-perfect vintage. Deep and textural, it packs together concentrated red fruits, preserves and cassis. At first it shows a little heat from the 15% alcohol, but as it breathes open over hours (and even days) the primary fruit gives way to subtle veins of olive, earth, coffee and toast.",,Woodward Canyon
"A tremendous Cabernet, authoritative and exciting. Shows a great structure of acidity and tannins, with a cedar and sweet tobacco earthiness. Yet it's also explosive in blackberries, black cherries, red and black currants and anise liqueur. A real accomplishment, and a great compliment to the high-altitude Stagecoach Vineyard, which straddles the Atlas Peak and Napa Valley appellation lines. Drink now_2016.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Sequoia Grove
"Tal Lùc comes in an elegant little bottle that beautifully sets the stage for the fabulous dessert wine to follow. The color is deeply golden and saturated and aromas include toasted almond, dried yellow rose, candied fruit and apricot. The creamy texture would pair with something different than dessert, say a delicate sliver of duck liver pâté.",Tal Lùc,Lis Neris
"Gorgeous, elegant and ageworthy. With a softly tannic structure, it's drinkable now, but should age and gain complexity for 10 years. Dry and smooth, it has complex flavors of blackberries, black cherries, currants, red licorice, cola and oak. Give it some time to breathe. Now_2017.",Cask,Rubicon Estate
"This has the great aromatic complexity you expect from Rugiens. Generous and full textured, this is a full-bodied, rounded wine. Sweet red fruits, touched by spice, are well balanced with a streak of acidity. Wait for four years, at least.",Les Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine de Courcel
"Ripe, generous, powerful and opulent, the wine combines blackberry juice character with mature spice and mushroom flavors. This is a massive wine, with a gorgeous velvet texture, only a taut core of tannins. Despite moving towards a mature phase, it has many years ahead.",Les Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"Made with Zibibbo and a smaller percentage of Malvasia grapes, L'Ecrù is a fabulous Sicilian Passito dessert wine with unique aromas of candied fruit, orange zest, apricot, honey and a touch of natural rubber. The thick, syrupy mouthfeel is loaded tight with more apricot flavors.",L'Ecrù,Firriato
"Pure joy and beauty emanate from the gorgeous bouquet of this golden dessert wine from northeast Italy. Intense aromas include peach, apricot, honey, almond and yellow rose and the impression the wine makes in the mouth is that of density and opulence. You can pair it with a not too sweet dessert, like panna cotta, or drink it alone.",Tal Lùc,Lis Neris
"Gorgeous, rich Pinot flavors float over soft, ripe tannins. Strawberry-fruit flavors offer freshness and bright acidity. The dense texture is very evident, layered with wonderfully perfumed flavors from wood and fruit.",Les St.-Georges Premier Cru,Domaine Henri Gouges
"Juvelo is an awesome Gewürztraminer-based dessert wine from cool-climate northern Italy that shows pristine aromas of stone fruit, white almond blossom and citrus freshness. What helps make this wine stand apart is its light and delicate nature.",Juvelo,Andriano
"What a great wine for the price. It's made from various Napa mountain vineyards, and shows concentrated blackberry and black currant flavors, wrapped into superfine Napa tannins that go down with silky smoothness. Not cheap, but the price is a bargain compared to superexpensive Napa Cabs. At nearly 6,000 cases produced, it's a steal.",,Atlas Peak
"Fresh and firm, with juicy primary fruits that meld together flavors of tropical and stone fruits__ riot of papaya, peach, pineapple, candied lemon and more. The butterscotch barrel notes glide into the mid-palate and coat the back of the throat, resonating long after the wine is swallowed. Based on previous vintages, this is a surefire six to eight year wine for cellaring.",,Abeja
"A distinguished wine, with power and richness but also dignity. The structure is more fine than firm, showing some dark tannins but more black fruits. There is a mineral edge, giving some good tension, the wine finishing dense.",,Albert Bichot
"The richness of this wine is immediately evident. It defines lushness, opulence, velvety ripeness, complexity, in short, Napa Bordeaux at its heady best. It's not subtle, offering waves of blackberry jam, black currant and chocolate flavors, but it's so good, you just can't keep from drinking it. And after all, that's the first duty of wine. Only 550 cases produced. Drink now_2013.",ERA,Alpha Omega
"The tannins set the scene with their firm character and solid structure. Licorice and bitter coffee flavors follow, and only then do the fruits come in. Black cherries are firm and ripe, with black plum skin texture. The wine is very concentrated and powerful. Give it four years or more.",Les Suchots Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This is a beautiful and delicate dessert wine with lightly musty notes that appear in the back of candied fruit, orange zest, almond paste, stone fruit and vanilla cream. It feels light and buoyant on the close but also delivers the heft and personality you need for a pairing with aged goat cheese and apricot jelly.",Casa Lola,Tre Monti
"Fruit sources for this limited-production Walla Walla bottling of Northstar Merlot include Leonetti's Loess vineyard, and Windrow and Anna Marie in the Seven Hills. Thick, lush and richly evocative, it shows Napa-like density. Chocolatey black fruits and baking spices add to the rich midpalate, which qualifies for the often-abused word __edonistic.'",,Northstar
"Just exquisite, combining power with elegance to produce a truly great Pinot Noir. The vineyard is in the heart of the appellation. The cool climate has made it dry, crisp and silky, but it shows powerfully concentrated cherry, pomegranate, mocha and bacon flavors, with overlays of smoky sandalwood. Compellingly good, this Pinot will develop over the next 6_8 years.",Rosella's Vineyard,Roar
"Textbook Howell Mountain Cabernet, classic in the volume of its tannins and the intensity of its fruit. Massive and delicious in blackberry, currant, dark chocolate and oak flavors that sink down into the palate and stay there. So good now, it's hard not to drink, but should develop bottle complexity over the next 10 years.",,Robert Craig
"Grown on Antinori's original property, high on Atlas Peak, although you'd never know it from searching the front or back labels. It's a very fine wine, dry and elegantly constructed, with little of the baby fat over-the-topness that affects some Napa Cabs. Within that firm structure are extraordinarily complex blackberry, black currant and spicy plum flavors. Delicious now despite the firm tannins, and should develop over the next 8_10 years, at least.",Antinori Family Estate,Antica
"Shows the softness and herbal quality that mark Alexander Valley Cabernet, in the best sense. The wine feels fine and beautiful in the mouth, with the complexity and elegance to pair with great food. Delightful for its cherry, berry, currant, cola and oak flavors. Great now, and should develop over the next five years.",Best Barrels,Blue Rock
"A powerful, almost severe wine, with a strong core of dry tannins over the black fruits. There are hints of red cherry and spice from wood. The main structure dominates, and will need several years to round out.",Les Epenots Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"A wine that is closed up at this stage. But beneath the surface there is a wine that will revel in delicious red fruits with barnyard flavors, ripe fruits and sweet tannins. As it opens, it reveals richness and generosity.",Clos de l'Eco Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"This dark wine opens with bright fruit aromas that are soft and straightforward. The wine presents bold cherry, blackberry and spicy rum cake flavors, and a mouthfeel that is fresh and round. The finish is dominated by chewy berry fruit.",Riserva,Fattoi
"Licorice, ripe fruit, ginger, lemon zest, crushed stone, cassis and wild berry notes are bold, but in the mouth the wine is lean and compact, with a particularly bright and fresh feel in the mouth. There's even a menthol note at the very end.",,Fattoria dei Barbi
"A dark, masculine, brooding Brunello, with savory aromas of leather and cured meat behind ripe fruit and blackberry. It's tight and clean, with a streamlined mouthfeel that testifies to the wine's firm tannic structure. Executed in a traditional style, it shows possibilities for long-term aging.",,Altesino
"A unique and individual style of Sherry, even among palo cortados. It's dark amber in color, with a pungent mix of aromas that include molasses, raw brown sugar, chocolate and campfire. Feels fresh on the tongue, with coffee, dark chocolate and core peach and citrus flavors.",Apostoles Palo Cortado Viejo,González Byass
"A full-bodied wine with cured meat, barbecue, black fruit, toasted almond, leather and tobacco aromas. It feels smooth and opulent, with good structure and a velvety texture.",Salvioni,La Cerbaiola
"This wine definitely shows a ripe side in its cured meat, tobacco, sandalwood, smoked bacon and old spice. Delivers a rich, plump feel in the mouth, backed by gritty tannins and bright acidity. Despite the cooler vintage, this wine packs power, heat and a tiny touch of sweetness on the close.",Riserva,Tenuta Oliveto
"Named for the winemaker's youngest daughter, this ripe and sweet selection boasts intense oak-driven aromas of butter and creamy vanilla that mingle well with the honeydew, pear and peach notes. Thankfully, there's good cut to the round mouthfeel, as zesty orange-flavored acidity keeps the finish fresh and long. Drink now_2014.",Cuvée Anaïs,Vins d'Orrance
"It may just be that this 84% Tempranillo blend (plus 12% Graciano, 4% Garnacha) needs some more time in bottle to develop, in which case it will only get better. In the meantime it has undeniable juicy, red fruit, grippy tannins that are just starting to mellow and is overall a very savory and delicious wine. Fermented as a field blend, The Spaniard mingled for months in all-new French oak and would go gangbusters with lamb or other red meats.",The Spaniard,Twisted Oak
"Inky-dark and superconcentrated. Notes of coal, licorice, crushed peppercorn, river stone and dark fruit are so big and bold, it's hard to imagine with which foods it would pair best.",Campogiovanni,San Felice
"Light in color, with pecan pie aromas. There's nothing heavy or blowsy about this refined palo cortado; it's tight in the mouth, with narrowing acidity and tangy, oily flavors of citrus, almond and rancio. Long as they come on the finish, with zero excess weight.",Marqués de Rodil Palo Cortado,Hidalgo
"Classic Brunello, albeit in a bold, dense style. Delicate, ethereal Sangiovese accents emerge, but the wine is also packed tight with modern aromas of spice, leather and dark chocolate. It shows nice balance and complexity. Textured tannins and tight structure keep it firmly in place.",,La Collina dei Lecci
"There's a bright, pungent, in-your-face aroma of dried fruit and black currant. Maybe a touch of dried apple, too. This wine offers dark concentration with loads of density and intensity. Plush, rich and nicely framed by firm tannins and a drying mineral note, it shows positive evolution in the glass.",Riserva,La Palazzetta
"A solid wine, with plum skin and dry tannin textures. It does have the ripe fruit of 2009, attractive red fruits and juicy acidity. But it needs aging over at least three years to show its fruitiness.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Linear and bright, with firm structure and smoky hints of leather, tobacco and candied fruit. This is a bold, austere Brunello, with notes of root beer and white pepper on the close.",Riserva,Le Macioche
"Rich, ripe and full aromas of baked apple and melon are laced with spicy accents of cinnamon, ginger and vanilla bean. Medium weight but well-balanced in the mouth; bright acidity and minerality tie everything together on the palate. A lime flavor lingers on the long close, followed finally by a touch of spice. Drink now_2015.",,Buitenverwachting
"This Brunello presents a classic, textbook bouquet with red fruit, spice, cola and pressed flowers__ut with a subdued, mild delivery. The wine shows aromatic intensity but not in an exaggerated fashion. The tannins are dry, firm and dusty and there's a wood-driven finish of spice and rolled pipe tobacco.",,Canneta
"Sweet new wood goes with rich plum skins in a wine that has a firm structure. The richness of the wine revolves around sweet cherries and juicy acidity. With the wood still dominant, it needs at least five years to settle down.",Les Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"Inky dark concentration combines with a youthful, almost grapy quality in the mouth. Cola, chewy fruit, ripe density and exotic spices all are present while the mouthfeel is lean, crisp and structured.",,Donna Olga
"A perfect recreational player's drive, right down the middle of the fairway, this wine neatly splits the range of flavors between savory and fruity, blending meaty, olive notes with mixed berries and vanilla. Long and lushly textured on the finish, like velvet. Drink now_2020.",Estate Grown,Coriole
"A brutish, muscular style of Shiraz, filled with intense notes of plum and tar and accented by hints of coconut and vanilla. Yet for all its concentration and richness, the finish is surprisingly elegant. Drink now_2018.",The Vicar,Chapel Hill
"This Rosso boasts impressively intense and pure Sangiovese aromas. The wine is compackt, with red berry, rum cake, dried rosemary, ginger and spice. It's a small step away from the quality of Brunello at a fraction of the price.",,Capanne Ricci
"Cassis, cola, leather, dried ginger, dried spice, cherry and black licorice all play out on this wine's smooth, silky finish. Very nice length with a smooth, silky endnote. Ripe tannins balance crisp acidity.",,Terre Nere
"Neutral on the nose with smoked ham and dark leather tones, this wine shows tertiary aromas of wild mushroom, earth and black licorice. It has a ripe, round quality to its fruit, with firm structure. Very tangy, bright and refreshing on the close.",Riserva,Poggio Rubino
"After it oozes rubber and bacon on the nose, berry fruit and mild medicinal aromas settle in. Feels full, tight and structured, with meat, black cherry and wild berry flavors. Finishes warm, chocolaty and lightly roasted. Well-made, and impressive for the price.",Crianza,Martín Berdugo
"An excellent value, the 2008 Gold Label Shiraz is a full-bodied, powerfully built wine, filled out by cassis, chocolate and tobacco flavors. It's long and velvety on the finish, not just an upfront powerhouse. Drink now_2020.",Gold Label,Wolf Blass
"A bright, lively Brunello that happily sheds all pretense. It's a wine that communicates Sangiovese Grosso in a straightforward, confident and natural manner. There's bright berry fruit, firm structure and a lean, compact mouthfeel with silky tannins. But don't mistake this for a simple wine. It's not. It shows delicate complexity and elegance.",,Collelceto
"Full, lusty and slightly floral smelling, with notes of leather, crusty berry and hoisin sauce. Feels thick, with body and weight along with flavors of berry, cookie dough and floral hints. Long, meaty and slightly herbal on the finish, with just enough complexity to nudge it ahead. Drink now through 2015.",Crianza,Convento Oreja
"Fruit stars in this young, rich Cabernet. It's as good as young, drink-me-now Napa Cab gets, offering waves of blackberries, cherries, plums, sweet oak and spices that go on and on into long finish. The tannins are perfectly ripe, the acidity fine and brisk.",,Atlas Peak
"After picking yourself up off the floor having digested the price, the wine is excellent but not otherwordly. Sweet, dense and calm on the nose, with alluring black fruit and raisin aromas. Feels hefty and gritty, with rooty, sweet flavors of brown sugar and baked blackberry. Finishes round, big and smooth, with generally good balance. 120 cases made; drink now through 2014.",Parcela 26 Limited Edition,Finca Flichman
"Firmly tannic, showing rich black fruits and sweet juicy berry flavors, along with a dry core of structure that promises aging. A powerful wine, it has weight as well as delicious final acidity.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Light in color and bright in intensity, this luminous late-harvest Moscadello boasts enormous purity of aromas. The wine is also delicate and feminine with tones of yellow rose, vanilla cream and apricot that accent it's thick, creamy texture. Not cloying or too sweet; would pair well with pâté.",Vendemmia Tardiva,La Poderina
"The vineyard is right next to those of Melville and Babcock, in the appellation's northern tenderloin. The wine is rich, full-bodied and ripe, quite dense and concentrated. Shows masses of black cherries, raspberries, currants, licorice, beef jerky and spicy sandalwood, leading to a long finish. This Pinot Noir needs time. Best after 2013.",Turner Vineyard,Samsara
"This is the first all-estate-grown Chardonnay bottled by Woodward Canyon since 2003. Fermented in one-year-old Burgundy barrels, it's a Washington Chablis that brings exceptional focus and persistence to bear on flavors of intense citrus, honeyed candy, orange peel, spice and even a slim hint of chocolate. The mix of fruit, herb and mineral combines to create a terroir-laden wine that is beautifully complex and proportioned.",Estate,Woodward Canyon
"Fully botrytised, 46% residual sugar, from 30-year-old vines, this is an unctuous, TBA-style dessert wine. Honeyed and decadently rich, it soaks its peach and apricot fruit in a thick wash of honey and caramel, streaked with mocha and lightly scented with jasmine highlights. Should age for decades.",Golden Berry Select,Olsen Estates
"A Poet's Leap botrytis-affected Riesling was first done in 2005; this is the second. Opens with a sensational smorgasbord of scents from honey and citrus to pineapple, celery, cucumber, orange blossom, lemon verbena and so on and on. Full bodied and extremely youthful, this has a long life ahead.",Botrytis,Poet's Leap
"Inspired by the Italian word for pearl, La Perlara is a delicious dessert wine that boasts a luminous golden color and intense aromas of honey, almond, apricot and sweet yellow rose. There's also a touch of piquant spice at the end that sets it apart, and the mouthfeel is indeed as smooth and silky as a pearl.",La Perlara,Ca' Rugate
"Already a beautifully balanced wine, with firm tannin, ripe cherry fruits and a fine, elegant structure. A plush feel is just beginning to develop, showing through the tight, closed youthful texture.",Clos des Chênes Premier Cru,Domaine des Comtes Lafon
"Initially, the red fruits dominate, exploding in the mouth. Then the tannins take over, giving a wine that is hugely structured and powerful. The fruits, though, are as impressive as the tannins, the combination giving a wine that is both juicy and smoky, finished with new wood.",Les Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"This wine is dry and crisp and enormously complex. It flatters the palate with waves of blackberries, cherries, currants, tangerines, bacon, white pepper and sweet vanilla oak, and the all-important tannin structure is fine. It's 94% Syrah, while 6% Viognier brings the perfect bite of acidity and citrus.",Sixer,Coquelicot
"The Knoll Grüner style is for a hint of steel, doses of minerality and not too much ornateness despite the wonderfully elaborate traditional bottle labels. The intense fruit, spice and peach character is balanced by acidity, a taut, nervy edge. It will certainly age for 5_6 years.",Ried Loibenberg Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"A ripe, red berry-fruit flavored wine, highlighted with sweet cherries. At this young stage, it shows more fruit than structure. Tannins are here, likely to flesh out the wine as it develops. For the moment, enjoy the great swathes of sweet fruit.",Ile de Vergelesses Premier Cru,Domaine Chandon de Briailles
"This is beautifully aromatic and assertively tannic, with monster fruit that overtakes the 100% new oak and shows no hint of heat from the 15.5% alcohol. It's big, yet graceful, with veins of smoke and rock wrapped around the dense cassis and berry fruit. Young as it is, this has immense concentration and depth.",The Evil Twin,Gorman
"This Brut-style wine feels extraordinarily refined in the mouth, with a silky, airy texture. The flavors of toffee, butterscotch, orange marmalade and vanilla bean are rich, but balanced with yeasty bitterness and bright acidity. Gorgeous to drink now, anywhere, anytime, with practically anything. Pricey, yes, but worth it for special occasions.",Joy! Rosé,Iron Horse
"Dark and structured, powered by smoky tannins and plum skin texture. The wine is just beginning, its weight an indication of good aging potential. It is firm and dense, the acidity providing an attractive final freshness.",,Joseph Drouhin
"For sheer deliciousness, it's hard to beat this Syrah. It shows intensely concentrated blackberry, cherry and liqueur flavors, with rich, smoky oak complexities, and the mouthfeel is pure velvet. For all the richness, the wine finishes dry and elegant. Compellingly good, and a worthy alternative to a great Napa Valley Cabernet.",Three Creek Vineyard,Andrew Murray
"Closed up at this stage, firm and powerful. The potential is here, with concentrated black fruits and dark tannins. As it develops, it will show a rich side, the tannins more tarry, the berry fruits sweeter. Age for at least five years.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Aux Malconsorts Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"The Vigne de l'Enfant Jésus is a 10-acre parcel in the heart of the Grèves vineyard that once belonged to Carmelite nuns. This vintage, while marked by acidity and soft fruit, does have a firm edge of dark tannins, filled out with plum and red cherry flavors.",Vigne de l'Enfant Jésus Grèves Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Very firm, very straight__he severe side of Chambolle-Musigny. The tannins are dense, giving a wine that has a solid fruit structure, coffee and licorice flavors, very dark in character, concentrated.",Les Baudes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"With its fine tannic structure, plum juice sweetness and beautifully ripe fruits, this is a wine that combines structure with a rich velvet coat. The acidity gives a fine lift, bringing out strawberries and a final piercing freshness.",Les Amoureuses Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"Dark colored, highly perfumed wine, packing rich fruit with its ripe, chunky structure. Black berries give a juicy character, taming the acidity, and allowing the wood smoke to wreath around the wine. Age for at leasy six years, but this can withstand more.",,Maison Champy
"A delectable, perfumed wine, with sweet and intense fruit flavors and a soft, velvet character. Soft Pinot Noir, full of black fruits, plums and red cherries. Needs medium-term aging, perhaps four years.",Clos des Chênes Premier Cru,Domaine Michel Lafarge
"The Celilo Vineyard is arguably the finest location in Washington for growing Gewürztraminer, and over the years quite a few winemakers from both Washington and Oregon have worked with these grapes. No one does a better job than Chris Dowsett, and this new vintage is his finest to date. A thrilling wine, from the first sniff to the last lingering sip__emon peel, sappy citrus fruits, rich minerals, perfect acidity_ it's all here in spades.",Celilo Vineyard,Dowsett Family
"A terrific Cabernet that gives all the richness and opulence you expect in an expensive Napa Cab, yet controls it with firm tannins, acidity, minerals and earthiness. Explosive in blackberry and cherry-pie filling and chocolate granola-bar flavors that are so delicious, you can't stop reaching for another glass. The grapes come 100% from the winery's Atlas Peak appellation vineyard.",,Bialla
"Zinfandel isn't ordinarily a wine you want to age, but this dry, tannic bottle will improve in the cellar. Made from Seghesio's estate vineyard in the southern Alexander Valley, it's amazingly rich in mulberry, currant, spice and mineral flavors, with beautiful tannins and perfect acidity. It's gorgeous now, with a few hours of decanting, but will show increasing interest over the next four to six years.",San Lorenzo,Seghesio
"The 2008 Devotion is 41% Syrah, 30% Mourvèdre and 29% Grenache. Winemaker Chris Dowsett notes that he is upping the percentage of Mourvèdre again in the 2009 version. It's a significant improvement, elevating this blend into a rarefied, tightly controlled, sculpted wine with wild berry and cherry, iron filings, dark chocolate and licorice, wrapped in firm, polished tannins.",Devotion,Dowsett Family
"There's a streak of citrus running down the spine. The lively acidity adds some zip to the blackberry and black cherry fruit. There's a smoky edge to the polished tannins, but those lemony acids keep the wine bright and fresh, penetrating into a lingering finish with sweet cracker and pepper highlights.",Reserve,Dusted Valley
"A beautiful wine, dry and classically structured, showing the elegant balance for aging. Made from 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, it's long and deep in blackberries and cassis. Give it a brief decant if you open it now, but it should develop over the next six years, at least.",,Corison
"At 40 acres, Saint-Pierre is small for the Médoc, but it is certainly performing well. As fine as the 2005, the 2008 is a stylish wine that also packs a firm punch of dense fruit, firm tannins and mouthwateringly juicy acidity. For medium-term aging.",,Château Saint-Pierre
"Full of fruit, this rich wine packs plums and cherries into a style that is sumptuous, with great ripeness. The tannins are soft, sweet and roll well into the rounded structure.",Santenots Premier Cru,Domaine des Comtes Lafon
"The vineyard, which is in St. Helena, certainly yielded grapes that were ripe, to judge by this wine's flavors. It's gigantic in berries, cherries, mocha and spices that are jammy and sweet. The best thing about it are the tannins, which are smooth and complex. Give this flashy young Petite Sirah a couple years to integrate and mellow.",Hayne Vineyard,Jacob Franklin
"This wine is a bright, plump and succulent expression of Sangiovese Grosso, showing easy, crisp structure enhanced by bold aromas of plum, leather and spice. There's a silky, fine nature to the polished tannins.",,Canalicchio di Sopra
"This is a special expression of Sangiovese (and a small amount of Cannaiolo) with a pure, luminous quality aided by subtle aromas of forest berry, white licorice, cola and pressed lavender. It's an elegant wine from start to finish.",Testamatta Soffocone di Vincigliata,Bibi Graetz
"Toasty and sweet on the nose, however it's not very complex. Feels juicy and refined, with raisin, fig and date flavors. Long on the finish and chocolaty tasting, with raisin and a lightness of being. Sweet within the style, but not unctuous or candied.",Solera Cream,Alvear
"Bonterra is offering up some serious yumminess here, from organic grapes grown in Lake County. The sweet wine opens with a sweet floral nose and a lot of minerality graduating into a concentrated thickness of golden honey-graham flavors.",Bartolucci Vineyard,Bonterra
"A delicious Sauv Blanc from one of the coolest areas of South Africa, it takes a while for this wine to fully express itself. Green pepper and grass start on the nose, but then subside to allow green fig, lime rind and tart tropical fruit accents to unfold. Balanced and refreshing, with a fynbos herb note that remains through the long finish, almost like fresh hops.",Pincushion Vineyard,Lomond
"Bramble and forest floor, cherry cola and savory bresaola notes amount to pretty aromatics with less bulkiness in the mouth. The structure is there but this wine is a bit dry, sharp and less fleshy than many others.",Pian delle Vigne,Marchesi Antinori
"At the heart of Chianti Classico, Badia a Passignano is among the most beautiful wine properties in the world with an ancient abbey that crowns softly rolling hills. This wine is packed tightly with bright cherry, spice and tobacco notes, and lingering touches of wild berry and cola.",Badia a Passignano Riserva,Marchesi Antinori
"Solid as a boulder and concentrated on the bouquet, with a mix of floral, fine perfume and blackberry aromas. Feels lush, complete and easygoing, with blackberry, cassis and chocolate flavors. Graceful and composed on the back end.",,Tapiz
"A Chardonnay-based sparkler, this rich and concentrated wine has a luscious mix of apricot, peach and papaya fruit flavors in a creamy, textural setting. Exceptional length and development in the glass, which keeps bringing in nuances such as vanilla and pepper.",Brut,Treveri Cellars
"Ripe aromas of dark fruit, crème de cassis and cherry liqueur. The wine is thick, juicy and chewy, with a touch of tightness or astringency on the close.",Riserva,Terre Nere
"A raisiny and ultraripe Bordeaux-style blend, two-thirds Cabernet Sauvignon. It has apparently been given a lot of time in heavily-toasted barrels, and the layers of smoke, espresso, cinnamon and tobacco dominate. A wine for those who like the blockbuster, oaky style.",Owens Reserve,Robert O. Smasne
"A soft, exceptionally ripe Zinfandel, sweet in what tastes like residual sugar, although the sweetness also comes from very high alcohol. The flavors are pure Paso Robles, all about black cherries, raspberries, red plums, red licorice, bacon and exotic spices. A splash of Petite Sirah brings tannic depth and weight. This is a good example of Peachy Canyon's style.",Mustard Creek,Peachy Canyon
"Very acidic, giving the ripe tropical fruit and green pea flavors an almost sparkling spritziness. But very rich and flamboyant and complex. This wine was tasted at just about a year of age, and should calm down by summer 2012.",Clone 76 Inox,Melville
"Shows the richness of Mount Veeder fruit and also the Rubissow style, which emphasizes massively extracted fruit. Just overwhelms with jammy blackberries, cherries, mocha, licorice and vanilla. The tannins are polished and pretty, being firm yet soft at the same time. Give it a decant and drink now.",,Rubissow
"A bright and direct Brunello with aromatic intensity in the form of small berry, almond skin, toasted espresso and nut notes. There's a charred, toasted element to the wine that at this young stage adds some astringency to the mouthfeel. Finishes firm and crisp.",,Poggio Rubino
"A concoction of 66% Zinfandel, 33% Syrah and 1% Viognier that's thick in tannins, meat and dusty earth, or is it earthy dust? The black licorice is mighty memorable.",Tributary,Cabot Vineyards
"Anderson Valley is better known for Pinot Noir and Chardonnay, but the cool climate is also good for Sauvignon Blanc. Foursight's 2010 is a delightful wine, vibrant in citrus, tropical fruit and peach flavors, and there's no oak to interfere with its purity. With a finish that seems just a little sweet, it's a fine companion for Asian fare.",Charles Vineyard,Foursight
"A great value, this Merlot-dominant blend, with splashes of Cab Sauv and Cab Franc exudes ripe aromas and flavors of rich dark fruit and berries jazzed up with layers of cigar tobacco, leather, savory herbs and tree bark. Concentrated and mouthfilling, with a velvety texture, it's a well-balanced wine with fine, but persistent tannins and a lengthy finish.",Three,Constantia Glen
"This vineyard-designated Riserva shows a broad portfolio of tertiary aromas with crushed stone, licorice, cassis, leather and smoked meat. It is evolved and silky, with a fresh, crisp close and enough complexity to ride smoothly across the palate.",Vigna Fontelontano Riserva,Collemattoni
"This wien is rich in balsam notes of eucalyptus, dried rosemary, ginger and cherry cola. The bouquet is distinctive, and the wine ends with a bright, fresh finish.",,Castello Romitorio
"Made in a style to appeal to the popular taste for Cabernet, and succeeds wildly. It's delicious, offering waves of blackberries, cherries and plums, wrapped in firm, ripe tannins and finished with smoky oak. No mere fruit bomb, it's a complex wine with a long, spicy finish. Drink now_2014.",,Bennett Lane
"Much improved from past efforts, this firm and fruity Tempranillo has a lush core of boysenberry and black cherry fruit. It's finished with screwcap, and may require decanting to push it open, but it will reward your patience with a deep and focused wine that has some cellar potential.",,Airfield Estates
"Shows the silky dryness and elegance you want in a Pinot Noir, with brisk acidity framing sour cherry, pomegranate and persimmon fruit flavors. Really grows on you as it sits in the glass, warming up and developing complexity. The vineyard has been quite a successful source of grapes to several wineries, including Blessing.",Split Rock Vineyard,Blessing
"Round and welcoming up front, with toffee, caramel and mocha aromas that are not too sharp. Feels smooth, with pure flavors of toasted nuts, caramel, cocoa dust, dried apricot and underripe peach. Complex and nutty on the finish, with a sweet aftertaste of chocolate and toffee.",_lite Oloroso,Bodegas Dios Baco S.L.
"Acidity and ripe fruit mark this Chardonnay, which is lovely to drink now. Don't chill it too much, to allow the orange, pineapple and passionfruit flavors to express their nuances.",Estate,Melville
"Complex, integrated and solid up front, with berry aromas, vanilla notes and toasty oak. Feels full, thick, staunch and balanced, with deep berry and cherry flavors leading to a toasty, peppery finish with leftover berry flavors. Well formed and well oaked, with excellent fruit quality. Drink now through 2014.",Elite Vendimia Seleccionada,Prado Rey
"This Brunello opens with a sweet nose of vanilla and cherry. The bouquet is straightforward, giving the wine a frank, no-nonsense personality. Flavors of spice, leather and tobacco appear later, rendering more depth. It feels youthful, soft and chewy on the close.",,Villa I Cipressi
"A concentrated, intense wine, filled with cherry-berry fruit and more than a hint of vanilla. It's tart and edgy, with some firm tannins on the finish, so hold it another 12 months and then drink it over the next 5_6 years.",,Sidewood
"A forward, oak-inspired character leads the nose with scents of vanilla and soft toast, but is supported by the solid fruit core of blueberry, mulled boysenberry and black plum guts. Attractive and rich in the mouth, with a firm but accessible structure and lifting acidity. Drink now_2015.",,Spice Route
"A wine that is ripe and relatively soft. It does offer some dense tannins, but these are surrounded by rich black plum and ripe berry fruits. The structure comes from wood aging and fruit as much as from tannins. The final flavors are delicious, smoky and toasty.",Les St.-Georges Premier Cru,Domaine Henri Gouges
"Luscious and seriously structured, this is a wine that offers the dense texture of a Gevrey Grand Cru vineyard. It has rich fruit, touched by chocolate and licorice, as well as ripe black fruits. For aging over 4_5 years and more.",,Henri de Villamont
"Fruity, floral and calm on the nose, with nothing aggressive or out of place. The palate is deep, flush and offers great mouthfeel, while the flavors run toward big, juicy berry, cassis and chocolate. Like most Catena high-enders, this Cabernet-Malbec blend features a toasty finish of coffee and mocha, and overall it's stylish and impressive. Drink now through 2014.",Nicolas Catena Zapata,Bodega Catena Zapata
"As so often results from this vineyard, this is a lovely wine, the fruit ripe and showing considerable sweetness as well as richness. The structure is soft, open and elegant, surrounding the core of sweet tannins. Not for long-term aging, but worth waiting 4_5 years.",Les Amoureuses Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"The beautiful moated Issan Château is producing better wine every year. This 2008, from a vineyard that was badly hit by hail that year, has an elegance and style that is very much in keeping with southern Margaux. There is also a fine balancing density, sweet plum fruit and, with its fine tannins, great aging potential.",,Château d'Issan
"This vintage of Florus shows enormous purity and elegance and the various floral, fruit and almond aromas show seamless integration. The wine is thick, creamy and dense on the palate, but a zesty touch of acidity and chopped mint keeps it from ever feeling sticky or heavy.",Florus,Castello Banfi
"Co-fermented with a small quantity of Viognier, this Syrah was aged in 100% new oak. It's flashy and completely satisfying to drink now. Starts a little soft and dry, then explodes midpalate into a burst of cherry and raspberry fruit, with creamy, caramelized notes. The finish is long-lasting and elegant.",_ber,Margerum
"Give this Cabernet some time in the cellar. Right now, it's a little tough in acids and tannins, although the blackberry, cherry, black currant and smoky oak flavors are rich and fine and enjoyable now. But it should soften and be even more approachable after 2013.",Ghielmetti Vineyard,Steven Kent
"Big, big, big! This is a mountain-grown Bordeaux blend, based on Cabernet Sauvignon, and it's tremendous all around. Explodes in jammy blackberries, blueberries, currants, cherries and mocha, and the tannins are strong, but refined. Combines elegance and power, and should develop over the next 6_8 years.",Buck Pasture,Mauritson
"This Sancerre-like effort shows amazing concentration and distinct, vineyard-driven flavors of grain and herb. Racy, textural, crisp and penetrating, it's lifted by a refreshing minerality. Lemon polish, citrus oil, a very delicate suggestion of honey in the nose and mouth, and above all a wonderful persistence make this a standout Sauvignon Blanc.",Estate,Woodward Canyon
"From the excellent 2001 vintage, this opulent and intense Vin Santo (a traditional dessert wine from Tuscany) reveals layers of honey, almond paste, dried apricot and butterscotch. There's great complexity and elegance here and the wine would pair with an assortment of aged cheeses.",,Volpaia
"Soft and ripe, with a sprinkling of pepper and spice, this is a rich, gentle wine. The tannins are open, lying under the lively black and red berry fruits. It will age over the next few years, but is not for the long-term.",Les Epenots Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"Cantine Barbera has produced a beautiful Passito dessert wine that shows feminine harmony and balance. The natural intensity is here; Aromas of apricot, honey, candied fruit and almond paste emerge with confidence from the nose. In the mouth, the wine is particularly sweet and smooth.",Albamarina,Cantine Barbera
"Smoky and dark, with serious aromas of black licorice, earth and lush berry. The palate has a great feel to it along with huge flavors of cassis, blackberry, black peppercorn, coffee and sweet coconut. It's stellar from front to back, with coffee, mocha and silky tannins on the finish. Composed of 60% Malbec with 35% Cabernet Sauvignon and small parts Tannat and Petit Verdot. Drink now through 2013.",Amano Remolinos Vineyard,Finca Decero
"A powerful wine, packed with solid tannins, giving rich fruit over the hard, youthful structure. Black tannins and complex bitter chocolate and acidity suggest this is a wine that still needs time to knit together. The final is big and generous.",,Henri de Villamont
"An elegant style, showing a fresh character, packed with red berries, softly textured. It is a beautiful wine. Though not for long-term aging, it has great style, finishing with perfectly formed acidity and spice.",Les Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine de Montille
"Capezzana has crafted a very beautiful and intense Vin Santo that would pair with slivers of aged Tome Chèvre or another piquant cheese. The wine boasts a deep amber color and and sweet layers of maple syrup, honey, candied fruit and chestnut.",Contini Bonacossi,Capezzana
"As before, this features fruit from Conner-Lee, here with some Lewis vineyard grapes added to bring in more minerality. The result is a well-crafted mix of grapes from these two premier vineyards, with a tight core of chalk-laden citrus fruits. Persistent and resonant, the fruit is edged with citrus skin and brings a pat of butter at the end.",,JM Cellars
"A stunningly good, young Cabernet, marked by rich, ripe flavors of blackberries, black currant and cedar flavors, wrapped into strong but fine tannins. Lovely and sweet now, with some decanting, and should develop bottle complexity over the next 6_8 years.",,Materra Cunat Family Vineyards
"This is a beautiful, intricate and appealing Cabernet to drink with upscale fare, like a very fine steak. It's bone dry, but very rich and sweet in blackberry, cherry and currant fruit, and there's a nice cut of acidity for balance. Steven Kent is producing today's greatest Livermore Cabernets, wines that hearken back to the valley's roots as one of California's best wine regions. Drink now_2013.",Estate Grown,Steven Kent
"Tenuta Capofaro's beauty is captured in this precious wine, in its golden color and bright aromas of peach, honey and white almond. The creamy finish is sweet and delicious.",Tenuta Capofaro,Tasca d'Almerita
"This amber, thickly extracted Vin Santo from Chianti Classico opens with intense aromas of butterscotch, marron glacé, honey-roasted almond and brown sugar. It's beautiful and intense down to the succulent core and offers fleshy layers of syrupy sugar.",Conti Capponi,Villa Calcinaia
"Spicy, rich and concentrated, the important element of acidity working with the ripeness of the juicy black fruits. The wine has density, pushing tannins through to the ripe fruits. It shows a dry element that will take time to integrate.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Aux Malconsorts Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Calcaia is an elegant dessert wine from Umbria that has seen botrytis. Delicate aromas of candied fruit, honey and apricot make for an impressive bouquet.",Calcaia,Barberani
"A dense and serious wine, layering acidity with tight tannins. Under this surface firmness, the red-berry fruit is sumptuous with great juicy freshness. It is a great bringing together of structure, roundness and lively acidity.",Clos des Mouches Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"Firm and solid, this is a wine marked by blackberries, solid and dense tannins. The concentration will bring all the elements together to give an important wine, while never losing the 2008 acidity.",Les Porrets St.-Georges Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Another fine vintage for this Wahluke Slope vineyard. A sophisticated and muscular Cabernet Franc, with smooth and smoky flavors of mixed blackberries and black currants. The blend is 88% Cab Franc, 6% Syrah, 4% Merlot and 2% Cab Sauvignon, and it opens into a pretty nose with sweet grain and clover accents, runs into ripe, powerful fruit, and finishes with a kiss of clove.",RiverBend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"Structured and still fresh, an enticing wine that dances with its acidity and crisp tannins. At the same time, the texture is relatively closed, promising some more aging.",Clos de Chênes Premier Cru,Domaine Michel Lafarge
"From the winery's estate vineyard high on the mountain comes this young wine. Although it's tight in tannins and acidity, it's extraordinarily rich in blueberry, blackberry, chocolate and roasted almond flavors, like a granola bar. Alcohol of 15.3% provides a slightly hot, sweetly tart counterpoint to the fruit. A gorgeous Cabernet to drink now with a perfect steak.",,Dos Lagos Vineyards
"Superb, rich, fruited wine that has an intense creamy character to go with spice and ripe apples, peach and greengage. It has great elegance, a very stylish character, keeping the richness beautifully in balance. Age this wine for 3_4 years.",Ried Kreutles Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"A nice evocation of Santa Maria Valley Pinot Noir, showing rich raspberry, cherry, persimmon and crushed dark spice flavors, framed in a silky texture. Produced from the Solomon Hills and Sierra Madre vineyards. Now_2016.",,Rusack
"A good value in New World Cabernet, with supple, silky tannins framing cassis fruit that's just starting to show some evolution toward cedar, leather and earth. Lingering vanilla and a burst of tart berries mark the finish. Drink now_2018.",,Morambro Creek
"A complex blend of 75% Shiraz, 10% Cinsault, 8% Cab Sauv, 6% Gren and 1% each of Carignan and Mourvèdre, this is a concentrated and flavorful selection that's brimming with raspberry sauce and dark berry fruit aromas and flavors. Framed by black tea, sweet spice and vanilla bean accents, the mouth is firmly structured with medium tannins and acidity, ending on a soft, roasty note.",Secateurs,A.A. Badenhorst Family Wines
"This is all Merlot, tight and toasty, with generous black fruits compacted into a dense core. This one needs more bottle age, and/or substantial decanting time, but it shows excellent depth and polish already.",,Airfield Estates
"For affordable amontillado, this is downright excellent. Smells nutty and oily, maybe a touch sharp, but well within normal parameters. Feels fresh, round and comfortable, with lots of core fruit flavor, nuttiness, sweet toffee and caramel. Finishes with toasted pecan flavors and peanut butter notes. Semidry in style.",Amontillado,Bodegas Dios Baco S.L.
"This impressive Rosso offers lush aromas of rum cake, coffee, spice, pipe tobacco and dark fruit. It shows warm, earthy or leathery notes in the mouth that are rounded off by fresh Sangiovese acidity.",,Caprili
"A delicious Sauvignon Blanc, really fine. It showcases how well this cool little corner of Monterey County, with its stony soils, ripens white wines. Brisk in acidity and laden with minerals, it offers rich flavors of citrus fruits, white flowers, white currants and spices.",Coquina,Deep Sea
"Packed tight with power and minty, earthy berry aromas that come with a dry dustiness. Feels ripe and proper, with a slight tannic grab and full but fresh flavors of wild berry, cassis, cocoa and oak. On the finish, chocolate and dry spice flavors take over, yielding a pleasant, complete whole. Drink now through 2015.",,Finca La Mata
"Pure, condensed and dark on the nose, with blasting aromas of blackberry, crusty spice and char, this is packed like an overstuffed suitcase, with flavors of jammy black fruit, fine herbs and spice. Shows more big fruit on the finish and plenty of lasting berry flavor. Drink now through 2014.",Reserva,Finca Valpiedra
"Good berry aromas form a nice opening, and there are solid spice and herbal notes to boot. Feels juicy, well-cut and tighter than in years past, with blackberry, tea, spice and cured meat flavors. Oaky on the back side, but complex and showing potential. Hold through 2013, then drink.",Malleolus,Emilio Moro
"Rich, ripe and oaky, this Petite Sirah charms with flashy blackberry, cherry and dark chocolate flavors that are opulent through the long finish. The vineyard is in the Los Alamos region.",Thompson Vineyard,Jaffurs
"Rich doesn't begin to describe this Pinot Gris. It's explosive in orange and apricot jam flavors, with vanilla and buttered toast layers. There's a fat, oily texture that adds interest to a variety that can be simple.",North Highlands Cuvée,Manzoni
"The 2006 Pertimali tastes better than the 2006 Riserva and the 2007 Brunello. This wine is uniquely characterized by bold freshness and richness showing the clean and precise quality of Sangiovese fruit. The aftertaste is long, spicy and firm. Give this wine 5_10 more years.",Pertimali,Livio Sassetti
"Brims with dark fruit notes of mulled boysenberry, cassis and black cherry, all streaked with spicy accents of menthol and black tea leaves. The mouthfeel is slightly creamy, but framed by medium tannins. Notes of licorice stick, espresso and roasted cocoa nibs linger through the long close. Drink now_2014.",Faithful Hound,Mulderbosch
"One of the classic wines from Drouhin, this concentrated and ripe wine has rich tannins, certainly laced with wood. Plum and red-fruit flavors are a delicious presence to go with the firm, solid structure. Age for 3_4 years.",,Joseph Drouhin
"An intense, flavorful rendition of Sauvignon Blanc, this is grapefruity from start to finish, balanced by slightly riper notes of pineapple and a custardy richness to the wine's texture. Pair it with bold fish dishes over the next 6_9 months.",Omrah,Plantagenet
"This Shiraz does a nice job of balancing its fruit-sweet characters of blackberry and blueberry with savory elements of herbs and green olives. It's full-bodied, warm and creamy-textured, with a warm, chocolaty finish. Drink it now and over the next few years.",Red Silk,Oliverhill
"There's a ripe, cooked quality with black fruit, toasted nut, cured meat and wild mushroom to this expression. The fruit tones are candied and mature, and the wine offers a ean and compact mouthfeel with a two-fold blast of acidity and tannin.",Phenomena Riserva,Sesti
"Fermented and aged in stainless steel, this wine is all about fresh, vibrant fruit. Limes, Meyer lemons, gooseberries, Asian pears and something tropical, like papayas, all mingle together. Aging on the lees, which is a popular intervention in many unoaked white wines, gives additional notes of cream and sourdough.",Reserve Selection,Raymond
"Sure is easy to like this Chardonnay, with its rich flavors of honey, pineapples, peaches, crême brulée, vanilla and cinnamon spice. It seems almost sweet, but zesty acidity and minerality pull it back into dryness and elegance.",Estate,Robert Young
"Here's a fruity, soft, flamboyant Cabernet, packed with plum, blackberry, black currant, licorice, dark chocolate and spicy oak flavors. Delicious and savory, it's probably showing its best now, so drink up.",Reserve,Rodney Strong
"A standout in a flight of more expensive wines, this five-grape blend leans heavily on the Bordeaux varietals, with a bit of Syrah as well. Firm and complex, its black cherry, cassis and plum fruit flavors are nicely accented by baking spices and red licorice. The balance is perfect; the finish carries a suggestion of dried leaf.",County Line Red,Smasne Cellars
"Dried leaf and cherry tobacco scents highlight this well-made Grenache. It includes just a whiff or two of the classic funk, but the rich black-cherry fruit is the real star, well-ripened and leading into a clean, lingering finish.",Upland Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
Some charred almond or toast aromas join with black berry and crushed granite in this full and generous wine. Nice linear quality allows the berry fruit to glide over a long smooth finish. Good structure and intensity but not overdone.,,Solaria
"Sure, this wine is full bodied and lush, filled with ripe raspberry fruit, but there is also a sense of underlying structure, and some lovely herb-spice complexities, like rhubarb, cedar, cinnamon, vanilla and cracked pepper. Drink it over the next 2_3 years.",Lights Out,Ross Estate
"At the age of more than four years, this 100% Cabernet remains an immature clash of fruit, oak and tannins. Everything sticks out, especially the massive blackberry and cassis flavors. The oak is sweet and butterscotchy on the finish. With a superb structure, it seems like an ideal cellar candidate, except for a touch of bitter raisin in the finish. Hard to predict its future. Try in 2015.",Reserve,Rubissow
"Here's a deliciously ripe, forward Pinot. It's made in an accessible style, with flashy raspberry, strawberry and oak flavors. Yet it exhibits classic Pinot elegance. Could turn into something special in 6_7 years, if you're a gambler.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,Rusack
"Lots of flashy blackberry and blueberry fruit in this rather forward Syrah. It's also quite tannic and spicy, the result of 100% whole cluster fermentation. With its fairly high alcohol, it has a mouth-warming fullness. Drink now.",Turner Vineyard,Samsara
"Perfect for pairing with grilled meat, white beans or hearty pasta dishes, this bright Rosso di Montalcino opens with notes of plush cherry, with almond, spice, leather and tobacco. The mouthfeel is characterized by toasted oak notes and bright acidity.",Campogiovanni,San Felice
"A youthful, bold Brunello with exotic spice, dark vanilla bean, leather, toasted oak and chestnut. Background tones include bramble, wild berry, blueberry and cola. Bright and firm on the finish.",,La Palazzetta
"Inky, penetrating and bursting with black-fruit aromas as well as coffee, mocha and pastry notes. The palate is perfectly lush and deep, with smooth tannins and proper acidity propelling jammy, lovely berry flavors. Dark, smoky and rubbery on the finish, with a streamlined tail. One of the best Chilean Syrahs. Drink now through 2014; only 150 cases made.",,Matetic
"Big, round and lush, this is the fourth vintage for this wine, one of the best Chardonnays in Washington state. In this vintage it did not go through full malolactic, leaving a nice underlying acidity with a leesy, creamy freshness. Golden apples, stone fruits and a lick of butterscotch add to the luscious, generous finish.",Big Sissy Conner Lee Vineyard,Gorman
"Firm, dark tannins with solid black fruit flavors. It has structure followed by lively acidity that lends freshness, with a final beautiful black cherry character. It promises aging potential, proof of the quality of the vineyard in a cooler year.",Ile de Vergelesses Premier Cru,Domaine Chandon de Briailles
"From a superb year, this wine saw all French oak, but an ongoing reduction in exposure to new barrels brought the percentage down to 60%. Young and muscular, the blend of black fruits, sweet oak and toasty spice is focused and compelling. Pure fruit flavors include black cherry and plum, smooth and concentrated, with a smoky kick in the lingering finish.",,Northstar
"Regarded as a Styrian Grand Cru, the Kranachberg produces landmark Sauvignon Blanc. In the hands of Wilhelm Sattler, the richness of the fruit, with its almost tropical spice element, is tinged with elegance as well as great concentration. There is a fresh, racy aftertaste.",Kranachberg,Sattlerhof
"Colle del Re Passito is a gorgeous, smooth and creamy wine with a beautiful bouquet of honeysuckle, candied orange, almond paste, apricot and butterscotch. It tastes fresh and silky and would make a great companion to dried biscuits or sponge cake.",Colle del Re Passito,Umberto Cesari
"You want lush, plush and opulent in your California Syrah? Here you go. It's soft and intricate, with lacy tannins framing complex flavors of blackberries, black cherries, bacon, black pepper, anise and sandalwood. Just delicious now and for the next two to three years.",My Father's Vineyard,Dutton Estate
"The steep Cazetiers vineyard is among the best of Gevrey's Premier Crus. This is a robust wine that can take all the wood thrown at it and still come back tasting of sweet plums and fresh raspberries. The tannins, with their smoky character, shine right through the heart of the wine.",Les Cazetiers Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"Relatively light and fruity with tight tannins. The wine has fresh acidity that still dominates the texture. There is a delicious spicy element that edges around the tannic core. It seems firm, not yet ready to soften into middle age.",Clos Saint-Jacques Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Darkly textured wine, the black berry fruits show firmness as well as acidity and a dry core. This will age well, its tannins pushing the weight forward. It is an impressive wine, with the acidity of 2008, while also having powerful structure.",,Domaine des Perdrix
"A wine with a very ripe, wild strawberry character, meaty and savage. The fruits are just moving out from behind the structure, the maturity not yet coming in. An impressive wine, hinting at power.",Les Rugiens Prement Cru,Domaine Parent
"From the distant 1994 vintage, this Vin Santo blend of Trebbiano and Malvasia has been aged an astonishing 15 years in small oak barrel. You can detect some of that evolution on the bouquet thanks to aromas of dried apricot, marron glacé, maple syrup and candied fruit with cinnamon spice. It's a sweet, thick wine with great intensity and the potential to age many more years to come.",Riserva,Fattoria di Grignano
"A beautifully luminous wine that opens with unbelievable elegance and delicacy. You can just recognize aromas of fuzzy peach and white mushroom associated with the muffo, but they are backed by the complex presence of almond, honey, peach and slight shadings of exotic spice and cinnamon.",Arkezia Muffo di San Sisto,Fazi Battaglia
"Pure Cabernet, aged in the same Vicard barrels as winemaker Randy Dunn's Howell Mountain wines. About 90% is new oak, but it doesn't strangle the fruit in any way. Tart and vibrant, with black cherry/black currant fruit, this balanced effort shows a velvety character and a fine touch in the vineyard. Nuances of coffee, earth, leaf and dried herb are threaded through, in perfect harmony and balanced for medium-term aging.",,Feather
"Fragrant and inviting with lush aromas of red berries, black cherries and chocolate. In the mouth the wine is loaded with powerful ripe fruit flavors, still compact and primary, but promising excellent development in the cellar. Threads of iron and coffee appear, and the wine takes a sinuous path through the palate and into a lingering finish.",RiverBend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"This is 88% Cabernet Sauvignon, 8% Merlot and 4% Cabernet Franc. Thick and dense, it's a perfect companion to the winery's current release of Merlot, though they are a year apart in vintage. This Cabernet has slight intimations of herb and black olive, and is tightly focused with very dark cassis and plum fruit flavors. It's a wine to cellar, as it is still a little hot and tightly wound.",,Abeja
"A lush mouthful of nuanced fruit, this single-vineyard Viognier is loaded with a rich mix of peach, apricot, papaya and guava fruit. Laced into the hefty fruit core are baking spices and cocoa powder, along with suggestions of curry and cumin. This wine should be mandatory with curry dishes.",Coyote Canyon Vineyard,Syncline
"The Nussberg vineyard towering above the western edge of Vienna is famed for its field blend Gemischter Satz (mixed varieties). Fritz Wieninger has produced a wine that perfectly balances opulence with minerality. Rich fruits march with citrus and finish with structure, and the potential to age.",Nussberg Alte Reben Gemischter Satz,Wieninger
"This new vintage of Abeja's estate-grown Viognier is back to a richer mouthfeel after the high acid 2008, with generous citrus and stone fruits__each and pear__andied lemon and pineapple, highlighted with cinnamon spice. Flat out yummy, roundly fruity, and long-lasting, with butterscotch ruling the finish.",,Abeja
"Foursquare, almost chunky, the tannins dominate black fruits, dark chocolate and spice flavors. There is considerable concentration here, along with initial high acidity. Straight from bottling, the fruit is subdued. The weight of the wine, though, confirms that this is going to be a powerhouse.",,Louis Latour
"A powerful wine, offering a dark, textured view of Clos de Vougeot. It is muscular, packed with ripe fruit and a layer of spice and wood. Black plums and prunes provide extra, delicious flavors.",,Henri de Villamont
"Shows deep, concentrated flavors of blackberries and black currants, with classically fine, complex Napa tannins. It's 100% Cabernet, with 50% new oak, and although the label doesn't say so, the grapes come from a Howell Mountain vineyard. Beautiful now, and will develop over the next 6_8 years. Decant for hours if you open it now.",Reserve,Johndrow Vineyards
"With a ripe texture, this is developing into a delicious wine. It has richness, allied to the lighter structure of 2007, the acidity and red fruits driving right through the beautifully perfumed wine.",Clos des Mouches Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"Very soft, very ripe and generous, the tannins showing but surrounded by fruit flavors that are now morphing into more herbal, tarry, mushroom flavors. The final spice character gives a great complementary burst of taste.",Les Epenots Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"A beautiful combination of ripe, tropical fruits with flint, honey and smoke. There is a great steely backbone here, offering a linear character as well as elegant, ageworthy fruit.",Ried Pfaffenberg Steiner,Emmerich Knoll
"Sicily makes some of the absolutely best dessert wines you will ever taste, and Feudo Disisa's late-harvest Krysos is an excellent example. The wine opens with intense aromas of apricot, chestnut honey, almond marzipan and dried apricot. It feels soft, thick and enduring on the long, sweet finish.",Krysos,Feudo Disisa
"The Domaine de Courcel owns a large part of the heart of the Epenots vineyard, within the walls of a clos. This is a wine with a solid structure, cherry and spice flavors, an elegant feel to go with the ripe berry fruits. It is very balanced, the tannins a great support to the fruit.",Grand Clos des Epenots Premier Cru,Domaine de Courcel
"Rich, soft and gentle, with light tannins, ripe fruit and a pronounced freshness, touched with black cherry. This is not for long-term aging, but it's worth waiting for 2_3 years.",Clos des Chênes Premier Cru,Domaine des Comtes Lafon
"Pungent and spicy, dark and brooding, this wine brings it with deep, sappy berry fruit and overtones of meat and garrigue, all with muscle and verve. Tannins are firm and hard, showing some ripe stem and earth flavors, and plenty of barrel toast. Muscular and warm, this Syrah walks the line perfectly between the Rhône and Barossa.",,Sequel
"Horus (a fabulous blend of 90% Picolit with smaller percentages of Sauvignon and Friulano) opens with a golden-amber color and segues to aromas of honey toasted almond, dried apricot, chestnut honey and yellow rose. The wine is thick and creamy with a long close that is driven by both extraction and freshness.",Horus,Russiz Superiore
"Here is a clean, straightforward Brunello with pretty aromas of wild berry, vanilla, leather, spice and rum cake. It shows a genuine, frank style with a sweet, velvety close.",,Lazzeretti
"Robust and fruity, this big Syrah floods the mouth with blackberries, currants, bacon and black pepper. It's a delicious wine, wrapped into firm tannins, and ideal with a nice charbroiled steak, with salt and pepper to echo the wine's spices.",,Novy
"Occasio has made a restrained and elegant Cabernet, alluring in its cola spice__lmost sarsaparilla__romas. Then the wine delves into dusty red and black fruit with ample structure, and a vein of minerality cradled into one delicious package.",,Occasio
"Attractively ripe aromas of melon and softly baked apples lead the nose, with a touch of sweet smokiness, almost like cured bacon, following close behind. Medium weight with balanced, lifting acidity and a spice-infused clementine rind finish.",Robusto,Rudera
"Spice, cherry liqueur, dark fruit, leather and moist tobacco comprise the bouquet. Structured and firm, the wine delivers a clean, focused feel.",,Pecci Celestino
"Penley's 2009 Phoenix offers classic cassis fruit, shored up by hints of mocha, vanilla and menthol. It's medium to full bodied, powerful yet elegant, with tannins that are firm but not unapproachable. Drink now_2020.",Phoenix,Penley Estate
"An intense wine, its spice finely integrated with a more fruity character. It has the classic Gewürztraminer lychee flavor but this is balanced with acidity, ripe baked apple and mineral structure.",Réserve,Pierre Sparr
"You're in for a big, bold wine the minute you pour Il Brecciolino into the glass. This blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Petit Verdot opens with a dark, inky color and intense aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry, rum cake and spice. It's soft, supple and rich.",Il Brecciolino,Castelvecchio
"This bold Chianti Classico opens with earthy aromas of cured meat, tobacco, pipe tobacco and rum cake. The fruit aromas come forth as candied berry, plum and crème de cassis. This wine is aged for one year in oak barrel, resulting in a soft, plush and velvety finish.",Messer Ridolfo Riserva,Cantalici L'Antica Fornace di Ridolfo
"An inky-black appearance and spicy-savory aromas make this the kind of Brunello you want to drink on a really cold winter night. Tightly concentrated and extracted, with loads of black cherry, leather and tobacco, there are balsam notes too, but delivered in a big, strong fashion. The smooth, silky finish that is not overly dense or intense.",Voliero,Casato1
"A dark and rich style of Merlot, this wine boasts intense aromas and flavors of black forest berries, plum flesh, cocoa powder and pencil shavings. Succulent, with a creamy texture, the tannins are fine but mouth-coating and provide a good frame to the sultry flavors. Chocolate and cedar spice linger on the close.",,Ernie Els
"Blended with a little Syrah, Petite Sirah and Sangiovese, this Merlot in a big box is clearly a terrific value. It's so lush and delicious in berries and spices, it's crazy that the price works out to $6.25 for a regular bottle. With production over 200,000 cases, it's a testament to the art of blending.",,Black Box
"True as dry oloroso comes, with nutty aromas combined with caramel richness. Feels raring to go, with pumped-up acidity that boosts otherwise normal flavors of dried white fruits, mixed nuts and brine. Tight, long and driving on the finish.",Villapanés Oloroso Seco,Hidalgo
"Made in the modern style, this Cabernet is dark in color, soft in acids and tannins, and enormously fruity. The flavors of blackberries, blueberries, mocha and roasted nuts suggest sweetened granola candy. It's a flashy wine that impresses for its sheer power. Drink now-2015.",Hoffman Lane,Jacob Franklin
"Expansive, round and supple in the mouth, this Shiraz features lush raspberry fruit, framed by vanilla oak. There's a tart edge to the finish, providing a solid sense of balance to the lingering warm, chocolaty notes. Drink now.",Entity,John Duval Wines
"A wine that reveals its rich, jammy fruit slowly. When it arrives, the fruit is soft and generous, with strawberry jam and red plum flavors. It also has intense fresh acidity, a dry tannic core and aging potential.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Good price for a Napa Chardonnay this rich and balanced. It's enormously ripe in pineapples, oranges and golden mangoes, but grounded by zesty acidity and a minerality that comes from the soil.",,Stonegate
"Approachable, high in quality and made from a mix of Malbec, Cabernet and Bonarda. Smells of lead pencil, blackberry and dark plum. Feels friendly and smooth, with lightly buttered oak leading licorice, black pepper, chocolate and roasted berry flavors. Offers a lot of good things for the price. Drink now_2015.",Corte B,Vistalba
"This perennially consistent Priorato deals graphite, coconut, leather, forest and oaky, chocolaty berry aromas in front of a round, mouthfilling palate. Tastes primarily of plum, cherry and currant, with a snappy finish defined by red fruit flavors and length. Perfectly good and ready; can hold through 2014.",Cartoixa,Scala Dei
"This dry, acidic, minerally Chardonnay brings Burgundy to mind. It has a lot going for it, but is rather tight and angular despite a rich vein of pineapple and lemon drop. Distinguished in its way, it's a fine wine, at a great price.",,Sarah's Vineyard
"A complex, kitchen-sink blend of 29% Chenin Blanc, 23% Roussanne, 11% Viognier, 11% Chardonnay, 10% Grenache Blanc, 5% Colombar, 5% Grenache Gris, 2% Sémillon, 2% Clairette and 1% Verdelho, there's a lot to be discovered in this wine. Melon, pear and sweet citrus lead the bouquet, with nuances of orange blossom and honeysuckle, while spicy flavors of baked apple, glazed canteloupe and lightly-mulled pear flood the palate. Round and forward, with a silky texture; give it time to open up now or hold another couple of years.",,A.A. Badenhorst Family Wines
"This is a terrific super Tuscan blend (of 50% Sangiovese with equal parts Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon) that drinks beautifully. Bright red fruit and cherry give the wine a lively, cheerful personality and the wine's structure is perfectly balanced and smooth. It's a one-size-fits-all wine for our favorite Italian foods.",Mongrana,Agricola Querciabella
"Defines Russian River Valley Pinot Noir in the dryness, silkiness and full-bodied richness, with flavors of cherries, pomegranates, raspberries and slightly underripe persimmons. This complex wine grows better as it warms in the glass. Drink over the next 2_3 years.",,Bailiwick
"This low production blend of Longoria's estate Fe Ciega Vineyard and Bien Nacido Vineyard seems to be comprised of grapes that didn't make the winery's highest cut. It's quite a nice wine, dry, brisk and pure in cherries, cola, spices and sandalwood, but it doesn't seem like an ager, so enjoy now.",Lovely Rita,Longoria
"Rich and round but not overdone, with a nice brightness to the apple, clementine and white peach aromas and flavors. Balanced and well-integrated, with all of the components working together in harmony. Closes on a brisk citrus-rind finish. Drink now_2014.",,Hartenberg
"This is 100% Merlot, and all Red Mountain fruit. Ripe plums and cherries are accented with hints of dried leaves, tobacco, and sweet herb. Baking spices reflect its 20 months in oak, and the wine has a soft finish that is ideal for immediate enjoyment.",,Hightower
"Good price for a Napa Valley Cabernet this distinguished. It's rich and satisfying in blackberry, black currant and blueberry fruit, with a lovely coat of smoky oak. Shows lots of complexity, and the finish is dry and spicy. Could go the distance, but just to be safe, drink over the next six years.",,Buehler
"The purity of fruit is the most striking aspect of this wine. While it is relatively light in texture, it revels in its fresh red-fruited character that gives an impressive intensity. With balanced touches of tannin and acidity, the wine should age well.",Lulune,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"Shows the strong acidity of Foursight's new Pinot Noirs, but also considerable deepth and lushness. Once the mouth adjusts to the acids, it's able to appreciate waves of cherries, blackberries, currants and cola, while 50% new oak adds rich notes of smoke and burnt butter. A lovely, dry and impressive wine, fine now with an hour or two in the decanter.",Charles Vineyard Clone 5,Foursight
"Ripe fruit and new oak combine for lush, complex flavors in this dramatic young Pinot Noir. It shows real flair in the raspberry, cherry and cola flavors, with vanilla and buttered cinnamon toast from aging in French barrels. Easy to like now for its silky texture and long, pure spicy finish.",Estate Vineyard,Gundlach Bundschu
"A fabulous Petite Sirah for serious fans of the variety. Shows typically big tannins and high alcohol, with full-bodied, concentrated mountain flavors of blackberries, currants, roasted meat and pepper. Best of all is the balance of its parts, resulting in elegance despite the power.",Madrone Spring Vineyard,Mauritson
"This is a beautiful Cabernet to drink now with a good steak. It's rich and complex in blackberry and black currant flavors, and is very dry, with lingering acidity. The tannins are thick but fine. The best Cabernet from Eberle in memory. Drink now.",Vineyard Selection,Eberle
"A wine that edges towards sweetness, while still retaining a piercing, refreshing acidity. Honey, pineapple and spice are contained in a package of minerality with a hint of saltiness, suggesting long aging.",Ried Loibenberg Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"Sweet Zibibbo grapes are dried under the sun for concentration and power. Abraxas makes one of the most traditional interpretations with a dark amber color and pure aromas of raisin, dried apricot and chestnut honey.",,Abraxas
"From the most famous slope in Morgon, this is a powerful wine, its tannins still working their way into the fruit. Black cherries, and sweet plums are dominated by a firm, concentrated structure. Give this wine another year.",Côte de Py,Georges Duboeuf
"Purple-black, with rich scents of bright boysenberry fruit, and an unusual earthy umami note that adds depth to the finish. Sharp, young, acidic and grapy, this drinks like a younger wine.",,JM Cellars
"Structured and concentrated, it has a silky richness that is very Volnay, while at the same time giving the bright fruits of the year. The final tastes are smoke and crisp acidity.",Ancienne Cuvée Carnot Caillerets Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"A savory and smoky wine that impresses with its licorice, spice and bacon aromas along with corpulence and length. There's more than enough oak here, but the sandalwood, mocha and wood-driven spice notes blend into the wine's big-berry fabric rather than dominate. Overall there's fine balance, black fruit essence, depth of flavor and a long, toasty finish. 1,800 cases produced. Drink now through 2013.",J. Alberto,Bodega Noemía de Patagonia
"This gorgeous wine opens with deeps hues of amber and gold, followed by intensely fragrant tones of dried apricot, chestnut honey, almond paste and pineapple. There's piquant spice on the close that tickles your tongue and the wine boasts thick, luscious sweetness and opulent density.",Rocca Sveva Mida,Cantina di Soave
"Very smoky aromas, the fruit ripe with sweet blackberry flavors. The wood is still very present, not yet completely integrated; there is a touch of green perhaps from the wood. At the same time, the wine is developing while keeping a fresh streak of acidity.",Les Suchots Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This hits all high marks thanks to the integrity and intensity of its beautifully aromatic bouquet. The wine is creamy and smooth with exciting dashes of mint, candied fruit, honey and apricot that appear at various, random points.",Acinatium,Suavia
"This is a beautiful, classic 100% varietal Cabernet Sauvignon, but it's also immature in hard tannins, which is a telltale mark of this mountain appellation. The wine is bone dry and complex, with waves of blackberries, black currants, cassis, minerals and cedar. It clearly wants time in the cellar. Best after 2013.",,Summers
"Released in a half-bottle format, this is the perfect Cabernet for two people to drink over a nice cut of beef. It's dry and stylishly elegant, with impressive blackberry, currant, olive, cocoa and herb flavors.",La Petite,Summers
"Extraordinarily rich and complicated in flavors, this wine comes from vineyards that are at least 50 years old. It's dry and spicy, with textbook Zin notes of wild berries and currants, but also exotic minerals that come from the soil. Yes, the alcohol is high, but that is the signature of Seghesio's marvelous Zinfandels.",Old Vine,Seghesio
"Made with red Sangiovese grapes that have seen botrytis, or noble rot, this Occhio di Pernice expression of Vin Santo opens with very distinctive aromas of prune, raisin, candied orange peel, maple syrup and honey. The sweet wine is sticky and thick in the mouth and a touch of citrus zest helps it move forward over the palate.",Trasanto Occhio di Pernice,Tenuta Villa Trasqua
"You don't look to Pinots from this vineyard for delicacy. You look for power, sheer butt-kicking audacity. And that's what you'll find in this '08 from Roar. It's almost Rhône-like in the dark color and full-bodied richness, with its chocolate and black cherry fruit. But that's Pisoni for you. Will age for the better part of a decade.",Pisoni Vineyard,Roar
"The ripeness and heat are immediately noticeable in the liquorous nose. Supple and smooth in the mouth, it shows a blend of pretty purple fruits and polished tannins, layered with barrel flavors emphasizing espresso and strong toast. Classic Michel Rolland, inviting and generous.",,Pedestal
"This sturdy, full-bodied Pinot could almost be a Grenache, it's so big and strong. Yet, strangely, there's a silky elegance that tells you it's Santa Lucia-style Pinot. Offers waves of raspberries and cherries and oranges, brightened with zesty acidity. A considerable value given the producer and origin.",Lucia Highlands Vineyard,Pessagno
"Pure, inviting and open, with cedar, tobacco, blackberry, earth and cookie dough aromas scattered all over a robust bouquet. Deep but fresh, with fine balance and a bold, jammy set of blackberry and black-pepper flavors. Finishes well, with integration and easygoing tannins. Drink now through 2013.",EQ,Matetic
"This rich, spicy wine comes from the eastern part of the valley. It's very full-bodied, almost coarse now, but that's a function of its fresh tannins and brisk acidity. Tastes jammy in cherry-berry pie filling, with a sweet, smoky oak veneer. Needs 4_6 years, but if you drink it now, decant.",Ampelos Vineyard,Samsara
"There's a pepper note that might make you think this was a cool-climate Syrah. It's very rich and flamboyant in jammy blackberries, black cherries, currants, mocha and bacon, while oak adds even richer layers of toast. No question about the deliciousness factor. Provides a great mouth of Cabernet immediately, and probably for the next 5_6 years.",,Elan
"From the dreamy Mediterranean paradise known as Sardinia comes this opulent dessert blend of Nasco and Malvasia Bianca. The syrupy wine exhibits a dark amber-copper color with aromas of toasted almond, butterscotch, caramel, dried apricot and candied fruit. It shows density and grit, and yes, there's even a touch of piquant spice on the close.",Aristeo,Feudi della Medusa
"Opening with fruity, bubble gum scents, this barrel-fermented (in new French oak) old-vine Chenin Blanc has a delicious toasty, bready flavor, sweet lemony acids, and plenty of peachy fruit, without being unctuous or heavy. The broad and toasty mid-palate seems to extend indefinitely; it just never stops.",The Cry Baby Late Harvest,Gorman
"Dedicated to the memory of a family founder, Vernon Rhodes, this one-time release is packed with barrel flavors of chocolate, espresso and smoke. The fruit holds its own, dense cassis and black cherry, dappled with pepper and fresh herbs. Tight and balanced, this needs decanting and can certainly be cellared for a decade or longer.",V.R. Special,Dusted Valley
"Just two barrels were made of this Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Merlot blend; each bottle is hand-numbered. As you would expect from this fast-rising Walla Walla winery, it is high-powered, full-flavored, and balances its ripe, tangy cherry fruit with plenty of chocolatey oak. Tannins are just slightly green, and some earth and bark accents highlight the finish.",Wallatage Red,Dusted Valley
"Relatively soft for a St.-Estèphe, this nevertheless has plenty of firm tannins to project the powerful fruit forward. It has structure and weight, piled with plum juice and acidity. Great aging potential.",,Château Tour de Pez
"An elegant wine from the relatively cool Lavaux St.-Jacques vineyard. Soft tannins surround sweet fruit. The structure is fine, delicate, but certainly present, giving a final solid aftertaste.",Lavaux St.-Jacques Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"Angialis is superripe, thick and sweet. It shows thick syrupy concentration and glides smoothly over the palate thanks to the high glycerine content. It would probably pair better with aged cheese or pecorino than with dessert.",Angialis,Argiolas
"A beautiful Cabernet, dry, soft and balanced, that will silence objections that California Cab is too strong to drink with food. This wine is fine in tannins, and the blackberries and cherries have a lovely note of herbs. Feels elegant and luxurious. Drink now.",,Blue Rock
"Shows softness, perhaps missing a big structure. To compensate there is a great red fruit element that dominates the tannins. Juicy and fruity, layered acidity to finish.",Rugiens Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"This bottling has been variable over the decades, but this 2010 shows fine form, a good sign coming on the heels of the excellent 2009. It's richly oaked and flashy in pineapple jam, buttered toast and creamy, yeasty flavors.",Barrel Fermented,Flora Springs
"Substantial and muscular, still quite tight and unyielding, this grudgingly displays purple fruits in a mix of roasted coffee beans, clove and black olive. If past releases are any indication, this will continue to evolve and expand as it gets a bit more bottle time.",Stained Tooth,Dusted Valley
"Cedar, chocolate and cherry are the main players, with hints of alfalfa adding a modicum of complexity. It's full bodied, round and warm, with tannins that seem firmer than many in this price category, making it a good steakhouse red. Drink it now and over the next several years.",Jester,Mitolo
"Two-thirds Chardonnay, 22% Viognier, and the rest Sauvignon Blanc__n unusual blend that works well. Medium gold and showing the color and scents of oak aging, this big-boned white runs the gamut from apple to pear to peach, soaked in Bourbon barrel flavors, with a rich, creamy finish.",Francis Reserve White,Robert O. Smasne
"Cola, black licorice, cherry liqueur and rum cake presage loads of ripe fruit and power. Yet it's lean and compact on the finish, with bright acidity that would pair well with pecorino stagionato or any aged cheese.",,Talenti
"This impressive Rosso delivers a silky and smooth texture, with aromas of bright fruit backed by toasted nut and spice. The balance and overall harmony of the mouthfeel are what set this wine apart.",Val di Suga,Tenimenti Angelini
"Excellent modern Rioja at a fair price. Smells solid, with crusty minerality and toasty oak to go with black fruit aromas. Feels flush and voluminous, with jammy blackberry, baked fig and coffee flavors. Toasty, meaty and dark on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Reserva,Señorio de Uñuela
"This balanced Rosso delivers intense aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry, spice, sweet cherry and rum cake. The wine's consistency is rich and smooth, with a refreshing touch of acidity on the close.",,Siro Pacenti
"Stottle does an especially good job with Tempranillo, sourced from the same site as its Nebbiolo. Fruity and fleshy, loaded with bright berry notes, it reflects its 21 months in barrel in its complex streaks of spice, chocolate and butterscotch.",,Stottle
"Acidity is the best thing about this Chardonnay. Without it, the tangerine, apricot and lime flavors, accented by sweet oaky vanilla, would make it a mere fruit bomb. Tartness wakes it all up and makes the finish clean and pure.",Wolff Vineyard,Summerland
"An excellent value, the 2010 Shotfire Shiraz offers bold, punched-up cherry-berry fruit framed by hints of vanilla, dried herbs and cracked pepper. It's a big wine that's reasonably creamy in texture, with plenty of mouthcoating flavor on the finish. Drink it over the next few years.",Shotfire,Thorn Clarke
"Pronto red is 77% Grenache, with the remainder a blend of Touriga Nacional (11%), Syrah (7%) and Monastrell (5%). It starts off with leather and spice, then folds in cherries and licorice. It's full-bodied, round and slightly warm, with a supple, spice-driven finish. Drink now-2015.",Pronto,S.C. Pannell
"Compact, concentrated and clean, with all its components in place. The bouquet is dark with charcoal, but bright with berry fruit aromas. The mouthfeel is comfortable and balanced, with sweet berry flavors offset by mild spice and proper oak. Soft tannins define the finish; a fine Malbec that doesn't overdo it.",Reserve,Salentein
"Yorba's Tempranillo is very masculine, briary and tannic, packed with earthy baked plum, raspberry and dark chocolate mocha, with a slight trace of black licorice. Concentrated and lush, it would stand its own against many a big slab of meat.",Shake Ridge Vineyards,Yorba
"Yorba is doing the world of Zin lovers a huge favor by holding its wines in bottle for longer than most producers, and what you get for all that waiting is a wine ready to drink that's still got plenty of structure and ageability. This Zin shows great depth, with subdued fruit and darker flavors of plum and coffee allowed to shine, rounded out by an intensity of spice.",Shake Ridge Vineyards,Yorba
"A very drinkable, densely lush Barbera that's been given proper time to age and tame its tannins. This wine has dense plum flavors and accompanying layers of spice and earth, a very nice example of mountain-grown California Barbera.",Shake Ridge Vineyards,Yorba
"Nicely rounded in texture without being flabby, this is a lively, crisp white wine, well endowed with flavors reminiscent of melon, pear and lime. Perfect to drink now with most seafood dishes, or as an apéritif.",Doctoressa di Lago Single Site,Zonte's Footstep
"If only more California Primitivo could be made in this style - soft, lower in alcohol, modestly showing its fruit - there would be more converts among Zin fanatics, who would be wowed by the subtle black cherry and licorice flavors and dry finish, minimally aged in oak.",,Uvaggio
"Cedarville is loved for its Syrah and Grenache but it can expertly handle its estate Zinfandel too__rown at 2,500-foot elevation__his smoky, raspberry-wrapped, silky wine is full of big, round mountain tannins yet somehow manages to be light on its feet on the finish. Have it with sticky ribs.",Estate,Cedarville Vineyard
"Excellent growing conditions and quality fruit shape this fresh, food wine that pairs well with pasta or meat dish. The bouquet is redolent of black cherry, plum, chocolate mocha and spice.",,Fattoria La Lecciaia
"Made in a bone dry, acidic style, what this Chardonnay lacks in richness it makes up for in elegance. Fans of sweet, buttery Chards won't like it, but true aficionados will appreciate the austere citrus and mineral flavors.",,Deep Sea
"This young winery has made huge strides with its red wines, as this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon demonstrates. Young, tight, tart, and expressive, it takes the cranberry and cassis components from cool-vintage, cool-climate grapes, and turns them into a complete and complex wine. High acid, with well-integrated nuances of mushroom, earth, and smoke.",,Airfield Estates
"Garnet-ruby hue with slightly browning rim. Savory aromas of cured meat, cola, dried fruit and rum cake upfront, while warm earthy, tobacco and leather tones fill in the rear. Sophisticated and rich, reminiscent of a storied, nostalgic Brunello tradition. Generous, but with a firm, drying feel on the finish.",Saporoia,Baccinetti
"This wine almost quivers with freshness when first sniffed, it's so vibrant and citrusy. Then it broadens out nicely on the palate, delivering ripe melon and apple flavors and ample weight. Drink it now and over the next few months.",,Hazyblur
"From its situation on the plain outside Beaune, Chorey is often overlooked. A wine like this, ripe and smooth, full of red fruit, offers a deliciously juicy drink and represents a great value in red Burgundy. Drink now, or keep for two years.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Rich and oaky, with pineapple jam, tangerine juice, buttered toast and vanilla spice flavors. It's a big, opulent wine, but a little in your face. Drink now.",,Cakebread
"Kilikanoon's 2008 M features bold berry fruit, lashings of vanilla and a bit of eucalyptus on the nose, followed up by rich blackberry and vanilla flavors. It's a full-bodied wine that nevertheless turns crisp and edgy on the finish. Drink now_2018.",M Reserve,Kilikanoon
"This wine strikes a nice balance between sweet and savory spice on the nose, with ripe fruit, prune and leather in the background. This is a velvety, warm, earthy wine with a broad aromatic delivery and bold Brunello style. It's smooth and round, without any of the sharp acidic accents you sometimes find in Sangiovese Grosso.",,La Colombina
"Clean, pure and uncomplicated on the nose, showing depth and clarity. Smells and tastes much like a good Malbec or Cabernet might; it's sweet and fruity, with black cherry, pastry, baking spices and a certain rubbery quality that seems to come with Bonarda. On the money for this variety.",Reserve Old Vine,Maipe
"From Montalcino's picturesque Castelgiocondo estate, Campo ai Sassi (__ield of stones_) is a soft, plush Rosso, with aromas of black cherry, vanilla and mocha. The wine imparts a round, velvety feel in the mouth, with a steady, simple personality.",Castelgiocondo Campo ai Sassi,Marchesi de' Frescobaldi
"Rich wine, a blend dominated by the rare Rotgipfler and Zierfandler, with great ripe layers of tropical fruits, peach and spice, perfectly balanced with full acidity. Fred Loimer of the Kamptal also produces this Schellmann brand in the Thermenregion, with concentrated dense and deliciously ripe wines. Screw cap.",Schelllmann Gumpoldskirchen Cuvée,Loimer
"A very fine Cabernet, with the structural depth and classy mouthfeel you expect from a fine Howell Mountain wine. It's totally dry and modest in alcohol, with complex blackberry, black currant and cedar flavors, as well as an interesting splash of dried Provençal herbs. A minor quibble is a certain raisiny superripeness that may limit ageability.",,Martin Ray
"From a section of the vineyard known as the __spresso block_ this smoky, coffee-flavored Syrah certainly warrants the nickname. Penetrating aromas of espresso and baking chocolate roll into dense, compact flavors with cassis and black cherry packed tightly in the core. One of the most pure and deep expressions of Syrah from a state bursting with excellent versions, this is one to cellar for up to a decade.",McKinley Springs Vineyard,Syncline
"They've been doing their homework at Windsor Sonoma to judge by this Cab, which is a vast improvement over past releases. It's a pleasure to drink now for its rich, forward flavors of cherries, blackberries, currants and cocoa, soft tannins, and lush overlay of caramelized oak. It finishes sweetly smooth, although it's technically dry.",,Windsor Sonoma
"Merges Ojai's leaner, more elegant style of winemaking with the rich pedigree of this fine vineyard to produce a dry, complex and food-friendly wine. It's zesty in acidity, with intricate flavors of cherries, cola, minerals and dried herbs. Should do interesting things over the next six years. Give it a good decant after opening the bottle.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Ojai
"Here's a soft, luscious Cabernet. It has soft tannins and is very delicious, with a milk chocolate edge to the black and red sour-cherry candy fruit, enriched with rich, toasty oak. Lovely now and should develop over the next 6_8 years.",,So Rare
"Warm and complete, with oak-influenced char and licorice along with black fruits on the bouquet. An elegant Uco Valley specimen with refined, full-force flavors of cola, blackberry, tobacco and chocolate. Turns more complex and satisfying on the finish. Drink this high-quality value now through 2013. A blend of Malbec at 50%, with Cabernet, Petit Verdot and Syrah.",Signature Blend,Carlos Basso
"From the privileged soil of St.-Julien, this is an opulently rich wine. The weight is obvious as is the sweet fruit. But there is complexity as well, spice and black currant fruit powerful and concentrated. For long-term aging.",,Château du Glana
"Syrah is a core strength of Darby, and as with previous vintages, this is dense and aromatic, leading from floral scents into a dark, almost broodingly deep core of blackberries, cassis and pepper. Full-bodied and 14.4% alcohol, this captures the essential strengths of Washington Syrah, done as a fruit-driven, berry-laden style.",The Dark Side,Darby
"Sharp, phenolic and edgy, with bright fruit and intensity, this southern Rhône blend brings in a lush mix of Meyer lemon, tangerine, orange peel, pink grapefruit, and even a little pineapple. With a bit more bottle age, the sharpness should smooth over.",Le Deuce,Darby
"Tough to appreciate now due to its acidity and tannins, which lock it down behind a cloak of impenetrability. There are exotic wild raspberry and cherry fruit, cola, licorice, Provençal herb, bacon and pepper flavors, but you can't quite get to them, because they're behind bars. Obviously needs time. Give it 3_5 years in the cellar, and it should begin to blossom after that.",Occidental Vineyard,Evening Land
"A barrel selection of lots the winery has to choose from, this is Failla's highest priced Pinot. It's clearly a very fine wine, dry, crisp in coastal acidity and complex. The flavors now range from cherries and currants to cola and tomato juice, wrapped into firm tannins. Not showing delicacy or opulence now, but a Pinot Noir to cellar. Better after 2013.",Vivien,Failla
"Showy, spicy, with fresh fruits and lightness. This is a wine more about red cherries, bright acidity and a smooth texture. The tannins form a strong core, never weighty. Not for long-term aging.",Les Epenots Premier Cru,Domaine Parent
"There is plenty of the proper power and intensity of a Chambertin here, resulting in a structured wine. It is dense, packed with black plum flavors, with a hard edge of spice and tannin. Obviously, there is a long-term future here, and it should not be touched for 5_6 years.",Cuvée Héritiers Latour,Louis Latour
"A very successful Cabernet that continues the winery's string of mountain bottlings. It's dry and classically balanced, with a firm minerality bracing flavors of blackberries, black currants, herbs, spices and smoky oak. The firm tannins are a bit numbing now, so give it 3 or 4 years in the cellar to settle down.",,Martin Ray
"As rich as it is tannic, this is powerful and concentrated. It shows the rich 2009 fruit at its best, full of sweet berries, deliciously ripe. Enjoyable, while it is also serious.",Domaine de la Chaponne,Georges Duboeuf
"Another successful release from Stromberg after the fine 2005 vintage, and it makes the case for Dry Creek Cabernet at its best. Hillside grapes have yielded concentrated flavors of blackberries, plums and spices, and the wine is finely balanced with dense tannins and acidity. Fifty percent new French oak barrel aging is easily absorbed by the wine's inherent size. Elegant and complex, it's a gorgeous wine to drink now.",,Stromberg Vineyards
"Brilliantly aromatic, this wine beguiles with exotic scents of plum pudding, spice cake, cherry compote, pipe tobacco, red licorice and raspberry jam. All that and more can be tasted__he wine is a riot of fruits and baking spices. This makes the best possible case for Mourvèdre as a stand-alone varietal wine here in Washington.",Coyote Canyon Vineyard,Syncline
"A lovely and complex Cabernet from this mountain in the southerly Mayacamas chain. It shows the big, firm tannins of its origins, with a dry sturdiness backing up the intense black currant flavors. Drinkable now for sheer decadence, although it also seems to have the stuffing to age for a decade.",,Robert Craig
"Not clear if this is a long-term ager, but you definitely want to give it a good decanting of at least four hours. You should even pour the glasses and let them to stand for an hour. The interaction with oxygen will open the wine up and allow it to express its herbal, soft deliciousness. Airing also emphasizes the cherry and red currant fruit, letting the palate enjoy this complex, tannic wine at its best.",,Silver Oak
"This Moscato Passito from northern Italy opens with crisp and pristine aromas of yellow rose, honey, stone fruit and white almond. On the close, the wine is sticky, sweet and succulent. Pair it with vanilla cream or panna cotta with caramel.",San Giovanni,Tenuta Olim Bauda
"Cedar and spice are the lead aromas, and beyond that there's blackberry, pepper and floral notes that rain complexity down on the bouquet. The palate is superrich, a bit tannic and deep as night, with black fruit, espresso, syrup and spice flavors. Finishes brawny and long, with toasty richness. Drink now through 2013.",,Monte Cinco
"Made in a dry, austerely tannic style, this Pinot Noir is very elegantly constructed, with notable acidity. It's dense and young, but very concentrated in black cherry jam, cola, beef jerky, olive tapenade, sandalwood and spice flavors. Needs time to resolve. Better after 2011.",Clos Pepe Vineyard,Ojai
"The score reflects the potential of this Cabernet down the road, as right now it's very tight and hard in mountain tannins. However, there's a gigantic core of blackberries and cherries that's just yearning to get out. Production was a mere 640 cases, but this is a good wine to seek out for the cellar. Best after 2013.",,Robert Craig
"The wine is defined by its power and dense concentration. It shows solid black fruits, plums, fig and licorice as well as dark tannins. It seems a little austere at this young stage and needs several years to flesh out.",,Louis Latour
"Flowery and smoky aromas introduce a perfumed, ripe wine. Gentle at first, the tannins gradually show through, part of a solid texture that gives density. Fruit goes from damsons through black cherries and a layer of wild strawberry. For long-term aging.",,Louis Latour
"A firm wine from a cool vineyard. It is structured, dry and solid, the fruit dominated by tannins. There is an austere character here that obviously needs time to fill out. Give it five years.",Les Cailles Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"For sheer hedonism, this is one of the best Cabs on the market. This classic Napa Cab is dry, complex and a joy to drink now, framed by elegant tannins. A spectacular bargain. Production was 4,000 cases.",Lot 157,Cameron Hughes
"Chanson owns the whole of this small premier cru. This vintage is firm and solid, contrasting with fresh acidity and tantalizing juice and fruit character. The tannins have a dark edge, but the fruit is well on its way to standing up to this structure.",Clos des Fèves Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"The blend in 2006 is 45% Cabernet Sauvignon, 36% Syrah, 10% Petit Verdot and 9% Cabernet Franc. It spent 30 months in 90% new oak. Released a year ago, it has a feminine grace and softness in the aromas, a lovely mix of flowers and spice. The Syrah brightens up the fruit, accenting berry flavors with a hint of pepper, while the Petit Verdot adds clover and violet aromas and density to the tannins.",,Chester Kidder
"From Dwelley vineyard grapes, this barrel-fermented Viognier offers appealing toasty fruit coated in buttered nut goodness. Meyer lemon and stone fruits, dusted with cinnamon, give it a French pastry sort of finish, though it is completely dry.",,Stottle
"Extra brut means that this Pinot Noir-based bubbly is drier than Schramsberg's regular brut. Even at the age of more than seven years, it's aggressive in bubbly acidity, with a scoury mouthfeel framing ripe raspberry and lime flavors. Feels austere and hard, but who knows? Could surprise. A gamble if you want to cellar it.",Extra Brut,Schramsberg
"This hearty Rosso opens with earthy tones of leather, tobacco and dried rose petal. The wine's consistency is sharp and defined with uplifting acidity.",,Tenuta Vitanza
"A firm, darkly structured wine. It has a hard edge of smoky wood tannins that dominate the black fruits, so it needs 2_3 years to balance out. It's always likely to be a firm, dense wine.",Les Saint-Georges Premier Cru,Moillard
"Not the darkest, biggest or richest Shiraz to ever come out of Australia, this is nevertheless a delightful wine. A green peppercorn note accents red raspberry and cherry fruit, with just a hint of vanilla in the background. Drink it over the next year or two.",Made with Organic Grapes,Yalumba
"The subtle, subdued nose is of perfumed spice, dried red rose and currant. But there is chewy softness here and enough extraction to hold the wine firm on the palate. The structure is there but the fruit definition is less apparent.",Carillon,Vini Italiani da Sogno
"A big, warm style of Chard. The nose is soft, toasty and loaded with butter, baked apple and vanilla aromas. Feels full, round and creamy, while oak sits at the forefront of the flavor profile, with toast, apple and vanilla lurking behind. Finishes sweet and smooth. 400 cases made.",Bramare Marchiori Vineyard,Viña Cobos
A beautifully perfumed wine that shows some of the structure of a Gevrey but combines this with dark rich fruits and sweet tannins. There is a smoky flavor that balances the ripe red fruits and final acidity.,,Domaine Thierry Mortet
"Here's a bright and fresh Rosso that delivers notes of red cherry, raspberry and cassis. The wine has a smoky element on the finish that intensifies an otherwise smooth mouthfeel.",,Geografico Castello Tricerchi
"Aromas of pencil shavings, marzipan and jammy berry are sweet and slightly candied. Flavors of Bing cherry, raisin, licorice and citrus peel are forward and tight, while the finish is long and flavorful, with some acidic tang. Lively despite a mild raisiny quality. Drink now through 2013.",Roureda Llicorella Gran Selecció Vitis 60,Cellers Unió
"Very rich and flamboyant, this could only have grown in a New World climate. In fact it's from a coastal vineyard. Ripe and expressive in raspberries, cherries, sandalwood and spices, the richness is balanced with crisp acidity. Drink over the next three years for freshness.",Gloria,Cutruzzola
"Here's a soft, round Rosso that imparts fresh tones of cherry and blackberry as it rolls across the palate. The wine is simple, crisp and nicely textured with smooth, silky lines.",,Altesino
"Marked by acidity, strong tannins and powerful fruit, this Cabernet is a three-way playoff. The fruit is the obvious early victor, flashy in plums, blackberries, cassis and cedar. But the astringency makes it difficult to enjoy now. Cellar for six years, and see what happens.",Reserve,Armanino Family Cellars
"A bit of an outlier for Pinot Noir, with a green, minty streak that cuts right through the cherries and pomegranates. With it comes stimulating acidity, but you have to wonder about the wine's long-term prospects. Drink soon.",Rio Vista Vineyard 115,Coghlan
"Here's a really pretty Rosso with a bright, fruit-driven bouquet. It opens with notes of raspberry and wild berry, with background tones of cinnamon and crushed clove. The finish is acidic and crisp.",,Castelli Martinozzi
"A meaty, bulky, earthy style of Ribera with smoky, charred, new-oak aromas setting up a reduced-seeming palate with roasted, sweet flavors of black fruits and cured meats. Feels rich, sticky and candied on the finish. Needs a couple of years to knit together; may improve with bottle age.",María,Alonso del Yerro
"Dense and dark, with plum, prune, blackberry and earth aromas. Feels thick, meaty and composed, with blackberry and dark plum flavors leading the charge. Density and balance are the wine's attributes; it's full, mildly tannic and generous but not overdone or overoaked.",Reserve,Maipe
"Sangiovese fruit is presented in its most genuine and clean state, with bright berry nuances, violets, moist earth, tobacco and cola. There are wood elements, but they are unobstructive, clean and otherwise relegated to a supporting role. The bouquet shows wild berry, bramble and bright acidity.",Marchese Antinori Riserva,Marchesi Antinori
"A bold, inky-black style that is slightly overdone and a touch overripe. Despite aromas of blackberry preserves, prune and rum cake, this is a strongly masculine wine that puts its savory side first. The close is packed tight with smoked bacon and cured beef aromas. Textured tannins create some astringency on the finish.",,La Rasina
"Spice and cream combine in a rounded, soft, very ripe wine. It has intense flavors of lychee and white peach with a refreshing amount of acidity. The wine is dry, but rich from the ginger and with a peppery final bite.",Réserve,Pierre Sparr
"This Rosso displays soft aromas of red cherry, chocolate and light spice that create a clean and balanced bouquet. Its smooth, fresh mouthfeel suggests it would pair with veal, roast turkey or pork.",,Tenuta La Fuga
"An aging wine with a garnet-ruby color and bricking at the rim. Aromas of barbecue smoke, cured meat, leather, tobacco and dark fruit give way to tight, finely textured tannins on the palate.",,Villa Poggio Salvi
"Forward aromas of sweet spice and baked apple lead the nose, while secondary hints of cobbler and vanilla cream follow. The palate is lush and ripe, but it's kept in check by a streak of acidity that braces up the nutty finish. Rich, balanced and accessible.",Sutherland,Thelema
"Carillon opens with a dark, concentrated appearance and smoky aromas of barbecue, spice and toasted oak. The fruit element comes forth on the palate, revealing the wine's bright cherry and crème de cassis notes.",Carillon,Vini Italiani da Sogno
"A little rough in the mouth, with a scoury feeling. But it's extraordinarily rich in orange and lime flavors, with the vanilla and yeasty dough accents you want in a nice sparkling wine.",Split Rock Vineyard Reserve Blanc de Blancs,One Hope
"Tart and juicy, with crisply-rendered berry and plum fruit flavors. As with all the Smasne wines, the oak is a large presence, here adding a striking note of clove. The tannins hint at a slight green streak, but the overall balance is fine.",Block #3 Lawrence Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"A classic Brunello with a savory, aged quality that exudes sophistication and elegance. Dried fruit, cassis, spice, old leather and rum cake form the bouquet. The wine is finely textured, sharp and clean in the mouth. Seems aged, savory and austere.",,SassodiSole
"The raspberry, cherry and vanilla flavors of this Pinot Noir taste sweet, giving it a delicious pie-filling richness. Crisp acidity fortunately provides balancing structure. It's a flashy young wine for drinking over the next five years.",,Samsara
"Made in the popular style, this Chardonnay has flavors of buttered toast, pineapple jam, vanilla and cinnamon spice. At the age of three-plus years, it's soft and mellow. Not likely to improve, so drink up.",Reserve Sangiacomo Vineyard,Bennett Lane
"This wine is ripe and soft, with jammy aromas of blackberry and raspberry followed by rich smoothness.",Vigna la Quercia Riserva,Castelvecchio
"Fonbadet is one of the few chateaus that are not classed growths on the heartland vineyards of Pauillac. It has a strong proportion of Cabernet Sauvignon, giving the wine a strength of tannins and intense black currant flavors. With its firm tannins, it will age for many years.",,Château Fonbadet
"Give this beautiful Cabernet a few hours of decanting, because fresh out of the bottle it offers firm tannins and zesty acidity that make it austere and tough. Yet it's just a few oxygen molecules away from drinkability, with fabulously delicious blackberry, cherry, currant, anise, pepper and smoky oak flavors.",State Line Vineyard,Corley
"A strong, powerful Pinot that's nowhere ready to drink. That's despite massive blackberry, cherry, cola, red currant, licorice and sandalwood flavors that dazzle the palate. The tannins are potent, the acidity is tart and the finish is bone dry. Obviously needs time in the bottle. Try after 2013.",Occidental Ridge Vineyard,Failla
"This latest edition of Hekate opens with a bright amber-gold color and shows lively aromas of stone fruit, especially apricot, honey, caramel, almond paste and yellow rose. It tastes thick, sticky and deliciously sweet on the close.",Hekate,Feudo Arancio
"Villa Monticelli Passito represents one of the best dessert wines to come from Umbria, central Italy. Made from air-dried grapes, the wine sports a amber-copper color and opens with syrupy aromas of white raisins, candied fruit, honey and loads of apricot.",Moscato Passito Villa Monticelli,Barberani
"A wine that shows a more delicate side of the vineyard, as the texture is rounded and juicy. The structure is fully in place, hinting at licorice and black chocolate while pushing the red berry fruits forward. The final tannins are soft and open.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Aux Malconsorts Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"One of Duboeuf's 2009 successes, this is powerful, excellently balanced between solid tannins and fresh fruit. The black cherry flavors revolve around a dry core, concentrated and complex, with a full and ageworthy aftertaste.",Prestige,Georges Duboeuf
"Exceptionally ripe and yet beautifully proportioned, this has a gravelly base under bright red currant and raspberry fruit. Tight and tart initially, it opens into a lush, superripe wine that finishes a bit hard and green but with bright, intense baking spice highlights.",Zachary's Ladder,Gorman
"From one of Chambolle's best premier crus, this is a very complete wine, its tannins kept in balance with ripe strawberry and plum jelly flavors. It is ripe and full, hinting at concentration of minerality and structure, but already opening out well.",Les Baudes Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"A delicious wine with all the roundness and style of a Chambolle. The texture is soft, but given a firm cushion of tannins and vanilla from the wood aging. Given 2_3 years, this will be a lovely wine.",Les Chatelots Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"Here's a beautiful, amber wine blended with Malvasia Toscana, Trebbiano and Sangiovese that opens with impressive aromas of candied orange, butterscotch, caramel, honey and roasted chestnut. It imparts a smooth, rich feel with a sweet finish that can be counted in minutes.",,I Veroni
"Fragrant and dense, this is nonetheless immediately accessible, with bright berry flavors wrapped in strong mineral accents, finishing with licorice, steel, skin flavors, and sharp tannins.",Longevity,JM Cellars
"If you're looking for a gorgeous Pinot to drink now, here it is. The wine is dry and silky and complex, offering waves of black cherry jam, red currant, licorice, cola and sandalwood flavors. Tastes elegant and complex. Now_2013.",La Pommeraie,Benovia
"Made in the modern cult style, this soft, ripely lush Cabernet is immediately likeable for its blackberry-pie filling, black currant liqueur, chocolate, licorice and smoky sweet oak flavors. It's California Cabernet at its heady, opulent best. Drink now.",,Altvs
"Made from a small block in Artesa's estate vineyard, this low production (250 cases) Pinot is rich and concentrated in bright raspberry, cherry, licorice and bacon flavors. It's powerful enough to support lots of new French oak, yet is balanced and refined in the mouth. Should develop over the next 4_5 years.",Block 91D,Artesa
"Opulence and a definite streak of sold tannins combine to give a wine that has intensity, rich fruit and sweetness plus a licorice layer. The wine offers bright acidity as well over pure strawberry fruit flavors.",Les Chabiots Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"There is definite richness here. This is a wine that has a mineral structure inside an opulent and ripe outer skin. The fruits run the range from pear to black currants to tropical flavors, all given a delicious spicy edge. Age for 2_4 years.",Langenlois Terrassen Reserve,Loimer
"A very lovely blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc, with rich flavors and classic dryness. Shows delicious blackberry, black cherry, currant and dried herb flavors, touched with smoky oak, and wrapped into gentle tannins. Should age well over a decade; decant if you're going to drink it now.",Sophia's Hillside Cuvée,Lancaster
"Another of Cameron Hughes' terrific Cabernets at a good price. This wine will easily stand beside Cabs far more expensive, with its dry, crisply complex flavors of blackberries, cherries, currants, anise, mocha and oak.",Lot 172,Cameron Hughes
"A smooth, modern and rich version of Chilean Syrah that's bringing it. The nose is full of mineral, graphite, coconut and heavenly black fruit, while the palate is bright, pure and delicious as it leans toward black-currant liqueur, blackberry and boysenberry. Fruity to the max, with a meaty finish and plenty of body. Drink now through 2013.",La Cumbre,Errazuriz
"This is a lush, complex Pinot Noir. It shows classic cool-climate acidity and dryness, and long hangtime flavors of raspberries, cherries and cola. But there also are exotic notes of wild berries, spices, cured meats and dried herbs, which make the taste fascinating and elusive. The texture is silky and pure Pinot Noir. Should develop over the next 6_8 years.",Doc's Ranch,Evening Land
"Chard fans who are tired of soft, flabby wines will welcome this dry, crisp bottling. The underlying grape flavors offer lime, Meyer lemon, mango and steely minerals, while winemaker bells and whistles bring needed layers of buttered toast and vanilla cream. A beautiful, classy and elegant Chardonnay; production was only 400 cases.",,Failla
"Wonderfully rich, with a lush and luxurious mid-palate, this young wine is packed with berries and cassis, elevated with some citrusy acidity, and deep with notes of gravel and smoke. This wine is still hard and unresolved. Give it a lot of decanting, or just age for a few years.",The Bully,Gorman
"Young as this is, it is a complex, aromatic, blend that is open enough for immediate enjoyment, but full and detailed enough for long term cellaring. Right now it's all about strawberry jam, light pepper, and hints of rock. Big, lush and delicious.",RiverBend Vineyard Tribute Red,Fielding Hills
"Closed with a bright red wax capsule, Sant'Ulderico is an oak-aged sweet red wine from Valpolicella that offers massively thick extraction and firm tannins that are successfully offset by sweet fleshiness. What really distinguishes this wine, however, is the gigantic thickness of its texture.",Sant'Ulderico,Monte dall'Ora
"One of the prettier Cab Francs on the market, showing fine Napa structure and intricate flavors that grow more complex as the wine warms in the glass. With red and black cherry, red licorice, teriyaki beef and sweetly smoked cedar flavors, it's a beautiful wine to drink now.",Estate Grown,Monticello Vineyards
"The Kögl is one of the great Krems vineyards, and this full-bodied Riesling has considerable power as well as intensely crisp acidity. There is just a touch of spice to go with the pineapple juice and green apples. Keep this wine for 4_5 years.",Kögl Reserve,Stadt Krems
"A beautiful, complex and upscale Cabernet to drink now, after a good decant. It's bone dry and a little soft, with intricately layered blackberry, black currant and oak flavors. Feels lush and important in the mouth, and the spicy finish lasts for a long time.",Home Ranch Vineyard,Steven Kent
"Supple and inviting, from the nose of flowers and dark fruits, to the chocolatey tannins that lick the back of the throat, this is a fully-realized, smooth and most accessible red wine.",,Pirouette
"This luminous Passito di Noto (a dessert wine from Sicily made with air-dried grapes) offers bright and defined aromas of orange and almond blossoms, honey, dried apricot and sweet summer fruit. There's a touch of piquant spice and acidity to break through the wine's natural sweetness and thickness.",,Planeta
"From an excellent vintage, this bright Rosso offers creamy aromas of espresso mousse and milk chocolate, with steady pulses of cherry and blackberry at the back. The wine's fresh acidity pairs well with cheesy pasta or pizza.",,Castiglion del Bosco
"Delicate yet beguiling, with aromas of violets, ripe pomegranates and granite, there's an Old World elegance that sets this Romanian Pinot Noir apart. The palate is concentrated, with crisp red cherry and plum flavors, but keenly balanced by brisk acidity and soft, finely-grained tannins. Structured and refined with a medium long finish.",Kronos Limited Edition,Cramele Halewood
"Expect ripe and open fruit from this Faiveley owned vineyard in Mercurey. The wine tastes soft, the tannins well integrated into the ripe cherry and berry fruits. It could age, but it is ready to drink now.",Clos des Myglands Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"Distinctly Californian in style, this is a soft, big, fruity Pinot Noir, packed with cherry, berry, cola and spice flavors that sink deep into the palate and last long on the finish. It's certainly rich, but lacks some finesse and elegance. Drink now.",La Encantada Sapphire,Coghlan
"An interesting blend of equal parts Syrah and Mourvèdre wiith 8% Tannat, The Pepper Pot offers concentrated aromas and flavors of dark forest berries and fleshy black plums. A hint of leather and game unfolds on the finish, while medium acidity keeps the flavors fresh on the palate.",The Pepper Pot,Edgebaston
"Dusty dark cherry and blackberry fruit dominate the nose, with secondary aromas of game, peppery spice and tobacco. The dark fruit character continues on the palate, transitioning into the finish, which is laced with hints of mocha and spice. Medium weight, with nice vibrancy in the mouth. Drink now-2015.",Silkbush Mountain Vineyards,Lions Drift
"Round, ripe and quite pretty cherry fruit flavors, showing a hint of loam and a briny note. Tannins have smoothed out, and the length is better than average. Score could improve with further bottle age.",Boushey Grande Côte Vineyard,McCrea Cellars
"This wine may lack the dramatic power of its top-flight brethren, but it still satisfies, delivering reasonably complex notes of cherries, rhubarb and olive carried by silky tannins and moderate alcohol. Drink this terrific value over the next year or two.",,Milton Park
"Big blackberry aromas show very little rusticity. Feels full but smooth and balanced, with a nice mix of wild berry, spice and fine herb flavors. Mellow and not pushy on the finish. Really good for Bonarda.",Single Vineyard Reserva,Lamadrid
"Hawk and Horse have managed to make a delicious Cabernet from a challenging vintage. Dark, earthy flavors of cedar, spice and blackberry, are enriched with plenty of smoothness and structure to give it that extra something special. Made by winemakers Dick Peterson and Scott Harvey from a certified-Biodynamic vineyard with rocky red soil at 2,200 feet above sea level.",,Hawk and Horse Vineyards
"This wine goes from delivering savory spice, cured meat and smoked bacon to being lean and not too intense or persistent on the close. The alcohol and dry tannins want more plush fruit for support.",,Pinino
"This pretty Rosso di Montalcino opens with a concentrated appearance and aromas of ripe fruit, spice, toasted nut and dried rosemary. A bit thin on the finish, the wine concludes with silky tannins and a fresh touch.",,Poggio Nardone
"From the Castello di Argiano property, Sesti's delicious Rosso has bright aromas of small berry, dried rosemary, dark chocolate and toasted almond.",,Sesti
"Spicy wood notes, dark fruit, rum cake, dried ginger, licorice and cola add up to an ethereal and elegant Brunello that is more smooth and silky than it is bold and bulky. Spice, sandalwood and cedar appear on the close, but it has a compact, streamlined structure.",,Ridolfi
"This Chenin seems to have an older soul than its peers, with mature notes of honeyed almond and sweet spice that infiltrate the Anjou pear and hard peach flavors. Citrus pith adds a touch of bitterness to the otherwise toasty, sweet spice-infused finish.",De Tradisie,Rudera
"There's so much nuance and complexity in this rustic yet fascinating Croatian wine, that it takes a while to break down its components. Initial scents of dried leaves and mulch blow off to reveal an array of delicate floral and fruit aromas, accented by rich chocolate and vanilla notes. Big in both alcohol and structure, its massively tannic, but smoothes out with aeration. Decant to drink now, but could easily evolve for 5_10 years.",Dinga,Saints Hills
"Blackberry aromas blend with open-grained oak to create a slightly charred bouquet. A bit acidic and edgy in feel, with a mix of herb, plum and berry flavors. Tight, juicy and a touch short on the finish, with dry, peppery spice notes. Drink now through 2014.",Crianza,Viña Vilano
"There's a progression of aromas here, with some bright candied fruit alongside rum cake, dried ginger, licorice and forest floor. The fruit component resembles crème de cassis and red currant. Despite all that pretty movement in the bouquet, the wine is lean and bright in the mouth, and gets the job done in terms of keeping the palate refreshed.",,Marchesato degli Aleramici
"This wine has a more vinous nose with bold cherry and raspberry aromas followed by leather, spice and Spanish cedar. Textured and firm, bright and fresh.",Riserva,La Torre
"This Brunello shows elegant aromatic restraint in its tight aromas of wild berry and red currant. Dark flavors of barbecue spice, cured meat, leather and tobacco layer the midpalate, then turn fine and full on the finish.",,Le Gode
"This Brunello shows aromas of leather and cured meat without much fresh fruit to hold it up. The structure and acidity is there, along with tertiary aromas of crushed mineral, asphalt, candied fruit and dried sage.",Riserva,Podere La Vigna
"Nice and peppery, with deep, impressive blackberry and plum, bacon and sandalwood flavors. It's a full-bodied wine with lots of power and elegance. Drink now.",,Q
"Made from Carneros-grown grapes, this Syrah strikes the palate as rather candied in blackberries and cherries. It's smooth in the mouth, and the oak brings a pretty layer of smoky cedar.",,Cakebread
"Here's a tight, streamlined Brunello characterized by a toasted or charred almond note and bright forest notes of wild berry and underbrush. The mouthfeel is lean and tight, and there's a tannic firmness that holds it together.",,Collosorbo
"A bright nose of cherry, vanilla and rum cake leads into a moderately intense midpalate, with bright endnotes of dried mint and ginger on the cool, crisp finish.",,Cantina di Montalcino
"This is a rich, ripe Syrah, with deep, long-lasting chocolate, blackberry jam and oak flavors. Impresses for its sheer razzle dazzle. Probably best over the next few years.",Fox Family Vineyard,Blair Fox
"Sweet smelling, but welcoming and true to the cream style. Feels creamy and soft by Sherry standards, with prune, raisin, caramel, toffee and chocolate flavors. Turns a touch bitter on the finish, with a final dose of raisin, honey and toffee.",Cream,Bodegas Dios Baco S.L.
"Big and bold, but a bit disjointed aromatically. Ripe fruit and pipe tobacco vie with a fine note of graphite or lead pencil. It seems soft, with a touch of sweetness, but crisp tannins. Give it a few more years to unwind. Finishes thick and chewy.",,Bonacchi
"A delicate and subtle expression of Sangiovese Grosso, with tight touches of wild berry, almond skin, forest bramble, rum cake, cola and eucalyptus. Streamlined and tight, with great power on the close. A very compact and tightly constructed wine.",,Agostina Pieri
"This 60-40 blend combines Shiraz's blackberry fruit with Cab's slightly herbal notes to make a pretty marriage. It shows enough firmness to stand up to rich, fatty meats now, or to sustain it through up to a decade of cellaring.",Mountain Estate,Inkberry
"Here's a lightly oak-aged Recioto di Soave that opens with an intensely golden color and beautiful aromas of raw honey, roasted almond and chestnut, backed by candied fruit and apricot.",Monte Calvarina,Sandro de Bruno
"An awesome Zinfandel that shows how delicious the variety can be in the right hands. The wine is unusually complex for Zin, showing not only its briary wild berry flavors but deeper, terroir-driven notes of minerals. The tannins are strong but very fine, while crisp acidity provides balance. Definitely hot in the finish, but fiery barbecue will be a perfect pairing.",Home Ranch,Seghesio
"Made with overripe, concentrated grapes, Assoluto is a crisp and luminous dessert wine. It releases very feminine aromas of honey, yellow rose, vanilla cream and loads of stone fruit. There's glycerine, but also acidity to maintain that ideal balance between thickness and freshness.",Assoluto,Pala
"An attractive Vin Santo opens with integrated aromas of honey, candied chestnut, maple syrup, dried fruit and apricot. The 2003 vintage was a hot one, but this beautiful wine takes that heat and turns it into intensity. Finishes full and soft.",,Volpaia
"It opens relatively soft and forward (for a Woodward Canyon Cab), then delivers a burst of sweet cherry fruit, backed with barrel flavors of cinnamon and mocha. There is plenty of acidity and astringent tannins propping up the finish; another year or two of bottle age will help to smooth it out.",,Woodward Canyon
"A Yarra Valley classic, Dry Red No. 1 is a Bordeaux-style blend marked by its restrained alcohol levels yet potent flavors. The 2007 features scents of tobacco, vanilla and cassis, with a hint of tomato emerging on the palate. It's medium-bodied, with a long finish that finishes with firm but silky tannins and lip-smacking cassis. Approachable now, but should age well for 10_15 years.",Dry Red Wine No. 1,Yarra Yering
"The heavy bottle, as so often, is the giveaway: This is meant as an important statement. The wine comes from a small parcel of vines owned by Cambon la Pelouse in Margaux. It has 100% new wood, but the richness of the fruit balances, giving a smooth, rich wine with black berry, bitter chocolate and mint flavors.",L'Aura de Cambon,Château Cambon la Pelouse
"Spicy and precise, this is a Bordeaux mix, with sharp-edged cassis, black cherry and blackberry fruit, encased in a strong, fortress-like, oak stockade. Clearly a wine to decant, it's got plenty of power and 15.3% alcohol, yet retains a supple mouthfeel and sense of proportion.",BFM Red,Dusted Valley
"Potentially an aromatic wine that will develop a rich, velvety character. At this young stage, the fruit is dominated by firm tannins that sit at the heart of the wine. It has all the density for a good development, aging over 5_10 years.",,Château la Bessane
"A firmly structured wine, perfumed with delicious fresh fruit, supported by densely solid tannins. Fresh cherry acidity cuts right through the texture. It has weight certainly, while the freshness suggests this could be drinkable within 4_5 years.",Les Pruliers Premier Cru,Domaine Henri Gouges
"Hekate, made with a blend of aromatic grapes from Sicily, is a rich and decadent wine that opens with a luminous amber color and intense aromas of candied orange, sweet almond paste, dried flowers, peach and honeysuckle. The wine is thick and dense with crisp citrus flavors and would pair with crème caramel.",Hekate 500ml,Feudo Arancio
"The fruit is ripe and the tannins firm; winemaker Jerry Reiner is able to craft very ripe fruit while keeping the varietal character of the Cabs__arth and herb, with a touch of stem. Deep and substantial, this should age well for a decade or more.",Conner Lee Vineyard Gun Metal Red,Guardian Cellars
"A fine combination of tannins and ripe fruit, rich and at the same time solidly structured. The year brings out soft acidity and blackberry juice, and the wine finishes big and bold.",Les Evocelles,Henri de Villamont
"Fine, elegant wine, packed with delicious strawberry flavors, sweetness and richness. At the core are firm tannins, but these are almost crowded out by the ripe fruit.",Les Feusselottes Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"Released from Hahn, the Central Coast producer, this wine is so good, it easily stands beside far more expensive bottlings. It's dry and full-bodied and complex, just what you want in a Cab, and shows classic flavors of ripe blackberries, sweet black currants and smoky cedar. Production was 2,200 cases, and it's worth the search.",,Bin 36
"From Long Shadows, a rare, barrel-fermented Riesling. Sappy, tart, juicy and stylish, this is loaded with pear, grapefruit and Meyer lemon. The acidity is generous but softened up a bit by the extra oxygen from the fuder.",,Carmina Burana
"This beautiful Malvasia-based wine shows the beauty and good cheer of the island of Salina off the northern coast of Sicily. The wine is luminous and light but it also shows enormous purity of its honey, peach and apricot aromas. Pair it with foie gras or aged cheese.",Tenuta Capofaro 500ml,Tasca d'Almerita
"Ojai is making Chardonnays in a drier, leaner and lower alcohol style than many others, but the wines reward for their extreme elegance and Chablisian minerality. This one, from a cool vineyard within sight of the Pacific, is streamlined, with flavors of citrus rind, tapioca and oak, and is very high in mouthwatering acidity.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,Ojai
"A full style of Riesling, showing a tropical fruit side. Rich and concentrated, with acidity coming through only at the end, where the rich fruit gives a broad aftertaste. Age for four years and more.",Grillenparz Reserve,Stadt Krems
"With 4,300 bottles produced and only 110 cases imported, this is a gorgeous small production Cab that should be grabbed up when you find it. It's all dark fruit and sweet spice with notes of black currant, fig, plum, leather and cigar box. With firm tannins and a medium-full weight, this is a big but balanced wine that's easy to enjoy now or can be cellared for a couple of years.",Three Pines,Stark-Condé
"At first this seems over the top (it's 15.8%). But give the wine time and you'll find the ultimate presentation of ripeness, richness and depth. The flavors are thick and black, with chunky black plum, prune, syrup and more. But it's also healthy and not flabby, with balance and a sense of being. Excellent if you like monster reds.",Lindaflor,Monteviejo
"This is a very nice Cabernet for drinking now and for a few more years, although you'll want to decant it for several hours. It's dry and tannic, with flavors of blackberries, black currants and cedar, and it has that ineffably hard to describe quality of elegance.",,Martin Ray
"An intense wine that has powered, nervy acidity, lots of citrus with lime zest. The wine is still young and should be aged to become an impressive Riesling.",Kremser Pfaffenberg,Winzer Krems
"The latest Artist Series Cab is mostly old vine Champoux vineyard fruit, and displays single-vineyard character as a result. Big, powerful, full, round black cherry fruit grabs the center, just on the edge of jammy, supported with juicy acidity. This wine is still quite young and edgy, but will reward cellaring over a decade or more, as is usually the case with Woodward Canyon Cabs.",Artist Series #16,Woodward Canyon
"Le Poesie is an elegant and subdued wine that is characterized by refined, but never exaggerated, aromas of dried apricot, honey, marzipan, peach cobbler and fine touches of dried sage and lemon zest. The acidity is impressive and really helps in washing the palate of the wine's delicious residual sugar.",Le Poesie 500ml,Cantina di Soave
"This blend of different vineyards is immediately appealing for its silky mouthfeel and delicious flavors. Floods the mouth with raspberries, cherries, red currants, licorice, bacon, dusty herb and sandalwood flavors. So pretty, so polished, so refined. Will develop over the next two__our years.",Occidental Coast,Evening Land
"Give this vigorously young Pinot Noir several hours of decanting, or age it for five__even years if you can. It's brightly acidic and ripe in cherry, currant and sandalwood flavor, with a gorgeous mouthfeel of velvet and silk. It's a bit ponderous, but there's no denying the power.",Peay Vineyard,Failla
"The wine shows great richness, power and density. Wood aging has smoothed the rough edges and give an intense, firm wine, the tannins finely balanced with the black fruits.",Altenberg,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
"A sharp, spicy, beautifully-defined example of Washington Syrah. Purple berry fruits, lingering, focused, and intense. Tasted right at release, it is still sharp and woody, and very much in need of more bottle age. But the basic juice is exemplary, and the finish has a pretty, toasty ring to it.",RiverBend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"A stunning Chard, one of South Africa's best, that can truly compete with some of the classics at a fraction of the cost. Rich and ripe with notes of red apple flesh, melon, orange oil and a soft hint of toasted woodiness. It's full in the mouth but balanced by superb minerality and medium acidity. The finish is long with a fresh hazelnut driven nuttiness lingering throughout.",,Hamilton Russell
"This is a classically styled Coonawarra Cab, with ample cassis, cedar and mint wrapped up into a balanced, well-proportioned whole. The Katnook style favors silky tannins over power, making this elegant Cabernet one to drink over the next several years.",Founder's Block,Katnook Estate
"Just an edge of butter gives this wine roundness and extra richness. Along with this character comes ripe peach fruit, lifted with acidity. Ready to drink. Screwcap.",Kimmeridgien,Jean-Marc Brocard
"A tremendous wine. Made from 100% Cabernet and raised for nearly two years in 40% new French oak, it defines the ripe, hedonistic Napa style. Yet it's no mere fruit bomb, offering a tobaccoey earthiness to the berries. A touch of raisins and heat in the finish seems to limit ageability, though, so drink up.",Silencieux,Venge
"Opens with cassis, black cherry, blackberry and dusty aromas that suggest leather. Feels healthy, with blazing acidity propelling dark fruit, toast and vanilla flavors. Juicy on the finish due to semisharp acids, with length and liveliness.",Q,Zuccardi
"Solidly varietal flavors of strawberry and Bing cherry fruit anchor this well-made, 100% Barbera. The wine has both depth and polish, with some varietal tartness running through a medium length finish. It makes a good case for Barbera's potential in Washington state.",,Stottle
"Talenti's Rosso is an impressive expression of Sangiovese, with bold brushstrokes of ripe berry, spice, blue flower, toasted nut and dried herb. This is a compelling red wine from Tuscany that would pair well with lasagna or cheesy pasta.",,Talenti
"Lots of nice blackberry, cassis, plum and new oak flavors in this dry, tannic Cabernet. It hews to an old-fashioned style, with an earthiness that suggests time in the cellar. Try after 2014.",,Silver Oak
"A brilliant gold color, this Chenin boasts wood-infused fruit notes of pear, peach pit and melon alongside accents of honeysuckle and toasted brioche. The round, slightly slick mouthfeel is elevated with a mouthwatering acidic cut to the close.",,Spice Route
"Shows some of the warmth of the vintage in its elevated alcohol levels and high-toned fruit. It's full-bodied and supple, with flavors of brandied plums and baking spices. Drink it over the next few years.",William Randell,Thorn Clarke
"The wine is subdued and clean on the nose and it doesn't exaggerate or mask the quality of fruit. This is executed in a bright, compact and streamlined style that combines freshness and firmness.",,Baricci
"Some superripe notes of strawberry jam and candied fruit lead into notes of rum cake, cherry liqueur and cured meat. A bold, masculine mouthfeel comes courtesy of firm, structured tannins.",Assunto,Bellaria
"Deep purple in color, with a dense, compact bouquet showing ripe blackberry, density and heat. Full-force on the palate, with drying tannins along with prune, blackberry, licorice and peppery flavors. Serious and tannic, with richness, extract and power.",,Angulo Innocenti
"This 50-50 Merlot-Cabernet Sauvignon blend is soft upon entry, with delicate, pretty fruit flavors of raspberry and wild plum. Gentle accents hint at buttery caramel and sweet cracker through a well-balanced finish. A light touch is evident throughout.",Lalayee Red,Lullaby
"Nice ripeness, fullness and generosity here. The bouquet opens with bold brushstrokes that don't match the delicate, subdued feel in the mouth. It delivers most of its energy on the nose and segues to a much calmer, more straightforward style on the close.",,Il Marroneto
"While it does have the structure of a Pommard, this is also a ripe, rounded wine. Its sweet red fruits surround the firm tannins offering richness. A wine that will offer sold pleasure in 3_4 years.",Rugiens Premier Cru,Domaine Moillard
"This plump Rosso di Montalcino offers ripe, succulent fruit notes of black cherry, blueberry and fresh plum, rounded by toasted espresso and almond. All that results in a soft, round and smooth mouthfeel.",,Fossacolle
"While sweet on the nose with aromas of blueberry preserves and fruitcake, the palate on this dry Romanian red is refreshingly restrained, with a fresh herbal tone that accents its ample fruit flavors. A fascinating study of the Feteasca Neagra grape, there's a surprising amount of elegance that peeks through its initial rusticity.",Hyperion Limited Edition,Cramele Halewood
"Darcie Kent really nails this Cab out of John Madden's Ranch. Pungently bold and moody, intensely herbal with green pepper and olive, wrapped within a wall of black pepper that lingers. Pair it with pepper steak.",Madden Ranch,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"Opens with horsey, leathery aromas that are funky and wild, but are surrounded by solid berry-fruit scents. Picks up steam on the palate, which is easygoing, solidly built and just firm enough. Tastes of blackberry, cola, spice and chocolate, then finishes smooth and creamy.",B Crux,O. Fournier
"Lemon verbena and green grass aromas waft from the glass, with secondary notes of grapefruit and stone fruit to round it out. Vibrant acidity brightens this medium-weight mouth, with a touch of green plum-skin flavor and soft bitterness remaining through the lively finish.",,Morgenhof
"Pretty to sniff, with aromas of lemon, fresh white fruits and minerals. Feels crisp, chiseled and racy, with blazing acidity propelling green apple, lime, green melon and saline flavors. Long on the finish. Drink now.",Pazo Barrantes,Pazo de Barrantes
"Packed and concentrated, with blueberry, blackberry, bramble and pastry aromas. Initially, it's jumbled and out of joint, with jumpy acids and heavy flavors of blackberry, grilled meat and herbs, while on the finish, the fruit fades quickly, leaving weight, resin and vanilla.",Bramare Rebon Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"Concentrated aromas of berry fruits, spice and black currant jelly suggest that the wine is full and rich. In the mouth, severe tannins create a grinding sensation, while flavors of toast, blackberry, cassis and brown sugar lead to a heavy, burnt tasting finish that's blocky in feel.",Parada de Atauta,Dominio de Atauta
"This newish producer pays honor to its Persian roots with Yalda, a Rhône-style blend of 41% Shiraz, 26% Mourvedre, 25% Grenache and 8% Cinsault that's intense, coated like chocolate-strawberry jam, tobacco, leather and earth with a subtext of cheese rind. This wine definitely has character.",Yalda,Fazeli Cellars
"A dense wine, its tannins firmly in place. It shows ripe red berry fruits, firm structure and rich, juicy fruit. Powered by its tannins, it will remain a firm wine for 2_3 years.",Beaumont,Domaine Guillot-Broux
"This is a dry, robust Syrah, packed with blackberry, blueberry, anise, bacon and pepper flavors, and wrapped into sturdy tannins. Give it a decant, and drink with game or Mexican beef dishes.",,Dogwood
"There's a dark smoky element to this hearty Brunello that recalls cured beef, moist earth, cedar, leather and rum cake. The wine is silky and smooth, with a noticeably clean quality to the finish.",,Armilla
"This medium-bodied Shriaz displays a soft, creamy, inviting mouthfeel and a piquant counterpoint in its flavors of tart cherries and mulling spices. It's an easy-drinking wine that ends on a cranberry note.",,Hope Estate
"With sweet blackberry, cassis, anise and mocha flavors, this Cabernet is a flashy wine, but you'll find some overripe, raisiny notes toward the finish. Drink now before it goes downhill.",Estate,Ideology Cellars
"A nice dry wine to drink now. It's soft and velvety in the mouth, with flavors of blackberries, plums, anise and cedar. Blended with a little Cabernet Franc and Merlot, it's brightened by a bite of acidity.",No. 72,Foyt Family
"There is a rich texture, with black and red cherry fruits. The wine is dominated more by the dark and complex tannins that give a solid and firm base, and also show potential lusciousness.",Les Roncerets Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"From Chanson's five-acre parcel of the Beaune Grèves vineyard, this is a ripe, softly tannic wine, more dominated by strawberry flavors, rich and deliciously sweet. Not for long-term aging, but worth 2_3 years' waiting.",Les Grèves Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"This full-bodied Cabernet is packed with ripe cassis and chocolate aromas and flavors, yet retains a certain charm and elegance that makes it very drinkable now. The finish lingers, marked by tannins that are supremely supple without being soft. Drink now_2015, or perhaps for a few more years after that.",Blocks Road,Kilikanoon
"Made with air-dried Passerina grapes in central Italy, this special dessert wine shows characteristic aromas of butterscotch, crème caramel, dried apricot and honey. It's sweet but not too heavy and would pair with dried cookies or sponge cake.",L'Estro del Mastro 500 ml,Il Conte
"This offers a distinctive take on Boushey fruit, with a lot of green tea in the tannins. The berry flavors take a back seat to the vineyard's distinctive highlights of earth, cured meat, and Rhône-like bacon fat.",Boushey Vineyard,JM Cellars
"The Herrenberg vineyard has a produced a wonderfully rich Grüner, its rich tropical character broad but never far from freshness. Pear juice and peaches dominate, with just a fleck of spice, pierced through with mouth watering acidity.",Herrenholz,Wieninger
"Recioto della Valpolicella is one of the rare red dessert wines enhanced by a strong tannic structure. This extra density and richness is what makes these wines such a perfect pairing partner to chocolate-based cakes and puddings. This expression delivers layers of fudge, smoke, roasted almond and exotic spice.",Rerum 500 ml,Sartori
"Sangue d'Oro is a hearty, extracted Passito dessert wine made with fragrant Zibibbo grapes. The wine is thick and dense and beautifully redolent of chestnut honey, candied fruit and almond paste.",Sangue d'Oro 500ml,Sererraglio Carole Bouquet
"Bailly Lapierre regards this full-bodied rich Pinot Noir as its signature wine. It has a cool, northern feel to it, but it also has powerful red-berry fruits, a firm structure, a final layer of acidity and a sense this is a wine as well as a Crémant.",Pinot Noir Brut,Bailly-Lapierre
"Ultrasmooth and luxurious in the mouth, with the fine tannins and complex cherry, blueberry, anise and mocha flavors of a fine red wine, and the finish is dry and lingering. It's a bit soft and hot, but a lovely Merlot to drink now.",Reserve,Cerro Prieto
"A powerful, ripe wine with great sweet tannins, piled with black fruits, a dense texture and layers of wood. Despite all the richness, it still retains a sense of structured balance, finishing with good Bordeaux dryness and acidity.",,Château Soudars
"Tight and tannic now, giving an unrelieved mouthfeel of astringency. That's despite concentrated, powerful blackberry-pie filling, cassis and richly smoked, sweet oak flavors. Give it 5_7 years in the cellar to come around, if not longer.",Reserve,Corley
"Groseilles is French for red currant, and there is a definite red-fruit character here, with a hint of smokiness and sweet tannins over layers of wood. The wine is still young and relatively soft, but offers aging over the next three to four years.",Les Groseilles Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"Inside the lush exterior there is a solid, tannic character, very firm with dark raisins and prune flavors as well as black plums. This is a big wine for the vintage, both structured and ripe.",Les Roncerets Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"A cool, elegant wine, the wood in harmony with the black cherry and mulberry fruits. The wine is properly structured and dense, the dry tannins lending great support to this fine, mineral-inspired wine.",Les Fichots Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"In the creamy rich style that is the hallmark of many Kamptal Grüners, Fred Loimer's blend from different vineyards has ripe, juicy fruits, a delicious combination of mango, pear and crisper apple skins. Age for 2_3 years.",Terrassen Reserve,Loimer
"Rich as well as tannic, this is concentrated, with dense fruits and sweet acidity. Its structure offers good aging as well as pleasurable fruit now.",Château du Grand Pré,Georges Duboeuf
"A big, bold and fruity wine that is full of ripe berry fruits, rich and generous. This is Beaujolais at its most exuberant, a celebration of delicious fruit. It could age, but is ready to drink.",Domaine des Rosiers,Georges Duboeuf
"The soft, silky quality of the tannins, fine acidity, and elaborate black cherry, currant, herb, anise and oak flavors make this elegant young wine fully ready to drink now, with equally fine food. Give it a few hours of decanting.",,Lancaster
"This is pure Washington Merlot, sourced from Klipsun, Ciel du Cheval and the original 1976 planting at Kiona. Initially stiff and herbal, it opens grudgingly, streaked with black olive, black cherry, earth and dark chocolate. The muscularity is a fine demonstration of why and how Washington Merlot is ageworthy; a showcase of tight black raspberry and cassis, with a core of iron.",,JM Cellars
"The best of Olsen's 2008 reds, this 100% Merlot is generous and forward, with rich cherry and raspberry fruit. Spicy in the nose and in the mouth, it is lightly herbal, adding texture and length, and has the concentration and depth to develop nicely over the next decade.",,Olsen Estates
"This is powerful, rich Grüner, one that brings out the pepper character as well as apricot and honey. There is a dense texture in this concentrated and well-balanced wine. It needs to age for 3_4 years.",Wachtberg Reserve,Stadt Krems
"This is exactly the kind of unusual red blend that is giving Paso Robles such a good name. Made from Syrah, Petite Sirah and Zinfandel, it's an enormously attractive wine, dry and well-structured and complex. It shows flavors of blackberries and black cherries, currants, smoked meat, olives and cedar, with a slightly funky, Burgundian note of barnyard. Drink now.",Euphony,Red Poets
"This precious expression made by the dynamic Rizzi family shows thick, heavy, sweet creaminess in the mouth and bright aromas of honey, apricots, raisins and pressed flowers.",Frimaio 375ml,Rizzi
"This is a gorgeous and superbly balanced Syrah that's a real joy to drink. Aromas of cherry, whole vanilla bean, berry preserves and black tea leaves fill the bouquet, while solid notes of raspberry and red plum fill the mouth. The crushed velvet texture with dusty but firm tannins transitions seamlessly to the long coffee and black-pepper infused finish.",,Rudi Schultz
"Dark, dusty, strongly scented with barrel toast, coffee grounds and incense, this is the most substantial and complete version to date. Balancing cherry and plum fruit against the pretty barrel-infused tannins, it glides gracefully across the palate into a seamless finish.   Saggi is the Long Shadows collaboration with Tuscany's Ambrogio and Giovanni Folonari. the blend in 2007 is 43% Sangiovese, 36% Cabernet Sauvignon and 21% Syrah. With each new vintage, the percentage of Sangiovese climbs, putting more Tuscany in this new world super-Tuscan wine. Dark, dusty, strongly scented with barrel toast, coffee grounds and incense, this is the most substantial and complete version to date. Balancing cherry and plum fruit against the pretty barrel-infused tannins, it glides gracefully across the palate into a seamless finish.",,Saggi
"A smoky, intensely flavored wine that is ripe and opulent. The tannins are beautifully integrated into the powerful texture of sweet berry fruits, intense acidity and sumptuous aftertaste. Age for 3_4 years.",Les Taillepieds Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"Stella Maris is priced well below the other Northstar wines, but can stand on its own with this kind of quality. Bursting with tangy berries and lively acidity, it feels sculpted and refreshing, deep and lingering. A lick of mocha and a finishing hint of licorice add to the pleasure.",Stella Maris Red,Northstar
"What's nice about this wine is its bone dryness, and the way the acidity scours and cleanses the palate. It's subtle in citrus, grass and hay flavors, with complex herb, spice and mineral complexities. A superior California Sauvignon Blanc, and a superb food wine.",McGinley Vineyard,Ojai
"This fine Pinot Noir easily holds its own when tasted against far more expensive bottlings. It's softly silky and delicately structured and enormously rich, offering delicious waves of raspberries, cherries, oranges, cola, beef jerky and black pepper. A perfect Pinot Noir to drink now. Easy to find, with nearly 13,000 cases produced.",,Calera
"There's a focused quality to the fruit in this bright Rosso that resembles red candy, bright raspberry and sour cranberry. A softly toasted note of oak spice rounds out the mouthfeel and gives the wine extra depth and texture.",,Brunelli Martoccia
This wine's ripe cherry fruit and milk chocolate notes suggest softness and roundness. But the wine shows astringency and firmness on the close.,,Bellaria
"This is a nicely fragrant Rosso that shows bright nuances of raspberry, wild strawberry and pressed rose petal. The wine is smooth and silky to the end.",,Belpoggio
"Jammy and generous smelling, with pastry and solid black-fruit aromas. Feels good and balanced for a young Malbec, with flavors of sweet plum, blackberry and a medicinal character. Plump and fruity on the finish, and steady wire to wire.",,Lexicon
"Clean and bright on the nose, with loads of black plums and blueberries. This wine, made from _küzgözü grapes, is an interesting glimpse into Turkish winemaking. Dry and medium bodied, with a firm tannic structure and brisk acidity, it finishes with a hint of milk chocolate flavor. Could benefit from decanting, but would be an interesting to age as well.",Vintage Single Vineyard Collectible Series #5,Kayra
"This hearty Brunello shows a ripe, almost jammy personality with strawberry and raspberry preserve notes. There are background tones of exotic spice, vanilla and cinnamon that help support the wine's chewy fruit. The mouthfeel is soft and velvety.",,La Fiorita
"Winemaker John Kinney blends 50% Cabernet Sauvignon from Galles Vineyard with 50% Del Arroyo Vineyard Petite Sirah, trying to take advantage of the Cab's floral, herbal notes and the Petite's concentration and wall of tannins. He has largely succeeded. This dark-black wine is very much full of intense cherry and structured tannins and leathery spice. Petite Sirah lovers will particularly swoon.",Sotto Voce,Occasio
"Oak dominates this Chardonnay in its buttered toast, caramel and butterscotch flavors. Buried under that are pleasantly ripe pineapples and lemons. The winery suggests it will age through 2020, but that seems doubtful.",Estate,Sarah's Vineyard
"Dark and chocolaty, with grainy tannins under deep cassis and black cherry fruit. Full-bodied and chewy, with coffee grounds and spices filling in the finish.",Phinny Hill Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"Delicate sweet-pea and white-flower aromas marry into forward fruit notes of fresh pear and hard apricot. A mineral streak weaves through the lush palate, and a peach pit nuttiness lingers into the finish. Accessible and enjoyable now.",,Spice Route
"Black cherry and raspberry scents immediately hit you upon nosing, followed shortly after by an herbal edge with a chocolaty accent, like a thin mint cookie. This wine has structured tannins and medium weight, with a sweet-spice tinge to the close. Drink now.",,Tormentoso
"This informal wine opens with a dark, ruby color and pretty notes of red berry, rose and pipe tobacco.",,Uccelliera
"Despite the inexpensive price tag, this is a solid Shiraz, offering ripe black cherry fruit and touches of tree bark and orris root. It's medium-bodied, yet features a velvety texture and plenty of length on the finish. Drink now_2015.",,Rolling
"Soft and ripe, this is a broad wine. Its tannins are enveloped by the rich plum and damson fruit flavors. It combines the richness of the vintage with the softness of a Savigny in an already delicious whole.",Les Serpentières Premier Cru,Maurice Ecard
"Vanilla cookies, peach and nectarine aromas work the opening. In the mouth, there's a nice and even flow of acidity and pulpy tropical fruits. Flavors of tangerine, melon and lychee are authentic and well balanced, while the finish is musky, fresh and confirms the wine's high quality.",,Recuerdo
"A miracle for Grateful Dead fans who have matured into wine, there's lots to like in this red blend that's got bright, friendly cherry fruit, a lick of spice and surprising sophistication. It's medium in weight, with a shock of silky berry fruit on the finish. The blend is 60% Zinfandel, 23% Petite Sirah, 11% Barbera and 6% Sangiovese. Pair it with mushroom pizza or burgers. Jerry would approve.",Grapeful Red,Ruby Hill Winery
"This Syrah is remarkably ripe in blackberry, blueberry and cherry fruit, with a bite of acidity. It feels fine and vital in the mouth. Give it a brief decant.",Verna's Vineyard,Samsara
"A pure expression of Syrah from coastal Tuscany, Pieve dei Monaci offers a chewy texture and thick layers of black fruit, prune, cola, spice and smoked bacon. Pair this wine with grilled meat.",Pieve dei Monaci,Pieve Vecchia
"Quattroventi delivers a clean, genuine Rosso with bright notes of raspberry, blueberry, plum and black cherry. There's a touch of smoke or spice at the back that contributes to a round, easy mouthfeel.",,Quattroventi
"A fine Syrah, dry and rich in blackberry, currant, dark chocolate, grilled meat, spice and cedar flavors. It's pretty firm in tannins and acids, though, making it hard and chewy. Difficult to predict its future, but an educated guess suggests it's not an ager.",Phoenix Ranch,Whetstone
"Piccole Gioie (__ittle joys_) delivers a steady stream of tiny bubbles that form a foamy, creamy appearance and texture. In fact, a frothy cap remains long in the glass and provides a solid platform for aromas of honey, peach blossom, fragrant flower and dried sage.",Piccole Gioie,Ghione
"This is Dutton Estate's unoaked Sauvignon Blanc. It did not go through the malolactic fermentation, but it started as very ripe grapes, so what you get is pure citrus, Asian pear, white peach and green apple flavor, zesty and clean in acidity, with slight a sweetness in the finish. Nice with Indian, Chinese, Vietnamese fare.",Kylie's Cuvée,Dutton Estate
"This blend of 50% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Syrah and 20% Merlot has a fruity nose, the Syrah's leathery-ness is quite strong, surrounded by raspberry sweetness and red cherry from the Cab and Merlot. Although it's been in bottle some time, the finish is grippy and strongly tobacco-infused.",Confluence,Cabot Vineyards
"A kitchen-sink blend of 60% Shiraz, 20% Cab Sauv, 7% Grenache, 6% Mourvèdre, 4% Cinsault and 3% Viognier. Aromas of crushed violet petals are pitted against the intense mulled-raspberry and black-fruit core. Drinkable now, with approachable tannins and a dusty, cocoa-sprinkled finish, but could age until 2014.",Big Easy,Ernie Els
"From Temecula-based producer Fazeli, this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon features a lofty nose that's quite herbal, drifting into eucalyptus land__nd tasting of cranberry. Velvety tannins.",Khayyam,Fazeli Cellars
"Full bodied and meaty, with its slightly creamy texture supporting ample spice and bright berry flavors. This easy-drinking, moderately complex Barossa Shiraz is probably best consumed over the next 2_3 years.",,Grant Burge
"Easy, fresh and succulent, this ruby-colored Rosso would make a great match for grilled sausage or hamburger patties. There's a ripe, chewy texture to the mouthfeel, with a finish that's driven by dark fruit flavors.",,Cordella
"Lots of ripe blackberry and cherry fruit in this Cabernet, accented with notes of licorice and oak. It's a good wine, full-bodied, tannic and dry. Very good now, especially after a brief decant, but too dependent on fruit for a higher score, and doesn't seem like an ager.",Terraced Hillside Estate,Amizetta
"From Montalcino's most historic estate, this pretty Rosso opens with a bright, ruby color and aromas of spice and forest fruit. It delivers bright acidity and silky tannins in the mouth.",,Biondi Santi
"A very nice Sauvignon, easy to drink, and showing lots of style and elegance. Bone dry and zesty in acidity, it has citrus, tropical fruit and white pepper flavors, with a stimulating touch of tart gooseberry.",Kick Ranch,Carica
"This is an unbelievable price for a Napa Merlot of this quality. The wine is softly tannic, dry and rich, with crisp acidity balancing complex flavors of cherries, currants, herbs, violets and cedar. Taste this against Merlots costing five times as much, and it will acquit itself well.",Lot 175,Cameron Hughes
"Le Sponde is sweet and luscious, delivering fleshy, sweet aromas of stone fruit, honeycomb, apricot and almond paste. The wine is sweet, thick and decadently creamy on the close.",Le Sponde 500 ml,Coffele
"Limited production (just 1,800 cases) and special handling (native yeast, barrel fermented, lot selection) make this the prestige Chardonnay offering from the entire Ste. Michelle portfolio. Much of the fruit is from original (1973) plantings at the Cold Creek vineyard, and gives the wine depth and resonance. This vintage has had plenty of time to absorb the new oak and integrate the flavors, and is drinking beautifully.",Ethos,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Here's a beautifully gold-colored late harvest dessert wine born in the same territory that produces celebrated Brunello di Montalcino. Castello Banfi's expression is thick and luscious with a long fade flavored by apricot, honey and delicately toasted almond. Drink this wine alone after dinner in lieu of dessert.",Florus 500ml,Castello Banfi
"A solid wine, finely constructed, its chunky tannins blending well with the red-plum-juice flavors. The acidity is important, along with the tasty cherry texture. Age for 3_4 years.",Aux Perdrix Premier Cru,Domaine des Perdrix
"This Bordeaux blend is solidly in the Darby style, but bigger and fuller and rounder than the other wines, with lovely, plummy aromas that lead into mouth-filling blackberry, cassis and cherry fruit. The use of 75% new oak is not intrusive; it's truly just an accent, and does not overtake the fruit.",The Swagger Reserve Red,Darby
"Bee pollen, honey mead and lemon polish mingle in the bouquet; turning smooth and supple in the mouth. This is a rich and buttery wine, with excellent acidity behind the ripe fruit. The flavors gather strength as the wine pours over the tongue and down the back of the throat, finishing with a lick of butterscotch.",Boushey Vineyard,Darby
"Sweet, jammy fruit with spice from wood aging give a rich and soft wine, packed with ripeness, red cherries and blackberry. At this stage, the wood is major, and needs time to integrate.",Fremiers Premier Cru,Domaine de Courcel
"What a nice Cab! It's so softly intricate, so complex, so dry and interesting, you just want to drink the whole bottle now with anything related to beef. Shows blackberry, black currant and oak flavors, with a fine balance of acids and tannins, and is ready to drink now.",,Angeline
"Here's a Pinot to enjoy now with steak, or try a Julia Child-inspired coq au vin. It's big and sturdy and ripe, with cherry, currant, licorice and beef teriyaki flavors that finish in a swirl of spices. The tannins are substantial. Give it a few hours of decanting.",Cohn Vineyard,Benovia
"A beautiful, addictively good Sauvignon Blanc that shows how well the variety does in this inland valley, and also how well-farmed the Mauritson Vineyard is. The wine is brilliantly dry and crisp, with complex citrus, melon, fig, vanilla and white pepper flavors. Great value. Production was 1,000 cases.",Mauritson Vineyards,Bin 36
"Co-fermented with 3% Viognier, this estate-grown Syrah is front-loaded with bacon fat flavors. The tannins are still a bit astringent and chewy, but this wine has a ton of rich, earthy flavor. Mushroom, moist earth, black cherry, black raspberry, coffee, black olive__t's all good. Give it another couple of years to smooth out.",,Abeja
"A solidly tannic wine that powers with bitter chocolate, plum skin and black berry flavors. Very concentrated, it has the structure and acidity to offer aging potential for 2_3 years.",Carquelins,Georges Duboeuf
"Great structured richness, dense complex flavors. The ripe fruit swathes the core of tannins, giving a powerful texture, while the obvious acidity offers a streak of freshness to this sweet fruited wine.",Les Evocelles,Henri de Villamont
"A very fine 100% Sauvignon Blanc, made with little or no oak influence. It's dry and crisp and attractive, with citrus and tropical fruit, honeysuckle and vanilla flavors, and a fine tug of minerals. Combines richness and power with elegance, a rare feat.",,Hall
"A deliciously soft, smoky wine, the tannins a hint behind the rounded fresh berry and red-plum fruits. There is a great juicy character to go with the fresh acidity and the final, drier structure.",Beaune Grèves Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"This is a stellar and immensely attractive Merlot that's sure to impress any true wine lover. Fig, black plum flesh, sweet cola glaze and black raspberry sauce dominate, with accents of leathery spice and cigar tobacco adding depth and complexity. It's round and full in the mouth with dainty fine grain tannins and a long finish. This can easily be drunk now or cellared for another 2_5 years.",Mount Bullet,Shannon
"A mineral, textured wine, peppery and tightly wrought with distinct acidity over the green fruits and vivid acidity. The wine is full, but powered by acidity to keep it crisp.",Weinzierlberg,Stadt Krems
"This is a lovely wine to drink now. It's so dry and elegantly constructed, with wonderfully ripe tannins and great integration of oak with the fruit. There's a nice balance of acidity to balance the blackberry, cherry and cola flavors. Drink now, with a brief decant.",Smith Ranch,Steven Kent
"Ripe, rich Sauvignon Blanc with apple and green pepper flavors, spiced up with herbs. It moves to the herbaceous side of Sauvignon Blanc while also retaining fine concentration. Screw cap.",Sernauberg,Sattlerhof
"For a Grand Cru from Vosne-Romanée, this is a wine on the light side, its tannins soft and dominated by new-wood flavors. That said, it is still a fine wine, packed with ripe fruit and fresh acidity. The structure floats over the fruit; a few months and it may fatten out.",,Louis Latour
"Dark and smoky, this blend of fruit from Klipsun, Ciel du Cheval and Kiona includes 9% each Merlot and Cabernet Franc. Tight and herbal, infused with rock and iron, it is a compact and well-structured Cabernet Sauvignon that is not afraid to show a fair amount of stem and herb.",,JM Cellars
"Here's a ruby-colored Passito made with sweet Moscato Rosa grapes. This is not exactly a complex wine, but boy is it intense. Putting your nose in the glass is like burying your face is a bouquet of fresh red roses. Those amazing floral fragrances appear on the wine's long, sweet finish.",Cashmere Passito 375ml,Elena Walch
"This 100% Syrah is a supple and juicy, fruit-laden wine, bursting with blackberry, black cherry and cassis fruit. It is dense enough to add layers of mineral and mocha. Tannins are powerful and smooth, with a hint of green stem and pepper.",The Pixie,Gorman
"What a roll Feliz Noche has been on. They're scoring hit after hit, and this lovely Syrah is right on. Drink it now for its polished tannins, soft texture and dry, rich flavors of blackberry jam, cherry tart, cola and chocolate.",,Feliz Noche
"A velvet-textured wine, relatively light because of the vintage, but oh-so tender, the tannins whispering behind the sweet fruits. This is regarded as the second wine of Clos de Tart Grand Cru and shows the same generous, plush character.",La Forge de Tart Premier Cru,Clos de Tart
"This wine surprises by being so very pretty__nexpected from such a hot site. Lovely scents of raspberry, strawberry, mint and spice lift the nose; the palate is medium-bodied, nicely tart, perfectly balanced and long. The mix of sweet and tart red fruits lasts deliciously, with the spice adding grace notes. Though blended and aged in 100% new French oak barrels, the oak is muted, and the fruit shines through.",Stone Tree Vineyard Reserve,Columbia Crest
"A bit less obvious and more elegant than the 2007 vintage, this edition of Diamante (a Passito dessert wine from one of Sicily's best producers) shows piquant aromas of lemon zest, candied fruit, dried apricot, honey and butterscotch. The wine slides over the palate with crisp, clean determination a thick creaminess.",Diamante 500ml,Tasca d'Almerita
"Great Zinfandel, easily worth the price. Napa Valley still makes the most balanced, claret-style Zins, and this polished beauty is right up there. It's dry and elegantly constructed despite its considerable power, showing rich flavors of wild raspberries and cherries, sweet concentrated red currants, mocha, licorice and scads of peppery spices. Drink now. Production was 1,750 cases.",,Neal Family
"Sweet and a bit choppy on the nose, with aromas of wood shavings, mocha, fine herbs and spicy black fruits. Flush, lusty and big across the palate, but juicy and clean, with subtle bush berry and spice flavors. Finishes clean and subtle, with floral accents and a touch of heat. Drink now through 2013.",Kankana del Elqui,San Pedro
"Coonawarra's not known for Sauvignon Blanc, but this is a very good example. It's medium in weight and dominated by citrus, but it also sneaks in some slightly tropical nuances before ending in a zesty, mouthwatering finish. Drink now.",,Katnook Estate
"Innocent Bystander has been ahead of the Moscato curve, making this wine for a number of years, and it has always been among the best from Australia. The 2011 is perfumed and spicy, with ample strawberry and cherry fruit and a soft, frothy feel in the mouth. Drink it over the next six months or so.",,Innocent Bystander
"Opens with hard-baked berry aromas that turn briary and herbal with airing. Smooth tannins and meaty blackberry flavors are matched by barrel-driven vanilla and spice. Oaky and minty on the finish, with spunk and length.",Single Vineyard Reserva,Lamadrid
"Ugolaia is a delicious and attractive wine, but there's no denying that the overripe aromas of strawberry and raspberry jam subtract from the wine's overall sophistication. The mouthfeel is soft, round and plush.",Ugolaia,Lisini
"This wine feels wrapped in sunshine and warmth. There's ripe fruit, plus leather, barbecue sauce, cured meat and blackcurrant. A soft, plush mouthfeel with a firm tannic backbone lends sensations of dryness and power.",Pertimali Riserva,Livio Sassetti
"Dusty and toasty aromas over sweet plum fruit, with a streak of mocha running sharply down the center. Svelt and open, yet still sharp and showing a little bite in the back.",Cuvée Orleans,McCrea Cellars
"A solid example of Coonawarra Cabernet, the 2008 Terra Rossa features a charming combination of cherry-cassis fruit and eucalypt with cigar box and vanilla. It's medium to full in body, with fine balance and a long finish. Drink now_2016.",Coonawarra Estate Terra Rossa,Parker
"High alcohol gives this wine a glyceriney sweetness as well as heat, a prickly mouthfeel boosted by plenty of black pepper. Yet it's softly delicious, in the Peachy Canyon way, with an enormous array of blackberries, chocolate and bacon. Drink now.",Mustang Springs,Peachy Canyon
"This is a beautiful Moscato d'Asti with peach mousse, tangerine, white almond, honey, ginger and spring flower. Perfect for nut-based desserts, the sparkler is soft and sweet with a distant touch of tangy spice on the finish.",,C_ ed Balos
"This pretty Moscato d'Asti shows a rich, creamy quality, thanks to the sweet tones of honey, peach and exotic fruit that drive the bouquet. The texture is sticky and thick, but a zesty touch of fresh acidity shows up right at the end to keep the palate refreshed.",,Gianni Doglia
"Tart and fresh, with lovely aromas of grass, green plum and asparagus. Glimmers of stony minerality flash on the palate, with lime pith and plum skin flavors driving through to the mouthwatering finish. Brisk and slightly pricky texture.",Private Cellar Series,Steenberg
"At first, a rush of front-loaded plum and blackberry fruit hits the palate, then the flavors seem to sag a bit entering the midpalate. A wall of still-to-be-resolved oak leads into a hard, astringent, somewhat woody finish. Yet there is a substantial and well-built wine here, waiting to resolve its components into a more seamless whole. Retasted after being open a full day, it showed well, suggesting good aging potential.",,Steppe Cellars
"An unusual blend of Sangiovese, Nebbiolo and Barbera, aged two and a half years in French oak, yields a pleasing wine with light berry fruit anchoring a spicy center. The barrel notes add toast and cracker, nicely balanced, and there remains a suggestion of yeasty dough as well.",Reserve,Stottle
"Summerland's new crop of Pinot Noirs is quite good, and while this is their least expensive and lightest, it shows their signature. Crisp and silky, its cherry, spice and sandalwood flavors make for nice drinking now.",,Summerland
"With no oak to interfere with the fruit, this wine shows flashy tangerine, pineapple, Meyer lemon and tart lime flavors that are bone dry, and brightened by Edna Valley acidity. It's savory, refreshing and frankly delicious.",,Tangent
"This opens soft, even a bit flat, and should be served chilled for best showing. With some breathing time tropical fruit flavors come up, ripe and fleshy, with a butterscotch finish and a bit of heat. Best for near-term drinking.",,Upland Estates
"This 100% Cabernet was grown in a Calistoga vineyard. It was aged in 40% new oak. At the age of 3½ years, it's still quite tannic, even a bit rustic, with zippy acidity and fresh, jammy blackberry and black cherry flavors. Hard to say where it's going, but try aging it for 5_6 years and see what happens.",Winfield Vineyard,The Grade
"Floral red fruit aromas carry a hint of minerality and garrigue. The palate is lively, with good overall balance. Tastes of ripe red plum, raspberry and vanilla, while the finish is light in weight and quick, but satisfying.",,Nice
"Decadent scents of buttered brioche, honeydew and crushed yellow flowers lead the nose, while flavors of grilled yellow peaches and orange oil flood the palate. The mouthfeel is round and full, but countered by medium acidity and a slightly bitter note on the close.",,Spice Route
"Pretty aromas of cassis, cherry and sweet cream are inviting. Feels good, with zesty acidity and nice overall balance. Flavors of black currant, Bing cherry and plum cover the bases, while the finish is easygoing. The epitome of everyday Cabernet.",[+],Santa Julia
"A screwcapped, Rhône-style white, blends 43% Viognier, 39% Roussanne and 18% Marsanne in a tightly wound, fresh, lively wine. Spicy apple and pear fruit flavors run into a medium long finish with some near-term aging potential.",Lightning White,Airfield Estates
"Smooth, sweet in fruit and easy to like. With its jammy flavors of blackberries and mocha, it's delicious, although it would benefit from greater complexity and not so much reliance on sheer intensity and oak.",,Cakebread
"This bright and nicely layered Chianti Classico opens with characteristic Sangiovese aromas of forest fruit and blue flower followed by leather and tobacco. Since the wine spends many months in oak, the finish is soft and spicy.",Cantalici,Cantalici L'Antica Fornace di Ridolfo
"Red in color, with fresh aromas of nectarine, orange peel and red currant. For a 2010 this is still fresh and sturdy, with cleansing acidity and focused flavors of citrus and red berry fruit. Eminently drinkable, with a long finish for basic rosé. Drink immediately.",Serres Tempranillo-Garnacha,Carlos Serres
"This garnet-colored riserva opens with savory spice, leather notes, with aromas of cured meat and barbecue smoke. The 2005 vintage was a warm one, and the ripeness of the fruit is evident on the bouquet and in the soft texture of the mouthfeel. Drink now.",Carlo Baccheschi Berti Riserva,Castello di Vicarello
"Sangiovese (with 10% Merlot) forms a solid base for bright aromas of red cherry, cola, leather, tobacco and rum cake in this blend. These two varieties work well together to produce a soft, velvety feel with a touch of ripe fruit on the finish.",Il Castelvecchio,Castelvecchio
"Pristine on the nose and palate, this dry, full-bodied Chardonnay is a prime example of how thoroughly modern Romanian winemaking can be. Juicy and floral with pretty hints of apple blossoms, it's creamy and rich in texture, yet impeccably refreshing on the finish.",Theia Limited Edition,Cramele Halewood
"RosaMati opens with a bold pink color and follows up aromatically with bright raspberry, cassis and cranberry. The wine shows a cool, silky feel in the mouth with a crisp close.",RosaMati,Fattoria Le Pupille
"This amped-up vintage of the Merlot-dominated, BFM Bordeaux-style red tops 15% alcohol, but seems a bit contrived. Aggressive vanilla and tobacco flavors cover up the nuanced highlights found in past BFM vintages, and the base of black cherry fruit carries a root beer finish. Not that it isn't a tasty drink__t is__t's just less interesting than before.",Stone Tree Vineyard BFM Red,Dusted Valley
"Here's a softly smooth, polished Cabernet for drinking now. Blended with 20% Merlot, it has approachable flavors of berries, mocha, cassis and toasty oak.",Kemsley 1550,J Ludlow
"Potent Malbec with aromas of leather, bacon, blackberry and smoke. It's thick and dense, but well balanced, with flavors of blackberry, cola, pepper and nutmeg. More smooth and easy than complex, with a long, creamy, sweet finish that cements the wine's character. Probably the best Felino Malbec to date, and a good value at 20 bucks.",Felino,Viña Cobos
"Big, structured and solid, with powerful dense fruit, this is packed with plum juice flavors. The wine feels chunky, while the acidity keeps everything in proportion.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"A dense, solid wine that's packed with ripe fruit, concentrated tannins and layers of spice, acidity and toast. This is a classic St.-Estèphe style, firm when young and likely to develop slowly and satisfyingly. Give this wine at least six years.",,Château Cos Labory
"Shows a marked improvement over the winery's previous Chards, offering real richness of flavor and good structure. With oak-inspired apricot, pear and citrus flavors, it's an upscale wine to drink now.",Reserve,Corley
"Here's a thickly concentrated Recioto that delivers an inky black color and sweet, ripe fleshiness. Firm tannins give structure to all that sweet succulence and help define the wine's aromas of almond, chocolate and black cherry.",500ml,Corte Lenguin
"Pomele is a sweet red wine made from the Aleatico grape that could pair with salty and sweet foods. The wine offers bright tones of black cherry, blackberry and a touch of exotic spice.",Pomele 500ml,Falesco
"With some richness, red fruits over wood and a full-bodied structure, this is a solid, dense wine. Acidity is present, while the ripe juicy fruits more than balance it. The tannins offer a firm structure and suggest aging.",Servoisine Premier Cru,Domaine de la Ferté
"Chocolaty and malty to start with, then more meaty, rubbery and traditional on the nose. The palate is round and just right in feel, while the palate is meaty, layered and savory, with juicy acidity and savory undercurrents. Cutting and food-friendly, and very well-made for a $10 wine.",,Dolce Stefania
"Columbia Crest makes a limited number of single vineyard reserves. This Zinfandel comes from what is emerging as the best site for that grape in Washington. Bright, tart, and full of sappy raspberry and red fruits, this young, ageworthy Zin has great penetration and punch. In style, it is closest to classic Dry Creek Zins from such producers as A. Rafanelli and Doug Nalle. Though labeled simply Columbia Valley, it's actually the Wahluke Slope AVA.",Stone Tree Vineyard Reserve,Columbia Crest
"Passerina is a little-known indigenous grape from central Italy and when made into a dessert wine, it imparts aromas of caramel, yellow candy, honey, apricot and almond paste. In this vintage, there's also a distinctive note of smoke or toasted nut.",L'Estro del Mastro 500 ml,Il Conte
"Dominated by its dry tannins, this is a tight black currant and dark plum skin-flavored wine, surrounded by a firm core of tannins, a firm and dark-hued wine.",Clos des Garands,Georges Duboeuf
"A fine Zinfandel, ripe and balanced. The wine shows concentrated wild berry, licorice, fruit liqueur, jam, bacon and spice flavors. Yet the richness is balanced with fine acidity and soft but intricate tannins, and the finish is dry. Drink now_2013 for freshness.",Old Vine,Girard
"DUBL is probably the first metodo classico sparkling wine available in the U.S. that is made in Campania. That's just one reason to find this wine so exciting. Other reasons include its clean bouquet of peach, sweet berry, white cherry and almond paste.",DUBL Brut Rosato Metodo Classico,Feudi di San Gregorio
"One third Petit Verdot, which really shines here, and the rest Cabernet Sauvignon. The PV brings intense floral aromas, dense but supple tannins, the deep color and the cassis-laden fruit. Tarry, tannic, grainy and powerful, this is a potent wine with particular appeal to lovers of the Petit Verdot grape.",The Albatross,Gorman
"This 100% Syrah comes from a warmer part of the valley, and it's certainly ripe. Shows flashy blackberry, currant, teriyaki beef, olive tapenade, pepper, sweet caramelized oak and dusty spice flavors that are delicious and long-lasting. The tannins are soft but pronounced, suggesting the wine will develop over the next two to three years.",McGinley Vineyard,Andrew Murray
"Just the kind of Sauvignon Blanc the valley produces so well. It's flavorful in citrus fruits, peaches, golden mangoes and honey, yet balanced with racy acidity. The dry, crisp finish makes it an ideal cocktail sipper.",,Longboard
"The latest version of this popular blend drops the Chardonnay and adds 11% Grüner Veltliner to the Roussanne-Viognier blend. It seems to elevate the aromatics, pushing lush scents of lemon drop, pineapple, and candied orange peel forward. Those perfectly rendered citrus peel flavors put a frame around the tart fruit, and there is a hint of white pepper in the spicy finish.",Subduction White,Syncline
"The blend is an authentic Port combination of Tinta Madera, Tinta Cão and other local varieties. The Cão alcohol is high but the acidity is rich, just what you want in a wine this sweet. Shows beautiful blackberry and cherry jam, chocolate and brown sugar flavors, with a hint of smoky oak. Drink now.",Four Grapes Vintage,Pedroncelli
"Lots of bang for the buck in this rich, fruity Chardonnay. It hits it right down the middle in solid popular appeal, with New World tropical fruit, citrus and peach flavors wrapped into a buttercream texture and liberally accented with smoky oak.",Reserve,Martin Ray
"This Yakima Valley bottling highlights fresh herbs and sharp, juicy pear and apple fruit flavors. The vivid fruit is racy and tightly defined, and seems to gather strength and focus as it sits in the mouth. A splendid effort that really sets the standard for Washington Pinot Gris.",,Willow Crest
"Zenato's rich and powerful Recioto opens with a solid, impenetrable appearance of extracted fruit with dark garnet highlights. On the nose, this brawny dessert wine delivers enormous intensity and deep layers of chocolate powder, cinnamon, clove and roasted almond, backed by luscious tones of cherry liqueur and blackberry jam.",500 ml,Zenato
"The wine is dry, soft, elegant and lovely, with full-bodied black cherry, currant, red licorice and cola flavors. It certainly is one of the best Syrahs you can buy at this price.",Lot 177,Cameron Hughes
"Rallo's luscious Passito di Pantelleria opens with intense and jammy aromas of dried apricot, prune, raisin, honey and vanilla bean. You can really taste those sun-dried grapes; the wine could easily be consumed after dinner in place of dessert.",500ml,Cantine Rallo
"There is great structure here, with dusty tannins percolating through the rich wine. It has power, concentration and density, with cocoa and cherry flavors well integrated. Think about aging for 1_2 years.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Strong, full-bodied, tannic and muscular, this 50-50 blend of Cab Sauvignon and Cab Franc seduces you with sweet berry fruit, backed with stiff tannins and well-modulated streaks of iron and earth. For Cab freaks this is a gold mine of flavor, but it will need decanting or cellaring. It should keep for a decade or more.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard The Wanted Red,Guardian Cellars
"Since the futures tasting in 2009, the wood element has been tamed. It is still an important factor, but the fruit has blossomed, showing a solid core of tannins, surrounded by dark plum and red fruit flavors. It will need many years, but everything is here now.",,Château Lilian Ladouys
"You need to give this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon time in the cellar. It's nowhere near ready, even if you're used to tannins in your reds. It's hard as nails in astringency. This 2006 vintage doesn't have quite the concentration of the _05, but there are some lovely black cherry and black currant flavors, and they should begin to blossom in 4 or 5 years.",Kronos Vineyard,Corison
"Give this lush, rich Syrah two or three years to soften and develop in the bottle. It's a very good wine, offering impressive blackberry, blueberry and cherry-pie filling flavors, wrapped into fine acids and tannins. But it's fresh and young and will get better. Better well into 2011.",McGinley Vineyard,Andrew Murray
"A rich white wine, its toast character submerged in a generous peach and apricot ripeness. There is an attractive lemon zest acidity to give a bright shot through all the richness. Worth aging 2_3 years.",,Château Haut Selve
"Lemon rind and prune are the primary aromas, but there's also a hint of green bean in here. The palate is dark and concentrated but not exactly high voltage in terms of power. Flavors of raisin, cassis, fig and chocolate are rich and ripe, while the finish runs dark. Almost overripe but seemingly more jammy than overdone. Drink now through 2012.",Catena Alta,Bodega Catena Zapata
"Marked by enormously ripe, powerful fruit flavors, this wine explodes with jammy blackberries, cherries and red plums. Oak adds even richer notes of toast and sweet caramel. Drink this deliciously soft wine now.",#50 Mon Chou,Jacob Franklin
"Lots of ripe, pleasurable flavors of blackberries, black currants, dark chocolate, plums and oak in this dry, nicely structured Cabernet. It's pretty tannic, though, with a tough astringency, and doesn't have the fruit to outlast the tannins over time, so give it a decant and drink soon.",,Mario Perelli-Minetti
"New oak sticks out on this Chardonnay, with buttered toast and vanilla dominating the tropical fruit, orange and Meyer lemon flavors. It's finely constructed, with deft acidity and a stony minerality. Drink now_2013.",Verna's Estate,Melville
"A pretty ensemble of floral tones, ripe fruit and toasted almond leads into drying touches of granite and mineral, with some root beer-like notes. Some raw berry aromas need time to soften. Shows a silky, polished feel, then turns compact, crisp, firm and clean on the close.",,La Torre
"Bright, vivid and sizzling on the nose, then zesty, tight and acidic in the mouth, with high-toned plum, berry and red currant flavors offset by a touch of milk chocolate. Long on the finish, but not that nuanced or complex.",Reserve,Nuna
"This is Peachy Canyon's 100% Zinfandel, unblended, and it's a true expression of the variety, Paso Robles style. That means it's softly voluptuous and almost to the point of overripeness, with blackberry, raisin and spice flavors. Drink now.",Snow,Peachy Canyon
"Made in the Peachy Canyon style, this Zin, which contains some Petite Sirah, is very high in alcohol. It's sweet, hot and soft. The blueberry, blackberry and chocolate flavors are almost in dessert wine territory, but it's a very good example of its genre.",Vortex,Peachy Canyon
"It drinks bigger than the listed 14% alcohol, but remains all in proportion. Tangy cherry and plum fruit flavors are wrapped in spice, cinnamon especially. A coffee scent carries through on the palate, infusing the finish.",StoneTree Vineyard,Steppe Cellars
"Exotic on the nose, with aromas of raspberry, plum and blueberry. Shows good intensity on the palate, with a solid feel and fresh flavors of blackberry and dark plum. Fresh but smooth on the finish; very good in every way.",,Sur de los Andes
"Plum and berry aromas are straightforward, but also clean and nice. The palate on this wine from San Rafael is focused and orderly, with flavors of red fruits, spice and mild woody notes. Long lasting on the finish, with freshness and just a modicum of tannic bite.",Gran Reserva,Tango Re_l
"Chunky aromas of sweet berry and beets announce a ripe style of Rioja. The mouthfeel is medium to full and healthy, with focused flavors of berry, oak and peppery spice. Long and a little fiery on the finish.",Crianza,Señorio de Uñuela
"Warm, slightly leathery and earthy on the nose, with a hint of cheese. Feels full, nice and solid, with decent depth. Flavors of black fruits and pastry are friendly, while the finish is pleasant. Delivers all it can for the price.",,Septima
"Here's a textbook Rosso that delivers clear and crisp fruit notes, with pretty nuances of wild berry, red rose and moist earth at the back. The wine feels crisp, lean and silky on the close.",,Tenuta di Sesta
"This lovely Montalcino estate delivers a bright, ruby-colored Rosso that is heavily characterized by fresh forest-fruit aromas and bright acids. The wine is streamlined and pristine.",,Tenuta Il Poggione
"Uccelliera's savory Rosso offers a compact mouthfeel, with bright acidity, silky tannins and bright berry aromas. Pair this wine with lamb stewed with exotic spices and grated ginger.",,Uccelliera
"Lean and light, with aromas of muddled fruit and spice. This wine does not have huge staying power but the wine does offer a simple, clean close, with a touch of fresh acidity.",Zebras,Villa I Cipressi
"Giorgia presents textbook Moscato d'Asti aromas of sweet flower, fragrant soap, jasmine, honeysuckle and peach blossom. This lively sparkler shows impressive intensity and subtle elegance with a smooth, silky feel in the mouth.",Giorgia,Cascina La Ghersa
"A big, dark, extracted Malbec with murky lead aromas of Graham cracker and sweet blueberry. The palate is jammy and chunky, with dark, earthy flavors of prune, blackberry and raisin. Finishes a bit pruny, but there's enough acidity to maintain a sense of balance. Drink now.",Mayacaba,Mi Terruño
"McCay is a producer to watch in Lodi and this wine is a perfect example of why. A blend of four different Zinfandels and Petite Sirah, it opens with a nose of baked blackberry clafouti with a bit of hazelnut and almond, a still-tight wine that with air shows a ton of structure and layered tannins.",Paisley,McCay Cellars
"Sweet and lush, showing ripe blackberry, plum, cassis, raisin and oak flavors. It's one of those wines that just feels fine in the mouth, satisfying your basic Cabernet craving. Drink now_2015.",Maroon Vineyard Reserve,Maroon
"Charred almond and graham cracker notes need time to integrate. The wine is compact and lean in the mouth, with endnotes of small berry fruit, bramble, white almond and cola.",,Le Chiuse
"A rich, earthy blend of half Barbera, half Zinfandel that tastes light at first, earthy with raspberry and cherry tones. On the finish, it gets darker, its spicy, dark fruit tones memorably bound in a wall of leather and tobacco.",Il Segreto Red Wine,Rodrigue Molyneaux
"This is from Rubissow, and it's a nice wine for the price. Essentially a Bordeaux blend with a splash of Syrah, it's rich and satisfying in blackberry, cassis, mocha, bacon and pepper flavors, with a coating of sweet oak. Lovely now with anything from a nice steak to a beef burrito.",Proprietary Red Wine,Lola Kay
"A fiery, demanding, extremely power-packed Sherry, with toffee, orange zest, pecan pie and apricot aromas. Feels tight and high in acidity, with dry, salty flavors of walnut oil and pecans. Layered and drying on the finish, with power to spare.",Prestige 50 Oloroso Viejísimo,Pedro Romero
"Attractively balanced wine, with refreshing acidity cutting through the apple and pear flavors. It has some tangy minerality as well as a really fresh but rich aftertaste. Screwcap.",Réserve,Pierre Sparr
"This wine needs a little bit of time to fully integrate, but it has an attractive crushed-velvet texture with medium tannins, and a flavorful palate. Forward fruit flavors of berry preserves and black plum abound, and a black pepper accent remains on the medium-length finish.",Made With Organically Grown Grapes,Releaf
"Zinfandel is joined by Mourvèdre and a few other minor grape varieties in this overtly sweet, high alcohol wine. It's soft and glyceriney, with cherry, blueberry, dark chocolate and pepper flavors. You have to give it credit for being true to its style.",Especiale,Peachy Canyon
"This wine adds to the growing case to be made for Cabernet Sauvignon in Livermore Valley. Mother Vine Reserve is a smallish offering for Concannon, loaded with black olive, tea and black pepper. It's Cab Franc-esque in some way, yet intensely dark, brooding and velvety.",Mother Vine Reserve,Concannon
"There's a ripe orange-oil streak in the background of the bouquet, boosting rich aromas of tropical fruit and hay. The texture is full but framed by cleansing acidity and a tart, slightly pithy accent on the close.",,Constantia Glen
Le Ellere is a tight and fresh expression of Sangiovese that delivers a clean and crisp quality of fruit. The wine's acidity makes it a perfect pairing for ravioli stuffed with ricotta cheese or chicken in cream sauce.,Le Ellere,Castello d'Albola
"A mellow, pure Malbec, with soft, subtle aromas of graham cracker, licorice, blueberry and chocolate. The palate has a welcome freshness that melds acidity and ripe fruit into a correct whole, and the flavors of blackberry, spice, coffee and chocolate work great together. Just right for the money, with blackness, richness and balance. contains 90% Malbec with 9% Merlot and a drop of Petit Verdot.",A Lisa,Bodega Noemía de Patagonia
"A solid, dense wine, packed with tannins and with a dry core. The soft fruit has flavors of strawberry, hinting at richness to come. At this early stage, tannins and acidity are still forming. Hold for five years.",Les Beaumonts Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Opens with heavy aromas of raisin, prune, leather and chocolate. The palate is just racy enough, with depth, big tannins and structure. Tastes grapy and big, with blackberry fruit and a chocolaty aftertaste. Toasty and a little gritty and tannic on the finish, and ultimately it's a little sweet but still impressive for Chilean Syrah.",Cuvée Alexandre Las Kuras Vineyard,Lapostolle
"This weirdly named wine is a blend of 95% Cabernet Franc and 5% Merlot. It's a bit soft and melted in texture, like liquid licorice, with flavors of cherries, red currants, mocha, anise and smoky oak, and the finish is dry. Notable for the elegance and purity of its tannin structure.",Will Jarvis' Science Project,Jarvis
"Round, thick and pulsing, but not too hard, angular or tannic. The nose brings richness, smoke and black fruits, while the palate is juicy, focused and forward, with black-fruit flavor galore and a slight creamy character. Drying and toasty on the finish, with snappy acidity through the final drop.",Broquel,Trapiche
"Nine Hats is a recently-introduced second wine from Long Shadows. Clearly this is great juice, though it is, inevitably, a bit of a mishmash blend. Tannins are a little rough, but as a $25 red this has plenty of high-priced flavor.",,Nine Hats
"This is pure Petit Verdot, substantial and muscular. Scents of violets and purple fruits bring extra nuances of mushroom and moist earth. There is a hint of animal, and a tight core of purple fruits. Tannins are supple and well-managed.",,Olsen Estates
"Great price for a Russian River Chardonnay of this quality. It's rich and savory in pineapple, Asian pear, green apple and other fruity flavors, with zesty acidity and a smooth, creamy mouthfeel. Production was 2,400 cases.",,Sea Mist
"Aromatic and complex, this wine, though not quite bone dry, is tart and citrusy. The mixed fruit flavors run a spectrum from grapefruit to lemon candy to nectarine, lingering gracefully into a mineral-soaked finish.",,Apex
"Il Musico is a Passito dessert wine from Sicily made with aromatic Moscato grapes that seems to have all the bright intensity of the southern Italian sun inside. The bouquet is redolent of jasmine, orange blossom, almond paste and white peach. In the mouth, the wine is smooth and soft without being heavy or fat.",Il Musico 500ml,Benanti
"Paloumey is in the southern Médoc, close to Margaux. This brings out a perfumed character that sits well with the fresh black currant fruit and gentle tannins. There is a great juicy quality that develops as the wine opens.",,Château Paloumey
A densely firm wine with fine perfumed fruit. The fruit and acidity ride well with the firm tannins and the restrained wood element. It is well balanced and likely to age for several years.,,Château Paveil de Luze
"This succulent effort proves once again that a hot site can make excellent Riesling in Washington state. The Cold Creek signature minerality provides the base, and the fruit, vibrant and fresh, brings juicy acidity as well. The wine sails into a creamy finish that demands a glass refill.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"In 2009 this single vineyard offering includes 11% Sémillon. It has wonderful texture, and a mix of light herbal flavors that run through a gamut from celery to lemongrass and up into tart citrus fruit. The acidity is generous but not searing; it penetrates but never overpowers. A quintessential food wine.",Noble Baron,Château Tanunda
"This 100% Grenache is young and grapy, flavorful and forward. This has more muscle and depth than might be expected from such young vines. There is a strong streak of grapefruit/ pineapple citrus that elevates and adds some nervous energy to the finish.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Darby
"Slick and attractive on the nose, with licorice, blackberry, cedar and spice aromas. The palate is clean, crisp, linear and tannic, with zesty, lemony oak in support of smoky, charred berry and coffee flavors. Consistent from head to toe, with a full, toasty finish. Drink now through 2012.",Synthesis,Finca Sophenia
"This is a delicate wine, sweet strawberry and elegant structure combining over a soft texture. There is a hint of smokiness as an addition to the finely rounded aftertaste.",Les Feusselottes Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"Made from the winery's little vineyard on Atlas Peak, this 100% Cabernet needs time to come around. It doesn't show the voluptuous approachability of the 2005 or the 2007, which will be released next year. It's fairly acidic and tannic. But there's a luscious core of blackberries and black currants. Try after 2012; it might be a very long-lived wine.",,M by Michael Mondavi
"A perfumed wine, only just hinting at Pommard chunkiness and tannic structure. This is more polished and smooth, with a strong toasty wood element, while still delivering a fine, jammy, sweet aftertaste.",Les Grands Epenots Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"A crisp, refreshing Sauvignon Blanc, fermented and aged in stainless steel. Shows rich, savory citrus and green grass flavors, with hints of minerals and flowers. Very drinkable and bone-dry.",Sybarite,Margerum
"Finely perfumed, a wine that has some elegant structure, sweet red-berry fruits and a light acidity. The texture is gentle, soft and rounded, ready to drink now.",Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"Big, dark and brash, and very much in the modern California style, meaning it's rich, creamy, oaky and full-bodied. The nose brings toast, heat and potency, while the flavors are saturated, spicy and revolve around wild berry, tea, spice, caramel and savory warmth. Only gets better as it opens and airs; drink now through 2012.",Alazan CJ's Barrel,Kingston Family
"Lots of rich, ripe fruit in this Cabernet, which comes from the Happy Canyon area of the warmer eastern part of the valley. It shows deliciously forward blackberry, blueberry and cherry flavors, with a sweet overlay of toasty oak and rich, firm tannins. Dry and lovely, it's fine to drink now.",Vogelzang Vineyard,Foxen 7200
"A textured, structured wine, solid and packed with tannins. It is full of concentrated black currant and prune flavors, layered with dark coffee. It is worth aging for at least 1_2 years.",Domaine de Montchavy,Georges Duboeuf
"An elegant wine, its berry fruits fitting well into a structure that balances tannins and soft acidity. It has style, the fruit full of sweet black berry juice and a lift of acidity.",Domaine du Paradis,Georges Duboeuf
"A ripe, sweet and enticing wine, with elegant structure and spice from new wood. It's the fruit that is so delicious here, the tannins subdued behind the strawberry flavors and fresh acidity.",,Domaine des Perdrix
"This is a beautiful, elegant Cabernet to drink now with upscale fare. It's soft and velvety and dry, with deep, rewarding berry, cherry, mocha, herb and spice flavors. Don't be bothered by the sediment that it throws in the glass.",,Hauck
"This 60-40 blend of Trebbiano Toscano and Malvasia Bianca offers a traditional interpretation with thick sweetness and aromas of roasted chestnut, caramel and honey.",Caratello,Pietro Beconcini
"Too young now, a tight wine whose oak, acidity, alcohol and fruit are all over the place. The cherry, currant, cola, beef jerky and Asian spice flavors are quite intricate and delicious. There's a dry, elegant wine in here that's just waiting to bust out and come together after 4_5 years in a good cellar.",Fe Ciega Vineyard,Ojai
"If you like the Ojai style of dry, austere, flinty Chardonnays, go out and find this one. It's a good approximation of the winery's more expensive bottlings, with intricately woven citrus, wet stone and spice flavors, brightened with lots of zesty acidity.",,Ojai
"There's a striking minerality that adds depth to varietally characteristic scents of ripe cassis, violets and cedar. Full bodied and densely concentrated, with sweet, black-fruit flavor, it's balanced by brisk acidity and fresh herb flavors that linger on the finish.",Hyperion Limited Edition,Cramele Halewood
"A go-to red blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Malbec, Farm Boy is one of Robert Smasne's many ventures. A fruity mix of cherries and plums, with well-integrated streaks of clean earth, milk chocolate, and a whiff of Bourbon barrel.",Red,Farm Boy
"Round and fruity, with a generous mix of berry and cherry, and no discernible oak influence, this pleasing Mourvèdre lets the fruit be the star. Nicely balanced and drinking well already, it carries a hint of mineral/metal in the finish.",Stone Tree Vineyard,Dusted Valley
"Acidity marks this wine, making it sharp in the mouth, while some greenness gives it a flavor of mint jelly. Nonetheless, there's some fancy cherry and raspberry fruit. A fragile wine that seems at its best now, so drink soon.",Charles Vineyard,Foursight
"Oak is front and center on the bouquet, and with that come accents of dried cheese and sawdust. Feels saturated, layered and tannic in the mouth, with roasted berry, black plum, herb and spice flavors. Feels and tastes a touch resiny on the finish, more evidence of the wine's barrel influence.",Reserva,Altocedro
"Opens with grainy, whispy aromas of reedy raspberry and smoky blackberry. Feels tannic and aggressive, so it punches ahead with lively, firm flavors of raspberry, plum and strawberry. Finishes oaky, with vanilla and dill notes. Bold Rioja to drink now.",Conde de Valdemar Reserva,Bodegas Valdemar
"Bonterra excels with this leaner, lighter, brighter form of Chardonnay. Made out of organically grown grapes, it's crisp as a green apple, with just a trace of butterscotch on the otherwise lemony finish.",,Bonterra
"From the Loazzolo subzone of Piedmont, this beautiful dessert wine presents generous aromas of fresh flower, apricot, honey, baked pear and Golden Delicious apple. The mouthfeel is rich, long and smooth.",Isolabella della Croce Solìo,Borgo Isolabella
"Fusion blends 79% Syrah, 15% Petite Sirah, 5% Zinfandel and 1% Alicante Bouschet a delicious case in point. Gamy, with flavors of dark earth, thick blackberry jam and dark plum, it's the tobacco kicker on the finish that'll bring you back.",Fusion,Borra
"Light and balanced, this five grape Bordeaux-style blend does not try to overreach. The fruit is clean and delicate, pale cherry set amidst dried leaves, tobacco, and muted tannins. Plenty of acid keeps it lively, but everything is in focus and proportionate.",Aviator Red,Airfield Estates
"Acidity hits the palate like a shard of glass, immediately followed by rich, concentrated flavors of blackberries, cassis and spices. The tannins are strong, too. All the parts simply have not come together. Will it age well? It's not a slam dunk.",,Frias
"Approaching maturity, here is a Riesling that still has a refreshing citric character, intensely tangy perfumed fruit as well as green herbs, spice and yeast.",,Hugel
"Katnook's top Cabernet is always oaky, and the 2006 is no exception, featuring plenty of brown sugar and caramel aromas. Vanilla and cedar dominate the palate, forming an attractive wooden shell over cassis fruit. Drink it now if you like that sort of full-on youthful oak, or hold it a decade until it develops a soft, rich patina of age.",Odyssey,Katnook Estate
"Lush, creamy and smooth, with buttered toast, lemon custard, crême brulée and spice flavors. Maybe a little overworked, but it satisfies Chardonnay cravings.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,J. Wilkes
"There's a bright, almost Ribena-like quality to the fruit in this wine, with underlying hints of wood and mint. It's full bodied, but the tannins are modest and softly rounded, making it deceptively easy to down. Drink now_2018.",Menzies The Cigar,Yalumba
"Beautifully perfumed wine, its white fruits transformed into a mature, almond and herbal wine, tight and dry while showing delicious, appetite-enhancing freshness. Ready to drink now.",,Trimbach
"A consistent producer, Silvio Nardi delivers a bright, fresh Rosso, bursting with notes of cherry, raspberry and white chocolate. This is a food-friendly wine that would match up nicely with breaded veal or mushroom risotto.",,Tenute Silvio Nardi
"There's a detectible fynbos character to the herbal edge of this wine, mingling with the white peach and gooseberry fruit aromas and flavors. A clementine citrus edge remains through the long finish.",,Thelema
"Pretty, supple purple fruits infuse this interesting blend of Tempranillo, Grenache and Mourvèdre. No one grape dominates; the flavors are smoothly integrated and well-matched, with an undercoating of smoke, licorice, pastis and coffee. Nicely polished tannins.",StoneTree Vineyard,Steppe Cellars
"Fiery, foxy and leathery on the bouquet, with a hint of latex in addition to ripe blackberry aromas. Feels round and fresh, with a complete mix of plum, berry and currant flavors. Finishes tight and legit, with good length and feel.",Felino,Viña Cobos
"A very oaky style of Malbec. The bouquet is full of cough drop, milk chocolate and mint, while the palate feels solid and beefy, but resiny. Flavors of berry fruits are softened and sweetened by oak and chocolate, while the finish is woody and tannic.",Gran Reserva,Altocedro
"This has a soft entry, its fruit beginning to show secondary flavors of bakery pastries. Mulberry and prune, soft and spicy, make for a pleasing, accessible wine that finishes with a lick of cinnamon. It is already drinking well.",,Airfield Estates
"Shows jammy but somewhat simple cherry candy and mint flavors, the kind that come from young vines. Plenty of tart acidity scours the mouth, creating balance to the fruit. Ultimately, this is a Pinot Noir for drinking soon.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,J. Wilkes
"Lots of ripe, spicy fruit in this Pinot, marked by waves of black cherries, Dr. Pepper cola, plums, tobacco and sandalwood. It's brisk in acidity, a wine that gets the tastebuds whistling. Seems at its best now, so drink up.",Ketcham Vineyard,Ketcham Estate
"Achelo is a bright, chewy and lively red wine with aromas of blueberry, spice, milk chocolate and crushed white pepper.",Achelo,La Braccesca
"Fresh and bright, this wine is rich with wild berries, cassis and white cherry aromas that would pair perfectly with home-cooked pasta and meat dishes. It's natural acidity will cut through the rich consistency of those foods.",,La Poderina
"Rounded and soft, with gentle tannins. Packed with black cherry fruits, a herbal edge and sweetness, this is already an approachable wine, fruity and generous.",,Joseph Drouhin
"A real crowd pleaser for its sumptuous array of ripe berry and spice flavors. Wherever the grapes come from in California, they've given a delicious wine, soft and gentle, and filled with cherry, black raspberry, sweet licorice, exotic spice and sandalwood flavors.",,Leese-Fitch
"You absolutely can't go wrong with a wine like this plump, textured expression of Rosso di Montalcino. Pair this wine with pork chops or breaded veal as the fresh acidity nicely contrasts against those sweet cuts of meat.",,Fattoria dei Barbi
"Made from 100% Cabernet, this is a fine everyday wine. It's dry, full-bodied and satisfying in blackberry, cola and currant flavors, with a nice kiss of oak. The alcohol level is nice and low. Ready to drink now.",Director's,Francis Ford Coppola
"With some judicious wood aging, the St Laurent has moved from purely juicy to a sophisticated grape. There is a fine ripe layer of plums and red cherry flavors mingling with the toast and acidity. The finish brings out spice and complex tannins.",Reserve Tattendorf,Stift Klosterneuburg
"Far and away the best yet from this five-year-old site, Syncline's 2009 GV is a remarkable wine. While retaining clear varietal character__ight pepper, green herb, and a floral/citrus palate__t brings the vivid brightness of Washington fruit into play, along with a searing acidity and surprising body. All this and low (12.5%) alcohol.",Underwood Mountain Vineyard,Syncline
"A fancy, somewhat gritty Cab Franc, marked by ripe fruit and oak. Attractive in cherry and red currant flavors, with smoky sandalwood complexities, and a long, spicy finish. Lovely with a grilled steak. Drink now.",Estate,Rubicon Estate
"This is a top-tier Washington Sangiovese, the tannins thick and textural, the strawberry fruit threaded with tobacco, the acids juicy and fresh. While you might wish for an alcohol reading a bit lower than the 15.9% that is listed, honesty is its own reward, and clearly this was not watered back. Sip gently, and enjoy.",Bonatello Riserva,Tre Nova
"An interesting wine, and kudos to Tejada for tackling such an unusual blend. Made from 87% Tempranillo and 13% Garnacha, it's silky and high in acidity, but very dry, with tobacco-inspired raspberry, cherry and spice flavors. A winery to watch.",Reserve Tempranillo-,Tejada
"A Châteauneuf-du-Pape-style Rhône blend that really nails it for satisfaction. Rich and fruity, spicy, yet with great structure. Defines the vintner's art of blending, comprised of five varieties sourced from a dozen vineyards. Fun and serious at the same time.",M5,Margerum
"This is a soft, richly attractive red wine to drink now. It shows elaborate blackberry, cherry, currant, teriyaki beef, black pepper, anise and sandalwood flavors. An elegant mouthfeel, grows better as it breathes in the glass.",Estate Grown,Monticello Vineyards
"Inky dark in appearance and concentration, this muscular Recioto della Valpolicella Classico wraps your tongue tight with its blockbuster power and persistency. Aromas include blackberry jelly, chocolate, cola and exotic spice. It finishes with smooth firmness and loads of personality.",500ml,Nicolis
"Pure, perfumed wine, its floral currant flavored fruit dancing in the glass. There is a bright lift to this delicious fruity wine, just demanding to be drunk. Screw cap.",Reserve,Loimer
"A terrific Merlot, especially at this price. Impresses for its soft lushness and intricate flavors of berries, currants, cola, anise, pepper and sandalwood. A real bargain. Production was 2,500 cases. Drink soon.",Bench Vineyards,Pedroncelli
"A Cabernet of considerable heft, showing the big-time tannins the mountain is known for. Below them are very rich blackberry, blueberry, cassis and mineral flavors, leading to a dry, spicy finish. A bit hard and difficult now, but should hit its stride starting in 2012.",Estate,Bravante
"There is an edge of bitter cherry here, the fruit with some ripeness and also a firmer mineral character. The tannins dominate, indicating good aging potential.",Les Vergelesses Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"A touch raisiny but lusty and rich, with licorice, mint, black plum and fruitcake aromas. The palate is mouthfilling despite rather pointed acidity, and thus the flavors of juicy blackberry, cherry, pepper and coffee are accurate and appropriate. Long, toasty and yet again slightly raisiny on the finish. Drink now; 300 cases made.",Gran Reserva,Cinco Sentidos
"Big and dense, now developing well, the wine shows richness and complex fruit flavors as well as spice and dusty tannins. Licorice and dark chocolate go with damson plum flavors, never losing sight of the final juicy acidity.",,Château Dutruch Grand Poujeaux
"The new oak sticks out like a sore thumb, dominating this young wine with vanilla, buttered toast and charred wood aromas and flavors. Fortunately, the underlying wine also is very powerful in ripe blackberry and cherry fruit. This is an elegant, strong, impressive Cabernet, but the oak should be reined in to allow the beautiful fruit to star.",Walther River Block,D.R. Stephens
"From Dry Creek Valley, this Zin shows a classic regional profile. It's dry, tannic and full-bodied, with rich flavors of wild berries, currants, briary nettles, licorice and black and white pepper. The balance is fine and elegant, and the wine never loses Zin's lusty character. Ready now.",,Del Fava Family
"This is a less formal Vin Santo. The wine is creamy and thick, with sweet syrupy notes of chestnut, honey, maple, candied fruit and dried apricot.",500ml,Fattoria di Casalbosco
"Made from the same blend of grapes in Amarone, this dessert Recioto is a dark and thickly extracted wine that tastes much sweeter than it smells. In fact, the bouquet is redolent of hearty dry wine aromas such as black fruit and Indian spice. Residual sugar and refined tannins make for a powerful combination in the mouth.",500ml,Begali
"This is a robust and firmly structured Syrah with medium-coarse tannins and medium-full weight. Meaty and dark with notes of licorice, black currant, sweet spice and a touch of cocoa on the finish. Though it's intense, it still feels like it's holding back a little bit; try after 2012 for a more forward presentation.",,Boekenhoutskloof
"The Cartizze cru is known as the best area for growing quality grapes for Prosecco. This precious expression shows drying mineral tones backed by sweet fruit, melon and peach. The soft, creamy quality if the perlage is also noteworthy.",Cartizze Dry,Bortolotti
"The tannins here are fine, dusty almost, giving the wine a softer core than is normal for this vineyard. Around the tannins, the jammy blackberry fruits give a sweet side to the flavors. Rich and soft.",Les Porrets Saint-Georges Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Tannic and mineral, this is intensely structured. With its firm tannins and dark plum flavors, it is on the dry side, needing 2_3 years to show its best. This is Beaujolais for aging.",Belles Grives,Georges Duboeuf
"Firm and structured, this is serious Beaujolais. The ripe cherry and plum flavors are surrounded by dry, dark tannins that promise some aging. Hints of smoky minerality go well with the final juicy acidity.",Domaine de la Seigneurie,Georges Duboeuf
"Surprisingly rich and complex for the price. Shows pineapple, pear and oaky vanilla flavors that are deep and long, and balanced with crisp acidity. Very drinkable, and a great value.",,Greystone Cellars
"Made with a blend of diverse aromatic grapes from Sicily and beyond, this golden Passito is redolent of candied orange, dried apricot, honey, almond marzipan and loads of sweet, raw honey. The wine is dense and creamy and extremely sweet tasting on the finish.",Diamante 500ml,Tasca d'Almerita
"You should know what you're getting yourself into here, as the name definitely doesn't lie. So minty and herbaceous it's almost hard to believe, and it all mingles with notes of crushed violets and black currant leaf as well as a solid fruit core of cassis and black plum skins. It's firm and tight in the mouth but approachable after a little breathing time.",The Mint,Thelema
"This vintage of Il Musico presents united aromas of pine, almond, maple syrup, candied fruit and orange zest. It's a different, distinctive dessert wine that does not resemble most other Passitos because of the inherent spice and zestiness of its flavors.",Il Musico 500ml,Benanti
"There is a voluptuous edge to this generous wine. It has rich flavors, some strawberry and plum juice. The final extreme freshness shows through the layer of firm tannins. For aging over 4_5 years.",Les Damodes Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Give this Syrah a good decant to take the edge off the fresh tannins and acids. It's a gritty, resilient wine notable for its wealth of blackberry, black cherry, currant, beef jerky, anise and pepper flavors, accented with sweet, smoky, caramelized oak.",Mounts Vineyard,James Family Cellars
"This is a great buy. It's soft, rich and dry, with the velvety texture you want in a nice Syrah. Shows complex flavors of berries, cherries, cocoa, licorice and crushed pepper, and feels really stylish. Gets better as it warms in the glass.",Kiara Private Reserve,Le Vigne
"At only 7% Merlot, it's unclear why it's even mentioned on the label, especially since it seems to be so obviously Cabernet in style. Cassis and chocolate notes dominate this richly textured, full-bodied red. Drink now.",,Greg Norman Estates
"Showing youthful oak tones that still need time to integrate, this wine is a bit sour and ripe at the same time. Black cherry, tobacco, leather and spice aromas are nice, but the tannins are firm, and the wine shows a bright point of acidity on the close and a gritty, cooked-fruit finish.",,Ferrero
"Half Merlot and half Cabernet Sauvignon. The Merlot saves the day, rescuing the underripe Cab with rich flavors of cherries and red plums. Oak adds the usual notes of sweet buttered toast and spice. Drink now.",Spessartite on Quartz Fusion,Coghlan
"Milk chocolate and sweet cherry aromas appear alongside cured meat and plump black fruit. This is a straightforward Brunello with a creamy, soft close.",,Col di Lamo
"Dark, inky and brooding, this thickly extracted Brunello shows thick layers of ripe cherry, crème de cassis and blackberry with background tones of rum cake, ground clove, cola, leather and fresh tobacco. There's a meaty element of bresaola or smoked bacon as well.",,Casa Raia
"From a single sustainably farmed vineyard in Lodi comes this super bang for your buck. It's earthy Cab that's perfumed inside and out, with wafts of cedar burning on an open fire, as well as brick, black cherry and clove. It's balanced and structured to boot.",Cherokee Lane,Tortoise Creek
"Cabernet specialist Venge tinkers with white blends under the Spettro designation, with inconsistent results. This 2010 is mainly Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay, with a splash of Chenin Blanc. It's a good, sound white wine, dry and crisp in acidity, with mineral-infused pear, citrus fruit and apricot flavors. No oak is evident.",Spettro,Venge
"Earthy and subtle on the nose, with mellow leafy notes, spice and fresh red-fruit aromas. Feels lively and layered, with integrated flavors of berry fruit, oak and mocha. Creamy and long on the finish, with just enough acidity to maintain length and feel.",Crianza,Viña Hermosa
"This takes a page from California in its naming convention and style, which includes a good proportion of barrel-fermentation and oak maturation. Toast and vanilla frame melon and fig notes, and the midpalate is slightly creamy in texture before the wine turns crisp and lemony on the finish. Drink now.",Three Monks Fumé Blanc,Taltarni
"Subdued on the nose, this wine still needs to stretch its proverbial muscles. Its flavors of cherry liqueur, rum cake, blackberry and forest underbrush give voice to a clean, traditional winemaking philosophy.",,Tassi
"La Togata offers a crisp and fresh Rosso, with aromas of bright berry, cherry cola, wild raspberry and lemon zest. The natural acidity of this wine would pair well with lasagna topped with melted mozzarella and Parmigiano.",La Togata,Tenuta Carlina
"This medium-bodied dry white is notable for its balance and harmony. Citrus, wet stone and green apple aromas and flavors all come into play, none of them dominant, then end on a bright, grapefruity note. Drink now.",,Sidewood
"A big wine that handles its 15.3% abv. Smells of pastry, earth and soft berry fruit. Feels round but reticent, with no fire or heat but plenty of blackberry, molasses and coffee. Mellow, toasty and blackened on the finish, with an earthy feel and a baked aftertaste.",,Solsticio
"Hay, green plum and gooseberry lead off on the nose, while ripe hints of passion fruit and pineapple acidity flood the mouth. Lifted, with good cut and freshness, and a mouthwatering close. Delicious now, but should hold together nicely for another couple of years.",,Southern Right
"Tight grapefruit flavors, very perfumed and totally dry and crisp, this is a pure-fruited wine, packed with acidity, flavors of white currants and a final zesty minerality. Screwcap.",,Pierre Sparr
"This informal Rosso shows balance and intensity with bright berry aromas and acidity that is not too sharp. In fact, the wine is nicely rounded and supple.",,Podere Paganico
"This blend, which is mainly Zinfandel and Cabernet Sauvignon, is robust. It's a trattoria or bistro wine, dry, tannic and spicy, with earthy flavors. Drink now with rich foods to tease out the berry fruit.",Blue Wing Teal,Paraduxx
"A ripe red wine, brimming with cherry fruit, and heightened in texture by acidity. Not particularly complex, but rich and satisfying, making it one of the better Grenaches from California.",Larner Vineyard,Samsara
"This is a dark, plump expression of Sangiovese Grosso that delivers finely-tuned aromas of succulent fruit and blackberry. Notes of espresso and dark chocolate give the wine added dimension and staying power in the mouth.",Carillon,Vini Italiani da Sogno
"A dark, brooding showcase of many of Shake Ridge Vineyards's finest varieties mixed into one inviting bottle. With 31% Syrah, 28% Primitivo, 18% Petite Sirah, 10% Mourvèdre, 7% Malbec and 6% Merlot, this wine has baked plum and dark bright cherry predominantly, followed by a grip of tobacco and cinnamon spice. Have it with roasted meat and potatoes.",Shake Ridge Red,Yorba
"Sweet oak on the nose results in creamy, chocolaty aromas, along with herbal notes, plum and berry. Feels tight but expansive, with solid tannins, bright acids and solid flavors of herbs, berry fruit, cassis, toast and chocolate. Keeps it together on the finish.",Felino,Viña Cobos
"Perfectly good, but seemingly more simple and oily than in the past. Maybe that's just perception, but the perception is that this is a mild, tropically influenced wine with a fleshy body and mild aromas and flavors of lychee, green melon and lime. Finishes short and pithy.",,Colomé
"Nemorino (a blend of Syrah, Sangiovese and Merlot) shows chewy cherry and blueberry characteristics with easy spice tones on the finish. The wine is fresh and bright and would pair with meat lasagna or tortellini with grated Parmigiano.",Nemorino,I Giusti e Zanza
"For some reason, Fritz held this wine back eight months later than their very fine 2009 Reserve Pinot. It's a solid wine, silky and pure, but it's a little too sweet in raspberries and cherries, like a granola candy bar.",,Fritz
"Livermore Valley-based Fenestra loves to source fun stuff from Lodi, and Graciano has proven to like Lodi very much. In Fenestra's hands this varietal is soft and round, perfectly fine drinking, a taste of Bing cherry in liquid form.",,Fenestra
"Standard cherry and plum aromas create a straightforward bouquet. The feel is hot and choppy, but there's enough body and balance for it to weigh in properly. Tastes of sweet cassis, kirsch and creamy chocolate, with an oaky finish containing cocoa notes.",Remolinos Vineyard,Finca Decero
"Forceful from the opening, with floral notes, dark oak, shoe polish and char vying with black fruit aromas. Feels both lush and tough, with hard tannins poking through. Tastes of black fruits, cola and heavily toasted oak. Bittersweet on the finish; lusty and black but neither elegant nor light on its feet.",Reserve,Finca Sophenia
"This wine starts off a bit tarry or rubbery, but decanting allows the bright berry fruit to come forward. Raspberries are limned with hints of mint and other herbs and framed by vanilla. It's medium-bodied, with a tangy finish and a crisp, satiny texture. Drink now.",Benchmark,Grant Burge
"A rich, lusty wine, dry and easy to like for its array of blackberry, cherry, anise and sandalwood flavors. Made from the traditional Bordeaux varieties, based on Cabernet Sauvignon, it really pleases the palate. Drink now.",Black Label Diamond Collection 1910 Type Claret,Francis Ford Coppola
"If you're sensitive to high alcohol, this wine isn't for you. If you're not, it has plenty to offer in the way of flavor, including raspberries, chocolate and pepper. Turns a bit overripe in the finish, but not too much.",Kick Ranch,Carica
"A finely balanced wine, its tannins showing the influence of Cabernet Sauvignon along with its signature black currant flavors. There is also weight and an attractive plumper character that broadens the wine, surrounding the tannins with sweet berry fruits.",Château d'Arche,Mähler-Besse
"If more Syrah tasted like this, more people would drink it. Beautifully ripe and soft, pure and rich in cherry and raspberry liqueur, smoke and pepper flavors. Ready now.",Colson Canyon Vineyard,Margerum
"Shows the purity and transparency associated with this fine vineyard, as well as crisp coastal acidity and finely etched tannins. Doesn't possess the depth or concentration of previous vintages, especially 2007, with somewhat curtailed blackberry fruit and a short finish. But then, it was a difficult vintage. Very classy wine to drink now.",Estate Vineyard,Failla
"Right now this is a big, tough Cabernet. It's very dry and oaky, and the black and red cherry flavors have a jammy edge. Despite the apparent simplicity, you find yourself returning to it, a good sign that suggests complex ageability. Give it 4_6 years in a cool cellar.",Yewell Vineyard,Corley
"This richly extracted dessert wine boasts a dark, inky appearance and aromas of exotic spice, nutmeg, cinnamon, dark chocolate, carob, roasted chestnut and mature blackberries. It is smooth, well textured and exceedingly rich on the close with loads of power, personality and persistency.",500 ml,Corte Lenguin
"Initially mineral and austere, but after a moment, the richer sweet berry fruits come through. The wine has spice from new wood as well as a solid core of dry tannins. The aftertaste reveals the dense texture, and the aging potential.",,Château Belle-Vue
"With hints of mint, and a firm structure from wood as well as tannins, this is a flattering wine. The tannins are rich, layered within the jammy black berry fruits. This is a wine for aging, but is deceptively attractive now.",,Château Cambon la Pelouse
"In 2009 this single vineyard offering includes 11% Sémillon. It has wonderful texture, and a mix of light herbal flavors that run through a gamut from celery to lemongrass and up into tart citrus fruit. The acidity is generous but not searing; it penetrates but never overpowers. A quintessential food wine.",Horse Heaven Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"After opening with graham cracker, plum and ripe berry, the wine settles into a thick and heavy place that's rich but bordering on cloying. This is a heavy style of Malbec that tastes of ripe black fruits and herbs. It's toasty, full, thick as can be and long on the finish. Drinkable now but could use a couple of more years for everything to mesh.",Noemía,Bodega Noemía de Patagonia
"Owned by the Devillard family, Château de Chamirey produces firmly textured wines. This Mercurey is on the dry side, while not losing sight of fresh red-berry fruits and bright acidity.",Les Ruelles Premier Cru,Château de Chamirey
"Heavy and dark, with licorice, fruit syrup and blackberry pie aromas. The palate is lush, deep and chugging along at max ripeness, while the flavor profile pushes blackberry and prune flavors. Roasted and coffee-laden on the finish, with a ripe, ready personality. Drink now.",Gran Guarda,Serrera
"Rounded and rich from the top vineyard site of the Göttweig monastery, the wine has an impressive concentration, yellow fruit flavors and the lightest hint of spice with final acidity.",Gottschelle Reserve,Stift Göttweig
"An edgy, perfumed wine, textured and steely, with white fruit flavors cutting through the acidity and the taut apple skin core. It is a beautiful wine that also has a complex core of flavors. Age for 3_4 years or more.",Göttweiger Berg,Stift Göttweig
"This pure Cabernet blends first-class fruit from Loess, Windrow and Cold Creek. It's spicy and tight, with black cherry fruit at the core. It's back-loaded with toast and caramel flavors from aging in a mix of French and American oak.",,Northstar
"This is a great value in a Petite Sirah that shows how well the variety performs in a great vintage in a warmer climate. With 20% Syrah, which seems to add richness and nobility, the wine is bone dry and elegant in mouthfeel, with complex blackberry, black currant, grilled beef, black pepper and cedar flavors. Drink now.",Family Vineyards,Pedroncelli
"From Minick Family estate vineyards, this intense and thrilling Riesling has a Germanic 8.5% alcohol and 5.5% residual sugar balance, yet with acids so vivid and juicy that its sweetness is completely counterbalanced. Loaded with spicy pear and tart tangerine fruit flavors, it's a penetrating, dense and highly refreshing wine that explores a style that is both complex and user friendly.",,Willow Crest
"From Minick Family estate vineyards, this intense and thrilling Riesling has a Germanic 8.5% alcohol and 5.5% residual sugar balance, yet with acids so vivid and juicy that its sweetness is completely counterbalanced. Loaded with spicy pear and tart tangerine fruit flavors, it's a penetrating, dense and highly refreshing wine that explores a style that is both complex and user friendly.",Kremser Wachtberg,Winzer Krems
"Not many 2004 Argentine wines are still on the market, and yet this isn't showing any age. In fact, it's racy and a little sheering, with citric acidity that's keeping it fresh, firm, vital and lively. Flavors of zesty berry fruits come with a touch of oaky vanilla, but not too much. Very nice for a mature blend of Malbec and Merlot.",Encuentro,Felipe Rutini
"This Bordeaux-inspired blend of Cab Sauvignon (30%), Petit Verdot (25%), Merlot (25%) and Cab Franc (20%) manages to be crisp and bright in acids while the tannins are ripe and plush. Tart berry flavors are marked by a not-so-subtle kiss of vanilla-laden oak. Probably at its best over the next few years.",Tatty Road,Gemtree
"Full and rich, this is a ripe, generous wine that offers great swathes of black berry fruit. It is well structured, the tannins folding into the ripe fruits, although never losing sight of delicious jelly acidity.",Château de Prieuré,Georges Duboeuf
"A complex and intense single-vineyard wine, it has ripe berry fruits with dark tannins. Only at the end is the juicy character of the wine on show.",Domaine des Versauds,Georges Duboeuf
"Bringing out the tannic side of Fleurie, this Sélection is a chunky, structured wine whose black currant-skin flavors mingle with bitter cherries. It layers a fine juiciness with the structure.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"The nose of this Cab is very inviting with heady aromas of black cherry, cassis and blueberry infused with leather and woody spice. More of the same unfolds on the palate with cedar notes supporting the dark fruit. The mouthfeel is round and full but structured with tightly woven tannins carrying through the long finish.",Unfiltered,Fleur Du Cap
"Feels rather heavy and extracted right now, with masses of jammy cherries, currants, chocolate and spices, and even a note on the finish of overripe raisins. Meanwhile, 100% new oak adds a filigree of toast and vanilla. Made from 100% Merlot, it's a good, rich red wine, but would have benefited with the addition of a little Cabernet Sauvignon or Petit Verdot for complexity.",Reserve,Jarvis
"With four years of age behind it, this Cab is soft and fine and ready to drink now. It's delicious in blackberry, cherry, currant, licorice, beef jerky and smoky oak flavors, and feels elegant in the mouth.",Redwood Hill Vineyard Tableau,Hauck
"Sweet and ripe, with plenty of tannins, along with a mineral, chalky character that gives texture to the fresh and ripe strawberry fruits.",Clos des Guettes Premier Cru,Henri de Villamont
"There is a definite Volnay lushness here, despite severe tannins. The sweet acidity boosts the black currant flavors, while the dry edge gives a square structure. The final effect is of a rich, ripe wine.",,Henri de Villamont
"Crushed violet petals, plum, roasty coffee and cocoa dusted black cherry aromas all welcome you on the bouquet of this wine. The round mouth is just as opulent and inviting, with more dark fruit and mocha notes backed by sweet spice. Tasty and easy to drink.",,Beau Joubert
"Jammy and dense on the nose, with herbal blueberry and prune aromas. This is powerful Malbec, with meaty, sweet flavors of black fruit, blueberry, dry spice and menthol. The feel is soft and easy, with a finish that is smooth and deep but not overly potent.",Swinto Old Vine,Belasco de Baquedano
"Smooth and rich, a delicious black berry juice-flavored wine, its tannins embraced by ripe fruit and sweetness. The wine does have a dry core, along with acidity, although it will be ready to drink in the next 2_3 years.",,Château Fontis
"Fruity on the nose, with a friendly mix of pineapple, apple, melon and powdered sugar aromas. Feels smooth and round but not heavy, with good acidity and likable, simple flavors of melon, banana and apple. There's a light note of toast on the finish.",,Alamos
"From a vineyard located 580 meters above sea level, Il Solatio delivers cool aromas of wild berry, cola, white mineral and crushed stone. The wine is lean and compact in the mouth, but it definitely bears the mark of its origins.",Il Solatio,Castello d'Albola
"Almost completely black, this wine reveals inky-dark concentration and dark, jammy fruit. Shows power and smoky barbecue aromas of soy sauce, teriyaki, bresaola, cherry liqueur, rum cake, Spanish cedar and sticky pipe tobacco. Cured meat and savory spice as well. Seems extracted and overripe, with hard tannins.",Pertimali,Livio Sassetti
"Pinot Noir specialist Rick Longoria continues to tackle this difficult variety, which may be the hardest to master in California. His results are inconsistent. The '09 is a very good wine, bone dry and dusty, with tobacco and cherry flavors.",Clover Creek Vineyard,Longoria
"Herbal accents grace the black plum and berry aromas and flavors, and a touch of biltong spice and meat mingle with the fruit for added character. Approachable and soft, with delicate tannins and an easy, friendly finish. Drink now.",,Ken Forrester
"It takes some time for this wine to open up in the glass, but when it does you're greeted with black cherry and cassis aromas laced with hints of cigar box. Structured with mouth-coating tannins and medium acidity, a leathery texture carries through the close.",Petit,Ken Forrester
"A very soft-textured Cab, unusual for its high-elevation origins, with sweet red fruit and dark plum nestled around a trace of chocolate.",Estate,Lava Cap
"From one of the Leflaive family vineyards close to Puligny-Montrachet, this is as rich as Aligoté can get. Even so, the texture is crisp, with fresh kiwi and herbs, finishing with intense acidity.",Aligoté du Domaine,Olivier Leflaive
"A rich, flashy Zinfandel, packed with spicy cherry, blackberry, cocoa and pepper flavors. Shows plenty of Dry Creek character in the firm tannins and briary, brambly mouthfeel. A sweet finish suggests pairing it with slightly sweet dishes, like ribs or chicken slathered in barbeque sauce.",,Sebastiani
"A nicely done wine, especially at the price. It's very pretty aromatically, boasting pear and vanilla notes, full in the mouth and lemony with minerality. __am_ of Jam's Blend is a commingling of the names of the two Tortoise Creek founders, Janie and Mel Master, who source the grapes for this wine out of a Lodi Rules vineyard.",Jam's Blend,Tortoise Creek
"Here's a lively rosé from Tuscany (a 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon) that offers pretty aromas of cranberry, red rose and white almond. Pair it with smoked salmon and capers.",Piano... Piano,Terre di Talamo
"Made in an oxidized style like a Sherry from Spain, ROX is meant to be drunk as an apéritif with raw oysters or hard, stinky cheeses and cured meats. An interesting almond-flavored take on Sierra Foothills-grown Roussanne grapes for sure.",ROX Monarch Mine Vineyard,Terre Rouge
"A useful Zin, rich and sweet and savory. Blended for complexity with Syrah and Petite Sirah, it's satisfying in black cherry, red licorice and cola flavors, sprinkled with black pepper and baking spices. Easy to drink with barbecue, burgers and such.",Incredible Red,Peachy Canyon
"Dark and bold, with leafy, slightly mulchy aromas that settle on earthy and mossy. Feels round and full, with weight, along with flavors of cola, blackberry and plum. Toasty, dark and tasting like coffee on the finish.",,Pujanza
"This bright Moscato d'Asti delivers pure expressions of both the fragrant Moscato grape and the special territory in northern Italy that shaped this delicate dessert wine. Floral aromas of honeysuckle and jasmine are presented in a compact, elegant manner thanks to the temperate growing conditions in Piedmont. The finish is creamy, frothy and rich.",,La Gironda di Galandrino
"Mauro Sebaste has produced a creamy, elegant Moscato d'Asti with lovely notes of white flower and soapy foam. Sweet flavors of peach and honey are followed by a touch of zesty lemon.",,Mauro Sebaste
"La Bruciata is a foamy, creamy and soft Moscato d'Asti with pretty aromas of honey, peach blossom and musky exotic flower. The wine is superrich and frothy in the mouth, thanks to the generous quality of the silky bubbles.",La Bruciata,Oscar Bosio
"A young tannic wine with jammy, fresh red-cherry fruits and red plum skins. The acidity is palpable, shooting through the structure, giving the wine a fresh, fruity aftertaste.",Beaumont,Domaine Guillot-Broux
"This blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot opens with earthy aromas of leather, tobacco and button mushroom, followed by fresh cherry. Crisp acidity makes this a good wine to pair with cheesy risotto or pork.",Amadio,Buccia Nera
"This bright peach-pink colored rosé is made using Syrah from the Cortona area. It shows aromas of peach, cranberry, white almond and pink grapefruit.",Rosa del Castagno,Fabrizio Dionisio
"Lots to like in this smooth, polished Chardonnay. It shows plenty of ripe pineapple, peach and pear flavors, with overtones of vanilla and buttered toast. Good price for the quality.",Votre Santé,Francis Ford Coppola
"Smells cheesy and leathery, with herbal notes. Feels condensed and flat, as if it's collapsing on itself. Flavors of baked berry and prune are dark and typical of very ripe Malbec, while the finish is warm but basic in feel and flavor. Bullish, sweet and heavy. Not Colomé's best effort, especially given the price.",Reserva,Colomé
"Opens with berry fruit aromas, density and slightly medicinal notes. Feels bright and lively, with ample acidity pushing toasty, lightly herbal flavors of blackberry and plum. Shows mild spice, licorice and barrel notes on the finish, along with herbal notes. Seems like a very good everyday or value-driven choice.",Andean Culture,Maipe
"A soft, richly fruity cherry-flavored wine. Its tannins are so round they melt into the fruit. Acidity gives a deliciously fresh edge to this smooth and almost-ready-to-drink wine.",,Joseph Drouhin
"A rosé of Sangiovese from southern Tuscany (Montalcino), Lo Sbrancato features ripe aromas of wild berry, cranberry and white almond. It's a simple, fresh wine that would pair well with mussels steamed in cream sauce.",Lo Sbrancato,Il Poggione
"Iron Horse crafted this brut, which has a gorgeous red and yellow label, for the Chinese market. It's similar to their other bruts, dry and rich in lime, strawberry and yeasty flavors, although it's softer, which may reflect what Iron Horse knows about the Chinese palate. The price also seems to reflect what Iron Horse believes the Chinese market will bear.",Chinese Cuvée,Iron Horse
"Fresh and jammy in raspberries, cherries and blackberries, this wine trades complexity for sheer fruity power and lusciousness. Drink now.",Kemsley 1550,J Ludlow
"The vineyard is in Yountville, and the wine shows plenty of the zesty acidity that marks this cool portion of Napa Valley. The wine also exhibits ripe flavors of oranges, Meyer lemons, kiwi fruit and sweet limes.",Massa Ranch Vineyard,Jacob Franklin
"Standard cherry and plum aromas are fresh, clean and unadulterated by heavy oak, leather or earth notes. Feels clean and dry, with nice but standard red-berry and plum flavors. Has good flow and feel, with a light dusting of spice on the finish.",Crianza,Marqués de Cáceres
"This precious Moscato d'Asti opens with soft foam and sweet aromas of peach, honey, almond blossom and jasmine. Pair this delicious dessert wine with fruit ice cream or semifreddo.",Nivole,Michele Chiarlo
"Full-bodied Grüner, packed with apricots and pineapple flavors to go with the crisp edge of acidity. It is ripe and vibrant, with a creamy, smooth aftertaste. Screw cap.",Schellmann Ossi,Loimer
"Apricot and pineapple flavors compete easily with citrus and minerality. The acidity is just gearing up to power through the ripe fruit, with a nervy, tense edge and a rich honey and spice aftertaste.",Silberbichl Reserve,Stift Göttweig
"Run, don't walk, to find this 100% varietal Sauvignon Blanc__t's a steal. Shows why Dry Creek Valley has had a reputation for this variety for so long. Dry and crisp and unoaked, yet richly honeyed, it offers waves of mouth-flattering citrus, tropical fruit, green apple, white peach and pear flavors. Production was only 336 cases.",,Stromberg Vineyards
"Not offering much opulence now. It's hard, dry and acidic, a wine that struggles with the palate. Deep down inside are very luscious black and red cherry, red currant, cola, licorice and sandalwood flavors. Defines a particular style of elegant austerity rather than plushness, and will be welcomed by sommeliers and chefs for its food-friendliness.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,Ojai
"This smooth and supple wine has been aged in 65% new oak, yet does not seem at all oaky. A solid core of black fruits is annotated with streaks of coffee, licorice and gun metal. The finish is persistent, with a hint of citrus. Recently bottled, the wine may merit a higher score with a bit more bottle age.",Edythe Mae Vineyard,Olsen Estates
"Feels tight and dry and tannic now, and although the pedigree is clear, it's not showing generosity of spirit. There's a core of blackberries, black currants and minerals, yet it's hiding under a blanket of astringency. Will it age beyond the next few years? Hard to predict.",Jefferson Cuvée,Monticello Vineyards
"A racy Grüner, crisply fruity and packed with both acidity and the typical varietal spice. It has fine balance with ripe apples adding to the mix, leaving a wine with a great final tang. Screw cap.",Vienna Hills,Wieninger
"As this Cabernet develops in the glass, the oak takes over, offering rich aromas and flavors of caramel, vanilla and wood spices. Underneath is a nice Cabernet with cherry and blackberry flavors. The wine is dry and crisp and fairly tannic. A study in progress.",Grassini Family Vineyard,Foxen 7200
"Cedary and more than bit woodsy, with darkness, char and black fruit on the nose. The palate is rich, concentrated and a touch burnt and black, with blackberry, spice, cedar and mossy flavors. Finishes soft, dark and slightly herbal. Nicely done.",Reserve,Finca Sophenia
"A very nice Cabernet that expresses the Alexander Valley's soft ripeness. The wine is dry and delicious, offering berry, cherry, coffee, anise, herb and smoky oak flavors that are deep and complex. Drink now and over the next few years. Production was 150 cases.",Red Grav Vineyard,Hauck
"A fully balanced wine, showing ripe black fruits over a strong sense of acidity, wood and juicy tannins. The wine has weight and richness while also keeping a firm, dry aging potential.",,Château Verdignan
"A supple and polished Bordeaux blend (40% Cabernet Sauvignon, 40% Merlot, 12% Cabernet Franc, 8% Petit Verdot) that features cassis and blackberry fruit. It's round and forward, with pretty floral aromas from the Petit Verdot. The tannins are polished and the wine carries its 14.6% alcohol without a hint of heat or burn.",CHAOS Red,Darby
"On the lean side, this has a light acidity, closed red berry fruits and a dry core of tannins. It is firm and hard-edged at this young stage, the structure dominant. Give it 3_4 years to broaden out.",Premier Cru,Clos du Cellier aux Moines
"Dominated by herbaceous Sauvignon Blanc, with a finely judged hint of wood, this is a fruity wine with bright acidity, pear and green plum flavors and a crisp aftertaste.",Le Cygne,Château Fonréaud
"Made in the Bonterra style of exceedingly pure fruit, this Chardonnay brims with delicious tangerines and pears. It has pretty acids that make it feel clean in the mouth. A delightful wine made even richer with a touch of new oak.",,Bonterra
"Elegant and smooth, perhaps with an edge of too much smoky wood, but still showing good sweet fruits and fresh acidity. The tannins need time to settle down as the essentially rich wine matures. Hold for 3_4 years.",Aux Cras Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"Passrì di Scrapona is a highly concentrated and rich dessert wine that shows very nice aromatic balance and intensity. Aromas here include toasted almond, apricot, honeysuckle and loads of honey. The wine feels syrupy and shows big weight and density on the long, sweet finish.",Passrì di Scrapona,Marenco
"Opens with an enticing package of cedar, tobacco, herb, leather and black-fruit aromas. The palate has live-wire acidity and overall the wine is bright, piercing and full, with herbal black cherry, cassis and cola flavors. The finish is a little quick and short on flavor but big on texture and tannins. Made from Syrah, Cab Sauvignon and Carmenère.",Kuyen,Antiyal
"Made with a blend of two of Friuli's most traditional grapes, Picolit and Verduzzo Friulano, Siùm shows a rich, copperish color, with intense aromas of almond paste, butterscotch, caramel, candied fruit and orange zest. The Verduzzo elements lends a distinctive characteristic of yellow candy.",Siùm 375ml,La Viarte
"A smooth wine, very focused on ripe fruit. It has apricot and pear flavors along with a lime-zest bite. This is pure Grüner, finishing both rich and crisp. Screw cap.",Reserve,Loimer
"A sophisticated wine that shows richness, creamy character and a fine, crisp toast edge. The fruit is packed with pear and apricot flavors, but is well integrated into a richer, more mature character.",Cuvée Prestige Brut,Szigeti
"An impressive, rich Riesling that shows a balance between tropical fruit flavors as well as textured acidity. Apple and pineapple come together harmoniously with perfumes and a delicious juicy aftertaste.",Kellermeister Privat Kremser Kremsleiten,Winzer Krems
"This is the ripest of Ojai's current trio of '08 Chardonnays, with tropical fruit, apricot and pear flavors, but it also shows the winery's telltale acidity, dryness and minerality. Drink now.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Ojai
"With some neutral oak and a bit of lees aging, this dry Sauvignon Blanc has a pleasantly creamy, smoky edge to the grapefruit, Meyer lemon and gooseberry flavors, while tingly acidity makes the finish racy. It's a fine cocktail sipper and also a versatile white wine throughout the meal.",,Schug
"Perfumed with its new wood, not excessively as in the past but obviously. That gives the tannins an extra polish, smoothing the wine, leaving black currant fruit to shine through. Age for 4_8 years.",Quintessence,Château Pontac-Lynch
"Luxe is the high-end offering from Domaine Ste. Michelle, using free-run Chardonnay from a 25-year-old Columbia valley vineyard. It has more refinement, grip and depth than the regular DSM Blanc de Blancs, and mimics the pleasing toastiness associated with top Champagnes. Worthy of a place of honor on your holiday table.",Luxe,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"You can really taste pure notes of dried or candied fruit here. Honey, almond, mature apricot and maple syrup characterize the nose. In the mouth, the wine is richly sweet and thick.",Cantina di Colognola Acinatico 500ml,Collis Veneto Wine Group
"The tannins do have some firm character, but the fruit is more dominant, fresh and up-front. There is an attractive red-berry character, offering ripe fruits over a soft texture.",Les Epenots Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"A steely side of Grüner here, very crisp with a strong mineral element. The wine is razor sharp and bright, with a brittle texture. With its vibrant acidity, this is a great food-pairing wine. Screw cap.",Kollmütz Federspiel,Machherndl
"Rich, velvet-textured wine, this has weight and tannins surrounded by red berry fruits, soft acidity and a lingering sweet aftertaste.",,Maison Champy
"A nice Pinot Noir to drink now. It's bone dry and somewhat austere, showing only modest cherry, pomegranate and cola flavors that are marked by rich tannins and zesty acidity. But it's very elegant.",Central Avenue Vineyard,Pessagno
"Clean, fresh and spicy on the close, this easy Rosso offers mild aromas of wild berry, raspberry and cranberry. The wine delivers a crisp feel in the mouth.",,Podere Brizio
"This tight, brittle Pinot Noir isn't giving much pleasure now. It's distinguished in structure, with a fine, silky mouthfeel, brisk acidity and a pleasurable dusting of tannins. But it's a bit short on fruit. Give it a good airing and drink now.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Summerland
"A 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon, Piano... Piano opens with a pretty pink color and delicate aromas of rose petal, white cherry and almond paste. Pair this wine with spicy Thai beef and basil.",Piano... Piano,Terre di Talamo
"This Roussanne, Viognier, Marsanne and Grenache Blanc blend is very rich and fruity. It has all kinds of fruity, flowery, spicy and toasty flavors, brightened with crisp acidity. A nice, easy-drinking alternative to a creamy Chardonnay.",Estate Côte de Madrone Blanc,Sarah's Vineyard
"Whiffs of wet earth and wood add a rustic, foresty tone to aromas of preserved black fruit and violets. Big in both body and tannins, decanting could coax this wine into revealing more subtleties of fruit and minerals that may otherwise go unnoticed.",Terra Romana Cuvée Alexandru,SERVE
"This wine's ripe, earthy bouquet is enhanced by the bright aromas of strawberry and blackberry preserve aromas. It's soft, round, supple and there's a distant note of plump berry sweetness.",,Mocali
"Light oak aromas blend nicely with white flower scents and peach notes. The palate is round, smooth and honest, with plump flavors of vanilla, pear and melon. Oaky on the finish, then dry and toasty. Nice for a warm-weather Chard.",Felino,Viña Cobos
"Concentrated aromas of blackberry come with leather and dried-cheese scents. The palate is full in depth and solid in feel, with flavors of creamy oak, medicinality and blackberry. Feels rich, grabby and tastes resiny on the finish, but there's enough solid black fruit to override the oak.",Año Cero,Altocedro
"Honest plum and berry aromas get it going, followed by a fresh, comfortable palate with raspberry and plum flavors and nonpushy tannins. Feels entirely clean, with a pleasant red-fruit aftertaste. Everyday Malbec that gets it right.",,Arge & Tina
"A lovely blend of 77% Sauvignon Blanc and 23% Chenin Blanc, this light and lively wine is direct and focused, with good briskness to the green plum, fig and pear notes. A touch of floral character adds depth to the bouquet, while a lemon rind bitterness unfolds on the end.",,Bradgate
"A crisp, streamlined expression of Sangiovese Grosso that opens with lively aromas of wild berry, white pepper and pressed rose. Pair this wine with sweet meats, such as roasted ham or pork.",,Camigliano
"Already showing a bit of bricking, this is a full-bodied Shiraz that's a bit coarse in texture, with aromas and flavors of plum and brown sugar. The finish matches tart, zingy fruit with sweet, molasses-tinged oak. The individual components show promise, but it's tough to say if they will all come together in time.",Noble Baron,Château Tanunda
"A supple, medium-bodied Shiraz ideal for near-term consumption, the 2009 Block 50 Shiraz delivers clean aromas and flavors of dark fruit__lack cherries and plums__nd a hint of vanilla. It does turn a bit tart on the finish.",,Block 50
"Here's the kind of simple Rosso di Montalcino that would pair perfectly with with risotto alla Milanese (with delicate meat flavoring and saffron) or roast pork. It's a fresh, zesty wine, with bright berry nuances and a clean, sharp mouthfeel.",,Castello Banfi
"This is a big, barrel-aged Chardonnay resplendent in caramel and honey, although it turns a bit bi-polar on the mid-palate, where it shows off lean minerality. A yin and yang wine, with a slight burn on the finish.",DeMayo Vineyard,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"Fresh, clean and pure, with standard dark berry aromas. Feels round, creamy and chewy, while the flavors tend towards black fruits and no shortage of oak. Tastes toasty and feels resiny on the finish, with vanilla and berry syrup filling up the aftertaste.",Altosur,Finca Sophenia
"A Rhône-style red blend, with tart boysenberry and blueberry fruit. Sappy and forward, with light tannins and moderate acidity.",Squirrel Tooth Alice Red,Dusted Valley
"Saline and oceanic on the bouquet, but largely it's neutral-smelling. Feels tight and fresh, but tastes a bit stalky and bitter, with baked apple and a strong taste of straw. Finishes with white pepper notes and that same stalky flavor from before.",,Concertum
"This silky Rosso offers a lean, compact mouthfeel and intense aromas of red fruit, smoked almond, black olive and sour cherry. There's a savory note of cured meat on the finish.",,Máté
"Brisk in acidity and bone dry, this Pinot is elegant, although it falls short on opulence. The flavors are of sour cherry candy and cola.",Charles Vineyard Zero New Oak,Foursight
"Made in the popular style, with flavors of buttered popcorn, toast, honey, pineapple and vanilla. Tastes rather sweet, but brisk acidity helps maintain balance.",Director's Cut,Francis Ford Coppola
"Sabazio is a bold and savory Rosso di Montepulciano with spicy aromas of leather, tobacco, ripe fruit, blackberry preserves and rum cake. The intensity of the bouquet is there but the mouthfeel is light and tight.",Sabazio,La Braccesca
"In certain vintages, this wine can be excellent, but in 2008 it's merely good. The fruit__ blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (49%), Cabernet Franc (32%) and Merlot (19%)__omes across as slightly pruny or stewed, while the tannins remain firm and leathery.",Chertsey,Penley Estate
"Perfumed wine, all its flavors directed towards a spice-driven lychee character. Rosehip and peppered pineapple are layered with soft, ripe texture. Screwcap.",,Pierre Sparr
"A sound, likeable Merlot, whose fruity richness, soft tannins and relatively modest price make it a good buy. It's forward in blackberry jam, cassis, red licorice and smoky oak flavors.",,Oberon
"A nutty and acidic wine, with aromas of pressed walnuts and toffee. Feels tight, sharp and narrow on the tongue, with blazing acidity and dry, limited, salty flavors that fold in toffee and sour fruit notes. Exceedingly salty on the finish; smells great but feels and tastes astringent for such an expensive bottling.",Prestige 50 Amontillado Viejísimo,Pedro Romero
"Here's a dry expression of Moscato Giallo grapes from cool-climate northern Italy (where fresh floral aromas tend to be more intense) that opens with a bouquet of honey, acacia flower and stone fruit. The wine is fresh and clean, with a touch of bitter almond on the finish.",,Nals Margreid
"Seems like it might have been better a year ago. Although you'll find rich pineapple, lemon drop and butterscotch flavors, they're getting a little tired, and the oak is starting to dominate.",,Sarah's Vineyard
"Dark in color, with plum, berry and medicinal aromas. Round, full and in good shape, with dark plum, blackberry and a lot of oak for a $10 wine. Finishes creamy and big, with a spicy aftertaste. Plump and solid for value-priced Graciano.",,Rio Madre
"This is a big, rich and flavorful Pinot Noir. It's brimming with cherries, pomegranates, rhubarbs, red licorice and sandalwood, with a spicy, meaty taste of bacon. Drink now.",,Martin Ray
"Though crafted in 100% new French oak, this retains its strong varietal character, but some of the acidic sharpness is softened by the barrel fermentation. Fresh and clean, it brings sweet grain and herb flavors to a mix of pineapple and green apple fruit. Nice, snappy, tart finish.",Angel,Guardian Cellars
"Made with 15% Cabernet Franc, which adds a welcome cherry tart richness to the earthy blackberries and herbs, this Merlot is priced well for an elegant restaurant wine. It's dry and crisp and smooth, and so easy to drink with a fine steak.",,Gainey
"For a Pommard, this is surprisingly soft, more to do with the black cherry flavors than the tannins. A touch of spice and lively acidity give life to the dense structure. A wine to drink from next year.",,Domaine de Courcel
"Intense bramble, red plum and boysenberry backed by light coffee and a hint of sweet smoke immediately draw you in to this wine. The lush palate offers similarly dominating flavors of berry compote, forest floor, clove and black pepper. Creamy and full in the mouth with moderate dusty tannins, this is an easy pleaser that will pair well with grilled lamb.",,Neil Ellis
"The Hengsberg vineyard, close to the Klosterneuburg monastery, produces this luscious Grüner, very concentrated and rich. Apples and pear flavors dominate, although underneath there is spice to add complexity. Worth aging for 1_2 years. Glass stopper.",Hengsberg,Stift Klosterneuburg
"You won't find a better Pinot Grigio at this price in California. It's just wonderful, with brisk acidity perking up flavors of lemons, limes, green apples and honey. Production was 111,000 cases.",Private Selection,Robert Mondavi
"Tedeschi makes a fine Recioto with firm tannins and generous aromas of black fruit, spice, cinnamon and prune. It tastes smooth and silky and offers a curious balance between natural sweetness and dense structure.",Capitel Fontana 500ml,Tedeschi
"This Cab-dominant Bordeaux-style blend needs some time to come around, with closed aromas of dark fruits, cedar, leather and cigar box trying to fully unfold in the bouquet. The mouthfeel is creamy but gripping, the texture like crushed velvet that lingers on the finish. Black berries and plum flavors fill the mouth, accented by herbal notes of thyme, sweet spice and tobacco leaf.",Rubicon,Meerlust
"Year after year this ranks as one of Chile's most complex and satisfying SBs. The nose is like an ocean breeze mixed with saline, citrus and fresh greens. The palate blends zestiness with fleshy weight, and the flavors suggest lime, green apple and grapefruit. Clean and long on the finish; drink now before it fades.",Limited Selection Leyda Vineyard,Montes
"An interesting Rhône blend (40% Grenache, 26% Cinsault, 23% Syrah and 11% Mourvèdre) sappy and bright, with a generous mix of berries. Still tasting quite young and tight, this may benefit from additional cellar time.",Rouge des Coteaux,Olsen Estates
"This unoaked, low-alcohol Sauvignon Blanc is really elegant, and shows how you don't have to spend a lot to get a fine wine. It's dry, crisp and rich in lemon, lime, pineapple and vanilla flavors, with a savory creaminess from sur lie aging. A brilliant value; production was 77,500 cases.",Private Selection,Robert Mondavi
"Meaty, dense and rich aromas, with driving scents of prune, licorice, blackberry and cola. The palate is healthy and rich, and it keeps in step with flavors of blackberry, dark plum and savory spice. Finishes lightly roasted and dark, with a saucy aftertaste that separates it from the masses. A lusty Malbec to drink now.",Reserva,Ruca Malen
"One of the best Chardonnays available at this price. Shows welcome restraint in the crisp, clean flavors of pineapples, Meyer lemons, pears and green apples, with just a touch of oak. If you just judge by price, you'll be amazed how complex and layered it is.",Vintage Selection,Pedroncelli
"Oak dominates this wine, with buttered toast and vanilla aromas and flavors. It's a little obvious, but there's a solid core of pineapple fruit, and plenty of racy acidity. Exotic; a Chardonnay to drink now.",Lucia Highlands Vineyard,Pessagno
"Dry Riesling began as a limited, regional offering, but with a price drop and a three-fold increase in production in 2009, it seems to have arrived on the national stage. Loaded with tight, tart fruit flavors of apple, pear, grapefruit and lemon, this dense and delightful wine is surefire for a wide range of seafood and pastas in white sauce.",Dry,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Minerally and pure, with coastal-influenced nettle, green apple and passion fruit aromas. This is a very good, snappy wine with pure citrus, minerality, lime and grapefruit flavors. And that's also how it finishes. As the field of coastal Chilean SBs grow, Cool Coast from Casa Silva is one to keep an eye on.",Cool Coast,Casa Silva
"Described by the producer as the crème de la crème of Veltliners, this is certainly concentrated, rich and spicy. It has baked apple, nutmeg, a touch of ginger to go with the ripe fruit. It's a food wine, best with rich fish or creamy cheeses. Screw cap.",Gedersdorfer Vordernberg Reserve,Felsner
"Lean and tannic, this is a tough wine, its tannins dominating the underlying juicy fruit. It has power, with a firm and dry texture. Give it 2_3 years to develop.",Domaine Jean Descombes,Georges Duboeuf
"This citrusy Syrah, from a vineyard on the Royal Slope, spent 18 months in 75% new French oak. Yet it is not oaky or even particularly toasty; what comes through are tart berry flavors with a backbone of leaf and stem. It shows some heat in the finish, and a wash of chalky chocolate. This is a wine to decant.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Guardian Cellars
"This is a really nice Sauvignon Blanc and at this price, you should rush out and look for it. With fruit sourced from Lake County, Napa Valley and Clarksburg, it's crisp, dry and rich in citrus fruit, honeysuckle and pear flavors. Small percentages of Viognier and Pinot Gris add complexity and depth.",Clarity,Johndrow Vineyards
"A blend that brings together French and Austrian varietals into a smooth, rich wine. Licorice, sweet fruit jelly and spice go with toast and polished acidity to give a wine with an international feel.",Chorus,Stift Klosterneuburg
"Tenuta Sant'Antonio's lovely Recioto shows firm tannins that are surrounded by aromas of blackberry, spice, nutmeg, black cherry and prune. Chocolate fudge would make a perfect food companion to this dark, concentrated wine.",Argille Bianche 375ml,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"From the hills around Vienna, this Riesling is a rich style, emphasizing fruity lemon and apricot flavors as well as steely acidity. It's a fine combination with a tightly perfumed aftertaste. Screw cap.",Vienna Hills,Wieninger
"A rich and creamy character, underlined by pepper, sets this wine on a broad road. It has fine acidity as well, but it is the ripe structure that gives the wine character. There are delicious final apricot fruit flavors.",Edition Chremisa,Winzer Krems
"This is a linear and refined Recioto from the Valpantena subzone of Valpolicella that boasts aromas of sweet Christmas spice, rum cake, prune, clove and polished black stone. Recioto can sometimes be overripe and overblown, but this expression shows elegant composure.",500ml,Tezza
"Beautifully perfumed, with acidity, white fruits and a mineral context. The wine is layered with citrus and lime, hints of fresh pineapple acidity. Screw cap.",Steinterrassen,Stadt Krems
"A full wine with smoked meat, licorice and black-fruit jam aromas. The palate is healthy, snappy and tannic, with earthy, full-blast berry flavors that veer toward sweet raisin and syrup but then pull back before falling off the cliff. Saturated, dense and raisiny, but still very rich, real and rewarding.",Andes,Argie
"A softly gentle, ultrarich Chardonnay. Fruity flavors of pineapples and Key lime pie are enriched with notes of caramelized vanilla, buttered toast, sautéed banana and honey. A stony minerality offers much needed weight and balance. Delicious. Drink now.",,Antica
"A dry wine with firm tannins over the juicy red-cherry fruits. It is structured, while likely to develop well over the next few years. The wood and fruit are both attractive at this stage.",Collection Premier Cru,L. Tramier & Fils
"This Pinot Grigio is faintly coppery in color (trendy in some circles), with slightly floral and citrus overtones. It's modest in alcohol, but reasonably plump on the midpalate, delivering melon and apple-skin flavors before finishing crisp and refreshing. Drink now.",,Robert Oatley
"Tiezzi's 2010 Rosso shows a dark, austere side, with aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry preserves and rum cake. The acidity is lively and fresh, and the mouthfeel is balanced and smooth.",,Tiezzi
"Fleshy black-plum, cherry and blackberry notes lead this medium-weight wine, with a light dusting of cocoa powder. Dark but vibrant in the mouth, with a good amount of pepper and licorice on the finish. Drink now.",,Tormentoso
"Black fruit aromas feature a touch of licorice. Feels lively and alert, with edgy acids and juicy, forward flavors of plum and wild berry. Toasty, integrated and spicy on the finish, with pinches of green and black pepper.",Reserva,Terrazas de Los Andes
"This Tuscan expression of Viognier doesn't show the intense floral aromas you usually find in this fragrant grape variety. Instead, you get layers of citrus, pear and white peach.",Vento Teso,Terre di Talamo
"With a soft mouthfeel and upfront cherry, blueberry and blackberry flavors, this Cabernet puts all its chips on sheer deliciousness. It's a winner, but not an ager. Drink now.",,Valley Legend
"Rosso Carillon is aged one year in oak to produce smoky notes of toasted almond and exotic spice. The bright, compact mouthfeel offers cola, sour cherry and wild blueberry endnotes.",Carillon,Vini Italiani da Sogno
"Once thought to be Albariño, this grape variety is actually native to France's Jura. In this example from South Australia, it's a lean, crisp white, with hints of pencil shavings that accent its grapefruity flavors. It's pretty, harmonious and a good all-around white for drinking over the next 6_9 months.",The Love Symbol Single Site Savignin Blanc,Zonte's Footstep
"Fiery smelling at first, with aromas of mint, raw oak, coconut and baked berry fruits. Feels rich almost to the point of syrupy, with spicy, lightly green flavors infiltrating the core of cassis and berry. Finishes herbal and stalky, with a lingering green flavor.",Gran Las Divas Vineyard,Riglos
"Soft and delicately sweet, Moscato Bosc Dla Rei opens with a light, foamy appearance and plush layers of peach cream and lemon mousse. Fragrant, fresh and sweet, pair it with fruit salad.",Bosc Dla Rei,Beni di Batasiolo
"Luca Bosio's pretty Moscato d'Asti opens with characteristic aromas of ginger, tangerine skin and acacia flower. This sweet sparkler presents a mouthful of creamy foam and bright bubbles.",,Bosio
"Here's a lovely Moscato d'Asti with a pristine and bright quality to both the bouquet and mouthfeel. Not as creamy and frothy as most, the wine drinks like a still sweet wine (the bubbles are light and delicate) with a zesty touch of lemon zest on the close. A perfect apéritif wine.",,Massolino
"A big wine, ripe and explosive in fruit. Maybe too fruity, almost a bomb. Raspberries and cherries, sweetened with oak, dominate. Could use greater subtlety and restraint, not to mention grounding earthiness.",Home Vineyard,Manzoni
"This wine opens with some volatility that shows up as dried apple skin, strawberry jam, apricot and dusty earth. It offers polished tannins and bright, buoyant feel. There are loads of ripe strawberry on the close.",Pian delle Vigne Riserva Vignaferrovia,Marchesi Antinori
"The nose of this succulent Rosso opens with red berry, candied cherry and blackberry tar. Its firm tannins give the wine a textured, almost gritty, mouthfeel.",,Lazzeretti
"A little heavy for Pinot Noir. Almost like Grenache, with deliciously sweet, full-bodied flavors of cherry compote and raspberry tart, sprinkled with powdered sugar and cinnamon. Give it a good decant and drink now.",Reserve,One Hope
"A big Zin with juicy dark cherry and blackberry jammy-ness and a slight hint of cedar and clove. This wine is a chance to open but is a nice showpiece for Ruby Hill's love of and prowess with big, ripe Zins.",Peacock Patch Reserve,Ruby Hill Winery
"This is a confounding wine in many ways, one that could have easily scored higher, or scored lower. It starts with an almost alarming taste of vanilla and cherry coke and a slight bite of alcohol, but over time, got much more interesting. Finally, it turned earthy with pleasant hits of olive and caramel competing for dominance.",,Cabot Vineyards
"Simple, bright and packed with fresh berry intensity, this easygoing Rosso would pair well with meatloaf, lamp chops or pasta with meat sauce. The wine's naturally crisp acidity will cut through the fat content of these succulent foods.",Voliero,Casato1
"In the 2009 vintage, the wines of the Hautes-Côtes have an extra richness and warmth. This wine has flavors of cherries, raspberries that give fine acidity, as well as fruitiness. The tannins are already well integrated, finishing a wine that is deliciously juicy.",Sous le Mont,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"This proprietary bottling from Flora Springs has been around for a long time. It's a good wine, satisfying in citrus, peach and spice flavors, leading to a clean, fruity-sweet finish.",Soliloquy,Flora Springs
"Made from Zinfandel, Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Petite Sirah, it's an easy drinking wine despite the firm tannins. Shows lush, ripe blackberry, black currant, raspberry, cola and spice flavors, with a dry finish. Ready now.",Director's Cut Cinema,Francis Ford Coppola
"Quite a good Cabernet, especially at this price. They blended some other varieties, including Zinfandel, Malbec and Petite Sirah, which bring extra layers. It's a fine everyday wine__ruity, spicy, full-bodied and dry.",,Black Box
"Lightly spiced up front, with dry wood aromas, light cherry and floral hints. Feels juicy and tight, with basic red-plum flavors that transition quickly to spice and acidic crispness on a short finish.",Belezos Crianza,Bodegas Zugober
"Moscato Rosa is a crimson-colored sweet wine with dark ruby highlights that offers simple but fresh aromas of wild raspberries and blueberries. The wine's bouquet is fragrant, sweet-smelling and intense. Drink it as an apéritif or with fruit-based desserts.",Moscato Rosa,Franz Haas
"A little rugged around the edges, with jagged tannins that emphasize the acidity. But it's dry and balanced, and you'll find ripe flavors of cherries, pomegranates, red licorice and toast. Drink now.",,Ketcham Estate
"This Rosso shows nicely etched lines of wild berry, white almond and smoked spice. The wine is lean and crisp in the mouth and would pair well with a heaping plate of spaghetti and meat sauce.",,La Fornace
"Sweet, fragrant and intense, this pretty Moscato d'Asti opens with musky tones of melon, stone fruit, acacia flower and honeysuckle. The wine is creamy, rich and soft with pretty tangerine mousse on the close.",Nivole,Michele Chiarlo
"Centive is a pleasant and lively Moscato d'Asti with fragrant tones of dried flowers, jasmine soap, lavender honey and sun-ripened peach. The smooth mouthfeel is capped by loads of frothy cream.",Centive,Tenuta Olim Bauda
"Here's a lovely Rosso and a rare value wine from one of Tuscany's most prestigious wine-growing areas. Ciampoleto offers bright berry nuances, light shadings of exotic spice and a fresh, zesty finish.",Ciampoleto,Tenuta San Giorgio
"From the new Happy Canyon appellation, this wine is so close to being so good. It's dry and rich in acidity, and complex in blackberry, cherry and currant flavors that finish long and sweet. This new 7200 line from Foxen is worth watching over future vintages.",Range 30 West,Foxen 7200
"This is dry Beaujolais, boasting as much structure as fruit. The tannins are prominent, underpinning the spicy black berry fruits. The effect is rich, a wine that will age well over 2_3 years.",Château des Capitans,Georges Duboeuf
"Ripe and juicy, this is an immediately appealing wine, full of forward fruit that is rich and sweet. Dark cherry lies over cranberry sharpness. The wine flows easily from the glass, an example of the sunny side of Beaujolais.",Domaine du Moulin-_-Vent,Georges Duboeuf
"A structured, dry, firmly tannic wine with great concentration. It has a chunky rich character allied to a ripe, juiciness. Flavors of bitter chocolate add to the plum and damson skin flavor and bite.",,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
Medium-intense and herbal with notes of licorice root and cedar spice among the dark fruit and soft green-pepper flavors. It's easy to drink and well structured with moderate acid and soft but present tannins. A good amount of sweet woody spice lingers though the finish.,,De Grendel
"Lovely perfumed fruit with delicious, soft sweetness, raspberry and sweet plums. The acidity attractively cuts through this ripeness.",Les Dominodes Premier Cru,Chanson Père et Fils
"In the far north of the Haut-Médoc, Château Coufran is under the same ownership as Verdigan. It has perhaps a more austere character than its stablemate, with also more potential for aging. The fruit is structured and solid, a very textured wine.",,Château Coufran
"Deeply embedded in firm tannins, this is a wine for aging. There is plenty of mineral, black currant and plum juice fruit, with a fine juicy element as well as acidity. It is balanced and harmonious, a keeper for 5_6 years.",,Château Dutruch Grand Poujeaux
"More subtle than your average full-force Malbec. This one runs heavy on the cedar, tobacco and rooty characteristics more so than black fruit and power, but there's ripe raspberry and chocolate to satisfy anyone seeking fruit and richness. A definite warm-climate wine, but it's restrained and traditional in style. I like this wine for its individuality.",Roble Reserva,Staphyle
"This is a rich and concentrated wine with welcoming aromas of black fruits, bacon, African violets and soft black pepper. The mouth is as intense as one would anticipate with more concentrated dark plum and currant flavors and accents of coconut on the long finish. The tannins are gripping and the structure firm; try with hearty red meat dishes for a superb pairing.",Private Collection,Spier
"Hits all the classic well-oaked Cabernet notes: cedar, tobacco, vanilla and cassis upfront, with similar flavors coursing through from start to finish. It's not quite as full bodied as some Australian Cabernets, which isn't a bad thing, finishing with silky yet firm tannins. Drink now_2016.",Marquis Philips S2,R Wines
"Made in the modern style of superripe fruit and lots of oak, this Chardonnay is massive in the long hangtime tropical fruit, pear and peach flavors that the vineyard so easily achieves. It's not complex, but it sure is delicious, oozing with honey and spices. Drink now_2013.",Sleepy Hollow Vineyard,Pessagno
"Wilhelm Sattler's entry-level Sauvignon Blanc is a beautiful, intense wine, packed with black currant and pineapple fruits, layered with gooseberry. The effect is vibrant, fruity, with just an extra touch of class.",Steirische Klassik,Sattlerhof
"If you like your Malbecs big, lusty and powerful, you'll enjoy this densely concentrated wine, grown 1,100 feet up on the Rockpile. It's strong in blackberries and currants, and is very dry, with a good acid-tannin balance. Now_2013.",Buck Pasture Vineyard,Mauritson
"This wine shows some of the cool-climate notes associated with Western Australia and its maritime climate; green tobacco and other herbs intertwine with bright cassis fruit. At the same time, the fine quality of the tannins is evident in this wine's velvety texture, which makes it a pleasure to drink. Best now_2017.",Book Ends,West Cape Howe
"It's a little soft, but it sure is good and rich, offering waves of blackberries, cherries, currants, licorice and sandalwood, with a spicy, dry finish. Easy to like, and complex enough for upscale fare. Drink now.",Reserve,Whalebone
"A bright, fresh wine, its red currant and fresh plum acidity an important element. It has dry tannins at the core, giving a firm structure and hints of wood, with sweeter fruit coming through to finish.",,Château de Chamirey
"In the nose, this 52% Cabernet Sauvignon, 33% Malbec, 10% Merlot, 5% Cab Franc blend offers a plush mix of black cherry, cassis and black olive. There is a slight hint of tanned leather, but not enough to dampen the sweet fruit. Smooth and open, forward and just plain delicious.",Purple Haze Red,Darby
"Made with sweetly fragrant Malvasia grapes from the tiny island of Salina off the northern coast of Sicily, this Passito dessert wine opens with all the intensity you'd expect of sunny southern Italy. The wine sports a luminous amber color and aromas of candied fruit or orange rind, dried mint, touches of root beer and even a hint of white licorice.",Passito di Salina 375ml,Colosi
"500 ml. Almost as intensely spicy as an Alsace Gewürztraminer, this is a rich wine that remains essentially dry. Ripe peach and lychee are right up front, giving a fine intensity. This wine would work well with blue cheese or a pâté.",Loibner Smaragd 500ml,Emmerich Knoll
"Full and crisp at the same time, this wine brings together the two characters of the 2009 Bordeaux vintage. The wine has an attractive citrus character, followed by ripe melon and pear juice, and laced with light toast.",,Château le Bonnat
"Essentially a reserve blend from the Cold Creek, Canoe Ridge, and Indian Wells vineyards, this offers pleasing, nuanced aromas of smoke and cherry, but seems to quickly thin out in the mouth. The finish is sharp and tight, but does not seem to be leading into further complexity.",Artist Series Meritage Red Wine,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Light and lemony, with just under two percent residual sugar (balanced against piercing acidity), this well-crafted, fruit-powered Gewürztraminer seems custom-made for Thai food. Fruity and spicy, with a hint of the grape's characteristic talcum powder highlights, this is clean and eminently quaffable.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Restrained and elegant, this is a wine on the austere side, its acidity dominant along with a firm, dry aftertaste. Produced by the other Machard de Gramont estate.",Les Beau Monts,Domaine A. Machard de Gramont
"Tons of delicious flavors of blackberry and cherry-pie filling, blueberry granola, white chocolate, vanilla fudge and roasted almonds in this deliriously rich wine. Despite the opulence, it's dry. Could be better structured in acids, though, which may limit ageability. Drink now_2012.",,Hill Family Estate
"Named after the gravel soils in which the vines are planted (and the old quarry site), this Cab is well balanced and surprisingly approachable now with flavors of blackberry, black currant leaf, cola, sandalwood and a kiss of menthol on the finish. It's soft, silky tannins linger through the long finish.",Gravel Quarry,Glen Carlou
"This is a good, solid Pinot Noir, a little rustic and direct, but offering lots of drinking pleasure. It's dry and silky, with rich black cherry, raspberry, cola and sandalwood flavors. Drink over the next year or two.",Bella Una,Benovia
"With mineral and apple on the nose, this qualifies as a pure and pleasing SB for almost any occasion. The palate is elegant and lithe, while the flavors of green apple, gooseberry and grapefruit are what they should be. Pure, sound and solid wine to drink right now.",Reserva,Casa Silva
"With vineyards in Lamarque close to the Gironde estuary, the wine has fresh acidity, bright berry fruits and a core of tannins. These are firm at this stage with prominent acidity to finish.",,Château du Cartillon
"The lightest Grüner, crisp with fresh apple, it has just a touch of spice, focusing more on tightly clean fruit. A perfect apéritif style. Screw cap.",Lois,Loimer
"This could be straight out of New Zealand given its styling, which features pungent notes of crushed tomato leaf and gooseberries. It's light and refreshing, with a clean, crisp finish.",,Sidewood
"Treveri is a new Washington state sparkling wine producer that offers a full lineup of traditional method bubbly. This Extra Brut has clean, tart flavors of melon and citrus, fresh and crisply defined.",Extra Brut,Treveri Cellars
"Pure and inviting, with a touch of char and minerality to go with basic plum and berry aromas. Feels good and grabby, with flavors of sweet blackberry, cassis, butter and molasses. Creamy, jammy and uncomplicated on the finish.",Organica Made With Organic Grapes,Santa Julia
"Feels rough in the mouth, with jagged tannins framing ripe, extracted blackberry jam and oak flavors. A little rustic and fruity-sweet now, but could gain traction with a few years in the cellar.",Reserve,Beringer
"Interesting aromas of graham cracker, pastry, blackberry, dark cherry and tomato all work well together. The palate is full and easy, with some weight to it along with flavors of black plum and berry. Not exuberant on the finish; it ends in mellow, lightly medicinal fashion.",Colección,Alma del Sur
"Borra is going old-school here, making the wine nonvintage and putting 10% each of Syrah and Mourvedre into Petite Sirah. Smelling of freshly baked bread, the wine is full of structured red fruit, while its tannins are soft and finish is easygoing. A fine bottle for rustic fare.",Lot 09 47.5 Degree Limited Release,Borra
"Mostly Merlot, with some Cabernet Sauvignon, this blend starts out a bit angular, so give it some air before drinking. Although it's not an ager, it shows pleasantly ripe blackberry, cherry, mocha, herb and spice flavors.",Jane,J Ludlow
"With its distinctive herbaceous edge, the wine has a grapefruit-and-citrus character that offers a bright acidity. It has density and richness, fruity and forward.",Domaine Sainte Claire,Jean-Marc Brocard
"Aromatically, this wine takes some time to open, but in taste it's structured, pretty and very floral, with smooth lines of cherry and red raspberry that defy its high alcohol level. Made by Renwood Winery in Amador County, it's a very good value.",Grandmere Old Vine,Kirkland Signature
"Bright berry aromas are comported and good. Feels driving and forward, because of its bold acidity and choppy tannins, but tastes nice and dark, with blackberry and cassis flavors. There's a controlled burn to the finish, and overall the wine seems healthy.",Single Vineyard,Lamadrid
"Dense and inky on the bouquet, with blueberry as the core fruit aroma and some grass or alfalfa around the edges. Feels blocky and tannic, with sweet, roasted flavors of black fruits that come with a peppery aftertaste. Full on the finish, with coconut and oaky accents.",Single Vineyard,Lamadrid
"An easy-drinking Coonwarra Cab, with regionally characteristic notes of cassis, cedar and mint. It's medium in weight, with a finish that turns tart and tea-like. Drink now_2017.",,Katnook Estate
"With bright, zesty acidity, this Sauvignon Blanc is clean and vibrant in orange, pineapple, lime and gooseberry flavors. If only it finished drier, it would be superb.",,Cakebread
"This hearty Rosso opens with spicy aromas of candied fruit, clove, dark spice and cured meat. The wine has a warm, earthy note that is characteristic of Tuscany's Sangiovese. The mouthfeel is tart, bright and fresh on the finish.",,Fattoi
"Poggio Argentato opens with a bright bouquet of green apple, kiwi, cut grass and lemon zest. You'll also recognize green caper and olive notes on the finish. The wine shows good density, freshness and would pair with smoked salmon and cream cheese.",Poggio Argentato,Fattoria Le Pupille
"Jammy black fruit and berry notes fill the nose and mouth, while a hint of bramble and milk chocolate add depth and interest. Medium weight, with dusty but structured tannins, and a fudgy finish.",The Glass Collection,Glenelly
"A dark, plummy Livermore Valley Merlot that reminds one of herb-encrusted roasted meats, and would be a good wine to pair with such a feast. Full-bodied and lush, with a smoky, oaky finish and cedar lurking throughout.",Crown Block,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"Robust, peppery, dry and fruity, just what an inexpensive Shiraz should be. Easy to like for its array of blackberries, spices and cedar. A great value in a barbecue-style wine.",,Black Box
"Light, minerally and showing red fruit and cocoa notes on the bouquet. Offers depth and density in support of sweet, malty, chocolaty berry flavors. Creamy, oaky and chocolaty on the finish. Uncomplicated and easy to like.",Crianza,Carlos Serres
"Pair this food-friendly bright Rosso with meatloaf or pork roasted with chopped fennel and leeks. The wine opens with easy berry aromas backed by blue flower and spice, and there's a blast of cleansing acidity on the close.",Voliero,Casato1
"Here's a wonderfully fresh and tangy Chianti Classico (Sangiovese with a tiny element of Canaiolo) that opens with a bright, ruby appearance and tangy notes of wild berry, white almond and blue violet. The mouthfeel is fresh and focused.",Chianti Classico,Castello d'Albola
"Bright red cherry and chewy blackberry notes are followed by sweet spice, nutmeg and cinnamon. There's a grapy element to the bouquet that underscores the wine's youth and informality.",,Molino di Sant'Antimo
"This organically farmed blend of Sangiovese, Foglia Tonda, Barsaglina and Colorino opens with sweet cherry and blueberry notes followed by light accents of spice and leather. This easygoing wine shows medium intensity and fresh acidity.",,Mocine
"A sweetly floral nose wraps around you with the intensity of the Gewürztraminer grape, suggesting orange, perfume and spice. It's sweet enough to serve with a fruit-based dessert, though not sugary in any way.",Demi-Sec,Treveri Cellars
"Dry and unusual smelling, with baking spice, cinnamon and exotic notes. Not your normal black-fruited bruiser; this wine spreads out in the mouth, with sweet flavors of nutmeg along with dry plum and berry fruit. Lively and warm on the finish, with zest and an herbal element.",,N_made
"A light, easy-drinking Merlot that spent two months in new French oak and otherwise speaks of dark plums and earth. Some bottle variation; two bottles tasted.",Reserve,Middle Ridge
"Bass Tuba is a sweet sparkling dessert wine that opens with an off-gold color and ripe aromas of peach, honey, candied fruit and mango. It's a bold, concentrated Moscato d'Asti with a thick, creamy mouthfeel, bright sweetness and piquant touch of white pepper.",Bass Tuba,Bava
"The relatively cool Adelaide Hills are making a name for their Sauvignon Blanc, and this example shows a restrained, grassy bouquet and flavors of grapefruit and tangerine. It's plump on the midpalate, then almost razor-sharp on the finish. Drink now.",The Broken Fishplate,D'Arenberg
"Reale (100% Merlot) offers sweet cherry and raspberry aromas with light touches of spice and toasted almond in the background. This ruby colored wine offers an easy, fresh and lean feel in the mouth.",Reale,Fattoria la Castellina
"Encased in a lightweight, eco-friendly AstraPouch, this easy-to-share Cabernet is full of bright, cherry-fruit flavors and clove. It's simply drinkable and a good way to go for picnics, tailgates or when you just want a small pour.",,ecoVINO
"While there are tannins, they are not as powerful as the appellation and year would suggest. Instead, there is bright acidity, strawberry flavors and a fresh feel.",Les Cazetiers Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Ripe and soft, this is a densely fruity wine. Typical of Beaune, its tannins are gently enveloped by a soft, jammy texture of plums, fresh red cherries and a touch of smokiness. Finely balanced.",Vieilles Vignes,Maison Champy
"A very herbaceous Grüner, with grassy flavors as well as green fruit. It's fresh and refreshing, the cream and spice only coming through after a while. There is a fine line in bright, final acidity.",Göttweiger Berg,Stift Göttweig
"Here's an easy, straightforward dessert wine from Montalcino, Tuscany that shows bright aromas of stone fruit, honey and white almond. The wine is silky smooth and nicely sweet on the close without being too heavy or cloying.",Aurico 375 ml,Villa Poggio Salvi
"A good Cabernet, dry and classic in black cherry, currant, plum jam and cedar flavors. It's a little irregular in the mouth, with cutting acidity, and its future is uncertain. Give it a long decant.",,Truchard
"Acidity marks this wine, giving it a cut that streaks right down the middle of the blackberry, black cherry and cedar flavors. It's very dry, with rich, refined tannins, and that acidity will come in handy paired against a steak.",,Three Sticks
"The wine, which contains percentages of the Cabs Sauvignon and Franc, is rich in berry and cherry flavors. It's very dry, with pronounced but smooth tannins. Feels a bit young and jammy now, so give it 3_4 years in the cellar.",,Materra Cunat Family Vineyards
"A funky, individual blend of Merlot and Malbec from the Salta region, with its ups and downs. The nose carries patented Salta aromas of herbs and green bean, but there's berry scents and oaky mocha to offset that. The palate is forward and shows choppy tannins, while it tastes sweet, herbal and dark. As stated, this is a wine with virtues and pitfalls.",Ciclos,Michel Torino
"Controlled on the nose by blackberry, mint, menthol and fire. Like the 2008, this is not the easiest road to run, but it is a blast of penetrating blackberry, boysenberry, heat, spice and dark minty length. Tasty but tough, with the roughness and quality meeting in the middle. Drink in a couple of years.",Don David Reserve,Michel Torino
"A full-force, racy blend led by Merlot. It's ripe, staunch, mildly herbal and shows aromas of leather, savory berry and molasses. The palate is saturated, acid-driven and clacky, so it's lively stuff with medicinal, ripe berry and spice flavors. Finishes snappy and crisp, with pronounced acidity and tannins.",Corralillo Winemaker's Blend,Matetic
"A tremendous value for the lush berry, currant and mocha flavors, finely grained tannins, and the way the wine feels so fine and rich in the mouth. Drink now with almost anything calling for a full-bodied and dry red wine.",,Martin Ray
"Bone-dry and robust, this Zin has a bright, lemony acidity that seems odd at first, along with the wild raspberries and white pepper. The winemaker took the unusual step of adding Viognier grape skins to the Zinfandel juice; The result is a unique wine.",Flight,Quivira
"Superoaky in vanilla, buttered toast, honey and smoky flavors, this Chardonnay stands up to all that wood power with ripe pineapples, pears and lemons. It's a delicious, New World wine meant to dazzle, and it largely succeeds.",,William Hill Estate
"Power and concentration mark this Syrah. It's explosive in cherry, raspberry, bacon, mocha, pepper, mineral and new oak flavors that are frankly delicious, and the mouthfeel is pure silk. Could be a bit firmer and more structured, but it sure is a good red wine to drink now.",Doctor's Vineyard,Wrath
"This is a rich and toasty Chard with notes of wood-grilled peaches, soft Cortland apple flesh and vanilla cream. The finish is long and the mouth round without being flabby or overdone.",,Buitenverwachting
"This is a thick and succulent dessert wine with ripe aromas of candied pineapple, apricot, honey roasted almond, brown sugar and a light shading of dried sage at the back. The wine is dense and creamy on the finish and its long persistency is highly driven by its cheerful sweetness.",Passito 500ml,Cantina Caorsa
"Rich, fruity wine that is full of black plum juice and soft tannins. Milk chocolate sweetness adds to the generous nature of this juicy wine. Drink now.",Domaine de Michelons,Georges Duboeuf
"The year 2009 seems to have been a tannic one in Fleurie, producing wines that will benefit from some aging. This fits that bill well, a mineral and austere black fruit flavored wine, with a smoky aftertaste to go with tight acidity.",La Madone,Georges Duboeuf
"An attractive, ripe strawberry-flavored wine, with bright acidity combined with sweetness. It is already ready to drink, soft, full-bodied, stylish.",,Henri de Villamont
"A ripe, soft gentle wine, showing sweet tannins and a velvet texture. It doesn't have huge weight, but the cherry fruit is lush, plummy and open.",,Henri de Villamont
"Smells slightly reduced but enticing nonetheless with aromas of kirsch, melted milk chocolate and balsamic drizzled stewed strawberries. Accents of sweet cigar spice and vanilla keep things simultaneously interesting and hedonistic in the very round and lush mouth, leading through to the long oak-driven finish.",,DuVon
"Though it's had some extra time in the bottle, the oaky edges of this wine still seem a little rough and tumble. Or maybe it's the banana cream pie flavors__ppealing in their way, but opposite end of the spectrum from, say, the minerality of a Chablis. Front loaded, creamy and rich, this has generous amounts of the oak and toast that many consumers crave.",Indian Wells,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"An elegant wine, silky and supple, for drinking now with umami-rich fare, like ham or sausages, or a spicy lamb stew. Fully dry, it shows good acidity firming up the cherry, cola and herb flavors.",,Curran
"Now at the end of its peak, this is showing mature lychee, melon and soft-fruit aromas along with citrus, mango and nectarine flavors. It's tasty and pure, with only a slight bit of oily harshness that most Torrontés show. Drink immediately or wait for the 2010.",Classic,Alta Vista
"All five Bordeaux grapes are included in this Merlot, a substantial and well crafted wine with bright berry and cassis flavors front and center. Good complexity for the price, with olive, dust, mocha and caramel in the mix. Tannins are balanced and slightly grainy, with good length through the finish.",,Apex
"This is off dry, low alcohol (11.5%), spiced up with tart acidity and loaded with rich, ripe fruit flavors mixing pears and peaches. Sweet without being sugary, it should appeal to a wide spectrum of wine drinkers, and snap together the flavors of a Thai food. Columbia Crest makes 18,000 cases of this wine.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"Run, don't walk, to find this lovely, inexpensive Pinot. It's a fine wine to drink now for its soft silkiness, crisp dryness and raspberry, cherry, cola, pomegranate and sandalwood flavors. Easy to find, with 20,000 cases produced.",Caiden's Vineyards,Block Nine
"This is a subdued and elegant Prosecco with pretty aromas of cut grass, dried herbs, peach, citrus and green melon. There's a touch of piquant acidity backed by menthol flavors that taste great against all that creamy foam and bubbling.",Extra Dry 47,Bortolotti
"Soft and ripe wine, with gentle tannins and fresh acidity. There is an edge of bitterness that comes between the fruit and the structure.",Vignes Franches Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Dark in color, with a series of herbal aromas, this is dense and rich, with fine layers of berry fruits and solid tannins. It has a definite fresh character, with juicy fruit and acidity playing against the dry texture.",Château la Couronne,Mähler-Besse
"Ripeness was no problem during this fantastic vintage. The wine is rich and satisfying in black cherries, currants, cola, spicy mushu plum sauce and sandalwood flavors. There are some irregularities, though, that limit the point score, such as excessive softness, out of place acidity and a candied sweetness on the finish.",Tom's Vineyard,Hesperian
"Brisk in acidity, this everyday Sauvignon Blanc has ripe, bright flavors of tangerines, peaches and pineapples. It's a good by-the-glass wine for restaurants.",,J Ludlow
"Soft floral hints add depth to the otherwise straightforward ripe peach and white gummy bear aromas. There's a good balance in the mouth, with a nice acidic lift and slightly bitter edge to cut the sweetness on the finish and close with the faintest hint of astringency.",,Jam Jar
"Heavy and brooding, which makes sense seeing that it weighs in at 15% abv. So while it's not exactly ringing with freshness and agility, it scores points for its full-bodied black plum and blackberry flavors, and the oak is well applied. A bit warm and baked, but still good.",Libertad Vineyards,Benegas
"Black fruit aromas and rubber on the nose. Feels good in the mouth, with proper weight and balance. Tastes ripe and fairly sweet; blackberry and dark plum flavors turn peppery with time. Easy to drink Malbec.",,Alberti 154
"Sweet toffee, butter pecan and apricot aromas are the lead-in. This wine has a light body, decent acidity and mild flavors of burnt banana, spice and almond paste. Nutty yet basic on the finish, with a hint of mushroom.",Amontillado,Alvear
"A little on the soft side, with candied raspberry, cherry and cola flavors, but at this price, it's a decent starter Pinot Noir for those who are curious about this red-hot variety but don't want to spend a bundle. Enjoy the silkiness and spice.",,Leese-Fitch
"A little fiery and forced on the nose, but its wild berry and charred aromas it's solid. Feels full and stacked, with plum, cassis, pepper and a mild green element. Smooth in feel on the finish, but herbal tasting.",,Maipe
"A soft, robust Barbera with dark cherry flavors from beginning to end, and a pleasant level of minerality that levels off on the finish.",Estate,Lava Cap
"A Bordeaux-style blend, this initially hides its fruit in a wash of sharp-toned barrel scents. Tart berry flavors come in with a hint of sweetness, along with some volatility and heat. The wine should benefit from further bottle age.",Artemisia,Steppe Cellars
"Grenache is a grape variety that is slowly making its mark in central Italy. This 80-20 blend of Sangiovese and Grenache shows the bright cherry and blue flower aromas of Sangiovese with slightly smoked, savory layers in the background.",Ottopioppi,Varramista
"Overworked and oaky, with vanilla, buttered toast and sweet caramel flavors dominating everything else. Buried beneath are pineapple and pear flavors.",Reserve,Rodney Strong
"Despite lots of ripe peach, white flower and spice flavors, this Viognier is a little uneven. It's too sweet, almost a dessert wine, and yet there's a green pea, vegetal note.",Verna's Estate,Melville
Fair Play-based Perry Creek's Cab has high toned blue and red fruit and is tamely structured for being from high-elevation vineyards. Its finish is sweetly floral.,Altitude: 2401,Perry Creek
"Roll out richly sauced barbecue for this lusty Zinfandel. It's a big wine, full-bodied and dry, with spicy flavors of briary wild berries, tobacco and green herbs. It's hard to like on its own, but sweet meats and hard cheeses will help soften it.",Idyll Times Vineyard,Pessagno
"With a light touch of spice and some richness, this is a dry style of Pinot Gris. It has a kiwi fruit flavor along with white fruits, and finishes with pepper. Screwcap.",,Pierre Sparr
"Flashy notes of wood-grilled apple, brioche and apricot fill the nose. The mouth is round and the palate spicy, as flavors of ginger and cedar dominate the stone fruit.",,Radford Dale
"Quercerosa Rosé is pressed from Sangiovese grapes, and offers delicate tones of violet, blue flower and wild berry, with warm, earthy tones in the background. Pair this wine with tomatoes stuffed with basil and white rice.",Quercerosa,Pieve Vecchia
"This foamy Moscato d'Asti opens with bright aromas of tangerine flower, dried ginger, acacia flower and honey. The softly bubbly wine shows sweetness followed by a crisp accent on the finish.",,Castello del Poggio
"This is a tiny production Charbono that's light and in balance, with flavors and aromas of raspberry, red cherry and mushrooms right out of the dirt.",Babcock VIneyard,MICA Cellars
"Oak dominates this wine, with toasty charcoal aromas and flavors. The underlying wine seems pretty simple, with blackberry fruit flavors. Doesn't seem capable of aging, so drink up.",,Cakebread
"Mocha notes are upfront on the nose, with supporting fruit elements of raspberry and cherry flesh. Medium weight with a touch of bitter fruit-skin flavors in the mouth, and a short but clean finish. Easy and straightforward; drink now.",Frontier,Guardian Peak
"Red plum and small berries lead the nose of this Merlot, with hints of dusty dried blackberry in the back. The palate offers similar flavors, with a touch of sweet spice hanging on to the short but clean finish.",,Helderberg Wijnmakerij
"A simple, straightforward Cab. It shows herb and green pepper amid clove and currant and it's low enough in alcohol not to mess you up. A perfectly fine everyday wine.",,Heron
"Hannah Nicole's Merlot is one of its better wines, tasting of red plum and vanilla-laced toasted oak, its tannins grippy, with plenty of dried herb flavors in the background. Smooth and big.",,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"Quiet on the nose, but by no means does it smell poor. Feels chunky, with raisin, prune, brown sugar and baked fruit flavors. Flabby but flavorful late, with a finish that tastes like caramel and chocolate powder.",Cream,Alvear
"Aromatic, with notes of fresh red raspberries and sweet biscuit crumbs, this semisweet red sparkler is fun and fruity, but surprisingly brisk and quaffable. Exuberantly frothy, with a rich, mouth-filling foam, it finishes with just a whiff of dust and a sweet, red-berry note.",KrimSekt Matured Rosy Semi-Dry,Artemovsk
"In 1475, Monna Nera was the name of the woman who purchased and managed the historic Capezzana wine estate in western Tuscany. This easy wine offers loads of bright cherry aromas and a lean, crisp mouthfeel.",Monna Nera,Capezzana
"Soft and melted in the mouth, this 100% Cabernet has deep flavors of blackberries, currants and minerals. It's delicious, yet the structure is soft yet weirdly acidic. Doesn't seem like an ager.",Tony's Vineyard,Hesperian
"A dry blended wine, with attractive rich white fruits, pears and a citrus streak. The wine has a smooth texture, perfumed by lychee and with bright acidity to finish.",Gentil Hugel,Hugel
"A light-colored, delicate wine that is smooth and soft. It has a good balance of red-cherry flavors, with a little bitterness, layered over some gentle tannins. Not for aging, but attractively juicy now.",,Maison Champy
"Very ripe and rich in the modern style, a fruit-forward Chardonnay with pineapple, lemon and lime pie, buttered toast and spice flavors that are accented with crisp Central Coast acidity. Drink now.",Intrinity,Pessagno
"The Derby is pure, estate-grown, 100% Cabernet Sauvignon. The nose is accented with hints of violets and roses, ripe berries, plums and licorice. Once tasted, it seems to hit a wall and just stop. Extra hours of breathing did not make a difference. Perhaps it needs more bottle age, but at the moment it does not broaden out or move into a finish with the sort of depth that this wine has demonstrated in the past.",Derby,Spring Valley Vineyard
"A heady wine with mocha, chocolate, balsamic notes and black fruit on the bouquet. At first it seems thick and dumbed down, but it opens up to display bold berry flavors, stewed fruit, chocolate and savory accents. It's just lively enough, but overall this ranks as a saturated, bulky, round wine that falls squarely into the category of New World and ripe.",Cadus Single Vineyard,Nieto Senetiner
"There's little if any oak on this Chardonnay, which allows brisk Central Coast acidity and bright, long hangtime fruit to star. And that fruit is rich, suggesting tangerines, nectarines, Meyer lemons and Asian pears. Very nice with crab risotto, or with a beautiful roasted chicken.",O2 Series,Ortman Family
This sparkling wine offers rich and sophisticated aromas of baked bread and mature peach backed by accents of citrus and white pepper. The wine is rich and smooth with piquant effervescence. Not currently imported into the U.S.,Anno Zero Brut,Moletto
"In a soft and jammy style, packed with red berries and given a plummy juiciness. The structure is here, the fruit hanging on to it, giving the wine a gentle, final feel.",Aux Clous Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"A little rustic, with a briary, brambly mouthfeel, but it's a good example of a Sonoma County Zinfandel. The winery says the vines are old, and there are deep, concentrated flavors of wild forest berries, shriveled raisins, licorice, pine tar, grilled beef and black peppers. Because of the roughness, you'll want to give this wine a few hours of decanting.",,Benovia
"A really nice Cabernet that shows how well Paso Robles can produce this kind of wine while keeping prices modest. Made from 100% of the variety, it's dry and rich in tannins, with interesting flavors of blackberries, currants, anise and smoky oak. Drink now.",Signature Selection,Bianchi
"With 39% Petit Verdot, this is a rarity in Bordeaux. It is certainly reflected in the dark color of the wine. It has spice and a densely concentrated structure, firm and chunky. There are the Bordeaux tannins and the acidity of 2008, filled out with a bitter chocolate and black berry character.",,Château Bolaire
"Dense, rubbery and solid in terms of black-fruit aromas. In the mouth, it feels right and fades nicely, highlighting healthy, firm blackberry, black olive and herbal flavors. Meets the norms of a very good, commendable Malbec. 14,000 cases made.",Reserva,Bodega del Fin del Mundo
"This Sauvignon Blanc has very strong, ripe flavors of grilled pineapples, peaches, lemons and mangoes. Crisp, citrusy acidity fortunately balances out the rich fruity sweetness. A lovely cocktail sipper with some real complexity.",Refugio Ranch,Coquelicot
"Like any good Bonarda, this is a tough wine. But on the other hand, it's flush, very dark and full of black-fruit flavors and texture. The nose is piercing but honest, while the palate is big and fleshy, with firm tannins, extract and bright black cherry and blackberry flavors. Thick throughout, with bacony notes to the finish.",Estate Bottled,Dante Robino
"An interesting but questionable value with Patagonian individuality. The nose features clove, wild flowers, leather and hot berry fruit aromas, while the feel is clacky and tannic, and the flavors a little baked and stewy. Raisin, heft and berry soup characteristics make this a ripe, full-bodied force to reckon with.",S,Familia Schroeder
"Dark and dense with thick concentration and big intensity, this opulent Recioto is packed tight with layers of cherry liqueur, dark chocolate, exotic spice and dried prunes or plums. It boasts a chewy, rich quality capped by enduring sweetness and firm tannins.",750 ml,Domìni Veneti
"Crisp and also creamy, this is a soft, ripe wine that also preserves good acidity. It shows the freshness of 2009, while also bringing out a richly herbaceous character.",La Grande Cuvée,Dourthe
"This is a white Rhône blend of Grenache Blanc, Roussanne and Viognier. It's dry and crisply acidic and minerally, with pleasant citrus and peach fruitiness. Think of a cross between a zesty Sauvignon Blanc and a rich Chardonnay.",Red Cedar Vineyard Estate Cuvée Blanc,Clayhouse
"The Grand Estates Merlot holds center court in the vast Columbia Crest portfolio. This new release, which has received extra bottle age, is seamless, smoky, supple and seductive. Exotic sandalwood and Asian spices weave from the nose into the palate, wrapped around broad black cherry and blackberry fruit flavors. A darker streak of black olive and licorice runs into a finish replete with tannins that are tight and hint at stem.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Dark and full-fruited, with coffee, cumin and big berry fruit aromas. This is a pleasant surprise and a great value; the palate is bright and clean, with black-fruit flavors and cola galore. Creamy, mildly toasty and rich on the finish; overall it excels at its price point.",Xplorador,Concha y Toro
"Tight, mineral and closed, packed with dark tannins. The fruit lies behind all this texture, leaving an impression of toughness, the acidity dominant.",Clos des Guettes,Henri de Villamont
"Here's a smoky, oaky Recioto with aromas of exotic spice and toasted nut besides nuances of plum, blackberry, prune and cassis. This inky red dessert wine shows deep extraction and loads of power on the close.",500ml,Monteci
"A rich, ripe, oaky Cabernet, from this ambitious little appellation in the warmer, eastern part of the Santa Ynez Valley. It's nice to drink now for the fine tannins and dry flavors of blackberries, cherries, raspberries and oak.",Grassini Family Vineyard,Foxen 7200
"A well-balanced rich wine, showing the ripe fruit of 2009, giving sweet plums, ripe acidity and some firm, structured tannins. It is even worth aging for a few months.",Domaine de Riaz,Georges Duboeuf
"A beautifully perfumed wine. It has a good edge of firm tannins, but the fruit is so sweet and ripe, packed with strawberry jam flavors. Very seductive, the wood spice gives an extra edge. Drink now, or age for 4_5 years.",,Domaine des Perdrix
"Shows real Riesling character in the dryness, acidity, crisp citrus and mineral and floral flavors that mark this elegant wine. Easy to drink now, with some noble structural features.",La Estancia Vineyard,Pessagno
"Lots of exotic fruits and flowers in this lush Viognier. It's juicy in orange, passion fruit, Asian pear, honeysuckle and cinnamon, yet is bracing with minerals and acidity.",,Pomar Junction
"The typical field blend from Vienna, full and deliciously spicy. It has elegance and style, a wine that waltzes across the palate, offering hints of lychee, pear and crisp citrus all finely integrated by tangy acidity. Screw cap.",Wiener Gemischter Satz,Wieninger
"Luminous and deeply golden in appearance, this pretty dessert wine delivers intense aromas of dried rose, apricot, candied pineapple, honey and slightly roasted almond. Crisp acidity brings the wine's natural sweetness into focus and makes the wine ideal to pair with crème caramel or panna cotta.",El Ré 500ml,Tenuta Solar
"Attractive wine, hinting at the elegance of Chambolle, packed with strawberry-fruit flavors and sweet tannins. There is some final firmness, the acidity mingling with a solid structure.",,Louis Latour
"Opens with rustic, red-fruit and herbal aromas along with smooth leather. The palate is creamy and full, but healthy despite mild buttery oak notes. Flavorwise, we're talking chunky berry and fresh tomato, while the finish is long and correct, with a hint of leftover tomato.",Grand Reserve Limited Edition,Catrala
"This bright Moscato d'Asti opens with full, generous tones of peach, honey, acacia blossom, jasmine and freshly peeled tangerine skin. The rich and foamy mouthfeel would pair with soft cheese on dry rye crackers.",,Tenimenti Ca' Bianca
"There's a youthful, brambly character to this Rosso that appears as dried sage, rosemary, forest berry and wild mushroom. The wine is bright, fresh and streamlined.",,Poggio Antico
"A bit weightier than many Australian versions, this is a pale straw Moscato with a soft, frothy mouthfeel. It's floral on the nose, but mainly citrusy in the mouth, finishing on lime and grapefruit notes. Drink now.",Brilliant Disguise,Two Hands
"Exotic and unusual for value-priced Malbec, with aromas of blueberry and Middle Eastern spice. Feels chunky yet juicy, with good acidity highlighting lightly herbal flavors of plum and tomato. Meaty, round and solid on the finish, with saucy spiciness.",,Rio Perdido
"Charred and burnt-smelling, and those aromas are overpowering although not necessarily bad. Feels big and tannic, with bite to go with dark flavors of bitter coffee, roasted black plum and wild berry. The charred, burnt character that controls the bouquet returns with a fury on the finish.",Reserva,Rioja Vega
"Ruby Hill's Reserve has the requisite pear, lemon and tropical fruit so many Chardonnay lovers adore, and its barrel influence is very strong, both in its richness and creamy body.",Reserve,Ruby Hill Winery
"Peach and apple aromas come with a dose of minerality and a kiss of oak. Feels juicy and fruity, with citric acids pushing bright peach, nectarine and apple flavors. Cleansing on the finish, with mild bitterness.",Family,Salvatore Principe
"Tastes like it was just bottled, with jammy red fruit, sweet licorice, vanilla and spice flavors and a fresh burst of acidity. Almost like it's been frozen in time over the years, but not likely an ager. Drink up with barbecue, ham or pork chops.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,John Tyler
"Fresh raspberry and plum aromas offer an inviting opening that's simple, easy and clean. That's pretty much the wine in a nutshell: it's bright and fresh, with lightly spiced red-berry and plum flavors. Focused and uncomplicated.",Altos de Raiza,Raiza
"Rugged in the mouth, with edgy tannins, this Merlot also features ripe berry-cherry fruit that seems a little sweet. Ready to drink now.",Terraced Hillside Estate,Amizetta
"Basic apple and straw aromas are not that intense but are, at the very least, open and clean. Feels easygoing and nice, with acidity giving it a lift. Tastes dry, with white pepper dust mixed with tropical fruit flavors. Turns more stalky and waxy on the finish.",Roca,Alfredo Roca
"The oak treatment stands out a little in this wine, imparting a dusty, wood-smoke component as well as plenty of vanilla. The cherry fruit is otherwise nicely presented, with ample weight and a touch of creaminess to the texture.",Pure Estate,Anthropology
"Basically dry, this Vermentino is crisp in acidity and forward in lemon, lime and tangerine fruit. It's a nice, easy drinking wine to try as a switch from Sauvignon Blanc and Pinot Grigio.",,Bailiwick
"Earthy and leathery on the bouquet, with a cooked, charred element. Feels drawing but solid, with choppy tannins and flavors of baked berries, herbs and charred oak. Finishes warm and meaty, with an herbal note.",,Bodega Poesia
"This blend of 67% Viognier, 19% Chenin Blanc and 14% Grenache Blanc is crisp and tasty, with forward aromas of pear, hard peach, yellow florals and a touch of oak-driven spice. Roundly structured, with a lush texture and a nice, clean herbal characteristic to the close. Drink now.",The Wolftrap Viognier-Chenin Blanc-Grenache Blanc,Boekenhoutskloof
"Made with late-harvest grapes, this strange dessert wine shares the sweet, syrupy characteristics of a passito and the resiny, caramel-like intensity of Marsala. The wine opens with a dark amber color, aromas of butterscotch and candied chestnut, followed by a sweet, sticky mouthfeel.",Femme Fatale Blumarine,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Almost black in color and still very tannic, even at more than four years of age, this Cabernet is dry and soft in blackberry, cassis, dark chocolate and oak flavors. Despite being made from 100% Cabernet, its aging possibilities seem limited.",Muscatine Vineyards,Hesperian
"Red berry, sweet cherry and ripe plum aromas come with a touch of leather. The palate feels a bit sharp and acidic, with tangy, juicy flavors of plum and wild berry as well as some stalkiness. Cleansing and long on the finish thanks to high acidity.",Andean Culture,Maipe
"A funky edge frames this wine, both on the nose and in the mouth, and adds character to the otherwise straightforward blackberry, boysenberry and fig-preserve core. Cured meat and sweet spice grace the palate and persist through the medium-length close. The blend is 52% Pinotage and 48% Shiraz.",Pinotage-Shiraz,Leopard's Leap
"With a nice, silky texture and flavors of cherries, pomegranates and cola, this Pinot has plenty to like. It loses a few points, though, for unripeness that mutes the fruit and makes the finish sharp.",,Mario Perelli-Minetti
"Solid and straightforward, this refreshing and vibrant Sauv Blanc is light and approachable, with aromas and flavors of lemon, sweet grass and pineapple core throughout. A crowd-pleasing selection for entertaining.",Fantail,Morgenhof
"The easy-to-find Gnarly Head, a blend of 50% Zinfandel, 20% Merlot, 15% Cabernet Sauvignon, 10% Petite Sirah and 3% Syrah, is young and ready to drink.Its fruity nose and peppery spice tmakes it a full-blown crowd pleaser ready for backyard barbecues.",Authentic Red,Gnarly Head
"Oak stands out, bringing buttered toast and butterscotch candy flavors that dominate the underlying pineapple, lemon drop and green apple fruit. Brisk acidity and a tangy minerality add layers of appeal.",,Summerland
Opens with aromas of black cherry and waves of resiny oak. Has good body and grabby barrel tannins along with a palate that deals dark berry flavor and even more oakiness. Tastes resiny and saucy on the finish; cleans up as it airs.,Reserva,Sur de los Andes
"A touch of oak adds some creaminess, but this 100% Sauvignon Blanc is marked mainly by fresh fruit flavors of lemons, limes and oranges. It's zesty in acidity, but could be a little drier.",,Sea Fog
"Light bodied and modest in flavor, with lots of acidity. You find yourself wishing there was more in the way of fruit. Still, it's pretty good for the price, with a nice, silky texture.",,Sebastiani
"Rich, mountainous yet velvety, this affordable Cab offers boysenberry, blackberry and green pepper, and a whiff of baked bread. Perfect for filling people's glasses up at a party.",Maestro,Salvatore Principe
"Clements Hills is an up and coming subregion within Lodi and the grapes for this wine have been sourced from three Clements Hills vineyards. The wine has its rustic side but is also savory, with dark plum and berry fruit flavors and a toasty note at the end. The Chelonian Research Foundation, for which this wine is named, is devoted to the conservation of turtles and tortoises, and portions of the wine's proceeds will be donated.",The Chelonian,Tortoise Creek
"Fresh and a little confected-smelling, then more citrusy and snappy in the mouth, with pink grapefruit and citrusy flavors that make your lips pucker and your palate come alive. Crisp, zesty and well done for Argentine rosé.",La Flor Malbec,Pulenta Estate
"This sweet sparkling wine shows a steady, creamy texture with tangerine mousse, wild flower, honey, peach blossom and soapy foam. The long sweet finish would match well with baked apricot pie.",,Duchessa Lia
"Here's a nice, refreshingly clean Sauvignon Blanc that shows a lot of class for the price. It's basically dry, with a honeyed finish to the green melon, golden mango and Asian pear flavors. There's just a touch of tart green gooseberry for complexity.",,Clayhouse
"A soft wine, its tannins firmly embedded in the sweet black fruit. This is classic young Bordeaux, tannic and dry, of course, but suffused with a fresh, berry fruit character, lightened by acidity.",,Château Lestage Simon
"A blend of old vine wines from the 2005 and 2007 vintages, this brings out a surprisingly mature sophistication in what is normally a simpler fruity grape. It has a smooth, rich character, buoyed by acidity, while offering spice and a light touch of wood.",Rohrendorfer Thalland,Felsner
"Fresh and spritzy, this is almost like drinking the wine straight from the winemaker's fermentation tank__t's that juicy and delicious. Flavors of apple and pear, lightly dusted with cinnamon, are elevated with a zesty, mineral-driven acidity.",Boomtown,Dusted Valley
"This is a good, rich Chardonnay showing lots of tropical fruit and vanilla, smoky oak flavors, and a creamy texture. It's made in the modern style. Not especially complex, but rich and opulent. Drink now.",G.E.O.,Foggy Bridge
"Exuberant in fruit and oak, this Cabernet shows that the Happy Canyon appellation can ripen grapes. It's rich in blackberries and black cherries that taste baked into a pie, alongside buttery toast. Very delicious, but the next step is to build in layers of complexity with aging.",Vogelzang Vineyard,Foxen 7200
"This dry interpretation of the Cartizze cru shows chalky mineral notes with background tones of peach, honey, wild flower and lemon zest. The soft sweetness feels great next to the naturally foamy quality of the mouthfeel.",Cartizze Dry,Andreola
"Recioto is a dark red dessert wine that pairs with chocolate fudge or spongy spice cake. This expression shows loads of dark sweetness and firm fleshiness backed by aromas of cinnamon, clove, cherry candy and blackberry jam.",500ml,Antolini
"A pleasantly rich, vibrant Pinot Noir, made in a lighter style. Shows mouth-filling flavors of raspberries, cherries and toasted oak, with a long, spicy finish. Bright acidity makes for a clean, crisp feel.",,Artesa
"This Rhône-style blend contains a few drops of Petite Sirah. The wine is quite good, being dry and full-bodied and complex enough to linger over as it warms and changes in the glass. Shows interesting currant, pepper and cedar flavors, with a robust finish.",The Butler,Bonterra
"Ripe and soft wine, flavored with prune and black plums and a sweet jelly flavor. The wine has open, soft tannins and some good ripeness.",Domaine Adélie Champs Martin Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"A finely structured wine that has firm tannins to go with the ripe juicy red fruits. Bitter cherry and crisp acidity fit easily together, while the dry core comes out strongly in the aftertaste.",Château de Nervers,Georges Duboeuf
"Full in the mouth, this is a rich and easy wine, packed with jammy fruit. It is soft, the plum flavors rounded and only light brushed by tannin and acidity.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Red cherry flavors dominate this fruity wine. Its soft texture and sweet juiciness are given backbone by a light tannic element. It's ready to drink, a rich and dense wine with joyful acidity.",,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
"Very firm and tannic, with dark fruits creep in between dense, firm tannins. This is typical Pommard that shows more tannins at this stage, but in the next two years will develop the texture into richness.",,Henri de Villamont
"This is a good Sauvignon Blanc whose touch of oak adds smoky cream and vanilla. The underlying wine shows Lake County balance, with citrus, lemongrass, peach and green apple flavors accented by crisp acidity, and finished with honey.",Vintner's Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"Herbaceous aromas are balanced against a strong core of black fruit and berries. A touch of anise and roasted espresso beans add intrigue to the bouquet, while accents of licorice sticks, clove and whole black peppercorns carry the finish. A very well balanced wine with solid weight and appropriate medium grain tannins.",Art House,Juno
"High acidity and soft tannins mark this flavorful red, an unusual blend of Tempranillo and Grenache. It's a little on the sweet side, but the raspberry, cherry, mocha and oak flavors are delicious.",Tempranillo-,Tejada
"This is intended as an Amarone-style wine, made from half Sangiovese and half Barbera. The alcohol hits almost 17%, yet it is quite dry. Though not especially Amarone-like to this taster, it is an interesting, well-made wine that approaches Port-like intensity without either sugar or spirits.",Seccopassa 'Appassimento',Tre Nova
"This dark Recioto dessert wine opens with an inky black color and intense aromas of chocolate fudge, rum cake, Christmas spice, Spanish cedar and mesquite. In the mouth, the wine is thick, sweet and astringent at the same time, so pair it with pudding or chocolate cream cake.",Acinatico 500ml,Stefano Accordini
"Recioto is a dark red dessert wine from northeast Italy that pairs with chocolate-based treats and spice cake. Indeed, aromas include clove, cinnamon, prune, blackberry pie and sweet pipe tobacco. The wine's natural sweetness is backed by structure and fine tannins.",750ml,San Rustico
"There's loads of personality here. Verduzzo does beat to its own drum with unique aromas of pine cone, chopped peppermint, candied fruit and loads of floral lavender honey.",Ramandolo 750ml,Bernardis
"A light-colored wine from the hot Thermenregion south of Vienna; a blend of Zweigelt and St. Laurent. It has a Pinot Noir-like softness, allied to fresh acidity and flavors of raspberries. For consumption now. Screw cap.",Schellmann An der Südbahn,Loimer
"Delicious berry fruits, now softening and rounding out, with a light note of acidity. The wine is immediately accessible and attractive, the tannins soft and the fruits edging on sweet.",Le Village,Henri de Villamont
"The tannins are very present, forming a dark and tight layer over the blackberry fruits. The style is chunky and solid, but with enough fruit to offer good development.",,Henri de Villamont
"Henri de Villamont has a range of wines from Chambolle-Musigny, of which this is the simple village wine. It has big-hearted fruit, black-berry juice and red- cherry flavors, and an elegant final texture.",,Henri de Villamont
"Attractive, luscious fruits are balanced by acidity and tannins. There is just a hint of green, and the black currant and mineral texture give a chewy, firm aftertaste.",Le Village,Henri de Villamont
"Firmly structured, this is a significant improvement on 2007, with the wood kept in play but not dominant. That's because the fruit is so bright, with juicy berries bubbling along, leaving refreshing acidity at the end.",Château Cheval Noir,Mähler-Besse
"This Merlot is very tannic now, which makes it hard to drink. There are considerable cherry, berry, currant, mineral and herb flavors, but they're buried under a ton of astringency. You're best off giving the wine a good four years in the cellar to let it age it a bit.",Estate,Bravante
"The DSM sparklers all come in a fancy package, all are méthode champenoise, all finished with a wire cage and Champagne cork. This is quite yeasty, with a pretty toasted coconut flavor that spices up the fruit. Primarily Chardonnay, it has no perceptible residual sugar.",Blanc de Blancs,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"Medium weight and easygoing, this blend of 32% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Malbec, 11% Petit Verdot, 7% Cab Franc, 6% Petite Sirah and 4% Merlot has modest tannins and cranberry flavors and will both please a crowd and pair with a wide range of foods.",The Spur,Murrieta's Well
"Very ripe and flashy, but a little too sweet. Shows sugary raspberry and cherry jam flavors, with lots of zippy acidity.",,Rusack
"This is a good Merlot for the price, showing black cherry, prune, unsweetened chocolate and herb flavors, wrapped into smooth but firm tannins. Production is 6,000 cases.",Reserve Selection,Raymond
"Fruity and friendly on the nose, with composure and solid aromas. Feels both plump and dry, with toasty black-fruit flavors accented by peppery spice that turns slightly bitter on the finish. Good and dark overall, with limited follow-through on the finish.",,Pampano
"Made from estate grapes, this blend of all five Bordeaux varieties shows the hard tannins and minerality that characterize Howell Mountain reds. However, it's surprisingly soft and its blackberries and currants are modest in scale, making it a sound wine for drinking now, but not for aging.",Estate Vineyards,Burgess
"A fresh wine with red cherry fruits giving a bright character, the tannins soft and with attractive acidity. It is lightly textured and should be ready to drink in 1_2 years.",,Domaine Moillard
"A rich yellow fruit- and pepper-dominated wine. It is rounded, ripe and soft, with a maturity that gives flavors of almonds, nutmeg and light acidity.",Métiss,Domaine Bott-Geyl
"Dry, minerally and acidic, this Chardonnay offers pineapple, lemon and mineral flavors. It's a food-friendly wine that won't compete with what you eat. At this price, it's a good restaurant wine, and easy to find, with 7,500 cases produced.",Estate,Black Stallion
"Floral and lightly earthy on the nose, with a touch of latex. Feels fresh and pure, with fine acidity pressing bright flavors of red cherry and raspberry. Gets toastier and darker on the finish, ending with spice and clarity.",Loriñon Crianza,Bodegas Breton
"Bright red mixed berries are infused with a mocha streak, filling the medium weight, but juicy palate. Straightforward and enjoyable with clean fruit flavors and a short but softly spiced finish.",The Wolftrap Syrah-Mourvèdre-Viognier,Boekenhoutskloof
"Smooth and almost creamy, this simple sipper has cherries and chocolate in abundance. The flavors of vanilla and tobacco are also prominent.",,Kirkland Signature
"A Bordeaux blend based on Merlot, this is a pretty good wine for drinking now. It's soft and fruity, with cherry, mocha, spice and oak flavors.",Jane,J Ludlow
"This is a fresh, grapefruity wine, accented by fresh cut grass and green herbs. It's nicely proportioned and medium bodied, with a tart, slightly pithy edge to the finish. Drink now.",Tic Tok,James Oatley
"Loaded with honey, marzipan, peach and exotic fruit, this special expression of Moscato d'Asti delivers a thick, creamy feel in the mouth with foamy mousse and soapy intensity. Pair this with sugary almond cookies.",San Michele,Bersano
"Made from organic grapes, Yorkville's light-bodied Merlot is dry and herbal, with cedar in spades rounded out by elegant plum and chocolate softness. This vintage has 10% Cabernet Sauvignon as well, and would match well with lighter meats, like chicken.",Rennie Vineyard,Yorkville Cellars
"This Tuscan rosé made using Sangiovese grapes opens with a pink-purplish color and bright aromas of rose, cranberry and wild forest berry. There's a pretty touch of bitter almond on the close.",,Salcheto
"On the nose, there's an early whiff of nail polish that resolves itself in jammy black fruit aromas. Good on the palate, with just enough acidic grab in front of a full blast of berry flavors and an aftershock of chocolate. Finishes grapy.",Killka Collection,Salentein
"Fleshy peach, melon and pineapple aromas on the nose. Feels lifted and fresh, and decidedly not oaky, with citrusy orange and nectarine flavors. Fruity, round and easy on the finish.",Oak Cask,San Felipe
"Made using Moscato Rosa, this is a unique dessert wine that opens with a deep ruby color and bright aromas of wild berry and white chocolate. Smooth, sweet and thick, it also shows a touch of tannic firmness on the close.",Praepositus Moscato Rosa,Abbazia di Novacella
"Lots of ripe, forward citrus, tropical fruit, melon and peach flavors in this slightly sweet Sauvignon Blanc. A bit of oak brings a nice smoky creaminess. More controversial is the green, gooseberry tartness that will divide wine lovers into pro and con.",,Lola Kay
"There's something off in the aroma, which is herbal and peppery. Turns richer once you take a sip, with pleasantly dry, crisp cherry candy, white pepper and oak flavors. The vineyard is in a cool site, and it tastes like the grapes were not fully ripe. A disappointment after so many great bottlings from MacRostie.",Wildcat Mountain Vineyard,MacRostie
"This is a good, everyday Sauvignon Blanc. It's sweet and jammy in pineapples, grapefruits, peaches and tangerines, brightened with crisp acidity.",,J Ludlow
"The vineyard is in Coombsville, a cool part of the valley that recently received official recognition as an AVA. The wine, which was made from 100% Cabernet, is soft, sweet and oaky, showing simple blackberry, cherry and anise flavors.",Harry's Vineyard,Hesperian
"Concentrated and dark upfront, with black fruit, coffee, chocolate and cheese aromas. Full and extracted in the mouth, as flavors of charred wood, blackberry and black pepper take over. Turns hot and darker on the finish, where bitter chocolate and peppercorn flavors rise up.",Reserva,Las Perdices
"Rustic on the nose, with scents of dried herbs and grass that mingle with pretty rose and tea-leaf notes, this wine is an unusual blend of Turkish _küzgözü and Boazkere grapes with Syrah and Petit Verdot. Full bodied and soft on the palate, with ripe, red-fruit and mocha-chocolate flavor, it finishes with a coating of furry tannins.",Imperial,Kayra
"Huge flavors of jammy blackberries and cherries dominate this Syrah, with a coating of sweet, caramelized oak. It's yummy, but not especially complex. Drink now.",Home Vineyard,Manzoni
"There aren't many 2003 wines available today, and this raisin and red fruit flavored wine shows plenty of attractive ripe flavors. Dried fruits dominate, giving the wine a Port-like richness, the tannins now comfortably integrated in the texture.",Beaumont,Domaine Guillot-Broux
"Char and hickory override fruit on the bouquet, while the palate is full, round and falls into form with time in the glass. Tastes of forward oak and spice along with berry and plum fruit. Toasty and warm on the finish, but oaky and resiny.",La Florencia,Familia Cassone
"A good value selection, with green notes of bell pepper, asparagus and lime on the nose and in the mouth. Lightweight, with good lift and a herbal character that lingers on the finish.",,Glen Erskine
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, Gròttolo is a Tuscan rosé that would pair with shellfish or fresh pasta with grilled vegetables. The wine is layered with bright fruit, cranberry and a touch of fresh acidity.",Gròttolo,Collemassari
"On the austere side, as befits a wine from the highest vineyards in Beaujolais, this is also balanced and elegant. It shows black berry fruits, a firm edge of tannins as well as delicious juicy flavors.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"There's plenty to enjoy here__mooth, supple, forward black fruits, aged in 100% new oak. Fragrant, approachable, and medium-bodied, it fades into a finish with hints of chalk and herb.",Chalk Line Red,Guardian Cellars
"A pretty rose/salmon color, scented with cinnamon spice. Done as a saignée, barrel-fermented and bone-dry, this is delicate and yet persistent, with ripe peach highlights.",The Endless Road,Darby
"Very elegant for a Nuits-Saint-Georges, with the freshest possible fruits. The structural element and the tannins show through right at the end.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"This well-defined Cabernet offers blackberry, black cherry and a hint of sweet grape jam. It's set in a frame of rock and tannin, that seems to catch and hold as it enters the back of the throat. Perhaps an indication that more bottle age, or some hours of decanting, are in order? In any event, it stops a bit short.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"With the largest production in the entire Northwest, it is important that this wine express clean, varietal flavors with characteristic brightness and focus. And it does. Lightly herbal, fresh and clean, its fruit flavors suggest lemongrass, orange and ripe apple. Excellent balance and persistence",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A satisfyingly rich wine, with dusty tannins and a chunky, fruity structure. It has plenty of the typical black currant flavors of 2008, spiced with new wood. Ripe enough to drink now, but it will age.",,Château Trois Moulins
"Shows the aggressive tannins that often mark this unruly variety, but that's part of the charm. It's a big, potent wine, muscular in blackberry, black currant, leather and black pepper flavors, and best of all it's dry without high alcohol. A very nice wine to drink now with barbecue or beef stew made with the wine or one similar to it.",Signature Selection Plummer Vineyard,Bianchi
"At this stage, the wood element is too dominant. However, the attractive bright berry fruits should soon push through to give what will be a firm but fruity wine. It needs 4_6 years aging to soften its edges and provide delicious drinking.",,Château Fonréaud
"This expression shows lightness, freshness and clear luminosity; Delivers creamy, foamy bubbles with bright aromas of peach, honey and citrus.",Extra Dry,Villa Sandi
"James Mantone's white wines are always full of delicious fruits, but they go beyond that, bringing in sometimes exotic, often surprising grace notes. Here there is a pure thread of caraway, running through the melon and white peach core. It's 100% Roussanne, giving a rare and interesting glimpse into what specific identity the grape might have in Washington's future.",,Syncline
"Despite all the graphics and obscure references on the front and back labels, this is ultimately a very good wine and a value among under-$15 Malbecs. The Three Thieves team has bottled a creamy, oak-rich Malbec with full red-berry, spice and cocoa flavors. It's soft, subtle and smooth, but tastes and finishes properly.",,The Show
"This bright and fruity take on the southern Rhône grape is packed with fresh, tangy raspberry flavor, tight and balanced.",Vineyard Select,Olsen Estates
"A smooth red blend, mostly Cabernet and Syrah, with familiar vanilla and black-tea flavors. The soft red fruits are wrapped in licorice and coffee, and the tannins has been polished.",Manitou Red,Rolling Bay Winery
"Fritz Wieninger's blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Zweigelt is a perennial favorite. With its soft tannins and ripe, juicy full-bodied fruit, it is an elegant, stylish, drink-now wine. Screw cap.",Wiener Triologie,Wieninger
"A good, somewhat rustic Cabernet to drink now. It's nicely dry, with fine, softly intricate tannins, and the flavors are ripe in black currants and chocolate. Drink now.",Reserve,Castle Rock
"Though excessively foamy, once it settles down this wine has a pretty pale copper shade, and a hint of strawberry and cherry in the fruit flavor. It's dry and delicate, with a clean, persistent finish.",Blanc de Noirs,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"Made in a honey-sweet style, but the acidity is excellent, and balances the richness so that the finish is dry and clean. The flavors are very ripe in peaches, Key lime pie and vanilla custard. A nice cocktail sipper.",,Coquelicot
"A far better wine than the previous vintage. This is big, beefy and clean, with bacon on the nose. The palate is perky, zesty and high in acidity, and thus the flavors of cherry and plum are forward and alert. Finishes with snap and pop as it begs for pizza, grilled chicken or a hamburger off the grill.",,Espiritu de Argentina
"The blend includes 6% Syrah, and the wine has a pretty plum and blueberry color, that (perhaps by the power of suggestion) carries through into the aromas. It's tight, tart, and clean, offering a mix of berry fruits and a finish lined with vanilla and tobacco. Overall the balance is excellent, the wine juicy and fresh, and the blend just about perfect.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"Finished with a little oak, this Chardonnay features buttered toast and vanilla flavors on top of the pineapple, tropical fruit and sweet honey notes. It's a nice, stylishly rich wine to drink now.",,Hook & Ladder
"There is no question about the wood here. It dominates the aroma and the palate, burying the fruit in a smooth, vanilla character. It is a pleasure to drink, but seems to have removed itself from Beaujolais.",Cuvée Elevé en Fût de Chêne,Georges Duboeuf
"More exotic than many Malbecs, with intriguing aromas of prune, moss and savory berry. The palate has a proper, likeable texture and jammy flavors of black cherry and herbs. Finishes a bit short and hollow, which may be a reflection of tough harvest conditions in 2008.",Remolinos Vineyard,Finca Decero
"This concentrated and syrupy dessert wine opens with thick, slightly cloying aromas of candied fruit, white raisin, dried prune, maple and almond nut. It tastes sweet and heavy in the mouth, although there is a much-needed prickle of acidity on the close.",Rodon Maso delle Rose 375ml,Josef Weger
"The grapes sure got ripe, offering palate-flattering flavors of cherries, raspberries and blackberries. And there's lots of pretty oak. The next step for this ambitious bottling is to build in layers of complexity. Drink now.",Range 30 West,Foxen 7200
"It's a fine wine, full-bodied and dry, with spicy flavors of currants, teriyaki beef, black pepper and cola, with a bracing minerality that grounds the richness. Could be more concentrated, but it's a great value.",Lot 156,Cameron Hughes
"This is a good wine to drink if you want a modestly elegant Chardonnay to serve alongside food, instead of a big, oaky sweetie. It's dry and crisp and clean, with pleasantly rich flavors of citrus fruits, peaches, green apples, minerals and vanilla. Easy to find, with 17,000 cases produced.",Estate,Alexander Valley Vineyards
"Made with the native Raboso grape, this sports a dark, inky color and smoky aromas of exotic spice, wood shaving, nutmeg, dark fruit, tobacco and prune. The sugar content is high, although this wine doesn't taste too heavy or syrupy. In fact, it boasts some nice crispiness as well.",Passito 500ml,Bonotto delle Tezze
"Here's a fresh and attractive unoaked Chardonnay with vibrant flavors of pear, sweet clementine, yellow florals and crunchy peach. There's an impression of effervescence from the forward acidity, and the finish is long but remarkably crisp.",Sans Barrique,Bouchard Finlayson
"This field blend from the Nussdorf vineyard on the slopes above Vienna is a typical light, crisp wine. It has lively apple flavors, touched with some spice and a bright aftertaste. Screw cap.",Wiener Nussdorf Gemischter Satz,Stift Klosterneuburg
"Rooty and mildly sweet on the nose, then tight and zesty in the mouth, with crisp red-fruit flavors and citrusy snap. Feels entirely lean and crisp, even a bit tangy. But sometimes fresh, basic Rioja has its place.",Old Vines,Carlos Serres
"Coconut, vanilla and dill aromas sit on top of solid berry scents to form a classic Rioja bouquet. Feels fresh and agile, with acidity that allows the wine to dance around on the palate. Tastes of red plum, raspberry, mint and spice. Seems oaky on the finish, but lively.",Crianza,Viña Eguía
"This dark Rosso opens with aromas of dark fruit and bramble, with subtle background hints of wild mushroom and cured meat. Endnotes of crushed black pepper and crushed clove bring up the rear.",La Togata,Tenuta Carlina
"From a well-regarded site in the Horse Heaven Hills, this pure Malbec is clean and well-proportioned, but a bit on the simple side. Plain red fruit flavors, accented with light barrel notes, quickly fade on the delicate finish.",Phinny Hill Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"A standard Cabernet, dry and tannic. The best thing is the deep core of blackberry, currant, mineral and spice flavors. Drink now_2014.",,Q
"Smells sort of furry and earthy initially, with notes of graphite and woodspice. Feels narrow and grabby, with pointed acididty framing red plum, cherry and lightly oaky, minty flavors. Fits the definition of good but regular Malbec.",Reserva,Ruca Malen
"This fresh expression of Sangiovese Grosso offers tight berry aromas, with shades of spice and toasted almond in the background. Bright acidity brings up the rear.",,San Polo
"Big and ponderous for a Pinot Noir, almost like Grenache, it's so full-bodied and rich in cherries, mocha, anise and spices. Delicious in its way, but lacks Pinot finesse and subtlety. Drink up.",Bella Vigna Vineyard,Whetstone
"Inky and superconcentrated on the bouquet, with grapey fruit notes and density to spare. Feels grabby and angular, with some astringency to the tannins and huge flavors of black plum, blackberry and iodine. Thick and sticky on the finish; ripe to the max.",Reserve,Zolo
"Sweet, fragrant and beautifully intense, this bright Moscato d'Asti would pair with fruit salad or sponge cake with fresh strawberries and whipped cream. The close is creamy and frothy.",Monteolivo,Bersano
"The cardinal rules of Moscato d'Asti are frothy mousse, fragrant floral aromas and a simple mouthfeel. Cardinale Lanata follows them all and this bright dessert wine would pair with pastries or meringues.",Cardinale Lanata,Villa Lanata
"Jammy and dusty smelling, with black fruit notes, a touch of plastic and mild scratchiness. Feels tight and grating, with red-fruit flavors that are snappy and tempered by sweet oak notes. Finishes scratchy and tannic, with berry, pepper and licorice flavors.",,Doña Silvina
"White floral aromas are pure and fresh in this apple-inflected Romanian Riesling. Soft on the palate, with restrained acidity and a delicate, almost lacy structure, it finishes with a hint of powdered sugar sweetness.",Heavenly Retreat Semi-sweet,Cramele Recas
"An odd blend of Pinot Noir, Sangiovese and Merlot that starts out with aromas of bramble, brick dust and baked berries. Feels tannic and grabby initially, before spreading out wide and flat. Tastes stewy and herbal, with chocolate and spice notes. Probably strained and strange for the average consumer. 600 cases made.",Blend Edición Limitada,Cicchitti
"Coldstream Hills is better known for its Chardonnays and Pinot Noirs than its Sauvignon Blanc, but this is a solid effort. It's medium in body, with simple grapefruit and pineapple flavors and a crisp, clean finish.",,Coldstream Hills
"Ripe and jammy, with blackberry, coffee, currant and cedar flavors, wrapped into firm tannins. It's a bit rustic. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot.",French Connection,EOS
"Another faintly copper-hued Pinot Grigio from the Oatley family, this one offers modest apple, melon and citrus notes, medium body and a slightly tannic edge to the tart, lemony finish. Drink now.",Tic Tok,James Oatley
"Direct and fruity, with blackberry and blueberry flavors, wrapped into rugged tannins. Finishes a little sweet. Drink over the next few years.",,Judd's Hill
An inexpensive Merlot that's herbal. It also shows cranberry and menthol amid a light toasting of oak.,,Brass Tacks
"A medicinal quality comes at you right away, followed by chocolate-coated cherry, creamy oak and a distant note of paint or chemical. Feels round and voluminous, with minty, rubbery flavors of oaky, berry and chocolate. Finishes dry and oaky, with a buttery aftertaste.",Reserve,Caligiore
"Tastes harsh and tannic, with extracted blackberry fruit that's so ripe, it veers into sweet raisins. Pretty rustic, but gets the Cabernet job done.",,Beringer
"Here's a cheerful, fresh and fragrant sparkling Asti with bright aromas of white flower, ginger, stone fruit and lemon soda. There's a zesty touch of fresh spice or white pepper on the creamy finish.",,Bersano
"At the equivalent of about $6 a bottle, this is a good buy. It's made in the popular Chardonnay style, with pineapple, peach and spice flavors accented by smoky oak.",,Black Box
"There's a meaty quality to this Rosso that comes across as candied fruit, plum cake, leather, spice and moist earth. Drink now.",,La Torre
"This 50-50 blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay is a light-bodied, crisply focused wine. Lime and green apple notes dominate.",Wine Lovers,Tamburlaine
"Very ripe and fruity, like the essence of blackberry and cherry jam in liquid form, with a sprinkle of anise, pepper, cocoa and cinnamon. Delicious, yes, but rather sweet and simple. Drink now.",,One Hope
"Here's a well-proportioned Rosso that shows notes of fresh raspberry and cherry, with an easy consistency and crisp acidity. The wine's mouthfeel is lean and crisp.",,Villa Poggio Salvi
"Skin-driven red fruit characteristics abound on the nose, alongside soft vanilla and purple floral accents. Cherry and mulberry flavors dominate in the lightly-structured mouth, and the wine closes with a mouthwatering freshness.",Shiraz-Mourvèdre-Viognier,Robertson Winery
"Starts with aromas of black cherry and kirsch, but turns stalky and stemmy fairly quickly. Feels crisp and a bit hard for a reserva, with herbal, zesty flavors of roasted red berry. Falls off on the finish, but maintains good quality.",Reserva,Viña Palaciega
This pale pink sparkling wine offers easy aromas of sweet raspberry and pink grapefruit. It's a rosé sparkler made from Moscato grapes that will pair well with fruit ice cream or panna cotta with fresh forest berries.,Mochetto Pink,Vino dei Fratelli
"An enticing apple aroma sets the scene for a fresh, crisp and deliciously refreshing sparkling wine. It preserves the natural acidity of the Grüner Veltliner, while adding a literally bubbly character, breezy, perfect for an apéritif.",Brut,Szigeti
"There's a nice minerality to this wine, with ripe and juicy aromas of citrus, honeydew and soft white florals. The mouth is tightly structured with flavors of sweet citrus, green berries and white strawberry hull. Balanced and clean with the medium weight mouth countered by appropriately zesty acidity.",,Mulderbosch
"Juicy cranberry and pie cherry fruit brings this wine into clear focus. There is an underpinning of wet cement that comes across in the mid-palate, a sort of a stone wall that the fruit can't quite overcome. It fades into an astringent, tannic finish, still buoyed by those juicy acids.",Reserve,Snoqualmie
"Fairly pungent and lively for an '09, with citric, grapefruit aromas. The palate is still fairly vivid and driving, and the flavors of lemon-lime and green apple are true if a touch pithy. Just zesty enough on the finish, but it's starting to fade. Drink now.",Reserva,TerraNoble
"This Brut expression offers ripe melon aromas, bright citrus tones and touches of roasted nut and baked bread. The wine is full and luscious on the close.",Monti Lessini Brut,Riondo
"Very high in alcohol, to the tune of nearly 16%, making this Zin hot and also rather sweet, an impression that may be reinforced with residual sugar. It's made in that big, Porty style, with dried fruit and chocolate flavors.",Cemetery Vineyard,Mauritson
"There is plenty of green tea flavor running through the fruit and the tannins here, along with dark cherry and bitter chocolate. A rustic, rough, but perfectly enjoyable take on pure Cab Franc.",,Willow Crest
"Here's a clean and tonic Moscato d'Asti from the Santo Stefano Belbo area of the Astigiano (a first-rate growing area) that shows lively aromas of honey, peach and white flower. It shows great harmony and personality and is capped by lovely, creamy foam.",,Bosio
"Dark hints of charred oak and cola accent bright berry aromas, while the palate is marked by bold berry and black cherry flavors and a whack of vanilla. It's a medium-bodied red that comes across as a bit hard-edged because of its acidity despite having rather soft tannins. Drink now.",Cricket Pitch Cabernet Sauvignon-Shiraz-Merlot-Petit Verdot,Brokenwood
"Here's a big, inky dessert wine, sporting a dark garnet, almost black color, with masculine aromas of mesquite wood, barbecue sauce, root beer, prune and jammy blackberry. Take your first sip and you are suddenly hit by the wine's tannic structure and mellowing sweetness.",500ml,Fabiano
"Rich cola, pomegranate, rhubarb, cherry, currant, tomato and flashy oak flavors in this dry Pinot Noir, and it has a nice, silky texture. Feels a bit heavy and one-dimensional, though, and seems to be showing its best, so drink now.",Amber Ridge Vineyard,Furthermore
"There's a fine force of tannin here, giving the wine weight and structure. This balances well with red berry fruits, a light citrus edge and final juicy acidity.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Le Arele is a woody, smoky red dessert wine with firm tannins behind chewy, sweet notes of mature blackberry, cherry, nutmeg, clove and ginger. Pair this wine with chewy chocolate brownies.",Le Arele 500ml,Giuseppe Lonardi
"This is a pretty, polished wine to drink now with a nice steak. It's soft and rich in jammy cherry, berry and spice flavors. Earns extra credit for sheer lusciousness and drinkability.",,Hauck
"Shows extra creamy foaming and rich, persistent bubbling. Beyond the soapy perlage are aromas of sweet stone fruit, apricot, honey; there's a piquant touch of chopped mint on the close.",Millesimato Dry,Costaruél
"Tropical and ripe with aromas and flavors of gooseberry, soft lychee, rose petals and orange blossom. Attractive and easy to drink with moderate acidity and a clean, medium length finish.",,De Grendel
"A mongrel blend of Syrah, Sangiovese, Grenache and Cabernet Franc, this fruity red has a sweet core of blueberry jam, round and forward and quite appealing. It's dusted with baking spices and fades gently into a soft finish. Hard to imagine a more agreeable bottle of Washington red at this price.",Two Vines Vineyard 10 Red Wine,Columbia Crest
"Starts out with leathery, cheesy aromas and then the nose transitions to heft, prune and blackberry. The palate is good but feels a touch flat, with sweet, candied black-fruit flavors. Falls off some on the finish, which tastes slightly milky. Sweet and mostly ripe, but as a whole it doesn't seem to be 100% there.",AR Guentota,Belasco de Baquedano
"This 100% Tempranillo is soft and silky and vibrant in acidity, with pretty flavors of red cherries, raspberries and bacon. A nice wine to drink now with ham, sausage and similar salty, umami-rich fare.",Viva Tu!,Bodegas Paso Robles
"This extra dry expression opens with grassy tones of herb, white flower and loads of stone fruit. There's a touch of sweetness on the fade, but otherwise this bubbly offers a clean, tonic close.",Extra Dry,Bortolotti
"This is a very good blend from Paso Robles, showing the region's ability to ripen red grapes. It's a little on the soft side, but robust tannins provide good structure to the cherry, berry, beef jerky and pepper flavors. Drink now for freshness.",Ame de la Vigne,Le Vigne di Domenico
"Defines Paso Robles Petite Sirah with its soft, luxurious texture and wonderfully ripe fruit. Blackberry and cherry-pie filling, cola, beef jerky and sandalwood flavors flood the mouth, and are perfectly dry and moderate in alcohol. Drink now for sheer lusciousness.",,Le Vigne di Domenico
"When a young Pinot Noir is dominated by oak, as this one is, it's a little worrying. Will the oak be absorbed in time, or will it always be excessive? This young wine has pleasant cherry, black raspberry and cola flavors, but the oak seems to have the upper hand. Drink soon.",Estate Grown,Pfendler
"An elegant, ready to drink Riesling, with peach and flowery white currants. The texture shows the natural minerality of the grape, leaving a wine with a bright tang of acidity.",Franzhauser,Stift Klosterneuburg
"This Pinot Blanc is creamy smooth and soft, with a delicious line in peach acidity and lively green fruits. Crisp, ready to drink, and very fresh.",Jungherrn,Stift Klosterneuburg
"This 100% Syrah is a little too soft and melted, and lacks a solid structure. But the flavors are really delicious in raspberry- and cherry-pie filling, mocha and sandalwood.",Red Red Wine,Topanga
"Tart and juicy, showing primary raspberry and strawberry fruit flavor, bold and forward. The generous natural acids provide a tangy base to the fruit, and make it especially food friendly. Best consumed young.",Bonatello,Tre Nova
"Chunky, rubbery and leathery on the nose, but there's plenty of berry fruit, too. For an $11 wine, the palate is lush and plump, with big tannins and full flavors of roasted cherry, plum, herbs and tomato. Finishes long and persistent, but fresh. Interesting and nicely done for Chilean Cab Franc.",Cabernet Franc Carmenère,oops
"Pop the cork and let it breathe for an hour before drinking, as this wine needs some time to open up and show it's true colors. Cassis, black pepper, mocha, balsamic reduction and a hint of tar unfold in the bouquet. The medium acidity and tight tannins take firm hold of your palate and linger through the finish.",Organic,Org de Rac
"Stocky, meaty and full on the nose, and despite a hint of leafy, herbal green it's a more than solid offering. Black cherry and herbal flavors are generous, while the finish is full and competent. Shows good overall quality and solidity compared to prior vintages.",Selected Terroir,Santa Ema
"Fresh, piquant and bright, this Moscato d'Asti opens with slightly green aromas of wild flower, cut grass, wild sage and dried hay. The wine is plush and creamy, with a long, sweet endnote that recalls honey, marzipan and peach.",San Maurizio,Cantina Vallebelbo
"There's a sweet, sticky quality to this Moscato d'Asti that would match cream puddings or cooked fruit desserts. Fragrant aromas of yellow flower, honey, apricot and tangerine emerge on the bouquet.",,Vino dei Fratelli
A vin de pays from the hinterland of Burgundy. It is light and layered with intense red cherry acidity to give a fresh wine that can be drunk now.,Terres Burgondes,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"Oddly perfumed and flowery smelling, with peach and orange notes. Feels jumpy and unfocused, with sweet, almost candied flavors of melon and pineapple. Creamy oak rises up on the finish, where it matches up against stone fruit flavors.",Phebus Reserva,Fabre Montmayou
"Butterscotch and pineapple and peach jam flavors mark this Chardonnay. Fortunately, it's balanced with crisp acidity and a certain minerality. It's an obvious crowd pleaser, and would score higher except for the seemingly sweet finish.",,Garnet
"This majority Zin with 18% Petite Sirah is a popular, widely available choice for many Zin loves. Its concentrated fists of sweetness__anilla and cherry-based mostly__re hits with many consumers.",Old Vine,Gnarly Head
"This is a softly delicious red wine. It's strong and jammy in raspberries, cherries and milk chocolate, and is a little sweet, with a spicy finish. Nice barbecue wine. Mainly Zinfandel, with Petite Sirah, Petit Verdot and a few others.",First Timer,DC Flynt MW Selections
"Peach, scented candle wax and matchstick make for a solid bouquet. Feels good, maybe a touch cloying, but not too much. Flavors of crystallized mango and pineapple mix with fresh melon, and the finish is clean. About all you could hope for from an $8 Argentine Moscato.",,Casa de Campo
"Foamy, creamy and rich, this sweet sparkler opens with easy aromas of tangerine skin, jasmine and dried ginger. Fruit is sourced in Puglia, southern Italy and there is in fact a warm, ripe quality to the intense sweetness.",,Bosio
"A light and cherry-fresh Pinot Noir that has soft tannins, some herbal fruit and a juicy aftertaste. It shows intense acidity as well as final red berry fruits.",,Maurice Ecard
"Packaged in an electric blue bottle, Bella Bollè is a soft, foamy sweet sparkler with bright aromas of peach blossom, dried ginger, sage, white flower and musky soap. The quality of the bubbles is creamy and rich.",,Bella Bollè
"Here's a frothy and fresh Moscato d'Asti with fragrant aromas of honey, stone fruit and fragrant flower available at a competitive price. The wine is sweet and bright with a soapy touch of dried lavender on the close.",,Cantina Vallebelbo
"Perry Creek's popular, well-priced Zinman shows off leathery, cola spice and blackberry flavors and fruit that's just at the precipice between ripe and overripe nice structure.",Zinman,Perry Creek
"This is a simple, fruity wine whose berry and spice flavors have some appeal. It's soft and sweet.",Collection,Stonegate
"Crusty, rubbery aromas smell a bit burnt, while leather and berry aromas, rest below the surface. The palate is full, edgy and a little tangy, with red plum, herb and tomato flavors. Mild and saucy tasting on the finish.",Reserva,Tamarí
"It opens with raisin and stewed aromas, so its freshness is questionable. In the mouth, it's actually round, subtle and fairly well structured, with oaky vanilla accenting lightly herbal berry and cassis flavors. Herbal as well on the finish, with a lasting flavor of coffee.",Gran Reserva,Tango Re_l
"Opens with minerally, almost metallic aromas, along with rubber and berry mixed in. Feels fresh and ready, with plum, berry and chocolaty flavors. Finishes with a smooth feel, but maybe it could use a bit more cut and tannic structure. A wine that falls squarely in the middle zone.",Clasico,Tierra Prometida
"Sweet and forward in pineapple, peach and lime flavors, this is a blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay. It has good acidity and a clean, spicy finish.",,Turn 4
"A sound Cabernet, fruit-forward and somewhat one-dimensional, with cherry, blackberry and raspberry fruit. Oak adds sweet notes of caramel.",,Sebastiani
"With 12 months spent in French oak, this wine offers rounded notes of boysenberry and cassis framed by hints of purple florals and sweet spice. There's a lively lift to the fruit in the mouth, driving the palate to a clean and juicy finish. Drink now.",Roodewyn,Rooiberg
"A good, everyday Zinfandel, robust in blackberry, raisin and chocolate flavors, wrapped into firm tannins. With its sweet finish, it will be a good companion to tomato-based barbecue.",Estate,Quackenbush
"Sweet blackberry and blueberry notes are deeply concentrated on the nose and palate of this Ukrainian semisweet red sparkler. Softly pétillant, it's unabashedly fun and fruity, but an enjoyable choice for casual entertaining.",KrimSekt Red Matured Semi-Sweet,Artemovsk
"The sweet sparkling Moscato style is from northern Italy, the bottle's Etruscan theme is from central Italy and the fruit is sourced in Puglia, southern Italy. It's a wine of mixed messages, but Candoni's marketable Moscato d'Italia shows a simple sweet mouthfeel and bright aromas of jasmine and wild flower.",Moscato d'Italia,Candoni
"Grapy and floral with loads of rose petal notes, this Moscato is perfumey on the nose and palate. Exuberantly frothy and mouth-filling, the palate is fleshy with sweet ripe grapes, with just a hint of stems and leaves on the finish.",Rose Spumos,Exclusiv
"Stalky and strained on the nose, with a burnt-hay aroma to go with more typical tropical fruit and lychee scents. Citrusy and basic, with oily flavors of peach and apple. Chunky on the back end, with heat on the finish",Phebus,Fabre Montmayou
"Good for the style, which is sweet and lightly bubbly. Smells melony, then feels fresh and lively in the mouth. Sure, there's lots of residual sugar, but for a Moscato-type wine the tropical fruit and cotton candy flavors work well. Decidedly not cloying.",Opera Prima Sweet Pink,J. Garcia Carrion
"This pale straw-colored Moscato comes across as very citrusy and clean__emon more than Muscat's typical orange. It's light, frothy and sweet, with a mouthwatering finish.",Sparkling,Jacob's Creek
"Soft, ripe fruit flavors of apple, peach and melon crispened with acidity. The wine is smooth and rounded, with a fine, fresh aftertaste.",,Louis Jadot
"This is a frankly sweet, dessert style of still Moscato. It's modest in alcohol, offering up notes of oranges, melons and honey that are reasonably balanced on the finish. The price makes it a bargain.",Bin 90,Lindemans
"Suggestions of soft spice and bark jazz-up the dark fruit center of this blend, made with 75% Syrah, 13% Cinsault, 7% Mourvèdre, 4% Carignan and 3% Grenache. Mouthwatering black cherry and raspberry sauce flavors flood the mouth and stay through the solid finish. Drink now.",Red,Goats do Roam Wine Co.
"The simplest, most accessible wine in the impressive Sattlerhod range is this light, fresh, floral and herbaceous Sauvignon Blanc. With its crisp citrus and green apple, it just bursts with easy fruitiness. Screw cap.",Vom Sand,Sattlerhof
"Here's a rich, full-bodied and somewhat heavy wine fresh out of the bottle. Made from different vineyards throughout the appellation, it shows a certain generic Pinot Noir quality, albeit at a high level. The cherry flavors have an edge of heirloom tomato.",,Samsara
"Opens with a drying mineral note that squarely frames sweeter aromas of stone fruit, melon, honey and white spring flower. It's an informal, compact sparkler with bright acidity and a tonic, firm close.",Dirupo Extra Dry,Andreola
"For the price, this is a good deal in a rich California Chardonnay from a major producer. The wine is dry and crisp, with rich flavors of citrus fruits, peaches, mangoes and honeysuckle, and the minerally edge that a Calera Chardonnay usually shows.",,Calera
"Some producer in Carneros didn't want the wine that went into this negociant's _07 Syrah, to judge by its quality. Lucky for Cameron Hughes. It's a fine wine, full-bodied and dry, with spicy flavors of currants, teriaki beef, black pepper and cola, with a bracing minerality that grounds the richness. Could be more concentrated, but it's a very great value.",Lot 178,Cameron Hughes
"Lemony and herbaceous, this attractive 50-50 blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Sémillon combines a crisp, grapefruit character with a creamy layer that broadens the wine without losing freshness.",,Château Tanesse
"Shows brilliantly crisp acidity giving a jammy brightness to the pineapple, lemon and lime fruit flavors, and the finish is totally dry. Not particularly complex, but an easy-drinking Chardonnay.",,Casa de la Cruz
"Here's a wonderfully executed Brut Prosecco that shows firm, tonic bubbling and enticing aromas of stone fruit, honey and crushed white stone. It tastes drying and sharp in the mouth, making this sparkler a perfect companion to fried finger foods. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Brut,Bortolotti
"Defined by sheer richness and opulence, this oaky Chardonnay is meant to be opened now. It's rich and forward in pineapple and guava fruit, buttered toast, caramel and honey flavors.",,Coquelicot
"Amandorlato is a brawny, powerful red dessert wine with vinous aromas of grape, raisin, dried blackberry, prune and plum. The wine is aged in large oak cask to impart some aromas of spice and smoke and the tannins are firmly astringent on the close.",Amandorlato 500 ml,Corteforte
"There's a beautiful wine in here, but it's buried under so much oak, it's hard to find. Vanilla, char, buttered toast and woody aromas and flavors dominate and contribute to the tannins. The underlying Cabernet seems quite lovely, and it's an elegant, refined wine for drinking now. You have to wonder, though, why they plastered it under so much new oak.",Moose Valley Vineyard,D.R. Stephens
"From rich soil on the lower terraces of the Kremstal, this is a classic Grüner, clean, crisp, fruity with apples and green plums and a touch of spice. Screw cap.",Lössterrassen,Felsner
"Confusingly, a sparkler labeled extra dry is actually extra sweet. It's a French convention that probably should not have been carried over into American labeling, for it simply muddies the water. This is not terribly sweet or sugary, and has a distinctive, lime-flavored citrus streak.",Extra Dry,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"This budget Riesling sets a good standard for the style and the price. It's off-dry, low alcohol (11.5%) and solidly varietal. The fruit is full bodied and ripe, with vivid peach and apricot flavors. Additional notes of honey and lemony breakfast tea keep the finish up and running.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"A good Sauvignon Blanc but not up to the standards set by previous vintages of Terrunyo. The nose is less exciting and pungent than it has been, with grassy, generic citrus aromas. The flavors are slightly green and vegetal, with asparagus mixing with green apple and melon. And it's more soft-sided than memory suggests it should be. Drink now.",Terrunyo Vineyard Selection Block 28,Concha y Toro
"Fans of the ripe, modern style of Chardonnay will fall in love with this bottling. It's strong in toast, buttered popcorn, vanilla cream and peach, pear and pineapple jam flavors that dazzle and wow the palate. Easy to find, with nearly 17,000 cases produced.",Suscol,Hess
"Here's a soft, lushly delicious wine to drink now with steak, veal, pork, chicken or just about anything that wants a dry, medium-bodied red wine. It's rich in berry, currant, tobacco, spice and cedar flavors, and possesses that hard to define quality of finesse.",Coure di Vigne,Le Vigne di Domenico
"Starts out dry and leafy, then the spice and red-cherry aromas rise up. The palate is medium sized and mellow despite present acidity, and the flavors of juicy cherry and raspberry are more than solid. A fresh wine with good red fruit carry over from palate to finish.",Classic,Leyda
"This is a strong, direct Chardonnay that offers no subtlety, but impresses for sheer power. It dazzles with tangerine, pineapple and peach flavors, with plenty of new oak. Ready now.",Estate Grown,Monticello Vineyards
"Jammy and dark, with big berry and coffee aromas. The palate has a hard intensity to it that I haven't seen before from this wine, with bitterness along with black cherry, chocolate and toasty flavors. It's forward, firm and driving, but always hard and angular. In its defense, 2008 was a cool, difficult year with frosts at harvest time.",Ultra,Kaiken
"With crisp black berry fruits, this is pure juice in a glass. It has fresh acidity, a light layer of tannin and a sweet underlay to the attractive fruitiness.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Rich and attractive, with juicy blackberry and cherry flavors that finish in a swirl of anise and Indian spices. Dry, too, with firm tannins. It's a polished wine at a good price. Best with a nice steak to cut through the astringency.",,Jekel
"A spicy, full-bodied Zin that shows Dry Creek's classic wild berry, red currant, cola, brambly herb and white pepper flavors. It's a big, lusty, high- alcohol wine that pairs with foods such as short ribs or beef tacos. Drink now.",Treborce Vineyard,Hauck
"The lightest wine from the 500-year-old Stadt Krems winery. It has an attractive edge of spice to go with its apple and cream texture. Not for aging, but a delicious apéritif wine.",,Stadt Krems
"Made with organically-grown grapes, this soft, forward, fruity wine is designed for immediate enjoyment. The fruit flavors are solidly in the apple camp, rather than the riper peach or apricot, and there is a whiff of citrus in the nose. Best served chilled.",Naked,Snoqualmie
"Spring Valley wines have never been shy and retiring, but here the alcohol _ 15.2% _ seems to quickly mute the textural subtleties. Though it suggests a panoply of red and black fruits in the nose, the palate is a wash of coffee, toast, tannin and alcohol. The flavors get muddy and the alcohol strips the wine of its terroir.",Frederick Red Wine,Spring Valley Vineyard
"This sweet Vin Santo is a blend of Malvasia and Trebbiano aged many long years in small oak casks. This particular interpretation offers distinctive aromas of roasted chestnut and maple syrup with hints of dried herb, grass and drying mineral.",375ml,Vignamaggio
"Here's a fresh, crisp and tonic Moscato d'Asti (packaged in an elegant, little bottle) that shows nice floral intensity and background aromas of peach and almond skin. It tastes sweet and smooth and those perky bubbles help refresh the palate.",Nivole 375ml,Michele Chiarlo
"With many Champy reds, the high toast extract is just a hint. Here it dominates. While there is acidity and a bitter cherry flavor, it is hard to discern through the barrier of wood. Maybe two or three years will help, but it is a question.",Vieilles Vignes,Maison Champy
"This ruby-colored wine offers a pretty bouquet that is composed of red rose, sweet forest berry, candied fruit and distant prune. The wine is sweet, sticky and would pair with white chocolate or almond marzipan.",Moscato Rosa 500ml,Marco Felluga
"Aged only in stainless steel, this blend of Sangiovese and Alicante combines bright fruit nuances of cherry and blueberry with a lean, crisp mouthfeel. It's got enough acidity to cut through cheesy pizza.",Albatrello,Pieve Vecchia
"Pure Nebbiolo from the Elerding Vineyard, aged 40 months in a mix of French and American oak. Nebbiolo does not have much color to begin with, and this seems a bit washed out, with acids and barrel flavors overtaking the fruit. Astringent and aggressively oaky.",,Stottle
"Charred wood notes on the nose and palate lend a smoky, slightly herbal tone to dense, richly concentrated black-cherry flavors. The char subsides substantially with aeration, revealing a well-composed wine that balances power with elegance.",Terra Romana Chevalier de Dyonis,SERVE
"A soft, raspberry filled wine with a bitter cherry and dry tannic counter-balance. The wine is light and fruity, although still with a firm structure.",Blason de Bourgogne,Vignerons de Buxy
"Fragrant and foamy, this soft and plush Moscato d'Asti opens with orange blossom, honeysuckle and peach cobbler aromas. It's smooth and sweet, with creamy mousse on the finish.",Ferlingot,Arbiola
"Packaged in a handsome bottle, this bright Moscato d'Asti is musky and sweet (as tradition dictates) and opens with aromas of peach blossom, white almond skin and honey. Pair this wine with tangerine mousse or chopped fruit salad.",Villa Jolanda,Santero
"This is a sweet, pink sparkling wine (made mostly with Moscato grapes) from northern Italy that would pair well with raspberry tarts or strawberry pudding. The wine offers an easy bouquet of stone fruit and pink rose. It finishes with bright sweetness and foamy cream.",Pink,Mochetto
"Here's a sunny rosé made near the beautiful town of Gaiole in Chianti. The blend is Sangiovese, Canaiolo, Malvasia and Trebbiano, and the wine offers both fresh fruit and floral aromas.",Rosato,La Porta di Vertine
"This easy blend of Sangiovese and Ciliegiolo opens with a dark, garnet color and sharp aromas of raw cherry and blueberry. It's finely focused and crisp, making it perfect for pizza or pasta.",Camprianese,Buccia Nera
"Mild and powdery smelling, with inviting tropical undertones. The palate mixes flesh with freshness, and the flavors of lychee, green melon and white pepper are straight from the textbook. Finishes mildly bitter, which is natural for Mendoza Torrontés.",Grazioso Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Caligiore
"Shows the difficulties of making Cabernet succeed in this Santa Barbara County inland valley. It's awkward, with sweet blackberry and bell pepper flavors swamped with oak.",Amethyst,Coghlan
"Stalky smelling at first but good on the nose thanks to a solid berry core and leathery accents. Feels fresh and pinched, with medicinal flavors matched by equal amounts of red fruit and oak. Finishes clean but short, with decent weight.",,Casa de Campo
"Made from traditional Bordeaux varieties plus Syrah, this is a soft, simple, fruity wine. The raspberry, cherry, cola and spice flavors finish a bit sweet. Drink now.",Quadraphonic,D'Anbino
"New oak accounts for only 30% of the barrel regimen, but it dominates this Chardonnay, with buttered toast, vanilla and caramel flavors. Fortunately there's also strong pineapple, Asian pear and apricot fruit, but the oak is too powerful.",OFS,De Loach
"Slightly herbal plum and berry aromas come with a pinch of spice and meatiness. Feels medium-bodied and crisp, with juicy red-fruit flavors of plum, tomato and raspberry. Dries out on the finish, where it becomes more herbal and roasted.",Limited Edition Reserve,Espuela del Gaucho
"Fresh, fragrant and floral, this sweet sparkling wine offers aromas of peach, honey, white flower, wild sage and dried hay. The wine is plush and creamy with a thick effervescent mousse.",,Duchessa Lia
"No doubt Michael-David is going for a certain style with Earthquake, describing it as __ver the top and shattering to the veins._ Indeed. This Lodi Zin will knock your socks and several other pieces of clothing off with its smoky, greasy, hot and sweet berry pie flavors, with a side of bacon to boot. True to its style, this is one very big boy.",,Earthquake
"Soft, simple and fruity, but with its silky texture and rich raspberry and cherry fruit and spice flavors, it's pretty good for the price, showing authentic Pinot character.",,Forenzo
"A rather ordinary wine, dry and tart in acids, with modest cherry, tea and clove flavors, plus a little unripeness.",Votre Santé,Francis Ford Coppola
"Sweetly floral on the nose and palate, with hints of peach gummy candy, this off-dry Muscat sparkling might seem a bit confected, but it's nicely concentrated, with pure, clean flavors of peach and apricot nectar. Aggressive on the attack and finishes briskly.",KrimSekt White Matured Semi-Dry,Artemovsk
"On the tannic side, this is a structured although sweetly ripe wine. Red berry fruits are dominant, along with acidity. Coffee and dry tannins underneath.",Epineuil,Garnier et Fils
"Honey, candied nut, yellow flower, candied fruit and peach aromas open the bouquet of this bright, sweet sparkling wine. The effervescence is subdued, but the wine shows a rich, creamy mouthfeel regardless.",,Enrico Serafino
"Heavy and dull, with a soft texture framing cherry, berry and spice flavors. Pinot's famously silky texture is there, but the wine isn't offering much else.",Vintners Select,Summerland
A heavily pungent scent of bell pepper is partially cloaked in mocha flavors but seeps through on the palate. An uneasy truce between the vegetal fruit and the chocolaty barrel keeps this wine in an awkward condition; more bottle time may soften it but it can't ripen it.,Phinny Hill Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"Floral and citrusy smelling, with a lightness of being. Feels equally lean and light in the mouth, with fresh, floral flavors revolving around lychee and lime. Tropical and basic on the finish, with an easygoing way about it.",,Aconga
"A little sweet on the nose, with powdered sugar, vanilla and white fruit aromas. Feels foamy but just fresh enough, with apple, melon and controlled stalky flavors. Finishes with dry apple notes. Good for Argentine sparkling; 70% Chardonnay and 30% Chenin Blanc.",Extra Brut,Hom
"An earthy wine with rich, red fruits along with a barnyard flavor. The wine is ripe and jammy, the juicy acidity coming through at the end.",,Domaine Thierry Mortet
"Sweet oak and mint aromas vie with berry fruit on the bouquet. Feels chunky, round and full, with sweet plum, ripe berry, lactic and mint notes. Falls off on the finish, which is sweet but simple.",,Gran Familia
"Granular and punchy upfront, with heat and animal fur aromas on the nose. Settles with airing, revealing a heavy but solid palate with plenty of oak and candied red-fruit flavors. Falls off on the finish, with mint, resin and herbal notes.",Reserve,Cueva de las Manos
"This celebrated Italian brand continues its historic production of sweet sparkling wine from northern Italy. Made with Moscato Bianco grapes, this expression is fresh, with steely effervescence and a sweet, fruity note with hints of peach and honey.",,Cinzano
"There's more good to this rough and rugged varietal than there is bad. It's hugely fruity, perfectly ripe, colorful and full of cola, coffee, black fruit, rubber and length. It'll definitely last in a cellar, and that can only help soften the punishing tannins and mouthfeel that dominate the current state.",Don David Reserve,Michel Torino
"A little sweet with the glycerine of high alcohol, and there may be some residual sugar. That gives the raspberry, cherry and blackberry fruit a jelly-jam richness, with nuances of chocolate, anise liqueur and toast. Drink now.",,Mauritson
"Lots of bright, fresh fruit in this jammy wine. Bursts with pineapples, nectarines, sweet lemon chiffon pie, green-apple jelly, buttered toast and honey vanilla, wrapped into a creamy texture. Production was 3,100 cases.",,Martin Ray
"This Sangiovese wants decanting for a few hours to let it breathe and open up. Right out of the bottle, it's acidic and tannic, with lots of astringency covering the cherry, red currant and tobacco flavors. Drink now, with rich, oily fare.",,Mosby
"Overly sharp acidity marks this wine, giving it a cutting mouthfeel that interferes with otherwise delicious flavors. It sure is deep and long in blackberries, black currants, black licorice and smoky cedar wood, and the tannins are thick and dry, suggesting ageability.",,Neal Family
"Nice and dry, with a silky texture and pleasant blackberry, red currant, tobacco and spice flavors. This is a good price for a Cab of this quality.",Proprietor's,Rotta
"This soft, elegant wine is slightly herbaceous, with green olive and sage flavors alongside the riper blackberries. It's totally dry, and the tannins are very finely ground, giving it a pliant, gentle mouthfeel. Drink now.",Lot 179,Cameron Hughes
"Here's a softly rich Chardonnay that shows lots of appeal at a pretty good price. It's honeyed in pineapple, nectarine, guava and vanilla cream flavors, with a pretty overlay of sweetly smoked oak.",,Charles Krug
"With clean acidity that gives a scour to the richness, this dry white wine has flavors of oranges and apricots, with a pleasant tang of minerals. It's an elegant sipper and an elegant alternative to an oaky Chardonnay.",Estate Grenache Blanc,Clayhouse
"A dense wine, from one of the landmark chateaus of Listrac. It is a little rough around the edges at this stage, but wait for the chunky tannins to soften and the black plum fruits to come forward.",,Château Lestage
"This should prove to be quite popular, as it's loaded with blackberry and sweet black cherry fruit flavors. It carries the fruit with stiff but polished tannins, and brings in accents of licorice, coffee and dark chocolate. Nothing is overdone; the balance here is just right, and the addition of 16% Syrah brings with it a dash of pepper.",Indian Wells,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A soft, creamy wine, with bright yellow fruits and just the right amount of acidity. Green apple skins give texture to go with a citrus aftertaste. Screw cap.",,Château Suau
"This is a changed wine from previous vintages, now emphasizing the berry flavors of the fruit and not shying away from some chewy tannins. It seems more honest and direct, without the wash of vanilla and jam, and more food-friendly as well, with the stuffing to take on a flank or hanger steak.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Vivid and snappy, this was fermented in stainless steel, with a small percentage aged in neutral barrels to soften the mouthfeel. It's spicy and fresh, with a mix of fruit flavors including grapefruit and pineapple. A touch of vanilla enlivens the aromas.",H3,Columbia Crest
"Here's a solid and accessible Shiraz with medium- intense notes of red cherry, raspberry and cola on the nose and mouth. The mouth is medium weight with delicate tannins and black pepper spice, while the finish offers a glimmer of mocha.",Vineyard Creations,Douglas Green
"Dark yet a touch murky on the bouquet, with weight and black-fruit aromas. The palate is plump but healthy, with peppery flavors accenting core blackberry and chocolate. Chunky and proper, if a tad bit bitter on the finish. Gets better as it airs out.",Altosur,Finca Sophenia
"Loads of black pepper and foliage notes unfold in the bouquet here, with supporting aromas of bacon, game and red plum skins. The fruit is a bit more assertive in the satiny mouth, with plum flesh and ripe cherry lifting the cured meat character. A superb value that's complex yet approachable.",,Ernst Gouws & Co.
"Except for a slightly rustic edge to the way the wine feels in the mouth, this is a spectacular success. It stands next to much more expensive Merlots proudly. Dry and smooth in tannins, the cherry, red currant and pepper flavors are outstanding.",,Bogle
"A ripe, smoky wine, full of sweet jelly berry fruit. It is rounded and rich, a delicious wine that rolls easily around the mouth.",Clos des Quatre Vents,Georges Duboeuf
"Fresh, simple fruits, with plum skin texture and acidity. There is a fine layer of soft tannins. A wine to drink over the next two years.",Les Champs-Claude,Henri de Villamont
"Here's an interesting Cape Blend with 56% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Pinotage and 14% Petit Verdot that's different yet straightforward and approachable. Kirsch, black plum guts, rubber and vanilla start off on the nose, while the finish provides interesting hints of smoked cured meat and tobacco. Medium weight with soft tannins, this is a good partner for gamy dishes.",The William,Graham Beck
"With aromas of prickly citrus, nettle, cucumber and green fruits, this is hanging in there well. The palate seems to be softening with age, but there's enough acidity left to prop up the green apple, bell pepper and tarragon flavors. A good, basic SB from Casablanca to drink now.",Reserva,Veramonte
"Shows the clean acidity and purity this appellation bring to white wines, with savory tangerine, pineapple, green apple and vanilla cream flavors. Lovely as an appetizer wine, or with sole sautéed in butter.",Riverbank,Wente
"Bright, spicy and popping with cherry and raspberry fruit. This is uncomplicated but honest Pinot Noir with a juicy, fresh outlook and respectable flavors of spiced raspberry, red plum, caramel and toast. Works well for the price.",Castillo de Molina,San Pedro
"A little brusque in texture, with some tartness, but there's a lot of richness. Shows complex flavors of blackberries, cherries, black currants, cola, dark bitter chocolate, cedar and spices, with a pleasant minerality, and the finish is bone dry. Brisk tannins make it an ideal companion to roasted meats and hard cheeses. Production was 47,000 cases.",Estate,Alexander Valley Vineyards
"Ra'is exhibits a simple, genuine quality with aromas of citrus, almond, peach, apricot and honey. The golden dessert wine is made with aromatic Moscato grapes and shows a light, buoyant feel with herb and a touch of spice on the close.",Ra'is 500ml,Baglio di Pianetto
"Wildly herbal Chardonnay that has a ripe core surrounded by fennel and thyme flavors, topped by toast. There is a juicy quality to the plum flavors. It needs a year or two in the bottle.",Kollmütz Smaragd,Machherndl
"With 22 to 24 months in new French oak, there's a lot of richness to this wine in the form of raspberry sauce, milk chocolate and balsamic reduction. There's plenty of fruit to support those heavy flavors, though, with vibrant cherry and plum flavors in the medium weight mouth. Cola and spice add interest to the close.",Cathedral Cellar,KWV
"With 6,000 cases imported and an attractive price tag, this is an easy choice for dinner with friends around a hearty stew or braised meat. Bright and intense with strong berry preserve flavors backed by notes of graham cracker, bramble and sweet spice. Drink now.",Cape Maidens,Juno
"A rich, oaky wine that will appeal to lots of Chardonnay fans. It's creamy and smooth, with tropical fruit, vanilla and buttered toast flavors.",Reserve,Frei Brothers
"There's tobacco and chocolate throughout this highend Cab offering from Concannon. Maybe it's the vintage, maybe it's the time in bottle, but the wine's complexity appears limited.",Heritage,Concannon
"A ripe Chardonnay, big and full, with fistfuls of oak influence and a spoonful of sugar to help it go down. Find some rich crab cakes in a creamy sauce and enjoy.",Reserve,Concannon
"Soft sweet spice and black tea characters mingle with black cherry and plum flesh aromas and flavors. Medium weight and approachable, with dusty tannins and a clean, licorice-kissed finish. Drink now.",,Two Oceans
"Opens with a pinch of green as well as more standard cassis and berry aromas. Borderline sheer in the mouth, with pointed acidity and raspberry and plum flavors. Feels slightly abrasive, but on the plus side it's fresh and juicy.",,Tapiz
"A solid effort, fruity in blackberries, currants and oak, with a smooth mouthfeel. Not especially complex, but a polished wine for drinking now.",,Stonegate
"A bit muted and shy on the nose, with faint accents of fresh grass, sweet citrus and just-ripe gooseberry. The palate offers a pithy-citrus flavor, adding a touch of bitterness to the clean close.",Sutherland,Thelema
"Here's a simple, brambly expression of Sangiovese Grosso, with bright acidity and lively notes of forest berry and moist earth. This wine has a smoky touch of toasted almond on the close.",,Podere La Vigna
"Take a few bucks off the price, and this would be a good value. As things stand, this Chardonnay, which is a blend of Santa Clara Valley and Santa Cruz Mountains fruit, is fairly standard. It's dry and crisp, with pleasant lemon-custard flavors that turn a little unripe on the finish.",,Sarah's Vineyard
"Too sweet by far, this is almost a dessert wine, with overripe raisin and prune flavors alongside the blackberries. Sugar reprises on the finish, making it a little cloying.",Old Bailey,Peachy Canyon
"Santo is a creamy Moscato d'Asti with ripe fruit aromas of yellow rose, honey and apricot. The wine shows a thick, bold style ,with an off-gold color and plenty of sweetness on the sticky finish.",Santo,Santero
"A field blend from the DeMayo Vineyard, believed to be mostly Zin and Petite Sirah. The resulting wine doesn't show much of its provenance or history, just a smidgen of spice but only fruit and modest of flavor.",DeMayo Vineyard,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"A spritzy and effervescent selection, the carbonation helps to lift the inherent sweet fruit aromas and flavors of guava, peach and mushy pear. An ideal choice for a warm summer day by the pool, served very cold.",Sustainable Agriculture Perlè,Makulu
"Toasty oak, pineapples, oranges and vanilla combine in this Chardonnay to make it an easy-drinking everyday sipper. It seems little sweet, like jam.",Collection,Stonegate
"Darkly toasted oak lends a veil of smoke and char to apple and lemon flavors in this dry, full-bodied Chardonnay. There are hints of stems and leaves on the midpalate, but overall, it's a well-composed wine with balanced acidity and alcohol.",Terra Romana,SERVE
"Light, creamed apple fruits with a bright line of fresh acidity. The wine is exuberant in its citrus character, just broadened by an underlay of green apples.",Buissonnier,Vignerons de Buxy
"Waxy and oily on the nose, then narrow as a thin line on the palate. Feels linear and sharp, with lemony flavors that come with a green apple accent. Tastes aged and maderized on the finish, despite displaying lemony acidity and tartness.",El Palomar,Zarate
"Very fresh and acidic to the point of tasting sour, this ruby-colored Chianti offers bright berry aromas and white cherry crispness. The wine seems perfectly engineered to pair with cheesy pasta or pizza.",Guarniente,Buccia Nera
"Exuberantly fragrant of ripe, tropical fruit and florals, this Romanian white blend veers towards confected, but it's pleasantly brisk and apple-y on the palate. A good apéritif for casual, weekday enjoyment.",Single Vineyard Selection Scurta Vineyard Viognier-Tamaioasa Romaneasca,Cramele Halewood
"Hints of rose petals are a curious contrast to earthier scents of soil and beets on this full bodied, slightly chunky Romanian Merlot. Pleasant for everyday dining; flavors of charred wood and preserved plum would pair nicely with an assortment of smoked meats and cheeses.",Vitis Metamorfosis,Cramele Halewood
"This blend of five varieties, including Cabernet Sauvignon and Zinfandel, is soft and sweet. Call it bistro style. It's jammy in cherries, licorice and mocha. Proceeds from the wine's sales go to heart disease research.",,Colby Red
"Not much going on in this heavy Chardonnay beyond the oak. There are modest pineapple and peach flavors, but they wash away quickly.",,Bardessono
"Rubber, plastic and black fruit aromas. Feels fat and buttery, but with a streak of acidity that gives it pulse. Flavors of red berry come with oaky support, and the finish is sweet, oaky and warm.",Reserve,Mi Terruño
"Neutral on the nose, with peachy sweetness and softness that suggests it's beginning to fade. Feels honest but light, with pithy, neutral melon and red apple flavors. Dry but sort of bland; still upright. Drink right away.",,Marqués de Riscal
"Baked, saucy aromas suggest the wine's overall character. It's ripe and stewy, with a grippy palate and a flavor profile full of tomato, herbs and red plum. Tastes herbal and roasted on the finish; aggressive, savory Rioja.",Reserva,Marques de Tomares
"Roasted red berry and plum aromas carry the bouquet to a tannic, grabby palate with red fruit flavors and herbal shadings. Feels better on the finish, with tangy red fruit and nothing offensive.",,Sur de los Andes
"Rubbery on first take, with sweet chocolate and carob aromas. Feels pretty thick, with a creamy lead into an herbal-tasting palate that's crowded with oak and milk chocolate flavors. Turns resiny on the finish.",Co-Ferment,TintoNegro
"Full of red-fruit aromas, particularly plum and cherry. Feels raw, with wild berry, ample oak and a lot of acid-based tang to the palate. Lightly toasty, with a mild cherry flavor to the finish.",Zaphy,Trapiche
"An eccentric Chardonnay, not at all like the vast majority. With its apricot jam, lychee, sautéed banana, honey and crême brulée flavors, it's an outlier.",El Pajaro,Whetstone
"Fresh apple notes on the nose of this off-dry sparkling are pretty, but hindered by whiffs of dust and green stems. Softly pétillant with a creamy, mouth-filling froth, it finishes with a pleasantly sweet note. An unusual blend of Pinot Franc, Chardonnay, Aligote and Riesling.",KrimSekt White Collection Semi-Dry,Artemovsk
"This old-vine Lodi Zin features caramel, vanilla and cherry notes. Most unusually, it's blended with tiny amounts of Viognier and Sauvignon Blanc and is fairly light bodied and sweet on the finish.",Old Vine,Campus Oaks
"Initially all tannins, this wine is taking its time to develop ripe fruit. It has a mineral, gravel-like texture, with stalky berry fruits.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Simple and easy to like, with cassis and cherry aromas along with a hint of earth, moss and leather. The palate is fresh, juicy and healthy, with clean, regular raspberry and ripe currant flavors. And the finish is long and mildly toasty. Good, presentable and ready to drink.",Grand Reserve,Graffigna
"This is classic Merlot at a great price, with notes of black plum, cherry, blackberry and licorice on the nose and mouth. Balanced and softly textured with medium tannins and a solid, clean finish. Drink now.",Bergkelder Selection,Fleur Du Cap
A perfect balance of watermelon and strawberry fruit flavors introduce this lovely rosé. It's bone dry and as perfect a companion to your holiday turkey as your mid-summer picnic.,Ramblin',Dusted Valley
"This dessert wine is comprised of Sauvignon Blanc, Riesling, Viognier and Chardonnay grapes. Its deeply colored, almost pink, and very rich and sweet in honey, orange, apricot and vanilla flavors. Extravagant, but could use greater structural interest.",Slow Hand 375 ml,Coquelicot
"Here's a lighter, less bulky expression of Recioto that opens with a dark ruby color and pretty aromas of wild berry and dark cherry. It tastes sweet and thick, ending with a slight tannic nod that is firm without being astringent.",500ml,Corte Sant' Alda
"Superrich, offering waves of pineapple, mango, buttered toast and vanilla flavors. The brilliantly crisp acidity of Edna Valley makes it all clean and brisk. Not much going on below the appealing surface, so drink now. Ahi tuna tartare comes to mind.",Reserve,Courtney Benham
"Ripe and soft, this is a broad style of white showing a tropical side of Sauvignon and Sémillon fruit flavors. The texture is rich, full in the mouth, the acidity well in balance.",,Château Larroque
"This is a leaner style of wine than some 2008s, with acidity and dry tannins tightly coiled around black currant fruits. It needs time to soften out.",,Château les Ormes Sorbet
"Bogle continues to outperform nearly everybody else in their price range. Tasted alongside far more expensive Cabs, this wine performed well. It's dry and elegantly structured, with classic blackberry, black currant and cedar flavors. Production was an easy to find 175,000 cases.",,Bogle
"Blackberry and slightly green, herbal aromas start it off, and while the flavors maintain that herbal, green-tobacco core, there's enough body, blackberry and oaky coffee and mocha notes to make it a nice wine. Needs more clarity of fruit, cleanliness and purity to reach the peak, but still good as is.",Reserva,Cinco Sentidos
"Opens with a thick amber color and aromas of peppermint, apricot, white mineral and lavender honey. There's a floral component in the mouth but this wine also offers distinctive flavors of dried grass or herbs.",500ml,Colosi
"This sweet Recioto opens with thick, inky blackness and jammy aromas of black fruit, plum and prune. You can taste some oak-driven flavors of spice and smoke. The wine ends with a blast of astringent, ripe tannins.",500ml,Tommaso Bussola
"Terre del Cereolo is a very spicy and smoky expression of Recioto that shows oak-driven notes of clove, tobacco, blackberry and plum. The wine delivers its natural sweetness in the mouth as well as firm, biting tannins at the end.",Terre del Cereolo 500ml,Trabucchi d'Illasi
Beautiful fresh green grass aromas are backed by sweet grapefruit oil and ripe gooseberry in this attractive Sauv Blanc. Full but not fat with a hint of ripe melon lingering on the finish.,,Thelema
"A little generic, but overall this is a nice, simple, easy-to-like Cab with clean aromas and good structure and flavors. The nose is snappy, while the palate is driven by cherry, raspberry and plum flavors. Lasting and lively on the finish, with a modicum of complexity.",Selección del Directorio,Santa Helena
"An easy-drinking red wine. It's silky, fruity and dry. You could substitute it as an interesting alternative to Pinot Noir. Shows cherry and tobacco flavors, with a brisk scour of acidity.",,Yorba
"A wine that relishes its juicy fruit and acidity. The tannins, by contrast, are light. Close to Macau, south of Margaux, Gironville is in a fresh, black currant-fruit style, not for aging.",,Château de Gironville
"Here's a simple, easy sparkling wine with some sweet flavors of peach and apricot backed by drying mineral tones and chopped garden herbs. The quality of the perlage is foamy and soft.",Le Dolcirive Extra Dry,Costaruél
"Smells big but also herbal and entirely like a Maipo Cab. There's a freshness to the palate but also olive, herbs, berry fruit and a touch of vanilla sweetness. Medium-length on the finish, with some creamy, candied weight. Good but kind of regular given the price.",Antiguas Reservas,Cousiño-Macul
"This boasts some rather prominent herbal (dill, perhaps?) notes, but this is an otherwise creamy-textured, soft Cabernet meant for immediate consumption. Vanilla and black cherry notes start upfront and persist through the slightly warm finish.",Truffle Chocolate,Chocolate Box
"Tasted in October, 2010, this Pinot had a spritziness indicating some instability, making it hard to evaluate. That could calm down eventually, leaving behind a big, flavorful and dry red wine, brimming with berries, cherries and cola.",Bohemian Vineyard,Furthermore
"A little too soft, which gives a flat, lifeless quality to the mouthfeel. On the other hand, the flavors are wonderful, ranging from cherries and currants to an exquisite overlay of oak. Doesn't seem to be going anywhere, so drink up.",La Encantada Vineyard,Furthermore
"Ripe and also tannic, this is structured wine, its berry fruits pushing through a dry plum skin texture. It is solid and chunky while remaining fresh and fruity.",Château des Vierres,Georges Duboeuf
"A surprisingly dumb wine, not giving much beyond very dry tannins. The result is a wine that has bitterness, with dark chocolate and bitter cherry fruits. Will it open up? Maybe, but the jury is still out.",Domaine de la Tour du Bief,Georges Duboeuf
"The least successful of Heinrich's varietal range, this is edgy with insistent acidity. The fruit does show red cherry brightness, although the mineral character returns.",,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
"Gummy, rough and huge, with woody aromas, muddled red fruit and a ton of kick. The palate is narrow and grippy, with tarry, concentrated blackberry and wild berry flavors. There isn't much body or complexity to it; it's full-force, tannic and raw. Shows why Petit Verdot isn't usually made into a varietal wine.",Remolinos Vineyard Mini Ediciones,Finca Decero
"Lots of richness for the price in this Chardonnay. Shows pineapple custard, lemon meringue pie, vanilla cream and caramel flavors, brightened with crisp acidity. Easy to find, with 9,000 cases produced.",,Five Rivers
"Herbal berry aromas are solid enough but less than impressive, while the palate is soft, full, round and regular. Full across the palate, with mildly green cassis and berry flavors, then soft, chunky and slightly herbal on the finish.",Barrel Selection Reserve,Korta
"Black plum skins, green pepper, cassis and coffee provide the core character of this wine, with accents of tobacco and wood adding complexity. The medium-weight mouthfeel is balanced and easygoing with soft tannins and a clean finish.",,Le Bonheur
"Smells a bit cheesy and leathery, with mint and slightly chemical berry aromas. Chewy in feel, with buttery flavors of red berry and chocolate. Tastes oaky, minty and forced, but overall it's not a bad wine given the price and subpar vintage.",Crianza,Castillo Clavijo
"Not as good as Darcie Kent's Crown Block Merlot, this one is smooth, with big-shouldered tannins. It tastes of raisin toast, dried plums and tobacco, with menthol darting in and out along the edges.",Picazo Vineyard,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"La Fagiana is a bright, ruby-colored wine with aromas of forest fruit and bramble, with white almond and spice at the back. It's an easy, no-fuss expression with a clean, tart close.",La Fagiana,Fattoria di San Quintino
"There's a ripe, jammy aroma on the bouquet of this wine that is soon followed by toasted espresso, rum cake, spice and tobacco. The finish is harsh and strong, thanks to a combination of alcohol and high acidity.",Campo di Marzo,Il Valentiano
"Very sweet, but the raspberry and cherry fruit is thin, making the wine ultimately unsatisfying.",Dessert Wine,Martin Ray
"Every kind of pepper, from green to red to jalapeño, is present on the nose, along with red plum and spice aromas. Feels tight and zesty, with Italian-leaning flavors of tomato, oregano and basil along with cassis and strawberry. Crisp and agile on the finish, but tastes green.",Grand Reserve,Graffigna
"Made in the winery's style, which is ripe, full-bodied and rustic. This one's extracted in jammy blackberries, plums and currants, with some raisins on the finish, which is dry and spicy.",Old School,Peterson
"Labors from the start via soft, punchless aromas of generic red fruit. Feels a little flabby, with dry, basic flavors of red apple and cantaloupe. Turns pithy and slightly bitter on the finish. Drink now.",Rosado,Señorio de Uñuela
"Dusty, dry and lightly spiced aromas frame stalky red fruit scents. Feels chunky and clampy, with rooty berry sweetness and rubbery bitterness on the back palate and finish. Good, but tough around the edges.",,Rivarey
"White peach and papaya aromas are sweet and tropical, while saline notes play second fiddle. Feels tangy, juicy and lean, with dilute lemon and green banana flavors. Wet and watery on the finish.",Portillo Estate Bottled,Salentein
"Plum, red berry and wild herb aromas combine to create a briary whole. As it airs, the nose turns lemony and hard, while the mouthfeel is tight and limited, with herbal, saucy, red berry flavors. Tomato and basil notes appear on the finish.",Clasico,Tierra Prometida
"Foxy and jumpy on the nose, with candied red-berry and cherry aromas. Feels resiny, but there's enough acid to keep it moving forward. Flavors of plum and berry come with a lot of oak and barrel influence. Finishes resiny, with hints of vanilla and a burnt quality.",Uco Valley Reserve,TintoNegro
"Toasted oak dominates everything in this Viognier, which features charred wood, buttered toast, butterscotch and vanilla aromas and flavors. The fruit is pretty buried.",Catie's Corner Vineyard,Whetstone
"At the age of more than seven years, this wine is getting tired. It's drying out and softening, with mellow tannins and raisiny flavors that testify to the heat of the vintage. Drink up.",,Tedeschi Family
"There's a fresh, almost spicy quality to the nose, with fresh fruit, acacia flower, honey and crushed white pepper. The wine is steady and smooth on the palate, with a creamy texture and a foamy mousse.",Valdiserre,Isolabella della Croce
"Vintner Carlo Cattaneo offers a lean, crisp expression of Sangiovese with aromas of cassis and spice. The wine shows sharp acidity on the close.",Prelato di Massanera,Massanera
"Gaseous smelling at first, then the nose transitions to rubbery plum and blackberry. Feels zesty and spunky, with tangy raspberry, pie cherry and tomato flavors. Feels racy and juicy, with a tomato-like flavor on the finish.",Madurado,Castillo Labastida
"Smells clean and mild, with peach and apple aromas. Rather foamy and rough feeling, with tangy flavors of stone fruits, green apple and pineapple. Light, juicy and fruity on the finish, but basic. Made from 100% Chardonnay using the Charmat method.",Extra Brut,Coiron
"The bouquet reveals subtle notes of honey, white flower and peach blossom. This sweet sparkler also shows a milky or creamy note on the finish, with a softly sweet endnote.",San Maurizio,Cantina Vallebelbo
"Typically fragrant, with floral aromas vying with mildly green notes of lime and lychee. Feels tangy and downright citric, with lemon, orange, lime and green apple flavors. Cleansing and acidic on the finish, with lemony snap.",Gaucho Spur,Espuela del Gaucho
"Compared to Moscato d'Asti, Asti is a sparkling dessert wine with slightly more alcohol and more bite to its bubbly effervescence. This expression is pure and clean, with simple white flower and stone fruit aromas followed by a sweet, fresh finish.",Casa Sant'Orsola,Fratelli Martini
"Citrusy on the nose, with tangerine and passion fruit aromas, with white grapefruit and less-defined citrus flavors. Grapefruit persists on the racy, tangy finish.",Elverite Blanco,Villacezan
"A soft and simple Cabernet, with jammy blackberry, currant and sweet oak flavors. The finish is long and spicy. Drink up.",,Summerland
"Tastes tired, with dried out tannins framing blackberry and oak flavors. Interesting, but catch it now before it goes further downhill.",,Tedeschi Family
"A simple, rustic Zinfandel, sweet and fruity in cherry jam, red licorice, bacon and spice flavors, wrapped into robust tannins. The grapes were sourced from Sonoma, Mendocino and Lodi.",Vine Age Series,XYZin
"A young, plummy Zin that's lightly sweet, with blackberry jam, vanilla and caramel notes.",Blue Groove,Salvatore Principe
"Opens with an odd whiff of masa or cornmeal along with herbal berry aromas. Feels angular and narrowing, with herbal plum and dark berry flavors. Turns greener with time, ultimately finishing with brown sugar sweetness and green pepper notes. Good but herbal.",,Lexicon
"Made from 100% Merlot grown in Yountville, this is a lean, unforgiving wine. It's bone dry and tannic, with modest cherry fruit.",Triere Estate Vineyard,Burgess
"Flashy aromas of toast and butter mingle with tropical fruit aromas and flavors. There's a touch of warmth on the nose, and the mouthfeel is round and fleshy. Drink now.",,Fairvalley
Too oaky and forward in tropical fruit flavors. Takes the popular style and exaggerates it. It will nonetheless appeal to lots of people.,,Castle Rock
"A little aggressive in feline spray notes, but pulls back just in time to let the gooseberry, grapefruit, lemon and lime flavors star. Crisp acidity provides fortunate balance to this sweetly fruit wine.",,Mario Bazán
"Tasted in the late summer of 2010, this Cab was pretty tannic and acidic, despite some very rich and dynamic blackberry, black cherry, currant and licorice flavors. It will hit its peak sometime in the next 2_3 years.",Best Barrel,Municipal Winemakers
"A little simple and soft, but a pretty good approximation of Russian River Valley Pinot Noir. Shows raspberry jam, cola, red licorice and sandalwood flavors, wrapped into a silky texture.",,Sea Mist
"A good Pinot Noir for everyday drinking. It's very dry and crisp and silky in the mouth, with complex flavors of cherries, cola, licorice and beef jerky. The acidity suggests rich, oily fare, like lamb or salmon.",,Simple Math Cellars
"A good, basic table wine with spice, berry syrup, flower notes and char on the nose. The palate is a bit sharp and tangy, but the herbal berry and pepper flavors are pleasing. Shows a clean outlook and a dry coffee-tinged finish.",Private Reserve,Viña el Aromo
"Fresh and juicy, this easy-drinking blend provides simple mint and cassis aromas and flavors at a reasonable price, with just enough structure to stand up to burgers and the like. Drink now_2013.",Gamekeeper's Shiraz-Grenache-Touriga,St Hallett
"A touch sharp with prominent acidity and soft tannins in the mouth. Tart dried cherry, raspberry and plum fill palate, with a clean, medium-length finish sealing the experience. Drink now.",Reserve,Rooiberg
"This wine comes from the San Lucas area of the southern Salinas Valley, on the way toward Paso Robles. It's a peppery wine, rustic, hot and dry, with strong jammy flavors of cherries and blackberries, and a long, spicy finish. Drink now.",,Pomar Junction
"Herbal and green with notes of pepper, black plum skins, menthol and damp forrest floor. It's easy to drink with light tannins and a medium weight followed by a short finish.",Liber III,Emineo
"Dark, earthy and rubbery aromas go along with a reasonably fruity bouquet, and as a whole the entry is good. The palate is full, a bit rough and rugged, with ripe, sweet black-cherry and cassis flavors. Concentrated and a touch syrupy, but good for what amounts to basic Cabernet.",Estate,Errazuriz
"This is a soft, open wine, full of ripe berry fruits and red cherries. There is only the lightest tannin, along with bright acidity, a wine that is so ready to drink.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"Hard to appreciate, with its bite of acidity and jammy flavors. Good and dry, but this Cabernet lacks the richness and complexity you expect from Oakville.",,Groth
"With tight acidity and a grassy herbaceous character, the wine has crisp fruit, a flinty structure and a brittle apple-skin texture. For fresh apéritif drinking.",,Château La Rame
"A bold, aggressive wine that lacks a bit of elegance, the 2008 Galvo Garage is a big mouthful of cassis and cedar. In another few years it may settle down, but for now the overall impression is of a rather rough customer that's best suited to be poured alongside grilled steak.",The Galvo Garage Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot-Cabernet Franc-Petit Verdot,D'Arenberg
"Fixin, the northernmost red wines on the Côte de Nuits, generally produces light wines. This is no exception; the wine is bright, very fresh, with hints of berry fruits.",Vieilles Vignes,Derey Frères
"Soft in the mouth, with a somewhat simple structure, this Syrah's main virtue is flavor. It's enormously rich in ripe blackberry- and cherry-pie filling, cola, licorice, mint, chocolate, bacon and pepper flavors, and is fully dry.",Canterbury Vineyard,Bell
"The opening of lemon, lychee and pineapple is textbook and clean, while the palate is full and oily but not cloying or bitter. In fact, the flavors are pure applesauce and green melon, while the finish is fat and generous. A respectable, honest take on Torrontés.",Desvario,Bodega Tierra Colorada
"Fresh fruit shows the acidity of the year, while the black currant flavors give great freshness. The aftertaste is soft, flavored with strawberry juice.",Beaune du Château Premier Cru,Bouchard Père & Fils
"It's not clear where in the valley this wine comes from, but it's a pretty exposition of Napa Sauvignon Blanc. Slightly sweet, it's strong in citrus, tropical fruit and vanilla oak flavors, balanced with crisp acidity.",Allomi,Hess
"Nivole, a play on the Italian word for clouds, is a fresh and floral Moscato d'Asti with foamy bubbling and delicate aromas of soapy flowers, honey and sweet peach. Although this wine should normally be consumed very young, this vintage has held up beautifully and there's a touch of creamy mint on the close.",Nivole 375ml,Michele Chiarlo
"Here's a simple, luminous sparkling Prosecco with firm, steady perlage and bright aromas of field flower, stone fruit, honeycomb and crushed white stone. The mouthfeel is dominated by fleshy, peachy sweetness.",Extra Dry,Pitars
"Full in the mouth, this blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Gris has a rich, spicy feel anchored in ripe fruit. Made at the Benedictine Göttweig monastery by the team from Weingut Stadt Krems, it is a fruity apéritif style with attractive ripe fruit weight.",Brut,Stift Göttweig
"The Stiftsbreite vineyard has a claim to fame: It is the largest St. Laurent vineyard in the world. This fruity wine sums up the grape with ripe red berry and spicy black cherry flavors, just bursting with juice and bright acidity.",Ausstich Tattendorf,Stift Klosterneuburg
"Spunky and bright in terms of its aromatics, with musky lime and mineral notes. The palate is both juicy and round, with lemon, lime and piercing, pithy citrus flavors. Citric, sheering and foxy on the finish, and exceedingly cleansing.",Albamar,William Cole
"Creamy and herbal on the nose, with mild vegetal aromas and big but bland black-fruit scents. The palate is big and chunky, with heavy berry flavors tempered by herbal notes. Same goes for the finish, which is thick and hefty but a little sticky.",Ecos de Rulo,Viña Bisquertt
"Despite being six years old, this is still kicking. The nose is raw and stewy, but it's also ripe and rubbery, with cassis and berry aromas. The palate is thick, bulky and chunky, with heavy, chewy berry fruit flavors in front of a slightly baked finish. One-dimensional but not bad for Argentine Cab.",Limited Reserve,Viña El Cerno
"A perfectly fine, full-bodied red wine. Dry and tannic, it has ripe cherry and some overripe raisin and prune notes, wrapped into fancy tannins. Drink now.",Estate Grown,Monticello Vineyards
"There's a sweet edge to this Chard with notes of orange oil, lychee, honeydew and rose water filling the nose and mouth. Medium weight with decent acidity and a lingering finish. Drink now.",,Beau Joubert
"A very herbaceous Sauvignon aroma, crisp and fresh with pink grapefruit and lemon grass flavors on top of a bright squeeze of lime. There is a final touch of pear juice acidity.",,Château La Rose du Pin
"Surprisingly, this blend of 65% Chenin Blanc and 35% Sémillon is quite rich and oaky with prominent aromas of butter, wood-grilled red apple and walnut skin. The mouth offers more creamy nutty flavors of buttered popcorn and peach pit, but a bit lacking in the fruit department.",Donatus White,Dornier
"Prickly smelling, with pointed red-fruit aromas. Feels snappy and high in acid, with quick, zippy flavors of tangy red plum and red currant. Not too much flavor or feel on the quick, crisp finish.",Cepas Antiguas,Bodegas Martinez Corta
"From the deep south of Italy, this fragrant Moscato opens with generous aromas of orange, apricot, yellow rose and honey. This sparkling dessert wine is sweet, heavy and ripe in the mouth.",,Casal Nova
"Minty on the nose, with hints of cured meat, burnt field and spice. Feels fresh, with medicinal plum flavors and oak taking over after the fruit falls off. Finishes lightly spicy and drying. More balanced and less oaky than the winery's '09 reserva.",,Cas'Almare
"Frothy cream and a thick white mousse cap this bright, sparkling Asti as the wine is poured in the glass. Floral and fruity aromas of jasmine and peach appear on the bouquet and the mouthfeel is silky and easy.",,Mondoro
"Sweet but not overdone, with attractive aromas of lychee, peach and rose water. Medium weight, with a fruity but somewhat thin finish. Drink now.",,Two Oceans
"Apple-y on the nose and palate, with just a hint of dust and green leaves, this blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Feteasca Alba is refreshing, with striking acidity. Dry and medium bodied in style.",Terra Romana Sauvignon Blanc-Feteasca Alba,SERVE
"Chunky and murky on the nose, with melon and papaya aromas. Feels round but light in the center, with vanilla, pear and melon flavors. Fleshy and simple on the finish.",Altos del Plata,Terrazas de Los Andes
"They held this wine back nearly five years before releasing it, but it's still fiercely tannic. That's the main problem, and to judge by the fruit, which is entering a mature phase, the wine's future is in doubt.",,Sarah's Vineyard
"Zed is a pale flamingo in color, with plenty of hallmark Muscat aromas and flavors of orange and just a hint of berries. It is a bit heavy and rich compared to some of its competitors; try it with dessert rather than as an apéritif.",Rosé,ZED
"This bright Moscato d'Asti opens with a pristine appearance and a radiant pale gold color. The aromas are slightly closed and nutty, with white almond, stone fruit and yellow rose. There's a touch of crushed white pepper at the very end.",,Demarie
"A field blended red wine of 33% Cabernet Sauvignon, 33% Cabernet Franc and 33% Merlot. There's red cherry and herbal stuff going on, but the wine also lacks texture and depth.",CFM Jolon Vineyard,MICA Cellars
"Pretty ordinary stuff, although it does communicate Pinot's basic message of dryness and silkiness. Shows modest cherry and spice flavors.",California Cuvée,Castle Rock
"Burnt and leafy on the nose, with murky, earthy aromas. Feels gritty but lively, with sweet, herbal berry fruit in front of a somewhat dilute and dull finish. A modest, herbal Cab that does the job.",,Tomero
"Moscato Rosato is a sweet sparkling rosé with a bright raspberry color and tangy layers of forest fruit and lemon soda. There's a sharp, almost pungent aspect to the effervescence that removes the heaviness or cloying quality of the wine's natural sugar content.",Rosato,Tosti
"Cloudy to the eye, with overly green aromas of tomato and bell pepper, along with spice and dried cherry. Feels hot and acidic, with a clipped, cutting palate full of berry flavors, herbs and green pepper. Fresh but herbal on the finish.",Don David Reserve,Michel Torino
"Smells unruly, with animal notes, heavy char, rubber and mulchy earth. Gets better with airing, but seems thick on the palate, with stewed berry and mild green notes. Herbal, roasted and sort of weedy on the finish. Has been better in the past.",Yauquén,Ruca Malen
"Thick, soft and sweetly extracted in blackberries and licorice, this Syrah can best be described as rustic. It's not bad, just simple.",,Radar
Sweet aromas and flavors of peach and lychee are accented by a hint of fresh rose petals. A soft spritz in the mouth cleans up the finish. Drink now.,,Chaza
"Stalky aromas of burnt hay blend with white fruit scents. Bland apple and stalky flavors are balanced by decent acidity, then finishes with burnt, oily accents.",,Amadores
"Tomato and herbal aromas tell you most of what you need to know about this bargain-priced Cab. It's somewhat green and sweet, with a raw feel and tannic bite. Tastes of tomato and herbal red plum. Feels light on the finish.",,Arge & Tina
"Simple and dry, this Cabernet has modest blackberry, tea and oak flavors. With its firm tannins, it gets the basic Cabernet job done.",,Castle Rock
"Here's an easy, no-fuss Moscato with a bright, crystalline appearance and fresh aromas of spring flower, peach and honey baked almond. The wine presents a full, creamy finish with mild foaming and effervescence.",,Caposaldo
A simple Barbera with not much in the way of aromas and just a slight amount of earthy berry flavors.,,Zucca
"Even if you don't mind high alcohol in a Zinfandel, you might find yourself reacting to this one. It's frankly hot, with a chili pepper burn to the berry fruit. It's also overripe, with a sweet, Porty taste.",Bradford Mountain Vineyard,Peterson
"This sweet sparkling wine opens with a pungent tone of freshly squeezed tangerine skin, with citrus and more grapefruit at the back. The wine is very sweet and foamy with a touch of citrus-like acidity on the close.",Stella Rosa Il Conte Orange Moscato Fior d'Arancio,Poderi Arancio
"Too soft in structure, and sweet, too, like berry fruit concentrate. Fans of sweet, simple red wines will like this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Zinfandel.",Brooster Fighting Red,Pomar Junction
"Neutral, dusty and a bit damp-smelling, with a leanness to the palate feel as well as flavors of semitart melon and peach. Decent but fails to excite. Drink now.",,Tapeña
"The grapy nose announces a heavy, flat type of Malbec with intense color but not much in the way of acidic lift or excitement. Feels gummy, with jammy, sweet flavors of blueberry and clove. Stays sweet and sticky on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Viñas de Vila
"Foamy in the Asti style, with metallic, earthy aromas of peach and lychee. Feels pretty good, with sweet, basic lychee and honeydew flavors. The finish is simply a carry over from the palate: it's sweet and melony in flavor.",Sustainably Farmed,_rido
"Murky smelling, with nondescript berry aromas. Ultratannic and hard in the mouth, much like chewing nails. Meanwhile, the flavors run herbal and earthy, with dark fruit carrying things to a hard, tannic finish.",Casa Marguery,Familia Marguery
"Rubbery and sort of reduced on the nose, with sulfur and gaseous notes. After airing, it shows a juicy but plump mouthfeel with standard, perfectly good blackberry and herbal flavors. Finishes warm, full and toasty, but also a bit lemony and clacky.",Limited Edition Reserve,Espuela del Gaucho
"Dark, earthy and rubbery aromas go along with a reasonably fruity bouquet, and as a whole the entry is good. The palate is full, a bit rough and rugged, with ripe, sweet black-cherry and cassis flavors. Concentrated and a touch syrupy, but good for what amounts to basic Cabernet.",Steinbeck Vineyard,Eberle
"This expression of Moscadello di Montalcino opens with a dark, golden color and intense aromas of candied fruit, orange zest, roasted almond and dried apricot. The wine is thick and smooth with a strong element of sweetness balanced by a touch of crisp acidity.",500ml,Mocali
"Mostly Merlot, with Syrah and Cab Franc filling in the rest, this pleasant, everyday red has forward, clean, but simple fruit flavors. It adds light streaks of vanilla, cut leaf, and a suggestion of moist earth. A good companion for a simple burger.",Red,Murphy's Law
"The light and soft bouquet offers faint glimmers of fresh-cut grass and tart green berries. More of the same unfolds in the mouth, with lime citrus and green gooseberry leading through to the crisp finish.",,Vrede en Lust
"A lean, austere wine with a mineral character over the berry fruit and acidity. That said, there is a warm layer of acidity and spice that is now coming to maturity in the firm structure.",Edition Chremisa,Winzer Krems
"Il Fresco is exactly the kind of sparkling wine you want in large supply when your home is filled with family and friends. The wine is redolent of citrus, lime, stone fruit and loads of floral freshness.",Il Fresco Brut,Villa Sandi
"Given the local competition, this Pinot Noir-dominated sparkler is pretty good. It has a peachy color along with creamy aromas that might be a little oxidized but are soft and easy nonetheless. The palate feel is frothy, while the flavors are of peach pits and underripe cantaloupe. Finishes dry and lively.",Método Tradicional Extra Brut,Viniterra
"A very crisp Chardonnay, with a high level of acidity to go with the white currant and green plum fruits. The wine is fruity and open, while kept tight by an apple skin texture. Screw cap.",Mal Anders Smaragd,Machherndl
"Tight acidity and grassy herbaceous character, the wine has crisp fruit, a flinty structure and a brittle apple skin texture. For fresh aperitif drinking.",,Château La Rame
"Packed with juicy red cherries, this is a fresh, fruity Beaujolais to drink this winter. There is just a touch of tannin as well as refreshing acidity.",Cuvée Terroir,Domaine Pral
"This dry sparkler (made with the indigenous Durello grape variety) opens with a light, golden color. It follows through with subdued aromas of dried herb, mineral and white peach. The sparkler is very drying and tight on the palate.",Brut,Corte Moschina
"This is a very likeable and approachable Prosecco with bright aromas of white flower, citrus and peach. The wine is tonic, crisp and balanced and because this is a Brut expression, the wine is dry and fresh.",Brut Perlé,Dal Din
"This is a fresh and easy to drink white that's perfect for pairing with salads or citrus-based grilled fish. Medium weight with prominent tart flavors of lemony citrus and green berries, and the finish offers a hint of fresh hay.",Young Vines,DeWaal
"A little too harsh and raw, and there's heat from high alcohol, although there are other things to like about this Zin. It's dry and spicy, with complex wild berry, currant, cola and beef jerky flavors. The alcohol is 15.4%.",Heritage Selection Zen Ranch,Bianchi
"A Merlot to drink now for its rich cherry, red currant, green olive, herb and cedar flavors. It's a little sharp, so pair it with rich, fatty meats and cheeses.",,Keating
"Pretty good Merlot for its dryness and classy mouthfeel. Shows blackberry, cherry, herb and oak flavors, with solid tannins. Beginning to dry out, so drink now.",,Twomey
"This is a distinctive and expressive take on Prosecco with uniquely floral aromas that resemble dried rose or lavender. You'll also recognize shades of cut grass and herbs buried nicely within the foamy cream of the sparkler's soft, foamy mouthfeel.",Verv Extra Dry,Andreola
"Solid to start out, with mostly clean, fresh berry aromas and some medicinality. The palate is snappy, juicy and clean, with black cherry, plum and berry flavors. Forward on the finish, and composed for what is essentially a standard Malbec.",,Espuela del Gaucho
"This is powerful and determined, with high alcohol that covers some of the more delicate aromas of butterscotch, caramel and vanilla. Sweet candied fruit flavors and natural richness help bring balance back in the mouth.",375ml,Fattoria di Basciano
"Full-bodied wine that is soft, washing easily over the palate. The downside is that it lacks definition, the tannic structure lost in the velvet texture. Drink now.",Château de la Perrière,Georges Duboeuf
"Packed with strawberry aromas and red berry fruits, this is a ripe, fruit-forward wine only lightly disturbed by tannins. There is a great juicy quality here.",Château des Bachelards,Georges Duboeuf
"This crystalline sparkling wine delivers very distinctive aromas of apricot, mature melon, caramel, butterscotch and yellow rose. The wine has enough natural structure and acidity to pair with quiche Lorraine.",,Fongaro
"A light wine with strawberry freshness and prominent acidity. Bright and vivid, showing a core layer of firmer structure.",,Domaine de la Ferté
"Slightly earthy and herbal smelling but with enough clean fruit on the nose to make the grade. The palate is fairly flush, with blackberry, baked notes and bitter chocolate flavors. Fleshy and warm overall, with a thick finish that's lightly peppery and toasty.",,Bodega Norton
"A very different composition from the 2007 Les Chevaux, this year's blend is 34% Merlot, 30% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Syrah, 8% Cabernet Franc and 8% Malbec. It's a tannic wine, and seems to put a lot of emphasis on the vanilla/tobacco flavors that characterize so many blended reds these days. Fair value, but somewhat generic.",H3 Les Chevaux Red Wine,Columbia Crest
"A bit muted and light on intensity with soft ripe stone fruit and citrus aromas and flavors. Slightly prickly in the mouth with a short but clean finish, this is a good choice for heartier roast chicken dishes.",,Neil Ellis
"This red Passito dessert wine from Tuscany offers bittersweet aromas of wild cherry, raspberry, cassis and cola. It makes a simple but clean impression in the mouth and would pair with chocolate brownies or cherry pie.",Scalabreto 500ml,Morisfarms
"Strong scents of oak and butter come rushing out of the glass, with a medicinal edge. Though it has had some bottle age, this wine has not yet knit together. The ripe, soft, banana-flavored fruit and the forceful oak components are distinct and separate. Try it with pasta or poultry in a rich cream sauce that can pull everything together.",,Apex
"This is a perfect option for those looking for an informal, easy expression of Prosecco. The sparkling wine opens with floral and fruity notes of rose and apricot and there's a slightly heavier note of butterscotch or caramel at the back.",Extra Dry,Italo Cescon
"Smells different than most, with blueberry, carob and exotic sandalwood. Takes a dive on the palate, where it's sweet, syrupy and flat, almost like prune juice. Along those lines, it tastes pruny, with chocolate on the finish. Struggles to achieve balance.",,Manos Negras
"Strange smelling, with aromas of exotic spices, blueberry and some other notes that don't come across that well. Feels solid and chunky, with herbal, sweet flavors that culminate in a dry, rubbery, herbal-tasting finish.",,Laberinto
"Citric smelling, with clipped aromas of berry fruits. Choppy tannins, heat and raisiny, sweet, cooked berry flavors and stemmy notes finish herbal tasting but full in feel.",Luna Benegas,Benegas
"Too sweet, like pineapple and pear juice sweetened with white sugar. The underlying wine is pretty good, with decent acidity and a clean minerality. But that sweetness is over the top.",,Sebastiani
"Mild lemon and minerally aromas are about as expressive as it gets, although you get some apple and melon flavors. Finishes with more apple flavor, a fleshy feel and not much follow through.",,Tierra de Antes
"The nose is a tad dusty, with hints of unripe fruit and leaves, but the palate on this brut sparkling is clean and lemony, with a sharp, steely profile. Aggressive on the attack, with a stark, brisk acidity, it finishes with abundantly mouth-filling froth.",KrimSekt White Collection Brut,Artemovsk
"Smells flat and sweet, with a plastic-like essence. Zesty in feel but angular, with tangy acids and candied red-fruit flavors along with a pinch of dry spice. Tastes oaky on the finish. Tempranillo with 20% Garnacha.",Cortijo III,Cortijo
"Tosti's sparkling Asti offers a saccharine-sweet quality and aromas of lemon soda, candied fruit and honey. Perfect for dried biscuits or fresh fruit, the wine is soft, round and sticky on the close.",,Tosti
"This easy sparkling Moscato from northern Italy opens with aromas of yellow rose, peach, honey and almond skin. The wine is sweet, but not exaggeratedly so, and offers a light, delicate effervescence.",,Moscadoro
"Neutral smelling except for pithy white fruit aromas. Feels sticky but not cloying, with lychee flavors that turn bitter towards the end. Short on the finish, with little activity or lasting flavor.",,Conquista
"Foxy cherry and cough drop aromas are not convincing. Feels astringent and tastes tart, with sharp but candied cherry, faux oak and milk chocolate flavors. Blends sour notes with sweet oak, all to little avail.",Family Vineyards Organic Legacy Old Vines Single Vineyard,Caligiore
"Rooty aromas come with a caustic side, something akin to Pine Sol or ammonia. Feels narrow and restricted, with limited berry flavors, juniper and other weird elements. An intense wine, but not in the right way.",,Viña Ijalba
"Sweet and simple, with orange and vanilla cream flavors.",Espiritu,Pomar Junction
"Pasty and powdery smelling, with a flat, dull-feeling palate. Tastes sweet, fleshy and candied in front of a sugary finish with cotton candy flavors. Too sweet and simple to be taken more seriously.",Malbec,Zorzal
"The bouquet is demanding, with burnt tire rubber, horse, heavy char and muddled black-fruit aromas. Feels closed and tastes buttery and burnt, with barrel char and resin sitting heavily atop herbal berry flavors. A heavily made-up wine.",,Camino del Inca
"Smells like wet clay with an accent of floral black fruit. In the mouth, it's edgy and sharp, with rock-hard tannins that clamp down. Tastes lactic but not creamy, with sharp red-fruit flavors and a hard finish.",,Mil Piedras
"Soft, sweet and high in alcohol, with candied berry flavors and an unripe hint of vegetables.",,Pomar Junction
"Soft, sweet, hot and underripe, with vegetal flavors. Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petite Sirah.",Orchestration,D'Anbino
"Unbalanced, with lots of acidity, hard tannins and raisiny flavors alongside green ones.",Bernier Zinyard,Peterson
"Tastes like fruit-based syrup, with cherry and spice flavors. Lacks vivacity.",,Pomar Junction
"A hard wine to like. It's o.k. for parties and such, but is pretty simple and sweet.",Collection,Stonegate
"Made in the popular style, this Chardonnay features buttered popcorn, pineapple jam and buttered toast flavors. Turns cloyingly sweet on the finish.",,Sebastiani
It's soft and sweet and tastes like prune juice and crushed black pepper. The blend is based on Cabernet Sauvignon and Petite Sirah.,Train Wreck,Pomar Junction
"Green smelling. Feels thick, grabby and stewed, with herbal, saucy flavors of tomato and red berry. That same sauciness defines the herbal finish.",,Andeluna
"Simple and soft, with sugary sweet apricot and orange flavors that turn cloying on the finish.",No. 67,Foyt Family
"Sweet, soft and simple to the point of insipid, with jellied apricot, orange and vanilla flavors.",,Pomar Junction
"Burnt and roasted up front, with a leathery nose that doesn't convey freshness. Feels choppy and acidic, with herbal, semitart flavors of burnt berry fruit. Minty and green on the finish.",Don David Reserve,Michel Torino
"Smells grassy, jumpy and foxy, and while it sports a decent feel on the palate, it's herbal and tomatoey in terms of flavor, with a vegetal undertone. Green and oaky on the finish.",Reserva,Viñas de Vila
"This Vino da Tavola rosé has no appellation or vintage date, butopens with ripe strawberry nuances and sweet almond paste. It offers a powdery, semisweet feel in the mouth.",Note di Rosa,Il Valentiano
"Vegetal and a little unclean, with deficient acidity that makes the fruit tastes insipid and sweet. Meanwhile, high alcohol makes it all hot.",,Peterson
"Very dry and a little bitter. Try with grilled meats or chicken, as a little protein fat will soften the tannins and make the wine taste sweeter in berries and cherries than it really is.",,Greystone Cellars
"Smells like green pepper, saline and green apple. The palate has a pithy feel and sweet, mildly flabby flavors of tropical and citrus fruits. Seems a touch bitter and pithy on the back palate, with lime peel controlling the finish.",Block Selection Reserve,La Playa
"The fruit is certainly ripe here, but is really very young. It has good berry fruits and some soft tannins, relying on its juiciness to balance the fresh acidity.",Le de Lagarde,Lagarde
"Although this Zinfandel, Carignane and Petite Sirah blend is rustic, the price makes it a good value in a dry, full-bodied red wine. With its strong tannins and flavors of currants and black pepper, it will be nice with Mexican food.",Reds,Laurel Glen
Heavy bottles and heavy extract seem to go together; proving the point is this wine. Heavy toast dominates the berry fruit. The normal wine from Cheval Noir is much more attractive.,Château Cheval Noir Le Fer,Mähler-Besse
"This is a blend of 90% Tempranillo, with the balance of Garnacha and Graciano. It's from one of the new appellations in Lodi. Seems like there's a soft, dry, complex wine in there, with cherry and herb flavors, but too much oak weighs it down and makes it heavy.",Tres Tintos,Odisea
"Dry, but too ripe to the point of overripeness, with the cherry jam and chocolate flavors veering into Port, particularly on the finish, where a caramelized raisin taste dominates. Drink now.",Four Boys Vineyard,Pessagno
"Luminous and light, this is a vibrant sparkler redolent of sweet stone fruit, honey and yellow rose. A firm mineral note runs through the middle to keep it focused.",Extra Dry,Poggio delle Robinie
"Pungent and spicy, this has a scent that suggests it includes a fair amount of Riesling and perhaps some Muscat in the blend__he winery does not disclose the cuvée. It's medium-bodied, with a neutral palate of green apples and a whiff of orange liqueur.",Brut,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"Dark in color and aromas. The nose starts out sulfuric and gassy, but settles on rubber and earthy black fruit. In the mouth, there's poking, prodding acidity and basic flavors of blackberry, herbal tea and leather. Grabby on the finish, with a mild acidic scour.",Ique,Enrique Foster
"This playful Recioto opens with black, inky concentration and thick aromas of blackberry, sweet clove, Christmas spice and nutmeg. There are some green herb or grass-like notes and the wine is sweet, chewy and slightly raw or bitter on the close.",375 ml,Fattoria Garbole
"The wine shows bitter fruits, a layer of dry tannins as well as attractive acidity. It has a touch of spice over the juicy, fruity aftertaste.",Château du Grand Vernay,Georges Duboeuf
A rich and soft Merlot-dominated wine with a wood element that broadens the texture and enhances the black plum and berry flavors. Ready to drink now.,Leo Vinis,Caves Fleury
"Stalky in character, this has black currant fruits on a lean structure. The wood is not yet fully integrated and the wine could well flesh out in a couple of years.",,Château Béard la Chapelle
"This blend of Bordeaux varieties with Syrah is dry and rustic. It's very ripe in blackberries, with a shriveled raisin taste that veers into Port. Drink now.",,De Tomas
"This wine would compare favorably with the least expensive Sauv Blancs from New Zealand or Chile. It avoids the unripe pea vine or asparagus flavors that can afflict those wines, and brings light, fresh, sweetly grassy flavors to the palate. A little unfocused, but pleasurable and crisp, this is a good all-purpose seafood wine.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"A wine with some character, almonds and green herbs broadening out the bright and crisp acidity. This has freshness but also weight.",,Château Grand Jean
"An interesting blend of 39% Rhine Riesling, 28% Viognier, 13% Chardonnay, 9% Chenin Blanc, 8% Sauvignon Blanc and 3% Sémillon. Tropical fruit, tangerine citrus, lychee and yellow florals fill the light mouth, followed by a lively and somewhat brisk finish.",Blanc de Mer,Bouchard Finlayson
"A little stalky, with straw and hay aromas along with white-fruit scents and corn. The palate is big and thick, almost sticky, with slightly burnt, resiny flavors but even more sweet tropicality. Candied on the finish and weighty.",Family Selection,Luis Felipe Edwards
"Very sweet in sugary blackberry jam and chocolate flavors, brightened with good acidity. Wants for greater concentration and complexity.",Syrah,Krupp Brothers
"Simple and dominated by red fruit and mild green aromas and flavors. The palate has some sharpness due to high acidity, and the flavor profile shows generic ripe berry and not much on the back end. Good but not very interesting.",Broquel,Trapiche
"Light and tart, this brings cranberry and pepper flavors, which lead into a swift, sharp, tannic finish.",,Willow Crest
"This is estate-grown, Merlot, estate grown, with a fragrant and spicy nose. The herbaceousness is reminiscent of Carmenère, and it continues into a somewhat green mid-palate. Best paired with a grilled steak or burger, so the tannins and acids have some fat to cut through.",,Willow Crest
"Though labeled simply Columbia Valley, the grapes are single vineyard, Rattlesnake Hills AVA fruit. The best of the Girly Girl lineup, though the promising beginning (cassis and berry, scented with black olive and herb) quickly fades into a forest floor finale of decaying leaves.",Girly Girl,Silver Lake
"A little thin, but a really nice wine. Likeable for its upfront acidity and minerality, and flavors of citrus fruits, peaches, green apples and honey. The slightly sweet finish makes it a nice partner for Chinese and Vietnamese fare.",,Castle Rock
"Syrah is a real strength in Washington, but this wine does not capture the depth and detail of which it is capable. It's a pleasant, light, well balanced, generic red wine, with brambly blackberry fruit and gentle tannins.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This Zin seems to have lots of hot-climate fruit, for it's very soft in structure and very ripe. With pleasant raspberry, red currant and black pepper flavors, it's a little simple, but clean and easy to drink.",Old Vine,Bogle
"Made with Traminer and Chardonnay grapes, this luminous Brut sparkling wine opens with floral aromas of jasmine and honeysuckle backed by peach and yellow fruit. It's a simple but smart little wine that would pair with appetizers.",Traminer Brut,Bortolotti
"Opens with briar, raspberry and a spot of char. The palate is basic, simple in feel, maybe a touch curt, but overall the wine is fresh and tastes of plum and herbal berry fruit. It's slightly dry and leafy, but it's bright and fresh in the mouth, with good balance.",Xplorador,Concha y Toro
"A core of dry tannins and an austere edge give a wine that is hard to like. There is some attractive berry fruit, but it is caught up in the hard character.",Château Picard,Mähler-Besse
"Smells strongly of corn, stalky fruit, herbs and grass. Mouthfeel is not a problem, although it's a little sticky on the palate. Tastes heavily herbal and green, with an oaky covering. Short, woody and herbal on the finish.",,Antigua Bodega
"Oxidized aromas are not inviting. After the doughy, yeasty opening, the palate deals oxidized flavors of bitter and sweet red plum. Bitter on the finish; barely worth a look.",Rosé,Hom
"Cloudy to the eye, with strained aromas of sauerkraut and barnyard animal. Feels heavy and tastes rustic, with burnt, stalky, anonymous flavors. Shows bitterness and stalky flavors on the finish.",Premium Rosé of Malbec,Piattelli
"A beautifully structured wine, with its tannins layered between the ripest black plums, damsons and black currants. It is opulent while remaining dense, concentrated and very serious. Certainly a wine for long-term aging.",,Château Léoville Las Cases
"In keeping with the voluptuous approachability of the 2007 vintage, this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is simply fabulous now for its flood of the ripest, sweetest blackberrries, cherries, cassis and chocolate imaginable. Especially noble is the tannin structure, firm and soft, dry and sweet, a combination of opposites. The depth is vast, and the spicy finish goes on for a long time, suggesting the wine's concentration. Simply a joy to drink, it should develop over many years, but you might want to err on the side of youthfulness and open it by 2015.",Hillside Select,Shafer
"One sip is all it takes to fall in love with this 100% Cabernet, which hails from the winery's Stags Leap District vineyards. It's soft, lush and opulent in blackberry, cherry, blueberry, cassis, dark chocolate and smoky oak flavors. Although it was aged in 100% new French oak, the oak isn't at all heavy. Rather, it's perfect, adding just the right touch of smoke. Really fabulous, and the tannins define Stags Leap, so strong yet sweetly refined. If you can keep your hands off it, this is a wine to cellar for many years.",Cask 23 Estate,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"Solid as a battleship, with lemony oak, marzipan and layer upon layer of black fruit aromas. Almost syrupy in its richness but not fully; it's chewy and creamy, with vital acids. The flavors are mega ripe and rich, emphasizing blackberry, black cherry preserves, fudge and fig paste. Yet at the same time it's an ethereal wine; the epitome of modern Rioja. Drink now through 2015.",Cirsion,Bodegas Roda
"The legendary Vargellas Vinha Velha comes from the oldest vines of Quinta de Vargellas. This 2009 vintage is concentrated and impressive, its beautiful ripe fruits and dark chocolate backed by an immense structure. The gentler side of the wine comes through in its perfumed character. A wine that deserves many years of aging.",Vargellas Vinha Velha Vintage,Taylor Fladgate
"Enormous tannins, dominant black fruit and a solid, dense structure. The wine, packed with dark fruits, dry tannins, very firm in character. With its huge tannins as well as fruit, this is a wine that really needs many years of aging.",,Château Montrose
"Taylor Fladgate's vintage Ports are always among the legendary wines. This hugely structured wine keeps the dense, perfumed tradition very much alive. Along with the power, it also has wonderful fruit, bursting out with blackberry jam. Even with all the fruitiness, it needs to age for decades.",Vintage,Taylor Fladgate
"A hugely rich, powerful Chardonnay, layering ripe fruit with a core of tannic structure, acidity, wood and huge depth of flavor. The wine is concentrated, with layers of fruit and textured acidity. Of course, it needs aging_7 years at least.",,Louis Jadot
"You don't have to age this wine__arvis did it for you, holding it back more than five years before release, which is a very expensive proposition for a winery. It's a splendid Cabernet, with the tannins soft and velvety. The blackberry and black currant fruit flavors are as fresh and vibrant as the day the wine was bottled, an early indication of its ageability. This wonderful wine is so good, you can drink it now, but it will continue to evolve in the bottle for many years.",Estate,Jarvis
"With a structure that runs between acidity and dark smoky tannins, this is a wine with potential opulence. It's very rich in character, dense and dark. The black plum flavors are dominant, along with excellent acidity. For the long-term.",,Château Pichon Longueville
"Gigantic and impossibly tannic. Don't even think about drinking this Cabernet now. It's tightly wrapped in astringency, yet the molten core of blackberries, currants, blueberries and dark chocolate, and a firm minerality, almost guarantees extended aging through 2016, at least. It's a worthy followup to the 2006 and 2007.",Obsidian,Arkenstone
"A great Pinot Noir, although it's rugged now in its youth, with a scoury mouthfeel. Raspberries, cherries, cola, mushrooms splashed with balsamic, and white pepper, clove and cinnamon spices mark the flavors. Should emerge from austerity by 2015 and provide good drinking for several years afterward.",Rosemary's Vineyard,Talley
"A classic Fonseca, rich and powerful, with just an extra edge of weight from the vintage. It has a dry character, a tannic edge that gives great promise, but the open-hearted fruit is all there. A wonderfully intense wine for aging.",Vintage,Fonseca
"A superbly rich wine, with its acidity well integrated into the concentrated and rounded fruit. It has great texture and fruit that bursts from the glass. It is generous, warm and toasty, while also preserving the steeliness that is hallmark of the Les Clos vineyard. Age for at least five years.",Clos des Hospices Les Clos Grand Cru,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"Here the high alcohol does not obscure the layered fruits and overall complexity of this exceptional Cabernet. Thick, ripe and richly endowed, it keeps its black fruit, ripe tannins and liquorous barrel notes all in proportion, and pulls in top flight fruit from Champoux, Sagemoor, the estate vineyard and other select sites. Earth, cedar and tobacco notes highlight the extended finish.",Artist Series #18,Woodward Canyon
"An enormous Cabernet, but it's not simply the power of its fruit that's so impressive. Shows massive blackberry, blueberry, crème de cassis and oak flavors packed into profoundly beautiful tannins. The fruit is so sweet that it's surprising how dry the finish is. The winemaker, Ted Henry, also is at the helm of Jarvis. This young Cabernet should develop over the next dozen years, at least, in a good cellar.",Midoriya Hills Vineyard,Prime
"Huge, tremendous, authoritative and impressive for its sheer volume. It just explodes in blackberries, cassis, dark chocolate, leather, dried herb and smoky oak flavors, with a tangy minerality. The vineyard is in the Stags Leap tenderloin, and the wine combines an approachable drink-me-now quality with obvious ageworthiness through at least 2016. Only 180 cases were produced.",Brenda's Vineyard,Baldacci
"A five-grape blend from a range of outstanding vineyards__tillwater, Dionysus, Bacchus, Sagemoor and Weinbau. The detail and the dance between delicate nuances of vineyard and vine, and the supple berry and black fruit flavors, make this a wine to contemplate as well as savor. Can be drunk young for its vitality and superb structure, or cellared for another decade or more.",,Corliss Estates
"An awesome Cabernet, so elegant, powerful and refined. As softly attractive as it is, it has a reserve of power that should enable it to age effortlessly. Ripe, sweet tannins house exorbitant flavors of blackberries and cassis, accented with new oak. It makes for a full-bodied, showy 100% Cabernet, drinkable now and over the next 15 years.",S.L.V. Estate,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"The Celilo vineyard has contributed the fruit to many outstanding Chardonnays from a who's who list of winemakers, but none better than this. Intensely concentrated and deeply extracted, it explodes with marvelously pure fruit flavors__he full range of citrus, citrus peel and crisp tree fruits. A wine with perfect virtually balance, exceptional texture and amazing length.",,Tranche
"Sheer opulence is the hallmark of this wine. Call it feminine in its soft silkiness, and the way the raspberry, cherry and sandalwood flavors caress the palate. Yet there's a firmness of structure, a stony, minerally quality that lends power and authority. Great now, and will develop in the bottle for the next 6_8 years.",Rincon Vineyard,Talley
"El Bosque is Eguren family top-shelf Rioja that's a knockout. It's dark as night, with dusty aromas of cola, cocoa, marzipan, blackberry and spice all rolled into a finessed whole. Feels tight as a drum but balanced, with monstrous flavors of boysenberry, cassis, peppercorn, baking spices and chocolate. Young and raring to go; hold until 2013 then drink through 2018.",Finca El Bosque,Sierra Cantabria
"A taut, steely, very mineral wine, showing a tense, textured character. Fruit flavors run from grapefruit to peach, with a delicious tang of zest along the way. With its acidity and structure, this is a wine for long-term aging.",Les Clos Grand Cru,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"This Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend is a best-of-barrels selection from Summers' various Cabs throughout Napa Valley. It's unquestionably a big wine, densely packed with blackberry, cherry and dark chocolate flavors. It's also very young. The tannins pack a real punch. New oak, to the tune of 100%, is apparent in the buttered toast richness. Don't drink it now, good as it is. Give it until 2014, and it will develop long beyond that.",Checkmate,Summers
"Go ahead, knock this wine for high alcohol, if you want. It's still one of the best blends of its kind in California. It oozes blackberry and blueberry jam, melted dark chocolate, bacon, anise and pepper flavors that are extraordinarily rich. Drink it soon for maximum freshness.",Relentless,Shafer
"As good as varietal Petit Verdot gets, this delicious effort marries ripe red and black fruit to firm tannins streaked with minerals. It has the density and length of a cellar-worthy powerhouse, yet retains the elegance and balance to drink young.",Champoux Vineyard,Sineann
"The first Ross Andrew vintage for this Old Block (original planting) Boushey Syrah, it clearly displays the vineyard's defining characteristics__ powerful mix of herb, funk, game and brambly berry fruit flavors. Depth, density, complexity and nicely layered highlights make this a wine that never quits on you. It tastes like old vine fruit should__ubtle, supple and balanced.",Old Block Boushey Vineyard,Ross Andrew
"Dark and tarry at first, then more red and floral as it opens. It shows snappy acidity and fresh, herbal-tasting plum, cherry and berry flavors along with some cocoa and spice. Fades fast on the finish, leaving a mild acidic burn.",Pionero,Morandé
"A simple, soft, juicy red wine, full of ripe berry fruits. Delicious now; try it with barbecue. Juice and spice in a bottle. Screw cap.",Red,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
"From the 2003 vintage, this sweet red wine shows well evolved aromas of candied fruit, prune, black raisin, exotic spice and barbecue wood. The wine sports tight, gritty tannins and soft, jammy sweetness on the close.",500ml,L'Arco
"Seems soft and acidic at the same time, which gives it a rustic mouthfeel. But this 100% Sangiovese is nicely dry and silky, with good flavors of cherries, pomegranates, cocoa, anise and pepper. Drink now.",O2 Series,Ortman Family
"Opens with minty aromas, molasses, prune, fern and chocolate. The mouth is round but tannic, with mouthfilling, heavy flavors of stewed black fruits, herbs and earth. A solid wine but it's short on brightness and seems kind of stocky and baked.",Reserva,Staphyle
Spago Nero is a bright and buoyant Prosecco tied with a black string that is the traditional closure for informal sparkling wines in the Veneto region. This expression is perfumed and floral with sweet peach flavors.,Spago Nero,Riondo
"Mocha and creamy baked-berry aromas give it a soupy, chunky start, while the palate is rich and meaty for a $10 kosher wine. Flavors run sweet and syrupy, and a touch herbal, while the finish is full and chewy. Not exact but still a pretty good wine for the price.",Kosher,Terra Vega
"Firmly tannic wine that has a tight, overextracted structure. The fruit is firmly suppressed by the tannic edifice, and at four years old should be more in balance.",Le Charmois Premier Cru,Michel Picard
"Shiraz, Mourvèdre, Grenache, Tempranillo and Carignan all play parts in this Barossa blend, adding up to a wine that features ample cassis fruit and modest tobacco and cedar shadings. It's medium-bodied, a straightforward accompaniment to red meats or cheeses. Drink now.",Layers,Peter Lehmann
"Light in aromas, with hints of Barlett pear, vanilla and stone. The palate is tangy and citric, with lemon-lime and green apple flavors. Turns more astringent and tart the more you get to know it, so chill it down and drink it soon for best results.",Limited Edition,Catrala
"Here's a good, everyday Chardonnay that will satisfy fans of the variety who want a hit of oak. It's smooth in pineapples and peaches, with layers of buttered toast and cream.",,CC
"The rustic aromas are off-putting in this wine. It has a proper density but seems to have a musty character. This could blow off over time, because the fruit is here.",,Château Bellegrave
"This Rhône blend is dry, fruity and pleasurable now. It has earthy flavors of herbs, cherries, beef jerky and white pepper, wrapped into a light, silky texture.",Cashmere,Cline
"Surprisingly lightweight for a 2009 Bordeaux , here is a fresh, red berry-flavored wine with attractive fruit and a core of firm tannins. Drink now.",Grande Cuvée,Château Grand Rolland
"Prosecco Cortenova offers some sticky aromas of honeysuckle and caramel beyond fresher nuances of citrus, peach and creamy honey. The luminous sparkler is bright and firm on the close with a sharp, citrusy fade.",,Cortenova
"Cherry fruit and peppery spice mark the aromas of this effort, which features a surprisingly light feel in the mouth despite ample (14.5%) alcohol. The flavors are red fruit rather than cassis, with hints of brown sugar and baking spices in support. Probably best over the next few years.",The High Trellis,D'Arenberg
"The mouthfeel is clean, foamy and the wine leaves dried grass notes on the close. A fun and cheerful wine with an easy personality that makes it the perfect pairing partner to fried sage leaves or herb-encrusted cheese.",Verv Brut,Andreola
"A pretty good Pinot that shows an introductory level of quality at a decent price. Dry and silky, it has some nice cherry, cola and spice flavors.",,Angeline
"Pretty good for a Cabernet, with rich blackberry and cherry flavors and a rich overlay of smoky oak. Loses steam with some overripe raisins and an overly soft texture. Drink now.",Estate,Astrale e Terra
"Racy and bright, with high acidity framing dry flavors of lemons, limes and grapefruits. There's a green streak of gooseberry that signals some unripeness.",Reserve,Frei Brothers
"Passerina is a native grape from central Italy that imparts thick aromas of yellow candy and butterscotch. This golden sparkling wine spends six month on the lees for even warmer and creamier aromas of apricot, honey and pressed yellow rose.",Villa Prandone Emmanuel Maria Extra Dry,Il Conte
"The blend is 60% Cabernet Sauvignon, 19% Merlot, 15% Cabernet Franc and 6% Petit Verdot, which in this case has yielded a wine that is a bit austere on the palate, marked by taut acids and crisp berry fruit. Some herbal overtones are apparent as well. This is not an overweight Barossa wine by any means.",Memory Hill,Kest Wines
"A little overripe and hot, with some raisins and prunes alongside the blackberries, but dry and finely tannic, with a soft, spicy mouthfeel. This rustic Zinfandel drinks well with barbecue.",,Hauck
"Shows a warm, baked bouquet with black fruit, licorice and toasty aromas. The palate, however, is high in acid, thus it churns and burns as it's offering bright, sheer berry flavors. Crisp and a little hot on the finish, but with good overall flavors and enough solidity to make it a value.",,Viña Santa Maria
"Though it opens with a somewhat sweaty nose, once in the mouth this wine settles in to a base of black cherry fruit and earthy tannins. There are streaks of leaf and graphite, plenty of firm acids, and enough weight to out-muscle most inexpensive Merlots from California. Made with organically grown grapes.",Naked,Snoqualmie
"Flowery and fresh on the nose, with lemon-lime aromas. The palate is smooth, not too demanding or rough, and tastes of papaya and green banana. It's a dry sparkler with not too much flavor, but it's honest, with a good bouquet and feel to it.",Sparkling Chardonnay,Alma Negra
"A touch sharp and edgy, but still sound enough with its full berry, smoke and rubbery aromas. The palate has a moderately fresh feel along with herbal, snappy flavors of red plum, cherry and pepper. Spicy and dry on the finish.",Reserva,Luis Felipe Edwards
"Lots of zesty acidity in this Sauvignon Blanc, with pineapple and lemon jam flavors. It's a dry, tart and mouthwateringly fresh white wine, and a good apéritif sipper.",Bevill Vineyard,Hauck
"Smoky sweet plum aromas lead to a well structured Burgundy. It has ripe fruit and a layer of fine tannins. The acidity is perhaps high, a product of 2008. Screw cap.",Bourgogne Pinot Noir Signature,Maison Champy
"Fresh and dry, this drinks easily and invites glass after glass. There are aromas of white flower, stone, peach and pear and the wine is fresh and tonic on the close.",Brut,Canaletto
"Since we last reviewed a vintage of Romaneira, with the 2005 wine, the estate has moved closer to realizing its potential. This is an impressive, powerful yet elegant wine. Its dark fruits are sustained by wood and leavened by acidity. It has a great sense of style and considerable aging potential.",Tinto,Quinta da Romaneira
"One of the ultimate expressions of Etna, San Lorenzo is an elegant, determined and sophisticated wine with a steady stream of delicate aromas__ild berry, crushed granite, smoke and cola__hat build in momentum and evolve beautifully over time. The mouthfeel is firm and structured, with polished tannins and a bright berry endnote.",San Lorenzo,Girolamo Russo
"A substantial Bordeaux blend that trips into the palate on cat's feet__ delicate touch that gradually gains mass and dimension. It's compact and balanced, with a core of red fruit, a floral top note, and complex layers of mineral and metal. Give it time to open up, and see how the spicy fruit seamlessly mingles with satiny tannins; it scales up and out without being blocky or tiring.",Red,Corliss Estates
An impressively ripe wine that still keeps its structure and sense of place. There's a chalky-steely character to go with the richness. Green plums are merged with apricots to show great fine fruit. Age five years.,Les Referts Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"A gorgeous Cabernet, among the best Summers has ever released. Actually, their Reserve Cab tends to fly under the radar, and is a good buy for that reason, although they did raise the price considerably with this '08 bottling. The wine, which is 100% Cabernet, is showing beautifully now, with soft, rich tannins and luscious flavors of blackberries, black currants, dark chocolate and plenty of new oak. It will evolve in the bottle for many years.",Reserve,Summers
"This single-vineyard Rioja always impresses through its impeccable balance, depth of aromas and richness. Aromas of jammy blackberry come with blueberry, orange peel, graham cracker and graphite. It's tight and mildly tannic, with pure boysenberry, cassis, roasted plum, charred spice and toast flavors. Coconut, vanilla and coffee flavors are on the front side of the finish. A beautiful wine that will be best from 2013_2016.",La Nieta,Viñedos de Paganos
"So upfront in spectacularly ripe raspberry, cherry and mocha flavors, it's hard to keep from draining the bottle now. This shows the classic tannins of Stags Leap, soft and sweet but potent. Drink it now and enjoy for sheer opulence, but you might be missing out on something really special around 2016.",Fay Estate,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"An intense, mineral-driven wine, tasting of the limestone soil as well as very ripe fruit. Great acidity keeps the richness in line, toast offering sweetness. The wine is full-bodied, the flavors going right through to the apple-skin-textured core.",Clos Saint Marc Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Abeja's Chardonnays are as certain to hit their target as a Kobe Bryant slam dunk, and the style remains consistent vintage after vintage. Spicy, nutty, based around stone fruits and melon, they do not shy away from the toasty flavors that derive from barrel fermentation in 40% new French oak. The underlying minerality and well-balanced acidity mark this as Washington fruit, most of it from the outstanding Conner Lee vineyard.",,Abeja
"Doesn't say so on the label, but this is 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, from the Atlas Peak area. Very dry and tannic, with an astringent lockdown, it's functionally undrinkable now, but it does show the intensity of this mountainous region for Cabernet, with explosive blackberry, blueberry and black currant flavors. All indications are that it's an ager. Hold until 2015, at the very least.",Townsend Vineyard,Antica
"The tannins are very fine, with rich fruitcake and smoky flavors. Red berry and black plums give a fruity character, along with delicious acidity. The wine is structured while still remaining very approachable.",,Château Tronquoy-Lalande
"One of Portugal's legendary wines, this white Pêra-Manca is beautifully rounded and ripe, with apricots, toast and an intense series of fruit and herbal flavors. It has concentration, while also showing great elegance and impressive aging potential. Drink in two years, but also age for five.",Pêra-Manca Branco,Cartuxa
"A dense wine, the wood just showing at this stage through its dark tannins and superb rich fruit. The wine is ripe, with a density of tannins that go right down deep. Big and powerful.",,Clos du Marquis
"Ripe plush pineapple laces through the steely acidity of this tautly textured wine. Toast shows underneath all this richness, a subtle hint of smoke, while the fruits open out to reveal a massive wine. For aging over 5_6 years.",Les Folatières Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Formerly labeled simply as a Roussanne-Viognier blend, this is now the companion wine to Tranche's Slice of Pape Red. Here is a wine with power, balance and concentration. It's a polished, focused, utterly seductive blend, dominated by the Roussanne, but with the Viognier contributing brightness and a floral top note. There's a riot of fruit flavors, from citrus to tangerine to Macintosh apple and spiced pear, with a slightly saline finish.",Slice of Pape Blanc,Tranche
"If you cellar only a few Napa Cabernets a year, this is one you should seek out. It's so tannic, so shut down, yet so explosive in blackberries, currants, dark chocolate and sweet oak, that it will easily negotiate the next decade. If you really have to open it before 2015, at least give it a decent decant.",Estate Special Reserve,Reverie
"Almost as perfect a Stags Leap Cabernet as you can find, showing lush, opulent and immediately appealing flavors. Blackberries, plums, cassis, dark chocolate and sweet oak combine in a spicy swirl. The tannins are fiercely soft, an oxymoron that suggests the wine's complexity. Yet those same tannins are astringent enough to warrant time in the cellar. Hold until 2014, at least.",,Baldacci
"Abeja winemaker John Abbott sources fruit for this 100% Merlot from the estate (Heather Hill) vineyard and old-vine Bacchus grapes. Lush and full across the palate, this utterly delicious wine marshals an army of pretty red and black fruit into a silky smooth flavor formation, then wraps them in a tapestry of floral, caramel, coconut, coffee and chocolate highlights.",,Abeja
"Quite young and tight, with primary apple, melon and stone-fruit flavors, this is that rare domestic Chardonnay that surely will reward cellaring. With decanting it becomes creamier, with an aromatic lift of cinnamon and a thread of vanilla running through the toasty finish. A baby, but already delicious.",,Woodward Canyon
"A rank well above most PX sweeties, with lush but fresh aromas of raisin and spice that are distinctly not syrupy or heavy. Feels thick, but there's enough acidity to cut through the wine's weight. Flavors of caramel and chocolate are ideal, and the finish is smooth, not heavy, and has bounce in its step. A beautiful PX any way you cut it.",Solera 1927,Alvear
"From what may well be the most beautiful vineyard in Italy comes this gorgeous expression of elegance and power. Guardiola is a tiny plot on the slopes of Mount Etna with blackened soils, majestic fruit trees and religious shrines peppered between a jungle of gnarled grapevines. The wine delivers a steady stream of wild berry and mineral nuances, all backed by a firm, drying mouthfeel.",Guardiola,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"Testarossa is better known for Pinot Noir, but their Syrahs, and particularly those from Garys' Vineyard, are some of the best around. This 2009 is delectable now for its sheer drinkability. It's rich and luscious in blackberry, blueberry, smoked meat, pepper and earthy tobacco flavors, wrapped into smooth, complex tannins.",Garys' Vineyard,Testarossa
"N'Anticchia is a wine that has rapidly reached cult status in Italy and around the world. Its elegance, beauty and overall sophistication represent the best of winemaking on Mount Etna. More importantly, however, it faithfully portrays a personality that reflects the dramatic volcanic environment of its origins. The aromas are delicate, fine and polished, but the finish is firm and powerful.",N'Anticchia,Pietro Caciorgna
"Mille e Una Notte is one of a handful of wines that defines the very best of Sicilian enology. Dark, luscious and penetrating, this sophisticated red blend shows deep layers of chocolate, cherry liqueur, dried sage, tobacco and leather. It's soft and silky rich on the long, delicious finish.",Mille e Una Notte,Donnafugata
"Based on the Roêda vineyard, this opulent, fruity wine is dense, beautifully ripe, a powerhouse of sweet fruit, figs and raisins, plum jelly and the roundest, most generous tannins. It's a wine that will show well in the next few years, but which should age magnificently.",Vintage,Croft
"Very juicy, smoky, smooth and velvety. It has great acidity as well as sweet fruit. An opulent, open wine, yet with a great final structure; big and sweet.",,Château Petit-Village
"Dryness marks this elegant Pinot Noir, a remarkable feat since the strawberry and raspberry fruit is so opulently ripe. With fresh acidity, firm tannins and a touch of minerals, it's a wonderful expression of Santa Rita fruit.",Rio Vista Vineyard,Dolina
"Perfectly sweet, unctuous and rich, with lush coffee and cocoa aromas that indicate that complexity is coming. That promise is rewarded on the palate, which hits fifth gear in seconds flat. Flavorwise, it's complex and balanced, with good acidity forcing up orange and honey flavors in addition to raisin and brown sugar. A Wow wine where there finish lasts for minutes on end.",Noe Viejo,González Byass
"J Winery goes against the grain of the modern high alcohol, superripe style to produce this bone dry, steely, somewhat austere young Chardonnay. It hits with a smack of acidity and minerals, with an elegant complexity that may challenge those looking for big, fruity Chards. Give it a couple years in the cellar and see how it evolves.",Strata Estate Grown,J Vineyards & Winery
"At this high alcohol, the wine should be bursting the envelope. Yet it still has great elegance, its richness rolling around the mouth. Red- and blackberry-jelly flavors are laced with fine tannins and a young, juicy aftertaste. Only at the end does the alcohol show.",Malhadinha Tinto,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"Packaged in a squat, medallion-shaped bottle, this fragrant Moscato Giallo offers a full bouquet of peach blossom, honey, acacia flower and jasmine. It's sweet and tangy in the mouth to the right measure and would pair with fruit salad or apricot tarts.",Giallo,Gaierhof
"Fresh berry fruits and soft tannins combine to give an easy, jammy wine. This is ripe, juicy and fruity, and ready to drink now.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"This blend of 54% Viognier, 40% Grenache Blanc and 6% Roussanne is a playful but very enjoyable wine. Green apple, lime, melon and hints of tropical fruit fill the medium weight mouth. A great match for hearty chicken or steak fish dishes.",,Goats do Roam Wine Co.
"Quite grassy and herbaceous, this is a Sauvignon Blanc for those who favor the tight, acidic-style of Loire valley versions. Citrus fruits and plenty of sharp acidity make this a wine to match with food, especially a nice goat cheese from the local farmers' market.",Quail Series,Covey Run
"Lightly tropical to begin with, then more sheering and acidic in the mouth, with high-toned, jacked-up flavors of green apple, pineapple and lemon. Quite snappy and fresh, with an aggressive but true and correct finish.",,Cinco Sentidos
"Here's a simple, grassy expression that is loaded tight with herbs, stone fruit, honey and cantaloupe. It tastes simple and clean and offers good crispness on the close.",Asolo Millesimato Extra Dry,Cirotto
"A touch of wood helps the wine's light fruit to deepen and become richer. The wine is well balanced, with fresh acidity giving a good lift.",Elevé en Fûts de Chêne,Château Grand Jean
"A fuller, more California style of Pinot with reduced black cherry and cough drop aromas followed by a medium-round palate with sweet cherry, chocolate and herbal flavors. It's hefty but not fat or flabby, with cola and medicinal aftertastes.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"A soft, creamy rosé sparkler, made by the traditional method, giving a light mousse, with suggestions of strawberries and a gentle, lightly acid aftertaste.",Rosé Brut Grand Cru,Szigeti
"Light for a Washington Cab, this is sturdy enough, showing cassis and cherry fruit in a high- acid frame. Tannins are herbal and tight, and the fruit/acid/tannin balance is well  handled. The grapes are organically grown.",Naked,Snoqualmie
"This newly released Prosecco offers cheerful aromas of hay, white flower and peach backed by crisp effervescence. The wine is fresh, clean and shows the best qualities of this unique Italian sparkling wine.",,Pizzolato
"A dry, somewhat harsh and rustic Cabernet. The blackberry, currant and cassis flavors are rich, yet the tannin structure is unbalanced, and there's some sharpness in the finish. Drink now.",,Municipal Winemakers
"More grassy, stemmy and green than ideal, with a heavy, syrupy mouthfeel and thick, herbal berry fruit flavors. It's a minty, leafy tasting wine but also one that's dark and full-bodied, with core sweetness. Needs more work and clarity.",EQ,Matetic
"Blackberry, licorice and leather on the nose lead to a tannic, firm palate with stretched dark plum and black cherry flavors. There's vibrancy and juiciness to the wine, with a firm finish that introduces chocolate. Highly regular, with nothing glaring or wrong.",Estate,Medrano
"Soft and rather jammy sweet, this Zin has fruit-forward flavors of cherries and raspberries, with plenty of white pepper and baking spices. Drink now.",,Windsor Sonoma
"Here's a simple and bright Moscato d'Asti that would pair with fruit salad or panna cotta with strawberries. The wine is sweet and fragrant with pretty aromas of jasmine, peach and honey. The bubbling is soft and creamy.",Antica Casa,Ricossa
"Just 730 cases were made of this dry, lightly fruity offering. Melon and white peach flavors seem to be dusted with powdered sugar, though there is no sweetness in the finish, just dry flavors of wet stone. A good, every day, all-purpose white.",Quail Series,Covey Run
"Juicy and fruity, with red berry fruits and a strong element of acidity. This is refreshing Bordeaux, soft, supple and light in the mouth.",,Château La Rame
"Smells bland, with a bit of apple. The palate is candied and soft, with sweet orange, mango and other tropical flavors. Finishes honeyed and lazy, with sweet, simple flavors of honeydew and apple juice.",Equilibrio Made With Organically Grown Grapes,Aresti
"Smells and tastes thin and stemmy, with watered down cherry and cola flavors. On the plus side, it's dry and silky.",,Heron
"A smooth, fruity wine, with fine red-cherry flavors and very soft tannins. It is spoiled by a banana flavor that intrudes into the fresh fruit.",Domaine du Buyats,Georges Duboeuf
"Opens with sharpness along with red-fruit notes and a hint of vinegar. The palate holds onto that acid-driven feel, and there's saucy, herbal berry and cherry flavors. Finishes on the shallow side, with a pinch of bitterness.",,Alberti 154
"Salinic upon opening, with thick, candied blackberry aromas along with orange peel. The wine is sincerely syrupy and rich for a value-priced Malbec, but it struggles with balance and comes across heavy, roasted and loaded down with candied berry and milk chocolate flavors.",Classic,Alta Vista
"Simple aromas of lemon and lychee are just fresh enough, while the palate offers good feel and pithy, somewhat bland flavors of the same fruits that appear on the bouquet. The finish is lemony, and overall this is a good, basic Torrontés to drink as soon as you can.",,Tercos
"This soft, simple wine will satisfy your basic Chardonnay needs. It's creamy and somewhat sweet, with pineapple and buttered popcorn flavors.",,MooBuzz
"A tartly acidic, jammy wine. Shows Zin-like flavors of raspberries, cherries and black pepper, with a sweet coat of sandalwood.",,Mosby
"A little too soft and harsh in texture, but it's nicely dry, with rich blackberry, crisp bacon, sandalwood and pepper flavors. Drink now.",,C.G. di Arie
"Minty and earthy, with aromas of plum, rubber and herbs. The palate is straight down the middle in terms of feel, while the flavors turn brambly and herbal, something the finish matches. Basic and a little strained.",,Filus
"A solid, all-purpose wine, this has some toast and vanilla components, along with straightforward fruit that hints at green apple. There's a little spice and butter in the aromas also.",Quail Series,Covey Run
"Sweet and baked smelling, with foxy core aromas that suggest wet dog fur. The palate is loud and wild, with foxy, unsettled flavors of wild berry and cherry. Runs low on layering, structure and body, but it is lively.",,Andeluna
"If more Syrah tasted like this, the variety just might overtake Cabernet in popularity. It's really good, combining a dry, firm structure with lush flavors, in the way of blackberries, blueberries, currants and a meatiness like the sweet, charred fat on a steak. Kudos to vintner Murray for bottling it in a screwtop.",Watch Hill Vineyard,Andrew Murray
"Richly textured wine, with pear and citrus fruit layered over an opulent core of ripe yellow fruits and toast. It develops slowly, opening to show intense acidity, freshness and flavors.",Abbaye de Morgeot Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Over the centuries, lava flows from Mount Etna have formed natural vineyard terracing and tiny farming pockets, each characterized by a unique microclimate. The Calderara Sottana is a particularly fortunate niche that produces high quality fruit, elegant aromas and firmly polished structure. This wine is silky, long and very beautiful.",Calderara Sottana,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"The vintage as well as the vineyard gave this hugely rich wine. It has weight, concentrated fruit and toast flavors, the acidity on line right through the center. Peach, pineapple and grapefruit combine to give an impressive, textured fruitiness. Age for 2_3 years.",Charmes Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"The best yet in a series of superb vintages for this unique Washington Pinot Gris, sourced from a cool site in the Columbia Gorge. Luscious fruit cascades across the palate, filling the mouth with juicy, textural flavors of grapefruit, Meyer lemon, orange, orange peel and pear. Deeply concentrated and flat out delicious, this performs way above its price point.",,Tranche
"Passopisciaro is the name of a tiny town on the slopes of Mount Etna in the heart of the volcano's most celebrated wine area. Tuscan nobleman Andrea Franchetti bought property here many years ago and now leads a charge for quality wines from this unique site in southern Italy. His expression is nuanced and complex, with firmly polished tannins and bright end notes of wild berry, crushed stone and dried rosemary.",Passopisciaro,Passopisciaro
"It's labeled Cabernet Sauvignon, but includes both Syrah and Mourvèdre in the blend, along with Cab Franc and Petit Verdot. Unusual, but it works, creating a jammy wine with voluptuous black cherry and cassis fruit. The aging in French oak contributes Bourbon barrel highlights, and the tannins are ripe and nicely proportioned.",,Woodward Canyon
"A very fine Pinot Noir, dry and elegantly constructed, but it needs a little time in the cellar. That's due to the tannins, which are thick and noticeable in the way they create an astringency through the finish. The flavors are exceptionally rich, suggesting cherries, raspberries and tobacco, with a welcome sweetness from toasty oak.",OFS,De Loach
"Pricey, yes, but Madrigal pulled out all the stops on this flashy wine, making it their best Cabernet ever. It's a big, tannic and dry wine, stuffed with blackberry, currant and oak flavors. Voluptuous and dramatic, but it needs age, possibly a lot. Give it a rest until 2015 and see how it's doing then.",Las Vinas del Señor Reserve,Madrigal
"A delightful wine, one of Justin's best in quite some time. The blend is Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon, and fruit is the star, in the form of ripe, lush blackberries and currants. You'll also find complex notes of grilled meats, chocolate, herbs and spices, wrapped into a perfectly soft, delectable texture. Drink now_2015.",Savant,Justin
"A pure varietal blend from the estate vineyard, this has everything you look for in Walla Walla Syrah__lack fruits, loam, graphite, balsamic__nd an inviting scent of orange liqueur. Licorice, iron and a concentrated, muscular depth elevate the finish.",Seven Hills Vineyard Estate,L'Ecole No. 41
"Thank the folks at Pewsey Vale for aging this stellar wine five years before its release. The result is what Australian Rieslings aspire to become, a medium-bodied wine of uncommon elegance. Orange marmalade, honey and toast characters mingle easily yet finish crisp, long and completely dry. Drink now or hold through 2015, possibly longer.",The Contours Museum Reserve,Pewsey Vale
"From the tiny island of Salina off the north coast of Sicily (where the Tasca family runs a beautiful boutique hotel called Capofaro), comes this excellent expression of Malvasia. This dessert wine shows exactly what this versatile white grape variety is built to do best: The bouquet is redolent of honey, golden vanilla cream, candied apricot and sweet almond marzipan.",Capofaro,Tasca d'Almerita
"Put this one in the cellar for a good six years, at the very least. Right now, it's tight and tannic, with dramatically layered blackberry, currant, dark chocolate, mint and cedar flavors.",Clift Vineyard,Tudal
"The old gold color promises a long-aged wine. Fruit has gone, morphing into almond and walnut flavors, tense acidity, great concentration and a smooth unctuous texture. It's a superb Port, offering calm contemplation.",30 Anos Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"Structured, but so rich, with the tannins enveloped by sweet plum fruits and excellent acidity. The wine is juicy, sweet and darkly rich.",,Château Nenin
"Enormously rich, with intense blackberry and cherry jam, currant, dark chocolate and bacon flavors, wrapped into firm tannins. The vineyard is in a warm, high elevation part of the county. Delicious now, and should acquire additional bottle interest over the next six years.",Paradise Road Vineyard,Blair Fox
"A rich and flamboyant Viognier. One might even call it majestic. Somehow it combines fabulously ripe, opulent fruit, honey and spice flavors with a savory minerality, leading to a dry finish. A real achievement in California Viognier.",Paradise Road Vineyard,Blair Fox
"Vintner Giuseppe Russo (the estate is named after his father) presents Feudo, a fine and sophisticated wine that shows the best of winemaking on Etna. The bouquet is redolent of delicate tones of cassis, wild blueberry, crushed stone and tobacco. In the mouth, the wine delivers power, length and finely polished tannins.",Feudo,Girolamo Russo
"A rich and smooth wine, its tannins already deliciously integrated into the juicy black fruits. The wine has a tarry character along with its blackberry acidity, sweetness and an extra roundness from the wood. Worth aging for 3_4 years.",Domini Plus,José Maria da Fonseca
"Packed with ripe, upfront raspberry, cherry and cola fruit, this Pinot certainly delivers in the flavor department. But it goes well beyond that, framing the richness in a fine structure of smooth tannins, crisp acidity and a deft application of oak. Straddles the line between immediate drinkability and ageability, so drink it now and over the next four years.",Appian Way Vineyards,Joseph Jewell
"This young Pinot Noir is difficult and challenging. It's all acidity, cherries and pomegranates, tightly wound and aloof, giving little of itself. Yet there's enormous promise. The color is pale for a California Pinot, the alcohol is modest, and there are tantalizing hints of herbs, minerals, forest undergrowth, mushrooms, cedar, truffles. All indications suggest that this is a seriously ageable wine. Cellar until at least 2015.",MoDa,Standish
"Whether or not you consider yourself a fan of varietal Cabernet Franc, this is a wine to explore and to savor. Pure fruit is set amidst generous streaks of herb and earth, framed by firm tannins. The wine opens slowly, and pretty cherry flavors emerge, along with black olive, pencil lead and complex barrel notes.",Estate,Tranche
"The first Syrah in an expanding lineup of Tranche estate wines from the Blue Mountain Vineyard, this exceptional effort hews to a European style despite its substantial alcohol. Initially dark and smoky, hinting at streaks of herb and showing compact berry fruit flavors, it broadens out and expands aromatically, weaving in highlights of cured meats, bacon and clean earth. Just a dollop of herb and stem adds further interest, in a wine that retains its elegance along with exceptional power.",Estate,Tranche
"This rare Walla Walla-grown Sauvignon Blanc is superbly balanced, with rich, ripe, round, full-bodied fruit flavors anchored by defining acidity. From the Woodward Canyon estate vineyard, it conjures up a farmers' market of mixed stone fruits and melon, adding candied orange peel highlights to a lingering finish.",Estate,Woodward Canyon
"Hard to imagine greater concentration in a Napa Cabernet than you'll find here. It's just insanely rich in blackberries and blueberries and liberally oaked, while the tannins are hard and potent. Nowhere near ready now, even though it's already more than five years old. Give it at least six years in a good cellar, and it could easily go another decade beyond that.",Mountain,Yates Family Vineyard
"A tremendous Syrah, so rich and tasty, it makes you wonder why more people don't drink this variety. Shows intense, explosive blackberry, currant, bacon and black pepper flavors, with a savory hint of raisins. New oak is perfectly in keeping with the wine's volume. Dramatic and lush, this single-vineyard Syrah will provide good drinking over the next four years.",Goosechase Vineyard,Longboard
"This Bordeaux-style blend, from a choice section of the Seven Hills Vineyard, is fragrant with a beguiling mix of fruits, flowers and fresh herbs. Cassis and pepper, Asian spices and a lingering, textural mouthfeel, make this a wine that disappears all too quickly from the bottle.",Seven Hills Vineyard Red,Pepper Bridge
"From Pierre André's Château Corton-André, they can look up at the hill of Corton and the Corton-Charlemagne vineyard. That gives them a neighborly interest. This is reflected in this rich, powerful, muscular wine, full of yellow fruit, ripe wood and tense acidity. It should age for 4_5 years.",,Pierre André
"This Bordeaux-style red is blended from the Seven Hills, Klipsun, Canoe Ridge and Wallula vineyards. It shows a lovely structure, which takes its ripe blueberry, black cherry and cassis fruit and complements it with lush barrel flavors of coffee and dark chocolate. Fine-grained, dusty tannins smooth it along through an elegant, mouth-coating finish.",JRG Red,Pamplin
"Wood-aged white Port giving the gold color and an aged toast character. The wine, aged for an average of 30 years in barrel has sweetness, but this has been transformed into maturity, richness and a final almond flavor.",30-Year-Old White,Burmester
"The color is now deep amber, the result of long wood aging. The wine has retained its sweetness as well as its freshness, the acidity shooting through. A wine almost at its limit of aging, with immense concentration. It is for sipping and appreciating slowly.",40-Year-Old White,Burmester
"An interesting Pinot Noir, showing a bit of heat, but whose flavors are taut and complex. The usual cherries and cola you find in almost all California Pinot Noirs are grounded with meaty notes, like grilled hamburger, finished with a splash of tamari. Such are the tannins and acids that the wine should age gracefully for a good eight years, but you can drink it now.",van der Kamp Vineyard,De Loach
"The best of the new Syrah releases from Betz, this massive wine, sourced from the outstanding Boushey Vineyard, packs tart black fruit into a tight frame of licorice-soaked tannins. There are traces of clean earth, light mineral and smoked meat, while the tannins are kept in close check. There's terrific structure and poise in a wine of substantial power.",La Serenne,Betz Family
"A beautiful wine, fully resolved in age, showing a classy, smooth mouthfeel. The citrus, bread dough, vanilla and spice flavors are subtle but delicious, while the bubbles have softened, making the wine creamy. Made from Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, with a drop of Pinot Meunier, this delicious bubbly is made for drinking now.",Late Disgorged Vintage Brut,J Vineyards & Winery
"With exceptional dryness, acidic crispness and minerality, this Chardonnay can be described as Chablis-style. The structure is certainly noble, and nobody would ever accuse it of being a fruit bomb despite the rich pineapple tart and lemon drop flavors. Hard to predict its future, but probably best over the next four years.",Barrel 16 Estate Grown,J Vineyards & Winery
"Credit this Merlot for sheer enjoyability. It defines Merlot as the soft, drink-me-now Bordeaux red wine, full-bodied yet instantly likeable. Made from 100% Merlot, it's extraordinairly rich in cherry fruit, while 100% new French oak adds a deft touch of buttered toast. The tannins are gentle, sweet and complex. This flashy, fleshy wine is great now, and will hold and evolve in the bottle for at least six years.",Estate,Jarvis
"Shows all the hallmarks of an ageable Pinot Noir. The raspberry, cherry and cola flavors are very rich, but the structure is immaculate. Fine, firm tannins combine with zesty acidity to create a tightness in the mouth. As nice as this Pinot is, it will develop bottle nuances over the next six years.",Floodgate Vineyard,Joseph Jewell
"A distinguished Pinot Noir, dry, crisp in acidity and complex in flavor. The cherry, raspberry, cola and mushroom flavors are very rich, almost sweet, except that they finish in a dry scour of spices. Defines a young Anderson Valley Pinot, and should develop bottle complexity over the next 6_8 years.",Triangle Block Day Ranch,Standish
"The sixth release of this outstanding reserve holds firm to the well-established style. Bright, tart, ripe and compact red-berry fruit is set against firm, polished tannins. Still young and hard, it needs plenty of breathing time, or better yet, cellar it for a few years. Tim Stevens's reds have proven ageworthy, and this earthy, smoky, textural and well-crafted effort should improve for a decade or more.",XY Reserve,Stevens
"So sweet and strong in jammy blackberry fruit, this young Cabernet is hardly drinkable now. The vineyard is in the Oak Knoll District, and the wine shows the big tannins and fine acidity of this cooler part of Napa Valley. An obvious cellar candidate, it needs 6_8 years of bottle age to begin to mellow.",Reserve Block,Ideology Cellars
"If this Chard had any more oak, the forests of France would be denuded. But the buttered toast and caramel work well, adding even greater richness to the huge pineapple, lemon custard and gingersnap cookie flavors. Drink this extravagant Chardonnay over the next six years.",Estate,Jarvis
"Tremendous honeyed richness in this Viognier, yet as sweet as it tastes, it finishes dry, a magical trick only a great wine can accomplish. Shows all the exotic tropical fruit, wildflower and spice flavors you could ask for in a California Viognier, and never loses its vitality.",,Fess Parker
"This Valmur brings out great richness from the vineyard and the vintage while keeping an intense texture, orange zest and grapefruit flavors and a firm butter and toast aftertaste. Age for four years.",Valmur Grand Cru,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"An elegant wine, its red fruits balanced with acidity and layers of wood aging. The style is serious, the ripe fruit restrained by the tannins. It will age well, giving an always structured, fine and stylish wine.",Colheita,Quinta do Portal
"A tremendous Grenache from the Foothills, estate grown from Beaucastel budwood and let to develop slowly, this wine has acres to go before it sleeps. Still superdense and dark with fruity plum and anise predominating, it'll grow old with tenderness and grace.",Estate Bottled,Cedarville Vineyard
"Opulent and rich, this is a concentrated wine with toast and fruit both showing strongly. The new wood flavors offer spice, while the fruit suggests pineapple, kiwi and fresh plums. Worth aging 2_3 years.",Fourchaume Premier Cru Vieilles Vignes,Domaine Vrignaud
"Tancredi is a versatile, quality red wine that will content almost everyone. It opens with gorgeous aromas of chocolate and exotic spice, cherry and blackberry with Sicilian touches of toasted almond and pistachio.",Tancredi,Donnafugata
"If there was any oak on this wine, and the winery doesn't say so, it doesn't show. What stars is pure fruit from the vineyard, the first ever planted to Sauvignon Blanc in Dry Creek Valley. The flavors are massive, of citrus and tropical fruits, melons, tangy minerals and exotic spices. Just gorgeous, it's one of the most complex and satisfying Sauvignon Blancs on the market. Production was a scant 252 cases.",Estate DCV3,Dry Creek Vineyard
"A big, ripe earthy wine, layered with tannins and dark black fruits. It has density and concentration, while keeping a sense of freshness and balance. A powerful and impressive wine that will age well.",Quinta das Tecedeiras Reserva,Dão Sul
"Probably the best expressions of Cabernet Sauvignon from the Cefalù area of Sicily (north of Palermo). This beautiful estate, crowned by an ancient stone abbey, has seen a few difficult years, but thankfully, the vines remain productive. Gorgeous, rich and round, Litra delivers black cherry and chocolate flavors and velvety tannins.",Litra,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"A lovely wine, off-dry to moderately sweet, with tropical fruit, honeysuckle and vanilla flavors, accented with a roasted almond, granola toastiness. Once you accept that it's not really dry, it's easy to fall in love with this Viognier, most of which comes from Bien Nacido Vineyard.",,Jaffurs
"With some Chardonnay in the blend, this is a wine that combines a toasty character with rich yellow fruit and green plums. There is a good tang of orange zest that brightens the aftertaste of this rich wine.",Malhadinha Branco,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"Sourced entirely from old vine Tapteil fruit, this spent 32 months in French and American oak. It's loaded__s per usual with this winery__ith generous, dark and smoky flavors of espresso, smoke and charcoal. But the fruit has the power and depth to handle it well, and as the wine breathes it smoothes out into a thoroughly luscious quaff.",Reserve Tapteil Vineyard,Barrister
"Full in the mouth, rich with a mix of pastry fruits, fruitcake, baking spices, clove and coffee, this decadent pleasure is like drinking a Christmas cake. Raisins soaked in a Bourbon sauce come to mind, along with plum pudding.",Pheasant Run Vineyard,Basel Cellars
"The explosive success of Etna today has a lot to do with this wine. Serra della Contessa became one of this first bottles to show the enological potential of the Sicilian volcano. Elegant and pristine, this dark garnet wine offers drying mineral tones backed by natural rubber, small berry fruit and cola. The tannins are very polished and fine.",Serra della Contessa,Benanti
"Dense up front, with earthy notes to go with aromas of cola, ripe berry, coconut, almond candy and toast. Features a well-oaked personality and full flavors of ripe black plum, blackberry, fine herbs and integrated spice. Long and lasting on the finish, like a good cigar. Mature, but with lots of life left; drink now through 2018.",Onomástica Reserva,Carlos Serres
"In reaction to Mount Etna's volcanic eruptions, local farmers have adopted a unique mix of Christianity and mysticism to protect against imminent dangers. Many vineyard sites are anointed with religious names, like Santo Spirito, as if the name were a lucky charm in itself. This delightful vineyard-designate wine is ethereal and bright, with loads of small berry intensity and a dusty, dry finish.",Santo Spirito,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"Smooth and inviting from the start, with floral aromas, popping cherry and ripe plum on the bouquet. Feels fresh and forward, with black cherry, cola, baked plum and spice flavors. Gets it right all the way through, with smoothness and chocolaty oak on the finish. Drink now through 2015.",Reserva,Valenciso
"The wine, from this old vineyard, contains a good chunk of Petite Sirah, which adds body and tannins to the Zinfandel. It's a delicious wine, wonderfully drinkable, with deep, complex blackberry, cassis, dark chocolate, licorice, raisin, black pepper and sandalwood flavors that finish long and spicy.",Luvisi 1908 Vineyard,Vermeil
"Here's a fun and informal bubbly with easy aromas of white flower, citrus, peach and pear. The foaming is soft and creamy and the wine adds good levels of sweetness, contrasted by freshness.",Deor,Cielo e Terra
"A fairly one-dimensional Pinot Noir. It's soft and drinkable now, with raspberry, cherry, cola and oak flavors.",,Casa de la Cruz
"A solid effort, this basic red blend features mint accents layered over slightly herbal cassis aromas and flavors. It's medium-bodied, with silky tannins on the finish. Drink now.",Cabernet-Shiraz-Merlot,Ironberry
"Here's a simple but fun Moscato d'Asti with floral notes backed by fresh fruit tones of stone fruit and honeydew. The wine is simple, easy and nicely sweet on the close.",,Vino dei Fratelli
"So young, it tastes like it's still fermenting. Not a bad wine, but freshly tart and strong in grapy flavors. Should calm down by mid-2011 and become a nice, full-bodied and dry red wine.",Grower's Selection,The Crusher
"Murky and a bit sharp and herbal smelling, with a plump, chubby mouthfeel and herbal plum and raspberry flavors. Shows pretty good structure and texture on the finish, with notes of cola and berry fruit. Good as a whole.",Pionero,Morandé
"Aromas of red fruits, olive and hard spice lead to a sheer palate with juiciness galore along with red raspberry, cranberry and spice flavors. Very zesty but not harsh. Must have food to handle the acids.",Reserva,Apaltagua
"Dry and soft. It's a good Cabernet for everyday drinking, with pleasant berry flavors and a smooth mouthfeel.",Reserve,Castle Rock
"A decent everyday sipper. Soft and a little dull in texture, it's rich in blackberry, currant, chocolate and pecan pie flavors.",,CC
"A little soft and one-dimensional, with raspberry and cherry cola flavors. Lacks the liveliness that a rosé needs. No oak on this dry wine.",Rose 'Di Arie,C.G. di Arie
"Basic raspberry and plum aromas and flavors are accented by herbal, foresty notes. The palate is grabby, tannic and chunky, with herbal accents to the berry fruit flavors. Finishes with milk chocolate, acidity and tannic bite.",Reserva,Calina
"Slightly sharp, reedy and also sweet smelling, with cotton candy, vanilla and caramel aromas. The palate ranks as dry, simple and a bit dilute, with soft, light, buttery flavors and shy, airy red-fruit notes. Inoffensive and a touch weak.",Tributo Single Vineyard,Caliterra
"Prickly red-fruit aromas open the show, and after that it's briary. The palate delivers a choppy feel along with herbal, briary fruit flavors and earthy soupiness. Finishes with some burn, but overall it's still a decent, drinkable wine.",Viña Famatina,Bodega Vistandes
"The luminous sparkler offers sweet aromas of peach, honey and jasmine. Pair this this bubbly treat with oatmeal cookies or sponge cake.",Petalo il Vino dell'Amore,Bottega
"Likeable for its dryness and clean acidity, and elaborate buildup of orange, pineapple, pear, honey and vanilla flavors. There is a green, unripe ammonia streak mixed in.",The Climber,Clif Family
"Light in color, with transparency, something you usually don't see with Malbec. The nose is rubbery, saucy and a touch grassy, while the palate is tannic and grabby, with stewy, rustic, roasted berry flavors. Finishes with the taste of barbecue sauce.",Estate,Medrano
"Soft and sweet in vanilla, buttered toast and honey flavors, this Chard also features plenty of pineapple and pear jam richness. Good price for the opulence.",Lot 11,Grayson
"While there is some unfortunate banana flavor, the rest of this wine is attractive. It has juicy black berry flavors, an edge of citrus and final lively acidity.",Domaine de Grand Croix,Georges Duboeuf
"Opens with a strange bouquet; there's Christmas spice, an odd funk and resiny, almost meaty aromas. The palate is acidic and short on Chardonnay character, and the flavors are of spice, banana and resin. Finishes with some lemon and clampy acidity. Imported by Ecovalley Quality Wine Group and National Refrescos Import Company, LLC.",Reserva,Tamaya
"Starts out with mildly herbal, salad-dressing aromas, but the palate is fairly full and creamy, with soft tomato, spice and generic berry flavors. Fresh due to adequate acidity, but tastes a little herbal and sharp all the way through. Good enough for the price.",Reserva,Santa Alicia
"A slightly confected, slightly herbal Cab, with sweet cherry fruit that finishes tart. Still, it's nicely creamy in texture and while simple, is pleasant enough for a midweek quaff. Drink now.",,Red Knot
"Made with Raboso grapes, this foamy pink sparkling wine  offers feminine tones of rose, raspberry and cranberry. Closed with a silver string, the spago argento, it is a delicately sweet and feminine wine.",Pink Spago Argento rosé,Riondo
"Sweet, hot and soft, a hot- climate Zinfandel that's rustic in its charms. But it's very ripe, offering blackberry, cherry, raspberry and peppery spice flavors.",,Rock Lobster
"Here's a luminous sparkling wine that plays up its Italian good cheer. It's a simple and straightforward expression with characteristic aromas of cut grass, stone fruit and citrus that makes for an informal but very satisfying ensemble.",Extra Dry,Tiamo
Frappato is usually made as a dry red wine and Terre di Giurfo is probably the first to release a sweet expression of the grape. This ruby-colored dessert wine offers jammy aromas of strawberry and cassis and could pair with almond or pistachio cookies.,Uniku 500ml,Terre di Giurfo
"Showing a bit of evolution, The Turk features hints of leather and beef alongside blackberry and cassis. It's reasonably complex for the price, but dries out a bit on the finish, suggesting it may be past its best. Drink up.",The Turk Cabernet-Shiraz-Mourvèdre-Grenache,Turkey Flat
"An austere, stalky wine, showing its dry tannins and woody black currant flavors. It has a bitter edge to it, with its lean, dry tannins.",Château Biré,Mähler-Besse
"Charred and smells of coffee, toasted oak, minty berry fruit and earth. The palate is quite tannic, with creamy vanilla flavors along with candied berry fruit and lemony zest. Exhibits mostly faux oak and window dressing, but for $11 it isn't bad.",Reserva,Nieto Senetiner
"Balanced wine, the tight tannins fitting well into the black currant fruits, the texture coming from plum skins, damsons and some fresh, bright acidity.",,Château Julian
"This sparkling rosé opens with a pretty pink color and golden peach highlights. The soft foaming is steady and tonic and the sparkler moves smoothly over the palate with plush, creamy effervescence: There's a simple, sweet personality at the core with pink grapefruit and raspberry.",Graffio Spumante Rosé,Cantina Caorsa
"The soft but flavorful entry into a land of dark fruits, smoke and espresso barely hints at the wine to come. Give it time to breathe and it opens into a wonderfully complex, smooth and creamy wine with no rough edges. Pretty red fruit, seductive and lingering, is matched to hints of chocolate from 30 months in neutral barrels.",,Tranche
"This Oregon winery sources fruit for its Proprietary Red from top Washington vineyards on Red Mountain, in Walla Walla and in the Horse Heaven Hills. Mostly Cabernet Sauvignon (it could be labeled as such), it packs its rich raspberry, blueberry and black currant fruit into a precisely-defined, balanced and persistent wine with plenty of power.",Proprietary Red,Pamplin
"Amazing how the addition of just 3% of Viognier lifts the winery's Syrah and makes this wine so fine. The white variety's citrusy acidity and lime flavor uplifts and brightens Syrah's blackberry and blueberry fruit, giving the wine a zesty punch. Drink now for it's freshness.",Syrafina Estate Grown,Montemaggiore
"Cometa is an irresistible white wine from the deep south of Italy. It speaks its own Sicilian language but with modern, international accents. Made from Fiano grapes, it opens with a beautiful golden color, and delivers rich aromas of stone fruit, vanilla cream and rose. The mouthfeel is exceedingly soft, creamy and long-lasting.",Cometa,Planeta
"Planeta was among the first to bring this delicious sweet wine to the United States and demonstrate that great Sicilian dessert wines hail from places besides Pantelleria. There's a light, buoyant quality that is enhanced by fragrant floral tones of jasmine, honeysuckle and peach blossom. There's no better pairing for sweet almond cookies.",,Planeta
"While it is rich, the wine is more dominated by the minerality and structure of Chablis. White fruits, melon and pear come through, with a citric edge and firm toast. It is taut and tense, ready to age.",Les Vaupulans Fourchaume Premier Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"Few Zins are this ripe and extravagant in flavor. It delivers an explosion of blackberry and cherry preserves, mint, olive tapenade, black pepper and sandalwood flavors, plus a bunch of other things too complex to list. A terrific example of the variety, at a fair price.",Old Vine,Dry Creek Vineyard
"This full-bodied, 100% Cabernet is lightly gamy, offering a sensuous potpourri of wild herbs and brambly berries. It's subtle, lovely, distinctive, smoothly rendered and unusually textural and complex. Drink it with enjoyment now, or give it a few more years in the cellar.",,Bunchgrass
"Run, don't walk, to get this wine. It's wildly good for the price, offering powerful yet controlled black cherry, tea, bacon and black pepper flavors that are wrapped into smooth tannins. Production was 2,061 cases.",,Fess Parker
"In keeping with Sicily's Arab-European identity, Sultana is a thick and luscious dessert wine enhanced by attractive layers of cinnamon apple, toasted walnut and candied fruit. Golden Delicious apple and pear aromas are in the forefront, and the wine feels rich and smooth with soft touches of chewy sweetness on the close.",Sultana,Feudo Maccari
"A wine that reveals a textured side of Meursault. It has weight, ripe apricot and pineapple fruit with a refreshing touch of acidity. But the chalky, mineral character equally defines the wine. Age for 3_4 years.",Charmes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Here's a rich, ripe, opulent Syrah, all jammy blackberry, cherry and currant flavors, sprinkled with black pepper and housed in a structure of firm, strong tannins. It's a blend of some of the best vineyards in the county, including Bien Nacido, Larner and Ampelos. Drink now_2015.",,Jaffurs
"Layered, stout and pure smelling, with aromas of cola, chocolate and modern, ripe berry fruit that roll out the welcome mat. Feels full and tannic, with toasty black fruit flavors accented by espresso and bitter chocolate. Finishes dark, with coffee and licorice flavors. Best from late 2012 through 2015.",MC,Marqués de Cáceres
"Viticulturalist Ann Kraemer, who farms Shake Ridge Vineyards for many other producers, keeps some of the grapes for Yorba, her label with winemaker Ken Bernards of Ancien. The result is an exceptionally good dark plum, black cherry and blackberry-tinged Syrah with pepper and meat thread throughout the deep fruit concentration of this still-tight, mountain-grown wine. Cellar another 2_5 years.",Shake Ridge Vineyards,Yorba
"The first release for Tranche from Blue Mountain (estate) fruit, this classic Cabernet benefits from the same extended aging in barrel and bottle that sister winery Corliss gives its wines. Toasty, smoky and precisely defined dark fruit hold down the core, a muscular mix of black cherry, cassis, dried herb and leaf. Firm and compact, with well-integrated barrel flavors (two thirds were new), this balances Euro elegance with New World vitality.",Estate,Tranche
"Three things characterize this wine: exceptionally intense blackberry and currant flavors, thick, hard tannins and a bone dry finish. It's big and firm with a lot of promise, so do try to cellar it for at least six years, but people who like their wines young could try it sooner.",,Valance
"The largely unexplored Faro denomination in the northern point of Sicily is producing some of the island's best work. The promising Nocera grape variety is used here and vintner Salvatore Geraci is one of its biggest proponents. This blended red is finely embroidered with subtle notes of forest berry, cassis, leather and spice.",,Palari
"There aren't many California Cab-Syrah blends this satisfying. Perhaps the main reason, aside from good viticulture and winemaking, is the source, Dry Creek Valley, where the grapes got sweet and ripe in blackberry, currant, bacon and spice flavors, yet maintained enough acidity for balance. The tannins are a bit tough and brambly, but this is a delicious wine to drink now with richly sauced beef dishes.",Nobile Estate Grown,Montemaggiore
"Shows the ripe fruit of Balletto's Pinot Noirs, with bright, forward raspberries and cherries. But there's an appealing earthiness, something like wild mushrooms sautéed in olive oil. Oak adds the perfect touch of buttered toast. Drink now_2015.",Winery Block,Balletto
"A wine that is destined for good aging, with its mineral structure and toast flavors. It has weight and richness but equally it has intense pear and citrus fruits layered with acidity. Age for at least four years.",Mont de Milieu Premier Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"This wine is another rewarding Cabernet from a winery with a great track record over the years. Blended with some Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, it's dry and ultrasmooth, and while the tannins are thick, they're sweet and ripe. The blackberry, cherry, blueberry and cassis flavors have a rich, fleshy opulence. Drink now_2015.",,Clos Pegase
"Quite an impressive young Chardonnay, with brisk acidity, a tangy minerality and a bone dry finish. You'll find suggestions of pineapple, Meyer lemon, lime and kiwi flavors, with a kiss of smoky oak. Chill it well, then savor it as it warms in the glass.",Estate Grown,J Vineyards & Winery
"Sharp and tightly wound upon opening, this wine offers vivid fruit flavors of cranberry and pomegranate. Juicy and young, with the tart acidity and fruit density to cellar for a decade or more, it is infanticide to drink it so soon, but go ahead; it's delicious.",,Pepper Bridge
"Deep purple, this riveting Malbec melds dark red and blue fruits to the grip and texture of ripe Yakima Valley tannins. Think clean earth lightly dusted with chocolate, and you have the finish. A powerful wine with excellent cellar potential.",Timley,Stevens
"This is the darkest, biggest, richest of Raymond's 2007 Cabernets. It's ripe and full in blackberries and currants, with a thick coating of sweet, toasty oak, but it's not really drinkable now because the tannins are so strong. Designed for the cellar, it should develop bottle complexity over the next 10_12 years.",Generations,Raymond
"Like almost all of Reverie's Cabernets on release, this one needs time in the cellar. Tasted in fall 2011, it's tight and grapey, with blackberry jam flavors girded by a firm, stony minerality and sweet, but hard, tannins. Give it 6_8 years.",Estate,Reverie
"Wiese & Krohn have made a specialty of Colheitas, vintage-dated wood-aged Ports. This 1983, aged in wood for 28 years, is an opulent, ripe example of the style. It is sweet and very concentrated, with burnt old wood flavors to go with raisins and prunes. The acidity is intense, a fine counterpoint to the rich fruit.",Colheita Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"Can Washington Mourvèdre really be this good? From the Far Away Vineyard (previously named for owner Art den Hoed) it sure can. Sappy and fresh, this lively wine features ripe red fruits, sharp acids and smooth tannins, with toasted walnuts and caramel streaking through the finish. It shows excellent concentration and length.",Far Away Vineyard,Trio Vintners
"Under the guidance of Tuscany's Mazzei brothers, Doppiozeta is a New World wine from an Old World tradition. The blend is 60% Nero d'Avola with the balance comprised of Syrah and Cabernet Franc. It offers modern accents of chocolate fudge and spice behind territory-driven layers of small berry fruit, wild sage and toasted pistachio.",Doppiozeta,Zisola
"One of the most satisfying Rieslings of the vintage. It's dry, crisp and exotic, with crisp flavors of citrus fruits, wildflowers and that famous diesel or lighter fluid taste that characterizes the best Rieslings. Really a superior wine that shows the brilliance of Edna Valley for unoaked white varieties, as well as the excellence of the Paragon Vineyard.",Paragon Vineyard,Zocker
"Very simple and straightforward, this easy expression of Prosecco carries forth crisp aromas of dried grass, pressed flower, honey, peach and citrus. There's creamy foam in the mouth that would pair with mozzarella.",,Castellargo
"A little clumsy in the mouth, with some green flavors alongside the apricot, citrus and slate flavors. Seems a bit off-dry, although high acidity provides balance. The final impression is of a rustic and everyday quaff.",,Coquelicot
"Aromas of mocha, coffee and berry fruit are regular but decent, while the palate is astringent but lively, with herbal red-fruit flavors and a touch of green. Finishes lemony, tangy and grabby, with weight but a slight stickiness.",Gran Reserva,Espiritu de Chile
"Informal, light and loads of fun, this rosé sparkling wine is made from the same traditional blend of grapes that go into Bardolino. The color here is bright and luminous with shades of pale pink and peach; the aroma focuses on fruit, mineral and floral tones. There's a hint of bitter almond and firmness in the mouth.",Spumante Brut Rosè,Benazzoli
The wine opens with a pretty pink color and offers simple aromas of cranberry and raspberry. Would pair with salty appetizers and fried finger foods.,Raboso Rosato Frizzante Rosé,Bonotto delle Tezze
"A pretty good Chardonnay, especially at this price. Delivers lots of bang for the buck, with ripe, honeyed flavors of pineapples, pears and buttered toast.",Proprietor's Reserve,Glen Ellen
"Honeyed on the nose and palate, with mild citrus and green qualities like nettle and lime. The feel is kind of soft for Casablanca SB, and the flavors seem more tropical and sweet than they should be. Finishes soft, pithy and sweet.",Columbine Special Reserve,William Cole
"Pineapple, sulfur and matchstick, and finally some woody toast steer the bouquet. The palate is big and blowsy, with toasty baked apple and pineapple flavors. Finishes sweet, with honey and a sprinkle of white pepper. Yet another sweet, resiny, basic Chardonnay from Chile.",Reserva,Santa Carolina
"A pink sparkling wine that opens with vibrant tones of cranberry, raspberry and red rose. The feminine, floral side is indeed intense although the wine shows much more simplicity in the mouth.",Lagrein Brut Rosato,Bortolotti
"Passoro opens with an amber, almost deep orange color and overripe aromas of sun baked raisins, dried apricot, strawberry jam and candied fruit. The wine feels heavy and thick on the mouth but a sharp point of lemon zest appears at the very end.",Passoro 500ml,Maggio Vini
"This Riesling is slightly sweet, but it's balanced by crisp acidity. The tangerine, green apple and peach flavors have a honeyed finish.",Vintner's Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"This ruby-colored Lambrusco boasts soft, foamy bubbles and sweet notes of cherry and blackberry. Three qualities inherent to this wine_ slight tannins, effervescence and acidity__ake this the perfect pairing partner to buttery ravioli filled with ricotta cheese.",,La Battagliola
"Smells candied and gummy, with sweet, stewy red-berry aromas along with carob. The palate is fairly full and tannic, with cooked, herbal berry flavors that carry over onto the finish, which folds in coffee and grabby tannins. Good enough but sort of stewed and candied.",,Kaiken
La Meirana is an informal and bright sparkling wine that delivers floral aromas of honeysuckle and acacia backed by sweet almond and peach. It shows light bubbling that fades fast in the glass.,La Meirana Brut,Broglia
"A little soft and dull. Dry and silky, it features raspberry and cola flavors.",Lot 165,Cameron Hughes
"Earthy smelling, with black-fruit aromas that sit heavy in the glass. The palate pushes black cherry flavors and outsized acidity, and it only gets sharper on the back palate and finish. Flavorful and true to the variety, but piercing.",,Echeverria
"With just a touch of tannin, this big-selling Beaujolais-Villages has both weight and richness. Most of all, it has bright red fruits, a hint of spice and crisp acidity.",,Georges Duboeuf
"The banana aromas are off-putting in this light, juicy wine. Although there are tannins, they are not enough to make sense of the simple, jammy fruit.",La Trinquée,Georges Duboeuf
"The infamous wildfires in California this vintage seem to be showing up, giving this Merlot a smoky, cigarette ash aroma and taste. It's not entirely unpleasant, and there are still some good cherry flavors, but some people will be put off.",,Greystone Cellars
"The flavors of this Syrah are delicious, ranging from black cherries and raspberries to bacon, cinnamon bun and vanilla. But it's too soft and simple.",,Clayhouse
"A dark-hued wine, the tannins from fruit and wood dominating the fruit and giving a tendency to dry out. It could develop, although the tight structure does not help.",Elevé en Fûts de Chêne,Château Julian
"There are some unripe, vegetal flavors in this Pinot Noir. It's dry and simple, although it does boast some cherry and currant flavors, and has a nice, silky texture. Ready now.",,Simple Math Cellars
"Features charred and herbal overtones, but otherwise pleasant cherry fruit and a weightiness borne of moderately high alcohol (14%). The fruit fades a bit quickly on the finish, leaving some drying tannins behind, so serve with rare beef or lamb.",Avalon Tree Single Site,Zonte's Footstep
"Medicinal, soupy and not fully clicking. The nose is fishy and the palate has a grating feel and flavors of dried fruits, cola and caramel. Finishes with a toffee-like sweetness and wayward buttery flavors.",,Cinco Sentidos
"Soft, open wine, layering apricot and pear juice with some acidity that is fresh, rather than apple crisp. The wine is a little dilute and need to be drunk.",,Château Julian
"Opens with a foxy, jumpy, jammy set of aromas. The palate is also jammy and amorphous, with candied berry flavors and a drab, tangy, almost peppery finish.",,Notro
"Creamy, bland and short on kick, aromas and flavors. The palate is spongey and tastes of creamed apple, light herbs and white pepper. It's inoffensive but not worth much attention. Finishes a bit vegetal as well.",,Uva Negra
"Despite the name and packaging, this is a muscular, herbal, rough-hewn Merlot. The fruit touches on rhubarb and cranberry, with a lot of leaf and herb flavors filling in the rest.",Girly Girl,Silver Lake
"A pear-flavored Pinot Gris from Yakima valley fruit. The fruit is limned with well-defined skin flavors, and the wine has a light tawny color. It starts off well, then stops short with a plastic, Band-Aid finish.",Girly Girl,Silver Lake
"Pretty simple, but the price is right for an everyday, clean Chardonnay. Shows modest, fruit juice flavors of pineapples and oranges, with a hint of butter and cream.",,Castle Rock
"This old tawny Port has developed a green-gold color and extreme concentration. With a beautiful floral perfume, the flavors are of almonds, acidity and a bite of spirit, while overall is the beautiful smooth texture.",Over 40 Years Old Tawny,Rozes
"A blend of fruit from the Spanish Ribera del Duero and the Portuguese Douro and made at Quinta do Portal in the Douro. It's a seamless blend that as produced a ripe, spicy wine with a fine structure of ripe, dry tannins, along with black cherry and currant fruits. Age for 2_3 years.",Duraduero,Quinta do Portal
"A richly smoky wine, with all its juiciness surrounded by dark tannins. Despite a dominance of Merlot, this is still intensely structured. The wine has so much richness as well as acidity.",,Château Pibran
"Shows smoky new wood and black currant fruit. This is a structured wine, powerful, while preserving just the right balance of acidity. It's dark and dense in character, yet with great freshness.",,Château Potensac
"A powerful expression of rich red fruit, smoothed by wood aging and nearly four years in bottle. It has layers of acidity, spice, soft tannins and flavors of maturing fruit. It is ready to drink now but worth aging as well.",Foral de Evora Colheita,Cartuxa
"Even in marginal vintages like 2008, Atauta manages to shine above the rest. This delivers a gorgeous mix of blackberry blended with complex notes of fine herbs, vanilla and chocolate. It's alert in the mouth, with strong but manageable tannins and full flavors of berry, cherry and vanilla. Short but precise on the finish; drink now through 2015.",,Dominio de Atauta
"Concentrated white fruits, layering melon, pear and red apples with the balancing acidity. For a Chablis, it is ripe and opulent, a delicious already approachable product of the warm year. It does have texture to age well.",Cuvée Guy Moreau Vaillon Premier Cru,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"The grapes for this Syrah come from the Ballard Canyon area, which is likely to be Santa Barbara's next official appellation. It's a big, full-bodied wine, tannic and dry, with blackberry, blueberry, smoked meat, black pepper and sandalwood flavors. Feels fine and dramatic in the mouth, and should develop bottle interest through 2015.",Tierra Alta Vineyard,Blair Fox
"A closed, structured wine, revealing the steely side of Chablis rather than the richness of 2009. It has intense citrus fruit flavors, the acidity an important element along with the wood. However, it is the minerality that dominates, resulting in a taut, textured wine that needs five years aging.",Les Clos Grand Cru,Garnier et Fils
"A big, black-colored wine, impressively rich. Fermented in open stone lagars, it has an opulent ripe character, the black fruits sweet and generous. At the same time, the dense tannic structure promises good aging. Keep for 5_6 years or more.",Reserva,Herdade de São Miguel
"This is a restaurant-style Pinot Noir, classy and restrained. It shows classic raspberry, cherry, cola, pomegranate and spice flavors, with brisk Russian River acidity and a silky mouthfeel. Doesn't seem like an ager, but it's a lovely wine now and for the next few years.",,Joseph Jewell
"Just what you want in a Sauvignon Blanc-based white Bordeaux-style wine. It's bone dry and mouthwateringly tart in acidity, while the citrus flavors suggest gooseberries, but don't fall into the trap of green underripeness. Sémillon constitutes 20% of the blend.",White Wine,Vellum
"Tamarack blends grapes from an astonishing number of sites scattered across the length and breadth of the Columbia Valley, and yet makes wines that are distinctive, polished, generous, and focused. The 2008 Merlot includes 5% each Cabernet Sauvignon and Cab Franc. Its structure is firmly Cab-like, its fruit broadly displayed across the midpalate, a mix of ripe strawberries and cherries dusted with sweet baking spices and cocoa. It's a joyride from start to finish.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Stillwater Creek grapes anchor this outstanding Syrah. Rich cherry flavors, generously awash in cut tobacco and vanilla, gain extra complexity, with hints of smoke and a streak of dusty earth. It's clean, with good grip, and a long, smooth finish.",,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"A distinguished Bordeaux blend from a winery that flies a bit under the radar. It's rich and dramatic in intensely concentrated mountain fruit, brimming with blackberry and black currant flavors, liberally oaked and framed in thick, refined tannins. Possesses real elegance and dynamism, but it needs bottle age. Hold until 2014.",Alden Perry Reserve,Yates Family Vineyard
"This bottling has been a real success for Zaca Mesa. It's a vibrantly fruity Syrah, packed with sweet cherries and blackberries, with a meaty, umami spiciness suggesting grilled bacon. Deliciously soft, it's best consumed over the next few years.",Mesa Reserve,Zaca Mesa
"Beautiful to drink now, one of the most rewardingly plush Syrahs on the market. It's easy to like, with soft tannins and a creamy mouthfeel housing ripe, savory cherry and blueberry pie flavors. If only more Syrahs were this delicious.",,Terlato
"A first for Animale, and a terrific success, despite the almost 16% alcohol. Bursting with ripe berry flavors, this complex and flat-out delicious wine goes well beyond its highly-extracted black fruit. Wet rock, chalk and mineral extend and enhance the finish, with a chocolaty kiss at the very end.",,Animale
"This is a rich, flamboyant Syrah. The Central Coast appellation is because the grapes are a blend of Santa Barbara's cool vineyards and a warm one from Paso Robles. It's a good recipe, with ripe, forward flavors wrapped into a firm structure. Only 150 cases were produced.",Reserve,Andrew Murray
"Aurielle's Cabernets have been consistent over the years, offering lots of ripe, modern-style blackberry, blueberry, dark chocolate and oak flavors in a wine that's drinkable now. This '08 is quite stylish and elegant despite the power, with near-perfect tannins. You could age it, but it's really best enjoyed for flashy, youthful richness.",,Aurielle
"This is a big, gutsy Syrah. It's strong and astringent in tannins and potent in ripe, fruity blackberries and plums, with a spicy edge of smoked bacon. The overall balance testifies to a pedigreed address and superior grapegrowing. As savory as it is, it's not really ready for drinking. Hold for up to six years.",Ledbetter Family Vineyard,Longboard
"Tastes a bit remote and hard now, with a steely minerality that accentuates the acidity, and even boosts the tannins. Underneath that are clean, vibrant pineapple, Meyer lemon, golden apricot and lime flavors. This is one of the rare California Chardonnays that should improve with some age. Hold for 3_4 years, maybe even longer.",Jewell Ranch Vineyard Estate Grown,J Vineyards & Winery
"This cool-climate vineyard seems to need warmth to ripen, and 2008 provided just enough to make the wine tantalizing. It's dry, crisp and elegant, with a silky mouthfeel framing cherry, cola, bacon, cinnamon and white pepper flavors that are frankly irresistable. May not have much of a future, but it sure is good now.",Estate Stone Corral Vineyard,Kynsi
"This young Syrah is marked by jammy berry, cherry and mocha flavors, wrapped into an elegant structure of soft tannins. Sweet new oak adds a lovely touch of toast. Round and mellow in the mouth, it should develop additional nuances with up to six years in the bottle.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Epiphany
"Quota 600 is one of the protagonists of a new class of wines from the Etna denomination. Sourced from 600 meters above sea level on the slopes of the volcano, the wine shows delicate nuances of small berry, mountain herb, cola and wet river stone. Tight tannins and firm structure give it momentum on the finish.",Quota 600,Graci
"A terrific Sauvignon Blanc, pure and bright in citrus and tropical fruit, mineral and honeysuckle flavors, finished with a little bit of creamy oak. Finishes sweet in fruity essence, yet clean and dry. Shows how compatible the Sauvignon Blanc grape is with the valley's climate and soils.",,Dragonette
"A blend of Nero d'Avola, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, the 2008 vintage of No_ shows excellent concentration and intensity with lingering tones of ripe blackberry, cinnamon, wet earth and Graham cracker. It's a bold red wine, but the distinctive Nero d'Avola personality comes through nicely, linking the wine to its territory.",No_,Cusumano
"Give this dry elegant Pinot 4_5 years in the cellar to soften and mellow. Right now, the tannins dominate, making it tough. Underneath are fascinatingly earthy flavors of cherries, cola, mushrooms and exotic spices.",,De Loach
"Smooth and spicy, matching bright, tight, sweet-tart lemony fruit to nicely integrated barrel notes of sandalwood and graham cracker. The sleek structure, balanced for cellaring as well as immediate enjoyment.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This is a fairly big, muscular Pinot Noir, with beefy black-cherry fruit and oaky overtones of brown sugar. Give it a year or more to smooth out, because the long, intense finish filled with berry fruit shows tremendous promise. Drink 2013_2020.",,Carrick
"Aromas of hay, baked corn and honey suggest that this wine has lost or is fast losing its vitality. The palate is round and full, with honeyed, soft flavors of apple and grass. Finishes mushy, another indication that it's on its last legs.",,Maniña
"Murky, cheesy and just not very fresh on the nose, but solid in the mouth, with quick flavors of red fruits and especially tomato. The finish is mild and a little creamy, and tomato comes back similar to Campbell's soup. Not horrible but not offering a lot for the price point.",Duette,Indomita
"Starts out solid enough, with notes of white grapefruit, passion fruit and mineral. Then it turns decidedly vegetal, with heavy flavors of asparagus, canned green beans and bell pepper. By the time it finishes you're firmly in the green zone.",Classic,Leyda
"Nanerone opens with an inky, black color and jammy aromas of strawberry jam, dried prune, raisin, blackberry pie and some light shadings of sweet Christmas spice. It drinks like maple syrup__t's sweet, thick and heavy in the mouth.",Nanerone 500 ml,Piandibugnano
"Herbal and lean, with hints of sweet charred oak and tart cherries that combine to yield a slightly confected impression on the palate. Drink now.",Yellow Label,Wolf Blass
"A bit sweaty smelling, with pinched grapefruit aromas and distant citrus. The flavors say generic apple and lime, and there's a flatness to it. It's a little sugary as well. OK for a wine with pronounced low acidity.",Vástago de Gea,Staphyle
"Here's a curious Recioto with aromas of green olive and caper backed by blackberry and some distant spice. Sweetness and succulence push the wine forward over the palate but those green, herbal notes appear once more on the close.",750ml,Brigaldara
"Smells like a burning hay stack, and otherwise it's neutral. The palate has heft but little else, and the flavors of baked apple run resiny and sweet. Finishes mealy and dull; just another in a long line of uninspiring, mediocre Argentine Chards.",,Carlos Basso
"Big and over the top, with chunky, bland aromas of baked apples and overripe citrus. The palate is full, thickly textured and dull, with chunky, generic citrus and apple flavors. Finishes mealy.",Los Cardos,Doña Paula
"Smells like drugstore-quality chocolate mint candy, meaning it's creamy and confected. The palate offers a clash of chubby softness with needling acids, while the flavor profile revolves around faux mint, cotton candy and sharp plum skins.",Reserve,Cigar Box
"A mild, softly fruity wine, with unusual grace notes of sandalwood and incense. The fruit suggests cinnamon-sprinkled pears, and the acidity has been cut and softened. A little bit of a plastic, Band-Aid flavor infuses the finish.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"The clean look, nice bead and good mouthfeel are the saving graces here, because it smells strange, almost like steamed ballpark hot dogs, and it tastes odd and innocuous, like papaya juice. The look and feel are good but the smell and tastes are not so great.",Extra Brut,Medanos
"This playful blend of air-dried white grapes (Prosecco and Incrocio Manzoni) offers simple aromas of honey and peach backed by some dried hay and citrus. Made with organically-grown grapes, this dessert wine is sweet and thick on the close.",Alba Chiara Passito 500ml,Pizzolato
"Aromas of milk chocolate, candy, field greens and dusty red fruit are less than convincing. The palate has high acidity and a lean body, with flavors of carob, pepper, spice and basic raspberry. Sweet and light on the finish.",,Santa Florentina
"Starts with green drawn aromas and a backing of basic berry fruit. The palate is angular and intense, with lemony, high-toned flavors of generic cherry and berry. Finishes hard, tart and citric, with toughness.",Crucero Reserva,Siegel
"Sweet and crisp, but one-dimensional, with chocolate-covered cherry and cassis flavors that finish hot in alcohol.",Giubbini Vineyard Estate Zinfandel,Rotta
"Too sweet, like pineapple, orange and lemon soda with a squeeze of vanilla. Has some nice acidity, though.",,TV Celadon
"Burnt, edgy and stemmy/stalky from start to finish. The nose gives off a charred nut and asphalt character, while the palate is edgy, hard and bitter, with briary flavors of roasted fruit and stems. Questionable and compromised for the price.",,Puro Uno
"Dry and tannic, with an irregular mouthfeel. Feels tartly acidic, with a bitter raisin skin toughness, although there are some nice blackberry flavors.",,Clautiere
"Light and dilute, this is a pleasant wine, soft with hints of pineapple and a fresh aftertaste. Screw cap.",,Château d'Haurets
"This fresh and bright rosé opens with a peachy-pink color and aromas of simple fruit, raspberry and cranberry. It's tight and tonic in the mouth with a simple, clean close.",Le Dolcirive Extra Dry Rosé,Costaruél
"This soft, country-style Zin has candied flavors of raspberries, red currants, licorice, pepper and bacon. It's sweet in the finish, with a sugary aftertaste. Drink now.",,Bluenose
"Pinot Gris is a fast-rising grape in Washington, but most plantings are young, and prone to being a bit over-cropped. Whatever the case, this is sharp and acidic and does not have the concentration of fruit it needs. Green apples and celery flavors lead into a short, sharp finish.",,Apex II
"Yellowing in color and smelling waxy and peachy. This has become fleshy and sweet, with a syrupy feel. Drink it now or wait for a fresher vintage.",Martin Fierro,Bodegas Borbore
"Mint, mocha and a slight grassiness define the nose. The mouth is narrow and sheering, with high acidity pushing tart, underdeveloped generic berry flavors. Finishes in numb, dull form, with lagging berry flavors that fail to excite.",,Tierra Secreta
"Not much going on with this dry, crisp Chardonnay. It has watery flavors of citrus fruits and apricots, with a hint of oak.",,Simple Math Cellars
"Dark and forceful with a chemical element and aromas of char, bacon, medicine and toasted marshmallow. The palate has size but hollowness, and the flavors bounce between sour plum and herbs. Picks up more tang and sourness as it goes along.",Reserva,TerraNoble
"Here's your basic white Zin, fruity and slightly sweet, with jammy raspberry and vanilla flavors. Crisp acidity fortunately provides needed balance.",White,Fetzer
"A decent but awkward rosé, basically dry and crisp in acidity, but with some strange flavors. The raspberries and cherries have a medicinal, Band-Aid taste.",Petale de Fleur Rosé of,Coquelicot
"A decent, everyday Pinot Noir. it's silky and crisp, with pleasant berry flavors and a touch of smoky oak.",,Bin 36
"Oily aromas include sulfur and matchstick. The palate is full and bulky, what some might label cloying. The flavors are pure pineapple syrup, while the finish is very sweet. Teeters toward unctuous.",,Carmen
"Super floral, like lady's bath powder mixed with raspberry blossom. But that's where the pleasantries end; the palate is rubbery and hard as pavement, with gamy, cooked flavors that narrow down to a tough, tannic finish. Only 250 cases made, so it's more of an experimental wine than something commercial.",Cuarzo,Viña Alicia
"Blowsy and tropical, with aromatic flabbiness. The feel is acceptable and the flavors of papaya and dry white fruits bring some saucy, resiny qualities. Finishes with sappy, resiny oak notes and just enough Chardonnay character to not be disastrous.",Reserva,Nieto Senetiner
"Citric smelling, with floral notes and dampness. The palate is more thin and grating than expected, with red fruit, citrus, cherry sucking candy and graham cracker flavors. Finishes a bit edgy and candied, and overall it's generic with little personality.",,Origin
"This fresh Bardolino Chiaretto offers light bubbling and frothy foam with aromas of raspberry, white cherry and pomegranate juice. The wine is informal and light with bitter berry fruit on the close and refreshing acidity. It makes a perfect appetizer wine.",Spumante Brut Rosè,Zeni
"Candied and faux smelling, with a thin red-fruit palate that's sweet and generic. Fresh feeling due to high acidity but otherwise dull in taste and short on substance, flavor and concentration.",,Espiritu de Argentina
"Amid innocuous aromas of apple and green banana there's a whiff of dust on a hot radiator. The palate is wet, dilute and lacking in structure, while the flavors of pineapple and mealy apple vie with green notes akin to herbs and lettuce.",Estate Bottled,Finca El Portillo
"Smells like old peaches and tastes a bit like tangy tangerine and grapefruit. It's pithy, lumbering and fails to show any purpose, clarity or crispness. Too strange to recommend, but not undrinkable.",Sparkling Rosé,Alma Negra
A candy shop aromas with a perfumed palate leaving a bitter taste in the mouth. The wine has acidity but just lacks freshness,Grande Cuvée,Château Grand Rolland
"A bit skunky on the nose, with pickled green-fruit aromas. The palate is spritzy at first and then goes flat, while it tastes of generic tropical fruit and bitter greens. Soft, fleshy and hollow on the finish.",,Sun Valley
"Smells oxidized, as if it's dying. The palate is bland in feel and the flavors suggest fermented orange juice. Not hideous but uninspired; shows only a modicum of citrus character and pulse.",La Florencia,Familia Cassone
"A strange, light-bodied wine with aromas of animal cracker cookies, tangy raspberry and herbal weediness. The palate is weak in structure, with light-framed, herbal red-fruit flavors and a dash of pepper.",,Funky Llama
"Hard-edged wine with a metallic character and thin, tight fruit. There is a feel of old wood here and only hints of red berry fruits.",,Domaine Coquard Loison-Fleurot
"A simple wine. The underlying Zin is rather thin and jammy, while a clumsy overlay of oak adds unnatural vanilla and woodsap flavors.",,Bin 36
"Thin and vegetal, with barely ripened cherry flavors and lots of black pepper on the finish.",,Boeger
"A full burst of caramel announces this Merlot-based rosé. It is soft, lacking acidity, with vanilla flavors.",Grande Cuvée,Château Grand Rolland
"Basic Pinot, with little to recommend it beyond dryness and some decent cola flavors.",,Insatiable
"Rusty and transparent in color, with aromas of inner tube, burnt leaves and tomato. The palate is angular and just round enough to avoid being outright sharp, and the flavors lean toward tomato and brown sugar. High on acidity but low on fruit.",Pionero,Morandé
"Unrelieved in acidity and dryness, this red wine is hard to like. The flavors are of slightly bitter, shriveled berries. It's not flawed, just made in this style.",La Seduzione,Mosby
"Made with a blend of Merlot, Cabernet and Raboso, this opens with spicy aromas of candied fruit, butterscotch and awkwardly integrated oak aromas of cedar and mesquite wood.",Donna Luna 500ml,Pizzolato
"Smells brambly, sour and muddy, and that's a fair indicator of what's to come. The palate is astringent and seemingly acidified, and the wine's core plum and berry flavors are weedy and murky. Not very appealing.",Vástago de Gea,Staphyle
"A simple, fruity wine, the fruit on the lean side, with black currant flavors and fresh berry acidity. There is an unfortunate rustic edge to the tannins.",,Château Grand Jean
"Thin and generic, this could be any basic white wine. It's got a splash of Sauvignon Blanc and Gewürztraminer in the blend, but falls flat in the mouth, with a little celery and green apple flavor quickly fading.",Girly Girl,Silver Lake
"Pretty standard Chardonnay, with a creamy texture and flavors of buttered popcorn, caramel corn and pineapple Life Savers candy.",Big Green Box 3L,Pepperwood Grove
"Raw and earthy, a wine that has some juicy fruits, along with a beetroot flavor.",Bourgogne Pinot Noir,Michel Picard
"Yellow in color, with oxidized aromas along with a hint of lemon and butterscotch. The palate is heavy while the flavors are bland and suggest bitterness. Does not show this grape in a very positive light.",,Viña Santa Maria
"Murky, stewy, soupy aromas deliver little to no freshness or fruit, while the palate is tannic and tastes bitter, mildly weedy and minty. Seems roasted and devoid of quality. Unclean and unimpressive.",Vástago de Gea,Staphyle
"Shows barely any color and then a hard, vapid, no-fruit bouquet. The mouthfeel is citric and the tastes range from lemon to lemon. Pithy, tart and frankly it's a barely drinkable rendition of Argentina's signature white grape.",Reserva,Nieto Senetiner
"Porty and dull. Almost undrinkable, except for some decent berry and currant flavors.",El Matador,Ripken
"Smells like corn stalks and also of oxidation. The palate is wet but shapeless, and the flavors are waxy and jumbled. It's yet another pass-it-by, underperforming Mendoza Chardonnay.",,Cinco Sentidos
"A supremely ripe Port from Ramos-Pinto's vineyard in the far east of the Douro. It is finely perfumed, with layered tannins upon structured plum skins and black cherry fruit. It's in a fruity style, but the structure certainly promises aging.",Quinta da Ervamoira Vintage,Ramos-Pinto
"It's a shame that so little of this wine is made, as it is a textbook example of a powerful, beautifully balanced Syrah from this tiny AVA in the heart of the Yakima Valley. Black fruits abound, wrapped in a firm, muscular, polished package by fine-grained tannins and a dark chocolate finish.",,Upland Estates
"This very limited reserve mixes old-vine fruit from the Bacchus and Weinbau vineyards (all under the Sagemoor umbrella). Berries, cherries and cassis draw you into a dusty, detailed wine with nuances of herb and earth. A lick of rich dark chocolate ends it with a flourish.",Sagemoor Vineyards Reserve,Tamarack Cellars
"This is 100% varietal, and a star in the excellent Tamarack lineup. Deep and dense, with black cherry, iron, cherry liqueur, licorice and polished tannins, this long and satisfying Cab Franc can be cellared for a decade or more.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Powerful, concentrated Chablis. It is rich, with ripe apricot and nectarine fruit, laced with Seville orange acidity. With a touch of toast, a well-integrated structure, this is a wine for medium-term aging.",Vaudésir Grand Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"The Boushey character shines through in this elegant, complex wine. A lovely, sensual mix of loam, mushroom, tobacco and black cherry blends into a stylish wine with exceptional detail all the way through its lengthy finish.",Boushey Vineyard,Ross Andrew
"One of the best Syrahs at this price point in California. It's lush in blackberries, blueberries, chocolate and sweet oak, with a creamy mouthfeel. Drink now for freshness.",Ballard Canyon Estate,Rusack
"COS is a nod to the three friends who founded the winery, Giambattista Cilia, Giusto Occhipinti and Cirino Strano. This beautiful Nero d'Avola opens with bright berry aromas, toasted pistachio nut and bright accents of chopped herbs.",Syre,COS
"No_ is a successful blend of Nero d'Avola, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon that offers rich and creamy aromas of blackberry jam, spice, leather and dark cola. The wine is firm and dense, with lasting berry flavors.",No_,Cusumano
"Red wine doesn't get richer or more delicious than this Rhône-style blend of five varieties, based on Grenache. It's flamboyant in raspberry, cherry and milk chocolate flavors, yet the sweetness is balanced by fine acidity and a mushroomy earthiness. Drink now_2014.",Gypsy,Epiphany
"Reserve caliber fruit__ throat-coating mix of blueberry, cherry and cassis__olls into a rich, full throttle wash of barrel flavors. Toast, smoke, espresso and dark chocolate give the wine depth and gravitas. Ageworthy to be sure, but also enjoyable right now.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A splendidly rich wine, with mint from new wood adding an extra dimension to the ripe cherry fruit and sweet tannins. It's a wine that shows the full assets of the fine 2009 vintage, spice and ripeness.",La Chapelle des Bois,Domaine Chasselay
"A rounded wine, although still young. It has ripe fruit, creamed apples and fresh acidity. The wood flavors give an extra smoothness as well as a more complex long-lasting finish.",La Grand Chatelaine,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"Possibly the best Walter Clore to date, this is firm, with substantial dark-fruit flavors swathed in swirls of loam, blood, sweet tomato and red licorice. The relative coolness of the vintage seems to have allowed extra details to emerge, and the barrel aging has been handled sensitively.",Walter Clore Private Reserve Red Wine,Columbia Crest
"This wine has the richness of 2009, while still is mineral, taut and textured. The yellow fruits are balanced by intense acidity and a ripe, full-bodied feel. The wine is complex, needing aging; the aftertaste intense, crisp and fruity.",Mont de Milieu Premier Cru,Garnier et Fils
"Blessed with some of the most beautiful vineyards in an isolated spot in central Sicily (Contea di Sclafani), vintner Fabio Sireci's full attention goes to the quality of his fruit. This top-shelf expression of Nero d'Avola offers bright red fruit and softly toasted almond.",Vrucara,Feudo Montoni
"Ripe and leaning to the dark fruit side, with spicy blackberry aromas. Feels round and complete as it unfolds, and not at all edgy. Flavors of plum, cocoa and spice come with toasty oak, and the finish is bright and snappy. Will age for another decade without much trouble, but it's more than drinkable now.",Monte Real Reserva,Bodegas Riojanas
"Mellow on the nose, with red fruit aromas, freshness, hints of tobacco and marzipan. Feels flush in the mouth and lifted by fine acids, while it tastes of dried berry and plum, with dark spice accents. Shows a touch of espresso bitterness on a long finish. A keeper to drink now through 2017.",Gran Reserva,Carlos Serres
"Sourced from a smorgasbord of AVAs, this well-crafted Cabernet includes small percentages of Merlot and Cab Franc. Hard, tight and firmly grounded in cassis and black fruits, it melds in streaks of mineral, graphite and a hint of herb.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Diamante is a passito dessert wine from the producer's historic Tenuta Regaleali property outside Palermo. The wine boasts a beautiful golden color along with aromas of candied fruit, honey and marzipan.",Diamante,Tasca d'Almerita
"Il Musmeci is quickly reaching cult status in Italy as one of the best wines to emerge from Etna. Made from Nerello Mascalese and a small component of Nerello Cappuccio, it shows fine and elegant aromatic nuances of smell berry, cola and volcanic stone. The wine's real power comes in the mouth thanks to its tannic structure and length.",Il Musmeci,Tenuta di Fessina
"Fans of fruit-forward wines will love this Cab Franc for its explosion of cherries, blackberries and blueberries. The flavors go on and on. Sweet in fruit, yet it finishes bone dry. Not an ager, but a beauty with salty pork or duck dishes.",Gist Ranch Vineyard,Thomas Fogarty
"Another outstanding value from Three Rivers, this powerfully-built wine mixes ripe berry and plum fruit with polished, astringent tannins. It opens well, but really hits its stride on the back palate, with the balance and concentration to age. That said, it's drinking awfully well right now.",,Three Rivers
"In this 20-year-old tawny, you find a marvelous balance between fruit and extreme concentration. Burnt wood-aged flavors and acidity play with raisins and black figs give a sweet wine with a hint of dryness. Ready to drink.",20 Anos Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"Sweet and luscious, with powerful raspberry and cherry fruit. Made from 100% Syrah grown in the Moorman Vineyard, it was aged for nearly two years in French oak, much of it new. The alcohol is fairly high, giving the wine a full-bodied, glyceriney mouthfeel.",,Epiphany
"A very zinny Zin, packed with the variety's briary blackberry, anise, dark chocolate, bacon and crushed black-pepper flavors. It's the winery's best Zinfandel since the 2006 vintage.",,Frank Family
"Tornamira is a blend of Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot that shows dark and sophisticated aromas of cured meat, leather, Teriyaki sauce, black fruit and toasted almond. There's a modern touch of oaky spice on the finish, with soft, velvety tannins to boot.",Tornamira,Feudo Disisa
"Vrucara represents a new, exciting page in the story of Sicily's most important indigenous grape, Nero d'Avola. The purity of the fruit comes through loud and clear, and the wine doesn't deliver that bittersweet finish you sometimes get. Instead, it shows cherry, spice and an elegant mineral tone.",Vrucara,Feudo Montoni
"Few Sicilian producers export 100% Perricone wines to the U.S. Among those who do, Firriato's Ribeca is among the best. This is a bold, concentrated and modern wine, with opulent chocolate and dark berry aromas framed by oak spice and vanilla. Keep it in your cellar for a few more years.",Ribeca,Firriato
"Lifted and vibrant, this expressive Syrah shows great life and freshness. The red berry and blueberry fruit backbone balances the creamy vanilla and sweet smoke frame. Raspberry, cocoa-dusted cherry, coffee and anise flavors fill the round mouth with a lush, velvety texture; black pepper and baking spice notes remain through the long finish.",Yarden Yonatan Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
Red in color and flat in terms of bubbles and mouthfeel. It smells and tastes burnt and bitter. This is an odd conconction made from Malbec that's barely acceptable.,Serie Terra Spakling,Viniterra
"A perfect wine from a classic vintage, the 2007 Masseto (100% Merlot from a 17-acre vineyard of the same name) opens with an unabashedly opulent bouquet of delicious blackberry, cherry, chocolate, vanilla, exotic spice and cinnamon. Masseto excels both in terms of quality of fruit and winemaking and delivers plush, velvety tannins and an extra long, supple finish. It will make a special and valuable collection to your cellar.",Masseto,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"Here's a __ow_ wine you won't easily forget. Messorio is all Merlot, and happily delivers the softness, richness and overall opulence that we love in this noble grape variety. What elevates this particular expression and vintage is the true elegance and sophistication evident here. This is a huge wine, but it's not exaggerated and the finish is as long and smooth as they come.",Messorio,Le Macchiole
"The 2007 Ornellaia is a masterpiece blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and a tiny element of Petit Verdot. The intensity and purity are outstanding and the wine delivers beautiful notes of chocolate, black cherry, leather, cedar and spice. It's a big, modern expression that closes long with luscious softness and opulent fruit. Hold 10 years or more.",Ornellaia,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"The palate opens slowly, offering an initial citrus character, followed by wood and then, finally, wonderfully rich, but taut fruit. There is still a toast character here, with apricots and pear on top of the citrus, but it is still only just developing. In 10_15 years, it will be a magnificent wine.",,Château Haut-Brion
"Paleo (a pure expression of Cabernet Franc from Coastal Tuscany) is a drop dead gorgeous wine with amazing intensity and purity of aromas. You get it all here: Bright berry notes, drying mineral, exotic spice, cooling acidity and firm, satisfying structure. It's a rich, velvety and beautiful wine that will award you a memorable drinking experience now or in 10 years time.",Paleo,Le Macchiole
"Pretty much as good as Napa Cabernet gets. Shows the blackberries, black currants, blueberries and spicy plums of Oakville and scads of spices, and the tannin-acid structure is, in a word, superb. The oak elaboration is just about perfect, adding a tasteful layer of smoky, buttered toast. The finish goes on and on.",,Vine Cliff
"Galatrona is an opulent, gorgeous wine (from the excellent 2007) vintage that shows the very best of Merlot in Italy. Thanks to a unique growing climate located between Florence, Siena and Arezzo, as well as extremely low vineyard yields, the wine feels soft and velvety and imparts long-lasting flavors of black cherry, lively spice, tobacco and cigar box. The true beauty of Galatrona is that it shows all the passion and enthusiasm of its very talented winemaker.",Galatrona,Fattoria Petrolo
"Messorio (a 100% expression of delicious Merlot) is a wine that has already reached elite cult status and for very good reason. The opulence, richness and overall pleasure factor are unbeatable and the wine is sophisticated, elegant and balanced at the same time. The long fade is characterized by vanilla, chocolate, espresso, cherry and blackberry.",Messorio,Le Macchiole
"Scrio is a top-notch Syrah from Coastal Tuscany that does an excellent job of portraying not only the true nuances of the noble grape variety, but also the bounty of the beautiful territory that shaped it. Let this wine transport you to cypress-lined roads, stone farmhouses and Tuscan cuisine. The pleasure factor and richness are unbeatable.",Scrio,Le Macchiole
"Guado al Tasso is a wine that will make you fall uncontrollably in love with Italy. Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot are expertly blended to produce amazing intensity, purity and texture. You'll appreciate aromas of mineral, ripe fruit, leather, tobacco and chocolate.",Guado al Tasso,Marchesi Antinori
"A very great Napa Cabernet by any standard. Defines the modern style of soft richness, with lavish flavors of blackberry tart, crème de cassis, blueberry, dark chocolate and the richest, sweetest toasty oak you can imagine. It's soft and ripe enough to drink now, yet shows a subtle structure that suggests aging for a decade. Possesses the extreme complexity and finesse that mark the greatest wines.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Paul Hobbs
"This wine shows growing intensity the longer it stays in the glass and a very silky, polished feel in the mouth. Aromas include red fruit, spice and rosemary: this is a beautiful, balanced wine that will have a long life in your cellar.",Masseto,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"A true sensation. Shows the richness and concentration you want in a great Napa Cab, but also a structure that lifts it above the soft, mushy wines that are so prevalent. There's real tannin and acid architecture framing the opulent blackberry, black currant, mineral and cedar flavors, and the finish is dry, dry, dry. Every sip offers something different as it changes in the glass. A world-class wine that defines elegance, power and complexity. Should age effortlessly for at least a decade.",16 Rows,Vine Cliff
"One of the richest Cabernets of the vintage. Amazingly soft and velvety in the mouth, yet there's a solid grip of acidity and tannins that balance the richness. The flavors are extraordinary, ranging from blackberry and cherry-pie filling through currant liqueur and milk chocolate to leather. So decadent now, it's hard to resist, but should develop for 4_6 years.",Kathryn Hall,Hall
"D'Alceo is a drop dead gorgeous wine that oozes intensity, blackness, fruitiness, exotic spice and smoke. In the mouth, this beautifully executed super Tuscan is about as rich, smooth and opulent as they come. You'll love the lingering notes of mature berry, chocolate and espresso that drive the long, smooth finish.",D'Alceo,Castello dei Rampolla
"L'Apparita is a divine and delicate expression of Merlot with rich layers of black cherry, blackberry, spice, mocha, cedar, exotic spice and polished stone that are seamlessly woven together. The wine hits the palate with the softness and richness of the world's best Merlots and leaves a fading impression of fruit and spice that can be counted in many long, delicious minutes. Hold until 2018.",L'Apparita,Castello di Ama
"This vineyard has proved itself for so many years that it's practically a guarantee of greatness. This 2008 is a real stunner. It's so rich and exotic, so balanced and dry, so clean. Dazzles with pear, pineapple, lychee, roasted hazelnut, crème brûlée, buttered toast, honey and spice flavors, wrapped into a creamy smooth mouthfeel. Brilliant and compelling. Drink now.",Dutton Ranch Rued Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"An impressive wine from an impressive vintage, this Tuscan expression of Cabernet Franc opens with opulent fruit notes of blackberry, prune, plum and ripe cherry backed by clove, pepper, leather and cigar box. The tannins are firm and silky and the fade is long and velvety.",Dedicato a Walter,Poggio al Tesoro
"This beautiful vintage of Paleo (an oak-aged expression of Cabernet Franc) shows dark, inky intensity and loads of mature black fruit, spice, plum, prune and blackberry. It is extremely smooth and rich with a long-lasting fade that consists of fruit and clove-like flavors. Yet, the tannins are still firm, so put this wine aside in your cellar for at least five years.",Paleo,Le Macchiole
"No doubt you will very much enjoy this super Tuscan blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Sangiovese. The wine is rich, smooth and opulent: The quality of the fruit is also excellent with background shadings of black mineral, mature cherry, clove, rum cake, smoked ham and cola.",Oreno,Tenuta Sette Ponti
"Extraordinary for how drinkable it is right now, and for how it will evolve. Shows the crisp acidity and minerality of this cool-climate vineyard, with rich flavors of raspberries, cherry liqueur, cola, exotic spices, vanilla, buttered cinnamon toast and smoky sandalwood. Yet the tannic integrity should help it change in fascinating ways over the next six years. Decant for several hours.",Dutton Ranch Freestone Hill Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"Sorugo (a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc) is nothing short of gorgeous with elegant aromas of polished mineral, cherry, chocolate, leather and brooding black fruit. It's soft and textured with a refreshing note of acidity backed by excellent density.",Sorugo,Aia Vecchia
"Fruit was picked later than normal and the Masseto Merlot does indeed show mature aromas of black cherry, ripe blackberry, earthy iron and polished stone. The intensity and purity are amazing and the wine is sophisticated, soft and very rich on the finish. It is already showing beautiful evolution in the glass.",Masseto,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"It's easy to get ripe fruit in California and then plaster it in oak, but what's so difficult to achieve is the crisp, minerally structure this wine displays. It's rich in pineapple cream, Key lime pie, Meyer lemon sorbet, golden mango and vanilla oak flavors, but achieves balanced elegance with crisp acidity and a wonderful stony purity. Only 349 cases produced.",Proprietress Reserve,Vine Cliff
"So dry, so crisply acidic, so silky in the mouth, and so rich in flavor. This is a truly distinctive Pinot Noir. It shows the variety's elusive personality, now rich in cherries and currants, withdrawing into minerals and herbs. Yet the final impression is of fine, silky decadence. Should develop in fascinating directions over the next 6_8 years.",Buena Prierra Vineyard Helio Doro Block,Brogan
"Siepi is a gorgeous super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese and Merlot that exhibits richness, intensity and purity. This is a luscious and opulent expression with deep aromas of cherry, blackberry, chocolate, espresso bean and spice. The finish is super long and delicious.",Castello di Fonterutoli Siepi,Mazzei
"This late-disgorged wine has been released at the age of 11 years. It's a beautiful wine, notable especially for the ultrafine feeling of the mousse, or bubbles. So refined and silky. Rich too are the flavors, in limes, strawberries, toasty lees and minerals. A spectacular sparkling wine that has many years of development ahead.",Carneros Cuvée,Gloria Ferrer
"A 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet, this wine is rich and opulent, without being at all heavy or exaggerated. The mouthfeel is smooth, soft but structured and there is a long fruit and spice flavored finish.",Madre,Poggio Antico
"An awesome Chardonnay that gives everything you want in richness, yet frames it in a structural integrity rare in California. Dazzles with tropical fruit, green apple and pear flavors, with a brilliant overlay of oak that adds buttered toast and spice flavors, not to mention sturdy oak tannins. But it's the zesty acidity, like a squirt of lime juice, that really elevates this wine.",Ulises Valdez Vineyard,Paul Hobbs
"A stunning and balanced Cab, the El Rom Vineyard boasts ripe blackberry, cherry and cassis aromas and flavors, dusted with accents of cedar, cocoa powder and cigar box spice. Round and hedonistic in the mouth with seductive dark fruit and a mocha-driven finish, this wine is approachable now but can also stand some years in the cellar.",Yarden El Rom Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"A delicious vintage of Grand Vin, this wine shows great depth and drinkability now with the promise to age gracefully for at least another five years thanks to a ripe fruit center, medium acidity, structured tannins and superb overall balance. Black fruit and leathery spice dominate, with additional notes of black tea, licorice root, cassis and espresso grinds all fleshing out the complex and layered palate.",Grand Vin,Domaine du Castel
"The fruit for this excellent Cabernet Franc is sourced from wide-ranging vineyards throughout the Yakima, Columbia and Walla Walla valleys. Aged 18 months in a mix of French, American and Hungarian oak, it is the most accessible of the new red wine releases from Barrister. The tart red fruits are coated with creamy caramel and pretty toast notes, and it sails like clean silk into a long, smooth, buttery finish.",,Barrister
"Bésoleil remains Grenache-dominated, but this new vintage includes 14% Syrah, 10% Mourvèdre, and (for the first time) 9% Cinsault. Bright and penetrating, the brilliant raspberry fruit is the star here, tart and fresh, with the juiciness of a young Zinfandel.",Bésoleil,Betz Family
"Lusir_ is Sicilian dialect for __yrah_ grape and this hearty expression opens with inky dark concentration and intense aromas of ripe blackberry, blueberry, cinnamon, leather and smoked bacon fat. It shows a rich, chewy feel in the mouth.",Lusir_,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Just delicious. Feels like a modern, cult-style Napa Cabernet, soft and complex and slightly sweet, with tannins so finely ground, it's drinkable now. The flavors are Cabernet-like also, with blackberries,blueberries, mocha and spices, although its briary, brambly quality is distinctive to Zinfandel.",George's Vineyard,JR Wine
"The husband-and-wife team of Mike and Claire Allen have turned out 2,000 cases of this terrific value, which delivers authentic Pinot Noir complexity at an attractive price. Bold black cherry fruit carries subtle herb, twig and vanilla shadings with aplomb, while the texture turns velvety on the lengthy finish. Drink now_2017.",,Huia
"The winemaker pulled out all the bells and whistles, barrel fermenting this Chardonnay, putting it through partial malolactic fermentation, and aging it on the lees. The result is a rich, creamy wine, ripe in pineapple, orange, pear, vanilla and honeysuckle flavors, and brightened with brisk Carneros acidity. Shows impeccable balance, at a fair price.",,Isabel Mondavi
"From a very cool vintage, this wine takes full advantage of the flavors the year delivered. Bracing and fresh, with a lively mix of lime and citrus fruits, its vivid acidity and a wash of wet rock, give it life and length across the palate. Complex and textural, this is a lovely wine.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Features an admirably lean, elegantly fine line of acids from start to finish, off of which hang notes of crushed stone, green apple and lime, with just the merest hints of riper fruit, like nectarine. Crisp and long, this should develop well over the next 5_10 years.",Bin 51,Penfolds
"A new blend for Pepper Bridge, Trine is named for the three main partners and includes all five Bordeaux red grapes. Tannic and earthy, with a powerful core of dark fruit, this needs more bottle time to fully integrate. Layers of fruit are mixed with loam, iron, licorice and espresso, full-bodied and deep.",Trine Red,Pepper Bridge
"Burdese is Sicily's tip-of-the-hat to the great wines of Bordeaux. A blended red, the wine is elegant and firm, with dark concentration and earthy tones of leather and spice behind fresh berry and blackberry. Balance and length characterize the mouthfeel.",Burdese,Planeta
"A big, bold, black vintage Port, already enticingly perfumed, packed with as much rich fruit as tannin. It's in the sweet vintage Port arena, an immediately attractive wine, yet layered with enough structure to keep it maturing for many years. The final sense is all richness.",Vintage,Poças
"A gorgeous Cab-based blend with 17% Cab Franc, 15% Petit Verdot and 7% Merlot, Edom is rich and seductive. Sultry notes of mulled boysenberry and blackberry are infused with cigar tobacco, cedar and roasted cocoa nib accents. A strong structure of firm tannins and moderate acidity carry through to the black-pepper-flecked finish.",Edom,Psagot
"This stylish Viognier is sourced from the Dineen vineyard. A cool site in a cool vintage yields a carefully made wine with gin-like spices and penetration. Lemon, lime and raw steel give it grip and length. Fine winemaking shows the strengths of a difficult vintage.",Divio,Stevens
"An icon wine of Sicily, Rosso del Conte is the Sassicaia of southern Italy because it opened the road for a quality-based revolution. This gorgeous blend (55% Nero d'Avola, 17% Perricone and 28% other mixed varieties) is soft, subtle and rich, with long-lasting tones of cherry and spice and well-extracted concentration.",Rosso del Conte,Tasca d'Almerita
"Syrah, Grenache, Mourvèdre and Cinsault are included in this blend, along with a splash of co-fermented Roussanne. As with all the Tranche releases, the aromatics are seductive, the mouthfeel smooth and textural and the fruit immaculate. Brambly berry and plum flavors link to a finish with veins of graphite and cola.",Slice of Pape Red,Tranche
"This is an instantly loveable Grenache, bursting with ripe, sweet raspberries and cherries. Young and fresh, it's like sucking on a really good candy; then it finishes with a flourish of toast and mocha.",Far Away Vineyard,Trio Vintners
"A brilliant Chardonnay, brimming with powerfully ripe tropical fruit and pear flavors, enriched with smoky, sweet oak. The key here is acidity and the minerality that accompanies the best Santa Lucia Chards. Drink this flamboyant wine now for maximum vibrancy.",Dos Rubios Vineyard,Testarossa
"Very much in line with SEV's fine 2009 Chardonnay, this is sourced from the Lewis Vineyard. Instantly round and fruity, it offers up a ripe mix of oranges and apricots, backed with juicy acidity. Then it brings in the butter, toast and nuts__ full-bodied, extremely generous wine.",,Sinclair Estate Vineyards
"This wine is marked by exceptionally ripe, forward flavors of blackberry jam and black currants, with a sweet coating of smoky oak. In fact, flavor is what drives this wine, although it also shows fine, complex Diamond Mountain tannins that give it a dramatic structure. Seems best now and for the next three years.",Estate,Reverie
"Named after winemaker Domingos Soares Franco, this is a serious, intense, wood-aged wine. Along with the new wood flavors, it has rich blackberry fruit and dry tannins. With its firm concentrated structure, this is one age-worthy wine.",Domingos Touriga Nacional & Syrah,José Maria da Fonseca
"The luscious fruit mix starts with a suggestion of marmalade, then adds plum and cherry. It gains complexity with streaks of graphite, black olive and smoke, polished, lightly earthy tannins and plenty of power through the finish. An interesting, somewhat unusual style of Ethos.",Ethos Reserve,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Bold and gold, with penetrating aromas of orange, dried apricots, sweat and honey comb. The feel is rich and layered, with just enough acidity to lend volume to the apricot, dried peach and honey flavors this late-harvest Chardonnay is pushing. Thick and a bit unctuous on the finish; drink now.",Caligo Essència Sweet White Wine,D.G. Viticultors
"This fruit-forward Pinot offers a blast of cherries and raspberries. It's almost as sweet as jam, but it finishes dry, as the acidity and tannins that constitute its structure rush in. A lovely wine to drink now, right out of the bottle, and over the next few years.",Thornton Vineyard,De Loach
"Always one of the most approachable Pinot bottlings from Felton Road, the Bannockburn is a medium-bodied wine in 2009, redolent of earth, smoke and mushrooms. Silky tannins on the finish frame flavors of ripe cherries, dark earth and a hint of espresso. Drink now_2016.",Bannockburn,Felton Road
"The first Washington wine to be released from the 2011 vintage hits the ground running, with ripe, round, rich flavors of honeyed pears and peaches. Succulent and fruity, it cuts its sharp acidity with 2% residual sugar, making for a wine with fine concentration and length.",Drizzle,Convergence Zone
"This is a big, tannic, midnight black Cabernet, rude in youth and barely drinkable. The tannins are powerful enough to lock down the palate. The grapes, grown in Calistoga, are very ripe in blackberries, currants and dark chocolate, but those tannins are stubbornly astringent. Almost old-fashioned in toughness despite very high alcohol, it's a curiosity that seems likely to develop in the cellar, but with so little evidence of past vintages, all bets are off.",Blueline Vineyard,Hourglass
"A wonderful Syrah, one of the most drinkable on the market. It's delicious, with thick, soft tannins housing dry, complex flavors of blackberries, black currants, cola, anise and black pepper.",,Longboard
"Frank Cornelissen is one of the rising stars of Italy's natural wine movement. Munjebel 7 (he does editions, instead of vintages) shows a bright ruby appearance with suspended particles that give it a slightly cloudy appearance. The aromas are fine, delicate and complex with wild berry, crushed granite and dusty earth. His wines are aged in large clay amphorae.",Munjebel 7,Frank Cornelissen
"This iconic Italian wine from Bolgheri's landmark Sassicaia vineyard (characterized by little rocks, or __assi_) offers an elegant bouquet comprised in equal measure by mineral, fruit and spice nuances. The wine consists of 85% Cabernet Sauvignon and 15% Cabernet Franc and the finish is long, smooth and very fine. This is an ageworthy wine that should not be opened before 2018.",Sassicaia,Tenuta San Guido
In terms of overall quality this is the best yet from this sea-facing estate in coastal Tuscany. The blend sees Cabernet Sauvignon enhanced by Merlot and Cabernet Franc and the overall effect is one of impressive intensity and sophistication. The finish is velvety rich and smooth.,Argentiera,Tenuta Argentiera
"The most tannic and closed of Vine Cliff's magnificent array of '07 Cabernets. It's hard, with a bite of acidity, but it doesn't take much for the richness to explode. Blackberries, black currants, dark chocolate, butterscotch, sweet cinnamon spice, the list goes on and on. So rich and decadent, you can enjoy it now, but it will gather momentum over the next 6_8 years.",Pickett Road Vineyard,Vine Cliff
"This rich blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Sangiovese) opens with pretty chocolate tones followed by opulent cherry, spice, leather, tobacco and cola. This is a well shaped and focused wine with a linear, elegant feel in the mouth capped by soft, chewy texture.",,Grattamacco
"A great Bordeaux-style wine that can stand proudly next to Napa bottlings that cost far more. It's mainly Cabernet Sauvignon, with the other four permitted Meritage varieties, and there seems to be lots of new, sweetly toasted oak. The blackberry, cherry, red currant, mocha and bacon flavors are delicious, but even better is the tannic structure. It's soft and alluring enough to drink now.",Symmetry Red,Rodney Strong
"A spectacular Pinot that succeeds due to superior structure and complex flavors. With a silky texture, it feels smooth in the mouth, and shows dry, cool-climate flavors of raspberries, cola, oranges and anise, with the most lovely overlay of smoky oak. Beautiful acidity and finely meshed tannins provide the architecture. Drink now_2014.",Michaela's Reserve,Brogan
"Amazingly delicious and soft. Defines the modern Napa Cabernet style, with the tasteful elegance Hall wines are known for. With 20% Merlot, it displays dazzlingly rich flavors of blackberries, black cherries, red currants and mocha, with a savory note of bacon. Now_2013.",Ellie's,Hall
"His skills show in this rich, powerful, finely balanced wine. It has layers of black berry fruits, damsons, bitter chocolate and a good core of acidity. Give this impressive wine 3_4 years.",Rapariga da Quinta Reserva,Luis Duarte
"For lovers of sophisticated Italian wine, Schidione (a hearty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Sangiovese and Merlot) shows personality, elegance and impressive intensity. The mouthfeel is smooth and rich. An excellent addition to a cellar collection.",Schidione,Jacopo Biondi-Santi
"This is a lovely, rich wine with mature red berry tones followed by sharp mineral definition and bright aromas of fresh Indian spice. The wine is dense and decadent and could stand up to beef tenderloin with balsamic reduction.",Sapaio,Podere Sapaio
"Madre, or mother in Italian, is a feminine but sturdy blend that shows both the floral and forest berry characteristics of the Cabernet backed by the natural heft and intensity of the Sangiovese. This impressive super Tuscan blend would make a perfect partner to grilled steak or marinated pork.",Madre,Poggio Antico
"Syrah master Novy has given us a beautiful Syrah to drink now with rich lamb, beef and pork dishes, or perhaps a Latin-inspired black bean soup. It's rich, softly lush and dry, and the blackberry, currant, mocha and sandalwood flavors have exciting edges of salty cured meats and freshly crushed black pepper. Really exquisite, but only 263 cases were produced.",Rosella's Vineyard,Novy
"Sadly, just 44 cases were produced, from Block 1 of the original estate vineyard. Rhubarb, cherry, cinnamon and suggestions of light tropical fruits are delicately entwined here. It would be easy to skip over the wine's complexity; you must let it breathe open and it will reward you with fascinating, subtle layers that slowly unravel.",Quarter Mile Lane Vineyard,Adelsheim
"A selection from the Quinta da Bacalhôa vineyard, this sumptuous wine layers the darkest fruit flavors with a structure that is solid, dense and powerful. Juicy plums, licorice and a firm, stalky edge go with wood aging and bone-dry tannins. Age for 5_6 years.",Palácio da Bacalhôa,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Cecchi's Coevo is a wonderful super Tuscan blend that costs half as much as the other cult wines in this elite category. The wine is rich, opulent, intense and extremely focused in terms of its aromatic delivery and the mouthfeel is long, textured and rich.",Coevo,Cecchi
"High toast aromas are filled out on the palate with rich, concentrated fruit and bitter chocolate flavors. This powerful, impressive wine is spicy and densely packed. At this stage, it feels hard edged, but that will fill out in the next 3_4 years as the wine broadens out.",Le Cèdre,Château du Cèdre
"Beautifully rich and smooth, with mint and new wood aromas, and fresh spice. All this goes with intense, serious structure, black fruits and concentrated tannins. The wine is a powerhouse of intensity, with a great medium-term aging capacity (5_8 years).",Malhadinha Tinto,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"DVX is Mumm Napa's top of the line vintage bottling. This '02 is a 50-50 blend of Pinot Noir and Chardonnay, making it a brut. It's very high in acidity, and the bubbles are tiny and refined, giving it the ultra-smooth mouthfeel you want in a superior sparkling wine. The raspberry, lime and pear flavors are rich, but subtle, reined in by yeastiness and a tangy minerality. Drink this luxurious bubbly now and over the next 10 years.",DVX,Mumm Napa
"An ultrarich Cabernet whose ripe fruit is as elaborate as you can get. Ditto for the soft, plush tannins and the wealth of fine, sweet oak. Despite the wealth of blackberry, currant, dark chocolate and cola flavors, it's not a wine to drink now, because the tannins and acids are so pert. Give it a good six years in the cellar.",Beckstoffer To Kalon Vineyard,Paul Hobbs
"Typically Calera's most luscious, delicious wine in youth. The year 2007 was kind, and the result is a Pinot rich in cherries, raspberries, licorice and cola, wrapped into a silky texture, with near perfect acids and tannins. As good as it is now, it should develop over the next 6_8 years.",Mills Vineyard,Calera
"Marchesale is an excellent Syrah with an inky, black appearance and intense aromas of blueberry, plum, prune, black pepper and crushed stone. The wine shows incredible richness and density and lasts long on the palate thanks to its firm, succulent tannins.",Marchesale,Terre del Marchesato
"Napa red wine hardly gets more delicious than this. It's so soft and velvety, so rich in chocolate, blackberry and smoky oak flavors, that you can't resist sip after sip. It really defines the modern Napa style. The blend is Tempranillo, Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Malbec, and the grapes were grown on the winery's estate vineyard in the heart of Atlas Peak.",The Doctor,Krupp Brothers
"Saffredi is a beautiful wine, worthy of membership in an elite class of super Tuscan wines from Italy. The blend is Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Alicante and a tiny percentage of Syrah and the overall result is that of plushness, softness and intensity. Aromas include spice, chocolate, blackberry and cherry.",Saffredi,Fattoria Le Pupille
"Rui Reguinga, named Portugal's Winemaker of the Year in 2009, produces this sumptuous wine. The fruit is rich, with jammy berries and plums, balanced with spice from wood aging. The core of tannins suggests a powerful wine that will age well.",Reserva,Quinta do Quetzal
"You'll love the tones of rich chocolate, leather, berry fruit, cassis and vanilla. All those aromas are backed by dense, rich extraction and smooth softness.",Tenuta Belguardo,Mazzei
"A wonderful, rich wine, fermented in open stone lagars, giving a concentrated, beautifully soft wine. The texture is dense and velvety; ripe black fruits are given further complexity by wood aging. A superb wine, powerful and elegant.",Reserva,Vinha Paz
"With a density of nearly 7,000 vines per acre, and consequent low yields, it is not surprising this is a concentrated, intense wine. It has quintessential herbaceous flavors, rounded out with a creamed apple element and a tight, steely texture. Age for 3_4 years.",Haute Densité,Château de Tracy
"Inky black in color, this is strong stuff. The wood aromas are overdone, but on the palate, the wine is rich, allowing the tarry black berry fruits and herbs to show through. Designed for aging; keep for 4_5 years.",GC,Château du Cèdre
"Le Serre Nuove presents an intense and harmonious bouquet that is accented by opulent notes of black cherry, chocolate, cinnamon spice, leather and tobacco. The blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet France and Petit Verdot ends long on the close with enduring density and velvety texture.",Le Serre Nuove,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"Poggio al Lupo is a super Tuscan blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Alicante and Petit Verdot that delivers loads of chocolate fudge, spice, mature fruit and sweet tobacco. The wine is soft, smooth and makes a perfect companion to succulent meat dishes.",Poggio al Lupo,Tenuta Sette Ponti
"Initially a very soft wine, it slowly shows its ripe fruits, intense texture and blend of buttery toast and acidity. Yellow fruits dominate, bursting through the acidity to give a ripe, opulent finish. Age for 3_4 years.",Vaudésir Grand Cru,Garnier et Fils
"Neudorf seems to do almost everything well, and the winery's efforts with Riesling off the Moutere clays are no exception. It's made in a light- to medium-bodied style, off dry, with crisp notes of lime, green apple and wet stone that linger on the mouthwatering finish.",Moutere,Neudorf
"Tané is a beautiful barrique-aged blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah from southeast Sicily that shows rich intensity and a velvety feel in the mouth. The fruit is dense and smooth, and the wine's bright flavors last a long time on the palate.",Tané,Valle dell'Acate
"With a fine butter-and-mineral texture, this is an ageworthy wine. Its white and citrus fruit flavors offer both richness and acidity, with toast adding a note of spice. Keep for 2_3 years.",Les Hauts Jarrens Premier Cru,Maurice Ecard
"Morgante's Don Antonio is a wine that faithfully mirrors the growing success of Sicily. It's been around long enough to provide a model for younger vintners and it's quality remains excellent, thanks to a dense, inky texture and bright aromas of dark cherry and toasted almond.",Don Antonio,Morgante
"A rich style of Chablis, with a toasty quality and yellow fruits mixed with acidity. The wine is open and round, full in the mouth, with concentrated ripe fruit and a soft texture. It should easily age for 2_3 years, but it is delicious now.",Fourchaume Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Planeta's Chardonnay is one of the nicest expressions of this international grape variety made on Italian soil. From sunny Sicily, the wine recalls some of the characteristics of Chardonnay from California, with its creamy, rich mouthfeel and beautifully intense aromas of stone fruit, citrus, vanilla, yellow rose and exotic spice.",,Planeta
"COS is a natural, biodynamic and organic wine estate in southern Sicily and a leader in the rising popularity of the Cerasuolo di Vittoria denomination. This expression is particularly delicate and expressive, with nuanced layers of wild berry, white chocolate and cola.",,COS
"S_gana shows its best qualities in the 2008 vintage. It opens with a dark, inky appearance and thick aromas of red cherry, chocolate, espresso bean and dark spice. It's a bold and concentrated wine, with savory endnotes of soy and Teriyaki sauce.",S_gana,Cusumano
"Quater is an innovative blend of Nero d'Avola, Perricone, Frappato and Nerello Cappuccio (four important indigenous grapes of Sicily) with a vinous but intense bouquet of red fruit, chocolate and spice. The mouthfeel is soft, velvety and opulent.",Quater,Firriato
"This beautiful vintage of Duca Enrico shows riper fruit than the 2006, with its hint of green leaf. The fruit here is plush, rich and chewy, with long-lasting tones of blackberry pie, leather, spice and moist pipe tobacco.",Duca Enrico,Duca di Salaparuta
"Lovely and rich, drinking beautifully, this limited reserve celebrates the 10-year collaboration of Tom Waliser (grower) and Tom Glase (winemaker). Fleshy strawberry, mulberry and cherry fruit leads smoothly into a broad midpalate with notes of leaf and herb. Silky tannins wrap into a clean and delicious finish.",TomFoolery Red,Beresan
"Tight and edgy but ultimately oaky and generous on the nose, with earth, vanilla, dried cheese and blackberry notes. Feels cushioned and complete, with depth of feel and flavor; tastes of deep berry, mild herbs and finally a toasty wave of coffee and chocolate takes over. Impressive for a 2008; drink now through 2014.",Viñas de Gain,Artadi
"So delicious and easy to drink, it's complexities are almost unappreciated. Lush, ripe raspberry, cherry and cola flavors flatter the palate, finished with smoky toast and exotic spices. Extra points for crisp acidity and lovely tannins.",Burnside Road Vineyard,Balletto
"Made with a blend of Nerello Mascalese from different vineyard sites, or contrade, as well as various vintages, this special ""Vigna Alta"" Etna red shows elegant tones of small berry, black pepper and crushed stone. The wine represents the best of a natural, biodynamic and organic winemaking tradition that is taking hold in Sicily.",Munjebel 7 VA,Frank Cornelissen
"Ultraconcentrated and almost heavy on the nose, but not fully syrupy or leaden. Has a heavy disposition in the mouth, with brown sugar, caramel and other usual suspects making up the flavor profile. Creamy and chunky on the finish. Excellent dessert wine for the price.",Vino Dulce Natural,Hidalgo
"A rich, smooth, sweet wine, full of caramel and almonds, with just a hint of acidity. The spirit edge gives the right bite in this mature, rounded, delicious tawny.",20-Years-Old Tawny,Kopke
"Give this wine a year or three in the cellar, unless you like your Pinots a little on the tough side. Tannins and earthiness currently dominate the polished raspberry and cherry flavors. If you do drink it now, decant for a few hours, but not overnight.",BCD Vineyard,Balletto
"Fragrant with pretty berry scents, this compact wine rewards some hours of breathing time. The tangy fruit is complemented by streaks of herb, mineral and citrus peel, all woven together into a gently fading finish that adds a lick of dark chocolate.",,Amavi
"A limited release, first-time Cabernet from Heather Hill (estate) fruit, this is big, chewy and still locked up tight. Black cherry and cassis fruit is packed densely into a compact core, with veins of smoke, licorice and graphite. Aged in 80% new French oak, it is a wine for the cellar; the score could certainly rise with more bottle age.",Heather Hill,Abeja
"All Pepper Bridge vineyard fruit_62% Cabernet Sauvignon and 38% Syrah__his is right in line with the excellent 2006 Sayulita, which came from the Lefore Vineyard. Bright fruit, tart and tangy, gives a juicy, fresh quality to the mouthfeel. Lots of high-acid berry flavors, are accented by light chocolate and caramel notes from 20 months in second and third use French oak.",Sayulita Red,Balboa
"Edna Valley Pinot Noirs can be simple, but this one's not. It has a depth and seriousness that are good enough to accompany a great steak, lamb chop or grilled tuna. Dry and smooth, its cherry and raspberry flavors are enhanced with a deft touch of sweet, smoky oak.",,Kynsi
"With its fine aged-wood and fruit character, this is a sweet yet complex wine. Toast, almonds, a hint of spirit and the palate and delicate acidity all combine easily in a harmonious wine whose closest comparison is with a great amontillado.",20-Year-Old White,Burmester
"What a great price for a Pinot Noir with this charm and integrity. It's a wonderful wine, dry and rich in raspberry, cherry and spice flavors. Feels svelte and silky in the mouth, just like you want Pinot to be. Might even gain a few notes with a year or two in the bottle.",Estate,Gloria Ferrer
"Harmonium is a gorgeous, opulent wine with a generous bouquet that is packed tight with blackberry, cherry liqueur, dark mocha, toasted vanilla bean and bright touches of black licorice. It's a very pleasurable and elaborate interpretation of Sicily's number one indigenous grape.",Harmonium,Firriato
"Organically grown grapes have yielded a firm, dense wine that brings out the power of Morgon. It has dark plum skins and cherry fruit, layered with firmly structured tannins. It's an impressive wine for aging 2_3 years.",,Domaine Chasselay
A finely balanced wine with toast and ginger flavors peeking through the ripe peach and apricot fruits. It is striated with minerality giving an intense ageworthy texture. The acidity shows through strongly at the end.,Les Embazées Premier Cru,Chartron et Trébuchet
"As before, this is 100% Syrah from the Red Willow Vineyard's oldest vines. It can seem rather light when first opened, with pretty raspberry scents that carry delicate hints of herb. Complexities emerge with airing: more subtle whiffs of earth and flower and flavors that don't overwhelm, but seem to keep adding interesting threads of blueberry, black cherry, Asian spice and game.",La Côte Patriarche,Betz Family
"Thick and potent on the nose, with aromas of prune, cola and fig. Feels dense and syrupy, with dulce de leche, cocoa and integrated citrus flavors. An unbridled winner with richness, length and raw value; how many $15 wines rank this high? Not many.",Oxford 1.970,Bodegas Dios Baco S.L.
"Although CB made its reputation on Sauvignon Blanc, the Pinot Noir is finally achieving a similar level of quality. Dark cherry fruit is couched in notes of sandalwood, cinnamon and clove, framed by tannins that are silky without being excessively soft. Drink now_2016.",,Cloudy Bay
"A near replica of the wonderful 2007, and an equally powerful value. Enormously rich and attractive in pineapple cream, golden mango, lemon chiffon pie, buttered toast and dusty spice flavors; crisp Central Coast acidity makes it alive and vibrant. Only 400 cases produced, but worth the search.",Sarmento Vineyard,Windstream
"This is a massive, beautifully put together Bolgheri Superiore that opens with a complex bouquet of polished stone, dried fruit, prunes, plums, black- berry and new leather. The wine feels tight and compact with a fine, silky quality of tannin.",Arnione,Campo alla Sughera
"Run, don't walk, to find this rich Merlot. It shows vast berry, currant, mocha, licorice and cola flavors, wrapped into superfine tannins and balanced with fine acidity. Easy to find, with 7,600 cases produced.",,Chateau St. Jean
"Here's a blockbuster blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (65%) and Cabernet Franc that impresses on all levels. The aromatic intensity is outstanding, with deep levels of cherry, chocolate, tobacco and exotic spice. But what impresses most of all is the mouthfeel: It is rich, opulent, velvety and smooth.",Tâm,Batzella
"This Cabernet-based wine is supremely elegant. It brings together new wood flavors, firm and dry Cabernet tannins and powerful concentration. It has great depth of flavor; very complex, the acidity promising good aging.",Quinta da Bacalhôa,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"There is great power, yet balance here. The wine has firm, rich fruits, with solid dark tannins to go with layers of fresh acidity and a dense texture. Obviously for aging, this is an impressive statement of Malbec.",Clos Triguedina Probus,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Made from 90% Chardonnay and 10% Pinot Gris, this lovely Blanc de Blancs brims with vanilla cream, lime and pear aromas and flavors, with the yeasty, baked bread dough toastiness that mark the best sparkling wines. It's basically dry and quite high in acidity, which gives it a brisk, clean finish. Drink this fine bubbly now and for the next 6_8 years.",Blanc de Blancs,Mumm Napa
"Very unusual to get a newly released Cabernet from the 2004 vintage, especially one this good, at this price. At age six, it's fully mellow, with a silky mouthfeel framing flavors of cherries and blackberries that are starting to dry out and sweeten. There are also developing notes of mushrooms and earth. What a bargain, but only 800 cases were produced.",,Philippe-Lorraine
"This is one of the most forward and accessible of Calera's new releases. It's superrich now in black cherry liqueur, mocha, licorice, bacon and spice flavors, a seductively silky wine that's a total hedonistic pleasure. If you can keep from drinking it now, it should develop well over the next 6_8 years.",Ryan Vineyard,Calera
"Lupicaia is a beautiful blend of Cabernet with smaller percentages of Merlot and Petit Verdot. The wine is elegant, complex and layered with intense aromas of blackberry, cherry, spice, leather, smoke and Spanish cedar. It's beautiful from start to finish.",Lupicaia,Castello del Terriccio
"For sheer palate seduction, you can't beat this rich wine. It used to be that Diamond Mountain Cabs weren't drinkable for years because of the tannins. Not so with this beauty. It shows pure, classic Cabernet flavors of blackberries, black currants, cherry-pie filling, violets and sweet, smoky sandalwood, with a distinct minerality. Although it's beautiful now, it should develop in the bottle for a decade.",,J.R. Carter
"Guado dè Gemoli is a 80-20 blend of Cab Sauvignon and Merlot that is enhanced by elegant mineral and slate aromas backed by wild berry, cherry, leather, licorice and cherry cola. There's plenty of sweet, chewy fruit in the mouth to give the wine staying power. The close is both succulent and smooth.",Guado dè Gemoli,Giovanni Chiappini
"Awesomely rich, showing fine acidity and a stony minerality that ground and anchor it, but really notable for the explosive tropical fruit, apricot, pear and buttery oak flavors that are so opulent. The wine went through a complete malolactic fermentation.",West Block,Knights Bridge
"Dazzles now for its richness. Shows those classic Howell Mountain tannins, but they've been so tamed and refined, you can drink it now. The flavors are spectacular, over the top; pure Cirque du Soleil spectacle of blackberry, currant and chocolate acrobatics.",Vintage III,Lamborn Family Vineyards
"This edition of Sapaio (a hearty blend of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot) shows ripe fruit nuances of cherry, blackberry, dark spice and moist tobacco. The wine boasts a soft, thick and velvety feel and would pair with any winter meat dish.",Sapaio,Podere Sapaio
"Merlot and Cabs Sauvignon and Franc are the base of this ripe, dense and rich Bolgheri blend. The intensity is impressive and so is the overall density and persistence of the finish. Pair this wine with hearty dishes, such as sausage and slow-cooked lentils.",Sondraia,Poggio al Tesoro
"What a roll Mumm Napa is on with their new releases. This blush wine shows the level of richness and elegance the winery has achieved lately. Made from 85% Pinot Noir and 15% Chardonnay, it has deliciously forward flavors of raspberries, strawberries, gingersnap cookies and vanilla lemon custard, with the bubbly froth and tart yeastiness of a fine sparkling wine.",Brut Rosé,Mumm Napa
"Made by consulting enologist Roberto Cipressi, this rich blend of Merlot, Cab Franc and Sangiovese offers an impressive lineup of fruit, spice and mineral aromas. The wine is incredibly smooth on the fade with lingering notes of clove and cinnamon on the close.",Poggiomandorlo,Poggio Mandorlo
"Wow! This is a big wine with inky, black notes and almost exaggerated aromatic intensity. The blend is 70-30 Petit Verdot and Merlot and it's almost as if the density and concentration of the first variety needed to be cut by the softness and gentleness of the second.",Campo alla Sughera,Campo alla Sughera
"The fine folks at Castello di Monsanto manage to always produce elegant and harmonious wines from Tuscany. This exceptional Cabernet Sauvignon shows remarkable quality both in terms of its flavor presentation and its territory-driven personality. The long fade is colored by blackberry, cherry and spice flavors.",Nemo,Castello di Monsanto
"A full-bodied wine, just lightly wooded in character. Its acidity is beautifully integrated with rich lees flavors, grapefruit and bright apple. It is a complex wine, deliciously perfumed and likely to age well over 3_4 years.",La Vigne de Beaussopet,Domaine Laporte
"Ripe, dense and powerful, with on onslaught of raisin, spice, pepper and leather on the nose. The palate is direct and pure, with clean flavors of berry, spice and chocolate leading to a long, layered finish. Beautiful wine; one of the best I've had from this region. 70% Monastrell with 20% Cabernet and 10% Syrah.",Alma de Luon,Bodegas Luzón
"Quickly becoming one of Adelsheim's most important vineyard designates, this beautifully balanced wine opens with pungent, primary fruits, a jumble of berries and cherries in the nose and mouth. It lengthens into raspberry compote complexity, limned with dark chocolate and highlighted with peppery greens.",Boulder Bluff Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Equal parts Merlot, Cab Sauvignon and Franc shape a beautifully opulent wine that is loaded with ripe fruit, smoke, polished black stone, smoke and chocolate. The wine is very influenced by 18 months of oak aging (it feels rich, supple and velvety) and will age 10 years or more.",Vignarè,Guicciardini Strozzi
"The first duty of a Port-style wine is to be dazzlingly rich and sweet yet balanced in acidity, and this bottling is all that. Waves of blackberry jam, cassis and dark chocolate are brightened with zesty acidity, and the sweetness level is very high.",Zinfandel,Terra d'Oro
"Marchesale is one of the best Italian expressions of Syrah available today. Aged two years in oak, the wine is smooth and textured with fine tannins and a long spicy aftertaste. At the core of the wine is a beautiful bouquet of red berry, pepper, smoked meat and cherry cola.",Marchesale,Terre del Marchesato
"This is the driest of Iron Horse's new releases, but it still has a honeyed richness even though the residual sugar is a comparatively low half a percent. It feels refined, fancy and elegant, with delicious raspberry, lime and toast flavors. The blend is 75% Pinot Noir and 25% Chardonnay.",Ultra Brut,Iron Horse
"What's so likeable about this Pinot is its dryness, silkiness and elegance. It shows a cool-climate structure, with a bite of acidity and fine tannins, and tantalizing flavors of raspberries, cherries, cola and minerals. Should develop in the bottle over the next six years.",Morning Dew Ranch,Brogan
"A medium-sweet wine that is sweet with honey and lemon flavor, and contains delicious ripe pear juice freshness. The acidity focuses the fruit, giving flavors of almonds as well as spice.",Tuffeaux,François Chidaine
"This is a 100% expression of Cabernet,  with ripe, jammy fruit and lingering tones of spice, leather, rum cake, strawberry rollup and blackberry pie. The wine is round and ripe but it also adopts an elegant, direct style that is enhanced by a nice touch of acidity on the close.",Lien_,Giovanni Chiappini
"This is a Bordeaux blend based on Cabernet Sauvignon, with a drop of Petite Sirah for color and tannins. It's rich and deep in blackberry, currant and dark chocolate flavors, and balanced with big-time tannins and a fine cut of acidity. Doesn't seem like an ager despite the astringency, so drink it soon with rich meats and cheeses.",Bay's Blend,Reid Family Vineyards
"There's no disrespect to say this Cabernet is fun to drink. It is, for the soft, charmingly interesting mouthfeel and rich, sweetly forward blackberry, cherry, chocolate, cassis, anise and oak flavors. Few Cabernets in the world get this ripe and exotic. Enjoy it now.",Jean Louis Vermeil Frediani Vineyard,Vermeil
"The Tasca family shows a deft hand with Cabernet Sauvignon, and has worked hard to match this international variety to the unique Sicilian territory. This beautiful vintage opens with nicely ripened dark fruit, cola, root beer, cured meat and Teriyaki sauce. The wine's texture is polished, smooth and firm.",Tenuta Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"One of the highest expressions of Sicilian enology__oth figuratively and literally__l Musmeci is mostly Nerello Mascalese, with some Nerello Cappuccio. This rising star of Etna shows extremely delicate and fine-tuned notes of small berry and spice and a powerful and polished feel in the mouth. Age 10 years or more.",Il Musmeci,Tenuta di Fessina
"One of the best Malbecs on the market. It's perfect for drinking now despite big tannins. Shows vast, deep blackberry, blueberry, dark chocolate, currant and anise flavors, with a long, spicy finish. Grill up a steak and pop the cork.",Gist Ranch,Thomas Fogarty
"It's labeled Viognier, but the blend includes 20% Roussanne and a bit of Marsanne as well. It works terrifically, yielding a wine with a spicy mix of grapefruit, citrus rind, and Asian pear. Wonderful mouthfeel, with cut, focus and length.",,Ott & Murphy
"Dark and brooding, Santa Cecilia opens with a medley of licorice, dark spice, blackberry, currant, almond and soft shadings of dusty minerals. The complexity is there and the mouthfeel is equally tight, tonic, firm and clean.",Santa Cecilia,Planeta
"This is a classically styled Clare Riesling, from its hints of talcum powder, green apple and lime to its precise line and crisp finish. It's dry and undeniably tart and citrusy__erfect for aging 4_8 years.",,Wakefield Estate
"Arguably the best Ysios reserva to date; it shows a full, lightly baked bouquet with berry aromas, spice, barrel char and herbs. Feels fresh and lush, with balance and tasty flavors of black fruit, fig, tobacco and chocolaty oak. It's a touch oaky and warm on the finish, but elegant and very well made. Drink now through 2015.",Reserva,Ysios
"Roughly half Malbec and half Cabernet, this is a lush, full-bodied, round and plummy red. It deftly mixes its tangy red fruit with pretty baking-spice accents, light herb and fresh loam.",Bolsa Negra Reserva Vino Rojo,Castillo De Feliciana
"Thoroughly dry, yet strikingly concentrated, Cave Spring's CSV marries rich apricot nectar and apple flavors with layers of lime zest, blossom and steel. Whiffs of struck flint and stones reverberate from start to finish, lingering exceptionally long on the palate.",CSV Estate Bottled,Cave Spring
"Cusumano's S_gana brings the focus to the quality of the fruit. The wine shows red berry, spice and a unique toasted note that resembles almond or pistachio.",S_gana,Cusumano
"The 2008 vintage wasn't an easy one in Marlborough, but Ivan Sutherland and James Healy (both formerly of Cloudy Bay) have turned in an excellent effort. Even after almost four years, the wine remains dark and vibrant in color, with bold black cherry fruit accented by hints of plum and coffee. Tannins are soft and acids crisp, making it a wine to enjoy over the next few years.",,Dog Point
"This exceptional effort is packed with sweet and tart fruits, beginning with lemon-lime, then moving through peaches and apricots and on into hints of papaya. Good length and splendid acidity.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Lu Patri (named after the __athers_) is a pure expression of Nero d'Avola with sophisticated oak notes and deep layers of ripe fruit and spice. There's a slightly jammy aroma here, but it works well within the thick, dense personality of this hearty red wine.",Lu Patri,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Tan in color and elegant beyond what's normal, this high-end fino shows full, complex aromas of honey, citrus, rancio, dried gouda cheese and nuttiness. It feels both easy and fresh, with dry, intense flavors of citrus and almond. Long and smooth on the finish, with zero burn or bite.",La Panesa Especial Fino,Hidalgo
"Brambly blackberry and forest fruit aromas fill the bouquet, with secondary notes of licorice, bark and sweet spice lingering in the background. The medium-weight, structured mouth shows more skin-driven black-fruit flavors alongside gripping tannins and a solid finish.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Tornamira is a blend of Syrah, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon that offers plush, fruity layers of black fruit, spice, cola, tobacco and softly worn leather. Pair this wine with grilled sausage and bell peppers.",Tornamira,Feudo Disisa
"Camelot is a bold blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot that shows great balance and elegant composure. It's not overdone or jammy, despite the hot climate that shaped it. Instead, it shows focus and precision in its blackberry, cherry, oak spice and cinnamon notes.",Camelot,Firriato
"A medium-bodied, off-dry style, with scents of baked apples and vegetable oil followed by flavors of apple and peach accented by peppery cinnamon-tinged spice. It's slightly creamy in texture, with a long, mouthcoating finish. Drink now.",Reserve Selection Classic,Jawbone
"An opulent feeling wine, with its rich, rounded fruits and sweet tannins. There is a juicy character here, lined with new wood polish. The wine has density, generous black plum juice and a hint of prunes. It is powerful and ageworthy.",Domini,José Maria da Fonseca
"Very true to the variety, this is a soft, barnyardy, raspberry flavored wine. With its ripe fruit and well integrated tannins, it has a smooth mouthfeel that is freshened with acidity on the finish.",,Campolargo
"Completely atypical to any other producer in the Finger Lakes, or likely, beyond, this semisweet Riesling is a fascinating study of winemaker Kim Engle's unusual style. Curiously waxy on the nose with notes of lanolin and honeycomb, carmelized sugar and potpourri, it takes a while for the palate to integrate all of the flavors and aromas that emanate. Appley and brisk with tart pink grapefruit and lemon honey flavors, it finishes with intense focus and penetration.",Tanzen Dame Morehouse Road Vineyard 2nd Harvest VS Dry,Bloomer Creek
"This is a big and brooding wine, with a lot of aromas and flavors going on all at once: black currant liqueur, anise, cured meat, black plum, sweet spice and dark chocolate. The mouth is full and firmly structured, with intensely concentrated dark fruit character that evolves into a chicory-infused finish.",Superieur,Barkan
"Pietramarina (a pure expression of Carricante) shows light touches of lemon rind and exotic fruit followed by etched mineral notes of crushed granite and brimstone. The finish is tight, fresh and capped by a slightly menthol-like sensation.",Pietramarina,Benanti
"Il Drappo is a pure expression of Nero d'Avola that has been aged carefully in oak to produce a soft, rich mouthfeel and lively notes of bright berry and savory spice. There's a touch of toasted pistachio nut as well.",Il Drappo,Benanti
"This Pinot Noir from the Bannockburn subregion is a bit chunky and extracted without going too far, marrying ripe black cherry fruit with hints of cinnamon and coffee. It lacks the finesse of Carrick's pricier bottling, but offers a rich mouthful of Pinot at an attractive price.",Unravelled,Carrick
"A beautifully crafted blend that includes 19% Merlot and splashes of Syrah and Cab Franc, this melds black fruits, black olives, a pleasing array of fresh herbs and a hint of mint. The mix is full and seamless, with an easy roundness that carries into a pleasing finish.",,Amavi
"So sweet and rich in cherry, vanilla and cinnamon spice flavors, what's not to like? It's dry, gentle in tannins and complex. Seems designed for easy pairing with a great steak.",,Madrigal
"This Pinot is immediately drinkable for its early charm, but that doesn't mean it lacks substance. It has complex flavors of red fruits, cola, mushrooms and spices, and is balanced by crisp acidity and a hint of tannins. The texture is pure silk and satin. Quite a serious Pinot Noir, at a great price.",Limited Production,Magistrate
"This gorgeous vintage of L'Alberello (Cabernet Sauvignon with Cab Franc and Petit Verdot) is elegant and refined thanks to its focused aromas of mineral, black fruit, chocolate fudge and spice. The soft, but rich mouthfeel would pair with pork cutlets marinated with aromatic sage.",L'Alberello,Grattamacco
"This is a pristine and elegant Bolgheri Superiore with a particularly focused aromatic profile. The blend is 60-20-20 Cab Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Merlot. A green, herbal note comes through. You'll also recognize elements of caper, green olive, mineral, tobacco and exotic fruit. It shows thick fruit and dense concentration as well.",,Castello di Bolgheri
"Developing well, this rich and intense wine has all the pleasures of 2005. The tannins are a firm hint along with the sweet, smoky berry fruits and ripe acidity. It is structured, dense and elegant, a great success for this château.",,Château Marquis de Terme
"Cignale, or wild boar is one of Tuscany's best expressions of Cabernet Sauvignon. A small percentage of   Merlot is added for softness and flavor and the wine oozes darkness, blackberry and exotic spice at its core. Pair it with game meat or spicy pork sausage.",Cignale,Cignale
"Here's a beautiful Tuscan expression of Cabernet Sauvignon (with tiny percentages of Sangiovese and Merlot) that rolls smoothly over the palate thanks to the wine's natural richness, purity and overall intensity. Aromas include ripe berry, blue flower and exotic spice, but the wine is especially successful in the mouth thanks to the fullness of its texture.",Sammarco,Castello dei Rampolla
"This excellent vintage of Coronato (a hearty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot) opens with inky, black concentration and aromas of chocolate fudge, espresso, black fruit and spice. The wine tastes velvety and rich and will age for 10 years or more.",Coronato,Tenuta di Biserno
"Some obvious oak tones of spice and tobacco will integrate with more time in the bottle to give more space to the ripe fruit, mineral and chocolate notes that are already present in very good measure. The wine shows muscle and power with a determined, firm finish.",Greppicaia,Tenuta I Greppi
"This vintage of Orma (a hearty blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc) shows loads of ripe fruit intensity backed by spice, toasted nut, chocolate, tobacco and leather. It's a chewy, rich wine that would taste perfect with steak or roast pork.",Orma,Tenuta Sette Ponti
"From the famed vineyard in Oakville comes this dramatic wine. It will benefit from a few years in the cellar to let the tannins mellow, although it's so good now, you can open it right away and give it a decant. Drinks sweet and lush in blackberries and black currants, with a rich overlay of smoky cedar.",Beckstoffer Tokalon Vineyard,Provenance Vineyards
"Impressive, ripe wine, the acidity and black fruits meld together in a harmonious whole. It has fresh fruit as well as dark tannins, wood aging giving a rounded feel to the texture. Age for two years.",Cabeça de Toiro Reserva,Caves Velhas
"Made from Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, with a splash of Pinot Meunier, this bubbly is, in a word, delicious. It's so easy to drink, you can't put the glass down. Shows classic Champagne structure, with refined bubbles and brisk acidity. But the raspberry, strawberry, lime and apple flavors are pure California.",_toile Brut,Chandon
"Millepassi (one-thousand footsteps) is an austere and sophisticated Bolgheri blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot and Merlot. The wine is very ripe (just shy of being exaggeratedly mature or jammy) with bright aromas of strawberry, spice, blackberry and dense chocolate.",Millepassi,Donna Olimpia 1898
"Another beautifully rich, satisfying Tears of Dew from EOS. This is one of California's most consistently successful dessert wines. The '08 is very sweet and opulent in honey, apricot jam, orange sorbet and crème brûlée flavors. So easy to drink, and the alcohol is refreshingly low at 11%.",Tears of Dew Late Harvest,EOS
"An impressive and elegant wine. It has a delicious line of juicy red and black berry fruits, powered with a fine balance of acidity and firm, chunky tannins. With good potential, give the wine 3_4 years.",Grand'Arte Special Selection,DFJ Vinhos
"Riesci is a super Tuscan blend of Cabernet, Petit Verdot and Merlot with lovely density and opulence backed by bright aromas of mature berry fruit, cherry cola, blackberry pie, leather and dark chocolate. It's a black, inky wine with solid tannins that will cut through succulent steak.",Riesci,Fossacolle
"This is a beautiful and rich blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot that shows the best of Bolgheri Superiore winemaking. There's opulence and sophistication here with tones of wild berry, chocolate, tobacco and polished stone.",L'Alberello,Grattamacco
"A beautiful wine from a classic vintage, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon offers harmony, intensity and elegance. Berry and dark fruit aromas are enhanced by smooth texture, fine tannins and balanced acidity.",Ghiaie della Furba,Capezzana
"Assembled from dozens of individual lots, this sumptuous brut is an example of the art of blending. Based on Pinot Noir and Chardonnay, it's really as delicious and refined a sparkling wine as you could want for drinking now. Shows lush citrus, strawberry, honey, melon, fig and spice flavors that are wrapped into a smooth, silky bubbling mouthfeel.",Brut Prestige,Mumm Napa
"A big and bold Sauvignon Blanc, packed with flavors of mango, nectarine and fresh herbs that come together beautifully on the nose and palate. Long on the finish. Drink now through mid-2011.",Reserve,Villa Maria
"Notable for its richness and concentration of fruit, and also for the finesse of the tannin structure. Feels softly lush and luxurious, with potent blackberry and cherry-pie filling, raspberry liqueur, dark chocolate and smoky sandalwood flavors. Needs time to resolve its elements. Give it 5_6 years in a good cellar.",Oliver's Blend,Skipstone
"A lovely Cab from Montalcino, with bright berry aromas of blackberry and wild cherry backed by exotic spice, clove, sweet cinnamon and a touch of espresso bean. The wine is firm but smooth on the finish with loads of fruit intensity at the very end.",,Máté
"I Castagni (the chestnut trees) is a beautiful blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Teroldego (a native grape of northern Italy) that ages 18 months in barrique to achieve impressive richness, density and persistency. The aromas include crushed stone, ripe berry, blackberry, coffee, tar and chocolate.",I Castagni,Michele Satta
"Leonensis is a truly beautiful blend of Sangiovese (50%) with Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc that opens with plush and thick aromas of chocolate, spice, almond paste, black fruit, cherry and cassis. In the mouth, the wine imparts a soft, smooth texture and long finish.",Leonensis,Podere Brizio
"Made by the energetic and totally enthused Lorenzo Zonin, this beautiful wine shows all the potential and charisma of this young, passionate winemaker. A pure expression of Petit Verdot, the wine is inky black with determined aromas of blackberry, plum, exotic spice and leather. It feels warm, thick and firm on the long finish.",,Podere San Cristoforo
"Lots of zesty acidity in this wine, which gives it a mouthwatering raciness. It's bone dry but ultrarich and ripe in cherries, raspberries and oak. There's a slightly bretty funkiness that adds a mushroomy appeal. Should develop over the next six years.",La Encantada Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"With a deep, shiny color of copper and peach blush, you can tell this sparkling wine will be somewhat full-bodied and rich. And it is. Made from Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, it's a big, flamboyant bubbly, rich in raspberries, limes and yeast. Yet it retains the delicacy and elegance of a fine sparkling wine.",_toile Rosé,Chandon
"Dominated by tannin, this is a dark-hued, perfumed wine, with minerality and dry fruit dominant. The fruit is still behind in its weight, needing several years to develop, the juicy aftertaste giving a hint of pleasure to come.",,Château Grand Corbin
"Here's a super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon that shows its 10 years of age surprising well. There's still loads of fruit here backed by tertiary aromas of licorice, polished stone, dried fruit and old leather.",Sillano,Carpineto
"Here's a pure expression of Syrah from coastal Tuscany that lays on intense aromas of smoked bacon, bresaola, cherry fruit, spice, blackberry and black pepper. The wine shows amazing intensity and persistency on the close.",,Michele Satta
"The wine is plush and rich with fragrant aromas of black cherry, blackberry, spice, leather, cola and tobacco. This beautiful blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot would pair perfectly with classic osso buco, slow cooked until falling off the bone.",Volpolo,Podere Sapaio
"Nicely done, with plum and cherry compote anchoring the core. Ripe, almost jammy, full and fleshy, this snaps into focus with crisp acidity and gentle tannins.",Pepper Bridge Vineyard,Mannina Cellars
"Coal black, this no-holds-barred Syrah is for those who love the dark side of the grape. Flavors of smoked cherries fill the palate, which is dense and tannic. At the core is a mesh of bark, earth and graphite, but the wine retains its balance with the perfect mix of ripe tannins and natural acidity.",BlackTongue,Stevens
"Ripe, flashy raspberry and cherry jam fruit marks this young, elegant Pinot Noir. It feels fine and sensual in the mouth, with a silkiness brightened by Edna Valley acidity. Drink now_2015.",Stone Corral Vineyard,Talley
"Sicily's Tasca family does a terrific job with this golden Chardonnay. The wine reflects the sunshine, warmth and generosity of the island. Aromas of stone fruit, vanilla, rose and almond blossom are followed by a beautifully creamy mouthfeel.",Tenuta Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"This blend of 45% Shiraz, 40% Petite Sirah, 9% Petit Verdot and 6% Merlot exudes complex notes of fresh mint and pressed violet petals against a core of red cherry and plum fruit. Hints of black tea leaves, cocoa nibs and sweet spice linger on the close. It's till young and a bit tight, so decant now or give it some time to mellow.",Legend,Shiloh Winery
"A big, muscular Petite Sirah, showing the classic profile of the variety. Rich and thick in tannins, it showcases powerful blackberry, plum, currant, bacon and black pepper flavors that finish with fruity sweetness, although the wine is technically dry. A welcome addition to the top tier of Petite Sirah in California.",Reserve,Spellbound
"Nadir is an impressive rendition of Syrah that delivers round, sweet aromas of blackberry, cherry, rum cake and smoked bacon. The high quality of the mouthfeel also sets this wine apart: It is soft, modern and very rich.",Nadir,Tenuta Rapital_
"This is Terlato's ambitious entry into the cult Cabernet lottery. Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, with Merlot, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc, it's an elaborate wine, deep and long in blackberry, cherry, currant, mocha and sandalwood flavors. The tannins are impressive, yet young, giving a tough, astringent mouthfeel. But ageability is brought into question by some superripeness, in the form of raisins.",Episode,Terlato
"Good job by St. Supéry on this rich Cabernet, and kudos to them for holding back for four-plus years. Now mellow, it shows ripe blackberry and plum flavors, with a sweet coating of smoky oak. Delicious now and over the next several years.",Estate,St. Supéry
"Sweet, rich and luscious in a palate-enveloping style, this cherry-bomb of a Merlot opens with a rush of ripe, round, fruit-liqueur flavors. Delicious as it is, it hangs there right into a slightly alcoholic finish. Some further bottle age should make for continued improvement.",,Pepper Bridge
"Rosso delle Rose is a 70-30 blend of Syrah and Nero d'Avola that opens with smoky, savory elements of exotic spice, cured meat, ripe fruit and crushed white peppercorn. The wine's appearance is thick and dense, as is the mouthfeel, but there is also a touch of acidity to keep it fresh.",Rosso delle Rose,Masseria del Feudo Grottarossa
"What a fabulous value wine. If you love Sicily and you love Syrah, this beauty delivers the best of both. The low price tag is unbelievable. Aromas include blackberry, bacon fat, cigar tobacco and spice. The wine is soft, smooth and velvety on the finish.",,Planeta
"Pondera's Sericus is based upon Merlot, while this Bordeaux-style blend is mostly Cabernet Sauvignon. Solid fruit flavors of blueberry and plum are set amid sweet spices from the barrel aging. Cinnamon, sweet black tea and fine tannins lead through a balanced, lingering finish, with good grip and weight.",Consensio Red,Pondera
"A very good Cabernet, with ripe blackberry, currant, anise and oak flavors. Despite firm tannins, it doesn't seem to be an ager, but it is an elegant, complex young wine to drink over the next year or two.",District 4,Prime
"A fine combination of toast and yellow fruit has produced an exotic, opulent wine that's ripe and generous. The balance is exactly right, while the richness of the wine doesn't lose sight of the lime acidity.",Quintessence,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"A founding father of Sicily's quality wine tradition, the 2006 Duca Enrico is a plush and rich red with bold berry flavors and a spicy vegetal touch of green curry leaf. An icon of southern Italian wine, the wine is well suited to roast beef or sophisticated meat dishes.",Duca Enrico,Duca di Salaparuta
This unique Sicilian dessert wine shows distinctive notes of eucalyptus and hummus over candied apricot and honey-glazed chestnut. There's nothing else like it; then there's a touch of zesty acidity on the close.,Anima Mediterranea,Cantine Rallo
"Made from 62% Cab Sauv, 31% Merlot and 7% Syrah, this delicious blend offers a fleck of crushed rose-petal florals to the dark fruit core of blackberry, date and chocolate covered black cherry. Full but firmly structured, with roasted cocoa nib, cigar box spice and leather flavors lingering on the finish. Good now, but should hold through 2014.",Yiron Kosher Dry Red Wine,Galil Mountain
"Aged in oak and tank for 30 months, this wine wine is fat, full-bodied and rich. The texture is stretched tightly on a wire, with a steely incisiveness. The wine is intense and fresh, supporting aging as well as offering drinking pleasure now.",Grains Dorés,Garnier et Fils
"A blend of Carricante and Catarratto from vineyards plated 600 meters above sea level on the slopes of Mount Etna, Quota 600 is among Sicily's best white wines. Compact, tonic and streamlined, it does a beautiful job of presenting delicate floral and peach fruit aromas against an austere backdrop of crushed stone and talcum powder.",Quota 600,Graci
"A chocolaty wine with very pretty red fruit, this smooth and lightly spicy vintage is particularly well made given the cool year. In the blend are small amounts of Cabernet and Syrah, but Merlot is the star here, with rich black-cherry flavors wrapped in mocha.",Ethos Reserve,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This is a splendid rendition of Chateau Ste. Michelle's mainstay Cabernet, rich and round, with a sophisticated mix of grapes, including Malbec, Cab Franc, Petit Verdot and Syrah. Dark fruit flavors of black cherry and cassis create a lush center, and the wine is more evolved and smoother, with less obvious oak and barrel flavor, than the pricier Cabs from Ste. Michelle.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Cottanera's Etna blend (Nerello Mascalese and Nerello Cappuccio) opens with a brooding dark color and earthy aromas of crushed stone, forest floor and leather. There's a bright, vinous fruit note of wild berry and red currant as well.",,Cottanera
"A blend of Grenache Blanc, Roussanne and Viognier, this is a powerfully rich wine, with flavors of pears, peaches, mangos, oranges and almost any other fruit you can name. Thankfully, it's dryish, with a creamy texture and a spicy finish. Almost a food group in itself, it suggests pairing with strongly flavored, umami-rich dishes.",Chemin de Fleurs,Daou
"Subtle and fragrant with pretty blackberry and black cherry fruit, this carries hints of leather and earth, with polished tannins and surprising length. It needs extra hours to open fully, but will reward your patience with extended length and grace notes of plum pudding and black licorice.",,Beresan
"Buoyantly aromatic with notes of fresh wildflowers, preserved apricots and honey, this dry Riesling made from a tiny single-vineyard crop balances elegant crushed stone and stonefruit flavors with a focused acidity and stark orange peel astringency. Balanced and elegantly structured, it finishes on a long, meandering orange inflected note.",Tanzen Dame Auten Vineyard 1st Harvest Dry,Bloomer Creek
"Dry, smooth and delicious, a flashy wine that tastes complex. Although there are strong tannins, there's a drink-me-now richness to blackberries, blueberries, chocolate and oak. Decant for an hour or two, and enjoy.",Sonnet #63,Madrigal
"This is a dry, acidic Pinot Noir. It's a wine for Pinot aficienados willing to seek out its subtleties, rather than one of immediate charm. There's a place in white tablecloth restaurants for such wines, and kudos to Mahoney for resisting the tug of excessive ripeness and opting instead for elegance.",Mahoney Ranch,Mahoney
"A spicy but austere wine, with the emphasis on wood, apple acidity and citrus. There is some riper fruit (pineapple), but the wine remains textured, taut and nervy.",Blagny Premier Cru,Joseph Faiveley
"Simply delicious, showing ripe, soft blackberry, cherry and blueberry flavors. So soft and gentle, it's completely ready to drink now. A good example of the art of blending.",,Kirkland Signature
"This is essentially a Bordeaux blend, based on Cabernet, but the winery put in some Syrah. It's very delicious and forward in blackberry, blueberry and chocolate flavors. The tannins are as soft and sweet as Napa gets, making the wine drinkable now.",19 Block Cuvée,Hess Collection
"Very opulent, almost too much so, with a flood of Key lime pie, pineapple jam, orange, butterscotch and buttered toast flavors that overwhelm in richness. The saving grace is a fine structure of acidity and minerals and a finish that strives to be dry. Drink now with shellfish, roast pork, or all alone as an apéritif.",Reserve,Kunde
"Rich and bright in blackberries and cherries, this 100% Cabernet is, in a word, delicious. The fruit stars front and center, supported by soft, complex tannins and an overlay of smoky new oak. Should hang in there for up to six years.",Mavericks Signature Series Goosechase Vineyard,Longboard
"Wet stone and lemon-lime. If those sound good to you, this ageworthy Riesling is a fit for you. It's medium in body yet very crisp and linear in structure, with a hint of citrus pith on the finish. Drink 2015_2020.",The Lodge Hill Dry,Jim Barry
"Though technically off-dry, this tastes tart and racy, following its lively aromatics with crisp citrus-fruit flavors of Key lime, Satsuma orange, and ripe apricots. The fruit sources__vergreen and Wahluke Slope vineyards__re among the best in Washington for Riesling.",Traditions,Milbrandt
"With the spice markets and romanic bazaars of North Africa not far off the coast of Sicily, Maroccoli embodies a sensual spirit with bright cinnamon and clove backed by black fruit and dried fig. The wine is rich, plush and smoothly textured.",Maroccoli,Planeta
"Santa Cecilia is a Sicilian icon wine and a quality benchmark for the newly inaugurated Noto subzone. The 2009 vintage takes time to open and build momentum. It feels sharper and edgier than past years and is focused, linear and crisp. Give it 3_5 more years of cellaring.",Santa Cecilia,Planeta
"A five-grape Bordeaux-style blend (39% Cabernet Franc, 36% Cabernet Sauvignon, 17% Merlot, 7% Malbec, 3% Petit Verdot), the 424 is bright and gamy, the fruit showing pretty Bing cherry flavors in abundance. Fruity and supple with just a hint of leather, this is well-built without being too tannic, and shows no trace of its almost 15% alcohol. It was aged for 20 months in half new, half once-used French oak.",424 Red Blend,Stevens
"Here's a creamy, rich and beautifully fragrant Chardonnay that would pair with lemon chicken, tangy Indian dishes or lobster risotto. This bright white wine is redolent of peach, pear, crushed almond and tangy citrus rind.",Tenuta Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"This is a dark and muscular expression of Syrah executed in a quasi-Australian style, with loads of concentration and spice, backed by smoked bacon, Teriyaki, candied berry and Indian spice.",Sallier de la Tour La Monaca,Tasca d'Almerita
"A steely wine, its acidity dominating the attractive toast, white fruits and grapefruit flavors. It is rich, full in the mouth, a wine that shows some opulence while also preserving a firm, strict structure.",,Olivier Leflaive
"Smooth and chocolaty, this generous Cabernet brings plenty of chocolate-covered cherry flavors to the heart of the palate. Balanced and seamless, it follows the path of previous vintages. Drink it young for maximum enjoyment.",,Sineann
"Cabernet Franc is a difficult variety to make by itself in California, which is why so few wineries do. Reverie gives it a good try. Their '09 is quite tasty in cherries, minerals and oak, with distinguished mountain tannins and a savory, spicy finish. But it's not one for the cellar, so drink before 2014.",Estate,Reverie
"This vintage of Passomaggio (a blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot) shows impressive strides in quality. From an estate with a beautiful sea-facing abbey built in the 1100s, the wine is modern, clean, plush and driven by ripe fruit and spice.",Passomaggio,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"Aged for 20 months in French (70%) and American (30%) oak, this dark and brooding Cab is loaded with woody notes of cigar box, tree bark and leathery spice, but they're balanced by concentrated fruit flavors of black cherry, black currant and plum guts on the palate. Firmly structured with young, gripping tannins and a long finish.",Reserve,Alexander
"Shows lots of fruity richness, with Asian pear, pineapple, peach and green apple flavors, brightened by crisp acidity. It's surprisingly fresh for a 2008 Chardonnay, but you should drink it quickly before it starts to go downhill.",,Ancient Oak Cellars
"Light brown and slightly translucent in color. Aromas lean toward raisin and prune, but there's orange zest and molasses on the bouquet as well. Bores straight ahead on the palate, with sweet flavors of burnt brown sugar, caramel and prune. Satisfying and balanced even if it's not overly complex.",de Añada,Alvear
"A beautifully floral Viognier, its aromas tenderly inviting, with uplifting hints of apricot, pear and white fig. It's a deftly made white with lovely minerality and a fleshy mouthfeel all wrapped up in the end with a light touch of lemon.",Estate Bottled and Grown,Cedarville Vineyard
"This is a firm, structured wine but with the warmth of ripe blackberries. The dusty tannins offer a framework for the spice and richness, punctuated by acidity. This elegant wine will age for 2_4 years.",Reserva,Burmester
"Hearty and rich, this ripe rendition of Malbec (with 10% Cabernet Sauvignon blended in) was given just the right percentage (one third) of new French oak. Black fruit is complemented by barrel flavors of licorice and vanilla, and the medium-grained tannins lend further authority and support to the finish.",Phinny Hill Vineyard,Castillo De Feliciana
"COS is a leader in Cerasuolo di Vittoria thanks to the strict organic and biodynamic philosophy applied to their production. This vintage shows bright berry, cola, dried herb, olive, tobacco and warm, earthy aromas. In the mouth, the wine is crisp, fresh and firm.",,COS
"Fatagione delivers great intensity of cola, mint, licorice and rosemary-like aromas. The finish is dusty and dry, high lighted by brimstone and crushed mineral.",Fatagione,Cottanera
"S_gana is a pure expression of Nero d'Avola with loads of dark berry and cherry backed by toasted almond and milk chocolate. It shows a fair degree of elegance, and would pair with chicken, pork or over-baked pasta.",S_gana,Cusumano
"Quater is a rich red blend that opens with blackberry, rum cake, Indian spice, cola and ground clove. It combines intensity and complexity with a bold, opulent mouthfeel.",Quater,Firriato
"Careful winemaking and low vineyard yields make this a classy and sophisticated Sicilian white with a rich, creamy mouthfeel. The wine's compelling aromas include apricot, almond, yellow candy, pineapple and exotic fruit.",Bianca di Valguarnera,Duca di Salaparuta
"This white blend, modeled after Bordeaux, is two-thirds Sémillon, one-third Sauvignon Blanc. Pretty scents of sweet apricot, peach and melon lead into a midpalate that gathers both strength and concentration. Notes of citrus rind and dusty spices continue into a full and satisfying finish.",Seven Hills Vineyard Estate Luminesce,L'Ecole No. 41
"Hits all the right notes, with ripe, flashy pineapple, lemon and lime jam fruit, buttered toast from oak and a stimulating minerality. Follows the American style closely, but with style and finesse. Drink now.",Bald Mountain Vineyard Reserve,Martin Ray
"Only made in exceptional years, the 2007 Katzrin is a Cab-based wine with 9% Merlot that's aged for two years in French oak. It's lush and fruit forward, with aromas and flavors of cassis, black cherry and plum framed by spicy accents of cigar box, fruit cake and cracked black peppercorns. Round and creamy on the palate with a rich mocha and licorice-infused finish.",Yarden Katzrin,Golan Heights Winery
"A deep, cool, mellow style of PX with requisite raisin and prune aromas along with molasses and a touch of heat. Feels unctuous and almost cloying, with concentrated caramel and raisin flavors. Very long and supersweet, with excellent power and commendable balance.",Nectar Dulce,González Byass
"This is a big, rich Cabernet, loaded with gobs of lip-smacking blackberry, cherry, currant and oak flavors. Couldn't be riper, and the tannins are soft and smooth. A little obvious in its charms, but a real crowd pleaser.",,Frank Family
"This blend of Syrah, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon is a unique wine that shows quality fruit aromas of wild berry and sweet cherries backed by drying mineral, cola and exotic spice. The mouthfeel is excellent with a plush, sweet close.",Mediterra,Poggio al Tesoro
"Carmione is a 50-10-40 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Merlot that opens with a bright bouquet of wild spice, black fruit, prune, plum and rum cake. The wine is dense and dark with a thick, almost gritty feel in the mouth. This is a bruiser that would pair with mesquite-grilled ribeye steak.",Carmione,Pratesi
"A very good Pinot Noir. Shows just what you want in a fine coastal bottling, with a smooth, silky texture, crisp acidity, and fine, delicate but powerful flavors. In this case, the wine shows cool-climate notes of raspberries, cherries and red currants, with umami, salty smoked meat and oak-inspired vanilla toast complexities. Drink now_2013.",,Tudor Wines
"This is a really beautiful Pinot Noir. It's rich in flavor, but also strong in structure, with good acidity and firm, dry tannins framing a silky texture. The flavors suggest raspberries, cherries and vanilla cream, accented with smoky sweet oak. Drink now.",Tondré Reserve,Tudor Wines
"A beautiful wine, lush and appealing and at its best for the next 5_7 years. It's soft but enormously rich and smooth in tannins, with deep, extracted flavors of cherries, raspberries, red currants, bacon, licorice, cola, dried herbs and sandalwood. Grows smoother and more complex as it warms in the glass.",Oliver's Blend,Skipstone
"This is a rarity __ood-aged Vinho Verde. It works beautifully, the floral flavors of the Loureiro grape balanced with a smooth texture. The green fruit flavors dominate, just broadened by the wood.",Escolha,Quinta do Ameal
"Although 2008 was not a general vintage, some estates have released vintage Ports. Noval's Vintage, just bottled at the time of tasting, is a delicate and perfumed wine, elegant rather than powerful, with delicious black berry fruits to go with the rich core of sweet tannins.",Vintage,Quinta do Noval
"Made from all five classic Bordeaux varieties, this is a rich, softly tannic and delicious wine. It brims with jammy blackberry, dark chocolate and sweet cedar flavors, in a sweetly chewy texture that hints at further ageability. Drink now_2015.",Reserve Tapestry,Beaulieu Vineyard
"This first vintage of Coevo (a super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese, Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot) represents a new and dynamic project for Tuscany's historic Cecchi estate. The wine is rich, opulent and redolent of all kinds of dark fruit and spice.",Coevo,Cecchi
"Levia Gravia (a hearty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah) is an opulent and pleasurable wine that moves gracefully over the palate thanks to its lively fruit, firm tannins and rich mouthfeel. The long fade is colored by nuances of vanilla and exotic spice.",Levia Gravia,Caccia al Piano 1868
"Awesomely rich, with massive tropical fruit, pear, vanilla cream and buttered toast flavors, finished with cinnamon spice. Acidity is high and crisp, and a bright scour of minerals brings balance. Made in the modern style, this is a Chardonnay to drink with lobster and scallops.",,Calera
"The historic Capezzana estate produces excellent wines in a little-known wine region northwest of Florence. This hearty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah shows the best of Tuscan winemaking thanks to the purity of the fruit and the warm background etching of smoke and spice that complete a very pretty picture.",Ghiaie della Furba,Capezzana
"The wine opens with deep intensity and rich concentration: Black cherry, spice and chocolate are fundamental components of the bouquet. The mouthfeel is rich and decadent to the end. This 40-40-20 blend of Merlot, Cab Sauvignon and Syrah would make the perfect companion to pork shank in Porcini mushroom sauce.",Mosaico,Casa di Terra
"A floral, tropical fruit-influenced wine that is round in character and full of wonderfully opulent fruit. The final acidity stays within the ripe fruit character.",La Comtesse,Domaine Laporte
"A great followup to the '08, which was one of the best Gewürztraminers of the vintage. The '09 is even better, with a crisp, minerally mouthfeel, and superrich flavors of tropical fruits, spices and honeysuckle flowers. No oak, no malolactic and just a slight touch of sweetness on the finish.",Dutton Ranch Green Valley Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"A big and densely textured wine that shows great rich swathes of bitter chocolate, dark tannins and sweet acidity. The wine has power, dark aromas and an intense concentration.",Aragonez-Alicante Bouschet,Herdade da Comporta
"Smooth-textured wine, the layer of firm tannins enveloped by rich, sweet berry fruits. The wine is complex, powered by concentrated fruit, juicy acidity, a core of wood and tannin. Age for at least three years.",Rubrica,Luis Duarte
"A terrific California blush wine, rich and compelling, with a gorgeous color, sort of a salmon-koi gold. It's bone dry and crisply clean in acidity, with strong, but not heavy, flavors of strawberries and raspberries. There's a dusting of tannins that give the wine a solid structure.",Rose of Pinot Noir,Lynmar
"With beautiful aromas, and naturally light Pinot Noir color, this walks the line between feminine grace   and masculine muscle. Scents and flavors are purely varietal, with cherry, cola, rose petals and spicy tobacco leaf. The balance is perfect and the wine lingers into a smooth, seamless finish.",Black Love Lachini Vineyard,Mark Ryan
"Piastraia is a luscious and decadent wine with a plush, smooth mouthfeel. This blend of Merlot, Syrah, Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon opens with focused mineral tones backed by cherry, blackberry and spice.",Piastraia,Michele Satta
"Ombre is a very pleasurable blend of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Sangiovese that offers layers of chocolate and spice backed by red cherry, cassis and wild blueberry. It's a smooth, rich wine with firm tannins that could stand up to pork roll stuffed with prunes.",Ombre,Poggio Mandorlo
"Extra-ordinarily sweet, with fantastic honey, apricot, pineapple, orange marmalade, buttered toast and vanilla cream flavors. What's not to like? Could be more complex, but dazzles for sheer decadence.",Late Harvest,Nobility
"Always a very dry, elegant Pinot Noir, Signorello's '08 Las Amigas again displays those qualities. It shows dried raspberry, cherry and cola flavors, with a distinct minerality and a dusting of tobacco and black pepper. This fancy Pinot is a natural lamb or steak.",Las Amigas Vineyard,Signorello
"Enormously rich and complex in blackberry tart, black currant, crème de cassis, licorice and bacon flavors. The tannins are strong but very fine, with a velvety texture. Give it 5_6 years to achieve bottle complexity.",Oliver's Blend,Skipstone
"From a 300-acre property in Castellina in Chianti, Trasolo (100% Merlot) is a top-shelf wine with rich opulence and sophistication. Deep layers of cherry, blackberry, spice and leather are folded tight together and the wine is smooth and enduring on the close.",Trasolo,Tenuta Villa Trasqua
"Lower in price than Cenit's Old Vines, but to me this is a better, more open wine with bacon, spice and bold black-fruit aromas. The palate is full but retains finesse as well as big tannins; flavors of black fruits come with chocolate, coffee and spice. Full-force stuff but still fairly refined. Drink now through 2014.",Demora,Viñas del Cenit
"This is a luscious, butterscotchy, fresh, lime- and lemon-flavored Chardonnay; a true delight. Melon and peach fruit flavors thread into the core, and the wine has a wonderful richness without losing its finesse or acid base.",Three Hills Cuvée,Lange
"Dark, condensed and inky, with big, muscular aromas of charcoal, cassis liqueur, blackberry and tar. The palate is just lush enough despite being staunch and tannic, and the flavors of black fruit and cassis are luscious and sweet, with a bit of lemony oak adding zest. Drink from 2011 through 2015.",Termanthia,Numanthia
"A superrich, fantastically sweet wine. It's clean and crisp with acidity, and wildly extravagant in orange, apricot, vanilla, butterscotch and white chocolate notes. California's equivalent of a white Port, and a perfect pairing for cheesecake.",,Rotta
". This rich and opulent blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot delivers an intense bouquet of chocolate, cherry, blackberry, spice, nutmeg and polished stone. The wine ends with firm, biting tannins and flavors of chocolate essence. Give it three to five years of bottle aging.",Volpolo,Podere Sapaio
"This is a gorgeous wine with enormous intensity of fruit that comes forward as cherry, blackberry, spice, leather and cigar box. The texture is soft, smooth and velvety: In Violas has the heft and persistency to stand up to rosemary-marinated T-bone steak.",In Violas,Poliziano
"With an initial smooth texture, this is a rich wine. The ripe fruit hides the firm, dense structure, packed with dry tannins and wood spice. The wine is powerful in a serious way, needing several years' aging.",Picos do Couto Reserva,Quinta do Serrado
"Shows the rich, exotic notes that a Calera Viognier always displays. Waves of tropical fruits, peaches, honeysuckle flower, vanilla cream and buttered toast flatter the palate, leading to a long, spicy sweet finish. Drink now.",,Calera
"With just over 200 cases made, Maronea is a precious blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Petit Verdot that opens with huge concentration and plush aromas of ripe cherry, blackberry and chocolate. The tannins are firm and determined: The finish is accented by sweet fruit.",Maronea,Casa di Terra
"Poggio Querciolo represents a beautiful blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Petit Verdot that shows amazing structure and aromatic intensity. Aromas include bursting cherry, blackberry, cola, chocolate, spice and leather. Pair this wine with grilled steak garnished with olive oil and rosemary.",Poggio Querciolo,Casa di Terra
"There's a very linear and elegant quality to this wine that recalls perfectly ripened blueberry and crisp cherry. Beyond those bright fruit tones, this blend of Syrah, Petit Verdot and other mixed grapes offers hearty aromas of smoked ham, crushed pepper and worn leather.",Castello del Terriccio,Castello del Terriccio
"Beautiful and likeable for its dryness, crisp minerality, and the sleek, clean mouthfeel. The fruit suggests oak-inspired pears, oranges and citrons. This elegant quaff gets better as it warms in the glass. Drink now.",Dutton Ranch,Dutton-Goldfield
"Antonella and husband Vincenzo D'Isanto are the enthusiastic owners of the beautiful I Balzini estate in Tuscany. This gorgeous blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (50%), Sangiovese and Merlot offers softness, intensity and personality. It's a smooth, silky wine with elegant tones of black cherry, spice and leather.",Black Label,I Balzini
"A beautiful wine that asserts itself near the top of the pile of Carneros Chardonnay. Shows brisk acidity and a tangy minerality, with oak-inspired, superripe green apple, Meyer lemon and pear fruit flavors that are wrapped into a creamy texture. Drink now.",Beresini,Knights Bridge
"This terrific Sauvignon Blanc is marked by slightly pungent notes of green tomato or crushed tomato leaf, seamlessly married to smooth, ripe, tropical fruit. It's a bit creamy in texture, almost lush, with a long, mouthcoating finish.",Taylors Pass Vineyard,Villa Maria
"Golden brown in color, with smooth, almondy aromas along with apricot, cinnamon and toffee. The palate is full, round, smooth and satisfying, with a fine blend of weight, acidity and prime Sherry flavors. Overall this is a rich, heady style of dry Amontillado that finishes long and secure.",Jalifa Rare Old Dry Amontillado Aged 30 Years,Williams & Humbert
"The grapes are from the winery's estate vineyard. The wine is made in the modern style, which is soft, ripe and oaky. It's quite delicious, showing ripe, lush blackberry and black currant fruit, as well as caramelized wood notes. Ready now_2015.",Padrone,Signorello
"Some 18 months of careful oak aging have shaped a deep, layered wine with loads of cherry and cola. The wine shows a compact, streamlined structure but there is backbone here and the fresh acidity at the end really hits the spot.",Bliss,Batzella
"These old vines are famous for concentration, and this Zin surely is one of the most intense wines of the vintage. It's huge in wild berry, currant, licorice, dark chocolate, bacon and exotic spice flavors that go on and on. For all the richness, it's wonderfully balanced, with fine tannins and a crisp backbone of acidity. Drink now.",Reserve Century Vines,Kunde
"Filippone is a 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Merlot that is layered tight with aromas of wild berries, blue flower, plush cherry, moist earth and a touch of playful spice. The structure is firm without being hard and the wine would pair with pasta or meat.",Filippone,Canneto
"An elaborate Chardonnay whose high acidity and minerality are reflections of both the vintage and Carneros terroir. Shows bright, zesty flavors of pineapples, tangerines and green apples, while lots of opulent new French oak brings vanilla and toast richness, as well as supportive wood tannins.",Estate Bottled,Donum
"San Jacopo is a 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Merlot that offers generous and abundant aromas of ripe cherry and raspberry, spice and cinnamon, chocolate and tobacco. Rich, smooth texture characterizes the mouthfeel and the wine is plush and silky on the close.",S.J. (San Jacopo),Fuligni
"This 70-30 blend of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc opens with beautifully intense and opulent notes of blackberry, mature cherry, spice, leather and tobacco. The wine is rich and smooth and offers a playful touch of piquant acidity on the close.",Impronte,Giorgio Meletti Cavallari
"As usual with Duckhorn's red wines, this Merlot is more tannic and acidic than most anything coming from Napa Valley. They're emphasizing structure over decadence. But that's not to say there aren't rich, elaborate berry, cherry, currant, chocolate and cedar flavors that provide bang for the buck. Very elegant and refined, this Merlot should be decanted before serving.",,Duckhorn
"Notable for its firm minerality and acidity and distinguished mouthfeel. Could be a little richer, but offers intricate raspberry, sour cherry candy, blueberry, cola and sandalwood flavors. Might blossom over the next few years. Drink now_2013.",Dutton Ranch Sanchietti Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"Alleanza represents a successful collaboration between winemakers in Italy and California. The 70-30 blend consists of Merlot and Sangiovese and the wine is seductively redolent of wild berries, exotic spice, soft chocolate and mild tobacco. The plush mouthfeel wins points thanks to the smooth and silky nature of the finish.",Alleanza,Castello di Gabbiano
"This is a beautiful Cabernet that shows the gentle tannins and herbaceous edge of Rutherford Cabernets, but doesn't stint on richness. It's dry, smooth and appealing in black and red cherry, red currant, licorice, bacon and sandalwood flavors, and is complex enough to age for a decade.",,Riboli
"Shows a great return to form over the 2006, with the lush flavors and rich attractions of the 2005. With soft but complex tannins, the wine immediately appeals for its wealth of blackberries, black currants and plums, enriched with smoky oak. Very rich, pure and refined. Fine now, with a good decant, and should age well for a decade.",Winfield Vineyard,The Grade
"This Bolgheri Superiore shows luscious and clean notes of mature black fruit, plum, prune and loads of vibrant black cherry. Wood elements of spice, tobacco and leather are well integrated and the wine is impressively smooth and generous on the finish.",,Podere Guado al Melo
"Notable for the smoothness and finesse of the mousse, or bubbles, this Pinot Noir and Chardonnay brut-style blend is rich and crisp in acidity. There's a honeyed sweetness to the generous strawberry, raspberry, lime and vanilla flavors.",Brut Reserve,Mumm Napa
"This super Tuscan is designed by fashion icon Roberto Cavalli who owns the Tenuta degli Dei estate in Tuscany. The blend sees Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc resulting in a dense, rich and opulent red wine that is redolent of mature fruit and spice.",,Cavalli Tenuta degli Dei
"A powerful, solid wine, its dark fruits fitting well with the wood, the firm tannins and black plum flavors. This is made for aging, as it is just starting to show its depth.",,Château Corbin
"A stunning Minervois red composed of 50% Syrah, 30% Grenache, 10% Mourvèdre and 10% Carignan. Garrigue definitely takes center stage on the nose via thyme and lavender, with a strong black cherry and raspberry backbone. A lush, satiny texture with dusty tannins and a rich mocha-infused finish.",Les Clauses,Domaine Sainte Léocadie
"Mature, classy and different than most, with earth, tobacco, warm fruit, baked notes and subtlety to the bouquet. The palate is whole, welcoming and full of baked plum, spice, molasses and leathery, and then it finish long and complex, but a little sweet and rooty. A winner from Mallorca for those seeking something different. Drink now.",_n,_nima Negra
"Rich, smooth, with great wafts of creaminess to go with a judicious amount of toast. White plum and pear flavors precede a finish with impressive concentration and delicious acidity.",Catarina,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Ripe and rich, a wine that shows orange, pear and lime zest flavors alongside toast and herbs. It has a pure line of acidity and minerality that cuts through the warm fruit and gives extra shape to the wine.",Vaillon Premier Cru,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"Forgeron makes a full-bodied style of Syrah, with an almost jammy midpalate loaded with boysenberry and blueberry fruit. Veins of herb and loam lead into a generously chocolaty finish. The fruit is 100% from the Boushey Vineyard.",,Forgeron
"Punched up aromas of lime sherbet, talcum powder and apple blossom only tell part of the story. This is a concentrated wine with a firm backbone of acid that shows off the intense citrus character, plus hints of crushed stone and underripe peaches. Drink now_2020.",Individual Vineyard Selection Dry,Pewsey Vale
"Planeta set out to make a great white wine on the volcanic slopes of Mt. Etna using the indigenous Carricante grape. The results are chiseled and clean, with pristine aromas of zesty citrus, herbal nuances and rain-soaked slate roof.",,Planeta
"This classically styled Walla Walla Syrah is sourced from the excellent Les Collines Vineyard. Wreathed in smoke and suggestions of funky earth, the black fruits shine through and the tannins have grip and muscle. Solid and substantial.",Les Collines,North by Northwest
"This is focused upon a lovely mix of ripe fruits, running from citrus to apple, smooth and lightly buttery. The grapes were sourced from Boushey and Elephant Mountain vineyards, and aged on the lees for a full year.",L'Entente Blanc,Ott & Murphy
"Swanson employs former winemaker Marco Cappelli to make this nonvintage dessert wine, working with Mission grape vines in the Shenandoah Valley that were planted in 1856 and reside at a 1,300-foot elevation. Cappelli fortified the Mission wine with Brandy, let it all sit in barrel for six years, and used the solera system of blending in four different vintages over time. The result is delicious, a strong essence of cherry, dried fruit and molasses perfectly sippable and balanced.",Angelica,Swanson
"Powerful and complex, with layer upon layer of smoky mineral tones, musky florals, and crisp, tart tangerine and peach fruit flavors. Just off-dry in style, Red Newt's Davis Farms Vineyard is spectacularly refreshing, full of zingy lime-juice acidity and boasts a piercing steeliness that reverberates long after each sip.",Davis Farms Vineyard,Red Newt Cellars
"The Nautilus wines have been getting better and better, and this dark-toned Pinot is no exception. It shows excellent complexity__lack cherry and dark earth notes alongside hints of cured meat and sassafras__s well as a round mouthfeel that never turns jammy. It's firm enough to hold 2_3 years, if you prefer.",,Nautilus
"Signorio is a surprisingly polished and elegant Nero d'Avola with a silky, fine texture and bright flavors of dried fruit, cassis, espresso and dark chocolate. Pair this pretty wine with saffron and shrimp risotto.",Signorio,Tenuta Barone Nicolò La Lumia
"Hugonis is a 50-50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Nero d'Avola, with balanced fruit, spice, chocolate, leather and a modern, creamy endnote. This is an appealing wine that would pair beautifully with steak or pork chops.",Hugonis,Tenuta Rapital_
"Rusciano is a blend of Syrah and Nero d'Avola that displays impressive depth and complexity. Aromas of dark fruit, spice, black currant and earthy tobacco build in intensity as the wine evolves in the glass. The finish is smooth and rich.",Rusciano,Valle dell'Acate
"The Milbrandts farm over 2,000 acres in the Wahluke Slope, where their Clifton Vineyard__he source of this 100% varietal Viognier__s located. Creamy and refreshing, it's a mélange of lime rind and flesh, melon and pineapple, with the crispness of a mountain spring. The flavors build and build, with an elegant flourish as it finishes just as clean and refreshing as it began.",The Estates,Milbrandt
"Textbook Rioja reserva from a legendary label and a top vintage. Smells lightly baked and smooth, with leather, tobacco, raspberry and spice. Feels zesty, clean and pure, with reedy berry, tobacco and leathery baked plum flavors. Savory and smooth on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Reserva,Marqués de Riscal
"From the Suduiraut vineyard, this is a wine created to be drunk young. It has just the right amount of honey along with marmalade flavors. The texture is smooth, accessible and ready to drink. It combines opulence and freshness.",Lions de Suduiraut,Château Suduiraut
"Packaged in a special 170th anniversary bottle, this Marsala opens with a dark amber color, adds luscious depth and finishes long. It delivers flavors of candied fruit, marron glacé, brown sugar and dark vanilla bean.",Targa Riserva,Cantine Florio
"Delicious, first class and possibly ageable. It's rich in blackberry pie filling, crême de cassis and sweet oak flavors, with a firm minerality that adds structural integrity. Sweet and ripe, but elegant. Will provide pleasant drinking over the next four years.",,Cornerstone
"This is a rich, elaborate Cabernet Sauvignon. It's opulent and flashy, with upfront blackberry jam, black currant, chocolate, spice and new oak flavors, and the tannins are ultrasmooth. Made in the soft, appealing modern style.",The Cornerstone,Cornerstone
"Cottanera interprets Etna through the lens of international grape varieties like Syrah. Sole di Sesta shows chewy berry and smoked bacon overtones that are characteristic of the grape, with enhanced mineral finesse that is typical of volcanic soil.",Sole di Sesta,Cottanera
"From the Agrigento area of southern Sicily, this blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah offers dark concentration, plush berry flavors, spice, leather and crushed black pepper. It ends on bittersweet notes of spice and prune.",,D'Alessandro
"High acidity and ultraripe fruit, in the form of pineapples, mangoes, pears and lemons, give this Chard a rich, exotic taste. New French oak adds the perfect touch of buttered toast. It's an impressive, intense young wine of high pedigree.",Bien Nacido,Fess Parker
"Saia is an opulent, darkly concentrated wine that opens with lush tones of prune, dark fruit, spice, cola, leather and toasted nut. Try pairing it with potato gnocchi and veal ragú.",Saia,Feudo Maccari
"L_vico is a tight, bright wine that shows an elegant and austere side of sunny Sicily. The wine is redolent of wild berries, cola, dried ginger and light spice.",Vajasindi L_vico,Duca di Salaparuta
"Made in a sweet style with only 8.5% alcohol, pair this delicately-textured wine as you might a Mosel spätlese, with sweet-spicy dishes. Green apple and citrus notes provide crisp balance to the residual sugar.",The Doctors',Forrest
"Il Musico is a unique dessert wine that opens with aromas of resin, pine nut, caramel and candied fruit. The viscous mouthfeel is sweet and rich, but there's also a really nice blast of refreshing lemon zest on the close.",Il Musico,Benanti
"Noted only as a proprietary blend, this seems to be showing a strong Cabernet influence. It's tight and astringently tannic, with pure cassis fruit anchoring the core. Focused and closed down, but promising.",Mith Red,Balboa
"A lovely wine that continues Gainey's string of successful bottlings. It's finely crisp in acidity, with a refreshing mouthfeel carrying ripe pineapple, lime and kiwi fruit flavors.",,Gainey
"Attractive and layered with a blueberry and raspberry fruit core accented by notes of sweet spice, orange oil, ashy tobacco and a touch of dark purple florals. The gripping tannins are fine and balanced, with skin-driven fruit flavors dominating the palate and a fudgy chocolate and sweet spice note lingering on the finish.",Yiron,Galil Mountain
"Scents of vanilla bean and crushed violet add interest to the dark-fruit driven bouquet. The firmly structured mouth shows the same depth of flavor, with concentrated notes of boysenberry and cassis that are matched against similarly strong earthy elements of black tea leaves and leathery spice.",The Reserve,Gamla
"Girolamo Russo's 'A Rina is an approachable red wine with a streamlined and compact feel in the mouth. It beautifully shows characteristic Etna aromas of crushed mineral, wild berry and toasted pistachio nut.",'A Rina,Girolamo Russo
"This is the rare Riesling that has seen some oak influence. Yet it's not obtrusive at all, and just adds hints of honey, vanilla and toast to the wine's already complex flavors, encompassing lilac blossoms, fresh greens, peach and tangerine. It's on the full-bodied side of the Riesling spectrum, with just a pinch of residual sugar and a pleasant cremainess on the midpalate.",,Greywacke
"Along with all the ripe fruit in the wine, there is a kernel of serious structure. That gives the wine minerality, textured acidity lying over the depth of white fruits. Toast adds extra complexity before a crisp aftertaste.",,Joseph Drouhin
"From a single vineyard at the top of the Brancott Valley, this is a harmonious, silky-texured Pinot, with typical black cherry and sous bois notes and hints of charred beef and cedar. Finishes long, crisp and vibrant. Drink now_2016.",The Wrekin,Jules Taylor
"Made in a dry, earthy style, this wine chooses elegance and structure over dazzling opulence. And that's just fine. It has a good core of blackberry and currant fruit, and the balance suggests some time in the cellar. Give it 3_4 years.",,Summers
"Tascante combines __asca_ and __tna_ spelled backwards. This wine represents the estate's first vintage of Nerello Mascalese from the fiery Sicilian volcano. It's a tight, tonic expression with small berry fruit and a long finish highlighted by crushed clove and nutmeg.",Tascante,Tasca d'Almerita
"Marc de Grazia is a vocal enthusiast of Nebbiolo and Pinot Noir, so it's no surprise that he would include the indigenous grapes of Mount Etna, Nerello Mascalese and Nerello Cappuccio, on his list of favorite varieties. These grapes all share similar characteristics: They are delicately nuanced and complex on the nose with a silky but firm quality of tannin. And, they all show long aging potential.",,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"This is pretty hefty at 13% alcohol, yet retains a long, bright line of acidity that lights up the wine's petrol, lime and tangerine shadings. Nicely balanced, with a long, mouthwatering finish.",The Lost Watch,Wirra Wirra
"Light in weight, delicate in style, this is just barely off dry. Crisp apple fruit carries hints of riper stone fruit (nectarine?) but is underlain by a distinctly stony note. The lingering finish ably balances tart and sweet.",,Seifried
"Nuanced scents of crushed purple flower petals, forest floor and raw coconut are supported by a fruity backbone of blackberry and raspberry. The lush mouth is ripe and concentrated, with a satiny texture and bold dark-cherry and plum-flesh flavors framed by hints of cocoa. Drink now_2015.",Secret Reserve,Shiloh Winery
"There is nothing shy about this wine, a pure Cabernet Sauvignon from the Artz and Klipsun vineyards. Much like the Artz Merlot from Barrister, it's a big-boned, muscular red, deeply tannic. The fruit is superripe, with scents of prune, smoke and chocolate. Blocky and powerful, done very consistently, as are all the Barrister reds, in the full-on house style.",,Barrister
"Benanti releases wines from previous vintages to show the impressive aging potential of Mount Etna. This blend of Nerello Mascalese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Nero d'Avola offers currant and candied fruit aromas backed by soft spice and crushed granite.",Lamorèmio,Benanti
"Made from Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah, this red wine shows the full body, rich tannins and overall elegance of Baldacci's red wines. It's powerful in blackberry, plum, currant, bacon and black-pepper spice flavors, and the tannins are strong but ultrarefined. Drink now_2015.",Four Sons Fraternity,Baldacci
"Honoris Causa is a 75-25 blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah (aged in French oak) that opens with bold, chewy, modern aromas of black cherry and chocolate. The wine delivers a round, velvety mouthfeel and a touch of sun-ripened berry sweetness on the close.",Honoris Causa,Brugnano
"A soft wine, favoring warm fruit, pear and peach flavors, the minerality coming later. The wine is crisp and fresh, with an intensity of acidity rare in 2009. That suggests it will age, although it is already fruity and refreshing.",Les Pierres Blanches,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"The toast shows through strongly in this wine, giving a burnt edge. At the same time, the delicious fruit with its flavors of peach and green plum, is rich enough to develop well and produce a balanced wine.",Fourchaume Premier Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"So sweet and ripe in raspberry, cherry and white chocolate, it's almost like a dessert wine. The sweetness nicely evaporates in a dry swirl of acids and minerals, leaving behind only the impression of honey and spice. The blend is mostly Syrah, with Grenache Noir and Petite Sirah.",Revelation,Epiphany
"A concentrated and seductive Merlot that's perfect for folks who like 'em big, ripe and oaky. Mulled boysenberries and blueberry compote flood the nose and mouth, with lush notes of milk chocolate, blackcurrant liqueur and dark coffee spicing up the finish. Round and velvet-textured, with medium tannins.",Yarden Odem Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"Hedonis is a beautiful blend of Nero d'Avola (70%) and Syrah, with a soft, velvety feel and bold berry flavors. It offers endnotes of cassis, almond, tobacco and savory cured meat.",Hedonis,Feudo Arancio
"This blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah offers balance and harmony, with no aromatic element out of place. It presents a steady wall of black fruit, soft cherry, tobacco, rum cake and dark leather. The soft, velvety tannins make this a great pasta or lasagna wine.",Santagostino Baglio Sorìa,Firriato
"A solid Sauvignon Blanc, dry, crisp and rich, with lime, green apple, kiwi, green melon and sweet vanilla flavors. And then there's that tangy minerality that makes it so racy. There's no oak apparent anywhere, making the fruit star. What a great restaurant wine, and production was nearly 7,000 cases, making it relatively easy to find.",,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Made with fruit sourced from very old, head-pruned Insolia vines (with extremely low yields), this structured Sicilian white wine opens with a bright, off-gold color and creamy notes of apricot, honey and vanilla. Pair it with Cornish hen or pulled-pork.",Bianca di Valguarnera,Duca di Salaparuta
"Rooty, leathery and spicy aromas accent dry baked-berry notes. The feel is smooth and natural, with texture and acidity supporting toasty, leathery, spicy berry and plum flavors. Mildly baked tasting on the finish, with cinnamon and pepper accents. Drink now through 2014.",Reserva,Dinastía Vivanco
"With the looming crater of the Etna volcano visible just outside the winery door, Cottanera pays homage to local viticulture with this red blend of local grapes. The wine is focused and firm, with bright berry and zesty spice overtones.",Rosso,Cottanera
"A delicious Pinot Noir to drink now. Soft and savory, it shows appealing raspberry, cherry and spice flavors, accented with the vanilla and toast of oak. Defines Russian River Pinot Noir in its easiest form.",,Davis Bynum
"Richer in profile than Cave Spring's standard label Riesling, the Estate Bottled balances densely concentrated apple and honey flavors with layers of chalk dust and petrol. Zippy acidity cuts clean on the finish, leaving just a whisper of lime skin and green florals on the palate.",Estate Bottled,Cave Spring
"This very fine Petite Sirah mysteriously blends the variety's robust, full-bodied tannins with the silky delicacy of a Pinot Noir. The flavors are big and deep, offering an explosion of dried fruits, berries, tobacco, spicy gingersnap cookie and grilled meat. Drink with hearty stews and barbecue now, or stash it away for a few years.",Fox Family Vineyard,Blair Fox
"This late harvest selection boasts ripe apricot, lychee, golden raisin, honeydew and baked apple fruit characters alongside glimmers of sweet spice, candied orange rind and raw honeycomb. It's full and deliciously weighty in the mouth, with a stunning ginger-infused lift to the long close.",Sha'al Single Vineyard Late Harvest,Carmel
"The 2007 Anthology as usual is a blend of the many vineyards Conn Creek accesses throughout Napa Valley. It's a very good wine, sumptuous in fruit and easily likeable for its soft texture and upfront berry and chocolate flavors. Still, there's something generic about it. Even though it's more expensive, it lacks the focus and interest of the winery's single-vineyard bottlings.",Anthology,Conn Creek
"Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot from the Sanmichele vineyard of the Serramarrocco estate are blended to produce a thick, inky Sicilian red that is redolent of blackberry, dried prune, rum cake and exotic clove or cardamom. Pair this richly textured red with stewed beef or game meat.",Serramarrocco,Tenuta di Serramarrocco
"Dark and rich, there's a slightly liquorous sensation to the blackberry and cassis core. The medium-weight mouth offers lifting acidity, great balance and depth, with attractive notes of cigar spice, cocoa powder and roasted espresso grinds on the finish.",Secret Reserve,Shiloh Winery
"Very lush and ripe in blackberry, cherry, currant and cassis flavors, with an oaky overlay, and there's a minerality toward the end that smacks of the soil. With an acidic jamminess and fierce tannins, the wine feels austere and remote. Give it 6 or 7 years in the cellar to come around.",,J. Davies
"Pinot Noir doesn't get much richer than this smooth bottling from Fritz. It's their best yet, offering firm, drily crisp flavors of raspberries, cherries, red currants and cola, wrapped into a silky texture. Drink now.",,Fritz
"Made in a more forward style than it used to be, Calera's '07 Jensen appeals for its lush raspberry, cherry, bacon, vanilla and sandalwood flavors. The acidity is just fine, and the tannins are soft and intricate. Lovely now, with a brief decant, and should develop for 6_8 years.",Jensen Vineyard,Calera
"Dark in color, with an initial note of extraction, and with weighty fruit under the toasty surface. The wine is still coming together, needing 5_6 years to turn into the full-bodied ripe-fruited wine that it potentially is.",,Château Fonplégade
"For lovers of dense, firmly tannic and rich Malbec, this is pure pleasure indeed. It is a powerful wine, packed with dark, brooding fruits, leavened by a hint of mint and smoky acidity. The wine shows power, but doesn't get carried away. Age for 4_5 years.",Pur Plaisir,Château Haut-Monplaisir
"Shows the massively extracted raspberry, cherry, cola and anise flavors this block of the estate vineyard produces, with rich oak influences. No denying the opulence and immediately decadent appeal, or the silky, tapestry-like texture. Seems off a bit from the fabulous 2007, a little fatter, hotter and more obvious, but still a very flamboyant Pinot Noir. Drink now_2013.",Bliss Block,Lynmar
"A wonderful Gewürz. You never know what to expect from this varietal, but in this case the wine is basically dry, and freshly crisp in acidity. The flavors are complex, ranging from oranges, pineapples and honeysuckle to star anise, toffee and the famous spices of Gewürztraminer. There's also a rich, creamy texture.",,Novy
"It makes a smooth impression on the palate thanks to its natural intensity, it's fruit flavors and spicy close.  This 60-20-20 super Tuscan blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah would make a great companion to braised beef with porcini mushroom sauce and wild rice.",Obsession,Villa Vignamaggio
"Meaty, spicy and smooth on the nose, with subtle dryness that indicates maturity. The palate is saturated but not heavy or chewy, with body and balance that highlights plum, berry, cherry and toasty oak and spice flavors. Shows freshness, health, quality and finesse. Drink now through 2014.",Gran Reserva,Sierra Cantabria
"Guidalberto (a 60-40 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot) opens with dense, inky concentration and fresh tones of forest fruit and wild blackberry. The wine is bright and silky with a fresh cherry fade: Pair it with spezzatino di manzo (classic beef stew).",Guidalberto,Tenuta San Guido
"A powerful wine, tropical in its fruit flavors with mango and guava and layered with a mineral texture. This is rich and concentrated, with acidity that gives a great final bite.",Les Anges Lots,Pascal & Nicolas Reverdy
"Here's an elegantly oak aged Sangiovese with simple but bright fruit tones of cherry, blueberry and raspberry. There's plenty of spice, cola and cured meat at the back and the wine ends with fresh acidity and smooth tannins.",Cavaliere,Michele Satta
"An interesting Cabernet that is softening and mellowing. The primary blackberry and cherry fruit is starting to dry out, revealing more subtle and harmonious notes. This dry, complex wine is best now and for a few more years.",,Philippe-Lorraine
"Powerful and concentrated, this is a serious wine, rich in plum and damson fruits. It is sumptuous, its tannins folded into sweet, juicy black fruits, layered acidity and a firm structure. Age for 3_4 years.",Vinha das Româs,Monte da Ravasqueira
"This well toned Riserva Tuscan blend (70% Sangiovese with Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot) offers bright berry nuances and loads of spicy, smokey personality. Aromas here include pressed flower, cured meat and polished stone: The mouthfeel is smooth, silky and lively.",Vigna di Carmio Riserva,Pratesi
"The folks at Wairau River have picked up their game, turning out a slightly austere, minerally 2009 that balances those attributes with hints of nectarine, melon and fig. It's medium-bodied, with a long finish.",,Wairau River
"The flint of the Rochoy vineyard gives off great heat, turning this into a ripe and complex wine. It is steely, with a strong mineral character, finishing with a wonderful, lifting acidity.",Le Rochoy,Domaine Laporte
"Aged in a small proportion of new wood, this is a concentrated, sophisticated wine. It derives its character from the local Braucol and Duras grapes, blended with Syrah. Together, these varieties give a complex, black berry led wine, vivid with acidity and packed with tannins. Age for 4_5 years.",Renaissance,Domaine Rotier
"This is a dynamic and exciting wine with loads of depth and personality. The hearty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc opens with blackberry, spice, mature cherry, plum and leather. It feels compact and tight in the mouth and the finish is long and full of lively fruit flavor.",,Donna Olimpia 1898
"This 2009 shows the varietal's fantastic wealth of exotic tropical fruits, flowers, honey and spices. But it's also vibrant in acidity, with a core of cold minerality.",,Calera
"Orchidea is a 50-50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot that shows loads of ripe fruit, blackberry, cassis, chocolate and leather. Pair this wine with osso buco.",Orchidea,Fattoria di Casalbosco
"Shaped by 15 months in oak barrique, this pure expression of Cabernet Franc is beautifully integrated with impressively intense aromas of black fruit and spice. You'll also recognize mineral, root beer or herb and the wine ends with a blast of black, jammy berry fruit.",Lien_,Giovanni Chiappini
"Cowhorn wines are certified biodynamic and entirely natural. This stunning Syrah is inky black, and smells like a bowl of blueberries and blackberries. Threaded through those delicious berry flavors are composty highlights of earth and leaf. Beautifully balanced and intriguing; this is as good as any Oregon Syrah I've ever tasted.",Syrah 74,Cowhorn
"Made in an immediately appealing style, this Pinot has forward raspberry and strawberry jam, cherry pie, Dr. Pepper, vanilla custard and smoky sweet oak flavors. It's so delicious, you hardly notice the tannin and acid firmness. But that will protect it and enable it to age for 6_8 years.",Quail Hill Vineyard,Lynmar
"Here's an impressive new wine from Bolgheri with an inky, dense appearance and concentrated aromas of black fruit, spice, leather, tar and licorice. The wine shows depth and personality, capped by a velvety texture and long, fruit-driven persistency.",Donne Fittipaldi,La Pineta
"This beautiful wine boasts impressive harmony and balance between its fruit, spice, tannic and acidic elements. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Sangiovese and Merlot and the bouquet is redolent of cherry, blackberry, cinnamon and leather. Very nice.",,Michele Satta
"Nice and bronze, with nutty, potent aromas that are forward and chiseled. Lively, clipped and zesty in the mouth, with nutty pecan, toasted almonds, lemon zest and length. A powerful Sherry that represents the Palo Cortado category with aplomb.",Dos Cortados Rare Old Dry Palo Cortado Aged 20 Years,Williams & Humbert
"A smooth, yet textured Port, with sweet berry fruits layered with tannins that promise aging. The wine has elegance, perfumed with violets and ripe berries, balanced with some drier acidity and structure. The best vintage from Romaneira so far.",Vintage,Quinta da Romaneira
"How astonishing to find an Oregon Pinot Noir just under 13% alcohol that is fully ripe and fragrant with a perfect balance of fruit, herb and mineral. The young raspberry fruit flavors and overall lightness of this wine match beautifully with lox or smoked salmon. Despite its elegance, this strikes me as a wine that could turn out to be quite long-lived, given its impeccable balance.",Bryan Creek Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Lagone is a pleasurable and rich blend of Merlot, Cab Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Sangiovese that opens with rich, dark color and intense aromas of sweet spice, chocolate, cherry and tobacco. The wine feels chewy and smooth in the mouth with a long, velvety feel on the close.",Lagone,Aia Vecchia
"One of the top Madiran producers, Laplace tames the naturally tannic Tannat with a little Cabernet. But this is still a dark, intense wine, with plum skins and wood tannins to give the whole wine a powerful structure. Age for 5 years or more.",Madiran Laplace,Château d'Aydie
"Here's an elegant but also very approachable and friendly wine. There's a bright, lively quality to the fruit here and the finish is long and rich in fresh fruit nuances. Would make a perfect pairing partner to oven roasted pasta and easy meat stew.",Opus Magnum,Fattoria di Casalbosco
"If you can accept a slight hint of jamminess, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot is for you. Beyond the ripe cherry and blackberry is a beautiful blast of pleasure and opulence. Pair this wine with succulent cuts of red meat.",San Martino,Cipriana
"This beautiful Riserva from Montecucco (coastal Tuscany) shows loads of Sangiovese personality. You'll recognize the variety's true character in the wine's bright aromas of wild berry, toasted almond, blue flower and moist earth. There's structure and definition too, and the wine offers a long, bright finish.",Riserva,Collemassari
"An elegant red, with power, acidity and black berry flavors curling around a structured core of dark tannins. This is cool Touriga, very poised, worth aging for two years, with a delicious spicy aftertaste.",Grand'Arte,DFJ Vinhos
"From late harvest grapes, this concentrated sweet wine balances great freshness with a smooth creamy texture with flavors of orange zest, honey and spice. It is rich and concentrated, while the acidity shoots through the aftertaste.",Cuvée Thibault,Domaine Bellegarde
"Stocky, dark and pure, with inky aromas of shoe polish, black fruits and charcoal. The palate is brawny and tannic, with saturated blackberry, espresso and bitter chocolate flavors. It's rowdy but also attractive and full of everything good including chocolate, spice and pepper on the finish. Drink from 2011 through 2015.",Numanthia,Numanthia
"The wine is powerful and concentrated but also beautifully elegant, its richness balanced with acidity, damsons and a layer of dark chocolate. Age this fine wine for 3_4 years.",Baron Gustav von Fürstenberg,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"Nuts, sweet figs and spice come together in this delicious wine. It has great freshness as well as the concentrated wood character of a 20-year-old. A great final balance.",20-Year-Old Tawny,Ramos-Pinto
"This is a very good Cabernet that shows its mountain origins in the thick tannins and overall concentration. It's superrich in blackberries, black currants and crème de cassis, with a tangy minerality. There's also a cut of acidity that makes the mouthfeel tart, and will never go away. Seems at its best over the next few years for youthful beauty.",Lampyridae Vineyard,Schulz
"A very soft-textured wine with delicious jammy fruits that give spice and juiciness. It has a rich feel to it, velvet in the mouth, while the acidity adds just the right amount of freshness.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"Il Tarabuso is a rich and spicy expression of Cabernet Sauvignon (blended with 10% Syrah for extra spice and softness on the finish) that would pair with a hearty plate of grilled sausage and white beans. Aromas here include black fruit, spice, cola and sweet cherry.",Il Tarabuso,Terre del Marchesato
"A bone-dry wine, powered by its dense tannins. The fruit is under this brooding exterior, spicy berries and a dusty texture. Acidity and a juicy character emerge slowly, with a final pure blackberry freshness.",Rapariga da Quinta Colheita Seleccionada,Luis Duarte
"This is a lovely wine (a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and other grapes) that shows very attractive softness in the mouth backed by a velvety texture and fine tannins. Black fruit, tobacco, spice and leather accent the bouquet: Pair it with black truffle Cornish hen.",Guado al Tasso Il Bruciato,Marchesi Antinori
"A 100% expression of Syrah showing loads of varietal personality. Aromas here include red berry, moist tobacco, leather, cured meat and ground peppercorn. The wine is rich and smooth on the close with a touch of soft sweetness.",Banditone,Máté
"Thanks to the firm and structured nature of the tannins, Montepergoli will benefit from another five years of cellar aging. The wine opens with black, ripe fruit and smoky aromas of tanned leather, clove and peppercorn.",Montepergoli,Enrico Santini
"A beautiful wine, dry and elegant, and a great bargain at this price. Made from all five of the classic Bordeaux grape varieties, it's rich in blackberry, currant, violet, cocoa and sandalwood flavors, with an exotic spiciness in the finish. Fine acidity and silky tannins combine for a perfect texture. Drink now and through 2013.",The French Connection,EOS
"Made with organically-framed fruit. The bouquet here is very distinctive with aromas of ripe blackberry, maraschino cherry, clove, ground black pepper, cured meat and polished stone. The feel it imparts in the mouth is one of softness and intensity.",Suisassi,Duemani
"Pe_n (an 80-20 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc) is a round, supple and concentrated wine with a full, soft feeling in the mouth and a generously smooth texture. The aromas recall ripe cherry, chocolate and exotic spice.",Pe_n,Batzella
"More full-bodied than the winery's brut, this Pinot Noir-based bubbly also is richer. It's just beautiful in raspberries and strawberries, with brighter touches of lime, and although the wine has a honeyed sweetness, it's zesty acidity makes it finish dry.",Blanc de Noirs,Gloria Ferrer
"Campo al Fico (__ield of figs_) is a rich, ripe 80-20 blend of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc that opens with a dark, inky color and generous aromas of cherry, blackberry, slate roof and polished stone. There are some light brown shades at the rim of its ruby core, and the wine is soft, sweet and supple on the close.",Campo al Fico,I Luoghi
"A textbook example of Oregon Pinot Gris, this is bursting with citrus and pear fruit. Immaculately clean and crisp, the bright fruit and lively mouthfeel continue into a lingering, satisfying, tangy finish. All stainless- steel fermented.",,Iris Vineyards
"The 2005 vintage was a very great one for Iron Horse. This 100% Chardonnay reflects the perfect growing conditions. It's dry and especially elegant, with rich brioche, lime and green apple flavors, and a firm minerality in the finish. Drink now.",Blanc de Blancs,Iron Horse
"Here's an inky colored and deeply concentrated 50-50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot that delivers rock solid structure and intensely dark aromas of blackberry pie, rum cake, plum, prune, clove, leather, cola, and pipe tobacco. You'll need to pair this wine with succulent beef to break up those tight tannins.",Aquabona,Tassi
"Voluminous yet silky, this undeniably complex offering from Te Kairanga features hints of smoky bacon, black tea and briary herbs surrounding a core of black cherries and plums. The fine texture stands out on the long, slightly warm finish.",John Martin Reserve,Te Kairanga
"Here's a fabulous 50-50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah that offers black, thick consistency and meaty aromas of cured beef, peppercorn, smoke, tobacco and loads of luscious dark berry fruit. It's a soft, velvety wine with a plush, soft finish.",Cacciacone,Tenuta San Giorgio
"Just lovely to drink now, it's so softly lush and decadently delicious. Beguiles the palate with jammy, pastry flavors of raspberries, cherries and sweet oak. Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc.",SVR Reserve,Sterling
"The vineyard, high in the Mayacamas Mountains, is famous for the tannic quality of its red wines. You'll find this '08 Cab tough and astringent. But you'll also easily discover the vast richness of chocolate, cherry, blackberry and currant fruit, so deep and impressive, and the finish is totally dry and balanced. This Cabernet clearly needs time. Give it until 2014 to begin to come around.",Bismark Mountain Vineyard,Atmosphere
"Another fine success for Adelsheim, a founding Oregon winery currently on a quality roll. Elegant and crisply defined, this textbook Pinot Gris begins with a mix of fresh pear, honeydew and gooseberry, then refreshes the palate with juicy acids and some light citrus skin flavors.",,Adelsheim
"A beautifully smooth, opulent, wood-aged wine, with a great depth of ripe fruit, spice, vanilla, fresh herbs and concentrated tannins. Good aging potential. Drink now.",Tinto da Anfora,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"High-toned and fruity, the Abondante mixes cherry candy with tropical flavors. Full-bodied, robust and ready to drink.",Abondante Red,Sineann
"Sweetly floral, this concentrated and penetrating wine, from some special old-vine plantings on Snipes Mountain, smells and tastes like fancy perfume in a wine bottle. Though not sweet, it could certainly be served as a dessert wine, given its exotic character.",Upland Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"Occasio continues to plumb the depths of the Del Arroyo Vineyard and its abilities with each of the red Bordeaux grapes, this time deftly showing what it can do with the enfant terrible that is Cab Franc. Give it some time to open and then enjoy its densely layered richness of cherry and coffee and plum.",Del Arroyo Vineyard,Occasio
"This is a Bordeaux blend based on Cabernet Sauvignon, with a good chunk of Sangiovese. It's a pleasant, rich wine, tough in tannins and acids, with concentrated cherry pie, blackberry and oak flavors. Doesn't seem like an ager, so drink now with hearty foods.",PureCoz,Pure Cru
"A smoothly rich wine, this unusual Syrah from the Douro valley shows how good the variety can be there. It flows easily and generously in the mouth, with black cherry, sweet tannins and light acidity. Probably not for long aging, but delicious.",,Quinta da Romaneira
"Planeta's delicious Merlot opens with modern touches of spice and milk chocolate that enhance a solid core of red berry fruit. The tannins are soft and polished, but firm enough to give the wine impressive staying power.",,Planeta
"Dark and dusty, with streaks of metal and mineral, this complex Merlot retains the elegance so rarely found in domestic versions. Cassis and plum flavors melt into supple tannins soaked in espresso. Ready to drink now.",The Estates,Milbrandt
"Massively extracted blackberry, blueberry and cherry jam, chocolate and new oak flavors mark this blend of one-third each Cabernet Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Merlot. The tannins are smooth and complex. Rather direct now, it needs a couple years to settle down, but isn't a long term ager.",Terzetto,Volker Eisele Family Estate
"This Bordeaux-style blend includes Cabernet Sauvignon, Cab Franc, Merlot and Malbec. A tasty, toasty bottle, it's loaded with ripe black fruits, notably cherry and cassis. The tannins are supple and seem soaked in Kahlua.",Little Bear Creek Red,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"This is a firm and dark colored wine, dense and very concentrated. Its black fruits are ripe and structured, layering intense acidity with delicious blackberry jam; the tannins blended into the ripe texture.",Duvalley Reserva,Castro Pena Alba
"Round, soft wine, its currant and peach fruits ripely integrated into the acidity. It has a touch of wood, although not enough to suppress the ebullient yellow fruit, finished with pink grapefruit.",Ancestral,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"La Fuga is a fresh and delicious Chardonnay from the popular Donnafugata winery. It opens with bright aromas of stone fruit, citrus, dried herb and exotic fruit. The wine makes a perfect pairing partner to the delightful fish dishes served regularly in Mediterranean restaurants.",La Fuga,Donnafugata
"A juicy, fruity wine with just a line of tannins at its core. Its red berry fruits are delicious and easy to drink, the wine with its richness needs no aging. It's pure fruit bomb pleasure.",Quinta do Encontro Q do E,Dão Sul
"Rich and ripe in fruit, in the way of many Paso Robles reds. Offers forward blackberry, blueberry and cocoa flavors, sprinkled with pepper, and a few overripe notes of raisin. The alcohol is quite high, but balanced. One minor quibble is excessive softness.",,Daou
"Fresh and easy, this approachable Chard exhibits bright aromas of fresh red apple, light citrus and dainty yellow flowers. The palate is slightly richer and fuller-bodied, with lush flavors of wood-grilled apple skins and toasted brioche that transition into the baking-spice laden finish.",The Reserve,Gamla
"A structured ageworthy wine, layering tannins with dark cherry fruit. The acidity gives freshness and a textured character. With its dry flavors, the wine will age for 2_3 years or more.",Les Charmes Cuvée la Louve,Gérard Brisson
"Flamboyantly ripe raspberry, cherry and blackberry fruit marks this Syrah, a blend drawn from several vineyards throughout the county. The wine contains smaller amounts of Petite Sirah and Grenache, giving it a rich, tannic complexity.",The Big Easy,Fess Parker
"Graci is a dynamic, young producer with a beautiful estate at the base of the Etna volcano. This lively Nerello Mascalese opens with delicate floral intensity and background notes of mint, cola, licorice, crushed mineral and rosemary oil.",,Graci
"This wine is definitely on the ripe and chewy side of the Nero d'Avola spectrum, with bold berry and black cherry aromas. The mouthfeel is soft and slightly sweet.",Nerom_ccarj,Gulfi
"This rich, full-bodied Grenache shows ripe cherry and blueberry fruit, enriched with smoky, caramelized oak. It's fat, soft and flashy, if a bit direct. Drink now.",Fox Family Vineyard,Blair Fox
"This is an interesting wine, made from 40% Cab Sauv, 40% Merlot, 7% Petit Verdot, 6% Cab Franc and 4% Shiraz and 3% Grenache in the Italian appassimento-style. It's strong and robust, loaded with dark fruit flavors of blackberry, cherry and plum along with a streak of black currant liqueur and espresso with anisette.",The Great Amarolo Dry Red Wine,Alexander
"Lush tropical fruits are laced with mineral acidity. The two are held in balance by the citrusy texture. The wine is fresh while also rich, the edge of wood showing as a smoky aftertaste.",,Louis Jadot
"Despite being virtually dry and only carrying 11.5% alcohol, this wine seems more rounded than most Australian Rieslings, with hints of crushed stone accenting notes of tangerine, melon and cinnamon-like spice. Drink now_2017.",Founder's Block,Katnook Estate
"Kennedy Point is located on Waiheke Island, so this is contract grown and made for the label in the Marlborough region but the results in 2009 are very good. It delivers campfire-like notes, plus black cherry fruit and hints of brown sugar, mocha and cinnamon. Drink this supple wine over the next year or so.",,Kennedy Point
"This reliable producer of ripe, fleshy Sémillon has made a good, crisp version in this difficult vintage. Green apples and tart pears offer a slight hint of honeysuckle, but the juicy acidity is the main component here. Barrel fermentation adds just a touch of toast.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Surprisingly good for the price, this Cab appeals for its dryness and elegance. With pleasant blackberry, blueberry and smoke flavors, its tannins are firm, leading to a long, sweet finish. Production was just under 1,500 cases.",,Napa Family Vineyards
"Still hard and tannic, this big-boned Cabernet from the Champoux Vineyard is bursting with the vineyard's characteristic black cherry fruit. Hints of herb and dried leaf sneak in, but the tannin and alcohol will need some years of bottle age to smooth out.",Baby Poux Vineyard,Sineann
"This two-county blend is fine for drinking now. It's rich, dry and thick in tannins, with elaborate blackberry, cherry, spice and oak flavors. Decant it for several hours to let it mellow a bit.",,Tudal
"Shows lots of early drinkability in its raspberry, cherry and spice flavors. Brisk acidity and a gentle tug of tannins provide needed structure. It's an elegant wine, but doesn't seem to have the stuffing for aging, so drink now-2015.",Garys' Vineyard,Testarossa
"Tastes as sweet and delicious as chocolate-covered blueberries, sprinkled with black pepper, and finished with the warmth of alcohol and a bite of lemony acidity. Try with a grilled steak in gorgonzola sauce.",Paolo's Vineyard Estate Grown,Montemaggiore
"Tastes honey sweet in butterscotch, buttered toast and caramel. The sweetness dominates well ripened pineapple and tangerine flavors. But the fruity power is there. It needs a year or so in the bottle to emerge, and even a brief decant will bring greater harmony to this expressively opulent wine.",La Sereinité,Lynmar
"One of the most successful Bordeaux blends to come out of Sonoma Valley lately, this wine is dry and earthy, providing a nice alternative to today's super-fruity, overripe style. It has rewarding cherry, blackberry, red currant, mocha and licorice flavors, balanced with rich tannins. Really stylish for drinking now.",Serres Ranch,Highway 12
"Brings to mind the 2001 bottling, which originally was also pale in color, tightly wound and firm in acidity. Like it, this '07 is not showing well now. It seems dry and thin and lacking in opulence, especially if you're accustomed to the big California style. But it's true to its terroir, and the way it grows in the glass lends itself to developing over the next 6_10 years.",Reed Vineyard,Calera
"Ocra is a luscious and opulent blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Syrah (aged 12 months in barrique) that shows loads of cherry, blackberry and plum nuances. You'll also feel soft spice, leather and tobacco folded within the rich, creamy texture.",Ocra,Guicciardini Strozzi
"This is a very rich, flamboyant Pinot Noir. It offers waves of raspberries, cherries, vanilla, toast, gingersnap cookie and spices. The texture is silky smooth and elegant, while the acidity is fine and balancing. As good as it tastes, it needs more complexity and greater depth. Drink now_2014.",Gold Coast Vineyard Dijon Selection,Costa de Oro
"Warm and smooth, with aromas of fresh dill, spiced cherries, mulled earth and more. The palate has a full, stacked feel with well-oaked flavors of vanilla, toffee and earthy berries. Finishes chewy, with complexity and light flavors of caramel and tobacco. Ready to drink.",Solpost,Cellers Sant Rafel
"Super smooth and complete on the nose, with black fruit, toasty oak and earth notes rolled into a nice whole. It's lush, plump and balanced, with full blackberry, raisin, chocolate and spice flavors resting in front of a mellow, spicy finish. A pretty, balanced blend of 75% Tempranillo and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon that shows Jumilla at its best.",Taja Excelecia,Bodegas Mähler-Besse
"From a parcel at the highest point of the Tracy vineyard, this is a spectacular, densely mineral wine, taking its flavor from the soil. It is spicy, ripe and very full, with light tropical fruits as well as a taut and tight texture. Age for 2_3 years.",101 Rangs,Château de Tracy
"Here's a beautiful super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon available at a moderately reasonable price. The Castello del Terriccio estate overlooks the sea in Coastal Tuscany and presents aromas of well ripened fruit and plenty of background smoke and tobacco.",Tassinaia,Castello del Terriccio
"Lots of hard tannins and mouthwatering acidity in this Cabernet. It's bone dry, and densely packed with blackberries and black currants, with the tangy minerality of spring water and plenty of oak influence. Too astringent to drink now. Give it 5_6 years, and it should develop even longer than that.",,Roberts & Rogers
"This is a soft, lush, almost sweet Zinfandel. It has ripe, pie-filling flavors of raspberries and cherries, with a chocolate and spice finish. Feels a bit too soft, but the tannins are complex and refined. Drink now.",Luvisi Vineyard,Signorello
"Fresh and crisp in acidity, but very clean and balanced, this young Pinot wants a year or two in the cellar. It's silky, and elegant and rich in raspberries, cherries, cola, pomegranates and sweet, smoky oak.",Split Rock Vineyard,Petito
"This is a rich, flamboyant Chardonnay, built on a foundation of superripe pineapple, lime and golden mango fruit and elaborated with sweet, caramelized oak. Bright, zesty Edna Valley acidity balances the opulence.",Estate Bottled,Chamisal Vineyards
"From selected parcels of Château Bélingard, this is a great success for the cool 2007 vintage. There is black berry richness to balance the severe tannins, while the element of freshness is well integrated into the final stalky acidity. Age for 3_4 years.",Ortus,Château Bélingard
"While the winery's Pinot Noirs from this vineyard have shown tight acidity and hardness, they've shown great promise. So it is with this '08. It's bright in acidity, with tantalizing raspberry, sour cherry candy and cola flavors, while new French oak adds a needed touch of sweet vanilla and smoke.",Devil's Gulch Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"This lovely Sauvignon Blanc was cold fermented, then aged on the lees in neutral oak barrels. That was the perfect way to treat the grapes, which were grown in St. Helena. The wine shows rich flavors of limes, green melons and lemongrass, with a softly creamy texture and a long, spicy, honey-rich finish.",,Cornerstone
"This biodynamic Rhône blend is equal parts of Marsanne, Roussanne and Viognier, co-fermented with native yeast. It's a splendid example of the non-interventionist style, rich, and textural. The yeasty flavors are refreshing__ear and apple and cucumber fruit holding down the center__lean and solid. The wine gains power and brings in some toasty barrel flavors as it rolls into the finish.",Spiral 36,Cowhorn
"There's a delicate lemon scent, leading into a mix of citrus, grapefruit peel and honeysuckle. The wine gains weight in the mouth, showing ripe fruit (yellow apples) and a soft, lightly oxidized finish with toasted coconut and cracker. Quite delicious, distinctive and rich.",Estate,David Hill
"With its big tannins and equally intense tarry black fruit flavors, this is a bold brushstroke wine. The plum and damson fruits fold over a solid base of dark tannins, giving a rich textured, dense character. Age for 3_4 years.",Les Gravels,Domaine Rotier
"A zesty, lemon wine, with an intriguing series of herbal and animal flavors, this is not a wine to go unnoticed. It has weight, with spice and nut flavors adding to the fruit. Drink with shellfish or sharp cheese.",La Pierre Blanche,Domaine Bellegarde
"Ata Rangi isn't known for its Sauvignon Blanc__he Pinot Noir is what everyone clamors for__ut perhaps it should be. This is an excellent effort, balancing pineapple and citrus fruit with a hint of grassiness. Despite being well over a year old, it remains fresh, lively and crisp, with a long, mouthwatering finish.",,Ata Rangi
"This starts off herbal and green, with hints of nettles, but those elements settle down, ending up as a welcome, complex accent to the ripe nectarine fruit. Drink up over the next few months.",,Forefathers
"Ripe, forward blackberry, cherry, currant and licorice flavors mark this Cabernet-based Bordeaux blend. It's dry, and the tannins are ultrarefined. But there's an astringent feeling that shuts down the palate's appreciation of how good it is. This is a wine you want to cellar for 4_6 years.",Tribute,Benziger
"The ruby-colored Trefiano is a bright and aromatic wine with fresh notes of forest fruit, raspberry, violet and rose petal. The wine is mostly Sangiovese with smaller percentages of Cabernet Sauvignon and Canaiolo that add structure and fruitiness respectively.",Trefiano,Capezzana
"The grapes come from a vineyard in a part of the sprawling Sonoma Coast appellation that has yet to prove itself. The wine is ripe, with delicious cherry and raspberry-pie-filling flavors liberally accented with the sweet toast and vanilla notes of oak. There's an obvious appeal of deliciousness, and while it doesn't tire the palate, it doesn't offer extreme complexity. Drink now.",,Longfellow
"The wine is King Estate's superpremium offering, made exclusively with organically grown grapes from the estate vineyard. Lush and earthy, it's got a lot of forward, tart berry fruit power, turns a bit soft in the middle, and sails away with a hint of heat and a lick of chocolate.",Domaine,King Estate
"Fine structure, sharp acids and well-defined tannins provide the framework for this single- vineyard wine. The fruit is tart and carries a citrus component, along with wild berries. In the mouth it brings in suggestions of bacon fat and thyme, with the fruit continuing into a clean, precise, tightly wound finish.",Freedom Hill Vineyard,Lange
"Le Macchiole's Bolgheri Rosso blend (Merlot, Cabernet Franc, Syrah and Sangiovese) delivers an honest, but rich bouquet of black fruit, coffee, spice and chocolate shadings. The oak used here is two and three years old but has shaped a soft, velvety mouthfeel nonetheless.",,Le Macchiole
"Martinborough's trademark savoriness comes through in this wine as hints of soy and mushroom, layered over cherry fruit and chocolaty oak. This medium-bodied Pinot Noir is a bit tight and crisp right now, but it should be fully open and ready for business by mid-2011 and drink well for another 5_6 years after that.",Runholder,Te Kairanga
"This opulent and reasonably priced blend of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc is enhanced by a soft Merlot component. A sweet, rich wine with pretty aromatic highlights of mature fruit and spice.",Villa Donoratico,Tenuta Argentiera
"This is an LBV that could well age. Its tannins are still firm, although it does already have a delicious perfume of violets and rose hips, along with sweet black fruit. It will need decanting if drunk now.",Late Bottled Vintage,Poças
"A ripe and mature wine, its fruits showing rich maturity. Black plums are melded with soft tannins, a jammy texture and a great feeling of wood aging. The wine is ready to drink.",Vinhas do Lasso Reserva,Quinta do Pinto
"For a wood-aged colheita, this is a young wine, the color still ruby and the raisins and sweet damson fruit still in evidence. The wood-aging comes through to give almond and coffee complexity.",Colheita Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"Black raspberry, blueberry and black cherry fruit is at the heart of this tart, racy wine. These primary fruit flavors are presented in a clean, immaculate frame of mostly neutral oak. Good length, with just a hint of finishing heat.",Gamache Vineyard,William Church
"A beguiling nose erupts into scents of rose water, hard lemon candy and fresh-sliced orange peel. The palate leans toward citrus, light but lingering, with a touch of minerality.",,William Church
"A bit softer and more approachable than many Australian Rieslings, but it still bears a familial resemblance to Wakefield's Clare Valley Riesling, with hints of crushed stone or chalk and tangerine-citrus notes. Drink now.",Promised Land,Wakefield Estate
"So ripe and sweet in raspberries, cherries and blueberries, it's practically like pie filling, except this Pinot manages to finish dry. You have to give it credit for sheer razzle-dazzle.",Presidio Vineyard,Dragonette
"Sweet on the nose yet firm as a bristle brush, with lime and pineapple as the key aromas. Feels juicy, tight and light on the tongue, with fine acidity propelling nectarine, lime and melon flavors. Zesty, crisp and pure throughout. A serious value among white wines.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Nero d'Avola and Syrah make for a great marriage, and this wine from Firriato proves the point. It's luscious and warm with pulsing red cherry and blackberry fruit backed by smoke, spice and barbecue.",Santagostino Baglio Sorìa,Firriato
"Perfumed green plum aromas impart an attractive floral quality to this wine, which also has some wood aging. The acidity is light but just right for the textured white fruit flavors. There is good freshness on the finish.",San Miguel Branco,Herdade de São Miguel
"Savage and smelling of earth, this estate-grown and -bottled Syrah from husband and wife team Jonathan Lachs and Susan Marks is rightly mountainous, with a wall of tannin, still thick and tight but teeming with potential. Lay it down and let that wall melt into fruit and spicy earth.",Estate Bottled,Cedarville Vineyard
"A hugely purple Petite with layers of black pepper, bacon fat, cedar and earth. It's chewy and inky but in balance; its tannin structure is as thick as walls yet the wine's stewy plum goodness goes down easy.",Naylor Vineyard,Cedarville Vineyard
"This thick, purple-hued wine offers a rich mix of fruits, from brambly blackberry to plum and even a bit of spiced pear. The blend of ripe fruits and peppery spices is intriguing, and the flavors twist and twirl through a medium-long finish.",,Animale
"Cocoa powder, tobacco leaves and leathery spice all accent the black fruit soul of this wine. Ripe flavors of blackberry, cassis and juicy plum flesh flood the medium weight mouth, framed by a solid structure of gripping tannins that stay through the long close.",,Bazelet HaGolan
"Elegant and classically built on the nose, with lemony oak, coconut, cola and dried cherry aromas. Feels a bit high in acidity, with raspberry, dry spice and tobacco flavors. Juicy and long on the finish, and with this type of acidity it'll last another decade, no sweat. Drink now through 2020.",Gran Reserva,Beronia
"Bishop's Peak, which is the second label of Talley, has been turning out some of the best Pinot Noirs at this price point in California. Their 2010 is elegant and delicious, with savory cherry, persimmon and spice flavors. Drink it now.",,Bishop's Peak
"Classic in its aromas, earthiness, zesty acidity and dried fruit character. The mouthfeel is bright, juicy and fresh, with earthy berry flavors, a mild baked element, chocolate notes and leather. Expands on the finish, and overall this is a textbook wine that's honest and sings of what Rioja represents.",Rioja Bordón Reserva,Bodegas Franco-Españolas
"This rich wine still retains proper Pouilly-Fuissé minerality. It has apple as well as as yellow fruit flavors, giving a steely edge and a firm texture. The wine has weight while also keeping a fine poise with the final acidity.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Ripe and forward in tropical fruit, green apple, pear and peach flavors, this Viognier also is marked by brisk acidity and a deft touch of oak. Slightly off-dry, it's one of the more balanced Viogniers out there, a nice companion to Asian fare.",Estate,Kunde
"A pretty, polished Grenache, balanced and savory. Shows a Pinot Noir-like delicacy in the mouth, with cherry and red plum fruit, leading to a slightly sweet finish. Drink now for it's freshness.",,Jaffurs
"Very floral and citrusy, with lime and orange sherbet notes and hints of green apple and white pepper. It also shows good length for such an inexpensive drop. Drink now.",The Y Series,Yalumba
"Fourteen years in wood have given a wine that shows dried fruit, a definite old-toast character, along with nuts, licorice and intense acidity. The alcohol gives a burn to the wine and does hide some of the richness.",Colheita Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"A Bordeaux-style blend from the extra barrels in the multi-wine Long Shadows lineup, this nicely proportioned wine includes 54% Cabernet Sauvignon, 24% Merlot, and smaller amounts of Cab Franc, Petit Verdot and Malbec. Superb vineyard sources__einbau, Wallula, Champoux and StoneTree__long with aging in new French oak marks this as a wine with high-end aspirations. Smoky, oaky, textural and complex.",Red Wine,Nine Hats
"Starts out smelling charred and heavy, but with time the bouquet softens and shows aromas of smoky berry and fresh brewed coffee. Feels grippy and resiny, but healthy, with herb-infused flavors of blackberry, spice, clove and tobacco. Long, winding and oaky on the finish. Drink now through 2013.",Crianza,Obalo
"A butter-smooth and rounded wine. Its pear and ripe apple fruits are contrasted with a layer of wood and crisp acidity. It opens up to give richness, weight and delicious final yellow fruit flavors on the finish.",Rabource Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"With 20 months spent in new French oak, this is a lush and woody wine, with assertive aromas and flavors of sweet spice, vanilla and coffee accenting the black plum and berry fruit core. Round and full in the mouth, with a texture like crushed satin and a long, sweet oak-driven finish.",Secret Reserve,Shiloh Winery
"Fleshy yellow peach and honey-sweet tangerine flavors are deeply concentrated in Red Newt's rich, almost velvety, Lahoma Vineyards Riesling. It's focused and clean on the palate, with a kick of freshly picked herbs and crisp fennel on the finish.",Lahoma Vineyards,Red Newt Cellars
"Strikingly dry, with a mouthwatering pucker of quince and lime, Red Newt's Sawmill Creek Vineyard is full of verve and focus, but also significant body and texture. Fragrant with abundant aromas of white blossoms and zesty citrus, it finishes on a deliciously steely, petrol-tinged note.",Sawmill Creek Vineyards,Red Newt Cellars
"Traditional in style and approachable, with aromas of brick dust, dried berry, tobacco and leather. Feels flush and just concentrated enough, while the flavors of baked berry, sweet plum and earth work well together. Finishes round and solid. A very good value.",Reserva,Raiza
"Animale's newest Petite Sirah includes 15% Cabernet Franc in the blend, a welcome addition that adds some dried herbs to the mix of bright berries and earthy tannins. It's dark, powerful red wine, from a cool site in a warm vintage.",,Animale
"Shows plenty of good Cabernet varietal character in the blackberry and black currant flavors, with savory cherry and violet notes that must come from additions of Cabernet Franc and Merlot. The all-important tannins are super soft and mellow, while acidity also is soft. Enjoy this decadent wine now and through 2015.",,Signorello
"Clean, minerally, slightly green in aromatics and oh so approachable and nice. For an under-$15 white, this Godello from Monterrei excels with layered flavors of apple, minerals and natural spice. The finish is long and hints at fresh herbs like thyme and tarragon. Potentially superb with garlic shrimp or calamari over fresh greens.",Pazo de Monterrey,Pazos del Rey
"The Loureiro is the grape of the Lima Valley subregion in Vinho Verde. The texture of the wine is rounded and creamy, although the crisp green fruits give a great bright lift to this delicious, fresh wine.",,Quinta do Ameal
"This is a flashy Chardonnay, marked by scads of oak that contributes buttered toast and vanilla cream. You find rich fruit flavors of pineapples and golden mangoes, but they struggle to overcome the barrel influence. Still, there's no denying the opulence. Drink now.",,Vine Cliff
"A finely structured wine, very firm, with a dark edge of tannins over ripe black fruit. The wine is concentrated and dense, still developing and showing great final juicy character.",Les Charmes,Domaine Pral
"Despite appealing raspberry and cherry-pie filling, cola and spice notes, this Pinot is a bit hard and even green, with some tomato notes. The acidity is brisk, the tannins thick. Give it 4_6 years in the cellar, and it is likely to develop over a decade.",Selleck Vineyard,Calera
"A lovely Blanc de Blancs, bright and satisfying in lime, vanilla and toast flavors, with the yeasty complexity of a fine sparkling wine. Gains extra points for the smooth quality of the bubbles.",Blanc de Blancs,Gloria Ferrer
"From its bright floral nose to its soft, sweet finish, there's a gorgeous femininity to this outstanding Riesling. Dry in style but accented by notes of pink grapefruit and lychee, Magdalena's daintiness is kept in check with a bracing acidity and elegant white tea astringency.",Magdalena Vineyard Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Saint-Croix-du-Mont is on the slopes across the Garonne river from Sauternes. In years like 2005, it can produce some fine sweet botrytis wines. This has honey, a bite of botrytis and a great lemon edge. Worth aging, but ready to drink now.",,Château La Rame
"A dense and complex wine, packed with ripe fruit while preserving an elegant demeanor. The tannins are dry, while the sweet fruit is developing well. Balanced, just waiting a year or so to show its best.",Cuvée Prestige,Château Suau
"Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon are blended beautifully to produce a wine that shows bright fruit flavors, integrated acidity, fine tannins and a soft cherry finale. It's almost as if you can taste the basic component of each variety used in this super Tuscan expression.",Tricorno,Castello di Poppiano
"A beautiful Cabernet for drinking now and over the next few years. It's dry and fine, with appealing blackberry, black currant, herb and cedar flavors all the way through the finish. Excellent price for a Cab of this quality. Easy to find with 36,000 cases produced.",,Benziger
"One of the most distinctive among Adelsheim's single-vineyard Pinot Noirs, the Calkins Lane bottling does not shy away from earthy, herbal flavors, including forest floor, truffle and wet leaf. But there's plenty of fruit, a mix of ripe red apple, pomegranate, wild cherry and plum.",Calkins Lane Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Light and aromatic, this delicate and poised wine seduces with lush aromas of cherries and baking spices. It has the elegance that only fine Pinot Noir can express. Here the subtleties have been coaxed into rich expression, with details of spice and incense and chocolate truffles adding to the lingering finish.",Bench Lands,Brandborg
"Tightly wound, with big, edgy tannins that accentuate the acidity. Underneath you'll find dry, elegant flavors of tart cherries, red currants and violets. A polished, pretty wine that could pick up some nuances over the next 2_3 years.",Jack London Vineyard,Kenwood
"This new, well priced wine represents a partnership between the Franceschi family in Montalcino, Tuscany and Terlato in Napa. The rich blend sees Sangiovese paired with Merlot and the wine offers very nice density and purity of fruit, spice and floral aromas.",Mazzoni,Il Poggione
"A very pretty rosé, one of the most attractive on the market. Made from Pinot Noir, it's light and delicate, with polished raspberry, tangerine zest, rose petal, vanilla, gingersnap cookie and cinnamon spice flavors.",Barn Owl Blush Pink Wine,Kynsi
"Rooty, warm and leathery at first, and then it really rounds into form. This Garnacha-led multigrape blend is a pretty, earthy, stylish wine that's at peak maturity. It brings baked, rich black cherry, cola and toffee flavors and then a finish of coffee and toast. A bit syrupy but still excellent and ready now.",Selecció Vinyes Velles,Martí Fabra
"A taut and mineral wine, with intense acidity followed by peach flavors. The wine successfully manages   to combine a crisp edge and rich fruit, with delicious results.",Les Coûtes,Pascal & Nicolas Reverdy
"A great buy in a smooth, dry Merlot that shows real Napa elegance and style. It's medium-bodied and lush, with appealing cherry, currant, licorice, tobacco, mocha and spice flavors. Drink now for the immediate appeal.",,Napa Cellars
"Here's a Tuscan expression of Cabernet Franc that offers warm, dark concentration and bold aromas of black berry fruit and spice. There's also a nice mineral component here that lends structure and a sensation of dryness.",,Vignamaggio
"White pear, melon and almond skin aromas are good and correct, while the peachy palate has roundness and interesting flavors of orange, lime and nectarine. Crisp, precise and well-glued together, with harmony throughout. A textbook food-friendly white that's more interesting than other Rías Baixas wines due to the addition of Loureira and Caiño Blanco to traditional Albariño.",O Rosal,Terras Gauda
"Soft-textured wine, with an edge of minerality, this is deliciously rich, while presenting plenty of fresh acidity. It is ripe, full in the mouth, an explosion of white and yellow fruits, with a great burst of acidity.",Guadalupe Selection Branco,Quinta do Quetzal
"Roasted and baked on first blush, but then the wine's complexity and use of unusual Mallorcan grape varieties take over. Along the way there's flavors and aromas of prune, earth, leather, spice and Mediterranean terroir. It's also bringing tobacco and leaf notes to the table. A fun, different wine that goes nicely with tapas. Drink now through 2011_12.",_N/2,_nima Negra
"Made from Pinot Noir, although the color is golden straw, and the wine is light and airy in the mouth. The raspberry and strawberry flavors are the giveaway. Absolutely delicious, with a refined mouthfeel, and the price is a bargain.",Blanc de Noirs,Chandon
"Here's a curiosity, a fortified Tannat, made in the style of a Port. The acidity and tannins make a definite connection with the grape, while the mineral edge is close to the terroir. It has sweet blackberry juice flavors followed with richness.",Maydie Tannat Vintage,Château d'Aydie
"Although there is an obvious wood element, it doesn't intrude too much into the fine and concentrated fruit of this spicy, juicy wine, the top cuvée from Cénac. There is an attractive smoky character alongside dry and dusty tannins, although the wine reveals a richer character as it opens up.",Eulalie,Château de Cénac
"Big and firm, the tannins dark and dominant, this is a wine in transition from fruity to mature. The structure, spice, dried fruits and chocolate is emerging at the moment. Give it 2_3 years for its impressive character to open.",,Château de Ferrand
"This 50-50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot opens with a powerful blast of church incense, dried roses, spice, scented candle, blackberry and mature black cherry. The tannins are firm and textured, so give this wine another three to five years of cellar aging.",Adèo,Campo alla Sughera
"A smooth-textured wine that shows some ripe Merlot, firm fruit tannins and soft spice. There is an edge of wood, but the fruit is bright enough to cope. It should develop well into a rich wine.",,Château Roylland
"This is an uncomplicated, delicious Pinot Noir. What you taste is what you get. It's all about flashy raspberry, strawberry and cherry jam, toasted oak and spice flavors, wrapped into Pinot's inimitably silky texture.",,Balletto
"Sourced equally from Ciel du Cheval and Ranch at the End of the Road vineyards on Red Mountain, this offers bright, fresh berry-laden fruit flavors, leading into a black cherry core enhanced with pretty spices and a whiff of chocolate. The tannins are proportionate but relatively light for this appellation.",La Côte Rousse,Betz Family
"This is all Pepper Bridge fruit, a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Merlot. Nice fruit flavors of cherries and cassis roll into a lightly peppery wine with a mix of barrel toast flavors and a textural midpalate.",Constrictor Red,Balboa
"Warm, creamy, rich and beautifully intense, Laud_ri is a compelling expression of Chardonnay from Sicily, with bold aromas of stone fruit, pineapple, butter and toasted almond. Pair this wine with baked white fish.",Laud_ri,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Dusty cocoa and tree bark notes lead the nose, with additional supporting characteristics of black licorice, jerky, cigar box and tar. Mulled boysenberry and blackberry fruit forms the center. Bold and expressive, this fairly intense wine shows excellent concentration and depth of flavors. Pair with similarly assertive red-meat entrées.",Appellation Old Vines,Carmel
"There's a richness to this wine, exhibited through oak-driven, vanilla-infused blackberry aromas, that's lifted by complex accents of anise, leather and cigar box. It's concentrated but approachable with a crushed satin texture to the mouth and a cherry-skin and mocha edge to the flavorful finish.",Kayoumi Single Vineyard,Carmel
"Cantodoro is a blend of Nero d'Avola (80%) and Cabernet Sauvignon that is packed tight with bright fruit and pretty shadings of exotic spice and tobacco. It's a balanced, fresh red wine that would pair well with roast chicken or beef.",Cantodoro,Feudo Arancio
"Lightly herbal on the nose, but otherwise it's ripe and ready to go. The feel is slightly tannic and tight, but it's as fresh and healthy as can be. Flavors of raspberry, red plum and mild spice are comported and correct. Finishes long, with vigor. Drink now through 2014.",Torremilanos,Finca Torremilanos
"Cavanera is an elegant, lively red wine with forest berry, wild mushroom, talcum powder, exotic spice and cola notes. The mouthfeel is long, dusty and dry.",Cavanera,Firriato
"Cavanera is Firriato's Mount Etna estate, and its flagship wine, Cavanera, is a traditional blend of Nerello Mascalese and Nerello Cappuccio. It offers small berry aromas of wild strawberry and raspberry with drying nuances of talcum power and crushed stone.",Cavanera,Firriato
"Whole and typical of Chile on the nose, with aromas of eucalyptus, spice, berry, plum and leather. Full, structured and tannic in the mouth, with herbal blackberry, tobacco and cola flavors. Spicy and integrated on the finish; Carmenère, Cabernet, Petit Verdot and Cab Franc.",Gold Carménère-Cabernet Sauvignon-Petit Verdot-Cabernet Franc,Estampa
"Rich and flashy, this Grenache is one of the better evocations of the variety, which is a difficult one to master. It dazzles with black raspberry jam and white chocolate flavors that are balanced with fine acidity and tannins. Drink now for freshness.",,Dragonette
"Toasty smelling, with a hint of burnt banana chip, vanilla and roasted nuts. Round and mouthfilling for a fino, with toasty, nutty flavors followed by dry apricot and mild citrus. Focused on the finish, and lightly nutty as it fades away.",Fino Jerez Seco,Hidalgo
"Maurigi's top wine, this dark Petite Verdot offers black fruit, prune, plum, barbecue smoke and steak sauce notes. The Etna environment appears to have added a darker and rich quality to the overall bouquet.",Tenuta di Budonetto Lù,Maurigi
"Ripe yellow peach, apple and a hint of honeydew fill the nose and mouth, along with a soft kiss of toasted oak and sweet spice. The medium weight mouth is balanced and full, leading into vibrant acidity that lifts the finish. A beautiful dried and spiced orange-peel flavor lingers on the finish.",Yarden Katzrin,Golan Heights Winery
"A full-bodied, unctuous wine, packed with ripe peach and apricot fruit. The wood aging gives an extra sweetness to this rounded wine. It is nicely textured, with spice and a smooth, creamy finish.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Lean and crisp to the point of being ungenerous at this point in time, give this reticent Clare Riesling 3_4 years to loosen up. Right now, there's not a lot of fruit to be found, just hints of paraffin and tart green apples.",Mort's Block Watervale,Kilikanoon
"A very intense Pinot Noir, fresh and concentrated in jammy cherries, raspberries and plums. It's what the French call nerveux, tense in acidity and a little tight now, but balanced. Give it a year or two in the bottle.",,Gainey
"This is Geyser Peak's best Merlot in quite a while, a wine of real elegance and charm despite the everyday price. The cherry, red currant and oak flavors are plump, with a pleasant earthiness, and the mouthfeel is gentle in tannins. Decant for an hour before pouring.",,Geyser Peak
"Opens with aromas of moss, baked blackberry and dried cheese. Turns creamy and deep in the mouth, with soft, jammy tannins. Tastes of herbs, thyme, lightly baked black plum and carob. Long, earthy, herbal and cuddly on the finish. Soft on acidity; drink now through 2013.",Garage Wine,Lafken
"A great price for a solid example of Eden Valley Riesling. Lime sherbet and talcum powder define the aromas, and green apple joins in on the palate. It's crisp, dry and nicely textured, with a hint of iodine on the finish.",Mount Crawford Estate Grown Single Vineyard,Thorn Clarke
"From a difficult vintage, this is an impressively youthful wine, loaded with bold cherry fruit that's vibrant, fresh and clean, with shadings of coffee-tinged oak on the silky finish. For drinking now and over the next few years.",Reserve,Villa Maria
"It's really easy to drink this fine Cabernet. It's not an ager or anything like that, but it's rich, ripe in sweet blackberry, blueberry and cocoa flavors, and balanced in acidity and smooth tannins. It just feels fine in the mouth.",,Martin Ray
"Dark and smoky, this rather heavy-set Grenache has a chocolaty note from start to finish. The raspberry and black cherry fruit is tight but substantial, and the barrel aging_21 months in 20% new French oak__andled just right.",,Ott & Murphy
"An intriguing effort, black as coal, thick and pungent, with generous aromas of loam and funk. The fruit is ripe enough, but the standout scents and flavors run to funk and loam. The wine lingers through a long finish, with tannins that call to mind herbal tea.",Reserve,Pondera
"This is a very good Cabernet. It's made in a drinkable style, with jammy blackberry, blueberry and cherry flavors, and a sweet, toasty coating of new French oak. Drink this flashy wine now and over the next six years.",Reserve Selection,Raymond
"Impressively textured, this is the second wine of Quinta da Romaneira. It brings out black fruit, acidity and a well balanced layer of tannins. It's a wine that will age over the short-term, but is already delicious to drink.",Sino da Romaneira,Quinta da Romaneira
"A mineral driven, ripe wine that reveals green and white fruits, a strong line of acidity and steely minerality. With all this structure, the wine still shows the richness of the vintage, with wood and cream flavors that come through at the end.",Les Gresigny Premier Cru,Chartron et Trébuchet
"An assertive cured game and sweet smoke streak permeates the bouquet of this single site Shiraz. It's round but structured in the mouth, with fine yet firm tannins and lifting acidity. Fresh black-fruit flavors of plum and cherry abound in the mouth, while a fudgy flavor stays after swallow.",Kayoumi Single Vineyard,Carmel
"Opens in good form, with aromas of blackberry, rubber and earth. Feels a touch chunky and heavy, but it's easygoing and offers full flavors of berry fruits, rubber, hoisin sauce and fig. Finishes smooth and round; drink now.",Reserva,Condado de Oriza
"A smooth and velvet-textured wine, where the tannins are a cushion for the ripe plum juice fruit. Herbs and wood spice contribute to this rich and full-bodied wine.",,Château Fonguillon
"This 60-40 super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese and Merlot offers a smooth and clean quality of berry fruit, cassis and raspberry. You'll also recognize spice, leather, tobacco and soft chocolate fudge on the close.",Salicaria,Fattoria di Grignano
"Duemani is known for its high quality organic and biodynamic wines from Tuscany. This hearty expression of Cab Franc shows wonderful intensity with dark aromas of blackberry, black cherry, crushed pepper and polished river stone. The wine is firm and and focused with finely textured tannins.",,Duemani
"This elegant blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon shows the best of both varieties. Aromas include red berry, violets, wet earth, spice, tobacco and leather. The wine is soft and enduring in the mouth with polished, smooth tannins.",White Label,I Balzini
"Montepaone is a classic expression of Cabernet that shows enormous focus on elegance and harmony despite the hot vintage. The wine feels streamlined and tight on the palate, but the intensity of its fruit and spice aromas comes forward slowly and consistency on the bouquet.",Montepaone,Jacopo Biondi-Santi
"A fortified red wine blend of Cab Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Merlot, the alcohol is a Port-like 19.2%. This is dark and substantial, with allspice, clove and cinnamon infusing fig- and plum-flavored fruit. The residual sugar is 6% but the sweetness is not at all overpowering, thanks to the excellent spirit (no burn) and the dense tannins. Try it with figs stuffed with bleu cheese and walnuts.",Mundo Novo,Madrone Mountain
"Fifty percent Cabernet Sauvignon is enhanced by Merlot and Petit Verdot to produce a dark and compelling super Tuscan blend with structure, lively fruit and long lasting flavors of cherry and exotic spice. Pair this wine with veal encrusted with finely chopped pistachio nuts.",Colpetroso,Massi di Mandorlaia
"A wine only made in the best years, this is rich, softly textured, opulent and ripe wine. It is a powerful statement of sweet plums, arabica coffee, dark tannins, immense rich concentration.",Escultor,Monte do Pintor
"A wonderfully drinkable sparkling wine that appeals immediately for its balanced texture and rich flavors. Easy to like for its array of raspberries, limes, vanilla, toast and yeast. The sour lees note is nicely balanced with the sweet liqueur of dosage.",Sonoma Brut,Gloria Ferrer
"A lovely, refined sparkler from Tasmania (hence the 42 Degrees South name), this blend of 60% Chardonnay and 40% Pinot Noir is toasty and leesy, marked by savory mushroom and bright citrus notes and a long finish. Light and frothy in feel, it would make a fine apéritif.",42°S Premier Cuvee,Frogmore Creek
"Big and dark, its fruit dominated by bone-dry tannins, this is anything but petit (little). The density of the texture is balanced on a structure of the dark fruits, black plums and chocolate, with a fresh line of acidity holding it all in place.",Clos Triguedina Petit Clos,Jean-Luc Baldès
"This very special property in Bolgheri includes one of Italy's most important experimental vineyards. Among the various wines made here, this super Tuscan blend opens with plush berry and spice notes as well as leather, roasted almond and ground clove.",Guado al Melo Rosso,Podere Guado al Melo
"It's difficult to understand why Pinot Blanc has not become more of a cult wine in Oregon. Producers such as Ponzi make it in a style that is bright, bursting with citrus and apple fruit flavors, and elevated with a rose garden's worth of floral highlights. This wine would be a perfect start to a holiday meal.",,Ponzi
"This Syrah is marked by rich, extracted flavors. It's strong in blackberries, cherries and raspberries, coated with lots of smoky, caramelized oak. The deliciousness factor is very high. Drink now for decadent youthfulness.",Susan's Hill Vineyard,Novy
"Made in a lighter style, this wine is nonetheless rich and complex in flavor, proving that Pinot Noir doesn't have to be heavy to be really good. It's dry and spicy, with raspberry, cherry, red licorice and Dr. Pepper flavors. Drink now.",,Paradise Ridge
"A darkly tannic wine, very mineral, tasting of the granite Dão soil. The wine is taut, fresh with black currants, its structure a major element. For aging 3_4 years.",Serrado Colheita,Quinta do Serrado
"Pure and forward, with minerally aromas of citrus, grapefruit and wet stone. For basic Verdejo, this is head and shoulders above most; it bursts with fresh orange, grapefruit, green apple and peach, and the finish is pure and long. So tasty and super easy to like; a highly recommended go-to value white.",,Naia
"Six Sigma's Tempranillo continues to be one of the most interesting bottlings of this Spanish variety in California. This '06, like its predecessors, is dry and medium-bodied, and shows a pleasant combination of cherry fruit brightened with fine acidity and wrapped into ripe, smooth tannins. It hints at complex notes of hummus, olives, smoked meat and anise. Try now as an offbeat alternative to a big Russian River Valley Pinot Noir.",,Six Sigma Ranch
"Classic tannic Dão Touriga Nacional, packed with minerality, dark and dry tannins, firm and with a good juicy final character. Part of a range of wines from across the country under the name Azul Portugal.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"An extravagant Chardonnay, rich in buttered toast and vanilla cream from oak barrels, and opulent fruit flavors of ripe, sweet pineapples, golden mangoes and pears. The sur lie aging shows up in a creamy, yeasty richness. Holding this wine for a year or two will not harm it.",Quail Hill Vineyard,Lynmar
"There is dense chocolate and sweet berry flavors in this still young wine, its complex density still working its way through the solid fruit flavors and richness. It is powerful, yet still elegant.",Reserva,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"Big, broad and ripe, with an opulent texture, flavors of black plums. along with soft tannins and a smooth surface. The wine is developing well, offering rich fruit that will deepen in a couple of years.",,Château l'Enclos
"Wonderful herbaceous aromas shout Sauvignon Blanc. There is also a tropical element in the ripe fruit of this fine, cleanly fresh wine. It has good density, a layer of minerality and a shot of bright final acidity.",,Château de Tracy
"Soft and almost sweet in jammy, pie-filling raspberries and cherries. It's luxuriously soft and silky, with polished tannins, and lots of people will love it. Would benefit from greater depth and complexity, but it sure is lovely. Drink now.",Gold Coast Vineyard Reserva Oro Rojo,Costa de Oro
"Almost black in color, this is a concentrated powerhouse of black plum, damsons and dark berry fruits. It is explosively rich and densely structured, with intense juicy fruit.",Grand'Arte,DFJ Vinhos
"Foglio 38 (a pure expression of Cabernet Franc) offers loads of black fruit intensity and lingering spice. There are green characteristics here of caper, herbs and black olive as well as fruity tones of blackberry and plum. In the mouth, the wine shows firm, gripping tannins that will soften with a few more years in the bottle.",Foglio 38,Fornacelle
"Amity's dry Gewürztraminer is one of Oregon's finest, and a major strength of the winery. In this new vintage it shows broad and rich flavors, that run the spectrum from floral and spicy to sweetly honeyed. It's dry, make no mistake, but carries an impression of fruit sweetness. The deepening gold color suggests some early oxidation, and the caramel and toasted grain flavors are already at their peak.",Sunnyside Vineyard Dry,Amity Vineyards
"Another successful Marinus from this small Monterey County appellation. Made from all five classic Bordeaux varieties, it's dry and rich in blackberries, black currants, crème de cassis and cedar, and is more rough in tannins than your typical Napa Cabernet blend. Drink now_2013.",Marinus,Bernardus
"Young, tart and vividly bright, this spicy wine brings Asian pear and cool citrus flavors to the forefront. It holds well through a lingering finish, with a crisp, piercing, phenolic grip reminiscent of grapefruit rind.",Bryan Creek Vineyard,Adelsheim
"On the Atlantic coast, south of Lisbon, the Herdade da Comporta style is rich, soft wines, generous in their warm tannins. The 2007 shows ripe fruit, figs, chocolate and plum flavors and dense texture.",,Herdade da Comporta
"Impressive for a simple Chablis. In fact, it is not simple at all, with its toast and ripe peach fruits, rounded texture and uncommon depth of flavor. The steely Chablis character is there, but surrounded by rich fruit.",La Champréaux,Domaine Vrignaud
"Sweet, ripe and jammy in cherries, raspberries and blackberries, this small-production Rhône blend is made from six vineyards between Santa Barbara and Paso Robles. It's a direct, forward wine for drinking now.",Seven,Dragonette
"Tartly autumnal flavors emphasize mountain berries, dried leaves and forest floor accents. A streak of vanilla, a whiff of caramel and generous, juicy acidity elevate the mouthfeel. From young vines, with great potential.",Mary's Block Windrow Vineyard,Flying Trout
"Scents of sweet grain run into a mélange of Syrah scents and accents__lackberry pastry, moist loam, balsamic and lead penci__ll nicely structured and balanced. This seems lighter than past vintages, with a quick fade, but it is all in proportion and offers interesting complexity.",Les Collines Vineyard,Amavi
"A Port-like nose sends up scents of raisins and prunes soaked in chocolate. The wine is thick, dark and tannic, evoking the Barrister house style and the heavier tannins of the Red Mountain vineyard site. Just a hint of green stem creeps into the finish.",Artz Vineyard,Barrister
"Another solid Chardonnay from Gloria, continuing a string of recent successes. At more than three years of age, the wine is holding nicely, with oak, buttered toast, pineapple, crême brulée and custard spice flavors, brightened with exceptionally brisk acidity.",,Gloria Ferrer
"Hourglass's Merlot has not been as rewarding a wine as their Cabernet Sauvignon, and this 2009 shows the difficulties the variety so often encounters. It's quite good, rich and firm and dry, with complex blackberry, plum, dark chocolate, anise and sandalwood flavors. But the tannins are tougher than they should be, and the wine doesn't have the stuffing to age. Decant and drink up.",Blueline Vineyard,Hourglass
"Seems somewhat developed for a 2010 Riesling, showing hints of honey and toast alongside lime and petrol notes. Rounder and less angular than the Mort's Block, this seems ready to drink now.",Mort's Reserve Watervale,Kilikanoon
"With its red currant fruit and layered tannins, this is a full-bodied, solidly structured wine. It has fine, ripe juicy acidity to go with the firm finish. The wine could age for 2_3 years, but is ready to drink now.",Reserva,Kopke
"A lovely Chardonnay that straddles a welcome balance between ripeness and holding back. Made unoaked, it stars ripe Alexander Valley fruit, with pineapple, Meyer lemon, tangerine and tropical fruit flavors, brightened with acidity, and finishing dry and spicy.",La Nude,Summers
"Alcamo is one of the best areas in Sicily for white wine production. This creamy blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Catarratto opens with honey, apricot and Golden Delicious apple. The mouthfeel is rich and dense, and you can feel the smooth texture glide across the palate.",Cielo d'Alcamo,Tenuta Rapital_
This barrel-fermented SB opens with a rich vanilla nose and then gets delicately tropical without overdoing it. A very fine example of Lake County's ability to grow nicely mannered Sauvignon Blanc and Six Sigma's deftly achieved balancing act between crisp and creamy.,Michael's Vineyard,Six Sigma Ranch
Terre di Giurfo is worth keeping an eye on. It specialized in Frappato and Nero d'Avola. This oak-aged wine opens with inky dark concentration and ripe blackberry and cherry notes.,Kunt_ri,Terre di Giurfo
"Benanti's Etna red opens with earthy tones of terracotta, dark chocolate, roasted espresso and crème de cassis. There's a gritty, thick feel to the tannins and the overall structure.",Rosso di Verzella,Benanti
"Brimming with ripe boysenberry and blueberry compote aromas and complemented by a fudgy chocolate streak, this Syrah is lush and decadent, with good balance and an approachable yet mouth-filling structure. Flecks of black pepper and coffee grinds linger on the medium-length close.",,Alexander
"Sourced from the Gibbston subregion, this is a fresh, zesty Pinot Noir, perhaps slightly leafy, but also amply endowed with bright cherry fruit. The finish delivers tart, lingering notes of berry zinger tea, plus a hint of dark coffee. Drink now_2018.",,Hawkshead
"Here's a luscious Zinfandel to drink now. It's rich in tannins and brisk in acidity, with savory blackberry, blueberry, pepper, cinnamon, anise and sandalwood flavors. Textbook Sonoma Zin for drinking with barbecue.",,Buena Vista
"Intensely floral, with scents of gardenia and tea roses, Dr. Frank's semidry Riesling is intense in peach and apricot flavors, but bristles with a tart apple-skin bite and nervy acidity. Long on the finish, with a lingering fruit-and-floral perfume.",Semi Dry,Dr. Konstantin Frank
"Saia is a plump and modern expression of Nero d'Avola that opens with a richly concentrated appearance and intense aromas of black cherry, brown sugar, cola and toasted oak. There's a vinous, raw quality that should integrate with two or three more years of bottle aging.",Saia,Feudo Maccari
"This bright edition of L_vico opens with bright fruit aromas of blueberry and dried raspberry, followed closely by crushed mineral and light shadings of exotic spice.",Vajasindi L_vico,Duca di Salaparuta
"Cerasuolo di Vittoria is a fresh, compact and lean red wine that can pair with white meat or shellfish. You can also serve the wine slightly chilled in warmer months. The bouquet shows layers of blue flower, mineral, cola and wild berry fruit.",,COS
"A fresh wine, with red berry fruit and fine acidity. It has a firm core of tannins balanced with the fruit. The wine, made from 20-year-old vines, is likely to be ready to drink in the next two years.",Quinta das Tecedeiras Flor de Tecedeiras,Dão Sul
"While initially quite dry, almost bony on the palate, this bang for your buck Riesling intensifies on the midpalate with rich tones of white peach, fresh apple and white pepper spice. Nervy and fresh with lime inflected acidity, it calls out for a soft, creamy, cow's milk cheese.",,Cave Spring
"It's a pleasure to see a Cold Creek Cabernet Franc once again, here blended with 17% Cabernet Sauvignon. Forward, young and showing plenty of new oak, not yet fully integrated, it has enormous potential, based on the tight purple and black fruit that is considerably masked at the moment. Give this one some years in the cellar, and it should reward you.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Intoxicating on the nose, with super-sized fruit and floral aromatics, this slightly off-dry Riesling from Bloomer Creek is proof positive of just how ripe the 2010 Finger Lakes vintage was. Surprisingly complex on the palate, it reveals itself in layers of tea leaves and potpourri, crushed stones, and bracing orange-tinged acidity.",Tanzen Dame Auten Vineyard 1st Harvest VS Dry,Bloomer Creek
"Gets going with rooty, spicy aromas along with baked plum scents and fresh berry accents. Feels racy, tight and snappy, with dry spice, tomato, tobacco, pepper and raspberry comprising the flavors. Finishes focused, spicy and crisp; fresh and traditional in style.",Reserva,Carlos Serres
"Thoroughly delicious, this seamlessly integrated, palate-coating Merlot matches pretty berry fruit to impressive barrel flavors. Coffee, toffee and chocolate are there in abundance, smoothing out dusty tannins and adding a suggestion of sweetness.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Basically a second label of Seresin, this is a medium-bodied, crisp Pinot Noir with bright cherry-berry fruit, a slightly briary, peppery quality and hints of button mushroom. It should drink well for the next few years.",,Momo
"Tasted prerelease, but this is already showing very pretty cherry fruit at its core. Stevens is one of a handful of Washington wineries to showcase the very best central Yakima Valley vineyards exclusively, and this compact, tannic wine nicely captures the strengths of the valley, the grapes and the vintage. Details of bark and spice suggest that further bottle age will continue to improve it.",StevensFranc,Stevens
"If you're unfamiliar with Charbono, it's kind of like Petite Sirah in its inky color, thick tannins and full-bodied mouthfeel. Summers' 2009 is a big wine, bone dry and modest in alcohol, with deep blackberry, grilled meat and black pepper flavors. It's a good barbecue wine that will probably live for 20 years.",Villa Andriana Vineyard,Summers
"Both the high alcohol and the heavy bottle detract from what is a rich but balanced wine. It shows great concentration, dense texture, a powerful statement of the ripe fruit of the Alentejo. It's hard to seeing it aging much more than two years.",Grande Rocim Reserva,Herdade do Rocim
"Tightly wound, with oak sticking out, big tannins and a solid inner core of vibrant, red cherry and red currant fruit. There's a fine wine in here, but it just needs a few years to come out. Drink 2011_2014.",Reserve,Kunde
"Here's a modern and plump blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon that opens with a blast of fresh blackberry, blueberry and sweet exotic spice. In the background are integrated notes of clove and ginger and the wine shows both acidity and good structure.",Trasgaia,Tenuta Villa Trasqua
"With its aromas of tropical fruits, this is a rich wine. There is also a fine streak of minerality, spiked with lemon juice and textured with green plum skins. It is fresh, full and very dry.",Cuvée Florès,Vincent Pinard
"The structure is the thing here, a square, firmly tannic wine. The dry core of this impressive wine spreads out to the dark plum skin and loganberry flavors, solid and finely angled.",Colheita,Vinha Paz
"A selection of estate, Tualatin and Elton vineyard fruit, this carries the style of those wines to a more refined, high-toned level. The fruit is a bit more complex, and highlighted with baking spice, incense and toasted nuts. Just under 14% alcohol, it retains the essential character of the elegant Pinot Noir grape, but pushes it to a point where some heat comes into the finish.",Signature Cuvée,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"Richness alone would earn this Zinfandel a good score, but the overall balance uplifts it. It's simply delicious in wild berry, spice, mocha, salty bacon, vanilla toast and sandalwood flavors. Yet the tannins are fine, and the acidity is perfect. Even the slightly sweet finish and high alcohol work.",Sawyer Vineyard,Wilson
"From the far north of the Vinho Verde region, the rich and creamy wine balances acidity, green plum and crisp minerality. Aromatic, elegant, fresh.",Touquinheiras,Wines & Winemakers
"This wine does a nice job balancing its tropical fruit aromas and flavors with leafy, green notes. Ripe nectarine and grapefruit lie at the core, while herbal flourishes garnish the nose and finish.",,Saveé Sea
"This is an impressive, oak-aged expression of Vermentino in a world that usually sees this variety fermented in a simple, fresh manner. This wine has a bigger ideal in mind: To be an important Italian white and it achieves its objective beautifully. Pair it with lobster or white meat.",Papeo,Terre del Marchesato
"A great, concentrated wine, rich, with a burnt almond character and delicious acidity. It keeps some freshness while showing a fine sense of maturity.",Roncão 20-Year-Old Tawny,Borges
"The Bacalhôa quinta is more famed for its Cabernet-based red. Here Sémillon and Sauvignon Blanc continue the Bordeaux connection. A superrich wine, although the creamy, full texture is beautifully balanced with a good layer of citrus. Full-bodied, stylish.",Quinta da Bacalhôa Branco,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon are the base of this well concentrated and ripe super Tuscan blend. Aromas of cherry, raspberry, blueberry and hints of clove, smoke and cured meat make for a beautiful bouquet. The mouthfeel is equally smooth and complex.",Palpito,La Colombina
"Nice black cherry and black currant fruit flavors are wrapped in a casing of stone and earth. This wine seems to be holding itself back, perhaps just in need of further cellaring, certainly requiring decanting. It's compact, elegant and well balanced, but shy. A pleasing streak of truffle elevates the finish.",Estate Vineyard,Lange
"A picture perfect Sauvignon Blanc. Really defines the variety in California, with rich, ripe tangerine, pear, green melon and vanilla spice flavors, brightened with brisk acidity. Shows a lot of complexity and class, and look at that price. Easy to find, with 15,000 cases produced.",Pinnacles Ranches,Estancia
"Here's a small producer with a vineyard and bed & breakfast in coastal Tuscany that proves to be a promising newcomer. This 60-40 blend of Cabernet and Syrah (aged in cement tanks and barrique) shows dark, inky notes of black fruit and graphite. The fruit is succulent, rich and the wine shows a big, bold style.",Clarice,Eucaliptus
"This is a Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend with Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Sangiovese that shows wonderful aromas of cherry and blueberry. The wine is soft, tight and fresh: It would make a perfect companion to braised lamb shanks with a hint or rosemary and mint.",,Grattamacco
"Powerful, concentrated wine, whose tannins fold well around the berry fruits, acidity and sweet plum juice flavors. It is solid and chunky, full of ripe flavors and bold acidity. Worth aging for 1_2 years.",Grand'Arte,DFJ Vinhos
"Deep colored, wood aged Malbec that gives powerful and dense tannins and concentrated black berry and plum flavors. The wine is deeply mineral, edging on austere, but still packed with richness for the future. Keep 3_4 years.",K Lys,Clos Troteligotte
"An aromatic wine, its sweet texture pushed through with ripe apricot jelly, a liquor-like botrytis texture and intense, perfumed acidity throughout. There is a long, lingering ripe aftertaste.",Séduction,Château de Jurque
"An impressively structured wine, full of concentrated fruit and tannins. It shows ripe plums, layered with chocolate, spice and a hint of pepper, finished with wood. It needs aging 3_4 years.",Vieilles Vignes,Château de Minière
"A big, fruity bold wine, packed with the ripest fruit, concentrated and complex, with room for tight acidity. It has citrus and green plum crispness, and needs time to fully integrate with the wood and ripe yellow fruits.",Pêche au Carrelet,Château Haut-Peyrous
"Here's a ripely fruity Chardonnay that pulls out all the stops to achieve opulence, and largely succeeds. Defines the modern style of winemaking, with extracted pineapple, orange and caramelized oak flavors, wrapped into a creamy, leesy texture that's brightened with zingy acidity. Drink now.",Maldonado Vineyard,Tudal
"This is a lushly attractive wine for drinking now. It has pretty flavors of tart red cherries, accented with smoky oak, and brightened with crisp acidity. The dryness and smooth tannins add to this polished Cabernet Franc.",,Stepping Stone by Cornerstone
"A wine created to celebrate 100 years of Madiran as a designated region, this is a solid, chunky, proper expression of Tannat. The tannins mold easily into the rich black berry fruits, a wine piled high with complex flavors.",Cuvée 1907,Producteurs Plaimont
"This is a delicious, brut-style wine, based on Chardonnay and Pinot Noir. It's very rich in strawberry, raspberry and lime flavors, with vanilla and toast complexities, and the finish is honey-sweet and spicy. Great price for a bubbly this elegant.",Cuvée M,Mumm Napa
"This is a fancy Syrah, the result of a small crop in this cool vintage. The flavors are concentrated in blackberries, black currants and purple plums, with cured meat and black pepper complexities. Oak adds a lush layer of smoke, vanilla and wood tannins. Complex and delicious now and through 2013.",Double L,Morgan
"Fragrant with cranberry and strawberry fruit, this forward and appealing wine looks and drinks like a cru Beaujolais. The tasty fruit is delineated with a chocolate lining, and the tannins carry a whiff of fresh earth.",,Patton Valley
"A tough, sun-belted wine with concentration, big tannins and a ton of power and flavor. The nose is all bacon, balsamic notes, tobacco and roasted black fruit, while the ridged palate is dark and tastes of blackberry, molasses, coconut and brown sugar. Edgy, lemony and tannic on the finish. Drink now with beef; can be held for another 3_5 years.",Cenit Old Vines,Viñas del Cenit
"Vista Hills is in a sweet spot in the Dundee Hills, with neighbors including DDO and Domaine Serene. This puts the fruit front and center, a panoply of berries and melon, lightly edged with toast. Warm, forward and palate-friendly, it rolls into a finish with a hint of sassafras.",Tusculum Estate,Vista Hills
"This warm and rich wine features generous rounded white-fruit flavors. The wine gradually shows its wood aging, while the fruit continues to exude ripeness as well as acidity. The wine is already ready to drink, its tangy aftertaste a delicious bite.",,Olivier Leflaive
"In a cool year such as 2008, Pepper Bridge fruit gets a bit lean. This is tart and light, strawberry and cherry, amply supported with dried leaf and herb flavors. A streak of vanilla accents the hard tannins.",Pepper Bridge Vineyard Red,Pepper Bridge
"Cerasuolo di Vittoria is one of southern Italy's most exciting red wines. It's food-friendly, fresh and easy to drink like Beaujolais, but also delivers the elegance and firmness of Pinot Noir. Try it slightly chilled with chicken, pasta or a heaping summer salad.",Dorilli,Planeta
"A Bordeaux-style blend of 63% Merlot, 25% Cabernet Sauvignon, 10% Cab Franc and a splash of Malbec. It keeps the palate relatively light but nicely balanced, with leaf and berry flavors intertwined. It falls just a little short on the finish or the score would be higher.",Sericus Red,Pondera
"Quickly becoming one of Washington's best go-to Merlots, the latest from Waterbrook is pretty and smooth, richly endowed with ripe cherry and cassis fruit, snappy acidity and a bright, clean finish. The lovely fruit is accented by hints of herb and dried leaves.",,Waterbrook
"This five-grape, Bordeaux-style blend is quite flavorful, in a fruity, chunky sort of way. Big, bold cherry fruit is rolled in smoky, liquorous, almost buttery barrel flavors. Highly enjoyable, and ready to drink.",Sur La Mer Red,William Church
A blend of grapes from two excellent Yakima Valley vineyards__ineen and Red Willow__esults in a user-friendly Syrah loaded with pretty spices and scents of fresh cut tobacco and black tea. The leafy aromas wrap around somewhat blocky black cherry and blueberry fruit.,,William Church
Barbazzale is a blended red wine tha's 90% Nerello Mascalese and 10% Nerello Cappuccio. It opens with ripe berry aromas and smoky overtones of crushed granite and spice. The wine shows nice balance and firm structure.,Barbazzale,Cottanera
"Zinfandel and Syrah bring peppery and meaty flavors to this robust, dry red blend. Cabernet Sauvignon and Malbec add body, tannins and a rich, dark blackberry depth. Production was a little more than 2,000 cases.",The Loyal Companion,Cru Vin Dogs
"An oak-aged blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah, this wine shows warm, earthy notes of tobacco, leather, dark fruit and cured meat. The wine would be perfect alongside hearty bean soup or chili con carne.",,D'Alessandro
"Made from Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine certainly isn't shy on flavor. It's explosive in blackberries, currants, mushu plum sauce, licorice and sandalwood flavors that are frankly delicious. Could have better structure, though, as it's fairly soft and a little warm on the finish. Drink now.",Micho,Daou
"Full of dark plum and earth, a tremendous old-school California Mourvedre from old Oakley vines that exude mushroomy soft tannins and a rounded spiciness, finished by a trace of chocolate.",Ancient Vines,Cline
"This Bordeaux-style blend, one of four from this tiny winery, is almost three quarters Cabernet Franc. Raspberry and black currant fruit, tight and tart, anchors a focused young wine with nuances of dark chocolate and coffee grounds.",Ascent,Cloudlift Cellars
"Stony, oceanic and minerally on the nose, with no shortage of pungent green aromas. Feels tight and juicy, with wiry acidity and zesty flavors of gooseberry, green vegetables and lime. Definitely a green, cool-climate wine, but one with lasting zest and juicy acidity.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Light in color and subtle in aromatics, Esterlina's Riesling is just slightly sweet in a tropical kind of way, but lightly and delicately so. Overall, very balanced, crisp and perfumed, this is an elegant wisp of a wine.",,Esterlina
"This falls right in the toasty, oaky style of almost all the Chardonnays from winemaker Bob Bertheau, wrapping bright apple and citrus fruit in layers of toasty, nutty, buttery oak. A reasonable expectation is that additional bottle age will smooth it out and push the fruit more forward.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A lightly wood-aged wine, with the citrus and peach fruits much more dominant. The wine has some structure__ mineral edge that complements the buttery richness of the texture.",Cuvée Fût de Chêne,Domaine Marc Jambon
"Rich in lime, white currant and gooseberry flavors, this wine has lots of acidity that gives it a tingly brightness. It's dry dry and complex, the white wine equivalent of Cabernet Sauvignon.",Hummingbird Hill Vineyards,Dogwood
"Opens with peach, bell pepper and mellow mineral notes. About as wet, fresh and zesty as they come, with passion fruit, pineapple and tangerine flavors. Lively, crisp, green and pithy on the finish. Pure liquid freshness from start to finish.",Organically Grown Grapes,Cono Sur
"Baccante is an exciting Sicilian blend of Grillo and Chardonnay that opens with floral aromas, kiwi, exotic fruit, peach and white almond. There's substance and depth in the mouth that helps fuel a long, fresh close.",Baccante,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"The bouquet of this Syrah is tight and a bit warm, and it takes time to open up. Blueberry and raspberry aromas finally emerge alongside the purple floral and soft game scents. The mouthfeel is creamy and lush, with a weightiness to the rich berry flavors spiced with pepper and mocha.",Yarden Avital Slope Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"With some residual sugar, this lovely Riesling is off-dry, but the sweetness is balanced by refreshing acidity. The citrus, tropical fruit, honeysuckle and spice flavors are delightful.",,Fess Parker
"Alberta Ferretti (an all-Sicilian expression of Chardonnay) sees eight months in oak to produce a creamy, dense white wine with overtones of apricot, honey, almond paste, vanilla and butter. It's a New World-style wine from the Old World.",Alberta Ferretti,Feudi del Pisciotto
"From blackened volcanic soils comes this brilliantly pristine white wine, with aromas of pear, Golden Delicious apple, stone fruit and citrus. Saline notes of brimstone and crushed stone appear on the finish.",Cavanera Ripa di Scorciavacca,Firriato
"Released more than four years after harvest, this astringent, oaky Merlot remains in a dumb phase. Barrel flavors of bourbon and vanilla quickly take over the nose and the palate, though there is a suggestion of compact power and black fruit lurking in the background. Give it a lot of decanting time.",Klipsun Vineyard,Forgeron
"Tart and fruity, with a lip-smacking mix of green apples, citrus, grapefruit and melon. There is a peppery kick at the heart of the wine, moving past simple varietal herbaceousness into a livelier realm.",,Hard Row To Hoe
"Still young, this is a firmly tannic wine, its fruit under this dry surface. Give it a few months for the ripe blackcurrant and blackberry fruits to come forward. In two years, it will be a finely balanced wine.",Ciconia The Reserva,Herdade de São Miguel
La Vota is a surprisingly delicate and feminine wine considering it's from Sicily and it's made from hearty Cabernet Sauvignon. Forest fruit and violets emerge on the bouquet and the mouthfeel is silky and firm.,La Vota,Cantine Barbera
"Light and easy but attractive, with aromas of green plum, lime, green apple and a hint of petrol. Lightweight but flavorful in the mouth, with lifting acidity to the ripe fruit flavors on the palate. Faint hints of orange rind and clove appear on the finish.",Kayoumi Vineyard Single Vineyard,Carmel
"Donnatá is made in a hefty, concentrated style with overtones of cola, smoked meat, toasted nut, tobacco and sun-ripened fruit. There's roundness and bold personality, yet with a soft, smooth feel to the tannins.",Donnatá,Alessandro di Camporeale
"Great price for a Cab this good, and surprising that it's nonvintage. Toasty oak stands out, not unpleasantly, and then the blackberries, black currants and dark chocolate kick in. Holds its own among far more expensive Napa Cabernets.",,CULT
"This 100% Carignan is a great expression of what the grape can do all by itself without any blending buddies. Red cherry and plum mingle with garrigue herbs and a touch of vanilla on the nose. Soft tannins and vibrant acidity lay out the approachable structure, with a lingering finish accented by sweet spice.",Cariñu,Château Cabezac
"For the price and quality, you just can't go wrong with this one. Medium intense with strong suggestions of kirsch and blackberry liqueur lifted by accents of rosemary, espresso grinds and licorice. Round and satisfying in the mouth with more dark fruit flavors and a peppery finish.",La Tradition,Château Cabezac
"On the nose, this wine is very obviously wood aged. The same goes for the palate, with high toast wood smothering the herbal, ripe plum fruits. The wine therefore needs 2_3 years to soften and better integrate.",In Vinum,Domaine Sarrabelle
"Ripe, smooth, rich fruits, juicy strawberry flavor and fresh acidity. The texture is solid and dense, with an obvious potential for aging.",La Charmille,Château La Rame
"Aromatic, herbal wine, with evocative lavender, a core of dry tannins, fresh red plum juice fruit and flavors of wild thyme. The six years' aging has given the wine just the right amount of maturity to drink now.",Jules Réserve,Domaine du Grand Cros
"A rich wine with some tropical fruit character fixed firmly in a very mineral context. Very firm and rich, there is a grapefruit character to the texture. A fresh finish rounds it off.",Les Duchesses,Domaine Laporte
"The winery names Ribbon Springs its __ost important source_ of Pinot Noir grapes. The Ribbon Ridge AVA, a small subset of the northern Willamette Valley, is distinguishing itself for refined, focused Pinots such as this. Raspberries and rocks collide in midpalate, with a lick of milk chocolate as it fades into a gentle finish. The alcohol is listed at 13.2%.",Ribbon Springs Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Baked, earthy and leathery, just like all the AN wines. But there's also a smooth intersection of the old and new worlds here; it's one part rooty, oaky and rich but also dry, leathery and indigenous to the Balearics (the base grape is Callet). Finishes a little sweet and warm, and thus it's begging to be drunk now.",_n,_nima Negra
"A step up from the 2006 vintage, rich and smooth, very perfumed. The tannins are soft, balancing well with the acidity, layer of wood spice and the ebullient red berry fruits.",Só Syrah,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Wood-aged wine, very rich and opulent. It has great layers of spice, guava, sweet nectarine, along with a light citrus touch. It feels high in alcohol, which is a shame.",Olho de Mocho Reserva Branco,Herdade do Rocim
"A lovely Barbera. Shows the full-bodied, tannic structure and tart acidity of the variety, but is so rich in flavor, you want to drink it now. Floods the mouth with blackberries, currants, dark chocolate, anise and toasted almonds.",Walker Cuvée,Hovey
"Baia al Vento (windy bay) is a mostly Merlot-based wine (with tiny percentages of Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot) with big, ripe, chewy fruit at its core. The aromas include sweet cherry, jammy blackberry and cured meat.",Baia al Vento,Campo al Mare
"Grown in the Oakley area from (mostly) old vines, this Zin is dry, lush in texture and complex in flavors. It has lovely floral and mineral notes to the spicy raspberries, cherries, currants and cola. Great job at a good price.",Beastly Old Vines,Cardinal Zin
"A barrel selection from the 30-acre estate vineyard, this has a bit more muscle than its companion Amalie's Cuvée, with a more firm and full mid-palate. The fruit reaches into orange and plum and even hints at bourbon-soaked raisins, but within a context of a very cool vintage. Good balance and restraint, with the structure to age gracefully for up to a decade.",Estate,Amalie Robert
"Still showing its tannins, this wine is developing well. It is relatively light in texture, the sweet berry fruits balanced with a layer of acidity.",,Château Grand Corbin Manuel
"Made from unknown varieties, this is a big, sturdy, tannic and dry wine, made from a high mountain vineyard in this Lake County appellation. There's lots to like in the blackberry, cherry and red currant flavors, with their edge of dark chocolate and bacon. The wine is a bit sharp, but that could be a function of youth. Give it a few years in the cellar. A wine to watch.",Half Mile,Obsidian Ridge
"A more traditional type of crianza with vanilla, spice, dry berry fruit and a quiet, subtle approach. The mouthfeel is Old World with it's clean, dusty weight and proper acid-tannin balance, and the flavors of spice, cherry, dried currant and earth don't overstep their place. Very nice wine for under $20.",Crianza,Valserrano
"A fine and impressively complex wine, rich, packed with sultanas and dark chocolate. Very firm, this is worth aging but drinkable now.",Late Bottled Vintage,Quinta do Passadouro
"This is a food-friendly Sauvignon blended with hints of Riesling (for acidity) and Viognier (for fragrance). Citrus and grassy notes strike just the right balance, and there's a pleasant creaminess to the wine's texture. Drink it over the next six months.",Elevation,Wild Rock
"With some wood aging, this is a rounded, toasty wine. The local Mauzac (also spelled Mausac) grape gives a herbal character, filled out with white currants and yellow plums. To soften the wood, age for another year.",Le Mausac de Sarrabelle,Domaine Sarrabelle
"Tageto is a Bordeaux blend from Coastal Tuscany that will appeal to those who like an element of soft, chewy sweetness in their wines. It's bold and big on the palate with enduring persistency and layers of sweet strawberry, cinnamon and nutmeg.",Tageto,Donna Olimpia 1898
"The texture of this Pinot Blanc is Chardonnay-like, but the flavors veer more toward tangerines and oranges, with a buttered toast, honey and vanilla richness. It's a rich, creamy, complicated wine, a little sweet and soft, but a good partner with complex lobster, shrimp and scallop dishes.",Private Reserve Special Limited Edition,EOS
"Here is a well aged Cab Sauvignon that shows the heat of the 2003 vintage as aromas of blackberry preserves and strawberry roll-up. Thanks to 18 months of oak aging there's also plenty of spice, leather and pipe tobacco at the back.",Montevago,Fattoria di Petrognano
"With some weight behind the firm tannins, this is beginning to develop into a dense and powerful wine. It has black plum and berry fruits and a layer of fresher strawberry juice. Throughout there are dry tannins to hold the structure together.",,Château Tour Coutelin
"A higher-tier (and thus a bit more expensive) offering from Cabezac, this is a lush and attractive wine with a crushed velvet texture and a lingering finish. Seductively aromatic with notes of chocolate, licorice and raspberry sauce leading to flavors of sweet red berry preserves laced with cocoa in the mouth. So decadent and creamy, its an easy choice to drink now.",Grande Cuvée Belvèze,Château Cabezac
"Vibrant and lively red fruit aromas blend with fragrant woody spice in the bouquet. The cherry and berry flavors transition to the palate, where somewhat gripping tannins coupled with notes of fudgy brownie and black pepper add depth to the finish.",Le Petit Arthur,Château Cabezac
"The Sunnyside Pinot Noirs are consistently pretty wines, with tempting aromas of ripe cherries, underscored with spicy herb. Barrel aging brings a chocolate wash to the finish; all in all a very drinkable effort best enjoyed when young.",Sunnyside,Amity Vineyards
"Nice, clean and vibrant, with a welcoming set of peach, apricot and citrusy aromas. The wine is 100% correct and fresh, with clarity and flavors of apple, peach and green grapes. Shows just enough body, acid and pith on the finish, but drink now before it starts to fade.",,As Laxas
"Pazzesco, or crazy in Italian, is a lively blend of Merlot and Syrah that offers rich tones of smoked meat, ripe berry, white pepper and soft cherry. There's soft thickness in the mouth and the wine boasts a very rich and succulent texture.",Pazzesco,Castello del Trebbio
"A wine that combines richness with sweet cherry flavors and a firm tannic edge. Acidity and ripeness have produced a structured, food-friendly wine.",,Louis Jadot
"This darkly colored wine tastes strong and sweet, like a blend of raisins, blackberries, milk chocolate and red licorice, with a little bacon thrown in for umami saltiness. Tasty and flashy, but not going anywhere, so enjoy now with a good steak. It's a Bordeaux blend based on Malbec.",Amoureux,Lasseter
"Cartagho from powerhouse winery MandraRossa (one of Italy's most important cooperatives) presents a very modern, opulent expression of Nero d'Avola, with dark fruit and bright Christmas spice. The finish offers a lively touch of bitter almond.",Cartagho,MandraRossa
"Santannella is an innovative blend of Fiano, Viognier and Chenin Blanc from sunny Sicily, with bold aromas of pineapple, toasted almond, exotic and passion fruits. There are background tones of clove and cinnamon and generous, buttery intensity on the close.",Santannella,MandraRossa
"Super dark and dense, with black fruit, marzipan and mossy aromas. Feels tight and grabby, with firm tannins and dark, smoky flavors of blackberry, espresso and pepper. Turns harder and overtly tannic as it opens; needs food to show its best side.",,Maquis
"It's safe to assume that the Sangiovese in this wine was originally intended for Long Shadows super Tuscan Saggi red. Classy fruit is in the forefront, bright and high toned, with sweet cherry notes. A smooth midpalate extends into a pleasing finish that's balanced and silky, with medium length.",,Nine Hats
"Intensely wood-aged wine, with plenty of toast. That doesn't make the wine any less attractive with its yellow fruit flavors giving weight in the background. In a year's time, the wood and fruit balance should even out.",En Remilly Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"A blended red, Orphéus shows balance and harmony, with clean berry notes, licorice, drying mineral, pencil shaving, rosemary and dried herb. It would pair well with spicy lamb in yogurt sauce.",Orphéus,Scilio
"Il Frappato is a seriously fun wine that would pair with pasta, pizza or even spicy Indian food. It's a light, crisp red wine (serve it slightly chilled) with bright berry aromas of blueberry and wild strawberry. It's informal but attractively layered at the same time.",Il Frappato,Valle dell'Acate
"Six Sigma's workhorse Sauvignon Blanc is light and bright, like a lemon crisp enveloped by grapefruit and melon. It's fully stainless-steel fermented and ready for spring and summer.",,Six Sigma Ranch
"Spicy cranberry fruit leads, sharp-edged and tight. This remains a tightly-focused Zinfandel, clearly Washington in style rather than California, with bright acidity and hints of herb and stem in the finish.",Far Away Vineyard,Trio Vintners
"This wine opens with pulpy heft and concentration and offers a tight but yielding sensation in the mouth. That extra density really helps it work and underlines the wine's natural cherry, cola and chewy almond flavors.",Alto,Tenuta Rapital_
"A typical Maipo red, but untypically it's made from six grapes led by Cabernet Sauvignon. Smells mossy and of tobacco, olive, dried herbs and black fruits. Rich in the mouth except for a streak of acidity, with oaky flavors of vanilla, tobacco, stewed plum and berry. Finishes with coconut and power.",Gran Reserva Blend,Viña Chocalan
"Thick and concentrated, with brambly fruit and caramel from the American oak. The whole package is intense at first, but with air mellows into elegant flavors of red cherry and rich chocolate, and it would make a fine wine next to wintertime stews. Tasted two bottles with some bottle variation.",Tazetta Vineyard,Page Mill Winery
"A little light in body, but a solid Pinot Noir, at a good price. Shows real Russian River character, with cherry, pomegranate, persimmon and spicy Dr. Pepper flavors. Drink now.",,Ministry of the Vinterior
"Struck flint and stones add dimension to abundantly fleshy melon and grapefruit notes in Red Newt's Circle Riesling. Semidry, with a hint of smoked nuts and lemony fresh acidity, it finishes on a deliciously bitter grapefruit-pith note.",Circle,Red Newt Cellars
"Forward and pretty, with broad blackberry, black cherry and cassis fruit, this instantly accessible Cabernet Sauvignon offers many pleasures for an affordable price. Smooth tannins taste lightly of clean earth, coffee and light herb, giving just enough grip to offset the lightness of the fruit.",Traditions,Milbrandt
"Sito dell'Ulmo is a new vineyard-designated Merlot that combines pretty floral tones of red rose and spice with cherry, blackberry and rum cake. It shows a soft, fine texture that delicately caresses the palate.",Sito dell'Ulmo,Planeta
"Fine and delicate, with a light-bodied character that works well with the wine's notes of crushed stone, lime zest and green apples. It's already harmonious and ready to drink.",,Plantagenet
"Well balanced, ready-to-drink wine. It has a dry core of tannins that are surrounded by accessible blackberry and juicy cranberry fruit. The feel is open, soft and warming.",Coroa d'Ouro Tinto,Poças
"A balanced, nicely rounded Chardonnay, with light flavors of citrus and melon. Oak aging adds gentle notes of toast and vanilla, and the flavors extend gracefully into a finish of moderate length.",Estate Grown,Preston
"Aged for at least 10 years before its release, this amber-colored Marsala offers a touch of musky wood, white mushroom or toasted nut and caramel and butterscotch. It's smooth and silky with a blast of alcoholic power on the finish.",Superiore Riserva,Vito Curatolo Arini
"The 2009 blend includes 22% Merlot but eliminates Syrah. Tart fruit flavors of raspberry and pie cherry are dressed up in sweet baking spices. Simple, but tasty.",,Waterbrook
"Contadino 8 is a fetish wine for serious collectors of new experiences in natural and organic wines. Made with fruit from different vintages, it opens with a light ruby color and aromas of raw grapes, red candy, white pepper and dried apple. It is crisp, smooth and silky on the close.",Contadino 8,Frank Cornelissen
"From the Monreale subzone of western Sicily, Vuarìa is a fresh, lively wine that has seen some contact with toasted oak. Cherry, blackberry, roasted almond and exotic spice make this an easy, food-friendly wine.",Vuarìa,Feudo Disisa
"Feudo Montoni's beautiful hillside vineyards produce very clean and characteristic expressions of Nero d'Avola. This wine features nuances of bright cherry, wild berry, toasted almond and pistachio.",,Feudo Montoni
"Here's a simple but genuine interpretation of Nero d'Avola that presents bright aromas of black fruit, almond, prune and cherry cola. It leaves a soft, chewy impression on the palate.",,Feudo Montoni
"Chunky, forward fruit__ rush of blackberries and black cherry__ntroduces a full-flavored wine that won't challenge you but will satisfy. The oak treatment is still a little jagged, but the light mocha flavors that wrap around the finish are hard to resist.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Soft and raisiny on the bouquet, with leather, earth, prune and baked qualities. Feels meaty and solid in the mouth, with drawing tannins along with herbal, moderately intense blackberry flavors. Darkens up on the finish, where cocoa, prune and coffee flavors are dominant. Drink now.",Memoria Reserva,Convento Oreja
"Benuara is a 70-30 blend of Nero d'Avola and Syrah with a strongly menthol-driven nose enhanced by dark fruit, spice and green olive. Pair this wine with tapenade-crusted chicken.",Benuara,Cusumano
"Almost black in color, this is a solid, very chunky wine. Its black berry and bitter chocolate flavors push through an immense tannic structure, powered by a tough, stalky texture. It is very firm, edging on austere.",Prestige,Château Haut-Monplaisir
"Despite its very young age, this bright 30-30-40 blend of Syrah, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon shows impressive sophistication and personality. Neutral oak is used to fine-tune the spice aromas and the wine shows intense flavors of blackberry, cherry, leather and pipe tobacco.",Moreccio,Casa di Terra
"Le Tre Stelle (the three stars) is named after Maria Rubicini and her two daughters that run this boutique estate in San Gimignano, Tuscany. This 100% Merlot offers ripe and succulent aromas of black fruit, cherry and blackberry. Thanks to 12 months of oak aging, it also shows fine aromas of leather, spice and tobacco.",Doanto,Le Tre Stelle
"Smooth and silky, ripe stone fruit flavors are complemented by a flexible structure that gives shape to the juicy character. A light edge of wood and fine acidity complete the balance.",Terra Grande Reserva,Parras Vinhos
"On the restrained side, with flinty aromas giving way to notes of grapefruit, melon and fig on the palate. Finishes with a touch of leafiness.",,Nautilus
"Hearty, rustic and full throttle (at 15% alcohol), this is a bottle full of Sicilian fruits and flavors. Figs and dates, raisins and allspice, coffee and dark chocolate whirl through the palate, with the alcohol leaving a distinct trail through the finish. You might consider this in place of a dessert liqueur, served up with stuffed figs, walnuts and the bitterest of chocolate.",,Pheasant Valley Winery
"Greppicante is an oaky, spicy blend of Cab Sauvignon, Merlot and Cab Franc with loads of black fruit, asphalt, tar, licorice, natural rubber and concentrated cherry. The wine is bold and chewy in the mouth with firm, succulent tannins that will soften with time.",Greppicante,Tenuta I Greppi
"This extraordinarily rich Syrah swamps the mouth with jammy blackberries, raspberries and cherries. There's nothing subtle about it. But it's basically dry and properly balanced with acids and tannins, which gives it needed balance. Drink now and through 2014 to experience the youthful opulence.",Garys' Vineyard,Novy
"This is a good, well-made Cabernet Sauvignon to enjoy now. It's nice and dry and sturdy in tannins, with oak-influenced blackberry and currant flavors. Shows some real sophistication.",Dixon Ranch,Robert James Lynch
"Chewy tannins presage a firm, ageworthy wine. At this stage, it is all bitter chocolate and extraction, the fruit not evident. Dark, brooding, feeling heavy, this needs many years for the tannins to soften.",Reserva,Monte do Pintor
"A solid, foursquare wine, flaunting its tannins but not forgetting the rich weight of fruit underneath. Mint flavors go with the chocolate and dark plums.",Caractère,Château de la Grave
"Interesting and very much showing Navarran qualities, including aromas of black olive, herbs and mossy fruit. The palate has good structure, balance and feel, and thus there's a nice platform for dry black cherry, cassis and mocha flavors. As an '05 it's evolved, still fresh enough, and ready to go.",Reserva,Bodegas Piedemonte
Here's a ripe and chewy expression of Merlot with slightly jammy aromas of blackberry and maraschino cherry. Light shadings of spice and mineral appear in the background and the wine is smooth and soft on the finish.,,Castello del Trebbio
"A powerful, dense and still youthful wine. It balances a fresh blackberry fruit character with smoky tannins and delicious, bright and juicy acidity.",Retour des Palombières,Château Haut-Peyrous
"Ripe, dry and forward in fruit, with a soft texture, this Cab appeals now for its wealth of blackberries, cherries, plums, herbs and spices. It's a lovely wine that should be decanted for a few hours before serving.",Reserve,EOS
"Powerful and rich, this wine dominates with its concentrated dusty tannins. It shows big sweet black currant and plum fruits, with dark tannins offset with a layer of fresh acidity.",Olho de Mocho Reserva,Herdade do Rocim
"Toasty and citrusy, this is a prototypical méthode Champenoise sparkler, blending Chardonnay, Pinot Noir and Pinot Meunier from the cool island of Tasmania, off Australia's southern coast. It's medium in weight, with a crisp lemony finish that invites a second sip.",Premium Cuvée Brut,Jansz
"Here's a fresh and cheerful Sangiovese-based wine that shows bright berry tones and soft spice nuances. It proves a very food-friendly wine that would pair with pasta, light meat dishes or rolled pork roast.",Serrata Belguardo,Mazzei
"Tannat, with its high tannins, seems to lend itself as well to sweet fortified wines as do the Douro grapes of Port country. This is sweet, but firmly, solidly tannic, packed with wild berries and an edge of spice.",Tannatis,Domaine Berthoumieu
"Rounded and smooth, with some Alvarinho in the blend (which explains the regional appellation), giving weight, full-bodied richness to go with bright green fruits. There is just a final touch of wood.",Pó de Poeira Branco,Poeira
"Crisp, clean and minerally on the nose, with apple and green-fruit aromas. It has a round, smooth feel and flavors of peach, apple and citrus that will enliven the palate and aid almost any seafood, vegetable or salad. A natural wine with just enough powdery sweetness to raise a smile.",,Nora
"A very good effort, with attractive nectarine and melon fruit underscored by grapefruit notes that brighten and enliven the long, mouthcoating finish.",,Tablelands
"Very solid and sturdy, with aromas of apple, lemon-lime, soda cracker and mineral. The palate is fuller and more flavorful than your average cava, with candied apple, papaya, lime and lemon flavors. Dry, pithy and hinting at complexity on the finish.",Reserva Heredad,Segura Viudas
"If you're looking for a truly bone-dry Riesling from the Finger Lakes, look no further than Ravines. It's uncharacteristically austere for the region, with a lean, light body and a mineral laden, wet-stone palate. Lots of freshly squeezed lime juice and a citrus rind finish makes this an elegant, drinkable choice.",Argetsinger Vineyard Dry,Ravines
"Eola-Amity Hills has a distinctive __oice_ in the newly-defined Willamette Valley AVAs. It brings in earth and herb in a round and integrated style, not abrasive or stemmy, but adding Burgundy-like notes to the essential Pinot Noir character. The fruit is light and mixes cherry and citrus, and the tannins are proportionate and supple.",Elton Vineyard,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"A blend of three vineyard sites, this fragrant wine offers subtle scents of truffle and earth along with pomegranate and raspberry. The fruit flavors have a dusty character, and there is a strong mineral streak that washes through the midpalate. Give this plenty of breathing time.",Three Hills Cuvée,Lange
"A different breed of blended wine, with earthy aromas of dried cheese, leather, dill and vanilla. The palate is tight and mildly tannic, with sweet cola, roasted berry and earthy tobacco flavors. Not your normal bulky, dark wine; it's complex and based on 85% Garnacha and Carignan.",Masia Carreras,Martí Fabra
"Ponzi's mainstream Pinot Noir really brings the fruit in 2008, a wealth of blueberry and black raspberry flavors. From aging in 30% new French oak come streaks of clove and anise, with just a hint of moist loam. Tannins are light and ripe.",,Ponzi
"A fine balance between the nuttiness of aged tawny and ripe sweet fruit makes an attractive, mellow yet tangy wine. The sweetness is given liveliness by the final acidity.",Quinta da Ervamoira 10-Year-Old Tawny,Ramos-Pinto
"Dark and firm, with dry tannins strongly alongside the pure black currant fruits. A solid, linear wine, its acidity firmly in place.",,Château Barateau
"Big and forceful up front, with fiery, hot aromas that fall off to rooty and jammy. Tannic and aggressive on the palate, with an herbal, brambly blend of red plum, oregano, tomato, buttery oak and spice flavors. Big, loud and not short on spice and fire on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Sideral,Altaïr
"Pure and intense up front, with dry, nutty core aromas and not too much blatant oxidation. Fresh and kicking in the mouth, but still fairly smooth, with nutty, toasty flavors and a hint of baked apple. Nutty, creamy and not too acidic or scouring on the finish.",Fino en Rama,Alvear
"This is basically a Bordeaux blend based on Cabernet Sauvignon, with a hefty dollop of Petite Sirah. The latter brings tannic weight and dark color, but the most remarkable feature is the deep, delicious flavor. This wine floods the mouth with blackberry tart, dark chocolate, anise and sandalwood flavors. It's a bit high in alcohol, though, which shows in a hot finish.",Oyster Ridge,Ancient Peaks
"A rich wine that flatters the palate with flashy berry, cherry cocoa and oak flavors. Andrew Murray has been one of the Central Coast's true Rhône variety pioneers.",Espérance,Andrew Murray
"More than half Merlot, with the rest a mix of the two Cabs, this is spicy, toasty and firm. It's a good, all-purpose expression of Washington's basic Bordeaux blend style, clean and ready to drink.",Panorama,Cloudlift Cellars
"A Cabernet Sauvignon, Sangiovese and Merlot blend, the reserve fills the mid-palate with a pleasing mix of red fruits. The high acids of the vintage show through clearly, lifting the flavors into an even, peppery, lightly herbal finish.",Reserve Red,Balboa
A spicy start of snappy raspberry and cherry fruit mixes with notes of dried leaf and citrusy acidity. Orange peel highlights accent the acid and bring a slight bitterness that's not unpleasant.,Pheasant Run Vineyard,Basel Cellars
"Round and rich on the palate, with an intensely floral, marmalade tone, Bloomer Creek's late October-harvested wine from Morehouse Road boasts a palate that's rich and honeyed, yet surprisingly dry in style. Curiously spiced with musky incense, it finishes long, on a delicious orange pekoe tea note.",Tanzen Dame Morehouse Road Vineyard 2nd Harvest VS,Bloomer Creek
"Ripe, with a slightly baked persona turns more jammy with airing. Despite aromatic richness, the wine is a bit jagged and jabby in the mouth, with roasted berry, leather and acid-based sharpness. Still, it's a very good modern Rioja from a not-so-great vintage.",Cueva del Monge,Bodegas Vínícola Real
"Blackcurrant liquor, licorice root and roasted espresso aromas all pepper the black berry fruit core of this wine. A firm, mouth-coating structure and medium tannins give longevity and texture to the finish, along with a touch of fudgy milk chocolate flavor.",Appellation Old Vines,Carmel
"Starts off with petrol-like scents and gingery-peppery spice notes, then folds in pleasantly citrusy flavors. It's a bit plump through the midpalate but remains focused on the finish, resulting in a wine that's harmonious and easy to drink now.",Antonina Polish Hill River,Pauletts
"The Zisola estate is owned by Florence's Mazzei family. Partly age in French oak, this Nero d'Avola shows bright cherry and blackberry aromas, with toasted nut and bitter almond on the close.",,Zisola
"An unusual wine for Sicily, Sallier de la Tour Le Bianche represents an innovative blend of Viognier, Semillon and Sauvignon. The aromatic intensity__ith almond blossom and honey__s definitely there, and the wine is smooth, silky and soft on the finish.",Sallier de la Tour Le Bianche,Tasca d'Almerita
"Bidis is a smooth blend of Chardonnay and Insolia from the southern side of Sicily. The 60% Chardonnay component adds depth, balance and stone fruit aromas. The Grillo element grounds the wine in local tradition with fresh notes of wild herbs and fragrant white flowers.",Bidis,Valle dell'Acate
"Dusty scents of spice and cinnamon lead into a fruity red wine with a generous wash of oak. The cherry fruit is focused and tight, with a hint of cut tobacco adding interest.",Red Heaven,Wind Rose
"Easy to like for its rich blackberry, cherry and cassis flavors, and the lovely coating of new oak, which brings sweet notes of toast and vanilla. The price isn't bad, considering you get real Napa elegance.",Red Label,Newton
"This could be labeled Syrah, with just 17% Mourvèdre and small amounts of co-fermented Viognier and Roussanne in the mix. High-toned and complex, it wraps dark fruit in highlights of dried herbs, black olives and clean earth. The barrel aging_22 months in one quarter new French oak__rings in Bourbon barrel scents.",L'Entente Red,Ott & Murphy
"This beautifully fragrant Riesling opens with pear, white flower and honey. The wine's structure is tight but creamy at the same time and will age five years or more.",Praepositus,Abbazia di Novacella
"Fine but gripping tannins provide a solid structure and crushed velvet texture to this wine, which is otherwise loaded with ripe dark cherry, plum and boysenberry fruit flavors. A streak of sweet hickory smoke infuses the nose and mouth, and the finish closes with a light dusting of cocoa powder flavor.",Gaston-Reserve,Alexander
"This light and fresh Sémillon is all Walla Walla Valley fruit, with 12% Sauvignon Blanc in the blend. Apples and pear-skin flavors carry a hint of cinnamon. Lighter in the mouth than previous Amavi Sémillons, this elegant wine would be a good match to light seafood and shellfish.",,Amavi
"A bright, tart mix of fruit runs a gamut from citrus to apple to cherry. Flavors suggest young vines; clean, juicy and tasty with pure but simple fruit. A wine to enjoy while it's in the bloom of youth.",,Beresan
"Nero d'Avola, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon combine to produce a darkly concentrated wine with bold aromas of blueberry, blue flowers, sweet spice and rum cake. The wine's texture is plump and chewy.",Adènzia,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Fairly rubbery and smoky on the nose, with hickory aromas vying with blueberry and plum notes. Feels good and full, with sweet berry flavors and plenty of oak. In fact, this is a woody, modern style of Mencía that's lengthy and round.",Tinto Cuvee Mosteiro,Avanthia
"With its tropical fruit aromas, this is a superripe wine. The fruits are dominant_ rounded mango and yellow peach with an attractive touch of essential citrus acidity. It's ready to drink but will age over 3_4 years.",,Chartron et Trébuchet
"Youthful and bright, this Syrah offers plump fullness and loads of cherry, blackberry, rum cake, coffee and crushed mineral aromas. There's a touch of bright sweetness in the mouth that makes a cheerful endnote.",V90,Brugnano
"Tastes like black cherry and blueberry jelly, a very fruity, sweet wine with a bite of citrusy acidity. Absolutely delicious, yes, but not showing much complexity or nuance.",,Buena Vista
"With just a bit of oak adding a note of buttered toast, this bone-dry, high-acid Chardonnay tantalizes with savory citrus fruit enriched with pear and honeysuckle. From Talley, and made from their vineyards in the Edna and Arroyo Grande valleys. Good price for a Chardonnay this elegant.",,Bishop's Peak
"Crisp, nutty and very much as you'd expect a Manzanilla Sherry to be, but with a bit more color, body and nuttiness. Feels nice in the mouth, with modest, controlled flavors of toasted almond, baked apple, green olive and brine. Turns oily and slightly bitter on the finish.",Manzanilla Riá Pitá,Bodegas Dios Baco S.L.
"Foresty aromas blend with cola, nutmeg and spicy berry scents. The palate is a touch clacky and narrow, with zesty acidity and flavors of lemon, mushroom and dried raspberry. Turns sharper and more angular on the finish, but overall it's still a very nice taste of traditional Rioja.",Viña Albina Reserva,Bodegas Riojanas
"La Vota is a Cabernet Sauvignon from a hot climate that surprises the palate with its crisp, green aromas. There's a touch of soya, wasabi, bramble and forest floor. But you'll also recognize wild berry and toasted almond.",La Vota,Cantine Barbera
"Beautifully fresh wine that also has some weight to it. It is strung on a tightrope of crispness, balanced between white fruits and citrus. There is a great final mineral texture from the granite soils of the Minho.",,Casa do Valle
"A smooth and ripe wine, attractive cherry and sweet plum flavors along with a ripe tannic element. It is a rich wine, showing the concentration of 2008 in the Loire. Age for 2_3 years.",Chevalier de Minière,Château de Minière
"A wine that emphasizes the honeyed aspects of Chenin Blanc, without becoming overly sweet. It hits a good middle balance, giving sweet white fruits, plenty of acidity and a finishing dry structure. Age this for 5 years or drink now.",Le Chemin des Loges Demi-Sec,Domaine les Loges de la Folie
"Possibly just in a sullen phase, this reserve bottling from Craggy's home vineyard is dominated for the moment by smoke and cedar on the nose, and while there is some cherry fruit apparent in the mouth, it doesn't appear to be fully expressing itself. The impression is of a wine that's tightly coiled and may yet improve with another year or two of aging.",Te Muna Aroha,Craggy Range
"A very nice, elegant Pinot Noir. Shows clean crispness and pedigree, with fine acidity framing dry flavors of raspberries, cherries, red currants, licorice, bacon and cola. A rich feel. Drink now.",Dutton Ranch,Dutton-Goldfield
"A big textured, smooth wine, sweet fruits with firm tannins finished with dark perfumes. It is a blockbuster, thankfully without high alcohol, balanced in its richness. A barbecue wine, ready to drink now.",Grand'Arte,DFJ Vinhos
"Starts out rustic and leathery, with hints of smoke, leafiness and earth along with baked berry and spice. This four-grape wine has good density and mouthfeel that frames leather, earth and slightly baked berry fruit flavors. Finishes chocolaty and sweet, with just enough acidity to maintain balance.",Selección 12 Crianza,Bodegas Luzón
"A delicious wine and very much the model for value in Spanish Garnacha. That this has 25% Tempranillo only seems to make it better; the nose is sweet but full and plummy. The palate is pure, flavorful and sweet, with baked cherry, earthiness and a hint of chocolate. A wine to buy in quantity, i.e. by the case.",,Borsao
"Intense and bright with a wonderfully complex nose of slate and stones, combined with elegantly subdued florals. It's dry, but there's a whisper of lemon drop sweetness throughout. Beautifully balanced with an intensely mineral, steely finish.",Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"This superrich wine, with 12.7% residual sugar, is very sweet. It dazzles with honeyed flavors of tangerines and Asian pears, with creamy notes of vanilla bean and smoky pie crust. Could be denser and more concentrated, but it's a flashy dessert wine.",Late Harvest,Husch
"This coppery-pink rosé shows the same classy toast and citrus notes as Jansz's Premium Cuvée, with just a hint of cherry and mushroom to differentiate it. It's medium bodied, with a clean, refreshing finish. Good value.",Premium Rosé Brut,Jansz
"Not an easy wine to appreciate now. It's tannic, and the fruit is fresh and primary, with the sweet, candied taste of a chewy raspberry twist. Still, there's something complex and interesting going on. It's not just another overripe Zin. Give it a year or two to come around.",Black-Sears Vineyard,V. Sattui
"Sappy green apple, grapefruit and citrus aromas are welcoming and pure, while the palate is soft-edged, citrusy and full or tangerine and melon flavors. A good, honest, clean Verdejo that has sure-fire mass appeal. More solid than special, which is what you should want from this kind of wine.",,Valdelapinta
"Apart from making its own branded wines, the go-ahead Buzet cooperative sells a number of wines from privately-owned estates. This wine is firmly in the tradition of Bordeaux blends, with its dry tannins and firm, licorice and bitter chocolate flavors. It would be worth aging for 2 more years.",Château de Gueyze,Vignerons de Buzet
"Full-flavored, broadly-displayed and engaging with a mix of cranberry, raspberry and Bing cherry, this tasty Pinot Noir fills in the back end with pleasing barrel flavors. Buttered toast and caramel give it a smooth and creamy finish, and the alcohol is right at 13.5%.",Marylhurst Estate,Vista Hills
"There's a refined elegance to this delicious sparkler made from a classic blend of Pinot Noir, Pinot Meunier and Chardonnay. Soft bubbles burst with a bouquet of freshly baked brioche, fresh pears and delicate white flowers. The palate is dry with a brisk, minerally, lemon-lime profile.",Brut,Sparkling Pointe
"Vintage seems to have made all the difference in this 100% Cabernet. The 2005 was rich and fat, the 2006 less so. You'll find plenty of acidity framing the juicy blackberry and black currant flavors. It seems to be very finely layered, so your best bet is to cellar it for 6_8 years and see what happens.",Winfield Vineyard,The Grade
"Aromas of lush black cherries, coffee grinds and darkly toasted oak meld effortlessly in winemaker Roman Roth's powerful Long Island Merlot. After 21 months in French oak, the wine is smooth as silk yet intensely focused with a rich fruit palate accented by hints of forest floor and bramble, velvety soft tannins and a balanced astringency. Lovely all around.",,The Grapes of Roth
"A curious blend of local grapes with Syrah and Merlot has produced a bold, ripe wine. The tannins are soft, surrounded by juicy plum and damson flavors and a broad, ripe texture.",,Azamor
"A good wine that delivers the power you want. It's dry and rich in blackberries, currants, chocolate and smoky cedar. There's a slight rusticity in the form of a tannin-acid inconsistency.",,Longfellow
"Beautifully perfumed with luscious stonefruit and a hint of jasmine blossoms, but not at all cloying, this off-dry Riesling is another favorite from Hermann J. Wiemer. Bouquets of white florals shower the palate as well, but then retreat in the midpalate allowing elegant mineral and lime flavors to shine through.",Semi-Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Nutty and toasty, with toffee and butter pecan aromas. The palate is wet, light, alert and snappy, but also angular and citrusy. The acidity here is key; it pushes dried apricot and tangy flavors toward a nutty finish, and overall the wine delivers what a good, higher-end palo cortado should.",Marqués de Rodil Especial Palo Cortado,Hidalgo
"Delivers a rich and food friendly blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah. The wine is loaded with cherry and black fruit with a rich, but not over extracted personality.",Ruith Hora,Caccia al Piano 1868
"Fragrant, clean and tropical, with slate-driven minerality. The palate is just fleshy enough but mostly it's tight and crisp, with flavors of green apple, fresh green herbs and a drip of honey. Holds it together from front to back; just right for salads and seafood-based tapas.",,Gaba do Xil
"This massive blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot is packed tight with cinnamon, clove and Christmas spice lavished over a solid core of blackberry and plum. The wine shows a ripe, jammy finish with a long, fruity fade.",,Ferrari Iris & Figli
"Winemaker José Neiva delights in unusual blends such as this particular combination which should be tried more often. It is a big rich wine, packed with ripe flavors, plums, dark chocolate, rich sweet berries and firm tannins.",DFJ Caladoc/Alicante Bouschet,DFJ Vinhos
"By softening the extract and reducing the use of wood, Luc de Conti has succeeded in making a smooth, elegant wine in a difficult year. There is some weight, principally in the black currant fruit, creating a wine that could age for several years.",Moulin des Dames,Château Tour des Gendres
"A very mineral wine, with a lean and flinty character, tight tannins and suppressed fruit. The result is the need for several years of aging to bring out some weight and fruit. The potential is here.",Cuvée Prestige,Château de Cénac
"Emilio Primo (a pretty blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah) opens with fresh fruit tones and drying mineral, backed by sweet spice and toasted almond. In the mouth, the wine is direct and sharp with piquant freshness on the close.",Emilio Primo,Terre del Marchesato
"A ripe wine, with white fruits and a touch of spice. The crisp minerality of Vinho Verde is all there, with a satisfyingly textured aftertaste.",,Solar de Pinheiro
This semisecco Marsala from 2001 opens with a dark amber color and savory notes of wild mushroom and spice followed by caramel and toasted almond. There are touches of citrus and candied fruit woven into the wine's thick texture.,Targa Riserva 1840,Cantine Florio
"Cutaja opens with a healthy dose of cinnamon and spice backed by bright cherry and toasted almond. The fruit shows a dark, ripe quality, with overtones of black olive and caper, but there is enough acidity to keep the palate refreshed.",Cutaja,Caruso & Minini
Grammonte shows touches of ripe fruit and cured meat lavished over a thickly concentrated mouthfeel. The wine is plush and richly textured with a touch of sour cherry on the close.,Grammonte,Cottanera
"Nero d'Avola and Syrah are blended to produce a dark, hearty red wine with overtones of dried herb and black olive. The wine is fresh and smooth, with a touch of bitter almond on the finish.",Benuara,Cusumano
"A rich and rounded wine, with attractive ripe fruit and pear flavors. The wine is soft, with just the lightest tang of acidity and lime zest. Not for aging.",Casa de Santar Branco,Dão Sul
"A lush Rhône-inspired blend, loaded with peach, pear and other stone-fruit goodness. It enters softly, fills out nicely, and finishes laced with streaks of lemon custard and vanilla cream.",Kaitlin Rayann White,Farm Girl
"This oak-aged Nero d'Avola delivers dried berry, raspberry and cassis notes along with elegant touches of spice, leather and pipe tobacco. The fruit is dense and chewy.",Avulisi,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"Cerasuolo di Vittoria is a classic food wine. Its light, lean texture and crisp acidity go down beautifully with pasta, lasagna or veal. Aromas include bright berry, almond and barbecue smoke.",,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"A plump, modern expression of Nero d'Avola with evident oak tones of chocolate, spice, toasted almond and a darkly concentrated appearance. Some bright red fruit and wild berry peeks through and offers a touch of much-needed freshness in the mouth.",Vuarìa,Feudo Disisa
"Feudo Montoni delivers a delightful expression of Catarratto (one of Sicily's most popular white varieties) with an intense bouquet that is redolent of cut grass, citrus, grapefruit, almond skin and white flower. Very nice and easy-drinking with medium density and good freshness.",,Feudo Montoni
"Camelot is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot that shows solid structure, ample length, smooth tannins and loads of dark fruit and spice. Pair this hearty red wine with breaded veal rolls fried in olive oil.",Camelot,Firriato
"Chiaramonte is a pure expression of Nero d'Avola from a winery located in the Trapani area of southern Sicily. The fruit shows ripe characteristics of blackberry and spice, and the mouthfeel is long and soft.",Chiaramonte,Firriato
"The Cabernet brings structure and blackberry-currant fruit, while Syrah contributes softness and a roasted meat flavor in this dry, food-friendly wine. Drink it now with a nice steak, chop or stew.",,Epiphany
"Fresh, pointed and tropical up front, then nothing but wet and fun in the mouth, with snap pea, fresh bell pepper and lime flavors. Short, tight and ultrafresh on the finish, with a hint of pith and bitterness as it fades away. Really good value SB.",Visión,Cono Sur
"A finely structured, still young wine with an edge of austerity. It does have a rich core of red fruit, giving a slightly juicy character, but with its tannins it will always be a firm wine, dense and serious.",Colheita Seleccionada,Herdade de São Miguel
"Unlike many of its brethren, this Eden Valley Riesling relies on weight and texture rather than a fine line of acid to make an impression. It has the region's lime sherbet and wet stones, but is plump on the palate rather than lean and wiry, making it more approachable in its youth.",,Mesh
"As with all the Milbrandt whites, this young wine retains exceptional freshness, and lifts the palate with lively acidity. Ripe pear and fig flavors are laced with streaks of vanilla bean and coconut flakes. A hint of fresh brioche gives the finish an extra dimension.",Traditions,Milbrandt
"Full and fruity, but with an aromatic pinch of latex and rubber that subsides with airing. Feels healthy on the palate, with good grip and weight to bolster raspberry, plum, cola and spice flavors. In golfing terms, it splits the fairway; it's perfectly good and should generate no complaints.",Reserva,Montecillo
"This blend of Viognier, Marsanne and Roussanne, in roughly equal measures, is technically incorrect. It's a little dirty, a little fizzy and a little too sweet for a dry table wine. But you know what? It's fun to drink, and that's wine's ultimate obligation. Shows rich, satisfying flavors of apricots, oranges, peaches, honey and herbs, finished with a dry minerality.",3 Divas,Montemaggiore
"For the price, this is a great buy. It's rich in fruit and dry, with mouthwatering acidity. The lemon and lime flavors are good enough to inspire you to drink a few glasses and savor more.",,Gnarly Head
"Sourced from Stillwater, Conner Lee and Kiona vineyards, this 95% Cabernet and 5% Merlot blend is balanced and firm. The mixed berry and cassis fruit carries highlights of leaf and herb, plus a note of spice from barrel aging.",Reserve,Pondera
"A powerful yellow floral character dominates the bouquet of this wine, with supporting aromas of peach pit, hard pear and delicate toast rounding it out. The palate is full and creamy, but lifted by citrus-driven acidity and a wood-spice finish.",,Psagot
"A little overripe around the edges, with touches of raisins and prunes, but they don't detract from the wine's attractions. Dry and smooth in the mouth, its blackberry and anise flavors also feature Sangiovese's bright acidity. Drink now.",Sangio Vetta,Pure Cru
"This is lovely in violet perfume and bacony leather, structured like a tall building and best left to mellow out for further development. Winemaker John Kinney destemmed without crushing to preserve as many whole berries as he could, and kept the wine fermenting at lower temperatures to tame the tannins.",Del Arroyo Vineyard,Occasio
"Only a handful of metodo classico sparkling wines are produced in Sicily, and this Chardonnay-based bubbly from the Tasca family is among the best. Perfect for appetizers on a warm spring afternoon, the wine delivers tonic effervescence and aromas of white flower and citrus.",Almerita Brut,Tasca d'Almerita
Cygnus is a hearty blend of Nero d'Avola and Cabernet Sauvignon that opens with perfumed aromas of red rose and cinnamon potpourri followed by warm aromas of leather and spice. At the wine's core are black fruit and chocolate flavors.,Cygnus,Tasca d'Almerita
"Scents of tea leaves and honeysuckle add a layer of dimension to ripe, rich yellow peach and apricot notes in this densely concentrated Riesling from Sheldrake Point. Surprisingly dry on the palate despite so much sweet fruit flavor, the palate is framed with a shower of lime juice and pith that carries through to a long, minerally finish.",Dry,Sheldrake Point
"This is one of the best Pinot Noirs on the market in this price range. It's delicious in raspberry, cola, vanilla, cinnamon spice and smoky oak flavors, wrapped into soft tannins and brightened with acidity. Production was 1,470 cases.",,Small Wonders
"Although Etna is gaining international acclaim thanks to its increasingly popular red wine production, the volcano is also home to beautifully elegant white wines. This expression opens with bright tones of white peach, citrus, honey and a drying mineral note at the back.",,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"Erse opens with light, delicate tones of wild berry, cassis, blue flower and polished river stone. There's an extremely finely-etched, but also firm, quality to the tannins.",Erse,Tenuta di Fessina
"Floral fruit aromas suggest blueberry, but overall this vintage lacks the power and depth that Termes and its big brothers are known for. Airing sets up sweet, easygoing berry flavors and full tannins, but in the middle it's less whole than it has been in other years. A juicy, well-made wine that should not be judged as weak just because 2007 was a marginal vintage. Drink now through 2013.",Termes,Numanthia
"A fine balance between yellow fruit richness, with apricots and peaches, and a crisp, exquisite line of citrus. The wine is rich, while also fresh, a great food white wine.",Serrado Branco,Quinta do Serrado
"Here's a fresh and lively super Tuscan blend that would make a fantastic companion to roasted lasagna with ground beef and hearty tomato sauce. The wine is soft, velvety and layered with mature aromas of red berry, spice, leather and tobacco.",Albatro,Máté
"With good density and some richness, here is a wine that offers fruit as well as structure. The spice, black fruits and dry tannins hang well together, the acidity showing through to underline the ripe fruit.",,Château Beauregard-Ducourt
"Opens with cherry aromas and brightness, then the palate fans out and fattens up with juicy plum and cherry flavors along with just a touch of medicinality. Toasty, warm and tasty, with a thoroughness not usually found in $8 wines. Garnacha at 70% with 30% Syrah.",,Coto de Hayas
"Here's a young blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot from Coastal Tuscany that shows raw, vinous aromas of wild berry, white cherry and blueberry. There's a green, brambly quality as well although the wine does end with a surprisingly soft, rich and plush mouthfeel.",,Cipriana
"Charred oak is prominent here as it is with most Long Island reds, but exceptionally well integrated within a rich, round wine full of supple dark chocolate and fruit flavors. A good example of yin and yang, Clovis Point's blend of Merlot, Cab Sauvignon and Franc, and Syrah offsets dense, sweet boysenberry and mocha notes with firm tannins and a dark char finish.",Vintner's Select,Clovis Point
"Here's a 100% expression of Sangiovese that opens with jammy fruit aromas of ripe blackberry and strawberry. There are spice, earth and smoke notes at the back but that mature fruit sits firmly in center stage. The mouthfeel is soft, easy and slightly sweet.",,Antonino Tringali-Casanuova
"This oaky blend of Merlot (60%) and Cabernet Sauvignon (40%) sees 10 months of barrique for extra intense notes of spice, cinnamon, clove and general woodshop. There is black fruit, cola and blackberry pie as well, but the wine needs a few more years of aging to find balance.",Zizzolo,Fornacelle
"With its ink purple color, this is as young as can be, its wood and fruit not yet integrated. But the potential is good, with weight behind the spicy wood and the feel of solid tannic fruit coming up.",Château de Flore,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Very delicious, with the silky mouthfeel you want in a fine Pinot Noir. The flavors are cool-climate crisp, with raspberries, cherries and cola, balanced with subtle herbs and tobacco. Feels a bit direct and jammy in the mouth for development. Drink now.",My Father's Vineyard Shula's Pond,Brogan
"Ultrarich in cherry, black raspberry and red currant flavors, with a savory note of grilled beef and the sweet, salty umami of bacon. New oak brings vanilla bean and caramel richness. The result is a strongly flavored wine, but it's balanced with fine acidity. Drink now.",Sangiacomo Old Lakeville Road Vineyard,Campesino
"A robust, spicy wine that offers lots of bang for the buck. The flavors range from lush raspberries and red cherries up through blackberries and currants, veering into mocha, and there's lots of crushed black pepper. Easy to like with steak, lamb, Mexican food.",The Slammer,Big House
"Benton-Lane makes quite a lot of Pinot Gris, stainless-steel fermented and whole cluster pressed, yielding a soft, fragrant, fruity wine with plenty of fresh pear flavor. It flattens out broadly across the palate, full-bodied and lightly spicy. Just a bit more focus would really elevate this wine to the top ranks.",,Benton-Lane
"Very smooth with youthful, juicy, fragrant berry aromas along with a bouncy palate full of sweet cherry and cassis flavors. Clean, snappy, alert and healthy. More simple and straightforward than complex, but worth the money and then some.",,Aletta
"The 2008 Crannell leans to the herbaceous side of Oregon Pinot Noir, relatively low in listed alcohol (13%). Cranberry is the dominant fruit flavor, along with fresh herbs and whiffs of tomato leaf.",Crannell,Amity Vineyards
"From the estate vineyard, this delicate effort offers tart, racy, pie cherry fruit flavor, wrapped in substantial acids. There's a kiss of light chocolate, and the overall balance is just right.",Estate,Amity Vineyards
"A bright, berry-flavored wine, acidity showing well against the firm, dry tannins. It has freshness from juicy fruit, with a lingering, vivid aftertaste.",Monte do Carrapatelo,Luis Duarte
"This Bolgheri blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (60%) and Cabernet Franc offers green tones of pepper and chopped spice over natural rubber, bramble and wild berry. The wine feels tonic and sharp in the mouth and ends with a twist of sour cherry.",,Le Grascete
"Enjoyable and approachable now with straightforward red cherry, berry and game notes spiced up by glimmers of mocha and nutmeg. Linear in the mouth with soft tannins and a clean finish.",Emotion Occitane,Le Mas de l'Ecriture
"This lovely Sauvignon Blanc is a little sweet in honey. But the acidity is crisp, and there's a fine mineral undertow to the fresh peach, citrus and green apple flavors, so the finish feels dry and clean.",Vittorio's Vineyard,V. Sattui
"Here's a quality Merlot offered at a very reasonable low price. Sant'Adele is rich, succulent and smooth with bursting aromas of cherry, blueberry, spice and moist tobacco. Pair this wine with homemade roast chicken and garlic potatoes.",Sant'Adele,Villa Pillo
"Light and frothy in the glass, this beautifully perfumed dry sparkling is redolent of orange blossoms, apples and pears. A blend of Pinot Noir, Pinot Meunier and Chardonnay, there's a delicious hint of buttery cashew nut and bitter almond amidst the floral, fresh apple and lemon flavors.",Blanc de Blancs,Sparkling Pointe
This well-priced blend of Sangiovese and Merlot sees some oak aging to round off those bright berry and spice nuances. The overall effect is that of a well-balanced and informal wine that would pair with sausage pizza or hearty pasta.,I Campacci,Tenuta di Trecciano
"A great value in a Pinot Noir. It's dry and silky, the way you want a Pinot to be, and shows flavors of cherries, red currants, cola and bacon. It's sharp in acidity, but nothing too problematic. Easy to find, with 36,000 cases produced.",,McManis
"Here's a new, cheerful wine from the folks at Poggio Verrano in southern Tuscany that offers loads of ripe berry fruit, cherry, cassis, spice, leather and rum cake. The wine is smooth and soft.",Poggio Verrano 3,Poggio Verrano
"Balanced fresh wine, full of mango, guava and pineapple flavors. It has freshness, brightness, along with a refreshing citrus burst.",Guadalupe Branco,Quinta do Quetzal
"This wine is certainly a powerful statement: smooth, super-rich, tarry black berry fruits, spice and a sizable serving of wood vanilla. A wine to admire, not to enjoy.",Grou Grey,Wines & Winemakers
"Yellow in color, with a waxy nose that's baked, rich, a bit stalky but also honeyed. The palate is round, hefty and thick, with full melon and peach flavors in front of a plump, woody finish. Good as you're likely to find among Spanish Chardonnay.",Colección,Viñas del Vero
"Altrovino is a 50-50 blend of Merlot and Cabernet Franc that opens with intense aromas of black fruit, spice, tobacco and smooth black chocolate. In the mouth, this wine offers richness and a silky, long finish.",Altrovino,Duemani
"A totally pleasant wine, with earthy berry and toast aromas that lead to a full, cushioned, properly tannic palate. Shows lemony oak, citrusy notes, tomato, herbs, plum and raspberry flavors. Finishes dry, with tobacco as a lingering flavor. A very nice, dry style of Ribera reserva.",Reserva,Viña Mayor
"Floral and not overpowering in style, with good red-fruit aromas. Feels smooth and silky, not edgy, with tasty berry flavors touched up by a dollop of oak and chocolate. A fresh, easy wine to sip by the glass or with casual tapas.",,Luna Beberide
"Milton Park is a lower-priced offshoot of Thorn-Clarke, whose wines often represent excellent values. This Riesling might be a bit broad for aging, but it offers ample green apple and lime fruit and a hint of petrol for near-term consumption.",,Milton Park
"This wine's ripeness and power are similar to many Rheingau Rieslings. Honey, apple, peach, spice and petrol all combine easily into a slightly broad, off-dry style.",Falcon Vineyard,Lake Chalice
"It's easy to like this soft, smooth wine, with its cherry jam, blackberry liqueur, milk chocolate, sweet licorice, pepper and sandalwood flavors. It feels extravagant and seductive in the mouth, making you want another sip. The blend is Grenache, Syrah and Mourvèdre.",Chemin de Fer,Lasseter
"Tasted pre-release, this is a wine that should most definitely continue to improve as it knits together. The floral aromas are a bit like Gewürztraminer, though this is 100% Viognier. Flavors include rose water, citrus, and a honeyed lemon note that runs through the tart, high-acid finish.",Elephant Mountain Vineyard,Ott & Murphy
"A blend of estate-grown vineyards and fruit from Casa de Vina, one of Livermore's most dazzling vineyard sites, Page Mill has made a Petite with a sweet nose of red fruit and very soft tannins.It's docile in style and subdued, but its licorice and chocolate notes are deliciously vibrant on the finish.",,Page Mill Winery
"Vintner Salvatore Geraci's Rosso del Soprano is a bright, lively red blend from the northern-most Sicily. The wine opens with cherry, raspberry and wild berry, with darker notes of leather, tobacco and crushed minerals at the back.",Rosso del Soprano,Palari
"Decadent berry compote leads the bouquet of this wine, while secondary notes of fig and date unfold on the back. The balanced, medium-weight mouth is rich and ripe, with assertive flavors of cherry skin, fudgy chocolate and sweet woody spice that flood the palate and linger on the finish.",,Psagot
"Broad and weighty for a Clare Valley Riesling, with hints of wet stone followed by notes of ripe orchard fruits and citrus. A very good Riesling that's near-ready to drink now, priced at the top of the market.",The Merle Reserve,Pikes
"A perfumed wine, with aromas of lavender and ripe plum jelly. On the palate, the wine has great ripeness and sweet tannins, the fruit showing red berries, the sweet spice pounding through the acidity.",Late Bottled Vintage,Ramos-Pinto
"Verdant fennel and herb notes add freshness to concentrated honeysuckle and tangerine flavors in this fairly dry but fruity Riesling from Red Newt. Vibrant orange-inflected acidity penetrates on the palate, leading to a dry, lingering finish.",Dry,Red Newt Cellars
"Made in a softly appealing style to drink now, this 100% Cabernet is thankfully a huge improvement over the winery's previous releases. It's rich in blackberry and blueberry jam, dark chocolate and spice flavors, with a pretty overlay of oak.",,Ca' Momi
"Nero d'Avola (95%) is enhanced by tiny percentages of Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon to produce a thick, impenetrable Sicilian red that is based on ripe fruit, blackberry, prune, syrupy cherry sauce and shaved oak wood. It's a bold, chewy wine with a thick and soft mouthfeel.",'A Naca Rosso,Calatrasi
"The vineyeard is between two small churches. The wine is ripe and juicy, with a core of firm tannins that give it depth and structure. A great value that is ready to drink.",Entre II Santos,Campolargo
"Spicy wood and ripe fruit go well together in this young tasting wine. At this stage, it is all black fruit with a bright line of acidity. The weight and the more structured character will come later.",Catedral,Caves Velhas
"Quite young, this wine is still showing some reduced flavors, so give it plenty of breathing time. Clean and varietal black fruit and generous amounts of chocolaty oak provide the foundation. More time is needed to pull all the components together into a seamless whole.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Consistent with the past couple of vintages, this lively, racy take on Pinot Gris comes with delicate spritz, dotting the edges of the glass and tickling the palate. Grapefruit and lime are showcased by bracing acidity, and a mouth-cleansing minerality.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Cala Silente is a smooth and sophisticated Vermentino that exhibits a bright, golden color and opulent layers of apricot, honey, butterscotch and almond. A spicy touch of acidity keeps the wine from feeling too heavy in the mouth.",Cala Silente,Cantina Santadi
"Coda della Foce is a blend of Nero d'Avola, Petit Verdot and Merlot that offers wild berry, forest floor, cola, tobacco and charred almond or chestnut aromas. The wine ends with a silky, clean mouthfeel and a touch of dried herb.",Coda della Foce,Cantine Barbera
"Following on the heels of a stylistic shift in 2007, this delivers solid fruit flavors highlighted by tart boysenberry, then brings in light notes of earth, lead pencil and coffee grounds. Tannins are firm and carry the finish through a medium-long fade.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"A very perfumed ripe wine. The fruit flavors range from mango through peach to a taut citric finish. With just a hint of wood, this is a bright and fruity wine, delicious to drink now.",La Combe d'Eve,Domaine Emmanuel Giboulot
"Herbs, leather and warm berry aromas are sound and typical for Chile. The feel is a bit clacky and acidic, but there's layering and quality red plum, raspberry and tomato flavors. Tight, fresh and focused on the finish; strapping enough to age for 3_5 years.",Los Vascos Grande Reserve,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"One of a tiny handful of Mondeuse-based wines made in Italy, L'Ardenza offers plump, dark tones, combined with ripe fruit and dense richness. Because this wine originates from Mount Etna, it is also redolent of black soil and crushed minerals.",L'Ardenza,Cottanera
"There is new interest in planting Pinot Nero grape in Sicily. This ruby-colored wine delivers bold fruit, bramble, earthy tones and button mushroom. It's a surprise, but it works.",,Cusumano
"Jalé is an all-Sicilian expression of Chardonnay, with sun-drenched aromas of apricot, honey, pineapple, caramel and butterscotch. This versatile white would pair with rich foods like chicken in cream sauce that will contrast the slight sourness on the close.",Jalé,Cusumano
"A good Syrah, rugged in tannins and a little rustic, but offering plenty of blackberry, roasted meat and black pepper flavors. It's full-bodied and lusty, and suggests equally strong dishes, like beef stew, short ribs or game birds.",Premier Coastal Vineyard,db Winery
"Valentino (a Sicilian expression of Merlot) is aged in oak to produce a wine that offers equals parts cherry and spice in terms of its aromas. In the mouth, it is sticky, chewy and bursting with bright berry fruit.",Valentino,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Dalila is a relatively new product from Stemmari (formally known as Feudo Arancio) thats a blend of Grillo (80%) and Viognier. The first grape gives the wine a fresh, piquant feel and the second adds aromas of white flower and honey.",Dalila,Feudo Arancio
"A wine that shows more of the structure of 2009 than the year's richness. It has tannins, red berry fruit, spice from new wood and layers of acidity. It could age well another six months.",Premier Cru l'Héronde,Domaine Chasselay
"Plump, sweet and bursting with chewy blueberry and milky chocolate flavors, this is a dense, creamy Syrah to enjoy on a cold winter night. The wine delivers a velvety mouthfeel and long spicy overtones.",Kaid,Alessandro di Camporeale
"Let this mountain-grown baby open, but once it does, Andis' Cab Franc has classic aromas. This spicy, woody and cola-esque wine would make a fine introduction to California Cabernet Franc, or a reminder of how good it can be when done nicely.",Bill's Block Reserve,Andis
"A tightly wound wine with strong layers of bark and earth around tart cassis and berry fruit. There is plenty of natural acid, a sharp and toasty edge to the tannins and a promise of better things to come with a few years of bottle age.",,Basel Cellars
"Sicily is home to some of the best Italian dessert wines made today. The Noto subzone, located on the eastern side of the island, has many Moscato vineyards for the production of sweet, generous, sun-ripened wines like this. Citrus, almond blossom, apricot and honey make up the fragrant bouquet.",Rais,Baglio di Pianetto
"A decadent note of vanilla crème graces the all-fruit preserves and boysenberry center of this Cab. Soft tannins give way to an approachable structure, leading through to a juicy finish flecked with sweet spice accents.",,Galil Mountain
"This Muscat offers notes of guava, mango, yellow peach and lychee braced with an appropriate touch of acetone-like lift. It's round and mouth-coating on the palate with an orange oil and sweet spice accent on the back. Pair with a simple dessert, like lemon pound cake with vanilla ice cream.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Whispers of smoke and petrol meld into wild heather honey notes on Heron Hill's richly concentrated semidry Riesling. While abundantly floral and fruity, penetrating acidity maintains balance and structure. Finishes dry, with a deliciously bitter grapefruit-pith note.",Semi-Dry,Heron Hill
"A good, solid Pinot Noir, with pleasantly upfront raspberry and cherry flavors. It's silky and dry, with a bite of acidity. Earns extra points for sheer deliciousness. Drink now.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Kynsi
"Light and leafy, despite the substantial alcohol reading, this well-integrated, nicely-balanced wine is pure Malbec. The elements of leaf, herb and forest floor all mix well with the pretty red fruit.",,Hamilton
"A pretty nose topped with floral notes leads into a forward, fruity wine, with purple berries and plums dominating. Grace notes of anise and biscuit, along with a streak of vanilla, highlight the finish.",Burning Desire,Hard Row To Hoe
"Cerasuolo di Vittoria is an easy-drinking blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato (aged in oak) that pairs with pasta, veal or even a hearty hamburger with cheese, bacon and the works. This pretty wine shows nice heft and texture with a bright cherry close.",,Valle dell'Acate
"Il Moro offers intense aromas of blackberry, cherry, plum and rum cake. It's a tight, compact wine with great fruit intensity that would pair well with vegetable risotto or smoked cheeses.",Il Moro,Valle dell'Acate
"A big, powerfully structured wine with concentrated tannins and plenty of black fruit. It has density, juicy fruitiness, layered acidity and the potential for aging at least a year.",Belairissime Le Py,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Created to celebrate a 50th wedding anniversary, Nozze d'Oro is a blend of Inzolia and Sauvignon that offers bright floral intensity and a wonderfully pristine and crisp mouthfeel. Pair this wine with lobster risotto.",Nozze d'Oro,Tasca d'Almerita
"Some of the best expressions from Etna share some of the brightness and beauty of Burgundian Pinot Noir. Erse offers delicate berry and blue flower aromas and is driven by polished tannins and a firm, but precise mouthfeel.",Erse,Tenuta di Fessina
"This is a terrific white wine from the Etna area of Sicily (representing a blend of Carricante and Catarratto) that delivers a rich, generous style with loads of density and intensity. Soft aromas of peach, apricot, dried hay and honey bring up the rear.",,Scilio
The initially ebullient florals and sweet apricot preserves in Sheldrake Point's standard Riesling gain elegance and subtlety from a bracing shower of acidity. Fresh stone-fruit flavors penetrate deeply on the off-dry palate before trailing off with a whisper of lime oil.,,Sheldrake Point
"A juicy wine, with plenty of ripe fruit bordering on being tropical. The nicely integrated natural acidity, with a strong underpinning of mineral, adds texture and length.",Upland Vineyard,Smasne Cellars
"Ripe, spicy, raspberry and cherry fruit flavors mark this vibrant Pinot Noir. It shows the flashy elegance of the Santa Lucia Highlands, with brisk acidity lifting the fruit. Drink it over the next few years.",,Testarossa
"The sixth version of this nonvintage blend is delightfully rough, like an old truck with a failing muffler. Chewy, tannic, earthy and smoky, it lunges ahead with massive barrel flavors, atop sharp, tart red fruits. This blend is 40% Merlot, 25% Syrah, 22% Cab Franc and 13% Cabernet Sauvignon, and feels more acidic than previous versions.",Rough Justice Red,Barrister
"Starts with a smoky nose with fruit notes of mixed berry and pie cherries. Light notes of baking spices weave through, into a solid, well-balanced red blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cab Franc.",Merriment Red,Basel Cellars
"This is a fascinating sparkling wine. Made in the metodo classico using Carricante grapes, this lively bubble opens with stone fruit, citrus and floral aromas. What really sets it apart are those drying mineral tones of slate and brimstone.",Noblesse Brut,Benanti
"Ramione is a 50-50 blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot that offers bright fruit: blackberry, cherry and plum. Smoky oak spice fills in the back adding more intensity and density to the overall mouthfeel.",Ramione,Baglio di Pianetto
"While the wine is packed with ripe kiwi and peach fruit, it also has a crisp citrus core that gives freshness. The acidity cuts through the warm fruits and tight finish.",Monte da Peceguina Branco,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"Hints of smoke and toasted brioche meld deliciously with sweet, ripe melon tones in this pristine semisweet Riesling from Heron Hill. Juicy and ripe in texture, with concentrated peach and tangerine flavors, its elegantly structured, with zippy acidity and a hint of tea leaf astringency on the finish.",Semi-Sweet,Heron Hill
"Green floral notes and pine fronds add a foresty freshness to plump white peach flavors in this off-dry Riesling. Vivacious with sweet tangerine acidity, it's structured and focused, with a finish that lingers.",Semi-Dry,Keuka Lake Vineyards
"Brambly and bold on the nose, with jumpy red fruit and cool, briney action as well. Feels tight and solid, with spicy oak bolstering wild berry and herbal flavors. Polished and juicy, with an honest, vintage-reflective package of acidity and dry, zesty fruit.",Alazan CJ's Barrel,Kingston Family
"The red fruit character merges easily into a more mature, nutty character. The Port has a smooth, rich, chocolate texture, the dryness of wood aging just beginning to show through the sweet caramel.",10-Years-Old Tawny,Kopke
"Lots of rich, sweet cherry, blueberry and mocha flavors in this dry red wine, which is based on Merlot. But it goes beyond mere deliciousness in the refined structure. Feels elegant and dignified in the mouth, with a long, spicy finish. It's not an ager, though, so drink soon.",Paysage,Lasseter
"The 2009 Cali is half Cabernet Sauvignon, 42% Merlot, and the rest Sangiovese. An interesting wine aromatically, with sharp scents of herb, mint and pine needle, it's well-blended, smooth and balanced, with the herbal nature of the fruit on full display.",Cali Red,Mannina Cellars
"Shows how ripe the Napa side of Carneros can grow Pinot Noir. Floods the mouth with strawberry, raspberry, cherry and cola flavors, while French oak contributes toasty sweet vanilla and toast richness. Delicious and appealing now and for a couple more years.",Papi y Chula Vineyard,Campesino
"Grove Mill's 2009 Sauvignon Blanc strikes a pleasant balance between zesty citrus and ripe stone fruit. It's medium-bodied and plump in the mouth, with a crisp, clean finish that invites another sip.",,Grove Mill
"Youthful wine, full of rich berry and black plum flavors. It is concentrated while bursting with exuberant fruits, balanced with acidity. This is a true second wine of Malhadinha Nova, ready to drink now.",Monte da Peceguina,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"Lean and taut tannins play with the sweet spice of this concentrated wine. It has a dry, dark core, edged with acidity, followed by fresh red-berry flavors. The final juiciness__ven after five years__s considerable.",Primavera Special Selection,Caves Primavera
"A high toast wine, the fruit and fresh acidity submerged beneath the wood. At the present, it is hard to enjoy, but in 2_3 years the fruit will kick in. It would be good if the producer had been less enthusiastic about the wood.",,Château de Candale
"Sparkling Shiraz is an acquired taste, but this is a good introduction to the genre. Simply put, it's a big, oaky Shiraz with bubbles, bursting with vanilla, blackberry, chocolate and cedar aromas and flavors. Enjoy it over the next few years for its youthful exuberance.",Strawberry Chocolate Sparkling,Chocolate Box
"Scopaio definitely presents a bouquet marked by jammy fruit. This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and other grapes offers tones of ripe strawberry, raspberry, cinnamon and spice. It's a soft, smooth wine with a chewy and slightly sweet fruit fade.",Scopaio,Cipriana
"A wine that tastes of its granite soil, very linear initially, only opening slowly to give plums, exotic spices and the ripest firm tannins. There is a lovely juicy final character to this intriguing wine.",,Clos Teddi
"Give this wine credit for the sheer power of its fruit. Swamps the palate with freshly crushed raspberry and cherry flavors, liberally enriched with sweet vanilla and caramelized oak. Other than that, it's a bit soft and one-dimensional, but the score reflects how delicious it is.",,Clouds Rest
"An attractive, fresh wine, the tannins and bright acidity giving a firm support to the lively berry fruits and dry tannin core. The aftertaste continues freshness.",DFJ Touriga Nacional-Touriga Franca,DFJ Vinhos
"Sweet, yes, but not intensely so, more a sweet apéritif sweet wine for blue cheese or ham. The botrytis gives the wine a drier character, while the honey element leads straight into citrus.",Cuvée Tradition,Domaine Bellegarde
"An opening of apricot and peach aromas is proper, while the palate delivers a jolt of zest and acidity to more pineapple, lime and punchy green-apple flavors. Tangy later on, with more than a drop of lemon and lime to the finish. Also slightly pithy and bitter, which is natural for Godello.",,Abad Dom Bueno
"Just shows you don't need a super high score to have a super drinkable wine with steak, pork, veal, chicken, or just a simple burger. Blended from Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot, Merlot and Malbec, all of them great varieties, the wine is dry, sophisticated and rich in berry and currant flavors.",Big Guy,Big Guy
"Here's one of those fresh, bright Italian wines you'll want to pair with home cooked pasta or lasagna. The delivery is direct and fresh with lingering tones of cherry, root beer, licorice and sweet forest berry. The mouthfeel is clean, polished and crisp.",Lenaia Rosso,Casa di Terra
"An unusual blend of Riesling, Huxelrebe, Viognier and Sauvignon Blanc, this has residual sugar of almost 3%, but marries the sweetness to a Vouvray-like tartness. Your tongue dances back and forth from honey to tea, from sweet to dry. Excellent length and a wash of fresh cut orange as it fades.",Starthistle Cuvée,Madrone Mountain
"Rich and round with a seductive nose of honeyed apples and petrol, there's a surprising breadth to this lovely off-dry Riesling from Heron Hill. On the palate, sunny sweet peaches are counterbalanced by a stony, minerally elegance and refreshing lime juice acidity. The finish is long and ends with a pleasant jasmine tea astringency.",Semi-Dry,Heron Hill
"Minerality and crispness define the bouquet, which brings green apple and citrus aromas. There's punch and spritz on the palate as well as sweet citrus and juicy lime flavors that break up a little as they fan out. Not sure if there's residual sugar, but the wine tastes a bit sweet.",,Lícia
"Showing lovely, delicate orange and citron flavors, this Sauvignon Blanc is clean and zesty in acidity. It's so refreshingly dry, and has such a tangy minerality, that it's a pleasure to drink as a cocktail sipper.",Split Oak Estates Sur Lie,Morro Bay
"A pale salmon color, this is all Pinot Noir, picked early for the purpose of making rosé. Quite dry and elegant, it's a juicy, acidic wine, with pretty strawberry and watermelon flavors highlighted with zesty spice.",Rosato Pinot Noir,Ponzi
"Densely textured, this pure Tannat lives up to the name Plénitude (generous or full). It is characterized by dark plum and licorice flavor, very tannic with ripe fruit to match. Concentrated, with a mineral edge, it just misses the mark because of a rustic edge.",Plénitude,Producteurs Plaimont
"Feels muscular and dry in the mouth, with powerful black cherry, currant, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood flavors. The tannins are potent, but negotiable, although you should give this Syrah a decant of several hours to let it breathe.",,Stepping Stone by Cornerstone
"Light in color, but not in flavor, this appealing wine brings pomegranate, cranberry, tart cherry and lots of spice front and center. Baking spices rule the midpalate, elevated with crisp, citrusy acids, and the wine flows into a finish with leaf and herb highlights. Another year or two might help integrate all the interesting components; then drink up.",Estate,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"From the makers of the celebrated Sassicaia super Tuscan, Le Difese is a less formal wine at a very attractive price. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon (70%) and Sangiovese and the wine shows bright fruit nuances with layers of wild berry, mineral and light shadings of spice. It ends with crisp freshness as well.",Le Difese,Tenuta San Guido
"A dark, dry, tannic and rustic wine, made from this old variety. Very full-bodied, with moo shu plum sauce, anise, black currant and cedar flavors. Like a blast from 100 years ago, the kind of vino rosso the pioneers used to make. Will last for many years.",Estate Lemley Ranch Vineyard,Obscurity
"Firmly tannic, solid and dry wine, its balanced fruit fits well with acidity, spicy wood and a dense core of dry structure. Developing well, but age for 2_3 years.",Tinto,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"This somewhat broad, mouthcoating wine should prove attractive to consumers weaned on California Pinot Noirs. Dark, earthy, mocha notes lead into a round palate with flavors of cherry preserves and chocolate. Probably best over the next 1_2 years.",,Ra Nui
"Renzo is an 80-20 Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot blend with loads of jammy fruit and inner sunshine. Prunes, raisins and ripe berry fruit open the bouquet and are followed by chewy soft spice and moist pipe tobacco. The fruity fade ends on a slightly sweet note.",Renzo,Antonino Tringali-Casanuova
"Cranberry and mulberry fruits, sweet and soft and just so juicy. This is a lively wine with hints of rose hip and the freshest fruit__ven after three years. The aftertaste is soft, hinting at wood.",JP Private Selection,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A worthy followup to the 2008, showing crisp acidity and rich flavors of citrus fruits, New Zealand-style gooseberries, and vanilla spice, with a honey sweet finish. Drink now with Vietnamese food or sushi.",Denmark Street Vineyard Tribute,Atmosphere
"Shy at first, with standard raspberry aromas, earth and buttery notes along with cherry and raspberry flavors. Becomes fuller and more satisfying with time, and once it's fully open you have a solid, satisfying Rioja with true flavors and good overall balance.",Crianza,Castillo Labastida
"A lively crisp wine, flavored with soft pear, green plum oregano, streaked through with vibrant acidity. It's light, fresh, ready to drink.",Primavera Branco,Caves Primavera
"One of the more abundant New Zealand Pinot Noirs in the U.S., Brancott's 2007 Reserve boasts plenty of earthy, savory, sous-bois aromas and a bright cherry-cranberry core of flavor surrounded by foresty, fungal notes finishing crisp and long. Drink now_2013.",Reserve,Brancott
"The Campo al Mare Bolgheri Rosso (a blend of Merlot, Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc and Petit Verdot) shows no limpidity whatsoever. The wine is massively thick, black, inky and jackhammer intense. There are no subtleties here, no reading between the lines: Aromas of wet earth, blackberry and cured beef are flowed by thick tannins and a sweet berry fade.",,Campo al Mare
"Showing some signs of mushroom-flavored maturity, this is still a finely structured wine. The fruit has turned into a more vegetal character with beetroot and firm tannins, spice and final acidity.",,Château Roquevieille
"Here's a ruby-colored blend made with grapes that are native to Tuscany and central Italy that shows bright berry nuances followed by almond skin, herbs, pressed flowers and cherry cola. There is good balance here between the wine's bright acidity and its finely textured tannins.",Poggioncino,Bocelli
"Opens with a load of sweet, candied black-fruit aromas but this wine excels on the nose because it's composed and precise for being so young and simple in scope. Velvety, rich black-cherry flavors run the show, and the finish brings length and an herbal shading. Very nice for a wine from Toro at this price.",Dama de Toro,Bodegas Fariña
"This very rich Chardonnay oozes showy flavors of pineapples, pears and golden mangoes, with winemaking notes of buttered toast, crème brûlée and a slight taste of yeast. It's not particularly subtle, projecting power instead.",Gold Coast Vineyard Reserva Dorada,Costa de Oro
"Brings a welcome dryness and crisp structure to this Viognier. Tastes almost like Sauvignon Blanc, with orange and lime flavors and a bright, clean finish. Recommends itself as a good, alternative white wine.",Steinbeck Vineyard,EOS
"A softly tannic and dry Zin. Offers wild berry, cherry, currant and spice flavors, with a meaty edge, like beef teriyaki. Easy to drink with a perfectly grilled steak.",Morelli Lane Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"This super Tuscan blend of Syrah and Merlot opens with lush berry notes and clean aromas of cherry, blackberry and soft Christmas spice. The wine tastes rich, satisfying and would make a great match to lamb chops with roasted garlic potatoes.",D'Unico,Leopoldo I di Toscana
"This Cabernet is not providing much pleasure now. Bone dry and hard in tannins and acids, it's aloof to the point of unfriendly. But there are lots of blackberries packed inside. Give it at least 8 years in the cellar.",,Mayacamas
"Comes out of the chute with some aggression, but that's settled by quality apple and grassy aromas. The palate is jumpy and lively, with pleasant, slightly sweet apple and peach flavors. Shows good refinement, ample layering of flavors and a spot of minerality. As a whole, this is good cava.",Brut,Montsarra
"This blend of Italian and international grapes opens with buoyant tones of white cherry, cola, tobacco and chopped herb. The wine is sharp and defined with a refreshingly crisp close.",,Greppi Cupi
"A spicy, berry-dominated wine, rustic edging to dusty tannins and a strong mineral character. There is a strong acid element giving great freshness to this fine value wine.",Evidência,Parras Vinhos
"Delicious in pastry-filling raspberry and cherry flavors, with a baked brown sugar richness and exotic touches of vanilla, cinnamon, anise and toast. Dazzles with a direct hit to the palate; is soft and dry. But it has a certain surface one dimensionality. Seems at its best now_2013.",Lindsay Estate Vineyard,Paul Hobbs
"This is a smooth, subdued style of Rioja that's perfect for tapas or casual consumption. The nose offers the right kind of entry: cherry and raspberry with dusty spice. And the flavors are friendly and suggest black fruits and smoke. A little more oaky and charred than some, but a nice crianza nonetheless.",Crianza,Ramón Bilbao
"A faint coppery-pink rosé, Taltarni's 2008 Taché is a blend of 58% Chardonnay, 37% Pinot Noir and 5% Pinot Meunier. It's lean and crisp, with a zesty, citrusy feel to the modest toast and mushroom flavors.",Taché,Taltarni
"Dusty lemon and cidery aromas are solid and draw you in. The palate has a fresh, clean feel and lively, tangy flavors of citrus, green fruits and green herbs. Zesty, a bit lemony, and nice on the finish. Not a complicated bubbly by any means.",Brut Reserva,Sonim
"The grapes were grown in Calistoga, and they have yielded a fat, soft, flavorful wine. It brims with lemon, lime, melon, fig and honeysuckle flavors. Partial barrel fermentation adds a welcome touch of smoked cream.",Sea-Fog,The Grade
"A stylish, fashionable wine that feels plump and rich and classy in the mouth. It's a bit too soft, but shows lovely flavors of cherries, red currants, mocha and sweet oak, and the finish is thoroughly dry. Drink now.",,V. Sattui
Borgoforte is a well built and very well priced super Tuscan blend that would taste great with meatloaf and mashed potatoes. The wine is dense and round in the mouth with pretty but simple aromas of wild cherry and blueberry.,Borgoforte,Villa Pillo
"Lavischio is a ripe and chewy expression of Merlot with loads of black cherry and raspberry intensity. The mouthfeel is smooth, supple and rich. This is the perfect wine to pair with pork roast with rosemary and garlic.",Lavischio,Villa Poggio Salvi
"Old vine (1967 planting) Sauvignon Blanc from Oregon? OK, this is a rarity. The wine has a gentle grace, and manages to convey layering and complexity within a fairly light frame. Moderate acidity, some yeasty texture, and a mix of apple and citrus fruit all come together in a clean, fresh, well-balanced effort.",Old Vine,Kestrel
"A step up in quality from the 2008__ot surprising given the relative strength of the vintage. A flinty note accents nectarine and grapefruit flavors in this light- to medium-bodied offering, lingering nicely on the finish.",,Mount Fishtail
"From Sauvignon Blanc grown in the vineyards of the Mateus palace, this is a classic, herbaceous wine with attractive fresh and grassy acidity. The high altitude fruit is bright and crisp.",Três Bagos Sauvignon,Lavradores de Feitoria
"Dark and fully oaked Rioja with vanilla, mocha, char and black-fruit aromas. The body is good while the acidity is a bit high, and thus the flavors lean toward tart black cherry and zesty wild blackberry all with a robust amount of toast, spice and charred darkness.",Crianza,Obalo
"Jassarte is a noteworthy, and somewhat experimental, blend of more than 20 Mediterranean and Caucasian grape varieties with a dark ruby color and pretty aromas of blackberry, spice, toasted almond and plum. There are hints of chopped herb and mint in there as well.",Jassarte,Podere Guado al Melo
"A tightly tannic wine, with a firm feeling of wood, balanced by stalky black currant fruit and a layer of acidity. It is still young, with the tannins likely to soften.",Château de Sabazan,Producteurs Plaimont
"A powerful blend of Touriga Nacional, Syrah and Aragonez, rich and mellow, sweet fruits tempered by tight tannins and spice. The wine has a fine, juicy aftertaste to enhance the freshness.",Castelo do Sulco Reserva,Parras Vinhos
"Pretty and pale, this wine is already showing some sunset shades around the rim, and drinking like a wine with more than just a couple of years under its belt. That works in its favor, as it offers cherry-pie fruit, cut tobacco, some minerality and a chocolate/coffee kiss in the finish.",Love Puppets,Brandborg
"Sourced from the Waihopai Valley subregion, this is a round, soft Pinot Noir. It emphasizes fruit, but the black cherry notes are undeniably attractive and nicely balanced, framed by silky tannins. Easy to like and easy to drink, now_2014.",The Ned Benmorven,Marisco Vineyards
"The '07 release of this wine, a blend of four considerable vineyards, was great. This 2008 is less so, although it's still a fine wine. Packed with cherry, cola and spice flavors, it's a little raw in the mouth. Decant for a few hours before drinking.",The Architects,Cadre
"Without any intervention of wood, this is a ripe yellow fruit and mineral wine. It has a bite of steel as well as sweet, juicy acidity. With its weight and richness, it needs to age for at least a year.",Authéntique,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"Shows lots of citrus and tropical fruit, pear and peach flavors, with a delicious coating of vanilla and buttered toast. Finishes a little on the sweet side, which suggests pairing with Asian and fusion dishes.",,Envy
"Ripe and fragrant, with hints of peaches and cinnamon on the nose, followed by bold, fruit-driven flavors and more than a touch of sweetness.",,Giesen
"A little coarse and rugged on the nose, there's a meaty and earthy cedar streak to the otherwise black plum and berry fruit core of this Merlot. The concentrated fruit carries through to the medium-weight mouth, with a softly chewy texture of dusty tannins and powdery mocha flavors.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"A delicate and approachable selection, there's a true Pinot character to this wine, with bright fruit notes of red cherry, strawberry and red plum flesh, all lifted by accents of sous bois and orange peel. Juicy and mouthwatering, with light tannins and a clean finish.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Decadent notes of buttered brioche and baked apple add depth to the orange oil and floral bouquet of this wine. The mouthfeel is round but balanced, and ripe notes of peach and melon unfold on the palate. A tasty ginger and clove spice develops on the finish.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Inspired by the fashion designer Valentino, this Sicilian Merlot shows sun-ripened tones of blackberry, cherry liqueur, and dried prune. It's a soft, round wine with a dense and chewy mouthfeel.",Valentino,Feudi del Pisciotto
A sweet-fruited wine with flavors of raisins and dried cherries along with fresh red berry fruit and acidity. The wine has some structure and an attractive lightness.,La Carrière,Domaine Chasselay
"Here's a fancy Sauvignon Blanc, rich enough to drink with upscale dishes. It's smooth and creamy and very ripe in pineapple and tropical fruit flavors. Tastes sweet, but the sugariness disappears into a swirl of spice on the finish.",,Cornerstone
"D'Alessandro's plump Syrah is a bold and generous red wine, with richly layered aromas of cherry, blackberry, rum cake, bacon fat and toasted nut. Pair this wine with abbacchio arrosto (roast lamb).",,D'Alessandro
"Unlike most Australian Rieslings, this one has a hint of residual sugar left in it, giving it an appealing plumpness on the midpalate. Ripe apple and sweet peach notes are balanced by zingy lemon-lime acids on the finish. Ready to drink now.",The Dry Dam,D'Arenberg
"Made with a blend of Grillo and Catarratto, this dry Marsala opens with a dark amber color and aromas of candied fruit, caramel, maple syrup, resin and candied apricot. Sicily's most traditional wine, Marsala is perfect for easy sipping after dinner with a cigar and soft music.",Fine Dry,Cantine Florio
"Medium-sweet on the IRF scale, this light- to medium-bodied Riesling displays classic scents of petrichor, green apple and lime. Shows decent length and hints of petrol on the finish.",,Carrick
"Cutaja opens with lively red fruit, wild berry, cassis and marzipan. There's a raw, almost syrupy quality to the fruit that reflects the sun-drenched nature of Sicilian winemaking.",Cutaja,Caruso & Minini
"A pure, lively scent of fresh apricots introduces this crisply defined Pinot Gris. The rich, full midpalate brings in further fruit notes of apple and pear, with a vivid and bracing acid foundation. Long and refreshing.",Grand Estates,Columbia Crest
"Crystal clear and easy to like. The nose is a mix of crisp, oceanic, green aromas tied to fresh tropical fruit and bitter nut oil. Zesty and pure on the palate, with tangerine and pink grapefruit flavors leading to a cleansing finish. Drink this year.",Reserva,Morandé
"Semidry in style, with penetrating peach and apricot flavors, this deeply concentrated, yet elegantly structured Riesling is an excellent representation of a certain Finger Lakes style. Bracing on the palate despite its initial sweetness, it finishes quite dry, with a whiff of smoke and subtle bite of lime pith.",Semi-Dry,Red Newt Cellars
"Solid on the nose, with pure berry aromas matched by oak-related vanilla. Fresh and medium in weight, with juicy acidity and mild tannins. Tastes of dried red fruits, blackberry, vanilla and tobacco. Fairly long and slightly elegant on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Crianza,Viña Arnáiz
"Lamùri is a terrific value wine from Sicily that would pair well with pizza or backyard barbecues. The wine is plump, soft and easy and driven by bright berry fruit.",Lamùri,Tasca d'Almerita
"This is a gorgeous rosé that should be paired with salmon canapés, poached bream or shellfish risotto. The color is a beautiful pale pink and the aromas include white almond, cassis, wild berries and rose.",,Tenuta delle Terre Nere
"Ero is packed tight with bright berry, cassis and white almond. That all-Sicilian jamminess you sometimes find in this variety is absent here.",Ero,Tenuta di Fessina
"A big, ripe, exuberant wine, offering a mouthful of blackberry, blueberry and cherry jam and oak flavors. The wine was fermented in 100% new French barrels. It's a bit aggressive in both oak tannins and fruit, but such is the balance that 4_5 years in the cellar could make it more interesting.",Block 9,Terlato
Frappato is a terrific native grape from the southern-most parts of Sicily that offers the elegance and brightness of a Pinot Noir and the easy approachability of a Beaujolais. It's a red wine that would pair with fish dishes or a white asparagus risotto.,Belsito,Terre di Giurfo
"Kudyah is aged only in stainless steel to preserve the freshness of the fruit, offering raspberry, cherry and white almond. Pair this wine with meat dishes or pasta.",Kudyah,Terre di Giurfo
"Veins of slate and chalk add a deeply mineral tone to honeyed lime and orange peel notes on this elegantly structured Riesling. Lean in body, but with a delicious midpalate, it ends on a savory note of underripe apples, dust and smoke.",,Thirsty Owl Wine Company
"The second label for the Long Shadows group, this lightly spiced Syrah is built upon a solid foundation of ripe fruit: blueberries and black cherries. There is a pleasing subtext of fresh earth, and a balanced, light finish.",,Nine Hats
"Made with a little Cabernet Franc and Merlot, this is a beautiful wine to drink now, although you might want to give it an hour or two in a decanter. It's soft and luscious in blackberries, bluberries, currants and mocha, and feels fine through the long, spicy finish.",,Pure Cru
"A little too soft for a serious Syrah, especially at this price. But the flavors are enormously rich and complex, ranging from blackberries and blueberries to dark chocolate, bacon, sautéed wild mushrooms, black pepper and dusty Indian spices. Drink now.",Paolo's Vineyard Estate Grown,Montemaggiore
"Brickish in color, with mature aromas of cedar, pine, tobacco, olive and dried fruits. There's still some racy acidity that's keeping the rooty flavors of tobacco, dried berry, coffee and spice moving forward. Finishes dry and a little bit classic; drink now for an affordable taste of Navarra.",Crianza,Castillo de Monjardin
"Eighteen months in wood have dried out the fruit, and now the wine needs time to come together. The black plum weight is here, with a rich potential to bring out the sweet, juicy flavors.",Tradition,Château Cabredon
"Red currant jelly aromas burst into a sweet, but not luscious wine. There is just a touch of botrytis to go with freshness and some crisp acidity. A dessert wine for drinking, not sipping.",Cuvée Jean,Château Jolys
"Finely balanced wine with all the right elements in place. It has stalky berry fruit, spice, a good amount of acidity. All this is over a solid layer of fine tannins, while the wine finishes with a great burst of juiciness.",,Château la Roselière
"A finely structured wine, its tannin fitting well into the rich texture, with berry fruits, dark plums and bitter coffee adding an extra dimension.",Eulalie,Château de Cénac
"Crisp and minerally up front, with aromas of apple, peach and dust. It's fresh, maybe a touch basic at its core, with flavors of apple cider, apricot and almond skins. There's nothing not to like about this Albariño, which is pure, pithy on the finish, and more than solid in a pedestrian, familiar sort of way.",Single Vineyard,Finca de Arantei
"Here in the maritime climate north of Lisbon, Alfrocheiro works well to produce a rich, smooth and velvet textured wine, with a beautiful layer of acidity over the wood.",DFJ Pinot Noir-Alfrocheiro,DFJ Vinhos
"From a cool site in a cool year, this wine shows thoughtful winemaking and attention to detail. It's a finesse wine, balanced and poised, and the flavors, though light, are persistent; pomegranate, pie cherry, breakfast tea and a hint of tobacco come into play, with a thin suggestion of sassafras. But there is nothing unripe or unpleasant, and the tannins are nicely managed.",Amalie's Cuvée,Amalie Robert
"High-toned and sharp, this has a mix of pear, tropical fruit, banana, and juicy fruit gum. It's a fruit salad wine, full-bodied and exceptionally flavorful. There's a streak of butterscotch running through the finish, from fermentation in __eutral_ oak. Drink up!",Gilt,Ancient Cellars
"A firmly structured blend of Castelão and Merlot, rich and dense in texture. Spice, red berry fruits and plums mingle with good fresh acidity in an attractive, sturdy wine.",Quinta dos Loridos,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Smooth on the nose, with a pinch of rubber, earth, smoked beef and plum/prune. The palate offers structure, solid acidity, zestiness and bright flavors of cherry and raspberry. Finishes crisp and tight, with lingering vanilla. A nice wine for tapas and other meat-based dishes.",Reserva,Bodegas Ondarre
"While I prefer the 2009 for its clarity and freshness, this '08 is no slouching tiger. The nose delivers still-fresh apple and mineral aromas, while the flavor profile leans toward gooseberry, lemon and green melon. Shows some pithy bitterness on the finish, so drink right away or seek out the '09.",,Gaba do Xil
"Equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot are rounded off by 20% Syrah to create a bold, jammy style Bolgheri Rosso that will appeal to those who like this mature, concentrated style. The wine is chewy and thin on the finish with black pepper and spice aromas on the fade.",Borgeri,Giorgio Meletti Cavallari
"This is a good, elegantly structured Cabernet. It's bone dry, and marked by zesty acidity, as well as blackberry, black currant, cherry, mocha and bacon flavors. Especially likeable for its low, 13.9% alcohol. Drink now.",,Husch
"A really nice Merlot, and at this price, you should run and buy some. It's dry and smooth and balanced, with lush cherry, berry, mocha and cedar flavors. So easy to drink now with steaks or chops. Production was 4,900 cases.",,Irony
"Very dry, with mouth-watering acidity, but the palate also searches for a little more fruit than the wine offers. Still, the pineapples, peaches and apricots are pleasant enough.",Reserve,Kunde
"Soft, rather sweet and appealing. What it lacks in stuffing and complexity, it makes up for in sheer deliciousness. Opulent in raspberries, cherries, red currants, red licorice, Dr. Pepper, bacon, pepper and sandalwood. Drink now_2013.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Kynsi
"Very rich, spicy and full-bodied for a rosé. The raspberry and strawberry flavors have a grilled, caramelized quality, making for a slightly sweet finish. Fortunately, there is high acidity, giving this high octane rosé needed crispness.",Tempranillo,Gundlach Bundschu
"By contrast with some of the other powerful reds from Triguedina, this is a relatively soft, velvet-textured wine. But don't be deceived: beneath the smooth surface, there is a dark and mineral wine, all solid fruits and rich black berries.",Clos Triguedina La Chapelle du Clos,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Here's a cheerful and bright super Tuscan blend that tastes soft and dense in the mouth and offers impressive intensity and elegance for this everyday, low price. The velvety finish is accented by flavors of ripe cherry and raspberry tart.",Cingalino,Villa Pillo
"Poggio ai Ginepri (a luscious blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Merlot that is aged 50-50 in stainless steel and oak) shows fresh fruit characteristics of blackberry, cherry and plum. There are spice and tobacco notes but they are distant and well dosed. This is a great food wine to pair with any beef, veal or pork dish.",Poggio ai Ginepri,Tenuta Argentiera
This is a very likable and easy-to-drink blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon that moves over the palate with bright fruit intensity and silky tannins. The wine is fresh and would pair well with a heaping plate of sausage and white Tuscan beans.,Daniello,Tenuta di Trecciano
"Fragrant and fresh, this is a great bright, crisp Vinho Verde. The acidity is intense, balanced with an elegant softer texture. It just cries out for seafood.",Clemen Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"Mineral, lime and crisp apple aromas give it a precise, pure nose. And that same character exists on the palate and finish, where white peach, green banana and melon flavors are full and forward. Shows good concentration and quality for a large-production bubbly at this price.",Aria Estate Brut,Segura Viudas
"This estate is right in the south of the Vinho Verde. That gives the wine extra weight, with added richness from the Avesso grape. The aftertaste brings in crispness.",Avesso,Solar de Pinheiro
"This single vineyard Vinho Verde is complex and powerful. The texture is creamy, rich, with hints of pineapple as well as grapefruit. There is an edgy texture, balanced with the crispest final acidity.",Quinta de Simaens,Borges
"Ripe, fruity Chardonnay, with toast flavors balancing with smooth apricot and pear juice. The wine is soft, rich and generous, finishing with a light acidity.",Cova da Ursa,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"No oak on this crisp wine, whose flavors are so immediately likeable. It's bright and clean in acidity, with racy notes of pineapples, Asian pears and limes. Finishes off-dry, with a honeysuckle richness.",,Husch
"This brilliantly crisp Sauvignon Blanc is racy in acids and minerals, making it clean and zesty in the mouth. But it also has rich waves of citrus, green apple, melon and tropical fruit flavors. For all the opulence, it finishes dry. Production was 7,640 cases.",,Husch
"Spicy scents introduce a fresh and fleshy pear-flavored Pinot Gris, with a crisp underpinning of wet stone and medium acids. Citrus peel, light orange and pineapple weave into the midpalate, and the wine fills the mouth without being heavy.",Signature,King Estate
"This is a crisp, solidy structured Marlborough Pinot (a region known more for soft and accessible Pinots), which gives it a leg up on much of the competition. Plum and cherry fruit dominates, with shadings of mocha, root beer and tea leaves adding touches of complexity. Drink now_2018.",Pioneer Block 4 Sawcut,Saint Clair
"Smells clean as a mountain stream, with apple, peach and mellow citric aromas. Shows medium intensity and controlled citrusy acids along with grapefruit, pineapple and passion fruit flavors that come largely from the 20% Sauvignon Blanc in the blend; the rest is 70% Chardonnay and 10% the local Picapoll grape. Interesting, and a very good Catalonian white wine to match with seafood.",Abadal Chardonnay-Sauvignon Blanc-Picapoll,Masies d'Avinyo
"Crafted from five estate lots, Vino Noceto's Riserva is classic Foothills Sangiovese, with cranberry and dark cherry mingling around a light texture, high acidity and a smooth, caramel finish.",Riserva,Vino Noceto
"Dried fruit with great freshness in this warm, rounded 10-year-old tawny. It has delicious acidity, ripe fruitiness and a caramel richness. Like all aged tawnies, it is ready to drink.",10 Anos Tawny,Wiese & Krohn
"The almost-16% alcohol is difficult to ignore here, as it seems to blow away the nuances that these Woodward Canyon Merlots are usually so good at expressing. As a result, the fruit seems simple, with sweet berry and hints of oranges. It's round and concentrated, but not as textural and detailed as past vintages.",,Woodward Canyon
"Scurati is a balanced and firm wine with a bright, almost crunchy quality to the fruit and easy notes of leather and spice on the close. Pair it with barbecued grilled sausages or hamburgers.",Scurati,Ceuso
"Naw_ri is Pinot Nero from high altitude vineyards in Sicily, offering sweet fruit aromas of wild berry and almond paste with background notes of rubber, smoked bacon and crushed minerals.",Vajasindi Naw_ri,Duca di Salaparuta
"This beautiful Sicilian Insolia opens with a fragrant bouquet of almond and citrus blossoms, peach and passion fruit. The mouthfeel is silky and pure, making this wine an excellent choice for sushi or Vietnamese fish specialties.",Colomba Platino,Duca di Salaparuta
"A great value choice, this bright Nero d'Avola shows aromas of ripe fruit and blackberry framed by oak spice and leather. There's a pleasing fullness and thickness to the wine that would match up well with grilled meats.",,Cusumano
"Grillo is a popular white variety planted in many areas of Sicily and once used as a blending component in Marsala. This expression is fresh, clean and marked by bright citrus endnotes.",,D'Alessandro
"Esterlina's Dry offering is smooth, crisp and yes, dry, with a lot of light lemon scents and flavors. Would pair well with seafood or lemony chicken.",Dry,Esterlina
"This Bordeaux-style blend of 50% Cab Sauv, 45% Merlot and 5% Petit Verdot exhibits an attractive herbal character throughout, with notes of forest foliage accenting the blackberry, cherry and currant core. Gripping and firm in the mouth, with a soft hint of sweet spice on the close.",Petit Castel,Domaine du Castel
"Made with a mix of indigenous grapes, this satisfying white wine from Sardinia would pair well with shellfish, grilled vegetables, exotic spicy dishes or Italian kitchen classics. The wine imparts aromas of stone fruit, honeysuckle and white almond.",Iselis,Argiolas
"Bright and concentrated raspberry fruit is the hallmark of this Washington Zinfandel, with the acidity it needs to support almost 16% alcohol. High-toned and juicy, the fruit shines, though the finish turns chalky.",,Animale
"Single vineyard, pure Sangiovese__are in Washington__ields a compact, fruity wine with cherry and cassis flavors. There is a high-toned lift to the aromas, and plenty of supporting acidity.",Candy Mountain Vineyard,Balboa
"Versace is a smooth but easy Sicilian Nero d'Avola with ripe fruit and loads of dark, sun-ripened concentration. The mouthfeel is soft, round and chewy.",Versace,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Inspired by fashion icon Versace, this interpretation of Nero d'Avola opens with dense blackberry and blueberry aromas with background tones of spice and almond. This Sicilian estate belongs to the owner of one of Italy's biggest fashion-media groups.",Versace,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Sicilia and Syrah make a formidable team. This value wine from the Sambuca area of the island opens with a soft, velvety mouthfeel and delivers plump aromas of black fruit, cherry, white pepper and dark spice. The fruit element is bright and focused.",Stemmari,Feudo Arancio
"This pristine expression of Grillo opens with dry aromas of hay and crushed white stone followed by melon, citrus, pear and white almond. There's a spicy touch of white pepper on the close.",Altavilla della Corte,Firriato
"This sweet Marsala opens with a dark amber color and bright aromas of caramel, brown sugar, candied fruit and spice. Try a few sips of this delicious wine after dinner as a digestivo.",Fine Sweet,Florio
"Fondo Antico offers a clean and pretty Nero d'Avola without those messy, charred aromas you sometimes find in cheap versions of this indigenous grape. The nose is well put together, with elements of cherry, spice, almond and fresh citrus zest.",,Fondo Antico
"This is a very crisp wine dominated by herbaceous notes and intense acidity. It is bright and lively, hinting at spice and toast and tantalizingly fresh on the finish.",Colheita Seleccionada,Herdade de São Miguel
"Soft and rounded wine, with rich peach and pineapple flavors. The wine is smooth, the wood aging adding a subtle touch of spice. The long, creamy aftertaste suggests a wine that is ready to drink.",,Joseph Drouhin
"Sweet, jammy and a touch raisiny on the bouquet, with a roasted quality summing things up. Feels more acidic than expected, with zest and juiciness pushing flavors of blackberry mixed with tobacco and vanilla. Finishes herbal and oaky, but ripe and ready.",Inspiración Valdemar,Bodegas Valdemar
"Dietro le Case (__ehind the houses_) is a pure expression of Inzolia that opens with a pale hay color and fragrant aromas of melon, apricot and dried flowers. It's a simple, fresh wine with accents of citrus and honey.",Dietro le Case,Cantine Barbera
"Single-variety expressions of Perricone (a dark red grape found in Sicily) are showing up more frequently and are quickly cementing the grape's quality potential. A dark red color marks this wine's appearance, as do intense aromas of blackberry, plum and spice.",Sachia,Caruso & Minini
"Opens with waxy, sweet aromas of yellow apples and honey. Feels good, round and balanced, with Golden Delicious apple flavors sweetened by honey drippings and melon. Stays sweet but maintains a fruit component on the finish even as the texture and intensity dissipate. Good for varietal Xarel-lo.",XA Vinyes Velles Made with Organic Grapes,Albet I Noya
"A very good dessert wine, whose acidity provides balance to the sweet apricot, orange, vanilla and honeysuckle flavors. A bit of tease, it would score far higher with greater intensity.",Late Harvest,Longboard
"Riesling Kaiton is partly aged in large casks to achieve a smooth, creamy mouthfeel with bright aromas of peach blossom, honey, natural rubber and fresh kiwi fruit. There's a tiny touch of white almond on the close as well.",Kaiton,Kuenhof
"A tight, dry and somewhat one-dimensional Pinot Noir. It offers cherry, cola and spice flavors, and is elegantly structured. Grows more interesting as it warms in the glass, but it's ready for drinking now.",Las Brisas Vineyard,Mahoney
"A feminine wine, soft, gentle and delicious in flavor. Feels light and silky in the mouth, with rich notes of cherries, raspberries, cotton candy, buttered cinnamon toast and sandalwood. Almost sweet, but it finishes nice and dry. Drink now_2013.",Estate Stone Corral Vineyard,Kynsi
"Released almost a full year ago, this wine has had a chance to settle into a groove in the bottle. It is a medium plum color, lightly scented with herb, green and black tea, and Bing cherry. The flavors are astringent and compact, with a pretty burst of cherry in the core.",Reserve,Lange
"Starts out a little gaseous and sulfuric, but it picks up steam in the mouth, where flavors of apricot, citrus and tropical fruits perform a likeable dance. Powerful acidity pushes it in the right direction, and the finish of lychee, passion fruit and nectarine is lasting. Very nice wine but relatively high in price.",,Mar de Frades
"Soft and full in the mouth, with spice adding an extra dimension to the broad berry fruits. The wine is ready to drink, its acidity melding well into the richness. The final taste is solid and dense.",,Château la Croix Melin
"A richly textured wine, showing some attractive fresh fruits and soft berries mingling with a layer of firmer tannins. The wine has weight, an attractive edge of spice and a final sweet juicy character.",,Château Plaisance
"Starts off with slightly confected yet delicious aromas of cherries, almond paste and vanilla, but turns slightly more savory on the palate, where it picks up some herbal shadings. This is relatively light in body, with a crisp structure that suggests it may last longer than most Marlborough Pinots; drink now_2017.",,Churton
"Black fruit and taut structure are joined with black currant acidity and a core of the driest tannins. The wine has the cool 2007 feel to it, and is certainly ready to drink now.",Le Rouge et le Noir,Clos d'Yvigne
"A blend of four traditional Portuguese grape varietals, this unusual offering begins with a distinctly pruney nose, and seems soft and slightly oxidized. But as it breathes it adds interesting flavors of dried herbs and forest floor, rustic and complex.",Tradição Red,Coelho
This wine shows bright berry fruit and some light shades of smoke and spice that come from careful aging in large oak casks. Pair it with pasta or roast chicken with rosemary potatoes.,Villa di Capezzana,Capezzana
"Evocative Malbec perfumes, with mint and wild herbs mingling together, set the scene for this concentrated, ripe, juicy wine. The black plum and berry fruits are right up front, lifted by great acidity.",Cèdre Héritage,Château du Cèdre
"The Buzet co-op's top brand, this is big, powerful and rich. It is dominated by blackberry jelly and sweet plums, as well as firm tannins. The palate is weighty, solid, maybe missing freshness but certainly giving good intensity.",Baron d'Ardeuil Vieilles Vignes,Vignerons de Buzet
". The wine is easy, fresh and redolent of wild berries, cherries, peppercorn and clove. It tastes rich and consistent thanks to its naturally firm tannins.",,Tenuta di Trecciano
"Stylistically, this is at odds with what I feel Albariño should be. That said, it's a well-executed and well-made barrel-fermented white with full-force toast and popcorn aromas followed by a resiny, vanilla-fueled flavor profile that folds in apple, banana and creamy frosting. Still vital and healthy after three years in bottle.",Nora da Neve,Nora
"Satisfies the basic Port requirements of sweetness, firm tannins and crisp acidity. Quite good in blackberry, black currant liqueur and chocolate flavors. Needs an extra layer of richness and complexity, though.",,Meyer Family Cellars
"A blend from two well-regarded vineyards, this Chardonnay is ultrarich in pineapple, mango, pear and green apple fruit flavors that are liberally accented with sweet, caramelized oak. Crisp acidity and a steely minerality fortunately provide balance. Drink now.",Sangiacomo Vineyard-Truchard Vineyard,X
"Big, ripe and spicy, with tobacco and herbal flavors alongside the black currant intensity and powerful acidity. It is rich while the austere tannins of the Baga grape are still young. Keep for 2_3 years.",Primavera Reserva,Caves Primavera
"While there is a mineral austerity to this wine, it has the potential for richness. It offers dark berries and sweet plums under the dense layer of tannins. Give it 2_3 years at least.",,Château Suau
"A broad, ripe wine, with peach and apricot flavors to go with a fine citrus tang. Full in the mouth, very fruity and attractively textured with green plum skin juiciness.",Princesse de Cleves,Clos d'Yvigne
"Very full-bodied and richly forward in raspberries, cherries and oranges, with the yeasty lees and toast of sparkling wine. A little too big for classic elegance, but dry and easy to like.",Cuvée de la Pompadour Brut Rosé,Domaine Carneros
"An extravagantly perfumed Riesling billowing with white jasmine and elderflower notes. The floral tones are maintained on the palate as well, but interlaced with notes of stone and slate that add richness and complexity. The finish is dry and elegant, ending with a hint of bitter lime pith.",HJW Vineyard Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"For Navarran Merlot-Cab, Inurrieta Norte is always a winner. This vintage has good darkness along with smooth aromas of black fruit, earth, rubber and spice. It's a bit acidic and shrill as a tasting wine but will do fine at the table. The mouth is spunky and shows slightly herbal raspberry and plum flavors. Finishes light and easy.",Norte,Inurrieta
"For a rosado cava, this offers nice fruit, balance and complexity. The nose is pure cherry and raspberry, but in subdued doses. Meanwhile, it's zesty, foamy and fresh in the mouth, with nectarine, plum, strawberry and prickle. Perfectly nice for everyday quaffing.",Cordon Rosado Brut,Freixenet
"This value-priced offering starts off with slightly subdued notes of passion fruit, but gains a bit of intensity on the palate. It's a simple, tropically fruity Sauvignon Blanc with a soft, easygoing finish.",,Frenzy
"A nice everyday sparkler. It's a little sweet and very forward in lime and strawberry flavors, with the yeast and toast complications of a fine sparkling wine.",VA de VI Ultra Cuvée,Gloria Ferrer
"Waipara isn't usually considered Sauvignon Blanc country, but this is a creditable effort, boasting ample melon and fig flavors and a shot of grassiness on the otherwise soft finish.",,Grey's Peak
"The wine is redolent of bright blueberry and cherry with a tonic, youthful berry feel in the mouth. This easy blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (60%), Syrah and Cabernet Franc would make the perfect companion to pizza or pasta.",Digi_,Batzella
"A winning combination of sweet and savory, Belhurst's Traditions smells deliciously of syrupy boysenberry jam amidst the backdrop of a rustic barnyard. On the palate, juicy, ripe black fruit flavors gain complexity from a rich, earthy mushroom notes in the midpalate. Luscious and smooth with medium body and soft acidity.",Traditions,Belhurst
"Lots of raspberry, cherry, cola, red currant, licorice and bacon flavors in this dry Pinot Noir, and it has a wonderfully silky texture. Loses a few points for an acidic sharpness, though, that's likely to never go away.",Lambda,Ampelos
"The wild raspberry and cherry fruit is starting to drop out from this five-year-old wine, leaving behind alcohol and acidity. Turns astringent on the finish. Hard to see it improving with more age, but it's interesting for a certain complex tension.",Moonridge Vineyards,Korbin Kameron
"Except for some excessive sweetness, this is a brilliant wine. It's bright and clean in acidity, offering pineapple, lime and golden mango flavors that go on and on into the spicy finish. No question how delicious it is, but could be a bit drier and firmer.",Clone 76,Kynsi
"Dark and berrylicious, a Syrah with leather, cedar and mint undertones that's both dense and rustic. Its dark plum, boysenberry and blueberry flavors long and lingering on the finish.",,Malibu Rocky Oaks
"Klipsun vineyard grapes are fermented in stainless steel to produce this crisp and refreshing Sauvignon Blanc. In 2010, a cool vintage even at this Red Mountain site, the grassy side of the grape is in the spotlight. A little sweatiness blows off with airing, then the lemongrass and light melon flavors come through, with plenty of acid backing.",AnArtisticThought,Stevens
"A fine spine of minerals and acidity provides welcome relief to the sweet pineapple, vanilla, buttered toast and tropical fruit flavors of this Chardonnay. It's soundly made in the popular style.",,Storrs
"Leone d'Almerita is a blend of Catarratto, Chardonnay, Sauvignon and Traminer that opens with a fragrant floral bouquet and pretty notes of honey, peach blossom and marzipan.",Leone d'Almerita,Tasca d'Almerita
"This aged wine shows tertiary aromas of dried fruit, cured meat, bresaola and toasted almond. The wine is garnet in color with browning hues. Drink immediately.",Torreforte,Tenuta Barone Nicolò La Lumia
"Brambly blackberry and cassis fruit dominates the overall character of this wine, with additional hints of cedary spice and black tea leaves unfolding in the background. A touch of cocoa flavor dusts the medium-length finish, while soft tannins and medium acidity make this an easy drinker now.",Special Reserve,Segal's
"Il Frappato is a light, fruity red wine that is vinified in stainless steel to maintain its lively raspberry and blueberry flavors. It can be served slightly chilled and goes down easily with vegetables, veal or white meat.",Il Frappato,Valle dell'Acate
"Prius is a bright rosé from Sardinia that offers fun aromas of myrtle berry, chopped herb, bramble and savory spice. It's a crisp, silky wine that would pair with Thai or Indian dishes.",Prius,Tenute Soletta
"Sweet, smoky oak marks this Chardonnay, lending it buttered toast and charred wood flavors that challenge the orange, apricot and pineapple fruit. It's an impressively powerful wine, if a little overworked.",,Testarossa
"Terre di Maria is a Sicilian blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Pinot Noir that opens with dark concentration and savory aromas of spice, cured meat, smoked bacon and dark berry fruit. The bouquet is slightly muddled but the mouthfeel is bright and fresh.",Tenuta di Budonetto Terre di Maria,Maurigi
"A great value wine from Sicily present on restaurant lists across southern Italy, La Segreta is a famously food-friendly red blend that offers light berry, cherry, almond and spice aromas. The easy mouthfeel pairs with pasta, risotto, veal or roast chicken.",La Segreta,Planeta
"Delicio is a Sicilian expression of Fiano with a creamy mouthfeel and easy aromas of dried hay, pear and Golden Delicious apple. Pair this wine with Caesar salad.",Delicio,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"Lighea is a terrific wine and an excellent pairing partner to vegetarian and seafood recipes alike. Thanks to the aromatic Zibibbo grape, the wine offers a fragrant bouquet of citrus flower and honey. But it is not overtly sweet in the mouth and that's why it pairs with savory foods.",Lighea,Donnafugata
"Nero d'Avola and Merlot are blended to produce a tight, crisp, cherry-driven red wine with almond and toasted pistachio overtones. Pair this wine with veal, chicken or pork.",Triskelè,Duca di Salaparuta
"This wine features earthy characteristics of wild mushroom, wild berry, forest floor and bright cassis. The texture is thick and velvety, and there's a touch of softness on the close.",V90,Brugnano
Raisins and ripe fruit combine in this LBV that has some richness while remaining on the dry side. Blackberry jelly is layered with acidity and a dark tannic structure. For drinking now.,Late Bottled Vintage,Cálem
"This oak-heavy blend of Chardonnay and indigenous Sicilian grapes opens with luscious tones of toasted almond, apricot and candied lemon. There's a spicy vanilla note on the close, and the wine will appeal to those who appreciate an oaky Italian white.",Villa di Chiesa,Cantina Santadi
"Made with organically-farmed Catarratto grapes, Beleda is a fragrant white wine with aromas of dried flower, kiwi, mango and lime. There's a sharp, tonic, zesty quality to the mouthfeel.",Beleda,Cantine Rallo
"From the Erice area of Sicily in the southwest corner of the island, this bright Insolia offers crisp aromas of citrus, cut grass and white almond. It's a simple, genuine wine that is put together nicely.",Lev_ntio,Fazio
"Named after fashion designer Alberta Ferretti, this oak-aged Chardonnay delivers layers of soft, ripe mango and pineapple. The mouthfeel is thick and creamy.",Alberta Ferretti,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Here's an elaborate expression of Grillo that shows more density and richness than you normally see with this Sicilian native white grape. The wine offers peach, apricot and almond flavors.",Carolina Marenga,Feudi del Pisciotto
"This bright wine offers fresh and tangy fruit, dark concentration and bold aromas of blackberry and toasted almond. That nutty note is typical of this popular Sicilian grape variety.",Stemmari,Feudo Arancio
"Fragrant white florals and concentrated flavors of juicy pink pomelo are effortlessly decadent on this semidry Riesling. While soft and supple on entry, there's a nervy edge of Meyer lemon pith accentuated by a long, mineral-laced finish.",,Glenora
"Greg Graziano's Chenin, grown in a 30-plus-year-old vineyard, among the last of its kind in Mendocino County, is crisp and nutty, supported by dried apple, honey and melon-tinged minerality. Fermented in all French oak barrels, the wine has a calming roundness amid its acidity.",,Graziano
"Rossojbleo opens with distinct aromas of oatmeal cookie, Graham cracker and bright red fruit. It's a unique expression, with just enough acidity to keep the plate refreshed.",Rossojbleo,Gulfi
"From the Lonesome Spring Ranch Vineyard, in the eastern Yakima valley, this pure varietal offering starts sharp and then quickly softens up, with creamy apple and peach fruit flavors. It turns a little hot on the finish, but overall it's a smooth, easy-drinking style.",Shameless Hussy,Hard Row To Hoe
"With some weight, this is a smooth red-fruited wine with just a hint of bananas. The balance works well, marrying acidity and light tannins. Fruity and attractive.",Nouveau,Domaine de la Madone
"Honey and lanolin notes add an unctuous vibe to sweet, concentrated peach and honeysuckle flavors in this semidry Riesling. Its straightforward in its appeal, yet undeniably balanced. Bright acidity and a clean, dry finish make it a welcome companion to everything from veal schnitzel to Chinese takeout.",Semidry,Chateau Lafayette Reneau
"What a nice wine for $20 or less. It's lovely to drink now, with soft, sweet tannins and forward cherry, raspberry, currant, red licorice and chocolate flavors.",The Cab,Cosentino
"Angimbé is a versatile and food-friendly blend of Insolia and Chardonnay, with deep aromas of caramel, pineapple, honey and apricot. The wine sports an off-gold color, a sweet, creamy finish and a dash of piquant spice on the close.",Angimbé,Cusumano
"Antero is a 100% expression of Merlot with green notes of eucalyptus, caper olive and herbs. There's a warm note of graham cracker as well and the wine ends with sweet, firm concentration.",Antero,Le Grascete
"This fresh blend of Trebbiano and Vermentino from the hills outside Pisa offers pretty aromas of green fruit, kiwi, melon, cut grass and passion fruit. This is a crisp and fresh with a sharp, determined close.",Il Burchino,Tenuta di Burchino
"A good, strong, rustic wine, with firm tannins and low acidity. The flavors are rich and complex, ranging from fresh summer blackberries to dried fruits, cocoa, licorice and briary spices. Nice as a smoother alternative to Zinfandel.",Murill Vineyard-1916 Vines,Obscurity
"The aromas and tastes of oak dominate this Chardonnay, with buttered toast and sweet caramel riding high over the pineapple, mango and pear flavors. But crisp acidity provides needed balance, and there's a fine minerality that gives a tang of stone. A good price for a Chard this complicated.",,Ventana
"A good, dry Pinot Noir, tart in acidity, and showing flavors of sour cherries, currants and beef jerky, sweetened with caramelized oak. It's a little rustic, but elegant. Drink now.",Balo Vineyard,Tudor Wines
"Here's a pure expression of Syrah from Tuscany that shows loads of sun-ripened aromas of mature berry, mesquite, pepper and smoked ham. True to the variety, the wine is smooth and rich on the close with soft tannins.",Suavis Locus Ille,Tenuta di Trecciano
"Calasole has a very nice, silky feel in the mouth followed by ripe aromas of peach, honeydew and pear. Thanks to Vermentino's natural structure, this is a very food-friendly wine that could pair with pasta or white meat.",Calasole,Rocca di Montemassi
"Very ripe and bright in lemon, lime, apricot, apple, pear, vanilla, buttered toast and honeysuckle flavors. The acidity is strong and bright. It's a good, rich Chardonnay despite needing more subtlety and complexity.",Nagasawa Vineyard,Paradise Ridge
"Pretty rich and exotic for a Sauvignon Blanc, with tropical fruit and orange fruit flavors that might easily be Viognier. But it shows Sauvignon's zingy acidity, and finishes a little sweet. Easy to drink on its own.",Grandview Vineyard,Paradise Ridge
"The blend is 50% Sangiovese with Merlot, Syrah and Alicante, and the final result is that of richness, plushness and all around berry intensity. The fade is soft, slightly sweet and driven by easy berry flavors. Would make a fabulous companion to pasta and meat roast type dishes.",Mirus,Mocali
"This tastes like a warm climate, soft, round Cabernet, full-bodied and etched in dark, smoky tannins. The alcohol reaches 14.8% but does not burn; the fruit is a mix of figs and plums and ripe black cherries. Already four years old, it's drinking very well now and may be at its best over the next couple of years.",,Pheasant Valley Winery
"A full, rather indistinct wine that shows plums and damson flavors under a layer of tough tannins. The sweeter fruit flavors come through slowly, and the pepper alcohol edge never goes away.",,Monte do Pintor
"At just 12.5% alcohol, you'll find this lively, light, fruity Pinot has a sweet core of pretty cherry fruit. Nonetheless, it's dry and finishes with an astringent, leafy, palate-refreshing scrape of tannin. A fine sipping wine, with a resonant finish.",Whole Cluster Fermented,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"For a sort of kitchen sink blend composed of Grenache Blanc, Chenin Blanc, Mauzac, Sauvignon Blanc, Vermentino and Chasan, this wine is surprisingly pleasing and easy to drink with flavors of lively melon, stone fruit and accents of lime citrus. Versatile for food pairing, easy to drink and a terrific value.",ClaudeVal Blanc,Domaines Paul Mas
"Shows the rich fruit, acidity and silky texture of Calera's spot on Mount Harlan, with cherry, cola and sweet sandalwood flavors. It's not as complex or concentrated as the single-vineyard bottlings, but is a good approximation.",Mt. Harlan Cuvée,Calera
"Clean and crisp in acidity, with a rich overlay of smoky, caramelized oak, this Chardonnay has appealing pineapple, peach and lime fruit flavors. There's a honey sweet finish, although the wine itself is totally dry. Good price for all this opulence.",Reserve,EOS
"With its soft acidity, silky mouthfeel and very ripe raspberry, cherry, currant, mocha and pepper flavors that finish almost sweet, this is a classic Paso Robles Zinfandel. It's a little hot in alcohol, but not too much.",Reserve,EOS
"A very nice wine that takes the variety's rustic nature and elevates it into elegance, at a good price. The wine is dry and soft, with rewarding red berry, currant, mocha and dusty spice flavors.",Keyes Canyon Ranches,Estancia
"Aromas of cherry and leather come with burnt earth and smoke, but overall the nose is inviting. The palate is solid in feel, with good weight and drive that supports a smoky flavor profile of red berries and controlled bitterness. Finishes toasty, with a lick of bitter chocolate.",Elyssia Pinot Noir Brut,Freixenet
"You'll find thick tannins and soft acidity in this wine, which offers direct, jammy blackberry and cassis flavors. It's quite a rich wine that seems best now and for the next few years.",Estate Grown Redwood Retreat Vineyards,Fernwood
"An upscale hamburger wine, fruity and spicy. There's a bacony, smoked meat note to the raspberries and cherries that will play well against the char of grilled beef.",Rock n Red,Headbanger
"This is a big, spicy wine, its dark berry fruits balanced with ginger, acidity and wood. It has power and good concentration, leaving a rich, jammy aftertaste.",Rocim,Herdade do Rocim
"Sweet red peach flavors combine with honey in this soft, accessible wine. It has a layer of botrytis and just a hint of dryness. Drink now and over the next few years.",,Château Suau
"Softly appealing, with rich flavors of raspberries, cherries and spices. Oak barrel aging adds textured notes of vanilla, smoke and caramel. A pretty, polished Pinot Noir for drinking now.",Gold Coast Vineyard,Costa de Oro
"A perfectly solid Garnacha with pepper, bright red fruit and a touch of country style to the bouquet despite its pedestrian price. The palate is bright and tastes of plum and red berry, while the feel is good and the finish fruity and lively. What inexpensive red wine should be.",,Crucillon
"Light berry fruit, alcohol around 13%, a pale color, and plenty of acidity characterize this Pinot Noir. Still tightly wound, it may add some flesh with further bottle age. The aromas hint at tomato leaf, and the wine fades gently.",Bass Hill,Amity Vineyards
"Appealing now for its rich waves of raspberry and cherry jam, cola, anise, bacon and smoky oak flavors. Delicious and refined, with the light, silky texture you expect from Pinot Noir. Seems best now for its youthful opulence.",Rho,Ampelos
This 60-40 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot opens with jammy aromas of cherry marmalade and blackberry preserves. The fruit tones are very intense but the spice nuances are integrated and folded within the natural density of the mouthfeel.,Patrimonio,Antonino Tringali-Casanuova
"A pretty good Pinot Noir from a producer that specializes in it. Shows the classy balance of the winery's more expensive bottlings, although it's not as rich in fruit. But it's still a nice, dry wine. Easy to find, with 35,800 cases produced.",Avant-Garde,Domaine Carneros
"This is a wonderful Pinot Noir to drink now for its dry crispness, silky elegance, and pleasant cherry, currant, Dr. Pepper  and teriyaki beef flavors. Polished and supple, and easy to find, with nearly 38,000 cases produced.",,Husch
"A nice clean Sauvignon Blanc, whose brisk acidity gives the lemon-drop and lime flavors a kick. Tastes distinctly sweet in the finish. There's no oak in this fresh, fruity young wine.",,Alta Maria
"Only one barrel was made with fruit from the Doc Stewart vineyard on the Wahluke Slope. The saturated color and a nose redolent of forest floor and dried leaves are attractive, but the fruit falls rather lightly on the palate, delivering strawberry-candy flavors. Balanced and a bit earthy.",,Animale
"This well structured wine from sunny Sardinia opens with an off-gold color and intense aromas of ripe melon, apricot, honey and almond. Spice and acidity make for a crisp finish.",Is Argiolas,Argiolas
"This Chardonnay straddles the line between complexity and simplicity, with toasty orange and pineapple flavors brightened with citrusy acidity. Savory minerality adds interest and food friendliness.",McMinn Vineyards,Dogwood
"A red-fruited wine, with an attractive edge of tannins. The wine has red-berry fruit flavors, a dry core and a fresh, smoky aftertaste. Ready to drink.",,Château Dubraud
"Fresh and fruit-forward, there's a nice overall vibrancy to this wine that makes it an ideal choice for lightly-stewed chicken dishes or pizza. Strawberry and red cherry flavors flood the palate, while a hint of bittersweet chocolate remains after swallow.",Reserve,Binyamina
"Light raspberry fruit is enhanced by generous layers of coffee and chocolate. Aromatic and inviting, especially at this price, it brings in a hint of the barnyard on the gently fading finish.",,Blacksmith
"Terre di Giumara is a fresh and tight white wine with bright yellow fruit, peach and honey-roasted almond. The wine is full and ripe, with a touch of piquant spice on the close.",Terre di Giumara,Caruso & Minini
"An easy blend of oak-aged Nero d'Avola, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, Amongae represents a new, modern side of Sicilian winemaking. There are plush fruit aromas here, enhanced by tobacco, cigar box and drying mineral nuances.",Amongae,Maggiovini
"Bonera is a blend of Nero d'Avola (50%) and equal parts Cabernets Franc and Sauvignon. The bouquet is sweet and soft, with bright tones of red cherry, chocolate and espresso bean. The mouthfeel is firm, tight and fresh.",Bonera,MandraRossa
"A deliciously fresh wine, the bright acidity coming from green fruit and peaches. A creamy character adds a sense of roundness, but there is a crisp, taut aftertaste.",Reserva Branco,Kopke
"Lots of forward fruit flavor in this ripe Cabernet. It floods the mouth with blackberries, cherries and currants, with a smoky overlay of oak. Not particularly subtle, but it defines the modern style of Cabernet, and lots of people will love it.",,Michael James Wines
"This Pinot Nero is neutral on the nose with distant tones of small berry and violet. There's more power in the mouth, thanks to the long and silky nature of the tannins.",Tenuta di Budonetto Terre di Ottavia,Maurigi
"A rich, dry young Cabernet, with fresh blackberry, cherry and oak flavors, brightened by a burst of citrusy acidity. The tannins are strong, however, giving the wine a sandpapery astringency. Needs a few years, although it doesn't have the stuffing for the long haul. Your window is around 2014.",Cavedale Vineyards Smokin',Y Rousseau
"Le Segreta is an easy, popular red wine from Sicily that offers the wild berry, fennel, cola and almond-like aromas associated with the beautiful Mediterranean island. The mouthfeel is informal and crisp.",La Segreta,Planeta
"La Segreta is intentionally engineered to be one of those easy Italian whites that washes down fried calamari and spaghetti con vongole. Aromas include citrus, pear, white almond and honey.",La Segreta,Planeta
"Fermentation was done in a mix of stainless steel and French oak, yielding a soft, accessible, lightly spiced wine. Flavors mix notes of fresh cut grass and celery with melony fruit.",Estate Grown,Preston
"A fine Cabernet for drinking now. It's rich and soft in blackberry, currant, cherry, mocha and oak flavors, with a smooth mouthfeel and a long, spicy finish. Give it a brief decant.",,Stepping Stone by Cornerstone
"Gewürztraminer has lost some popularity lately, but this is really a lovely wine. It's spiciness and slight sweetness, not to mention the acidity, suggest pairing with today's Asian-inspired fare, especially based around chicken, lamb and pork.",Viento Vineyard,Storrs
"A nice Pinot Noir, with ripe, flashy red berry, cola and spice flavors. It's a bit rustic around the edges, but it does show a certain amount of elegance.",,Talley
"Lots of blackberry, plum, currant and oak flavors in this classic Bordeaux blend. It's so ripe, it's almost sweet, except that the finish is thoroughly dry, with a stimulating scour of tannins and citrusy acids. Right now it's direct and not very complex, leading to the question of ageability. All indications are that it's not a wine you want to cellar, so drink up.",Deux Chevaux Vineyard Rabicano,Tamber Bey
"Slightly herbal in style, with hints of tomato leaf accenting black cherry fruit. This is a crisp, fresh__ven tangy__ed that perhaps needs a few months to settle down and smooth out. Try it later this year; it should cellar well through 2018.",Cellar Selection,Villa Maria
"Scents of bacon fat from the new French oak introduce a tight young wine. The cured meat aromas and flavors somehow suggest a splash of Syrah in the blend, though none is noted. Give it a couple more years to smooth out and let the fruit come through.",,William Church
"Rich and spicy, with oak-influenced green apple, pear, peach and citrus flavors, brightened with fine acidity. The finish seems pretty sweet, making the wine more off-dry than dry.",,Terlato
"With brisk acidity and a tight, minerally feeling, this Pinot Noir is very dry, showing robust cherry flavors. It seems like an ager, but some raisiny overripeness might compromise it.",Brosseau Vineyard,Testarossa
"Fondo Filara offers an authentic taste of Etna winemaking at a reasonable low price. Delicate tones of wild berry, cassis and almond paste characterize the bouquet. The mouthfeel, on the other hand, shows power, length, tightness and firm structure.",Fondo Filara,Nicosia
"This edition of Rosso del Soprano from boutique winemaker Salvatore Geraci offers bright berry tones with easy background notes of almond, pistachio and tobacco. There's also a drying mineral note of crushed stone or talcum power that gives the wine backbone.",Rosso del Soprano,Palari
"Ripe and fruit-forward, this round Chard boasts intense aromas and flavors of tropical fruit, pear and orange oil along with a hint of yellow florals. Subtle toast and clove spice accents remains on the finish. Drink now.",Special Reserve,Segal's
"A sweet style of white Port, almost tawny in character, with nuts, acidity and old fruit flavors. Crystallized red fruits add an extra element. Drink by itself, or as long cocktail with tonic.",Porto White Reserva,Rozes
"This attractive, soft and fresh wine is fruity, with red berry flavors, balanced acidity and warm tannins. With its light touch of spice, it is ready to drink.",Periquita,José Maria da Fonseca
"A solid, ripe wine, very much a nouveau for food, with some rich cherry fruit and an underlying smoky tannin layer. The fruit is ripe and full.",Nouveau,Mommessin
"An exorbitantly rich Cabernet, one of the ripest from Santa Ynez Valley in memory. Just huge in blackberry, cherry and chocolate flavors, if a bit direct. Drink soon.",,Alta Maria
"Tight on the nose but also a bit oxidized and yeasty smelling. Feels more tangy and juicy than Alvear's Fino en Rama, with forward acidity, bite and cut. Flavorwise, there's a heavy dose of nuts, apricot and citrus followed by a zesty finish.",Fino,Alvear
"A light-bodied, delicate style of Pinot Noir, with pretty cherry fruit and plenty of forest and earth complexity. Silky on the finish, with hints of tea leaf. Probably best over the next year or two.",,Ara
"Tart, with brambly berry fruit, and even a bit of apricot. This was a cool year in Walla Walla, and the fruit flavors reflect that.",Pheasant Run Vineyard,Basel Cellars
"A soft acetone streak permeates the red cherry- and berry-driven bouquet, while red fruit and pomegranate flavors dominate the palate. A slightly twiggy herbal accent adds depth and staying power to the finish. Drink now.",Reserve,Bazelet HaGolan
"Almost tropical in style, with abundantly ripe mango and pineapple on the nose and palate, this semidry Riesling is irresistibly lush and fruity. Zippy tangerine acidity and a zesty orange peel note provides refreshing restraint on the finish.",Semi-Dry,Belhurst
"Quite earthy in profile with hints of smoke, petroleum and fresh green herbs, there's a distinct minerality in this off-dry Riesling that's compelling. Brisk lime-juice acidity and a hint of citrus rind bitterness accentuates the dry finish.",Dry,Billsboro
"Viognier and Sicily work well together to produce fragrant wines with aromas of honey, violets and exotic fruit. There's also a touch of alcoholic heat on the close.",Ginolfo,Baglio di Pianetto
"Lusty and ripe, jam-packed with upfront raspberries and cherries. A little lacking in complexity, but likeable for sheer deliciousness.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Chanin
"V90 is a soft red with bold fruit concentration and sweet aromas of jammy fruit, candied almond, vanilla and Christmas spice. It's a well-made wine with an easy approach and a bold mouthfeel.",V90,Brugnano
"All of the charms of this Merlot, Syrah and Zinfandel blend are on the surface, but what a pretty surface it is. Polished raspberry and cherry fruit, bacon, cream and a splendid array of flashy spices characterize the flavors.",The Count Founder's,Buena Vista
"This Syrah from Humboldt County is red fruit-forward and jam-packed with smoky caramel, cinnamon and meat. Thick as tar.",Kimberly's,Cabot Vineyards
"Pleasant, soft and smooth upon entry, this supple, almost buttery wine feels unusually light for this vineyard designate. Flavors suggest watermelon and strawberry, gently coated with a soft layer of coconut, cracker and butter cookie. Tasty, but not for long keeping.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Rujari is a hearty blend of Nero d'Avola, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon that opens with a dark, inky appearance and heavy aromas of ripe blackberry, cherry jam, cola and black licorice. The wine imparts a thick but slightly sour feel on the close.",Rujari,Cantine Rallo
"Pinot Nero in Sicily either works or it doesn't. This one does. The wine shows aromas of wild berry, peppermint, chopped mint, white cherry and red rose.",,Cusumano
"Cubìa is a bright, off-gold expression of Insolia with intense aromas of ripe fruit, apricot, caramel and butterscotch. More honey, passion fruit and pineapple follows on the palate.",Cubìa,Cusumano
"There's a jammy, sun-ripened note of strawberry or blackberry jam, but also soft layers of chocolate fudge and savory spice at the back of this Sicilian red. The mouthfeel is smooth and velvety.",Torre dei Venti,Fazio
"Here's an inky black and densely concentrated Cabernet Sauvignon that would pair with grilled sausage or barbecued steak. The wine is soft, round and slightly sweet on the finish.",Missoni,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Sicilian Cabernet Sauvignon is aged in large oak barrels to produce a clean, polished red wine with aromas of wild berry, blackberry, curry leaf, dried herb and white mushroom.",,Feudo Principi di Butera
"From a beautiful vineyard site in southern Sicily, this easy Nero d'Avola would pair well with lasagna or grilled pork sausages. Cherry, almond and wild berry aromas are followed by a bright, fresh mouthfeel.",,Feudo Principi di Butera
"There's a bit of warmth to the nose of this wine, but forest berry and red cherry aromas and flavors keep things vibrant and flavorful. It's approachable now with soft tannins and an easygoing structure, ending with a hint of milk chocolate.",Classico,Flam
"Soft, ripe and warm, this has attractive acidity, its lemon and pineapple fruit offering richness as well as a fine texture. Very pure fruit give the wine a delicious final line of acidity.",,Domaine Guillemot-Michel
"Round and fruity, with puckery lemon-lime and tangerine fruit front and center. Some sort of oak treatment is in evidence, with a streak of vanilla wafer running through the finish.",,Cloudlift Cellars
"Sometimes you need a solid wine to pair with spaghetti and meat sauce or simple meat dishes like pork or breaded veal. This Sicilian Nero d'Avola fits the bill and offers a bright bouquet of berry, almond and cola.",Passo delle Mule Suar Marchesa,Duca di Salaparuta
"Grillo is the base for many famous Sicilian white wines including fortified Marsala. However in this case, the grape produces a crisp, fresh, easy-drinking wine that pairs with seafood or Thai mango salad.",Kados Risignolo,Duca di Salaparuta
"A classic Concannon Petite with plum and meat that's nicely integrated, smooth going down and resplendent in aromatics, topped off with a cherry finish. Captain Joe was the founder of Concannon's son, a member of the first American calvary.",Captain Joe's,Concannon
"A rich Nouveau, with fine black cherry fruit and some sweetness. It's a full-bodied wine, the tannins and acidity offering a sense of structure. A definite food Beaujolais.",Nouveau,Henry Fessy
"You can taste the dosage on this Chardonnay, Pinot Noir and Pinot Meunier brut in the overt sweetness that accompanies the pear, citrus and raspberry fruit flavors. With noticeable residual sugar, it's not really a dry sparkling wine, but it is delicious.",Vintage Brut,J Vineyards & Winery
"Broadly fruity, with a palate of mixed red berries and cherries. Light and balanced, this is well-made, of medium length, and ready to drink right away.",,Lujon
"A good Chardonnay, rich and creamy in pineapple, lime, Asian pear, vanilla and new oak flavors. It's balanced with crisp acidity. Drink now.",,Husch
"One of the winery's sweeter wines, this Pinot Noir-based bubbly has jammy raspberry, strawberry and vanilla flavors. Ultra-crisp acidity provides needed balance. It's a little heavy, but will appeal to those who want some sugar in their sparkling wine.",Russian Cuveé,Iron Horse
"Clear and focused, with raspberry and edgy spice aromas to the nose. The palate doesn't bring a whole bunch of meat or heft, but it is clean, racy and food-friendly. Flavors of red berries and pepper are normal and expected, while the finish is dry and lean.",Crianza,Marqués de Cáceres
"A rich, tasty wine, whose berry, cherry, smoked meat, anise, spice and sandalwood flavors are soft and gentle enough to drink now. Combining elegance with rusticity, its varietal blend is mainly Zinfandel, with Merlot and Cab Sauvignon and Franc.",Hooded Merganser,Paraduxx
"Lime, citrus and other pungent aromas get it off to a good start, while the palate is wet and fresh, with clean, familiar grapefruit, lime and nectarine flavors. Lighter and less concentrated than Naia, but still a very good Verdejo for the price.",Ducado de Altan,Naia
"Ripe and fruity, touched by mint with some good balancing tannins and acidity. A fine, firm and also juicy wine, with a warm texture.",Château Ducla,Yvon Mau
Alicante imparts bright berry notes and sharp tones of white almond and bramble. Poggio al Tufo's expression is easy and fine with very nice berry brightness on the close. Pair it with pasta topped with melted mozzarella cheese.,Poggio al Tufo,Tommasi
"This plush and easy expression of Syrah opens with distinct aromas of cured meat, spice, black fruit, white pepper and mature cherry. The wine is smooth and rich with a fine, soft nature of tannins.",,Villa Pillo
"Ripe and juicy, maybe a little rustic round the edges, certainly fruity. Red berry flavors dominate along with an edgy center of tannin, while juicy acidity completes this attractive wine.",Samora,Wines & Winemakers
"Here's a simple, fresh Vermentino that shows lively tones of yellow fruit, kiwi and a touch of freshly cut grass. The wine is tonic, crisp and keeps the palate clean. Screw cap.",Emilio Primo,Terre del Marchesato
"The Crossings continues to be a reliable source of Marlborough Sauvignon Blanc at a reasonable price. The 2009 seems almost sweet in its intensity of ripe nectarine fruit, but there's enough grapefruit for balance and just a trace of herb on the finish.",,The Crossings
"Soft and fruity, with raspberry, cherry, Dr. Pepper and oak flavors. It has the jammy, marmalade taste of freshly crushed berries, with citrusy acidity. The oak is front and center. Might develop with a few years in the bottle.",Amber Ridge Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"Restrained, with a slightly herbal edge to the mineral notes of wet stones. This is medium in weight and rather creamy in texture, giving it a food-friendly vibe. Drink up.",Boulder Bank,Nick Goldschmidt
"This is a strong, spicy Zin, with a big, bold mouthfeel. It has lots of wild berry, beef teriyaki, cola and pepper flavors, while brisk acidity gives it a scour. It's also bone dry. The roughness suggests a little time in the cellar. Try after mid-2011.",The Convict Rocky Ridge Vineyard,Paradise Ridge
"This medium-bodied, slightly creamy-textured Sauvignon Blanc showcases gooseberry and pink grapefruit flavors, with an appealing herbal note on the finish.",Cellar Selection,Sileni
"This superrich Zin has extracted, luxurious fruit. It's ripe in blackberry and cherry jam, milk chocolate, peppery spice and anise flavors, with an overripe note of Port. Drink now.",Edizione Pennino,Rubicon Estate
"A very nice wine, kind of a mongrel with its array of varietals, but rich and satisfying. Braced with crisp acidity, it offers flavors of tangerines, peaches, Meyer lemons, limes, green apples and honey, with a pleasant minerality. The blend is Viognier, Riesling, Sauvignon Blanc, Chardonnay and Pinot Gris.",Heritage Blanc,San Antonio
"Dry and subtle on the nose, with cherry and plum fruit scents mixed with balsam wood. The palate is tight, simple and offers a bit of creaminess to go with raspberry and oak-based vanilla and mocha. Light on the finish and fresh, with a medium body.",Reserva,Montecillo
"The dark tones suggest a wine that is already somewhat oxidized, and the apple cider fruit flavor seems to confirm the impression. Quite dry and mellow, it's time to drink this one up.",,Amity Vineyards
"Timid but clean as a whistle on the nose, with apple and vanilla aromas along with a sprinkling of talcum powder. The palate is lively and fresh, with flavors of pineapple, lemon and other tropical hints. Entirely pedestrian as cava goes, but 100% clean and refreshing.",Artesanía Brut de Brut,Cavas Hill
"Good density for a young wine. There is weight here, dry tannins that integrate well with the berry fruits and the wood. Firm, still developing; keep for 2 years.",,Château Cabredon
"Dry tannins dominate this rough-edged wine. There are plenty of bitter cherry and cocoa flavors, while the acidity gives an attractive freshness. Those tannins need a year to settle down.",,Château de Minière
"Soft, ripe and juicy, this is an attractive wine, with red berry flavors and a light structure. Not for the long term. Drink now for its fruity character.",,Château Pey la Tour
"Dry and peppery to start, with muted berry fruit aromas along with wood shavings. The palate is snappy, clean and juicy, with raspberry, vanilla and tobacco-like flavors. More basic than special, with a steady, light-framed finish. More than functional; likely good with food.",Añares Reserva,Bodegas Olarra
"Bright, ruby-colored Sangiovese is enhanced by Cabernet Sauvignon and Canaiolo to produce an easy-drinking, informal expression from Tuscany. In the mouth, this pretty wine has a compact, tonic feel and there's enough natural acidity to cut through cheese-filled ravioli.",,Capezzana
"This is a wine with good, dense and red fruit, a touch of wood and a firm structure. There is a sense of elegance backed up by some weight. The aftertaste brings in spice and balancing acidity.",,Château des Combes
"This oak-aged blend of Trebbiano, Colombana and Malvasia Bianca opens with a golden hay color and aromas of white flower, peach, citrus, almond and mineral. It has both structure and refreshing crispness on the finish.",,Botti in Balzi
"A very good Merlot except for some sharpness. The wine is dry and finely tannic, with black and red cherry, mocha, dried herb and tobacco flavors.",,Folie _ Deux
"Floral and mineral, this wine has white currant flavors, herbs and green vegetables. It's full of flavor, ripe and concentrated, with great waves of fruit. The aftertaste is dry, but there's also a hint of honey.",Le Chemin des Loges Sec,Domaine les Loges de la Folie
"This is a very rich, oaky Chardonnay, ripe and forward in the California style. Although it's dry, it's so fruity and honeyed, it's almost like a dessert wine. Swamps the palate with pineapple jam, buttered toast and vanilla cream flavors, which are nicely balanced with crisp acidity.",Cupa Grandis Grand Barrel Reserve,EOS
"Neutral aromas suggest peach, apple and minerality. Solid, compact and healthy on the palate, with peach and white pepper flavors. Good on the finish but starting to show some maturity; at peak level now so drink immediately or wait for the 2011.",Sobre Lías,Maior de Mendoza
A delightfully easy-drinking Petite Sirah with cherry fruit and licorice overriding a subtle note of tobacco. Drink now.,,Line 39
"Delicate aromas of toasted egg bread, baked apple and orange rind dance in the bouquet, while the brisk and effervescent mouth shows more red apple-skin flavor alongside acidic notes of pineapple core and lime zest. Balanced and refreshing.",Yarden Blanc de Blancs Brut,Golan Heights Winery
"Pinched smelling at first, with a note of turpentine. Airing eliminates that burn, leaving standard nut and vanilla aromas. Feels good and lively, with refreshing acidity and nutty, dry flavors of white fruits including peach and apricot. Finishes long and fresh.",Tio Pepe Fino Muy Seco,González Byass
"Big ripeness and bold fruit flavors characterize this sun-drenched expression of Nero d'Avola. The wine is soft and chewy, with cherry liqueur notes on the close.",Nerobaronj,Gulfi
"Easy to like for its orange and pear soda, vanilla cream and buttered toast flavors that are heightened and brightened with acidity. Shows real richness and class for the price in a popularly appealing Chardonnay.",Artisan Collection,HandCraft
"Well-made and creatively blended from Zinfandel, Syrah and Petite Sirah, this is a big, tannic wine, formidable in sweet blackberry, cherry, licorice and spice flavors. It's not subtle, but it is authentic. Drink now.",The Devious Woman,JR Wine
"Juicy on the nose and palate, with loads of sweet peach and melon, this semidry Riesling is balanced by brisk lime-tinged acidity and crisp starfruit flavors that shine on the midpalate. Finishes on a pleasantly drying jasmine-tea note.",,Knapp
"Rich and fine, if a little too sweet and oaky. But those are the popular tastes in Chardonnay, and Kunde delivers. The fruit is potent in pineapple jam and Key lime pie.",Estate,Kunde
"For a simple Beaujolais, this is an intensely rich wine with toast spice coming through the black cherry fruit. The tannins give a ripe structure. All the time, the wine remains true to its fruity origins.",Cuvée de la Platière,Domaine Chasselay
"Classified as medium dry on the IRF scale, this is a medium-bodied Riesling without much texture, yet classic apple and citrus aromas and flavors. A sensation of wet stone creeps in on the finish.",,Forrest
"There's a richness to this wine that's paired with a soft warmth throughout, as forward notes of kirsch, muddled ripe strawberries, braised rhubarb and red-plum flesh flood the nose and mouth. Drinkable now, but with a gripping finish.",,Psagot
"Round from the vintage, this is still an apple crisp and mineral Chablis. Its tang comes from citrus, with the bite of terroir adding a dry texture. The wine is not complex, ready to drink now.",Les Deux Rives,Olivier Leflaive
"A blend from Puligny-Montrachet and Meursault, this is a soft rounded wine with white fruit acidity, almond flavors and a gentle lemon zest texture. Drink in the next two years.",Les Sétilles,Olivier Leflaive
"Sweet and fruity, this is a balanced, ripe wine. It brings blackberry fruit right up front, the tannins soft and warm. With its attractive edge of acidity there is just the right amount of freshness as a contrast.",Mural Reserva,Quinta do Portal
"Pair this salty, umami-rich Cab Franc with the right foods, and all will be right. By itself, it's rather straightforward in cherry marmalade and buttered toast flavors. It wants sausage, ham, smoked pork or similar protein dishes.",,Stepping Stone by Cornerstone
"This is made from declassified barrels originally intended for Stevens 424. It's sharp-edged and spicy, not yet wellintegrated, but substantial, with wild berry flavors and slightly green tannins. A good quaffer, or pair it with a flank steak.",YesOuiSi Red,Stevens
"This popular blend, now up to nine grapes sourced from across the Columbia Valley, spends time in 40% new oak. This 2009 lives up to past vintages, though perhaps falling on the lighter end of the scale, with pleasant fruit flavors and a hint of toast.",Firehouse Red,Tamarack Cellars
Lamùri is a solid value wine from Sicily that shows fresh fruit nuances and loads of wild berry and white almond. Try it with baked salmon or creamy shellfish dishes.,Lamùri,Tasca d'Almerita
"Quinta do Pégo produces a light, fast maturing style of vintage Port. This 2009 has the bonus of great richness, although its fruity character and soft tannins suggest it will mature rapidly.",Quinta do Pégo Vintage,Rozes
"Very peppery even for Syrah. Marked also by intense blackberry jam flavors, it's a full-bodied, tannic bruiser, but one with brooding depth. Decant it a few hours before serving.",Bragger,Wild Coyote
"Almost half Syrah, with the rest a mix of Bordeaux grapes, this affordable red offers thick, liquorous, darkly-fruited scents and flavors. Tannins are astringent; despite the hearty entry, the wine seems to lose complexity and depth in the midpalate.",Bishop's Blend Red,William Church
"There's an aroma and taste of hay, or dried twigs, in this Pinot that dominates the cherry fruit. It's also pretty tannic. This undoubtedly is due to the winemaker's style, resulting in an earthy, dry wine that might develop over the next six years or so.",,Terlato
"A difficult Pinot Noir to evaluate. It's very dry, acidic and tannic, with sharp flavors of blackberries that sweeten into jam on the finish. The question is one of ageability. Try cellaring for five years and see what happens.",Dos Rubios Vineyard,Testarossa
"Sicily is doing wonderful things with Syrah and this expression from the southern-most part of the island shows a fresh and informal side to the grape. The wine is packed tight with lush, bright red fruit flavors.",Case Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"Zagra means __itrus blossom_ in Sicilian dialect and the Grillo that carries this proud name is indeed packed tight with bright floral aromas. It also boasts mango, peach and white almond skin.",Zagra,Valle dell'Acate
"Impressive from the start for its rich blackberry and dark chocolate flavors, thick tannins and sweet overlay of smoky oak. Could be an ager, but some bitterness in the middle suggests the fruit will fall out before the tannins resolve.",,Vellum
"About as typical and pleasant as you'll find in this price range. The nose is snappy, with aromas of fresh peas, bell pepper, citrus and wild herbs. Feels light and fresh, with flavors of lime and apple alongside tangerine.",Reserva,Ventisquero
"Starts out somewhat fiery, with a dose of aromatic horseradish. After airing out, this varietal Tempranillo is fresh, juicy and crisp on the tongue, with flavors of baking spices, tomato, roasted plum and earth. Feels juicy on the finish, maybe a bit lean, and overall it's cut from the classic cloth.",Reserva,Viña Bujanda
"Don't look for subtlety in this Syrah. It's all about overt, in-your-face ripe blackberry jam, mushu plum sauce and dark chocolate flavors. The wine is dry, tannic and soft, with a long, spicy finish. Doesn't seem capable of aging, as the alcohol is high, so drink up.",Estate,Vineyard of Pasterick
"Soft and delicious, if a little one-dimensional. No denying the lushness of the pineapple, orange and golden apricot fruit flavors, or the pretty spices. Sémillon adds a cashew nut oiliness. Could use greater dryness and acidity.",,Duckhorn
"Judicious use of darkly toasted Hungarian oak results in a surprisingly sexy, supple wine that's dripping with vanilla and spicy dark plum flavors. There's a slight green twinge to the black cherry flavors on the palate, but this is a smooth, easy-drinking Merlot with a long, earthy, espresso finish.",Hungarian Oak,Comtesse Thérèse
"Here's a sour and astringent expression of Cabernets Sauvignon and Franc, Merlot and Syrah that opens with sharp black fruit and Indian spice. The fruit flavors are jammy and rich on the close.",Podere Ritorti,I Luoghi
"This 70-20-10 blend of Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot shows loads of zesty pepper and green spice. Aromatically speaking, the Cabernet component seems strongest. There's bright blackberry and cherry in the mouth with a touch of natural rubber.",Grale,Le Grascete
"A pure expression of Ciliegiolo (a native grape of central Italy), this bright ruby wine delivers crisp tones of cassis, white cherry and raspberry. It's a clean, easy wine that would pair well with cheesy pasta or risotto.",,Le Tre Stelle
"This vintage rosado is as good as always, but a bit lower on the quality ladder than previous years. The color is light pink and soft on the eye, while the nose suggests brick dust and orange peel. Smooth and easygoing, with sweet, generic flavors of orange and berry.",Reserva Brut Rosé,Llopart
"Refreshingly effervescent with a fresh apple and lemon nose, this dry sparkler is a blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Noir. The delicate lather is soft and mouthfilling with a clean minerality and pleasant lemon peel finish.",Brut,Martha Clara
"This is a very dry, richly textured Cabernet, vast in blackberry, black currant and cedar flavors, with the smooth, complex tannins Oakville is known for. However, there's a noticeable sharpness to the mouthfeel that may never go away.",Bonny's Vineyard,Meyer Family Cellars
"Normally this producer's high-end Sherries are outstanding, but this Amontillado is aggressive and hard, with a clod-like character that starts with molasses on the nose and then turns toward sharpness and bitterness on the palate. Try as I might, this one strikes me as good but loud, hard, forceful and lacking the suavity that great Sherries possess.",Del Duque Amontillado Muy Viejo,González Byass
"A good, soft wine to drink now with a steak or chop. It's full-bodied and very rich in extracted blackberry jam and crème de cassis flavor, with touches of pepper, cocoa and bacon.",Jack London Vineyard,Kenwood
"This is your quintessential simple quaff among brut cavas. It's clean, lime-tinged and soda-like on the nose, with a correct, no-issues palate that pushes zesty apple along with sweet papaya, mango and banana flavors. It's slightly sweet and tropical, but still it holds onto its crisp qualities and dryness. No complaints for the money.",Cordon Negro Brut,Freixenet
"Bright and cheerful with a candied black cherry nose, this is a deliciously fruit-forward yet focused wine. On the palate, soft, fresh fruit and supple vanilla flavors meld beautifully with supple tannins and a rich, dark, roasted coffee finish.",Reserve,Osprey's Dominion
"Slightly low on kick and bubbles for a blanc de blancs, but the wine's mix of green herb, apple, green banana and melon flavors is good and offers the proper set up to a finish that's citrusy as can be and only slightly pithy. Seems a touch flat or it might have rated even higher.",Brut Blanc de Blancs,Paul Cheneau
"A delicious, balanced Pinot Noir. Shows dry, pure flavors of raspberries, cherries, cola and sandalwood, with a delicious, drink-me-now appeal.",Radog,Radog
"Dusty, slightly candied aromas are briary and pretty good, and overall it's giving freshness, pop and red-fruit flavors touched up by dill, nutmeg and vanilla. Clean and lively on the finish, and more than competent as a whole.",Limited Edition,Ramón Bilbao
"A very good interpretation of Sangiovese. A pretty sharp mouthfeel, but maybe that's to be expected from this high-acid variety. Otherwise, it's nice and dry, with complex cherry, red currant, licorice, leather and sandalwood flavors. Good with spicy beef, pork and veal dishes.",Lola,Stave 28
"Very good for its complexity, although it's tough and tannic, and the acidity sticks out. The blackberry, currant and cherry flavors are rich and nuanced, but the wine feels hard and sharp. Odds are the lifespan is six years: cellar or decant.",Three Blocks,Signaterra Benziger
"Starts out with roasted, stewy, beefy aromas and not much brightness. The palate is measured and healthy, with dry raspberry, currant and medicinal plum flavors. It shows oak, earth, leather, acidity and some burn. In a nutshell, it's a good, standard, respectable Rioja that will complement almost any food.",Reserva,Solabal
"From 100% Azal grapes, this is a rich style of Vinho Verde, ripe and citric, touched by minerality. Yeasty aromas go through the palate but don't detract from the ripe final fruit.",Azal,Solar de Pinheiro
"Made in the modern California Chardonnay style you'll either love or hate. It's enormously extracted in pineapple tart, crème brûlée and honey-drizzled buttered toast flavors, and the acidity is bright and clean. The superrichness would benefit from greater control.",Reserve,Sonoma-Loeb
"A heavy, slightly strained wine that has a lot in tow. The nose is smoky, rubbery like an inner tube, and a bit herbal. In the mouth, it's a wide load with sweet, sugary, baked flavors of blackberry, prune, fig and chocolate. Very much on the ripe side, with a full tannic bite.",Lanzaga,Telmo Rodríguez
"This is dusty, and scented with earth and pine needles. Quite young, it tastes very tart, almost like cranberry juice. With significant breathing time it begins to broaden out and hint at a dusty, chocolate undertone. Good grip and medium body.",,Acrobat
"Initially it's rugged, but airing reveals black-cherry aromas and dry spice. The palate is crisp and a little sheer by itself, but the call here is that with food it'll be a winner. Flavors of red fruits are dry and collected, while the finish blends in coffee, spice and a touch of herbal Navarran panache.",Crianza,Marco Real
"Tough in tannins and acidic in the Mayacamas style. Feels hard and dry and earthy. The cherry-berry flavors have a tomatoey edge. But this Merlot, which contains 17% Cabernet Sauvignon, has a classy elegance, and opens up as it breathes in the glass.",,Mayacamas
"Simple and straightforward, this 50-40-10 blend of Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot delivers black concentration and slightly sweet aromas of mature fruit and blackberry. The wine tastes smooth and rich, but also remains very approachable and friendly.",D'Aria,Leopoldo I di Toscana
"Good on the nose, with solid raspberry and nectarine aromas. The palate is spunky and alert, with juicy red-cherry, rhubarb and integrated spice flavors. It's mostly a clean, basic, easy-to-drink bubbly, but it's persistent, harmonious and commendable. Pinot Noir with Trepat is the grape mix.",999 Brut Rosat,Loxarel
"Prelius is run by Castello di Volpaia's Federica Mascheroni Stianti and this light Vermentino offers tight tones of peach, green fruit and mineral. The wine is fresh and compact with loads of citrus on the close.",,Prelius
"Aromas of apple cider and mild spice get it going in a good direction, and this colorfully packaged cava does pretty well in the mouth, where the texture is on the soft side and the flavors of apple and orange run a bit sweet. Not complex but good, fluffy and yeasty.",Lady of Spain Brut,Paul Cheneau
"Raspberry, red cherries and fresh fruit come together with bright acidity and a soft, full texture. There is a good stalky, tannic core to give structure. A great barbecue wine.",Guadalupe,Quinta do Quetzal
"Good, dry flavors of red cherries, red currants, orange zest, Dr. Pepper and anise in this silky smooth, tart wine. It's a little off in texture, with some minty sharpness, so drink now.",Chamisal Vineyards,Chamisal Vineyards
"A firm, somewhat muscular wine, blending in 16% Merlot and aged in neutral oak barrels. Leaf and truffle notes abound, with the distinctively acidic underpinning of Sangiovese. Light strawberry-cherry fruit gently fades through a clean finish.",Seven Hills Vineyard,Mannina Cellars
"Sicily and Syrah make perfect partners. This wine offers linear, smooth berry tones with touches of barbecue smoke and crushed minerals or talcum powder on the finish.",Il Giglio,Masseria del Feudo Grottarossa
"This fresh, Catarratto-based white wine opens with a bright, crystalline appearance and a thin, crisp mouthfeel. Aromas include lemon, grapefruit, dried grass and mango.",Fondo Filara,Nicosia
"A blend of Carricante and Catarratto (two of Sicily's most expressive indigenous varieties), this Etna white would pair well with seafood or vegetarian dishes. It boasts focused tones of citrus and Granny Smith apple.",Fondo Filara,Nicosia
"Estate grown and seeming to hint at some time in oak, this dry and lightly spicy wine features apple and pear fruit, already smooth and rounded and ready to drink. More in the style of Oregon Pinot Gris than Italian Pinot Grigio.",,Locati Cellars
"Good price for a Pinot of this quality. It's dry and silky in the mouth, with classic Pinot flavors of cherries, spices and cola, enriched with smoky oak.",Four Keys Crossing,Parkers Estate
"Lunario offers bright sensations of cola, wild berry, red rose and drying talc powder. The wine boasts a thick, textured mouthfeel, and finishes with toasted notes of almond and pistachio.",Lunario,Brugnano
"Aged only in stainless steel to preserve the freshness of the fruit, this wine is redolent of wild berries, violets, cola, crushed stone and licorice. The mouthfeel is sharp, clean and bright.",,Colosi
"Now maturing, this wine still retains some of the freshness of the vintage. It also has spicy blackberry fruits, rich tannins and a full, powerful finish. Drink now, or keep for 2_3 years.",,Château Saint-Nicolas
From the beautiful Menfi area of southern Sicily comes this clean and genuine expression of Nero d'Avola featuring bright berry aromas and silky tannins. Pair this wine with roast pork.,,Cantine Barbera
"From the Alcamo area of western Sicily, this organically-farmed Nero d'Avola opens with slightly raw, vinous notes of cherry and fresh plum. The wine presents a bright, ruby color and offers flavors of toasted pistachio and spice on the close.",Il Principe,Cantine Rallo
"Clean, fresh and full of bright cherry and strawberry aromas. Offers the right size and balance, with red plum and red berry flavors touched up by light oak. Mildy toasty and textured on the finish.",Serres Tempranillo,Carlos Serres
"Terre di Giumara is a line of value wines. This Nero d'Avola offers bright aromas of berry, cassis, fennel, moist earth and almond that recall the natural fragrances of Sicily. The wine is simple, fresh and clean on the close.",Terre di Giumara,Caruso & Minini
"This popular Chardonnay gives you a generous burst of buttered nuts and toast, the flavors many consumers want in their Chardonnays. Not much going on in the fruit department__ust clean, tart green apples, with a sharp, acidic edge.",H3,Columbia Crest
"Lots of upfront lemon, lime, orange and tropical fruit flavors in this wine, which is balanced with crisp acidity and finishes dry. A tang of minerality helps to make it clean and vibrant. Great food wine, especially with Asian fare.",Reserve,Concannon
"This big-seller is a delicious mint and wood polished wine, its berry fruits rounded and softened. The tannins meld easily into a warm, rich, accessible, forward-fruited wine that is definitely ready to drink.",Cabriz,Dão Sul
"A solid, flashy Russian River Chardonnay, rich in pineapple, kiwi, tropical fruit and oak flavors, and brightened by crisp acidity. With a creamy, buttery texture, it's a solid hit down the middle of the popular style.",,Davis Bynum
"If you are staging an informal outdoor barbecue with franks and burgers, this value wine will meet all your pairing needs. It's soft, plush and round, with exotic spice, ripe fruit and black pepper.",Stemmari,Feudo Arancio
"This youthful wine plays most of its cards in the mouth, where it offers a plump, fruity feel with fresh accents of tangy acidity on the finish. The bouquet is redolent of red berry, cola and leather.",,Feudo Disisa
"Feudo Montoni is a beautiful wine estate located in an isolated spot in central Italy. Its Catarratto is a fresh, easy wine with a pretty aromatic ensemble of lemon, exotic fruit and white peach.",,Feudo Monaci
"This fresh Grillo with fruit sourced from inland Sicily offers tonic aromas of zesty lime, Granny Smith apple, spice and exotic fruit. You'll also enjoy the note of nutmeg on the close.",,Feudo Montoni
This estate dominates one of the most beautiful wine valleys in the southern half of Sicily. Rolling hills and chalky white soils help shape a bright but polished Syrah with sharp berry tones and lingering notes of crushed stone and talcum powder.,,Feudo Principi di Butera
"The bouquet of this wine is a little restrained, with soft aromas of black fruit flesh, savory herbs and vanilla bean. The mouth offers more character, with vibrant plum and cherry flavors alongside lifting acidity and apporachable tannins.",Reserve,Flam
"Shows enormously extracted black cherry and mocha flavors, a testament to how nicely ripe the difficult Grenache variety got in the winery's Rodney's Vineyard. Oak lurks in the background, giving smoky, buttery notes.",,Epiphany
"A blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot, Triskelè is a simple, fruity wine with a soft mouthfeel and a generous aromatic profile. The wine would work well with beef dishes like meatloaf or prime rib.",Triskelè,Duca di Salaparuta
"Sicilian Pinot Nero shows much of the variety's natural aromas of blue flower and wild berry, only in a thicker, more concentrated context. The southern Italian sun has done its part to produce a round, broad mouthfeel.",Vajasindi Naw_ri,Duca di Salaparuta
"Duca di Salaparuta sources fruit from vineyard sites spanning the island of Sicily. From the Passo delle Mule location, this bright Nero d'Avola is generous in terms of its fruit-forward aromatic profile. The mouthfeel is firm, polished and crisp.",Passo delle Mule Suar Marchesa,Duca di Salaparuta
"Due Vigne's mountain-grown Sierra Nebbiolo is savory, embellished with olive tapenade, sour cherry, cranberry and caramel, its tannins sufficiently managed to make this wine a rich, robust red with finesse. Small percentages of Barbera and Dolcetto are blended in.",Musso Family Vineyard,Due Vigne
"This pretty expression of Riesling Renano offers fruity aromas of pear and peach backed by natural rubber and fragrant floral tones. The wine is soft, smooth and thick on the close.",Istituto Agrario San Michele all'Adige,Fondazione Edmund Mach
"Fondo Antico's entry-level Nero d'Avola offers a clean portrait of the Sicilian indigenous grape, with tones of red cherry, blackberry, red rose and lightly toasted almond. The tannins are soft and silky.",,Fondo Antico
"Good price for a brisk, clean and elegant rosé sparkling wine. With a pretty copper color, it offers rich raspberry, strawberry and toast flavors. The finish is dry and honeyed at the same time.",Rosé,Chandon
"Montecucco is a wonderful, largely unexplored wine territory in coastal Tuscan that makes some of Italy's best super Tuscan blends. This expression sees 70% Sangiovese with Ciliegiolo (for bright berry flavors) and Montepulciano (for darkness and structure). The results show balance and loads of easy berry fruit.",Rigoleto,Collemassari
"With some good, ripe fruit and a core of dry tannins, this wine benefits from wood aging and rich berry flavors. It is solid and chunky, with a fine edge of black currant acidity. It could well age for 2_3 years, but can be drunk now.",Liberty du Château Soussac,Château Soussac
"Wonderfully rich with lush dark chocolate and espresso notes, this is another lovely, highly drinkable Merlot from Comtesse Thérèse. There's a good amount of charred oak, but it's integrated seamlessly with concentrated black plum and berry flavors. The finish is long, and accented by pleasant astringency of walnut skins and tobacco.",Traditional,Comtesse Thérèse
"This mineral-dominated Malbec is dry, packed with tannins as well as black currants and wild berries. It is on the austere side, finishing with intense acidity.",Château Nozières,Domaine du Grand Cros
"A blend of 60% Syrah and 40% Grenache, this wine offers both beefy and herbal notes among the more standard black raspberry and plum fruit flavors. Medium-full on the palate with a hint of sanguine character, this comes off a bit brighter and more balanced than one might anticipated from the bouquet.",Fernand Averoux,Domaine Sainte Léocadie
"A delicious Pinot Noir. Set it beside more expensive bottlings and it stands up well. Silky and rich, with raspberry and cherry purée, cola, sweet vanilla and sandalwood flavors, and a long, spicy finish. Production was 26,000 cases.",,Cupcake
"Superrich in tangerine, peach, lime, mango and honey flavors, this Rhône-style white blend is balanced with crisp acidity and a nice touch of minerality. It's a wine to drink now.",La Prenda Vineyard Dos Burros,Atmosphere
"A touch raisiny and sweet from nose to tail, but what's in between is convincing for Jumilla. Aromas of licorice and herbs are sweet but nice, while the flavors or raisin and blackberry are chunky, with a basic finish that's a little flat but definitely ripe. A blend of Monastrell, Cabernet, Tempranillo and Merlot that's ready to drink.",Taja Reserva,Bodegas Mähler-Besse
"A properly fruity 10-year-old tawny, balancing ripe fruit against fine, nutty character. It is fresh, on the sweet side, keeping a good layer of acidity.",Soalheira 10-Year-Old Tawny,Borges
"This is Goldeneye's basic appellation Pinot. It's fairly rich in cherries, raspberries, cola, red currant, licorice and sandalwood, with an elegantly crisp mouthfeel. But it lacks excitement, especially at this price. Drink now.",,Goldeneye
"A soft and rich wine, lined with fresh pear, bitter almonds, fresh herbs and a glint of citrus. It is full bodied, while remaining fresh.",Monte da Peceguina Branco,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"Bone dry with aromas of freshly pressed apples, this is an austere but elegant sparkling blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Noir. With notes of delicate white florals and yeast in the backdrop, the palate has a savory, dusty quality accented by a racy acidity and strong, minerally finish.",Cuvée Brut 30th Anniversary Edition,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Full bodied with a velvety heft on the palate, this Reserve Merlot from Hudson-Chatham offers a striking balance of intensity and elegance. From the nose to the palate, there's a bounty of rich dark fruit, bramble and smoke layered with silky oak and firm tannins.",Reserve,Hudson-Chatham
"Good and dry. Trades richness for a certain aloof elegance, and while it could be denser in fruit, the blackberry, currant and mocha flavors are just fine. Drink now. Production was 16,130 cases.",Jack London Vineyard,Kenwood
"Like the label suggests, it's sugary in tangerine, vanilla cookie and butterscotch flavors, with crisp acidity and fine, scoury bubbles. A nice sparkling wine for those who like a sweeter style.",Sweet Cuvée,Korbel
"For Spanish Chardonnay, this is perfectly good and clean. The nose brings your basic set of white-fruit, mineral and fresh herb flavors, while the palate is lively despite some dry, resiny oak flavor. Even with banana, vanilla and creamy flavors, the wine is decidedly not cloying.",,Vega Sindoa
"This rich, delicious blend of Castelão and Alicante Bouschet is soft and juicy, with black and blue berry flavors, dusty tannins and a fine, jammy aftertaste.",Catapereiro,Wines & Winemakers
"A Southern Rhône-style blend of Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre. Shows great flavors of berries, currants, cured meat, spices and sandalwood, and finishes dry and smooth. Could have a firmer structure, as it's a little soft and melted.",Cuvee Christie,Tercero
"Soft, pretty and pleasant to drink, the widely-available Willamette Valley bottling from Amity might pass for a simple Bourgogne rouge. Cranberry and watermelon fruits form the basis for the flavors, which feature light, balanced tannins and a clean, gentle fade into the finish.",,Amity Vineyards
"A ripe, full-bodied and spicy wine, defiantly dry, with a tight acid character. Aromatic fruit finish with intense perfumes, so that the wine is both rich and fresh.",JP Azeitão Branco,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"There's an interesting counterplay between the bright and the dark in Lovingston's hand-picked, small lot Josie's Knoll. On the nose, black cherry preserves are countered with black pepper spice and char. On the palate, ripe, concentrated black fruit is layered with tar, earth and bramble. It's elegant and seductive, but anchored by a core of gripping tannins.",Josie's Knoll,Lovingston
"This winery is known for red Mencía, but this small-lot Godello is perfectly nice and drinkable. It has a neutral nose and a fresh palate of green melon, nectarine and apple flavors. The finish is clipped and a touch bitter, but there's no denying its tangy, forward approach. Only 250 cases made.",,Luna Beberide
"This is a dry, clean, crisp Roussanne wine whose dominant flavors are of oranges and apricots. Oak brings additional notes of vanilla and buttered toast. It's a good, elegant wine to try as an alternative to Chardonnay.",Estate,Holly's Hill
"This is one of those wines that taste sweet and dry at the same time. There's superripe orange and pineapple marmalade fruit, but then clean acidity and a stony minerality wash over the palate, making the finish dry. It's an interesting blend of Roussanne, Grenache Blanc and Viognier.",Patriarche Blanc,Holly's Hill
"Celebrating the first lot__ort__n the first auction held by Michael Broadbent in 1966, this is a reserve style wine, rich and soft with chocolate and ripe berry flavors to go with the sweet texture. There is just a final edge of stalkiness.",Lot 1 Auction Reserve,Broadbent
"So easy to like for its soft richness. The raspberry and cherry fruit meets the toasted oak and creates an almost sweet, pastry taste. Wonderful now as a spicy alternative to Zinfandel.",Reserve,EOS
"Dusty earth and dry spice aromas blend with some char, vanilla and berry/cherry on the nose. The palate shows average density and depth, with lighter flavors of strawberry, raspberry, herbs, tobacco and vanilla. Finishes dry and peppery, with some toast.",Reserva,Dinastía Vivanco
"An oddity__abernet Franc made as a white wine. It tastes delicious, with a feeling of sweetness, with soft lychee and spiced apple flavors, balanced acidity and a lively juicy texture.",Blanc de Franc,Couly-Dutheil
"Sangiovese with 10% Syrah presents a united front of berry, spice, toast and cola nuances. The wine has substance and good acidity that would pair seamlessly with pork roll, pasta with sausage and tomato sauce or cheese-filled ravioli.",Tosco Forte,Castello di Poppiano
"Contempo is a fresh and lean expression of Nero d'Avola from western Sicily that opens with aromas of wild berry, rose petal and toasted almond. It's a simple red wine that would pair with pasta or easy meat dishes.",Contempo,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"As its hybrid name suggests, Shymer is a blend of Syrah and Merlot. The wine presents a friendly bouquet accented by red cherry, white pepper and sweet cinnamon. The tannins are soft and plush.",Shymer,Baglio di Pianetto
"A touch green and stemmy on the nose, but ripe red plum and cherry notes unfold on the palate alongside accents of dusty chocolate-milk mix and sweet baking spice. Medium weight, with an approachable structure and a solid finish.",Yarden Kela Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"A lush and tropical-fruit driven Chard; ripe notes of papaya, mango and apricot flood the nose and mouth. It's rich and heavy in the mouth, but with good enough cut to keep things from being too sweet or cloying.",Yarden Odem Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"A creamy wine, its apple fruit flavors smoothed by touches of butter and spice. There is a fine citrus aftertaste that gives the rich wine a delicious, refreshing lift.",,Henri Perrusset
"A pretty good Cabernet, especially considering the price, which makes it ideal for everyday drinking. Dry and medium-bodied, it has pleasant blackberry, cherry, spice and oak flavors, with a long, clean finish.",Artisan Collection,HandCraft
"Soft in tannins and acids, this Cabernet has a gentle, drink-me-now mouthfeel. The flavors are rich and sweet in milk chocolate, blueberries and blackberries. Easy to like, if a little pricey for what you get.",,Hanna
"A Bordeaux-style blend, this begins with concentrated strawberry and cherry flavors, rich and liquorous. A majority of the oak was Hungarian, and a strong vanilla streak runs through the middle and on into the finish. For some palates the fruit and the oak will seem a bit mismatched, but for others this will be right on the mark.",Teunis Red,Upland Estates
"Fresh, youthful and redolent of bright berry fruit, this Sicilian Syrah would pair perfectly with pizza, home-cooked pasta or light meat dishes. Blueberry and raspberry fruits dominate the bouquet and lend a soft, chewy feel in the mouth.",Case Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"From the newly created Vittoria appellation in Sicily, this bright white wine opens with citrus, crushed almond, peach and exotic fruit. The mouthfeel is fresh, compact and tight.",,Valle dell'Acate
"Not really dry, like the label says, but with apricot and orange jam richness. Sauvignon Blanc adds citrus fruit notes and acidity. There's also a lot of new oak. Drink this tasty wine now.",Luvisi Vineyard Dry,Vermeil
"Nuhar is an innovative blend of Nero d'Avola (70%) and Pinot Nero that surpasses expectations and does justice to both grape varieties. The cherry and almond tones of the first grape are present, as are the delicate violet, raspberry and cassis aromas of the second. The finish shows bright menthol and spearmint overtones.",Nuhar,Tenuta Rapital_
"This wine delivers plump cherry and blackberry with a soft, velvety, easy-going mouthfeel.",Aquilae,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"Pretty cherry fruit is at the center here, with light scents of fresh cut tobacco. The blend is two thirds Syrah, one third Cabernet Sauvignon, balanced and highlighted by a streak of cinnamon toast.",2 Spires Red,William Church
"From the very fine 2007 vintage comes this surprisingly tannic Cabernet. Even at the age of more than four years, it's still tough and astringent. It has a sweet core of blackberries, and it's tempting to recommend aging. But there's a troubling touch of raisins, so drink up.",Gist Ranch,Thomas Fogarty
"Chardonnay (75%) and Grillo are blended to produce an intense wine with pungent notes of ripe fruit, pineapple, candied lemon and yellow rose. There is alcoholic heat on the close but it is softened by the general density and thickness of the wine's texture.",Adènzia,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Very rich and opulent, if a little soft, offering a flood of orange cream pie, meringue, butterscotch and cinnamon spice flavors. Delicious, if a bit one-dimensional. Try as an alternative to an oaky Chardonnay.",Thompson Vineyard,Jaffurs
"With soft tannins and sweet red-berry fruits, this is a wine that is made for early drinking. It does have a firm core serving to give shape to this otherwise smooth, juicy, fruity wine.",Monte da Peceguina,Herdade da Malhadinha Nova
"This easy-drinking, estate-grown, Bordeaux-style blend tilts more toward Merlot than Cabernet Sauvignon in this new vintage. Medium-bodied and fully ripe, it falls just a little flat on the midpalate, and finishes with a suggestion of alcoholic heat.",Out of Line Red,Hightower
"Elegantly fruity, with restrained honeydew and white peach flavors, Lamoreaux Landing's Red Oak Vineyards Riesling is just off-dry with a refreshingly zingy profile. Mineral tones on the midpalate carry through to a pristine finish marked by sprightly green herbs and florals.",Red Oak Vineyard,Lamoreaux Landing
"Lavender honey and lanolin notes are warm and enticing in this semisweet Riesling from Lamoreaux Landing. A tad sugary on the attack, it gains balance on the midpalate thanks to delicate green floral tones and ample notes of bitter lemon pith.",Semi-Dry,Lamoreaux Landing
"This easy expression of Syrah is redolent of ripe berry, moist earth and forest floor. There's a touch of fresh mint or peppermint as well, and a drying mineral feel on the close.",,MandraRossa
"Named after the crows that fly on the Campolargo estate, this is a warm, ripely fruity wine with sweet flavors and soft tannins. It is ready to drink, a delicious winter warmer.",Os Corvos da Vinha da Costa,Campolargo
"Sed_ra is a popular Sicilian red that is readily available around the world. This lively vintage shows bright berry tones, white almond and bright touches of cola and cassis. The mouthfeel is sharp, crisp and compact.",Sed_ra,Donnafugata
"Fresh red fruit flavors are framed with interesting and lifting notes of savory herbs, whole tobacco leaf and a touch of milk chocolate. It's juicy and lively with fine tannins and a mouthwatering finish.",The Reserve,Gamla
"Intense acidity and a mineral texture show the northern origins of this wine. It is all citrus and grapefruit, the green apple flavors adding a tense texture.",,Garnier et Fils
"Missoni is an oak-aged Cabernet Sauvignon that opens with soft, chewy fruit and aromas of cherry liqueur, rum cake, espresso and exotic spice. The mouthfeel is plush, round and driven by plump blackberry flavors.",Missoni,Feudi del Pisciotto
"A great value wine to pair with homemade spaghetti sauce or grilled sausage with onions and bell peppers, this wine is soft and lush, with cherry, almond and blackberry notes. There's a touch of sweet strawberry on the close.",Stemmari,Feudo Arancio
"Here's a fragrant and fresh expression of Grillo that shows sharp, green tones of Granny Smith apple, kiwi, cut grass and lemon soda. The wine is clean and zesty, and will make your mouth pucker.",,Feudo Disisa
"Surya is a blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot from the Sicilian estate of northern Italy's Zonin family. The wine shows ripe fruit qualities of blueberry and raspberry, with a touch of bitter almond so characteristic of many Sicilian red wines.",Surya,Feudo Principi di Butera
"Clean and minerally, with stony aromas along with banana and pineapple. The palate is tight, clean and balanced, with flavors of green banana, papaya and apple. Finishes pithy and with a touch of fresh-grated white pepper. A good but common type of unoaked Chardonnay.",El Cerezo,Castillo de Monjardin
"A blend of Syrah and Carignan, this wine definitely has an unmistakable Languedoc herbaceousness to it amid the bright cherry and red plum flavors. Tightly structured with somewhat bracing acidity and a peppery finish. Drink now.",La Garrigue,Château Cabezac
"The dry tannins are firmly in charge in this young wine, its fruit fresh rather than rich. The flavors are red plum juice, acidity and a dry core that needs another year to soften.",,Château Roc Meynard
"The second wine of Château Fonplégade is fresh and bright with good fruits, berry flavors and some richness. It has good poise; ready to drink in 2_3 years.",Fleur de Fonplégade,Château Fonplégade
"Big, chunky and ripe, with earthy aromas followed by soft, round texture. Spice and black berry fruit juice are supported by dry tannins. It is bold, a little rough around the edges.",,Monte da Ravasqueira
"A clean, fresh, appealing sort of Tempranillo with cola, earth, black cherry and berry aromas followed by a bright, forward, spicy cherry palate. Honest, snappy, healthy and juicy; nice and solid for La Mancha.",Flor del Montgó,Montgó
"Rich and round, this offers plenty of concentrated blackberry notes enveloped in warm spices and supple oak. There's a hint of green tomato leaves throughout, but the lush fruit combined with sturdy grape tannins and high acidity would pair well with fatty short ribs or braised pork.",Estate Club,Veramar
"Simple, nice and not trying too hard; this basic brut is graced with nice apple and citrus aromas. The palate is wet, juicy and classic, with crisp apple, green herb and melon flavors. Round, clean and just crisp enough.",Brut Reserva,Segura Viudas
"Yellow/gold, lightly honeyed, with a yeasty character. Peach pit and nectarine, with a finishing touch of Meyer lemon, add length and some complexity. Drink soon.",,Seven of Hearts
"Fresh and fruity, laced with citrus, crisp apricot and a delicious layer of lime juice. Drink now, but the wine will age a year.",,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"Made from hand-picked grapes and unfiltered, this is a richly concentrated, full-bodied Merlot with an abundance of sweet, juicy black plum and freshly roasted coffee flavors. Two years of aging in French oak results in a supple, silky wine with beautifully integrated tannins and pleasant notes of darkly toasted wood. A great pairing with roasted pork tenderloin.",Barrel Select Reserve,Pindar Vineyards
"Amazingly rich flavors mark this Cab, ranging from blackberries and black currants to earthier notes of herbs, cola and olive tapenade. It's dry, and the tannins are lush and easy. Super easy to drink, but could benefit from greater structure, as it's a bit too soft.",Reserve,Rodney Strong
"A little raw in acidity, with some green olive notes, but the rustic nature works in favor of the wine, grounding its rich blackberry, currant and chocolate flavors with earthiness. Tasted in a flight of much more expensive wines, this Cab did very well.",Split Oak Vineyard,Morro Bay
"Fresh smelling, with notes of green melon, apple, honey and minerals. It's more simple than complex, with crisp apple and orange flavors and then a chunky, slightly pithy finish. For under $15 this is good, casual Albariño that won't steer you wrong.",Verdemar,Montecillo
"Subtle and savory, with modest beet, strawberry and cherry aromas and flavors, this is a relatively lightweight offering from Martinborough, with a delicate structure and a juicy, fresh finish. Tasted twice, with consistent results.",,Martinborough Vineyard
"A lusty, spicy Zin, born to partner with barbecue. It's powerful, high in alcohol and massive in baked blackberries and cherries, milk chocolate, red licorice, bacon and mounds of black pepper.",Ellie's Old Vine Vineyard,Wilson
"This estate-grown Pinot Gris has a pleasing delicacy, balancing light citrus with whiffs of pine and a base of pear and cucumber. Just 13% alcohol, it might strike some tasters as a little thin, but it would make a fine accompaniment to a course of soft, creamy cheeses.",,Winter's Hill
"Pear, peach and tropical fruits all roll together in this wine, with just a touch of toasty character. The wine is rounded and full, but still fresh.",Château Ducla Experience XIV,Yvon Mau
"There is good density here. The wine has spice and dark tannins, the wood integrated with the maturing black fruits. The tannins are still firm, so decant before drinking.",,Château Cabredon
Here's an easy Sangiovese-based wine (with a small percent of Petit Verdot for extra darkness and color) that would pair wonderfully with stay-home pizza or pasta. The wine offers bright berry nuances of cherry and raspberry and a touch of distant spice and smoke on the fade.,Il Gregoriano,Fattoria Scopone
"From a great dessert wine year, this is packed with botrytis, unctuous in texture, rich and liquor-like. It is not for aging, but is delicious now.",,Château la Rayre
"Some richness, a good depth of flavor with wood smoothing out the rough edges of the lean tannins. The fruit is full of juicy black currant energy, while the acidity dominates the aftertaste.",Cuvée Prestige,Château les Croisille
"This cheerful 60-40 blend of Chardonnay and Sauvignon Blanc offers pristine aromas of white flower, honeysuckle, peach blossom and a touch of crushed white pepper. The wine is smooth and silky on the close and shows a sunny Tuscan personality.",Trappoline,Badia a Coltibuono
"A good brut-style wine, a little sweet in the dosage, but with sound acidity. The bubbles are scoury. The blend is 75% Pinot Noir and 25% Chardonnay.",Classic Vintage Brut,Iron Horse
"This Tempranillo and Cabernet Sauvignon blend has rich blackberry, cherry, currant, licorice and sandalwood flavors. It's dry and quite acidic, with a tart, clean mouthfeel and a silky texture. Drink now.",Viva Yo,Bodegas Paso Robles
"There's a lot going on in this Merlot, which is likeable now for its rich blackberry, cherry, cranberry, cola and spice flavors. It's dry and balanced.",,Bandit
"Centine is an easy, well-priced white wine from Tuscany with pretty aromas of citrus and stone fruit backed by drying mineral tones and fresh acidity. The wine would make a perfect companion to light dishes like tuna salad.",Centine,Banfi
"Lots of rich, forward pineapple, ripe pear jam, vanilla cream and buttered toast flavors in this Chardonnay. It will satisfy your sweet tooth, with its honey-rich finish. Drink now.",Reserve,Bedarra
"Fresh and crisp, classic dry Vinho Verde, a blend of Alvarinho and Trajadura, with citrus flavors and a tight texture. Lively and fresh.",AT,Borges
"Well integrated charred oak melds well with ripe blackberry and black plum aromas in this blend of Merlot from a cooperative of Long Island winemakers. This is a full-bodied wine with an intensely concentrated black fruit character, a kick of earthy, barnyard funk and firm, structured tannins.",Merliance,Long Island Merlot Alliance
"Cavanera is a white blend produced by one of the most important wine families based in Trapani, on the other side of Sicily. The wine is crisp and fresh, with a drying mineral note that gives it momentum in the mouth.",Cavanera Ripa di Scorciavacca,Firriato
"A cool vintage shows through in the lighter style of this Merlot. Strawberry is the dominant fruit flavor, although the time in new oak is what dominates currently. The scent and vanilla flavor of American oak, though accounting just 20% of the barrels, comes across quite powerfully. Give this one another year or two.",,Forgeron
"Colomba Platino (a pure expression of Insolia) opens with fresh aromas of citrus, mint, exotic fruit, papaya and white flower. Pair this crisp white wine with Thai coconut curry.",Colomba Platino,Duca di Salaparuta
"Here's a very pretty white wine from Sicily (made with Grillo grapes) that opens with creamy, light nuances of almond blossom, stone fruit and citrus. Pair this wine with steamed white fish.",Kados Risignolo,Duca di Salaparuta
"From a mix of Columbia Valley vineyards, the Bona Vita is mostly Malbec, with Cabernet Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Merlot contributing to the blend. Pretty strawberry fruit is somewhat overtaken by aggressively smoky barrel aging, or so it would seem. Charcoal and smoke components lend a slightly burnt edge to the tannins.",Bona Vita Red,Hamilton
"Light in body and silky in texture, this easy Pinot Noir offers plenty of varietal character. The raspberry and cherry flavors are spicy and sweet.",Artisan Collection,HandCraft
"Good price for a Chardonnay this rich and satisfying. It's oaky and ripe and flamboyant in orange and pineapple fruit, yet a brisk cut of acidity and minerality saves it from being too sweet.",The Chard,Cosentino
"Dashe uses 30-year-old vines from Guinness McFadden's farm in the southeastern end of Mendocino County, organically grown and planted in rocky, chalky soil. Golden in color and thick in texture, the wine has lovely acidity and is definitely dry, austere and very Germanic, with a nutty earthiness.",Dry Riesling McFadden Farms,Dashe Cellars
"Opens with earth, lemon peel and lightly baked plum aromas. Feels easy and plump, with a good mouthfeel and proper acidity. Shows creamy oak flavors along with rooty berry, toast and milk chocolate. Turns more spicy and dusty on the finish.",Reserva,Castillo Clavijo
"Pineapple, peach, ripe melon and sweet orange oil lead the way on this fresh, unoaked Chard. It's easy-drinking and clean with a medium-weight mouthfeel and a bright, mouthwatering finish. Drink now.",Reserve Unoaked,Binyamina
Intensely fruity__hink boysenberry and blackberry jam__his old Carignane is also leathery tough with black pepper spice that's very savory amid the berry and cherry and bosomy tannins. Cline is among the few wineries in California to have access to these ancient Carignane vines and the winery does a nice job showing the variety's classic colors.,Ancient Vines,Cline
"This bright Vermentino opens with an off-gold color and intense aromas of yellow fruit, cantaloupe and chestnut honey. There's a piquant hit of tangy acidity on the close.",Villa Solais,Cantina Santadi
"This informal red wine is the kind of bottle you'll want to stash away in the kitchen for easy pairings with weekday family dinners. The bouquet presents red berry, almond and cola nuances.",,Cantine Rallo
"Age has been kind to this Petite, one of Concannon's smalller bottlings. The wine is noticeably easygoing with mellowed plum and blackberry fruit and tamed tannins.",Heritage,Concannon
"Concannon's Reserve Petite swirls in plum, dark chocolate and coconut with densely layered tannins that are expertly contained. No puckering here.",Reserve,Concannon
"A new release for Concannon, this smallish release for the winery has honey, sweet vanilla, citrus and apricot, supported by a light, creamy mouthfeel. Finishing slightly sweet, with a coating of lemon, too, this would make a fine introduction to California Viognier for the novice.",Reserve,Concannon
"After an aromatic opening that includes wet leather, rubber and brine, this wine finds its stride, and while it's firmly tannic, the flavors of dark fruits, tomato, herbs, tobacco and cured meats do the trick. It gets better the longer it sits; drink now but give it as much air as possible.",,Convento San Francisco
"Aliso opens with ripe fruit aromas of blackberry jam and cinnamon bread. It's a simple, plush red wine that would pair well with pasta, meatloaf or roast beef.",Aliso,Mineo Family Vineyards
"A bit abrupt, with edgy tannins, but quite good for the price. Give it an hour or two in a decanter to let it mellow, and enjoy the blackberry, black currant and oak flavors.",Family Classic,Raymond
"It's a wonder why Reverie makes Barbera, an inferior variety and a tough sell, but they do, so you have to pay attention. This '09 is dry, big in tannins, acidic and rich in blackberry, raisin and mushu plum sauce flavors. It will probably live for decades, gradually sweetening but unlikely to ever achieve complexity.",Estate,Reverie
"A great value choice from Sicily, this bright Nero d'Avola is perfumed and floral, with red rose, violet and wild berry aromas. The mouthfeel is delicate, polished and fresh.",Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"From the Erice area of Sicily (in the southwest, near Trapani), Barone di Serramarrocco is made with Pignatello (also known by the name Perricone) and small percentages of other indigenous varieties. This oak-aged red shows dark concentration and toasted notes of almond and dried fruit.",Barone di Serramarrocco,Tenuta di Serramarrocco
"A great value white from Sicily, Piano Maltese is a blend of Grillo, Catarratto and Chardonnay that opens with cut grass, citrus, white flower and peach. Overall the wine boasts a floral and fresh quality.",Piano Maltese,Tenuta Rapital_
"Fondo Filara is a blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato, two important indigenous grapes. This expression offers tangy spice, bright fruit and a fresh, lean mouthfeel.",Fondo Filara,Nicosia
"Planeta has done a terrific job of communicating the merits of Cerasuolo di Vittoria to wine drinkers around the world. This light, ruby-colored red wine is packed with bright fruit nuances and a crisp mouthfeel. It makes an ideal pairing partner to the best Italian pasta recipes.",,Planeta
"I Papiri is a fresh and fragrant white, with bright aromas of citrus, cut grass and white peach. Pair it with any Mediterranean fish dish.",I Papiri,Santa Maria La Palma
"With fruit harvested from 650 meters above sea level on the slopes of Mount Etna (making this one of the highest altitude vineyards in Italy), this bright red blend shows small berry nuances, with tangy almond, crushed clove and menthol notes. Drying mineral notes bring up the rear.",,Scilio
Here's a wonderful rosé wine from (made with Nerello Mascalese grapes) that opens with a dusty pink color and fragrant tones of berry fruit and crushed stone. The wine has the density and staying power to pair with pork or veal.,Rosato,Scilio
"Morgante is an excellent Sicilian estate that has shown consistency in quality throughout the years. This fruit-filled Nero d'Avola would pair well with veal encrusted with chopped pistachio or pork marinated in garlic and rosemary. Aromas here include wild fruit, cassis and black currant.",,Morgante
"Terre di Sofia is an oak-aged Chardonnay, with lemon zest, vanilla, exotic fruit, pineapple and light shadings of exotic spice. It's smooth and supple in the mouth.",Terre di Sofia Tenuta di Budonetto,Maurigi
"Easy to mistake this for a rustic Pinot Noir, with its silky texture, crisp acidity and bone-dry flavors of cherries and cola. Although it's not especially complex, it's the kind of likeable wine you could drink a bottle of with a nice meal.",Las Brisas Vineyard,Mahoney
"Fresh and full of lime on the nose, and overall this is simple, smooth and gives you little reason to worry or fuss. The palate is smooth, creamy and a little low on acids, thus the lemon-lime and melon flavors have a fullness that's sweet and good.",Extra Dry,Segura Viudas
"Cabernet Franc seems to be a strength in the Rogue Valley, as the fruit expression is good and the aggressive herbaceousness of Cabernet Sauvignon is somewhat tamed. Here the aromas are blackberry and cassis, and those fruit flavors are threaded with smoke and coffee. Balanced into a light, herbal finish.",Anna Maria,Valley View
This is an informal and fresh Cabernet that would pair perfectly with easy pasta dishes or lasagna. Aromas include black cherry and plum and the wine offers a polished and compact feel overall.,Poggio al Tufo,Tommasi
"Fresh and vibrant, with hints of herbs and flowers alongside figs and citrus fruits. This is light in body but not light on flavor, although it does finish a bit short.",Russian Jack,Martinborough Vineyard
"Crisp, bright, strawberry-flavored wine that has some weight and spice to it. It shows ripe fruit as well as vivid acidity, freshly balanced with red currant aftertaste.",,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"Soft, fruity wine from the Castelão grape grown in sandy vineyards, this is smooth and ripe, with a good edge of acidity. The wine has great berry fruits, just a touch of tannin, ready to drink now.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"Soft and somewhat rustic, this is a flavorful Pinot Noir, with herb, earth, citrusy acids, leather and quite tart cherry fruit. It would not fit into a textbook definition of classic varietal flavor, but it feels handmade, and it is light years beyond much of the corporate plonk being labeled Pinot Noir these days.",,Winter's Hill
"There's a maturity that shines through from the honeyed applesauce and steel aromas in this off-dry Riesling. Rich and full bodied on the palate, bright, fresh apple and lemon flavors linger elegantly on the tongue with a hint of bitter lime pith.",Select,Wagner
"A little on the thin side, but attractively layered and dry, with fine tannins and brisk acidity framing blackberry, currant, licorice, herb and cedar flavors. A good everyday Cabernet.",,EOS
"Like many Rieslings from the Finger Lakes, honey and apple cider aromas perfume Fox Run's Reserve. A dark, steely tone on the palate may come off as slightly tinny, but plenty of bright apple and pear flavors and a long orange peel finish make this luscious, dry wine a great choice for casual winter fare.",Reserve,Fox Run
"Sweet and a little grassy on the nose, with lemon-lime aromas. The palate has a solid, regular, friendly feel along with sweet flavors of white nectarine, apple juice and tarragon. Perfectly quaffable, dry in feel despite being semisweet, and balanced. For the price, what's not to like? Imported",Carta Nevada Brut,Freixenet
"This is soft, light and dominated by fresh berry fruits. The tannins give an attractive structure to this gentle wine. Drink now.",Gariottin,Château de Cénac
"A young, freshly fruity wine, with a gassy berry-cherry liveliness and silky texture similar to Beaujolais. The finish on this Tempranillo and Cabernet Sauvignon blend is dry and spicy.",Bandolero,Daniel Gehrs
"Lots of rich cherry fruit flavor in this wine. It's marked by decent acids and brisk tannins, and is totally dry. Feels one dimensional, but it has a nice silky texture.",,DARE by Viader
"Dry and papery, this not-quite-settled wine shows threads of fruit (green apple, pineapple), toasted cracker (odd in a Riesling) and plenty of sharp acidity. Time may be the missing ingredient here, but it's difficult to assess at the moment.",,Amity Vineyards
"Mostly Sangiovese with smaller percentages of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, this informal wine offers freshness and simplicity. You'll recognize balanced aromas of red fruit, spice, leather and a touch of chewy pipe tobacco.",,Ciacci Piccolomini d'Aragona
"A smooth, easy wine, fresh, with a crisp citrus edge and a broad texture. It is the perfect wine for seafood, with its final tight acidity.",,Clos Teddi
"The nose offers plenty of cooked plum preserves, warm spice and toasted, nutty oak. There's a nice, lush texture and body, and bright red cherry and plums flavors on the palate. The fruit flavors may be slightly lacking in concentration, but supple tannins make for smooth, easy sipping.",Aquebogue Estate,Comtesse Thérèse
"Pure black berry juice, ripe and solid, this is a chunky, fresh wine. The wood edge is a major factor; there is a final stalky, mineral element. Drink now.",Chatons du Cèdre,Château du Cèdre
"A full and ripe texture, wood aging giving good definition. The wine has a tannic element, but this is well balanced with the juicy black currant fruit and the lightly refreshing acidity.",,Château du Vallier
"A good, sound wine to drink now. It's nicely dry and rich in tannins, with a burst of acidity. The cherry, blackberry and raspberry flavors are a bit jammy.",Topanga Vineyards,Black & White
"Smooth, red-fruited wine with a fine balance between fresh berry acidity and ripe tannins. The wine is young, fresh, ready to drink.",JP Azeitão Tinto,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"There's a suppleness to the way oak envelops the ripe, plummy aromas on this Finger Lakes Merlot. The palate is dry, but ripe and lush with an intensely concentrated dose of fruit. Low in acidity and tannins, it's a bit plush, but makes for easy sipping with food or on its own.",,Keuka Spring
"Tight and dry in tannins now, with an astringent mouthfeel that feels like sandpaper. So is it an ager? It's dry and balanced and rich in blackberries, cherries and currants, so it might be. Try after 2012, if you're the gambling type.",,Hunnicutt
"Rich and delicious, although it's also somewhat soft and direct. Offers upfront, jammy flavors of raspberries and cherries, with elaborate oak touches of toast, vanilla and caramel. Drink now.",Piedra Roja Block 22,Irwin Family Vineyards
"A lightweight, silky Pinot Noir for early consumption, Lawson's 2007 features pretty red fruit shadings and delicately herbal notes, elegantly intertwined. The tannins are gentle, while the cherry fruit picks up hints of chocolate and coffee on the finish.",,Lawson's Dry Hills
"Tastes pretty sweet, like a good Syrah that's been doctored with a tablespoon of white sugar. If that's your style, you'll enjoy the rich cherry, currant, chocolate and spice flavors.",,Longfellow
"Soft and creamy, although with just the right Vinho Verde bite, this is a crisp and clean wine, boasting light pear and pink grapefruit flavors. Off dry and very fresh.",Santola,Messias
"Elegant, fresh wine, full of delicious red berry fruits, a fruit salad of red and black plums and a light touch of spice. Bright, juicy, ready to drink.",Castelo do Sulco Colheita,Parras Vinhos
"Voluptuously full on the palate, this succulent off-dry Gewürz seems to burst on the palate with sweet pink-grapefruit juice and lychee fruit flavors. A hint of bitter grapefruit pith and a spray of citrusy acidity adds balance and elegance.",,White Springs
"Yorkville has been making this blend of Sémillon and Sauvignon Blanc (for this vintage it's 60% the first and 40% the latter), for many of its 25 years, and it achieves a nice balance, the Sémillon there for richness, texture and color, the SB for acidity and the wine's citrus and herb finish. Made from organic grapes.",Eleanor of Aquitaine,Yorkville Cellars
Nero d'Avola and Merlot are combined to produce an easy-going red that would pair with grilled meat or breaded veal. The wine is lean and crisp with light berry tones and a touch of charred toast on the close.,Calanìca Nero d'Avola-Merlot,Duca di Salaparuta
"A great value wine, Cusumano's cheerful Syrah is aged in stainless steel to lock in its fresh berry nuances. The wine's texture is clean and simple, but nicely smooth and soft as well.",,Cusumano
"A soft wood- and almond-flavored wine. It misses fresh fruit, instead offering a rounded, ripe character that suggests it is not for aging.",Vaucoupin Premier Cru,Domaine Corine Perchaud
Vanilla and cookie dough flavors dominate. The fruit is light and simple cherry candy; the tannins are equally light. Quaffable and refreshing.,H3,Columbia Crest
"Cristo di Campobello's value line, C'D'C', includes this fresh blend of Chardonnay, Grillo, Insolia and Catarratto. This easy-going white offers citrus tones of pink grapefruit and lemon zest backed by dried hay and honey.",C'D'C',Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"This alcoholic wine (15.9%, and you can taste it) is also tongue-scrapingly tannic. The black cherry and cassis fruit is fabulous, and quite ripe, but the alcohol starts to burn out the finish. Let the record show that some tasters will love this wine.",,Animale
"A soft, fruity style, with a hint of CO²-derived spritz to provide zest to the peachy fruit. A hint of bitterness on the finish helps balance the residual sugar. Drink now.",Prickly,Frisk
"A strongly seductive mocha character adds lushness and weight to this easy-drinking red. Flavors of juicy raspberry and ripe cherry abound, while the texture is in the slightly creamy. Drink now.",,Galil Mountain
"You get lots of rich, extracted blackberry, cherry and mocha flavors in this sweet, softly tannic young wine. For the price, it's a classy wine to drink now.",,Geyser Peak
"Aromas of ripe honeydew and fresh apple mingle with yeasty, biscuity notes in this 2003 vintage sparkler from Glenora. Fairly dry, with persistent froth and an elegant yet fruitful palate, this blend of Pinot Noir, Chardonnay and Pinot Blanc finishes on a nutty, sweet brioche note.",Brut,Glenora
"Ripe and easy-drinking, this thick Syrah is brimming with fleshy black cherry, blueberry and blackberry fruit flavors alongside hints of violet and milk chocolate powder. It's very round and filling in the mouth, with a fudgy finish.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Simple and one-dimensional, this is one of those no-fuss Italian whites that pairs so perfectly with informal seafood dishes or fried calamari rings. It keeps the palate refreshed, thanks to abundant citrus, honey and yellow fruit.",,Feudo Maccari
"A little sweet and simple, but with lots of charm in the ripe blackberry, cherry and chocolate-covered raisin flavors. The tannins are rich and smooth, the mouthfeel supple.",Artisan Collection,HandCraft
"Although the wine is made in stainless steel, there's a tiny touch of oxidation here (only a distant accent) that shapes a warmer, broader bouquet of stone fruit, honey and butterscotch. It's silky and smooth on the close. Drink now.",Lunario,Brugnano
"Dark in color, with concentrated, jammy aromas of wild berry and plum. Offers a big body given that it's a $7 La Mancha varietal, with concentration, solid structure and full, mildly baked flavors of black fruits and baked fig. Short but stout on the finish.",,Campos Reales
"Light and a little scratchy on the bouquet, with leathery notes. Feels fresh and kind of light in weight, with basic but clean red-fruit flavors and a dash of peppery spice. Flows easily on the finish, with a bit of fire and heat.",Vega Montán,Bodegas Adriá
"Starts out odd and exotic, with blueberry and Middle Eastern spice aromas. Feels condensed and jammy, with full flavors of herbs, boysenberry and plum. Shows freshness along with simplicity, with finishing herbal notes of sage and tarragon. Contains 10% each Merlot and Cabernet.",Miros,Bodegas Peñafiel
"Cantine Barbera presents a classic but simple expression of Nero d'Avola with an easy nose of cherry, raw fruit and white almond skin. The mouthfeel is bright and compact and shows a touch of sour fruit as well.",,Cantine Barbera
"Bianco Maggiore delivers touches of lemon drop and kiwi with fresh lime and yellow rose. The mouthfeel is thicker and denser than you'd expect, and it offers a long, tangy fruit-driven finish.",Bianco Maggiore,Cantine Rallo
"Terre di Giumara shows dark concentration and savory aromas of forest floor, barbecue sauce, blackberry and button mushroom. Bitter almond appears on the close and there's a touch of tight astringency as well.",Terre di Giumara,Caruso & Minini
"It's pretty easy pegging this for Chilean SB; the nose is full of grass, lettuce leaf and bell pepper along with citrus. Feels fresh and deep, with good cut and pointed flavors of green bean and lychee. Runs heavy on the bell pepper and capsicum.",Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Ripe and fruity in raspberries and cherries, this Pinot is also sweet in toasty oak. It has a nice, pleasantly silky texture. Not going anywhere, but good for drinking now.",Siebert Ranch,Ancient Oak Cellars
"Caleo opens with a bright, almost pungent note of almond paste, cassis and dried apple. Bramble, wild berry and almond skin appear on the easy finish.",Caleo,Botter
"There's a tough, gritty feeling in the mouth with this dry, tannic wine. Although it has some rich flavors blackberries and blueberries, it's astringent and hard. Give it a good long decant and drink now.",202,Kunde
"A blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato, this easygoing Cerasuolo di Vittoria offers a nice mix of freshness, informality and richness. Layers of raspberry, cherry and almond build on the close.",Vigna di Pettine,Maggiovini
"A great value bargain, this fresh Inzolia offers aromas of cut grass, lemon zest, pear and Golden Delicious apple. Pair it with smoked salmon dishes.",Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
"Bright and vibrant, with slightly liquorous red cherry and berry aromas as well as a softly herbaceous streak throughout. The fruit is fresh and the palate light, but it's all a touch fleeting on the close.",Shor,Shiloh Winery
"A soft, savory and fruity Zinfandel, with flavors of raspberries, cherries, cloves, black pepper and sandalwood. Drink now.",,Tierra Caliente
"It's dry to slightly off-dry, with clean, zesty acidity and decent flavors of citrus fruits, green apples, Asian pears and peaches.",,Ty Caton
"Feels too soft and rather one-dimensional, although the flavors are very good. The best thing about the wine, aside from dryness, is the richness of tannins. The fruit veers toward blackberry marmalade and currants. Doesn't seem like an ager, so drink up.",Thompson Vineyard,Tercero
"Pale peach in color, this softly sparkling blend of Pinot Noir, Pinot Meunier and Chardonnay smells sweetly of red apples and a hint of lanolin. There's a gentle sweetness upon entry that carries through the finish with a bright acidity and pleasant apple and pear notes.",Topaz Impérial,Sparkling Pointe
"A neutral cava with white candy and mango on the nose. The palate is both foamy and scouring, with soda cracker, apple and citrus pith creating the flavor profile and finish. Shows basic flavors, normal mouthfeel and scouring acidity.",Brut,S_niger
"Opens somewhat clipped and choppy, with citrusy aromas mixed with red fruits. The palate is healthy, lean and acidic, with bright plum and berry flavors softened by some creamy vanilla. A solid wine with punch, acidity and a good finish.",Reserva,Ramón Bilbao
"Delicious fresh citrus flavored wine, bright as a button, lively and crisp. Made from Alvarinho, there is a creamy texture with a mineral element, finishing with green plums and banana flavors.",Quinta dos Loridos Branco,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A soft, spicy wine, with a slight farmyard character alongside light acidity. Mushrooms, smokiness and sweet vegetables are developing as the wine matures. Drink now.",Cuvée Edmond Dantes,Château Monte Christo
"With a light, silky texture, this Pinot glides over the palate, carrying rich fruit and spice flavors. They include raspberries, pomegranates, cola, red licorice, cinnamon and pepper. It's lovely in many respects, but it's also notably sharp in acidity, a problem that's unlikely to go away.",,Casa Torres
"The balance between the firm tannins and ripe fruit works well here. The texture is dense, rough at the edges but with good layers of wood, acidity and dry tannins. The aftertaste has welcome freshness.",Cuvée Prestige,Château du Port
"After the scent of char blows off a bit, this first harvest Merlot opens sweetly to aromas of vanilla, cinnamon spice and plush, red plums. There's a hint of green stalks and leaves detectable on the palate amidst underripe black cherry and plum flavors, but bright acidity gives this wine a fresh character and the spiced plum finish is pleasant.",First Harvest,Comtesse Thérèse
"Pale peach in color with savory aromas of apple, pear and buttered toast, this softly pétillant brut rosé hits the palate a touch sweet. Made from Pinot Noir with a splash of Chardonnay, it balances bracingly high acidity with rich, buttery biscuit flavors and a dry finish.",Brut Rosé,Martha Clara
"This is a soft, semi-sweet wine with rich flavors of cherry and raspberry jam, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood. It's a little syrupy. Give it a chill in the fridge before drinking.",Estate Vineyard,Gundlach Bundschu
"An elegant wine, the tannins a core element in the firm structure. Acidity and black currant flavors go together with spice. It is a young wine, ready to drink, but will develop.",Pedras do Monte,DFJ Vinhos
"Oaky and ripe, this Chardonnay shows soft flavors of pineapples, Meyer lemons, mangoes and sweetly smoked vanilla oak. Made in the modern style for drinking now.",Gravel Bar,Hawkes
"The sweet flavors of honey and oranges make this wine taste delicious and generous. It could be crisper and have additional layers of complexity, but a little sugar goes a long way.",Rayons de Soleil,Novella
"Lucid and basically colorless, with flowery, lychee-like aromas that suggest Malvasia or Moscatel. But it's only Viura and Chardonnay, and it tastes fresh, floral and nice, with lime and lychee. About as easy as they come.",Viura-Chardonnay,Ochoa
"Juicy, elegant fruit is supported by firm tannins and a vivid texture. Refreshing acidity from black currant flavors, structured by wood and spice, finishing bright and fresh.",Pèra Doce Reserva,Parras Vinhos
"The initial odor, probably from sulfur, will blow off quickly with decanting. It's crisp and bright in pineapples, limes, pears and green apples, with a touch of tart gooseberry.",,Robert Hall
"Despite intriguing notes of ripe red cherries, menthol and barnyard that peek through, tar and smoke from heavily charred French oak dominate both the nose and palate. There's a pleasant midpalate of black fruit and pepper spice but its brief appearance is overshadowed again by a deep char finish.",,Sherwood House Vineyards
"This fresh Vermentino from Maremma delivers green fruit ones, exotic and passion fruits.",Poggio al Tufo,Tommasi
"Spy Valley's 2007 Envoy Pinot Noir is an attractive wine, featuring an exterior of brown sugar, dry leaves and coffee and a fruit-filled cherry center. The only concern is the slightly drying finish and some slightly coarse, rustic tannins. If those resolve gracefully, this rating may look stingy in 3 years' time.",Envoy,Spy Valley
Very leafy and herbal__hink crushed tomato leaf__ut there's an adequate complement of tropical fruit to keep things moving along. Would work just right with parsley-laden mussels.,,Waimea
"This vividly effervescent sparkling Chardonnay offers notes of bruised apples and pears on the nose and a palate of rustic apple cider and lime pith flavors. A bright, lemony acidity makes this a refreshing, easy-drinking sparkler that would match perfectly with pork in a braised apple sauce.",Brut Blanc de Blanc,Wölffer
"Wonderfully frothy in the glass, this round, rich sparkling wine smells sweetly of apple cider and buttered toast. This Pinot Noir/Chard blend has plenty of toasty, nutty flavors on the palate as well. Fresh apple and lemon notes make this a refreshing, uncomplicated sip with a pleasant walnut skin astringency on the finish.",Noblesse Oblige Rosé Sparkling Wine,Wölffer
"Tastes its best now, with jammy blackberry, cherry and raspberry flavors, and a rich overlay of oak. The tannins and acids are soft and gentle.",Caton Vineyard,Ty Caton
"The nose is a pleasant harmony of dark, ripe fruit, espresso grinds and carefully charred French oak. Coffee and cigar box notes carry through the palate as well, marrying with fresher red-fruit flavors. There's quite a bit of tannin to grapple with still, but overall, it's a pleasant medium-bodied red.",,Vivác Winery
"This Chardonnay and Pinot Noir blend smells sweetly of caramel apples and cider. Dry, but rich on the palate with notes of sweet vanilla and caramel, its simple and straightforward but offers a nice, stony finish.",Blanc de Blanc,Martha Clara
"A bit unusual and confusing, but that's because it hails from the Rioja region. The nose is herbal and mustardy, with green aromas leading to a cidery palate of apples and spice. There's also a bit of lemon and creaminess to this cava. Hard to understand but not without its merits.",Casa Conde de Haro,Muga
"Gets the job done with its rich tannins, crisp acids and solid blackberry, mocha and orange zest flavors. Easy to drink, and ready now. Production was 1,685 cases.",,Morgan
"A useful wine that will play well against umami-flavored appetizers. It's dryish to off-dry and crisp in acids, with pleasant pineapple, orange and vanilla flavors. The blend is Sauvignon Blanc, Viognier, Pinot Grigio, Chardonnay and Grenache Blanc.",Synergy Blanc,Novella
"Tastes hot and prickly in alcohol, which puts everything else off, including the black cherry, bacon, olive and herb flavors, which are actually pretty good. Drink now.",Holbrook Mitchell Vineyard,Rock Wall
"This pretty, Rhône-style red blend consists of roughly equal parts Grenache, Cinsault and Syrah, with a splash of co-fermented Roussanne. It smells young and fruity, with candied scents of strawberry and raspberry. With plenty of breathing it gains a bit of midpalate weight, but the candied character remains.",Double Bluff Red,Ott & Murphy
"A blend of Merlot, Petit Verdot and Syrah, Damis is a plump, jammy wine with bold aromas of strawberry and blackberry preserves, spice and toasted nut. It's an easy-drinking wine with a fresh, almost sour note on the close.",Damis,Mineo Family Vineyards
"Seems as though this medium-sweet Viura-Malvasia blend has gotten better in recent years as the winery has dialed down the sweetness and weight. Lately, this vintage included, Satinela has been fresh, cleanly made and easygoing, with sweet pear and peach flavors and not too much weight or residual sugar. Captures the essence of medium sweet.",Satinela Medium-Sweet,Marqués de Cáceres
"Bacca Bianca from the vineyards of Tenuta di Budonetto, is a blend of Inzolia, Grecanico and Chardonnay. This wine is slightly muddled aromatically, but it does possess a fresh, zesty mouthfeel.",Bacca Bianca Tenuta di Budonetto,Maurigi
"A blend of Nero d'Avola, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon from Etna, Bacca Rossa is an informal, light wine with disjointed aromas of spice, red fruit and rose. The mouthfeel is sharp and compact.",Tenuta di Budonetto,Maurigi
"This is Primitivo-Barbera blend with dabs of Nebbiolo and Dolcetto in the mix. It's light and youthful, with cranberry fruit and the sort of juicy acidity that freshens the palate. Not especially concentrated, but crisp and clean, with a bracing minerality.",Bravo Rosso,Wind Rose
"Let this heavyweight open; its tannins are tight at first, a showcase of its mountain heritage and more savory personality. Clove and ripe fruit battle against dark coffee and chocolate and those scrappy tannins, which don't ever relent.",The Scrapper,Vinum Cellars
"Aquilae is an oak-aged Nero d'Avola that offers bold aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry, prune, plum and cured meat. In fact, the finish is very much driven by savory tones of leather, earth and smoked bacon.",Aquilae,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"There are several versions of Calanìca made from various blends of red grapes. This version combines Nero d'Avola and Merlot, and opens with ripe aromas of black cherry and dried raspberry. The mouthfeel is soft, simple and chewy.",Calanìca Nero d'Avola-Merlot,Duca di Salaparuta
"Grown at 2,400-feet elevation from Italian budwood, this Dolcetto, so common to Piedmont but almost unheard of in California, is muy grande, with mountainous tannins and flavors of coffee and toffee and bright notes of cranberry and cherry.",Musso Family Vineyard,Due Vigne
"Kue is a floral blend of Insolia (70%) and Viognier, with subtle notes of peach blossom and jasmine that would pair with basil pesto or fresh tomato bruschetta. The wine presents a thin, simple but crisp feel on the finish.",Kue,Brugnano
"Solid on the opening, with red fruit aromas and a mild stalkiness. Feels healthy and medium in weight, with mild oak, fresh plum and berry, and a touch of cocoa for flavors. Dry and crisp on the finish, with leftover oak flavor and good balance.",,Campo Viejo
"Heavily toasted aromas promise strong wood flavors. The fruit, rich with pear flavors, balances that wood, although the wine does need a few months more integration.",Branco,Campolargo
"La Bambina is a fresh and easy-drinking Sicilian rosé (made from Nero d'Avola) that opens with a pretty peach-pink color and bright aromas of raspberry, white cherry and cassis. Try it with swordfish carpaccio.",La Bambina,Cantine Barbera
"This amber-colored Marsala opens with earthy tones of porcini mushroom, caramel, burnt sugar and candied fruit. It's a thick, syrupy wine with savory, leathery details on the long finish.",Terre Arse Vergine,Cantine Florio
"A fresh and easy-drinking white made from Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay, the Blanc boasts scents of soft talcum powder, pink peony and orange blossom against a gooseberry and white strawberry fruit backbone. Zippy and prickly in the mouth with a mouthwatering, grassy finish.",Unoaked Blanc,Flam
"Sweet on the nose, with scents of pink grapefruit skin, rose petals and lychee fruit, Glenora's bottling screams classic Gewürztraminer. Waxy lanolin notes and black tea notes on the finish add a touch of complexity to this slightly off-dry sip.",,Glenora
"A ripe, fruity wine with a light structure of tannins and acidity, it has some density while remaining fruity and juicy. The red cherry fruit blends into the closing acidity.",Les Grands Eparcieux,Domaine Chasselay
"The softness of the 2009 vintage is very apparent in this wine. It is rounded with pear and ripe apple flavors, a touch of toast and a gentle lemon zest aftertaste. Ready to drink.",,Domaine Christian Moreau Père et Fils
"A rich and rounded single-vineyard Chardonnay. It has weight and a smoky character to go with the peach, kiwi and lime juice flavors. The acidity is light, but does give a line of freshness.",La Carte,Cave de Lugny
"A Bordeaux-style blend, tart and fruity, with an unusual fruit flavor mix that starts with citrus and orange and runs into bright berries. Two things keep the score down__ chalky edge to the tannins, and some noticeable volatility (a whiff of nail polish)on the nose.",Storm Front Red,Convergence Zone
"Terrae Dei is a simple wine with bright fruit and a clean, berry-driven palate. Pair this wine with spaghetti and sauce stewed with cubed bacon bits.",Terrae Dei,Corvo
"Here's a simple, straightforward Nero d'Avola from a relatively new estate located just steps away from the temples of Agrigento. The wine's aromas include sun-ripened fruit and cured meat.",,D'Alessandro
"This is slightly bigger and earthier than Ara's other 2009 Pinot Noir, with notes more of beet than cherry, and hints of dried herbs and mushrooms. It's a sturdy wine that could stand up to braised meats.",Pathway,Ara
"A white Bordeaux-style blend, crisp and edgy, with green fruit flavors sporting a citrusy kick. Young, tight and tart, it shows its alcohol on the angular finish.",Updraft,Cloudlift Cellars
"A well-priced wine packed tight in oak-aged aromas of ripe fruit and spice. There's a warm, jammy feel and the mouthfeel is soft and easy.",,Colosi
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, this Sicilian Grecanico opens with nice fullness, density and creamy aromas of lemon mousse and tangerine skin. The wine would make a perfect match to raw fish or sushi.",,Di Giovanna
"A multigrape blend that seems to be lacking focus, this tastes strongly of vanilla and butter cookies, the fruit extremely light.",H3 Les Chevaux Red,Columbia Crest
"Pleasantly fruity, with tart raspberry fruit, this easy, accessible Merlot from a single vineyard finishes with a light lick of toast.",Mirage Vineyard,Balboa
"A delicate but complex nose of peony, bergamot, Anjou pear and hard melon transition to a somewhat surprisingly lean mouth flooded with citrus flavors. The nuances of the bouquet are mostly missing on the palate, but this remains a clean and refreshing white.",Blanc,Les Deux Rives
"Delicate and pale, this elegant rosé hints at rhubarb and strawberry, dappled with light herbs. Tart and refreshing.",Rosé of Pinot Noir,Patton Valley
"The quality of the 2009 vintage is reflected in this value-priced Toro that's full and medicinal but also balanced and rewarding. Flavors of medicinal red-berry fruit are mixed with thicker, chocolaty notes, while the finish is bold, grabby and solid. A blend of Tempranillo and Garnacha.",,Caño
"Medium intense notes of sweet grass, fresh red apple slices, green melon and lime citrus on the nose and mouth. Medium weight with moderate, supporting acidity and a clean finish. Drink now.",Alice Blanc,Château Cabezac
"A wine that suffers from high toast and not enough fruit weight. In time, it should settle down, but it is always going to be a wine that is on the lean side.",,Château de Bel-Air
"Layers of char, black pepper and briar patch help to build complexity in this dense, concentrated black plum Merlot. There's a touch of green leaf and tomato throughout, but overall, it's a fruit-driven, luscious wine accented with spice and smooth, supple tannins. Aged 24 months in new French oak.",Château Reserve,Comtesse Thérèse
"A fresh, lightweight wine with good black berry fruits, a juicy character and balancing spice. The tannins are certainly dry, but the fruit is well in balance.",,Château Jacques Noir
"Straightforward, fresh and citrusy, this is a 100% Chardonnay sparkler that proves quality and price are not always perfectly linked, making it a great value. It is a little soft and plush in style, but shows some leesy hints and plenty of tangerine fruit on the moderately long finish.",DB Family Selection Sparkling Brut,De Bortoli
"As sharp, fresh and fruity as a jar of raspberry, cherry and blackberry jam, melted into liquid and fortified with alcohol. Feels hot, too, despite an official alcohol reading of just 14%. The winery held this back for five years, an expensive investment in storage, but the wine just can't quite overcome its limitations.",Cupa Grandis Grand Barrel Reserve,EOS
"Clean and approachable, with lemon-lime aromas leading to an easy, mildly crisp palate with lemon, lime and honeydew flavors. Sweet in accordance with standard extra dry guidelines, and also good for apéritifs and sparkling cocktails.",Cordon Negro Extra Dry,Freixenet
"Sweet, freshly pressed apples seem to gush from this medium-bodied, off-dry Reserve. Juicy and refreshing with a bright acidity and a hint of lemon rind on the finish, it's an easy-drinking wine that would be great for casual entertaining.",Vinter's Reserve,Hosmer
"This single-vineyard Merlot smells sweetly of ripe black plums with just a whisper of menthol and Band Aid. Soft on the palate, there's a good amount of dark fruit, but it's a tad tired and dusty. The finish is strong with a high-toned acidity and firm tannins.",V. by Vivác Single Vineyard,Vivác Winery
"A robust blend of two popular varieties, this full-bodied red is basically dry and fairly tannic. It's enormously rich and extracted in blackberries and cherries, with notes of bacon, beef jerky, tobacco and scads of peppery spices. Drink now.",Zinfandel-,Watkins Family
"Nemus pairs the light fruit and crisp acidity of Sangiovese against the hearty firmness of Cabernet Sauvignon to produce an informal, food-friendly wine that would match pasta dishes and pizza with fresh mozzarella.",Nemus,Scopetani
"Rich and jammy with concentrated, cooked blackberry flavors, this medium-bodied Colorado Merlot melds nicely with aromas of toasty, nutty oak. There's a raw, green pepper note that peeks through, but overall, it's a pleasant, accessible wine with a delicious roasted coffee finish.",,Two Rivers
"This Marlborough Sauvignon Blanc is very easy to drink, if slightly lacking distinctiveness. Melon and fig flavors finish on a slightly grassy note, while the texture is plump and soft.",,Smythe & Renfield
"Peperino is an informal blend of Sangiovese and Merlot with bright, clean berry nuances and mild shadings of spice and herb. There's a Mediterranean quality to this wine that helps it pair with most Italian, Greek or Spanish meat dishes.",Peperino,Teruzzi & Puthod
"Somewhat soft and jammy. While it's certainly delicious, this 100% Cabernet needs greater structure and complexity to add value to the sweet blackberries, cherries and chocolate.",,Stepping Stone by Cornerstone
"Apple, spearmint, mixed greens and citrus carry the bouquet to a firm palate with dry papaya, lemon and herb flavors. Finishes with apple, lemon and bitterness. Very basic and quaffable, but nothing extraordinary.",Cuvee Henri,Loxarel
"Here's an easy and straightforward super Tuscan blend that would pair with lasagna or white meat dishes such as roast pork or chicken. The wine shows good freshness with loads of black fruit, spice, tobacco and crushed black pepper.",Terre del Pelacane,I Veroni
"Here's a dry, crisp and elegantly structured Pinot Noir. It's rich and forward in jammy raspberries, cherries and cola, with a bite of acidity. Drink now.",,Irony
"Good, but not without problems. It's dry and tannicly smooth in the mouth, with black cherry and mocha flavors. But there's a tart, sandpapery roughness that's just a little short of ripe. Drink now.",Stone Vineyard,Hawkes
"Rich and full-bodied, this white has almond, peach and mango flavors. In the mouth, it feels rich and concentrated, the acidity slow to reveal itself.",Rocim Branco,Herdade do Rocim
"This is a soft, simply constructed wine, but it's very tasty. Flatters the mouth with waves of ripe raspberries, cherries, currants and cocoa, sprinkled with anise and black pepper. Drink now.",Reserve Bordonaro Vineyard,EOS
"Light, fresh and crisp, typical of bright cool whites of the Lisbon region. It has lively, fresh acidity, picked out with lemon and grapefruit flavors.",Portada Branco,DFJ Vinhos
"Lots of tropical fruit, orange, lime, pear and buttered popcorn flavors in this Chardonnay. It's very bright in acidity, and is almost honey-sweet on the finish.",Stainless Unoaked,Chamisal Vineyards
"It's called extra dry, but it's actually kind of sweet. Not too much, just enough to give a rich, honeyed edge to the strawberry, peach, nectarine and toast flavors.",Extra-Dry Riche,Chandon
"Here's an easygoing red blend made with grapes that are native to Tuscany. The biggest component is Sangiovese and indeed you can taste flavors of wild berry, cherry, wet earth, violet and white mushroom. The mouthfeel is cool, crisp and informal.",Le Franette,Bocelli
"Fresh berry fruits, with stalky tannins and a fine juicy acidity give an easy, soft and ripe wine. Short wood aging has softened the bursting fruit and added a light touch of spice.",Pequeno Pintor,Monte do Pintor
"This informal and light super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon would make a cheerful companion to spaghetti with Bolognese sauce or veal involtini stuffed with bread crumbs, parsley and pecorino cheese. The wine shows fruit intensity and enough natural acidity to cut through those dishes.",Poggio al Tufo Rompicollo,Tommasi
"You don't see much Sauvignon Blanc in Sicily (the variety is usually associated with cooler climates) but when you do, they resemble Sinestesìa. There are ripe fruit and peach aromas with yellow rose, honey and jasmine.",Sinestesìa,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"Abundant tropical fruit and honeysuckle aromas get a fine zesting of lime skin on this surprising bang-for-your-buck Riesling. Semisweet in style, almost with a deeply concentrated fruit palate, it finishes quite dry on a supple, waxy lanolin note.",,Blue Teal
"The lightest wine from Cartuxa, EA stands for Eugénio de Almeida, the creator of the charity that owns the winery. It's simple and fruity, with attractive tannins and red cherry fruit. Ready to drink.",EA Tinto,Cartuxa
"Easy, fresh and approachable, this screw cap Sicilian red opens with raspberry, cherry and toasted almond aromas. There's a touch of bitterness on the finish.",Terre,Baglio Curatolo Arini 1875
"A good, standard Pinot Noir, dry and crisp in acidity, with cherry, cola and pomegranate flavors accented by smoky oak. Drink now.",,Mahoney
"You'll be surprised how much class there is in this inexpensive Chardonnay. It's rich in orange, pineapple and butterscotch flavors, while brisk acidity etches it in brightness. Finishes a little sweet, but you can stand this against many Chards that cost two or three times as much.",,Hilltown
"A bit developed already, with a round mouthfeel and some honey character accented by citrus and gingery-peppery spice. Pleasant to drink now, but seems to lack the vivacity for extended aging.",Art Series,Leeuwin Estate
"This organic Nero d'Avola offers bold aromas of black cherry, cured meat, black espresso and tangy Indian spice.",Il Giglio,Masseria del Feudo Grottarossa
"Saia Grande is a blend of Merlot, Syrah and Pinot Noir that offers plump fruit flavors of cherry and wild berry followed by toasted almond and crushed white pepper.",Saia Grande,Maurigi
"Fragrant Viognier aged in stainless steel is redolent of violets, citrus blossom and crushed minerals. This expression is clean, crisp and lean in terms of mouthfeel.",Le Chiare,Maurigi
"Opaque in color, with blackberry and licorice aromas but also a distinct streak of brambly herbs and green. Later on, pine needle and tartness enter the fray. This is a commendable modern Rioja but it does have a few issues, namely a green herbal component.",Selección Especial,Marqués de Terán
"Attractive, soft raspberry fruit is evident, along with some toast. Flavors have light spice and balanced acidity, finishing with a yeasty character.",Rosé Bruto,Murganheira
"Broad and off dry, this is bulky for Riesling, with weighty notes of honey and stone fruit. There's a pleasant whiff of mossy stones and a hint of petrol, but also a hint of bitterness on the finish.",The Mound Vineyard,Mud House
"A blend of Gewürz and Riesling with a splash of icewine added to the mix, Pillitteri's Fusion is bright on the nose and palate with freshly pressed apple and Meyer lemon undertones. Waxy lemon peel and lanolin notes on the midpalate add an extra layer of dimension.",Fusion,Pillitteri
"The Sallier de la Tour line from Tasca d'Almerita offers some of Sicily's best values. This easy expression of Nero d'Avola shows mild tones of cherry, spice and almond. It's a perfect pasta or pizza wine.",Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
"This is a terrific value wine (a rosé made from the indigenous grapes of Sicily) that opens with a bright pink color and fragrant tones of raspberry, white almond and rose petal.",Regaleali Le Rose,Tasca d'Almerita
"Case Ibidini is a line of value wines from the Ragusa area of Sicily, with the island's best Baroque architecture may be found. This Nero d'Avola (aged in stainless steel) presents crisp cherry and bright almond aromas.",Case Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"A rich wine, with some weight, black cherry flavors and an edge of tannin. This is sufficiently structured to age, but the fresh fruit is all ready to appeal now.",Nouveau,Vignerons de Bel Air
"A cheerful blend of Nero d'Avola and Nerello Cappuccio, Calìo would pair well with potato gnocchi with butter and chopped sage. Cherry, wild berry and almond are backed by a powerful but smooth mouthfeel.",Calìo,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"This is a distinctive dessert wine that opens with an inky, dark ruby color and savory aromas of root beer, button mushroom, sun-dried fruit, prune and figs. The wine's sweet finish is dense and sticky.",Sikélios,Scilio
"A pretty good Cabernet, dry and softly tannic, with blackberry, black currant, herb and cedar flavors. Finishes a touch overripe, with the bitter taste of raisin skins. Ready to drink now.",,Rock Wall
"Smells roasted and spicy, with an herbal, brushy character. Tannic and tight in the mouth, with pinching grip and flavors of herbal plum and berry. The finish turns up fresh tomato and drying tannins. Seems high in red fruit acidity.",Gran Reserva,Morandé
"Sweet, ripe and intense, with vibrant acidity brightening lime, kiwi, orange, pear and pineapple flavors. It's long-hangtime Edna Valley fruit, pure and simple.",Effort,Center of Effort
"A good but average red wine for drinking now. Shows ripe berry, cherry, currant, licorice and spice flavors, with edgy tannins that are a little scoury. Drink up.",Estate,A.S. Kiken
"Contempo is a fresh, easy white wine that opens with crisp citrus, kiwi, papaya, hazelnut and honey. These aromas are delivered over a bright, tonic mouthfeel.",Contempo,Abbazia Santa Anastasia
"Sweet and spicy on the nose, this semisweet Riesling is chock full of concentrated mango and pineapple goodness. Juicy and forward in a sunny, tropical way, it maintains an easygoing freshness with bright citrusy acidity.",Friend,Brooklyn Oenology
"A big, bold, ripe wine. It is full-bodied and peppery, full of blueberry fruit. Soft tannins finish with a light dry edge. Ready to drink.",Calheiros Cruz,C. Cruz & Co
"A terrific value wine, La Piazza (in a screw cap bottle) is a blend of Merlot and Nero d'Avola. Bright aromas of cinnamon, Spanish cedar, mocha, black cherry and bitter almond have a raw, vinous quality.",La Piazza,Calatrasi
"This easy Sicilian white offers peach blossom and citrus over a tight, crisp mouthfeel. This is the kind of no-fuss wine to drink on a hot weekend afternoon.",Terre di Ginestra,Calatrasi
"A smooth, creamed apple-wine, ripe and delicious. It has a sweet feel to it, the acidity just giving a bite. A great apéritif.",Entre II Santos,Campolargo
"Fruity, dry and immediately appealing, showing ripe raspberry, cherry, blackberry, cola, licorice, bacon and sandalwood flavors. Could use greater complexity, especially at this price. Cabernet Sauvignon, Petite Sirah, Syrah and Malbec.",Tytanium,Ty Caton
"Sort of generic and oily on the nose, with white-fruit aromas that don't fully register. The palate is both spongy and spritzy, with dry, soft flavors of melon and papaya. More fluffy and lush than zesty and precise.",,Valdelainos
"There's a profusion of charred oak on the nose and palate, but smoke and tar notes combined with a slightly cooked plum and cherry profile make this hearty Merlot a good match for smoked meats or bacon enhanced meals. Subtle violet and barnyard aromas add some complexity, but the finish drops quickly on a charred wood note.",,Osprey's Dominion
"Aged five years in cask, this has a dry edge with a light poise to it. It has a good, sweet raisin character, on the dry side.",Ruby Reserva,Quinta do Passadouro
"A 60-40 blend of Sangiovese and Merlot, this easy-drinking and affordable wine offers a nice ensemble of cherry, cassis, spice and leather. Pair this wine with pasta alla norma (short pasta with fried eggplant and salty ricotta cheese).",Cuccaia,Piandibugnano
"Sweetly ripe and oaky, with pineapple jam, kiwi, pear and green apple, and notes of vanilla, buttered popcorn and cream. Defines the fruit-forward, buttery style of Chardonnay in a soft, forward way.",Sapphire Hill Vineyard,Paradise Ridge
"Nice and dry, with good varietal flavors of blackberries and currants, wrapped into rich tannins. It's a fine Cabernet to drink with ordinary food, and a good value.",Running with the Bulls,Salvatore Principe
"Waxy on the nose, with buttercup, creamy yellow-fruit scents and white flowers. The palate is wet, racy and a touch like soda, with sweet, candied flavors of peach and melon. Plods along with good enough acidity to support the wine's core sweetness and candied qualities.",,Viñas del Vero
"Co-released with the 2007 Zin-Petite Sirah blend, this wine shows the same characteristics. It's dryish, tannic and rustic, with peppery flavors framing berries, currants and smoked meat. Give it a good decant before serving.",Zinfandel-,Watkins Family
"A rounded wine, keeping the white fruit character of pears, given vibrancy by a citric grapefruit flavor. Full in the mouth, it has a smooth texture, finishing softly.",Samora Branco,Wines & Winemakers
"Starts with distinct, hard aromas of mustard, horseradish and jerky. In the mouth, it's full, bullish and tannic, with flavors of bacon, wood resin, smoke and stewed blackberry. Very smoky and dark, with hard tannins, and just not as good as past vintages.",Deyo,Castillo de Monjardin
"A lean, too tannic wine that shows black currant acidity, almost austere in its dry character. There is good density as well, that promises a year or two of aging before opening up.",,Château Bellevue
"So sweet and caramelized in smoky oak, it tastes almost like a dessert wine. There might even be some leftover sugar in the wine. Yet it has brisk, refreshing acidity, and there's no denying the deliciousness of the pineapple and lemon-pie flavors.",Gold Coast Vineyard,Costa de Oro
"Austerely tannic, showing black currant crispness, a green herbal character and smokiness. This is always going to be lean and tight, but will work with rich food.",,Château Tourteran
"Spicy wine, with Moscatel giving an attractive lychee edge to the fresh apple skins and citrus. Lively final acidity.",Serras de Azeitão Branco,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A sweet Chardonnay, made in the popular style. It's rich and creamy in vanilla and buttered toast, with fruity notes of pineapple and Key lime pie.",,Jargon
"Quite dry and tasting more of skin than fruit, this has a bitter, alcoholic edge to it. The fruit hints at banana and light tropical.",,Seven of Hearts
"Sharp, cutting acidity mars this delicately-structured wine. Tastes like a good dose of lime juice was added. Otherwise, the raspberry, orange and pomegranate flavors are delicious and dry.",Early California,Toretti's
"A soft, medium-bodied Sauvignon Blanc, the 2010 Overstone features ripe fruit flavors that skirt melon and fig before heading into guava, with just enough citrus to help balance the ledger.",,Overstone
"A soft, juicy wine, one-dimensional but attractive in its strawberry fruits. There are pleasant tannins to give just enough weight.",Terra Grande Colheita,Parras Vinhos
"With its definite spritz, this is light, just off-dry Vinho Verde. It has vibrant green fruits, although the yeast character is perhaps too dominant.",Rei do Minho,Vinicola do Norte
"Unusual in that this cava hails from the Ribera del Duero region, where red wines are 99.9% of the show. For a no-dosage nature, it's properly crisp and dry, almost like a liquid version of a soda cracker. There are some holes in the fabric but overall it's citrusy, tight and only mildly bitter on the finish.",Peñalba López Brut Nature,Finca Torremilanos
"Although the plush plum and coffee grind flavors combine seductively with hints of bramble and earth in this rustic, full-bodied wine, pervasive notes of char and a stalky, green character make this wine a bit clunky. Sturdy tannins, combined with black spice and tar drive a long finish.",Old Barn,Harbes Family Vineyard
"This medium-bodied Merlot wafts fragrantly of sweet, cooked black fruits. On the palate as well, the fruit profile is a bit the pruney side. It's a softer expression of Merlot without a lot of acidity or depth, but sturdy tannins keep things in balance.",,Chateau Lafayette Reneau
"Good flavors of citrus, peach, spice and toast in this classic blend of Chardonnay, Pinot Noir and Pinot Meunier. It's dry, but rough in the mouth, with a scoury finish.",Brut Classic,Chandon
"Although there's some underripe black cherry and espresso notes on the nose, char dominates both the bouquet and the palate. It's a savory, rustic wine without a lot of fruit intensity, but it's a simple wine for casual dining with rich, meaty fare.",,Clovis Point
"Attractive spicy wine from Setúbal region's signature grape. Ginger, berries and light wood work well together to give richness without weight.",Pedras do Monte,DFJ Vinhos
"Intensely fragrant of gardenias, fresh pears and lanolin, this dry sparkling may be a bit too perfumed for some, but its fresh apple and pear flavors are pleasant. Dry, with a high-toned acidity, it finishes on a slightly bitter, stony note.",Naturel Sparkling Wine,Belhurst
"Bold, forward and extracted red wine, with raspberry, earth, compost and a light leafiness to the nose. Tannic and tight, with plum and heavy, ripe berry flavors. Toasty and dark on the finish too, with power and freshness.",Tinto,Alidis
"Nice and dry, with plenty of upfront blackberry, cherry and currant flavors. The tannins are thick and furry, and the acidity is sharp through the finish. It's a rustic wine that needs big, rich fare with which to do battle.",The Prodigal Son,Big House
"Grillo tends to oxidize easily during winemaking. Timpune does in fact show distant aromas of butterscotch and caramel that fit squarely within the aromatic profile of the grape. Otherwise, the wine ends with fresh peach, citrus and pineapple.",Timpune,Caruso & Minini
"Here's a value white from southern Italy that offers a light golden appearance and clean aromas of lemon zest, peach and white almond. It's thin but fresh on the close.",Terrae Dei,Corvo
"Made from Dão's signature Encruzado grape, this has ripe almonds, yellow fruit and a seductive perfumed character. It's a rounded wine, the acidity well integrated into the ripe character. Drink now, but could age a year.",Cabriz Branco,Dão Sul
"A soft, rounded melon and pear flavored wine. Very fruity, it is rich, smooth and ready to drink.",Monte da Cal Branco,Dão Sul
"Frappato is a wonderfully light and fruity red wine for all seasons, even hot summer months. This expression sees some oak aging that adds extra density and spice.",Carolina Marenga,Feudi del Pisciotto
"I Versi is a youthful blend of Nero d'Avola, Merlot and Syrah that offers plump aromas of ripe cherry and blackberry backed by soft tones of cinnamon and toasted almond. It's a perfect pairing to a heaping plate of spaghetti carbonara with crispy fried bacon.",I Versi,Fondo Antico
"With its bright cherry fruits, this is a warm and ripe wine. It has soft tannins and strawberry acidity. Drink now for red fruit pleasure.",,Domaine Dupeuble Père et Fils
"Butter and toast flavors give this wine extra richness and some weight. At the same time, the textured citrus and grapefruit flavors combine with the wine's minerality to give a more lively aftertaste.",,Domaine Vrignaud
"This Sicilian white delivers a clean, crisp mouthfeel followed by flavors of peach, almond and Golden Delicious apple.",Calanìca Grillo-Viognier,Duca di Salaparuta
"Solid and varietally correct, this brings citrus and melon fruit flavors in modest proportion to a simple, but balanced midpalate. It carries a hint of sugar in the finish.",H3,Columbia Crest
"A little sour in acidity, or maybe the acidity sticks out because the raspberry and cherry fruit isn't strong enough. Either way, this dry, silky Pinot Noir is rustic, but it does show real varietal character.",Reserve,Concannon
"While redolent of jasmine blossoms and sweet orange marmalade, Hosmer's dry Riesling is surprisingly austere on the palate with hints of fresh fennel fronds and a gripping lemon acidity. A good match for heavier, savory fare like braised pork belly, it finishes on a pleasantly bitter citrus-pith note.",Dry,Hosmer
"Lighter than Malibu Oak's Cabernet Sauvignon, this Cab Franc shows the variety's characteristic herby notes and is otherwise easy and light, with enough depth to pair well with a range of meats.",,Malibu Rocky Oaks
"You can't beat the low price of this Sicilian Pinot Grigio. This food-friendly white would pair with fried calamari, shrimp cocktail or even sushi, thanks to the wine's easy aromas of tangerine, citrus and fragrant white flower.",,MandraRossa
"This is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah, Zinfandel, Merlot and Malbec. The grapes are entirely from Sonoma County. It's a tannic, lusty and ultimately satisfying wine, with jammy berry and spice flavors.",Point Break,Longboard
"Attractive ripe fruits go with lime and toast flavors. The wine is soft and green, with flavors of apricot and intense final acidity. A delicious, ready-to-drink wine.",,Maurice Ecard
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, Il Giglio is a blend of Inzolia (75%) and Grillo. It opens with a clean, straightforward bouquet of citrus, cut grass, green apple and exotic fruit. The wine is easy and tight in the mouth.",Il Giglio,Masseria del Feudo Grottarossa
"Greg Graziano has been producing Sangiovese for a long time in California and has managed to coax its thick tannins into a swirl of herby, dark plum and dried black-cherry flavors that are rich, ripe and full, ready for grilled Italian-inspired foods.",,Monte Volpe
"Sourced from a high-altitude vineyard near the top of the Awatere Valley, this wine shows some of the leafiness characteristic of the region. The fruit is more roasted root vegetable than tree fruit, with a potent savory and fairly muscular character.",Ballochdale Estate,Jules Taylor
"Plum and cherry aromas turn herbal and piney with airing. Definitely a leaner, sharper Alazan than in the past, with body as well as piercing acidity. Black fruit flavors have an herbal undertone as the palate transitions to peppery spice. Bright and zingy; not much finish.",Alazan,Kingston Family
"Waxy fruit flavors of peach, melon and banana, all a bit understated, lead through a light and pleasant quaffer with a hint of toast on the finish.",,Hard Row To Hoe
"Planeta breaks new ground with this Sicilian rosé made from Syrah. Clean packaging and a screw cap bottle set the stage for a modern, pristine and impeccably made wine that is fresh, zesty and very easy to drink.",,Planeta
"A simple red wine, with cherry, cassis and prune. There's a touch of burnt almond on the close that is typical of this popular Sicilian grape variety.",Fondo Filara,Nicosia
"The initial impression of young, juicy red berries carries into an astringent wine with streaks of gravel and chalk. It's pleasant, simple but quick to fade.",,North by Northwest
"Apples, green plums and peaches go with lemon zest acidity in this soft, fruity white wine. It is ready for drinking, finishing with an attractive warm finish.",Vinhas do Lasso Branco,Quinta do Pinto
"Reflecting the difficulties of the vintage, this is a slightly edgy, coarsely textured wine, with sweet, oaky notes framing cherries and roasted beets. Try it with something slightly rustic, like beef stew.",Satellite,Spy Valley
"Shows a slightly evolved color for a wine this young, with hints of brick already creeping in at the rim, but it also delivers elegant sous bois aromas, bright cherry and cranberry fruit and notes of scorched wood and leather that turn more mocha-like on the finish. Drink now.",,Wairau River
"This cheerful Nero d'Avola opens with fragrant tones of blue flower and wild berry. There's loads of fruit in the mouth, with a touch of bright potpourri at the end.",Case Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"Loaded with dark cherry earth, this is a dense, drinkable Pinot Noir. From a tiny Watsonville-based producer who sources from all over the state to make a handful of different wines.","Smith Road Vineyards, Rows 2_5",MICA Cellars
"Maurigi is a young, dynamic estate located on the blackened slopes of Mount Etna. This hearty Cabernet Franc shows tertiary aromas of leather, tobacco, licorice and inky dark fruit.",Tenuta di Budonetto Granny,Maurigi
"This big, powerful red wine is made from too many varietals to name, but they all bring something to the table. It tastes jammy and fresh in acidity, with berry, cherry, spice and earthy flavors.",Big House Red,Big House
"Heavy, dark, candied and jammy, with a hint of licorice to the nose. The palate is chunky and concentrated, with meaty berry flavors and a dose of chocolate. Short on the finish, yet fruity if a bit flat.",Spada,Bodegas Fariña
"Jammy, sweet aromas of cooked plum preserves and toasted French oak lead to a palate of dense, concentrated plum fruit and spicy, sweet cinnamon spice. Basic and a touch soft, this Merlot benefits from sturdy tannins and a balanced acidity.",Reserve,Macari
"This medium-bodied Sauvignon Blanc smells like fruit cocktail, and the flavors that follow are pleasantly reminiscent of guava, but slightly one-dimensional. Finishes soft.",,Konrad
"Straightforward, leesy, fresh, simple Pinot Blanc, with a mix of jicama, celery and yellow apple flavors. There's a bit of cinnamon spice in the finish; this is a good, everyday sipping wine.",,High Hook
"This off-dry Riesling offers plenty of concentrated apple juice flavors accented by a dash of lemon and savory apple pie spice. There's a hint of petrol throughout that adds a layer of depth, but overall, it's simple and easy drinking.",Semi-Dry,Hunt Country Vineyards
"Leafy and herbal, with green tomato and pineapple flavors that mesh surprisingly well. It's medium-bodied, with a slight tang on the finish.",,Zeal
"Feels dry and rustic in the mouth, with astringent tannins and acidity cutting across flavors of blackberry and cherry jam, red currants, licorice and pepper. Best now, with a brief decant.",Caton Vineyard Upper Bench,Ty Caton
"With high acidity making for a stinging mouthfeel, and 1.3% residual sugar giving some, but not enough, soft relief, the result is a compromise between a sweet and a dry wine, which will satisfy fans of neither. Still, it's ultraclean, and the apple and honeysuckle flavors are appealing.",,Ventana
"Earthy, spicy aromas are followed by a chunky wine, tasting of tough clay and limestone soils. Dark black currant fruits and layers of acidity, give an austere final flavor.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"Spicy, sweet red plums and charred oak marry well in this limited release wine from Sherwood House. There are hints of tobacco leaf and green grass throughout, but soft, supple tannins and a dark, smoky finish make this a pleasant sip.",,Sherwood House Vineyards
"Dry and crisp, with pure citrus flavors of Meyer lemon, lime and pink grapefruit. The acidity is strong and mouthwatering. There's also a potent note of unripe ammonia.",Shone Farm Vineyard,Signaterra Benziger
"From the folks at Spy Valley, this is a sweaty, pungent rendition of Marlborough Sauvignon Blanc, laden with hints of tomato leaf and herbs. Drink up.",,Satellite
"This blend of Syrah and Grenache is soft and melted, with green peppercorn flavors along with riper cherries, chocolate and rhubarb. Ready to drink now.",Syrache,Ampelos
"Attractive fruits with a good, juicy flavor characterize this easy, fresh wine. Black berry flavors and vivid acidity make it ready to drink now.",Serras de Azeitão,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A bright, fruity wine that has black currant juice fruit just lightly strengthened by tannins. It is crisp, with considerable acidity.",Classic,Château Bouissel
"Dusty and nuanced with soft aromas of cocoa, dried raspberry and cherry, reminiscent of a chocolate cherry latte from Starbucks. Light weight in the mouth with approachable tannins and a clean, dry finish. Drink now.",,Château Comte Devaugelas
"One-dimensional in fruit, but clean and zesty, and likeable for its wealth of orange, Asian pear, vanilla and honeysuckle flavors. The finish is off-dry and spicy.",,Chateau St. Jean
"A sweet style of white Port, its nut and honey flavors dominant. It has good balance though, a delicious apéritif wine.",White,Borges
"The Vinho Verde rosé style takes advantage of the high acidity of the red grapes in the region. Casa do Valle's rosé is bone dry, with an intense level of acidity, raspberry juice, crisp and fresh.",,Casa do Valle
"A relatively light, fresh style of sparkling Shiraz, with berries and hints of chocolate picking up just a touch of sweet vanilla on the finish.",Emeri Sparkling,De Bortoli
"This Bordeaux blend is soft and somewhat sweet, with jammy blackberry, cherry and currant flavors accented with oak and tannins. It seems at its best now.",Mirepoix,Fernwood
"Made in the modern style of oaky softness and jammy ripe fruit. Shows appealing pineapple, pear, buttered toast and vanilla cream flavors, with just enough acidity for balance.",Foggy Oaks,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Good, fleshy flavors of tart cherries in this dry wine. Yet it lacks structural integrity, as it is too soft and melted. Drink now.",Artist Collection,Imagery
"A little thin in flavor, but likeable for its pleasant flavors of citrus fruits, green grass and vanilla, with a firm spine of minerality. Zesty acidity makes it finish clean.",,Maddalena
Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot are aged in large oak casks to produce a balanced relationship between the wine's fruit and spice-driven components. It's an informal and easy-drinking wine that would pair with roast beef or honey-glazed ham.,D'Echo,Leopoldo I di Toscana
"Fruity and bright in acidity, this Pinot tastes like liquid raspberry and cherry jam, sprinkled with cocoa and cinnamon, and sweetened with a spoon of white sugar. Drink now.",,Kynsi
"Fresh and fruity, with attractive pink coloring, this light rosé has raspberry flavors, a touch of sweetness and caramel. It finishes bright and crisp.",Portada,DFJ Vinhos
"Accented with intriguing notes of charred oak, dried herbs, porcini mushrooms and a whisper of peppery grains of paradise, this is a rustic Merlot.  The midpalate shows hints of underripe red fruit and raw green peppers, but it's a sturdy dry red that would hold up well with rustic braised meats on a cold winter's night.",Estate,Raphael
"Starts off slightly flinty on the nose, then delivers restrained grapefruit flavors on the palate, tinged with green peas. Medium-bodied, with a short finish; drink it over the next couple of months.",,Silver Beach
"There's no doubt this is 100-percent Petite Sirah, full of dark plummy fruit and an earthy element that's close to mushrooms and dirt. Aged over two years in French oak the wine even has a slight hint of game and caramel. The tannins are soft but ample.",,McCay Cellars
"Smoky and a bit stark with whiffs of struck flint and stone. This off-dry Riesling is piercing on the palate with nervy lime-juice and lime-skin flavors. The finish is medium long, ending on a softly floral, crushed-stone note.",Semi-Dry,McGregor
"Murrieta's blend of 31% Sauvignon Blanc, 27% Viognier, 15% Sémillon, 11% Pinot Blanc, 8% Orange Muscat and 8% Muscat Canellii is well-made and likable, medium-thick and somewhat sweet in style with citrus and almond accents. Delightfully quaffable.",The Whip White Wine,Murrieta's Well
"The tough conditions of the 2008 vintage are reflected in this scratchy wine. Plum is the key fruit aroma, and that's followed by a tight, firm body with toasty oak, black fruit flavors, herbal notes and peppery spice. Quick and a touch hot on the finish.",La Montesa,Palacios Remondo
"A firm, youthful Cabernet, with cassis and blue plum fruit accented by dried herb, graphite and asphalt. As it sat in the glass, a distinct leathery aroma emerged and the fruit quickly faded.",,Ross Andrew
"Smells full but reduced, with a foxy, candied leaning and aromas of vitamins and minerals. Feels big, bulky, grabby and thick, with baked blackberry and plum flavors. Full on the finish, with some heat.",Reserva,Loriñon
"A soft, yet also mineral-textured wine. Its lemon and grapefruit flavors are crisp, reflecting the taut structure of the vintage. A fresh wine, with a crisp finish, ready to drink.",,Louis Jadot
"A 75-25 blend of Nero d'Avola and Tannat, Naisi is a plump, jammy red with aromas of blackberry, leather and cured meat. The finish is layered with sweet and sour elements.",Naisi,Brugnano
"From husband-and-wife team in California redwood country, comes this interesting Syrah, sourced from dry-farmed estate vines. Smelling of cedar pine and red fruit, it's very savory, full of pepper and leather, dark coffee and espresso. Lay it down another year or so to tame its wild soul.",,Cabot Vineyards
"This Bordeaux-style blend, one of four from this tiny winery, is two thirds Cabernet Sauvignon. The somewhat thin cranberry and raspberry fruit, high in acid, is not quite substantial enough to completely shed its candied character.",Halcyon,Cloudlift Cellars
"Insolia and Chardonnay make great blending partners and produce a white wine that is easy, crisp, genuine and food-friendly. This is not an overtly sophisticated or complicated wine, but nor is it meant to be.",Calanìca Insolia-Chardonnay,Duca di Salaparuta
"This value wine opens with a fresh, citrusy bouquet and features a compact, streamlined mouthfeel.",Calanìca Insolia-Chardonnay,Duca di Salaparuta
"Di Giovanna (an organic producer) shows a nice portfolio of easy-drinking white wines. This Grillo, for example, is redolent of passion fruit, lemon soda and vanilla cream.",,Di Giovanna
"Half of this Bordeaux-style blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, the other half a blend of Merlot, Cab Franc and Petit Verdot. Pretty cherry fruit and sweet oak flavors are the two main threads here, but they have yet to meld together into a seamless whole. The wine opens with plenty of black cherry flavor, then hits a wall of tannin and astringent dried wood.",Meritage,DiStefano
"Beautifully feminine, with a delicate cherry-blossom perfume, this off-dry rosé sparkler blends juicy cherry and strawberry flavors, with a hint of earthy, mushroom goodness. Medium sized bubbles are brisk and tonic on the finish.",Gabrielle Rosé Sparkling Wine,Ambition
Excellent color on this firmly fruity wine. It has an attractive edge of tannins giving it good structure while showing all of the fresh nouveau fruit.,Nouveau,Antonin Rodet
"Ready to drink, this Pinot is already losing color and going brick at the rim, its modest red berry fruit falling away to reveal notes of brown sugar, vanilla and even a touch of wintergreen. Supple in texture, with mouthwatering acids on the finish.",Composite,Ara
"Herbal and tight, with a whiff of burnt rubber in front of some tart fruit. There is some concentration, and with more bottle age the wine may yet flesh out a bit.",Chelle den Millie Vineyard,Basel Cellars
"Feels sturdy and properly acidic, with melon, papaya and apple flavors running alongside almondy bitterness. Simple and quick on the finish; 60% Xarel-lo and 40% Chardonnay.",Petit Albet Made with Organic Grapes Chardonnay-Xarel-lo,Albet I Noya
"A blend of Nero d'Avola, Syrah, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, Campobello's entry-level red is slightly muddled, but it does a good job of offering genuine fruit flavors and overall freshness.",C'D'C',Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Nerobufaleffj delivers ripe fruit, blackberry and some distant tones of citrus and apple. It's frank, easy and smooth on the close.",Nerobufaleffj,Gulfi
"This is a medium-bodied Riesling that seems destined for rather early consumption, as it lacks the fine edge of acidity that distinguishes age-worthy examples. Apple and lime flavors are tinged with gingery spice on the finish.",Reserve Dry,Jacob's Creek
"A veritable bouquet of lilacs and white blossoms, Hazlitt's standard Riesling is charmingly feminine with an abundance of sunny peach and quince preserve notes punctuated by musky whiffs of bergamot. Off-dry with a briskly acidic backbone, it finishes as pretty as it starts with a lovely violet scented note.",,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"A weighty wine that has black fruits, solid tannins and richness. It has a dense layer of spice and fruit that has acidity as well as juiciness. Worth aging for 6_12 months.",Hiver Gourmand,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Robust and fruity, this Pinot has drink-me-now flavors of cherries, raspberries, red licorice and cinnamon spice, with a touch of raisins. Earns extra points for its crisp acidity and silky texture.",,Storrs
"Waxy citrus skins and fresh pineapple notes are dewy and fresh in this just slightly off-dry Riesling from Swedish Hill. While a bit lean in profile, brisk lemony acidity and a subtly fruited palate make it a refreshing accompaniment to even the most delicately flavored fare.",Dry,Swedish Hill
"A great value wine, this fruity Syrah opens with bright blueberry, cherry and plum woven between subtle nuances of leather, spice and smoked bacon.",Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
"Mysteriously smoky on the nose, with an earthy sheen of crushed stones and steel. Just off-dry and fairly lean in style, it's surprisingly penetrating on the palate, with crisp lime and white peach flavors that linger.",Semi Dry,Wagner
"A pretty good Pinot Noir, dry and elegantly constructed, with crisp acidity and a backbone of tannins. The flavors of raspberry and cherry fruit are delicious, but the texture is scoury and a little warm, even though the alcohol is relatively low.",Grand Firepeak Cuvée,Baileyana
"Quite light, suggesting fruit that was picked at less than optimal ripeness. This thin wine has tart red fruit, a streak of caraway seed and a finish with sweet cracker highlights.",Inspired Red,Basel Cellars
"Spicy fresh berry fruit, with a great burst of ripe plum juice, along with acidity. This is rich, although easy and medium-bodied. Drink now.",,Vale da Mina
"Woody and blocky, with light peach-flavored fruit. Though neutral barrels are indicated, it has an overriding woody note. The fruit thins out quickly, with some bitterness (from skins?) and a little vanilla wafer in the aftertaste.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"Light on the nose, with dilute red-berry aromas and mild leathery, cheesy notes. The palate is kind of raw and lean, with tangy, crisp flavors of pie cherry and raspberry. Dry, peppery, snappy wine, with definitive crispness.",Crianza,Vaza
"Fresh, fruity juicy wine, deliciously light and ready to drink. Lovers of Beaujolais would also appreciate this soft, flavorful, easy wine.",Merlot Cabernet,Vignerons de Buzet
"Solid blackberry, black currant, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood flavors in this dry wine. The grapes come from a small appellation in Mendocino County. It's too soft, lacking structure, but has a certain opulence.",,Meyer Family Cellars
"A wine that starts almost too soft, the structure only slowly coming through. The fruit is pleasant, wood and bitter chocolate, tobacco and spice, but the wine lacks definition.",Montaria Reserva,Parras Vinhos
"Tastes soft and almost sweet, with melted raspberry and cherry-pie-filling flavors. It's rich and oaky, but the palate lacks some grip, some structure, something to hang on to.",Lingenfelder Vineyard,Brogan
"De Bortoli's Emeri line of sparkling wines are not conventional Pinot Noir-Chardonnay blends. This one is Pinot Grigio with bubbles, the usually muted aromas of the variety perked up to show grapefruit and fig notes. The wine is soft and fullish in body, with hints of fig coming through on the palate.",Emeri Sparkling,De Bortoli
"Medium-bodied and supple in texture, this dark and brambly Virginian Merlot offers plenty of black fruit and warm, savory spices. Aged in a combination of American and Hungarian oak, there's a slightly reedy, wooden note and high-toned acidity on the finish.",,Barrel Oak
"This is a very informal and easygoing red table wine that would taste great with pizza. It opens with a bright ruby color and shows aromas of cherry, raspberry and toasted almond.",VYD,Bellini
"Badia a Coltibuono's Cancelli is an informal, well-priced and handy little wine to stock for easy meals at home with family and friends. The simple bouquet is redolent of cherry and mild spice and the mouthfeel is tonic and bright.",Cancelli,Badia a Coltibuono
"Heavy for a Pinot Noir, it's almost unrecognizable. While it is a nice, rustic red wine, dry and spicy, with lots of berry fruit, it's just not particularly Pinot-esque.",,Inocencio
"Soft, young and fruity, with juicy black berry fruit flavors and only light tannins. Think barbecue.",,Vinel
"The Grand Vin from Water's Crest hits the nose with intense aromas of char, smoke and dark cherries, but is laced with a veil of green, vegetal notes throughout. On the palate, flavors of black coffee and rich black fruit are followed by a sweet vanilla chaser. Sturdy but supple tannins add structure and bite.",Grand Vin,Waters Crest
"After the initial bouquet of charred oak and espresso blow off, pretty aromas of ripe black cherries, spice and smoke linger on this beautifully balanced, regal Merlot blend. There's plenty of coffee and char on the palate as well, but layers of earth, mushroom and smoke flavors add complexity and depth.",Lambardo,Wölffer
"Soft and somewhat sweet, this rustic Petite Sirah has candied flavors of raspberries, mocha, bacon and black pepper. An easy sipper to enjoy now.",Alexander Valley Estate,Trentadue
"Too acidic, even for Petite Sirah, and the acidity compounds the tannins, making for a harsh mouthfeel. There are lovely berry and coffee flavors and a spicy, dry finish.",Jonquil Vineyard,Hopper Creek
"Rich flavors of peaches, pears, buttercream and toast appear in this dry Chardonnay, which shows no signs of tiredness, although many 2007s do. The chief problem is excessive softness. It lacks balancing acidity and brightness.",Los Chamizal Vineyards,Hopper Creek
"There's not a ton of intensity to the bouquet of this wine, but some serious sniffing can coax out suggestions of red apple and white florals. The mouth offers a bit more by way of full, juicy cantaloupe and grapefruit supreme flavors. Fresh and easy; drink now.",Domaine Lugel,Domaines Paul Mas
"A flamboyantly rich red wine, brimming with ripe cherry, blackberry, raspberry, red currant, cola, bacon, cocoa and licorice flavors. The tannins are soft and gentle but firm. The main problem is an excessive sharpness that seems artificial. Drink now.",Reserve,EOS
"Pale and low on bead, but if you like a Moscato-style wine, this isn't bad at all. The palate is sweet, fleshy and smooth, with lychee and melon flavors. Lively but easy on the finish, with a final wave of lychee fruit and Malvasia-driven sweetness. Unusual but pretty good.",Spumante,Freixenet
"Made from hand-harvested grapes, there are pleasant cherry, coffee grind and barnyard notes. Aged in French oak for 18 months, however, dark char dominates the nose and palate, along with hints of green stalks and leaves in the backdrop.",,Gramercy Vineyards
"The partner to Copains d'Abord, this wine sports a label of women having a good time at a party. The wine suits the image: fresh, fruity and juicy.",Les Copines Aussi,Domaine des Sablonnettes
"A medium-dry Vinho Verde, this is light and fresh without being quite crisp enough. Well chilled, though, it makes a lively and fresh apéritif.",Aliança,Caves Aliança
"An aromatic, perfumed wine, fat, full and soft. It lacks definition, but the spicy perfumes give it an intriguing character.",Premier Vin,Château la Rayre
"On the austere side, the tannins dry and firm. The fruit flavors echo the severe character, with red currant flavors and a slight vegetal edge.",,Château Tour Saint-Joseph
"Likeable for its dryness, and the discrete balance of black currant and dried cherry fruit with earth and mineral tones. The mouthfeel is a little fierce in acidity, though.",Viva Yo,Bodegas Paso Robles
"Tasting young, with a stalky edge, this reserve Port shows black fruits, very berry in character. It is structured, on the dry side.",Collector Reserva,Ramos-Pinto
"This first label Merlot combines pleasant notes of black coffee and plush red plum with savory aromas of dried mushrooms, spices and a hint of tomatoes. Gripping tannins and glimpses of underripe fruit and green stalks throughout make this wine a tad clunky and disjointed.",First Label Estate Bottled,Raphael
"A good Pinot, but not without its faults. It's nicely dry and has a lovely, silky texture, making it feel light and airy in the mouth. The raspberry, cherry, orange zest and cola flavors testify to the wine's cool-climate origins. The main problem is sharp acidity, which is hard to ignore.",,Toretti's
"Light fruit flavors run from melon into pale strawberry, with tannins that seem just on the edge of ripeness. Pleasant for the near term, but not for cellaring.",The Buzz Yellow Jacket Vineyard Red,Beresan
"With abundant floral and stone-fruit notes on the nose and palate, this New York sparkler is on the sweet side of brut. Brisk in acidity and surprisingly pétillant, this $9 sparkler is an irresistible weeknight bubbly.",Gabrielle Blanc de Blancs Brut Sparkling Wine,Ambition
"A blend of just over one-third Riesling, Atwater's Riewürz boasts a steely precision that cuts through all of Gewürztraminer's ebullient floral and juicy fruit characteristics. Semidry on the palate, with deliciously concentrated pomelo flavors, it finishes on a zesty, candied orange-peel note.",Riewürz,Atwater
"From a winery founded 137 years ago, this Grillo-based Sicilian white offers fresh aromas of citrus, honey, exotic fruit and Granny Smith apple. The finish is pure, simple and clean.",Villa Tonino,Baglio Curatolo Arini 1875
"Hints of bergamot add a musky elegance to tropical notes of sweet melon and tangerine in this beautifully perfumed Riesling. There's a sugariness on the midpalate, but the finish is clean and brisk, with a shower of pink grapefruit acidity.",Love,Inspire Moore
"Hints of exotic spice__lack pepper and curry leaf__ccentuate concentrated floral and stone-fruit nectar notes on the nose and palate of this semidry Pinot Gris. While voluptuous in body, it's balanced by a delicately sugar-laced midpalate and a bracing hit of tea leaf astringency on the finish.",,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"A soft fruited wine, its flavors are rounded with an attractive sunny feel. The wine is ripe while also attractively light, finishing with just the right amount of acidity.",Ciconia Branco,Herdade de São Miguel
"A consistent wine, year in and year out, MandraRossa's fresh Nero d'Avola would pair perfectly with pizza or simple spaghetti and tomato sauce. It shows loads of cola, licorice, dark fruit and bright acidity on the close.",,MandraRossa
"V90 offers loads of fresh citrus and grapefruit with background aromas of fragrant white flower and peach blossom. The wine offers a soft, almost sweet delivery that would work nicely next to shellfish or shrimp.",V90,Brugnano
"Creamy apple and pear flavors give this wine a bright, while full-bodied style. Wood tastes and taut acidity combine easily with the fruit. Drink now.",Reserva Branco,Burmester
"Smells good and correct for the variety, with leather, roasted berry and herbal-spicy aromas. Racy and tight in the mouth, with narrowing acidity and forward flavors of red plum, herbs, vanilla and heat.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Lightweight and easy in the mouth, with bright, juicy red fruit aromas and flavors spiced up by olive tapenade and fruitcake accents. Clean and balanced with a medium-length finish.",,Galil Mountain
"This blend of Nero d'Avola and Cabernet Sauvignon shows easy tones of blackberry, prune, plum and cherry liqueur. It's soft and velvety in the mouth, with an easy-going personality.",Nìvuro,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"As its name suggests, Quater is a blend of four Sicilian grape varieties (Grillo, Catarratto, Carricante and Zibibbo). It opens with thick aromas of pineapple, crushed clove, caramel and candied fruit. The creamy mouthfeel is capped by a touch of zesty spice.",Quater,Firriato
"An improvement over the previous vintage, this value wine shows a simple but clean aromatic profile, with citrus zest, Granny Smith apple and apricot. There's a sweet touch of lemon mousse on the close.",Grillo Parlante,Fondo Antico
The blend is 60-40 Grillo and Viognier and the wine offers aromatic components of both varieties. The first imparts green notes of kiwi and cut grass and the second offers sweet floral fragrances.,Calanìca Grillo-Viognier,Duca di Salaparuta
"This 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is clean and almost delicate, with cranberry fruit, red licorice, dry leaves and drying tannins. It fades rather quickly, but would make a nice companion to a simple skirt steak.",,Hamilton
"Sweet and oaky, with orange, pineapple and pear jam, buttered toast and vanilla flavors. Plays it safe down the middle by appealing to the popular taste.",,Hanna
"Cusumano is a terrific Sicilian estate that offers both high-end expressions and a consistent line of value wines. This well-priced Nero d'Avola is fresh, clear, fruit-forward and easy to drink.",,Cusumano
"A streak of green testifies to some unripe notes, which are accompanied by notable acidity. The wine is rather lean and angular, especially compared with lusher, riper Chards from the vicinity, but some will like its linearity and low alcohol.",Los Alamos Vineyard,Chanin
"Compact and candied on the bouquet, with dusty red berry aromas. Feels blocky and tannic but healthy, with cassis and blackberry flavors touched up by typical Chilean herbal notes. A flavorful wine for everyday drinking.",Reserva,Chono
"Medium-light, with clean and fresh berry fruit flavors, sharp and tart. It starts out with some quick punch, then fades away in a fast finish.",Cloud 2,Cloudlift Cellars
"This bright, ruby-colored rosé opens with lively tones of cranberry, raspberry and white almond. It's soft and creamy with a touch of sweet berry or ripe cherry on the close.",Tre Torri,Cantina Santadi
"Here's a focused and sharp Sicilian white that shows bright aromas of citrus, cut grass, kiwi and stone fruit.",,Cantine Barbera
"This is a spaghetti with tomato sauce wine, high in acidity, with very ripe, sweet cherry and cured tobacco flavors and firm tannins. It's kind of like an old fashioned Chianti.",AD,Carlotta
"The blend is Viognier, Roussanne and Marsanne, with a few other minor varieties. The orange and apricot flavors are strong and fruity-sweet. It's a country-style wine to drink with rustic poultry and pork dishes.",Charlene,Carlotta
"A great wine to drink as a cocktail or with light finger foods, Case Ibidini has a clean, crisp disposition and loads of citrusy intensity.",Case Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"Scents of smoke and sweet roasted chestnuts add a warm, rustic tone to this medium-dry Riesling. Deeply concentrated, with ripe yellow peach and apricot flavors, it's brightened by a shower of lemonade acidity and a snappy lemon-rind finish.",,Ventosa
"Enticingly nutty on the nose, with hints of smoke, yeast and apricot kernel, this 2003 vintage bottling from Swedish Hill shows promising signs of development. While fairly aggressive on the attack, it's clean and lemony on the palate, with a softly saline, sea breeze note on the finish.",Brut,Swedish Hill
Inzolia is one of the most widely planted varieties in Sicily and the results are surprisingly consistent. The grape is usually vinified in stainless steel to lock in its freshness and lemon-lime aromas. This wine faithfully follows suit.,Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
"A bit harsh and rustic in the mouth, with tart acidity and thin cherry, cola and spice flavors. Nonetheless, it's nicely dry and clean.",,Ventana
"The wine is crisp, easy and keeps the palate refreshed. Light and fresh, this luminous Vermentino would pair with rucola and tomato bruschetta or mixed seafood appetizers.",,Villa Poggio Salvi
"Lots of jammy blackberry, blueberry and cherry fruit in this dry Merlot. It's a little rough in the mouth, with pronounced acidity and some green flavors. Drink now.",,Roth
"The nose on this medium-bodied Merlot is lush with pleasantly charred oak, forest floor and ripe black plums. There's a decent amount of black fruit on the palate as well, but it's lacking in concentration, and exhibits a distinct vegetal note in the backdrop.",,Palmer
"A hearty, red-fruited wine with soft tannins, licorice and a fresh, juicy character. This is a soft wine, attractively balanced, the warm Alentejo sunshine filling the glass.",Montaria,Parras Vinhos
"Soft and fresh, a wine with delicious acidity, almonds and pink grapefruit flavors. A mineral edge comes through to give a vibrant aftertaste.",Azul Portugal Escolha,Wines & Winemakers
"Attractive characteristics of charred French oak, ripe black cherries, coffee and spice linger on the nose and palates, but are chased by a green vein of underripe fruit and leaves. Gripping tannins drive the finish to a dusty, dark end note.",,Wölffer
"Simple and fruity, this coppery-pink sparkler is semisweet but reasonably balanced and clean. The peachy aromas and flavors make it a natural with fresh fruit.",Emeri Pink Moscato,De Bortoli
"The combination of high alcohol and what tastes like residual sugar makes this Zinfandel rather sugary sweet. If that's your style, you'll like the jammy raspberries, cherries and spices.",,EOS
"A little harsh and rugged around the edges, but shows good Chardonnay character. Peaches and cream, pineapple fruit and buttered toast flavors lead to a clean finish.",,EOS
"Fresh, herbal and stalky, a light-bodied red wine that has some well-balanced residual sugar to go with the red berry fruits. The soft texture masks the acidity. Screw cap.",Portada Tinto,DFJ Vinhos
"A bizarre blend of the hybrid Negra Mole and Trincadeira. The is soft, rather heavy in texture, rich plum flavors, lacking acidity.",Esplanada,DFJ Vinhos
"This easy- drinking blend of Sangiovese and Merlot delivers loads of fresh fruit backed by aromas of cherry, cassis and white almond. The mouthfeel is simple, clean and keeps the palate refreshed.",,I Veroni
"Light and herbal, marked by restrained, melony fruit and leafy notes that lack overall intensity and complexity. Drink now.",Regional Reserve,Glazebrook
"Though the nose seems dark and brooding with notes of black cherries, smoke and spice, on the palate, this is surprisingly light and fresh with a bright sour cherry acidity and soft tannins. There's a hint of green stems throughout this fairly light bodied wine.",Cherry Barn,Harbes Family Vineyard
"Floral, earthy, funky and barnyardy, with all the young exuberance that comes with joven/roble wines from RDD. Lots of color, power, tannins and extract along with young, sweet, chewy black-fruit flavors and tart acidity to the palate.",Roble,Bodegas Qumrán
"The score reflects the rich cherry, blackberry, cola and smoked meat flavors in this dry, crisp, silky wine. But it also takes into account a certain funkiness and one-dimensional simplicity.",,Matchbook
"Hot earth, baked cherry and mild vanilla aromas come in front of a snappy, angular palate with tangy pie-cherry and red-plum flavors. Sheer and basic Rioja with high acidity, lean fruit, a cleansing finish and a light body.",Crianza,Montecillo
"A simple, soft, oaky Chardonnay made in the modern style. Tastes sugary sweet in apricot, pineapple and peach jam flavors.",Polo,Salvatore Principe
"A lightly botrytised wine, with sweet raisins and orange zest. The wine is soft, missing acidity, but the freshness is just right.",Seigneurs de Monbazillac,Yvon Mau
"Simple, acidic and slightly sweet, with tangerine, lime, papaya, honeysuckle, vanilla and spice flavors. Could use more dryness. A blend of Roussanne, Marsanne, Viognier and others.",Coda Blanc,David Girard
"This blend of 86% Tempranillo and 14% Graciano has sour cherry candy flavors, in a light-bodied, silky texture. It's bone dry with some unripeness.",Solea,Bodegas Paso Robles
"Smells oily and a little burnt and acrid, with fleshy flavors of banana, melon and bitter pith. Has some verve but mostly it's an average wine with some bitterness and dry orange peel and pith. Decent but offers nothing beyond.",Hermanos Lurton,J. & F. Lurton
"Lively, candied and medicinal, with grassy aromas along with mild animal notes. The palate is young, grabby, forceful but solid, while the flavors are bright, bold, snappy and suggest red plum and black cherry. A basic young wine that's decent if you're not too discerning.",Viñas de Olivara,Marqués de Olivara
"Light in body and pungent almost to the point of sweatiness, with leafy, herbal flavors that soften on the finish.",,Woollaston
"This is a tight, sharp, pungent Viognier, with penetrating scents of lemon oil and pine. In the mouth it is grapefruity and slightly bitter, with a perception of almond skin as it fades away.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"A little sweet in apricot, orange and pineapple flavors, like a fruit juice blend. But it's refreshingly crisp at an everyday price.",,Night Harvest by R.H. Phillips
"Stemmy, herbal and sharp, with a peppery bite, this seems a bit underripe. There's some barrel toast from exposure to one third new French oak. It's a quaffer, best enjoyed with a meal.",One Toe Duck,Ancient Cellars
"Simple and crisp, with well-acidified and slightly sweet flavors of apricots and tangerines.",,Bella Ragazza
"A soft, fruity wine lacking great depth, but with attractive red berry fruits and light tannins. It is bright, juicy and ready to drink.",,Château Soussac
"This blended white wine from Sardinia opens with fragrant tones of soapy spring flower, honeysuckle and peach blossom. There are touches of caramel and butterscotch as well.",Kyanos,Tenute Soletta
"The attack, or entry, of this Merlot is a massive assault of flavor. It's all raspberry and cherry jam, dark chocolate and the creamy caramel of new oak. Delicious, yes, but where's the subtlety? Drink now.",Estate,St. Supéry
"Grapy and tart, the light, young fruit flavors belie the almost 15% alcohol that is listed. It's dark and smoky, with a bitter, tannic espresso-flavored finish.",The Black Cask,Scarborough
Fresh herbs and green florals are fresh and fragrant on the nose of this semidry Riesling. Subtly sweet flavors of hibiscus nectar and peach gain complexity with whiffs of freshly ground white pepper and an elegant dusting of chalk on the finish.,Semi-Dry,Rock Stream
Plum and blueberry aromas come with a hint of green herbs. Feels fresh and clamps down with good tannins in the mouth before unleashing dark plum along with toast and peppery spice flavors. Juicy on the finish.,Made with Organic Grapes,Paso a Paso
"Bright red fruits in this attractive cherry and banana flavored wine. It has a soft tannic edge, laced with acidity and finishing spice.",Nouveau,Paul Durdilly
"This solid value wine would pair perfectly with pizza. An easy expression of Syrah, the wine is soft and silky, with simple, fruity layers of blueberry and cherry.",Aquilae,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"While richly concentrated, with a plump, sunny, yellow peach and sweet lemon character, Wagner's Select Riesling boasts darker tones of bitter tea and a slightly herbal aroma that runs from start to finish. It's elegant and restrained on the finish, with puckery lemon and lime pith notes.",Select,Wagner
"For the price, this is a good value in California Chardonnay. It shows ripe flavors of citrus and tropic fruits, with a creamy, oaky mouthfeel that finishes with a clean scour of acidity.",,Wilson Daniels
"This wood-matured wine features toast and spice as well as some pineapple and peach fruits. The wine is warm, rounded and soft, ready to drink now.",Les Beluses,Cave de Lugny
"Very herbaceous, Sauvignon Blanc-dominated wine. It has gooseberry flavors that are rounded out with pea and green bean tastes. A wine that can be drunk young and with seafood. Screwcap.",,Château Briot
"This fresh, easy-going Sicilian white would go with fresh seafood or spicy Thai curry. The wine shows bright notes of peach and citrus with a touch of soft sweetness on the close.",Bianco,Corvo
"Soft, sweet and fruity, tasting like a granola bar, with roasted almonds, raspberry filling and cinnamon spice.",The Franc,Cosentino
"Cusumano's fresh Insolia delivers a steady, neutral nose with distant aromas of honey, Golden Delicious apple and dried grass. It's a lean, simple wine at a competitive price.",,Cusumano
"Pleasant cherry, cola, spice and sandalwood flavors mark this bone dry Pinot Noir. It's a little harsh in texture, with sharp acids and tannins defining a certain rustic style from California.",,Dawn's Dream
"Yes, a certain amount of acidity is desirable in Australian Riesling, but this one is exceedingly lean and crisp. Perhaps it will blossom with age, but for now it is simply intensely citrusy and rather skinny. Pair it with oysters, or put it in a cool dark place and hope for the best.",Grand Barossa,Château Tanunda
"A warm and rich wine that shows soft, ready-to-drink fruit flavors, a touch of red cherry and some freshness from the acidity.",Quatre Saisons,Domaine Chasselay
"Earthy berry aromas come with rubbery notes, tobacco and bramble. The feel is scratchy but lively, with flavors of lean red fruits, dry oak and milk chocolate. Oaky on the finish, with some heat. Needs food to help it along.",Crianza,Dinastía Vivanco
"Made from native Cayuga grapes, this softly pétillant sparkler is pleasantly frothy, and features brisk, lemony acidity. Just a shade sweeter than brut, it's fruity and forward, with ample stone-fruit and blossom notes. Finishes with a dainty lacing of sugar. Drink now.",Sparkling Wine,Hosmer
"Rough at first, with hard cherry and nail polish aromas. Airing reveals a still-edgy wine with fresh acids bracing earthy strawberry and red plum flavors. Not a heavy type of wine; dry, spicy and lean on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Indomita
"From the fashion line of Feudi del Pisciotto's portfolio, Carolina Marenga is an oak-aged expression of Frappato that shows easy, fresh berry nuances backed by bitter almond and mild spice.",Carolina Marenga,Feudi del Pisciotto
Baglio del Sole is a solid value wine that would pair with four-cheese pizza or grilled sausage sandwiches. Bright cherry and cassis is backed by zesty citrus.,Baglio del Sole,Feudi del Pisciotto
"This blend of Catarratto and Chardonnay shows a tiny touch of oxidation, with butterscotch and caramel aromas behind candied fruit, apricot and pineapple. The mouthfeel is soft, thick and sticky.",Santagostino Baglio Sorìa,Firriato
"Henry Fessy's can-can dancer is with us again on this bottle of red cherry fruity wine. There is a texture of acidity, the fruit attractively integrated. Soft tannins complete this fresh, fruity wine.",Nouveau,Henry Fessy
"Not much going on in this soft, direct Chardonnay, besides sweet oak, with its buttered toast, vanilla and butterscotch flavors. Way underneath is pineapple and lemondrop fruit.",,Frank Family
"La Piazza Alta is a value wine from Sicily that shows lemon soda, pineapple and kiwi-like aromas. It's fresh, sharp and bright on the finish.",La Piazza Alta,Calatrasi
"An easy and drinkable wine, with soft notes of soft black plum and cherry guts along with a hint of savory herb stems. Clean and bright on the finish; drink now.",Reserve,Binyamina
"Sweet and fizzy, with orange soda and vanilla flavors. Made to appeal to serve the low-cost Moscato craze, and does a pretty good job.",,Allure
"While fairly subdued on the nose, this dry, rather uncharacteristic Gewürztraminer is refreshingly quaffable, with an abundance of fresh apple and fig flavors marked by snappy tangerine acidity.",Sunrise Hill Vineyard Dry,Knapp
"Ever since Tamber Bey made the switch from Oakville fruit to their vineyard in Yountville, their Cabernets have dropped in quality. This '09 is dry, tannic and uninteresting, with a harshness that makes it difficult to appreciate the blackberry and cherry fruit.",Deux Chevaux Vineyard,Tamber Bey
"Soft, stalky black berry fruits, dry with a firm edge of tannins. The spice shows through along with final acidity.",,Château de Virecourt
"Lots of people will be attracted to this wine, especially at this price. It's clean and crisp, with slightly sweet citrus, peach, green apple and vanilla flavors. Easy to find, with 25,000 cases produced.",Selected Vineyards,Concannon
"This is a soft, slightly sweet and very fruity Syrah. It's kind of simple, with a soft texture and rich cherry and raspberry- jam flavors.",,Longfellow
"This medium-bodied Sauvignon Blanc features some nice lime and grapefruit flavors, but it turns tart, chalky and almost metallic on the finish. It's certainly zesty, but it clangs off the rim instead of swooshing straight on through.",,Martinborough Vineyard
"Ripe Sauvignon Blanc, bringing out pear and apple flavors, topped with cream. There is a bite from an apple skin texture, along with bright, delicate acidity.",La Petite Perrière,Guy Saget
"Disappointing after the success of last year's version, Kato's 2009 is a lightweight Sauvignon Blanc with herbal, bell-peppery component. There's a tart stridency on the finish that will serve it well with some dishes, less so with others.",,Kato
"The nose on this medium- bodied Merlot is pleasant with aromas of burnt coffee, soil and plush red plums. Coffee flavors mingle on the palate with tart, underripe blueberry flavors and a hints of green herbs in the backdrop. With high acidity and soft tannins, it's a bit lacking in balance, but interesting tar and smoke notes on the finish would go well with a smoked meats or bacon.",,Fox Run
"This is a softly tannic, dense, extracted and acidic wine that floods the mouth with the sharp tastes of blackberry, cherry and raspberry jam. It's good, in a rustic way. Drink now.",Estate Bottled,La Storia
"Tastes excessively sharp throughout, with a cut of acidity that interferes with the palate's pleasure in the blackberries, cherries, currants and oak.",Distraction,Pear Valley
"Soft and melted, lacking structure. Lacking tannins and acidity. Tastes like liquid raspberry- cherry- and chocolate -pie filling, with alcohol and an overlay of caramelized oak.",,Reeves Ranch
"A bit flat and jammy on the nose, and then it runs hot and heavy across the palate, where the flavors waver between citric and plum-cherry. There's a lot of fruit here, but also some burn and finally a dull hum to the finish.",,Tienen Duende
"Dark and jellied, with raspberry and vanilla flavors accompanied by zesty acidity. Rustic, but okay with cold cuts, or a chicken taco.",Grenache Mourvedre,Tercero
"Good, rich notes in this blackberry, currant, dark chocolate, roasted meat and black pepper flavored wine, with its firm tannins. Loses points for excessive softness and heat, which gives it a rustic feel. Drink now.",Caton Vineyard Ballfield,Ty Caton
"Scads of freshly cracked black pepper show up in this wine, with its raspberry jam and sandalwood flavors. It's soft and simple and slightly sweet, but pretty good for the price.",,McManis
"A good everyday wine. It's dry, full-bodied and has enough berry-cherry flavors to get by, wrapped into a smooth texture.",,Montevina
"Thin and acidic, with cola, cherry, orange and oak flavors. Okay in a pinch for a dry, everyday Pinot Noir.",,MooBuzz
"Soft, sugary and one-dimensional, with raspberry- and cherry-pie filling flavors plus the toasty, buttery crust.",,Le Mistral
"This is the kind of inexpensive Cabernet you can serve at big parties. It's dry and full-bodied, with simple blackberry and cherry flavors leading to a spicy finish.",,Night Harvest by R.H. Phillips
"Earthy but sharp on the nose, with a foreboding sense of stem and sourness. The palate is indeed raw and acidic, with lean, slightly stemmy flavors of herbs, raspberry and plum. Not bad but carries a stemmy, less-than-pure personality.",Reserva,Campo Viejo
"Rich, but edging toward rustic, with its mature leather and berry fruits, topped by dry tannins. It is firm and smoky, in a very old style.",,Château Tour Canon
"Soft, ripe Merlot results in a wild strawberry-flavored wine. It is full in the mouth, very fruity, but missing acidity.",Bel-Ami,Clos d'Yvigne
"Juicy wine, with very dominant acidity. The flavors are of bright red plums and berries, but the wine lacks depth, skimming the surface of taste.",,Château la Fleur
"Soft and open fruit, flavors of black currants, rhubarb and fresh acidity. The tannins are light, the wine attractively balanced with a juicy aftertaste.",,Château de Terrefort-Quancard
"This blend is soft and fruity. It has flavors of cherry jam, licorice, bacon and peppery spices. Earns an extra point for the attractive mouthfeel.",Flying Nymph,Cass
"Literally friends and neighbors (the guys on the label dancing and playing an accordion), this wine is a light, soft blend of Groslot and Cabernet Franc from Anjou. It is light, strawberry-juice flavored, with green acidity. Ready to drink now.",Les Copains d'Abord,Domaine des Sablonnettes
"Dry and tannic, this Syrah has some juicy blackberry, blueberry, beef jerky and black pepper flavors. The underlying wine feels too soft, even though there are brusque acids toward the finish. Ready now.",Pine Hawk West Vineyard,D'Anbino
"Dark and scented with clove, licorice and bitter herb, this is a hard-edged Cabernet with a soft center of barely-ripe fruit. Some plum and prune notes are here, and the tannins have been softened, but the stemmy, herbal character dominates.",Amphorae,Ancient Cellars
"This medium-bodied bargain-priced sparkler is maybe just a touch on the heavy side, but it should satisfy most party crowds. Hints of toast accent pineapple and tropical fruit notes, finishing soft and short. Worth trying in Mimosas or Bellinis.",The Vines Brut Cuvée,Beelgara
"A rubbery, minty, jammy wine, with a mildly candied, gummy feel and sweet, modest, lightly green flavors that suggest red fruits. The finish is decent but herbal and sweet.",Viña Main,Bodegas Orusco
"Very soft and sweet in dessert pastry flavors. Not much structure, but delicious in cherry- and raspberry- pie filling flavors.",,A Cellar Full of Noise
"Here's an easy expression of Insolia that opens with citrus, kiwi and almond paste aromas. The wine is a perfect choice for appetizers of toasted tomato bruschetta and chopped basil.",Gloria,Tenuta Barone Nicolò La Lumia
"This wine shows a fair bit of oak influence; notes reminiscent of brown sugar and mocha mingle with savory, root-vegetable-like fruit. The tannins are supple, the wine reasonably balanced in terms of alcohol and acids. Drink now.",Icon,Nobilo
"Much higher production than Noceto's Riserva and sourced more broadly, this Sangiovese is more rustic and earthy, its cranberry flavors bursting from the seams, and would be yummy with thin-crust pizza.",,Noceto
"Pretty good for a California-appellated Chard at this price, showing ripe flavors of pineapples, pears and green apples, with a touch of smoky vanilla from oak. Finishes a little too sweet, but lots of people will like that.",,Snapping Turtle
"Baglio di Serramarrocco opens with a slightly browning hue and savory aromas of cured beef and black currant. There's an earthy tone as well, backed by mild grittiness in the mouth.",Baglio di Serramarrocco,Tenuta di Serramarrocco
"Has typical Clare Valley Riesling elements of crushed stone and citrus, but also considerable petrol and hints of honey and ripe apple. It's medium-bodied and tart, with a metallic or slightly pithy note on the finish.",Polish Hill River,Pauletts
"A supple, medium-bodied Pinot Noir with a pronounced acidic edge. Cranberry is the starring fruit here, framed by coffee-like oak. Crisp and a bit astringent on the finish.",Roaring Meg,Mt. Difficulty
"From the estate's Tenuta di Budonetto property, this warm-climate Sauvignon Blanc shows intense aromas of peppermint, chopped basil and medicinal herb. It won't be loved by everyone, but this wine is distinctive.",Coste all'Ombra,Maurigi
"There are solid Cabernet flavors of blackberries and black currants in this dry, tannic wine. It's rough and astringent in the mouth, without much charm, but a rich steak, maybe topped with a gorgonzola sauce, will make it shine.",,Markham
"Smooth, sweet and savory, this Cabernet has forward flavors of blackberries, black currants, cola and sweet oak. It's an easy wine to drink now.",,Windsor Sonoma
"You get plenty of rich, ripe cherry, red currant, cappuccino and peppery spice flavors in this briskly tannic, dry young Merlot. The mouthfeel is a little rugged, though. Drink up.",Cavedale Vineyards Pépé,Y Rousseau
"A rounded wine that is soft and fruity, the flavors edged with toast. There is an attractive citrus flavor that gives some crispness to what feels a fat wine. Drink now.",Cuvée Fût de Chêne,Domaine Marc Jambon
"This version of Calanìca (made from 60% Frappato and 40% Syrah) offers a low impact bouquet of earthy forest fruit and bramble. It's a light, lean wine with a touch of soft spice on the close.",Calanìca Frappato-Syrah,Duca di Salaparuta
Chalky accents add character to the red berry and white strawberry aromas and flavors of this wine. It's fresh and clean in the mouth with zippy acidity and an easy finish. Drink now.,,Galil Mountain
"A great value choice, I Versi Bianco (made with Grecanico, Inzolia and Grillo) is a crisp wine, with easy aromas of lemon zest, cut grass, almond skin and crushed brimstone. Pair it with Southwestern grilled chicken salad.",I Versi Bianco,Fondo Antico
"A soft, earthy wine with light fruits and plum jelly flavors. It is a wine that should be drunk young to enjoy its balance of fruitiness, acidity and light tannins. Screwcap.",Ciconia,Herdade de São Miguel
"Light on the nose, with a hint of apple and lime. Feels scouring, with sour-apple acidity and juicy but narrow flavors of white citrus and pineapple. Tangy but limited in flavor. Will work best as a palate-prepping or cleansing wash.",Reserve,Cornellana
"Terrae Dei is a value wine from Sicily with fresh aromas of citrus, almond and honey. This is an easy, no-fuss wine that would pair well with pasta salad.",Terrae Dei,Corvo
"Tastes and feels harsh and acidic, lacking Pinot's voluptuous nature, although there are serious, even complex, flavors of berries, cola, tobacco and spices. With Pinot Noir, texture is everything, and this wine is just a little off.",,Dawn's Dream
"Soft and one-dimensional, this Pinot has ripe, sweet raspberry and cola flavors. It's drinkable now with a juicy hamburger.",,Ancient Oak Cellars
"Strong scents of vanilla and fresh-baked pastry inform this wine, with a floral, lightly soapy character to the aromas. It is pleasant enough, but fades quickly.",H3,Columbia Crest
"Waxy floral and lemon skin notes are elegantly subdued on this concentrated semidry Riesling. Juicy on the palate with abundant peach preserve flavors, it finishes moderately long with on a slightly drying, tea inflected note.",Arcturos,Black Star Farms
A wine with a good balance between taut structure and forward fruit. Red cherries dominate this attractive light and fruity wine.,Nouveau,Joseph Drouhin
"There's a hint of caramelized sugar on the nose of this off-dry Gewürztraminer that gives an edge to all the succulent sweet pear nectar and apple blossoms notes that permeate the palate. Elegantly floral, it finishes with a touch of characteristic orange and clove spice.",Sunrise Hill Vineyard Semi-Dry,Knapp
"The address is Oakville, and the price is right, but this Cab could be from anywhere. It's soft and sweetly simple in cherry and blackberry jam, vanilla and oak flavors. Drink now before it fades away.",The Messenger,Ministry of the Vinterior
"Sharp acidity and even some tannins mark this simple Chardonnay. In its favor are savory green apple, peach and lime flavors, with creamy, oaky notes.",,Markham
"A broad wine, but with flavors of ripe melon, kiwi and an edge of lime. It is rounded and warm, although with a good final crisp edge of acidity.",Coroa d'Ouro Branco,Poças
"A cedary, slightly chemical aroma masks the fruit, and it is barrel flavors, more than berry flavors, that flood the palate. Overall it's a smooth, modestly-proportioned Merlot that's ready for near-term drinking.",Estate Grown,Preston
"This ripe expression of Nero d'Avola opens with a dark ruby color and slight hues of brown and amber. Aromas include black fruit, cured meat and hazelnut.",Don Totò,Tenuta Barone Nicolò La Lumia
"Bramble and red berry aromas are attractive and almost exotic. Feels a bit furry and scratchy, but tastes of blueberry with an herbal tinge. Finishes well, with a pinch of minty green flavor.",,Venta Morales
"Ripe pear fruit flavors go with green plums in the wine that has acidity, but does seem just too hot and heavy.",Branco,Herdade da Comporta
"Sweet and sour, like a Chinese pineapple sauce, and there's an ammonia taste that detracts. On the plus side there's mouthwatering acidity and a clean finish.",,Highway 12
A simple wine with a crisp and clean mouthfeel. There are plenty of bright fruit aromas to keep your interest. Try this wine with Margherita pizza or easy pasta with tomato sauce.,,I Veroni
"Farmyard aromas follow through to a firmly dry, darkly tannic wine with bitter licorice flavors. It has spice from wood, but a rustic character dominates.",Reserva,Vale da Mina
"A bit tan and dull to the eye, with neutral aromas of apple cider and peach. The palate is wet, uncomplicated and simple, with basic apple flavors that some might consider to be bland. Solid on the finish, with papaya for flavor.",,Vega Sindoa
"Too soft for comfort. Lacks structural integrity and lively acidity to balance out the rich blackberry, currant, anise and cocoa flavors, and there's peppery heat from high alcohol. Drink now.",Caton Vineyard,Ty Caton
"Although it's fully dry, the cherry and berry flavors have a Porty overripeness, while strong tannins make the finish astringent.",,San Simeon
"This blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay is simple and slightly sweet. It has flavors of oranges, pineapples and apricots, wrapped into a creamy texture.",Beachfront,Bedarra
"Awkward in the mouth, with hard-edged tannins and cutting acidity that interferes with the berry, cherry, currant and spice flavors. This old-fashioned wine could mellow over the years, without gaining complexity.",,Albeno Munari
"Tastes like an inferior Chardonnay, with overoaked flavors of tangerines, pineapples and buttered popcorn.",,Calera
"A lean, austere wine, maybe the result of the 2007 vintage. Stalky tannins push through the acidity and the tense black currant fruit. Drink now for the fresh, juicy aftertaste.",Tradition,Château les Croisille
"This wine is very pale in color, but the aromas are anything but understated, zooming out in full floral, orangy Muscat character. It's soft and sweet, balanced a bit by citrusy acids on the finish.",White Chocolate,Chocolate Box
"On the lean side, the acidity heightened by vivid berry fruits. The texture is light, with tannins that have a bite to them.",Réserve,Château Grand Jean
"There is considerable freshness here, along with black currant, bright berries and a smoky edge. It does have a strong tannic element that gives an austere structure.",Grande Cuvée,Château Grand Rolland
"Heavy and dull in the mouth. They seemed to have picked the darkest, ripest, softest, plummiest lots, and then plastered the wine with oak. Not bad for a Grenache, but lacks the vibrancy and lift you want from Pinot Noir.",Reserve,Riverbench
"Rich and jammy in cherries, berries and cocoa, this spicy blend is basically a Bordeaux-style wine with some Mourvèdre. It feels rustically soft and sweet in the mouth, especially at this price.",Bodaeceia,Robert James Lynch
"There is a sharp, penetrating scent of stem and tomato leaf here. Behind it is a wine well along the aging curve, the fruit thinning away, the tannins fading into flavors of black tea.",Anna Maria,Valley View
"Attractive red fruits and a good juicy character alongside soft tannins. This is an easy wine, ready to drink now.",Pèra Doce,Parras Vinhos
"A medium-bodied wine with lots of interesting forest moss and earth notes. The black plum and berry flavors seem underripe, resulting in a lack of concentration and presence, but the soft tannins and brambly finish are pleasant.",,Wagner
"Harsh in the mouth, with upfront acidity and powdery tannins, and the cherry, cola and cedar flavors aren't rich enough to stand up. Call it rustic. Drink now.",,EOS
"A little tough and sweet, but offers a solid mouthful of blackberries and cherries. Production was 175,000 cases.",Keyes Canyon Ranches,Estancia
"Get through the rusticity of this wine, and there is some fresh berry fruit and acidity. But the farmyard edge is off-putting.",,Château Roc Grand Antoine
"A fat, rich rosé, full of ripe berry fruits, caramel and spice. It misses out on freshness, and the alcohol does give a burn.",Olho de Mocho,Herdade do Rocim
"Though the nose wafts of sugary sweet cherry pie and cola, Glenora's Merlot is surprisingly vegetal on the palate with an abundance of green pepper and leafy flavors throughout. So soft in both tannins and acidity, there's not a lot of structure or heft either.",,Glenora
"Overly ripe and Port-like, with raisin and currant aromas. Tastes bitter in the mouth, with raisin skin tannins, although there are some rich blackberry jam and chocolate flavors.",Route 29,RouteStock Cellars
"Made by Beaujolais producer Gilles Gelin, this sweet rosé is full of ripe, crushed strawberries, a touch of caramel and a rosehip aftertaste. More acidity would be welcome, but it works well as an apéritif.",,Domaine des Nugues
"Soft, ripe wine with some attractive red berry fruits, touches of mint and leather tannic edge.",Património,Caves Bonifacio
"Rather restrained for a Muscat-based wine, with modest citrus notes dominating this soft, off-dry sparkler. Simple, but clean and well made.",Emeri Moscato,De Bortoli
"Soft, dry and simple, with enough berry and cherry flavors to satisfy your basic Cabernet needs.",,Barefoot
"With a streak stream of acidity and medicinal cherry flavors, this Merlot has a Life Saver-candy taste, with a sweet finish.",Estate Block 500,Trentadue
"Gets the Merlot basics done by being dry and medium-bodied, with everyday cherry, red currant, herb and oak flavors.",,Barefoot
"Tight and lean, austere in character, the fruit showing definite green characters.",,Château Cabredon
"A soft, easy red wine. Shows appealing cherry and raspberry flavors, with a silky texture. Drink now.",,Bray
"Earthy, rustic aromas reveal a wine that is rough at the edges, tightened with acidity, shot through with stalky fruit.",,Château la Rayre
"Starts out murky, gassy and challenged, and while it does emerge from that cloud it remains little more than bargain-priced, borderline Tempranillo from an obscure central Spain region. The palate shows generic, herbal black fruit and the finish is acceptable.",Mesta,Bodegas Fontana
"Soft, sweetly fruity wine, with the lightest touch of tannin. It is brightly acidic with a rustic edge. Fresh, ripe fruits are a good finishing touch. Screw cap.",Pinot Noir,Cox
"For fans of semisweet bubbly in a bright salmon shade, this sparkler offers a confected nose reminiscent of watermelon Jolly Ranchers. Softly pétillant with a heavy, syrupy texture, the palate is akin to liquid cotton candy.",Imperial Kir,D.H. Lescombes
"The bubbles really intensify the varietal character of this sparkling Sauvignon Blanc, supersizing its grassy, grapefruity aromas, while passion fruit flavors come through on the palate.",Emeri Sparkling,De Bortoli
"Bright and shimmers with purple, while the nose is jumpy and candied, with a lot of sweetness and black fruit. Marginal to tough on the palate, with racy, hard tannins and a clacky feel to go with wild berry and mulchy flavors. Tasted twice with consistent notes.",Tempranillo,Condado de Oriza
"Light and generic, this is a watery effort that doesn't give much pleasure. Simple cherry fruit is thin and quickly disappears.",,High Hook
"Curious stalky fruit aromas don't translate well in this rather lean wine. It has black currant fruits, light tannins, prominent acidity, but lacks balanced density.",DFJ Tinta Roriz-Merlot,DFJ Vinhos
"Frankly as sweet as Port, with sugary blackberry jam and chocolate-covered raisin flavors and high, brandied alcohol. Not bad for a dessert wine, but inappropriate for a table wine.",Dorothy's Vineyard,Wilson
"This is a soft, simple wine that tastes like a fruit juice blend of pineapples, oranges and mangoes. It's a little sweet.",Selected Vineyards,Concannon
"Generally speaking, most Amontillados are good at their worst, but for whatever reason this wine barely makes the grade. It lacks pop on the nose and seems dilute and drab. In the mouth, the flavors strike as sour and sharp, but also musty and weak. With so many fine Sherries available, this one seems like a laggard.",Viña AB Amontillado Seco,González Byass
"Though soft on the finish, this is sharply herbal and stemmy, with woody flavors instead of fruit. There are traces of berry and cassis, but the nature of Cabernet Franc is to be herbal, and here it's in full bloom.",Terebinth,Ancient Cellars
"This wine is a blend of Chardonnay from different regions of France. It is light, fresh and clean, with some attractive white fruit flavors, lifted by some crisp acidity.",When Cédric met Cécile Chardonnay,Domaine de Virginie
"A lean wine, the tannins dominating the fruit. The wine is all bone and no flesh.",Tertre Perdigous,Château du Port
"High in acidity and ripe in pineapple and vanilla flavors, this is a simple wine. It has sweet and sour flavors, like a sour cough drop.",,Redtree
"There are bitter tannins in this bone-dry wine. It's also thin in cherry and currant fruit. But it's clean, and at this price, a good, sound everyday sipper.",,Night Harvest by R.H. Phillips
"Strongly herbal and pungent to the point of sweatiness, with just a bit of citrusy fruit creeping in on the otherwise lightweight finish.",,Mussel Bay
"This carbonated wine is soft and low in alcohol, with a sweet-tart character that comes across as slightly confected.",The Proposition Premium Cuvée,Hesketh
"Simple and fruity, with raspberry and cherry Kool-Aid flavors.",,Barefoot
"An over-oaked wine. The lean 2007 fruit cannot cope with the wood, resulting in a wine that is one-dimensional.",,Château des Demoiselles
"Sweet and soft, with ripe berry flavors that veer into grilled cherries, chocolate and even Port. The finish is frankly sweet.",Chateaux du Lovall,Robert James Lynch
"Simple and honey sweet, with pineapple and buttered toast flavors. Gets the job done.",Split Oak Vineyard Sur Lie,Morro Bay
"Indulgent wood and high toast flavors swamp the fruit here. The result is a wine that is lean, hard-edged and without the weight to develop.",,Château Larroque
"This is all tannin, bitter chocolate and a dense texture. It seems to be drying out as the fruit goes, while there are few signs of softening. It suffers from the heat of 2003.",Tradition,Château Cabredon
"Strawberry and rhubarb aromas get it going, and frankly that's about as good as it gets. The mouthfeel is so-so. but the flavors are funky and mealy, with a weedy bitterness that doesn't serve the wine well. Lacks purity, focus and persistence. Made from Pinot Noir.",Aria Brut,Segura Viudas
"A strange bird with herbaceous aromas that suggest sage or juniper baking in the summer sun. The palate is acidic and sharp, with green-tinged pie cherry and plum skin flavors. Gritty on the finish, with needling tannins and a final wave of that odd juniper character. 60% Monastell and 40% Petit Verdot.",Crianza,Casa de la Ermita
"Recognizably Chenin Blanc, this just manages to give an attractive almond scent allied to sweetness and acidity. Screw cap.",,Michel Picard
Molten black-cherry aromas are followed by a tight but limited palate with hard tannins and hard-driving black-fruit flavors that turn quickly to pepper and ultimately a slight bitterness. Teases you at first then ducks out.,Los Cerezales,Pago de Valdetruchas
"A sweet-and-sour wine that mixes sour lemon candy with honey cough-drop elements. There is also an underlying streak of baby aspirin flavor, and the different aspects of the wine are not quite pulled together.",,Smasne Cellars
"An attractively fruity wine, with light tannins and juicy fruit. It has all the right red fruited elements for a nouveau, bubbling with freshness.",Nouveau,Albert Bichot
"Earthy tones of smoke and hazelnuts give way to bright white peach and grapefruit notes on the nose and palate of this fruitful Pinot Gris. Off dry in style, it's a tad sugary on the midpalate, but finishes fairly dry with a refreshing shower of lemony acidity. Drink now.",,Billsboro
"With old vines from a single vineyard, this wine has some good weight and concentration. Ripe peach and pineapple flavors are supported by a touch of spice as well as a warm finish. Screwcap.",Les Charmes,Cave de Lugny
"This easy Viognier from the folks at Calatrasi opens with aromas of yellow flower, peach and natural rubber. It shows some density and medium length.",Terre di Ginestra Magnifico,Calatrasi
"Perricone is a little-known variety from Sicily and this expression of the grape shows intense aromas of mint, spearmint, cola, licorice and small berry fruit.",Sachia,Caruso & Minini
"Inzolia is a fantastic partner to raw tuna, shrimp or ceviche. This example is simple and clean, with bright citrus, peach, lime and white flower.",,D'Alessandro
"This Sicilian Inzolia releases fresh aromas of citrus, sage, passion fruit, pear and apple. The wine feels fresh, zippy and clean overall.",,D'Alessandro
"It does seem crazy, but a handful of producers in Sicily do include Pinot Noir in their portfolios. The grape certainly does take on hot climate characteristics of ripe raspberry and spice, but the overall effect is not too far off from what you should expect of this delicate, feminine grape.",Stemmari,Feudo Arancio
Jammy black fruit and inky blackberry preserves open the bouquet of this syrupy red wine. The wine's texture is both dense and gritty.,,Feudo Disisa
"A simple, white fruited wine. Its texture is light, bright, the acidity coming from a touch of wood and apple and cream fruits. Easy drinking, ready to go.",Au Brûlé,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"A blend of Cataratto and Grillo, Cariddi is a fresh and easy white wine with mild tones of citrus, stone fruit and pear. Pair it with raw fish or smoked salmon.",Cariddi,Colosi
"Light to medium in body, with simple off-dry apple and citrus flavors and a hint of peppery spice on the finish. Drink now.",,eco.love
"This Syrah-Merlot blend is a country-style wine. Bone dry, it shows California fruity ripeness and lots of savory black pepper flavors, yet with rustic tannins and acids that scour the mouth. Drink it now with Mexican food or barbecue.",Royal Red,Eagle Castle
"Shows dark fruit aromas and raisin on the nose, feels fresh, zesty and edgy, with a bright mix of cherry, berry and mild spice flavors. Feels pretty good and offers a reasonably solid and long finish for a $6 red.",Opera Prima,J. Garcia Carrion
"Slightly fizzy at first, but honey and almond jump out from the start as the wine finishes light and dry.",,Jacella
"Opens with peachy, citric and saline aromas. Feels moderately fresh, but seems as though it's starting to mature as it's fleshy and pithy. Flavors of nectarine, orange and bitter pith are good but lack that ethereal quality that can make Albariño special. Drink now.",,Lusco
"A good Sauvignon Blanc, clean and crisp, with slightly sweet lemon, lime and vanilla flavors, brightened by zesty acidity. Easy to drink with roast chicken.",,Markham
"Soft and richly fruity, this has all the right red cherry and banana flavors that are immediately attractive. A delicious, juicy wine. Screwcap.",Nouveau,Mommessin
"This Barbera has an almost Pinot-like character to it, with hints of coffee, earthy tobacco and mushroom to the red cherry fruit profile. It's lightweight and easy drinking, with a softly woody finish. Drink now.",,Galil Mountain
"Made from organically-farmed Nerello Mascalese, this simple wine does show true varietal characteristics of wild fruit, dark mineral and cola. The aromas are mild and the mouthfeel delivers medium intensity.",,Di Giovanna
"A late release for this vintage, it remains tannic and earthy, with muted fruit. Some pretty tobacco scents add interest, though the rather high alcohol still burns on the finish. Drink up.",Sogno,DiStefano
"Fresh and appley, but restrained overall, with just a whisper of smoke and nuts, this semidry Riesling is refreshingly quaffable. A honeyed sweetness that lingers on the finish.",,Lakewood
"This Provençal-style blush is made from Syrah, Mourvèdre and Grenache. It's a good wine, dry and crisply acidic, but not without its faults. The main problem is a streak of green mint and vegetables. But there's enough sweet raspberry and cherry fruit to get by.",Enjoué,Lasseter
"Whiffs of sweet curry spice and fennel are enticing on the nose of this earthy, rather savory Riesling from Rock Stream. Lean in profile and vibrantly acidic with a squeaky, lemony sheen, it's the perfect pairing for subtly spiced South Indian cuisine.",,Rock Stream
"The perfumes of Malvasia Fina shine in this attractive dry sparkling wine. It is fruity, although with a yeasty edge, creating a fine apéritif style.",Bruto,Murganheira
"This is a fresh, tonic and light Grillo that would pair with endive salad and sliced oranges or red beets in vinaigrette. The wine offers citrus, green herb and fresh kiwi aromas.",Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
"While savory on the nose, with hints of mealy apple and chalk dust, the palate of this vibrant, light-bodied Pinot Gris exposes a range of delicate wildflower and lime zest notes, punctuated by snappy acidity and a brisk, clean mouthfeel. Drink now.",,Thirsty Owl Wine Company
"A wine with some warm black cherry fruit as well as structured acidity. It has a dry texture to go with the fruit, making it a ripe but food friendly wine.",Automne Festif,Vignerons de Bel Air
"An attractively ripe and lightly concentrated wine, with black cherry and an edge of dry tannins. Sweet fruit, richly juicy, right up front.",Nouveau,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Rasula shows ripe aromas of blackberry and prune with lingering tones of spice and leather in the background. It's a simple value wine with a chewy, rich mouthfeel.",Rasula,Maggiovini
"Good, in a simple way, with Chardonnay personality that will appeal to lots of people. It's dry and creamy in texture, with bright acidity framing citrus and tropical fruit, peach, mineral and vanilla flavors.",Route 121,RouteStock Cellars
"Here's a robust Cabernet for everyday drinking. It's dry and smoothly tannic, with earthy flavors of blackberries and plums.",,Leese-Fitch
"La Piazza is a fresh and fragrant Nero d'Avola packaged in a fun, screw top bottle that would pair with easy pasta dishes or home baked pizza. The wine boasts a dark, inky color with bold cherry, mocha and tobacco flavors.",La Piazza Alta,Calatrasi
"Here's a sweetly fruity, simple young Syrah, brimming with berry and cherry jam, sweet oak and spice flavors. It's soft and smooth in the mouth.",Betty,Carlotta
"Fresh and fruity, a wine with no wood but plenty of ripe lemon and apple flavors to go with the fine acidity. The texture has a richly vibrant tang, ready to drink.",Clos de la Bressande,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
Corvo Bianco is a tried and true white wine that helped introduce Sicilian wines to international markets. It's worth revisiting this wine if you are looking for something fresh to wash down seafood.,Bianco,Corvo
"Grillo is a native grape of southern Italy and this bright expression of the variety delivers a creamy, fatty texture and melon, apricot and Golden Delicious apple notes.",,Feudo Disisa
"Plump, lively and packed tight with cherry and blackberry, this blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot would pair well with grilled sausage or hamburgers. The mouthfeel is soft, easy and fresh.",I Versi,Fondo Antico
"Soft and sweet, this Pinot has simple but appealing raspberry, cherry, cola and spice flavors. It would score higher if the texture was more potent.",Siebert Ranch,Ancient Oak Cellars
"Whiffs of sweet white peach and melon agua fresca on this unabashedly fruity Pinot Gris are a delightful reminder of warm summer days. Semidry in style, it's quite rich on the palate, with concentrated fruit flavors accented by a touch of tart lemon. Drink now.",,Atwater
"This 50-50 blend is easy and drinkable now, with a soft structure of delicate red fruit flavors, light tannins and moderate acidity. An herbal, almost leafy character adds depth to the bouquet. Drink now.",Classic,Barkan
"All red fruit, red cherries and the lightest tannins. This is full-bodied and exuberant, with the typical acidity of young Beaujolais.",Nouveau,Bouchard Aîné & Fils
"A small Pinot Noir, rustic and simple, but not without its charms. Has a silky mouthfeel housing pleasant raspberry and cherry Lifesaver candy flavors.",,Kenwood
"This wine opens sweet, smelling of lemon and grapefruit, and is appropriately creamy in mouthfeel, with a sliver of sweetness on the finish.",,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"Bouncy, jumpy, candied aromas come with scratchiness and minty green. Feels tangy and bordering on sheer, with zesty flavors of red berry fruits, citrus and herbs. Mild and not too deep on the finish.",Tinto,Viña Bujanda
"This fresh and easy Sicilian white is a blend of Insolia, Grecanico and Catarratto with easy citrus and stone fruit aromas. Pair it with Chinese chicken salad.",Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"Minerally on the bouquet, with apple and oceanic notes. Turns citric and acidic on the palate, with pineapple, orange and tangy flavors. Shows astringency on the finish, but at least it's juicy and driving.",,Zarate
"This Rhône-style red brings Grenache and Mourvèdre from Meek Vineyard and Syrah from Lewis; good sources both. Hard and fruity, the forward flavors quickly hit a wall of tannin, with hints of dried leaf in a tart, short finish.",Midnight Red,Scarborough
"Pungent on the nose with aromas of dried herbs and and sweet spices, there's an exotic character to this full-bodied, semidry Riesling. Flavors of dried pineapple, honey and oolong tea on the midpalate end sharply in steely acidity on the finish.",Amulet DeMarco Vineyards Semi-Dry,Seneca Shore
"Aromatically restrained, with hints of green herbs, underripe apple and pineapple on the nose. It's semisweet in style, but brisk and approachable with pretty apple blossom and tart, green apple-skin flavors on the palate.",Semi-Dry,Treleaven
"This Pinot Noir is thin and simple, but it does have some pretty spice, raspberry candy and persimmon flavors. Tastes fairly sweet, but crisp acidity provides balance.",Siebert Ranch,Ancient Oak Cellars
"Floral and fruity, with abundantly ripe peach and melon flavors, this semidry Riesling is juicy and sweet without being cloying. Penetrating fruit flavors ease off on the midpalate on the way to a dainty, sugar-laced finish.",,Hosmer
"Almost garnet red in color, this off-dry Pinot Noir sparkling packs a punch with an abundance of juicy black cherry and plum flavor. Concentrated but festive and fun, with a candy-coated cherry finish.",Brut Rosé,Hosmer
"A soft, open wine, with flavors of wood aging to go with the sweet caramel and red fruit tastes. The wine has just a hint of tannin to hold it all together.",Reserve Tawny,Kopke
"Lots to admire in this single-vineyard Zinfandel from Zin's natural home, Dry Creek Valley. It's rich in ripe summer berry and spice flavors, with briary, fuzzy tannins. Two problems, though. It's too sweet, and high alcohol makes it feel hot.",Grist Vineyard,Joseph Jewell
"Made without any oak, this wine shows ripe, long hangtime flavors of oranges, pineapples, limes and white flowers that straddle the border between dry and sweet. It's an easy-drinking wine for drinking now.",,Geyser Peak
"A solid wine. At the equivalent of $5 for a regular bottle, it offers plenty of Cabernet flavor and texture, with smooth tannins framing flavors of blackberries, currants and spices.",Proprietor's Reserve,Glen Ellen
"Mulled red-berry aromas and flavors dominate this wine, with secondary accents of foliage and sweet spice unfolding in the background. It's lean and tight in the mouth with a slightly sharp alcoholic warmth to the close.",Reserve,Flam
"Gold in color and short on bubbles, but heavy on sweetness and residual sugar. That said, it's an advertised semidry, so a certain level of cloy is expected. But this tips too far to the sweet side, leaving nothing but refined white sugar, banana and vanilla cream. Not my cup of tea.",Carta Nevada Semi Dry,Freixenet
"Reddish in color and devoid of a visible bubble bead, this Garnacha-Monastrell cava is lacking in many ways. The nose is grassy and ashy, sort of like a spent cigar, and it's cheesy as well. In the mouth, it's fairly bland tasting, with generic, semitart flavors and a sharp finish.",Artesanía Brut Rosado,Cavas Hill
"This is a soft, simple and sweet wine, with cola and sugared raspberry-juice flavors.",,McManis
The acidity is the problem here. It is out of balance with what seems to be a layer of sweetness that leaves a huge hole in the middle. Screw cap.,,Michel Picard
"An unbalanced wine, semisweet and jellied in raspberries and cherries, but with vegetal tastes.",Rubystone,Ventana
"A fairly unclean wine with leafy cough-drop aromas. The palate is weak and washed out, with stemmy red-fruit flavors. Spiced and leafy on the finish.",Joven,Viña do Val
"Dry, harsh and thin in the mouth, with some unripe moldy notes next to the cherries and raspberries. A tough wine to like.",Patriarche,Holly's Hill
"Smells and tastes overripe and Porty, with raisin and caramel notes, a feels harsh and hot.",,Irish Monkey Cellars
A sharply bitter wine with sweet and sour flavors whose mouthfeel leaves plenty to be desired.,,Parkers Estate
"Stemmy and raw smelling; similar in the mouth. The palate is narrow and sheer, while the flavors lean toward tart red cherry and rhubarb. Peppery and underwhelming.",Tempranillo,Viña Albali
"Thin in berry flavor, with a harsh mouthfeel and even some moldy tastes. It's bone dry on the finish.",Classique,Holly's Hill
"Smells sharp and jammy and tastes tart and acidic, with jellied cherry flavors leading to a sugary finish.",Fióre Marcheschi,Irish Monkey Cellars
"The wine shows tannins and bitter chocolate, then only dilute fruit. It is still unbalanced and likely to remain so.",Tradition,Château Cabredon
"Unripe and sour, with ammonia aromas and flavors that barely veer into gooseberries.",Massa Ranch,Hopper Creek
Syrupy and tired. Not much going on with this raspberry-flavored Zin.,,Headbanger
"Raw, rustic wine, its tannins hardened by excessive acidity. It just about works as a rough and ready red.",Vale de Lobos,Quinta da Ribeirinha
"A wine that has created its own universe. It has a unique, special softness that allies with the total purity that comes from a small, enclosed single vineyard. The fruit is almost irrelevant here, because it comes as part of a much deeper complexity. This is a great wine, at the summit of Champagne, a sublime, unforgettable experience.",Clos du Mesnil,Krug
"A magnificent Champagne, one that is light, delicate, yet packed with character. It is beautifully balanced, with a bone-dry character, just softened by the toastiness that is developing. Expect this to age for many years.",Dom Pérignon Oenothèque Brut,Moët & Chandon
"A glorious Champagne, now at the peak of its powers and maturity. It is rich, creamy, lightly toasty, cookies and yeast propelling the fruits and acidity forward into a wonderful texture. This wine confirms Henriot's place at the top tables of Champagne.",Cuvée des Enchanteleurs Brut,Henriot
"Disgorged in 2009, this is a toasty wine, rich and concentrated. The idea of long aging before disgorging the yeast cells is to build up the unique complexity of the wine. In this Bollinger has succeeded magnificently. An opulent wine, with aging potential for 10 years or more.",RD Brut Champagne,Bollinger
"Exceptionally rich and dense, an exceptional wine that reveals itself in layers, from the first fruit attack to the mineral texture and the way it gradually fills the mouth. Selected from old vines, there is a great flavor in this wine, with the promise of many years' aging.",Cristal Brut,Louis Roederer
"Wow: simply wonderful! This wine will blow you away on all levels. The intensity, the quality of the mouthfeel, the fine focus of the fruit and spice aromas and its long persistency are stratospheric. It's a dark, brooding expression of Nebbiolo with enough of an aromatic motor to carry it forward many years, if not decades of cellar aging. The Rivetto family has produced a masterpiece.",Riserva,Rivetto
"This 20-year-old Champagne, just released by Moët, is beautiful, ripe, toasty, the fruit translated into almonds, French toast and searing, intense mature acidity. Disgorged in 2007, it is just now at its peak.",Dom Pérignon Oenothèque Rosé Brut,Moët & Chandon
"With all the extreme intensity of this vintage, this wine brings even more. The start of cookie yeast and toast character, a vibrant mineral texture, hints of spice, green herbs and a final white peach flavor. It is still young, just keep aging.",Cuvée des Enchanteleurs Brut,Henriot
"Bravo! The Brunate cru has awarded Vietti with a stellar product: a wine that is unusually dark and plush with impressive intensity and crafted aromas of black fruit, spice, earth, licorice, balsam and gianduia chocolate-hazelnut spread. The soft, velvety texture is seductively delicious and the wine will age many long, glorious years.",Brunate,Vietti
"Really taut, tight wine, its mature toastiness embedded in a steely, mineral, very dry texture. The acidity is assertive, wonderfully refreshing, so crisp. It may be 18 years old, but it looks likely to age for several years yet.",Grand Vintage Collection Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Costa Grimaldi is a spectacular wine that surprises with every sip thanks to its intensity and the extraordinary quality of its mouthfeel. Initially, the wine is soft and yielding with tones of red cherry, chocolate, cola, licorice and mineral. It grows even more opulent and velvety in the mouth thanks to its fine texture and tannins. Keep this wine in your cellar ten years plus.",Costa Grimaldi,Poderi Luigi Einaudi
"Intensely Chardonnay, this beautiful wine, named after the ancient rulers of Champagne, is pure mineral, green and citrus fruits, a steely shaft of pure concentration. Now just with a light touch of toast, this still will mature for several years.",Comtes de Champagne Blanc de Blancs,Taittinger
"A big wine, rather ponderous now in the size and forwardness of its fruit and the volume of mainly new French oak. The fruit is massive, suggesting black and red sour cherry candy, with oak influences of smoky char and pencil shavings, and complex notes of minerals and sweet violet flowers. But it all needs time to come together. Tasted in a large flight of 2007 Rutherford Cabernets and Bordeaux blends, this was easily the star. Really hard to exaggerate the wine's beauty and elegance. Best 2013_2019, at least.",,Staglin
"An extraordinary Cabernet that stands out even in this great vintage, and among its Rutherford peers. Quite dry and tannic in youth, it shows an astringency that strongly suggests the cellar. Underneath are powerhouse flavors of blackberries, black and red cherries, spices, tea and cedar. Really defines balance and elegance in a Napa Cabernet. Decant if you drink it now, but it should develop for years to come.",,Long Meadow Ranch
"Made from an interesting blend of Frappato and Syrah, this Calanìca offers the bright, fruity freshness of the first variety against the bold, soft chewiness of the second.",Calanìca Frappato-Syrah,Duca di Salaparuta
"Shows the acidity and dryness that red wines from this appellation always have. It's Pinot Noir-esque in the silky texture and cola flavors, and is ready to drink now.",Force Canyon Vineyard,Hangtime
"The wine that first introduced Americans to Sicily, this classic Corvo blend offers a light, bright appearance followed by easy tones of red berry, bitter almond and cassis.",,Corvo
"Corvo's entry-level Nero d'Avola opens with a bright, lean appearance and sharp berry tones with almond and cassis. It's a bit lean but fresh.",,Corvo
"Barbazzale is a 50-50 blend of Inzolia and Viognier. A touch of burnt matchstick blows off after a few minutes in the glass. Once the wine opens, it offers a full and generous mouthfeel and stone fruit flavors.",Barbazzale,Cottanera
"A spicy, blackberry Petite marked by stewed plums, anise and tar.",Madden Ranch,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"Simple and sugary sweet, with buttered toast, vanilla, orange and pineapple flavors, brightened with a squirt of lime-juice acidity. It's made in a style meant to appeal to millions of Chardonnay lovers.",,Ministry of the Vinterior
"Thick, raisiny and a heavy on first take, with meaty aromas. Feels jammy and soft, but the middle layers aren't well defined. Tastes dark and sweet, with fig, prune and lemony oak. Bulky, but struggles to reach a higher plane.",Edición Limitada,Morandé
"With relatively high altitude vineyards, Chiroubles can produce wines like this, with an austere backbone and high acidity. Together they make for a tight wine with red berries and a dry texture. Age for six months.",Eté Fleuri,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Sushi, fried calamari, grilled vegetables or barbecued shrimp would all make perfect companions to this fresh, easy Sicilian white wine. It ends with citrus, lime and herbal aromas.",Sallier de la Tour,Tasca d'Almerita
Here's a straightforward and simple white wine that delivers fresh peach and citrus aromas backed by a touch of bitter almond. The texture is thick and creamy.,,Tenuta Rapital_
"Hints of underripe pineapple and green fennel add a clean, refreshing tone to juicy pink-grapefruit flavors on the palate of this medium-dry Riesling. Lemony acidity and a pleasantly bitter grapefruit-pith note give focus and edge on the finish.",,Standing Stone
"The fruit is extracted and sweet in this scoury wine. It floods the mouth with raspberry and cherry jam, with plenty of toasty oak. The texture is irregular, though, with some harsh tannins.",Christie Vineyard,Storrs
"Whoa... need... water. Michael David's Earthquake is all about impact, no bones about it. And this one won't disappoint people who like their wine like finely aged Scotch, high in alcohol. For them, its bold smoky chocolate, savory bacon on toast notes will be delightful.",Earthquake,Michael David
"There's a touch of sulfur that takes a few seconds to blow off. Once it does, this wine offers yellow rose, exotic fruit, peach and almond skin.",Aquilae,Viticultori Associati Canicatti
"Tight, citric and minerally up front, with less-than-expressive white fruit aromas. Extremely high in acidity, which is why this wine is still kicking. Tastes of tart white grapes and citrus, with zest galore on the finish. 220 cases produced.",Balado,Zarate
"A controversial wine that will have its fans. Dryness and acidity make it a little sour, and a medicinal taste invades the citrus and tropical fruits.",,Dragonette
"So sweet in berry jam and mocha flavors, it's basically a dessert wine. If you like that style, it's pretty good.",Red Velvet,Cupcake
"Made with organically-farmed Viognier, this is a unique, slightly awkward white wine with muddled aromas of kiwi, green fruit, green leaf and wild caper. The mouthfeel is thin, compact and fresh.",,Di Giovanna
"Hot in alcohol, soft in acidity and sweet in berry-cherry fruit, this simple Cabernet earns a point or two for its lush, ripe tannins.",Bon Vivant Destiny Vineyards,Hunt Cellars
"Aromas of lemon blossom, apple and melon are friendly enough, and the palate has a clean, lifted feel. Flavors of pineapple, green apple and citrus are fresh but limited, while the finish is zesty but turns towards bitterness and almond skin.",,Finca Antigua
"A blend of Grecanico and Inzolia, this bright white wine opens with intense aromas of honey, exotic fruit and butterscotch. It's an easy-drinking, informal wine with a crisp close.",I Versi,Fondo Antico
"While floral notes waver a bit chemically on the nose, the palate on this Michigan Riesling is nicely concentrated, with abundant fresh apple and citrus flavors. Just slightly off-dry in style, it finishes sprightly with cut and focus.",Block II,Bowers Harbor
"Easy, fresh and crisp, this well-priced Grillo would make a great choice for, predinner sipping. Aromas include citrus zest, white almond and wild flower.",Terrale Oro,Calatrasi
"A bit scratchy up front, with some heat and rubber to the bouquet. Feels bold, grippy and alive, with lightly herbal flavors of roasted berry and leather. Herbal and blackened on the finish; ripe but basic in quality.",Mesta,Bodegas Fontana
Pithoi opens with light aromas of forest berry and raw fruit backed by touches of spice and bitter almond. It's an easy wine that could pair with pizza or take-out fried chicken.,Pithoi,Maggiovini
"A wine that shows bright acidity as well as red cherry fruits. It is soft and rounded, with the lightest touch of tannin. With its fruitiness, it should be drunk now.",Eté Indien,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Tonic and refreshing, with hints of fresh florals and apple skins, this light bodied Pinot Grigio is a pleasant aperitif. Airy and brisk, with a just a touch of astringency on the finish. Drink now.",,Mazza Chautauqua Cellars
"A simple, ripe and fruity wine that offers soft almond and toast flavors. The wine is balanced, with ripe acidity. Drink now.",,Domaine Talmard
"Stunning aromatically, with a veil of smoke and petrol that lingers over fresh, clean Honeycrisp apple aromas. Semidry in style, with a simple, slightly sugary attack, it finishes with just a tinge of green pepper in the backdrop.",,Brotherhood
"Although the aromas are toasty, the flavors are still so fresh, rich, complex. This is a wonderful expression of taut minerality, pure citrus zest and then a wood-toast character that gives the wine both richness and sophistication. Given the fresh, intense fruit, this will certainly age for many years.",Brut,Krug
"It's hard to beat the quality achieved by this spectacular wine. Luciano Sandrone's Barolo from the Cannubi Boschis cru is creamy, rich, opulent and sophisticated. It oozes flavors of espresso, ripe cherry, cassis, cola and licorice. In the mouth, it is extraordinarily bright and generous and the seamless finish can be counted in long minutes. And, the best news is: this wine will only improve with time.",Cannubi Boschis,Luciano Sandrone
"Easily one of the greatest California Merlots ever. Notable for its complete balance. Nothing sticks out; all the parts work together. The black cherry, plum, black currant, dark chocolate and licorice fruit is big, but perfectly balanced with smoky, sweet oak, while a subtle touch of violets brings a smack of the earth. The tannin-acid structure is just beautiful. Will continue to develop bottle complexity for at least six more years.",Reserve,Chateau St. Jean
"This eagerly anticipated Drew Bledsoe/Chris Figgins collaboration is a serious effort, dusty, dense, and dark. To begin are whiffs of cinnamon, smoke, cured meat and bacon; then come tight, dry, stone-soaked flavors of cassis and sweet black fruits. Floral highlights elevate the nose, and lead into a finish with delicious accents of toasted nuts, almond paste, and chalk. A dazzling debut.",,Doubleback
"This is a truly awesome Barolo Riserva from the La Morra subzone with gorgeous intensity and purity. The wine is flush with balsam, cola, cherry, mineral, spice and some earthy overtones. The quality of the fruit is very evident in the mouth. Lingering tones of leather and tobacco are folded within the long lasting finish. Put this bottle aside.",Riserva,Enzo Boglietti
"Full, creamy and soft, this is a rich Champagne, very much a food wine. It has great ripe swathes of peach and pineapple flavors, rounded by toast. While 2000 is not a vintage for aging, this opulent Champagne may be the exception.",La Grand Année Brut,Bollinger
"This gorgeous Barolo opens with plush, dark concentration and deep aromatic layers of smoked beef, mineral, cola, mesquite wood, blackberry and exotic spice. This dark, masculine expression also makes a lasting impression in the mouth thanks to the richness and persistency of the finish.",Vigna Cappella di Santo Stefano,Podere Rocche dei Manzoni
"As it develops in bottle, this wine retains all its intense acidity. But it has now brought in a toast and yeast character that gives it even greater complexity. It is a wine that is also a Champagne, now in full flow of mineral richness, still with a long way to develop.",Cuvée Femme Brut,Duval-Leroy
"A great celebration of the fine 2004 vintage, this wine reveals both generosity and a steely resolve. It has a cool elegance as well, giving it a sense of refinement, while still preserving the Roederer richness. The tight acidity holds the wine together and promises long aging.",Vintage Brut,Louis Roederer
"Moccagatta's expression from the Basarin cru will blow you away. This thickly extracted Barbaresco opens with a rich, dark appearance and opulent aromas of sweet spice, leather, toasted almond, vanilla and ripe cherry fruit. This is a big, masculine wine that would pair with pork medallions and caramelized onions. The finish is soft and slightly sweet. Keep it in your cellar 10 years or more. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Basarin,Moccagatta
"Nutty and toasty, this is already maturing. It has a ripe, soft texture, deliciously balanced between acidity, grapefruit and riper peach flavors. It feels sumptuous, rich and certainly ready to drink.",Dom Pérignon Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Azelia's San Rocco Barolo is a stupendous wine with impressive intensity and generous aromas of wild berries, licorice, white truffle, menthol, spice, tar and leather. The tannins are firm and polished and the wine fades slowly leaving a pretty vanilla aftertaste. Hold until 2018. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",San Rocco,Azelia
"Cantina Bartolo Mascarello, one of the feistiest and most historic estates in the Langhe, has crafted an amazing Barolo in 2006 that delivers both elegance and opulence. It's a richly layered and complex wine with a natural fullness and generosity that really sits well on the palate. Cellar this wine 10 years or more.",,Cantina Bartolo Mascarello
"Just touching maturity, this is a wonderful wine. With intense acidity, yeast, minerality and a beautiful final citrus texture, this is ready to drink but will age for many years.",Millésimé Brut,Henriot
"One of the best Barolos of the year, Coste di Rose is a natural beauty with gorgeous, thick extraction and perfectly balanced aromas of blueberries, violets, almond paste, sweet spice and root beer. The wine shows impressive heft and density, yet it is elegant and polished at the same time with finely textured tannins. Cellar this delightful wine ten years or more.",Coste di Rose,Marchesi di Barolo
"With a strong line of women at the helm of the winery, Josetta Saffirio is now run by the young Sara Vezza. Her Barolo Persiera is particularly impressive thanks to its bold, pulsing fruit nuances and the refined nature of its spice, tobacco and cola elements. The wine finishes with long floral flavors and polished tannins.",Persiera,Josetta Saffirio
"An absolutely lovely Pinot, the best in Gainey's long career. Dry, smooth and silky, it defines Pinot's more Burgundian side, with mushroomy notes along with perfectly ripe cherries and raspberries, accented with brilliant acidity. The oak treatment is tasteful and blends in seamlessly, offering a hint of toast. The wine treads an exciting line between ripeness and earthiness, while keeping alcohol to a refreshingly low 14.1%. This is a connoisseur's wine.",Limited Selection,Gainey
"Elegance and finesse mark this beautiful wine. It has a tight minerality to go with white fruits, crisp apple juice, a hint of yeast and the purest acidity. With this structure, it should age gracefully for many years.",L'Amour de Deutz Brut,Deutz
"Rocche Barolo is another homerun for Vietti. You'll fall in love with the wine's rich intensity and the ensuing complexity that becomes apparent as the wine spends more time in the glass. Thanks to a continuing evolution, you'll recognize aromas of wild berry, smoke, crushed stone, licorice, cola and mesquite. The tannins are silky and smooth. Hold ten years or more.",Rocche,Vietti
"MacRostie's Pinots from this vineyard on the edge of the Sonoma side of Carneros always are big, ripe, powerful and ageable. This '07 shows the fat, ripe character of the vintage, offering luscious raspberry, cherry, cola, red currant liqueur, bacon, anise, spice and sandalwood flavors. But it's balanced enough to change in interesting ways over the next 5_7 years. Really a glamorous wine for your best meals.",Wildcat Mountain Vineyard,MacRostie
"Massolino's Parafada Barolo is a stunningly beautiful wine with bold, confident aromas of black fruit, tobacco, cigar box, cherry cola, clove, nutmeg and vanilla bean. The mouthfeel is bright, lively, velvety and, generally speaking, the 2006 vintage represents a big jump over 2005.",Parafada,Massolino
"A wonderful wine that has preserved its freshness while welcoming elements of toasty maturity. It is crisp, definitely on the dry side, with red currants, bright wild strawberries over the purest acidity. It's sure to age over many years, but, if you must, can be drunk now.",Grand Siècle Alexandra Brut Rosé,Laurent-Perrier
"Now at its peak of maturity, this is a gorgeous toast and spice flavored Champagne. It has richness, refined acidity, a powerful concentration of yeasty almonds, a taut texture and a final flavor that is straight, true, perfectly balanced.",Dom Ruinart Brut,Ruinart
"A rich Chardonnay, full of white fruits and the merest touch of toast and yeast. It is ripe, full in the mouth, but never loses sight of pure elegance. A great success in balancing freshness and richness from this hot vintage.",Blanc de Blancs Brut,Louis Roederer
"This has been one of Etude's best bottlings, and 2007 was a great year. If you enjoy sheer, decadent deliciousness in your Pinot Noirs, this is one for you. The palate first is struck by the rich waves of cherry pie filling, raspberry essence and sweet, vanilla-tinged, smoky oak. Then it discovers the soft silkiness, and finally the firm, fine tannins kick in, providing structure. Just beguiling, and should develop in the bottle over the next 5_6 years.",Deer Camp,Etude
"From a simpatico, family-run winery comes this benchmark Barolo. La Serra speaks highly of the Langhe territory and of winemaking innovation. Aromas here include cherry cola, vanilla bean, leather and crushed granite stone. The wine is determined and direct with a savory note of cured meat on the long finish. Drink after 2017.",La Serra,Eugenio Bocchino
"Here's a truly astonishing Barolo (from the Bricco Gattera cru) that epitomizes the __ig boy_ style that represents one of two dominant winemaking philosophies in the Langhe. This is an exuberant wine with thickly extracted notes of coffee bean, blackberry, leather and savory layers of black pepper. The wine is rich, smooth and velvety and will appeal less to Nebbiolo traditionalists.",Bricco Gattera,Cordero di Montezemolo
"Nebbiolo grapes, with their naturally elegant aromas of black currant and licorice, speak loudly. So does winery magic: Tones of spice, leather, cola and tobacco are derived from 24 months of careful oak aging. The tannins are fine and tight and this wine will age ten years or more.",Bricco Rocche Bricco Rocche,Ceretto
"Texture is the name of the game here. We're talking pure velvet, the way the wine glides over the palate with hardly a wrinkle. Beyond the mouthfeel are flavors so complex, they're hard to describe. The blend consists of Cabernet Sauvignon, with contributions from Cab Franc, Malbec and Petit Verdot, and each grape brings its own distinction, as does 100% new oak. It's approachable now for the softness, and should glide through the next 6_8 years with ease. Expensive, yes, and only 344 cases were produced, but it's worth the search.",Reserve,Chateau St. Jean
"Thanks to its dense clay soils, the Brunate cru delivers wines with high color saturation and aromatic caliber. This Barolo offers layers of black fruit, plum, spice, tobacco, cola and dark chocolate. The wine is firm and finely textured with power, dimension and personality on the long finish.",Bricco Rocche Brunate,Ceretto
"A blend of Catarratto and Chardonnay, this is one of those easy Italian whites that will wash down fresh seafood or chicken salad. Ripe fruit and spice build some momentum in the mouth.",La Piazza,Calatrasi
"Scratchy red fruit aromas greet you along with leather and cheese scents. Feels juicy, light and mild, with plum, raspberry and freshness. Clean but lean, with zesty red fruit flavors and snappy acidity.",,El Circulo
"Jumpy and funky on the nose, with a lack of cohesion and a scent of wet dog. Feels grabby but lacks concentration; tastes herbal and mildly candied, with a scratchy and sweet tasting finish. Good but doesn't stand up to scrutiny.",Single Vineyard Crianza,Finca El Encinal
"Sweet in sugary pineapple and lime flavors, with the caramel and buttered toast of oak, this is a simple Chardonnay made in the popular style.",,Gnarly Head
"Lime pith, green plum and white clover aromas lead the nose of this Sauv Blanc, and the mouth offers similarly tart and tight flavors. The short finish favors white grapefruit accented by green grass.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"A fresh, lemon-scented wine, with white flower aromas and soft, crisp lime flavors. The wine has some softness as well as an attractive zesty finish. Screwcap.",La Côte Blanche,Cave de Lugny
"Here's an easy, no-fuss white wine to pair with rice salad or grilled vegetables. Citrus, almond blossom and stone fruit are capped by a slightly sweet feel in the mouth.",Fiore,Corvo
"Not much fruity concentration, but nonetheless, this is a pretty good Chardonnay to drink with everyday fare, like salmon cakes or chicken breasts in a white cream sauce. It's dry, crisp and citrusy.",,Angel's Secret
"Softly perfumed with scents of apple and orange skins, there's also a slightly waxy tone to this rich, semidry Ohio Riesling. Densely concentrated with flavors of apple compote and sunny tropical fruit, it finishes with a touch of sugar and musky potpourri.",Reserve,Debonné
"The blendo on this North Coast country sipper is Petite Sirah, Mourvedre, Zinfandel, Carignane and Syrah. It's rich and spicy in jammy berry flavors, and a little overripe, to judge from the raisins. Drink now.",Blendo,Dogwood
"Sweet scents of candied cherry and plum belie a palate that's actually quite dry and refreshing. It's easy drinking, with an abundance of crisp red-plum flavors and a pretty floral tone on the finish. Drink now.",,Albemarle
"A just off-dry Vinho Verde, fresh and spritzy. Acidity, sweet apples and a breezy citrus edge combine easily and lightly. Ready to drink.",Praia,Aveleda
"Packaged in a screw cap bottle (still a rare sight in Italy) this fresh white is packed with almond blossom, lemon zest and dried herb aromas. Try it with lemon chicken.",Terre,Baglio Curatolo Arini 1875
"Peach, melon and light oceanic aromas. Feels a bit flat, with slightly bitter flavors of almond skin and pithy citrus. Picks up steam on the finish courtesy of lasting acidity.",Zios,Lusco
"Gritty and rustic, with blackberry, prune and spice flavors. It's a dry, tannic wine, for drinking with simple foods, like burritos.",,Napa Family Vineyards
"Sweet and sugary in pineapple, lime and green apple flavors, this Chardonnay has a strong overlay of sweet oak. Everything is too much. It lacks subtlely and complexity.",Estate Grown,Petroni
"There's a minty, ammonia streak of greenness that can charitably be described as gooseberry in this dry Sauvignon Blanc. Oak brings sweet vanilla richness, but the wine is still pretty eccentric.",Estate Grown,Petroni
"Juicy sweet on the nose and palate, this semidry Gewürztraminer is likeable for its unabashed fruit forwardness. Sweet peach and melon candy flavors finish a bit on the confected side with a swirl of perfumy florals.",,Thousand Islands Winery
"Smells decidedly burnt and stalky, with rubbery berry and black plum aromas. Shows grip on the palate, along with the same flavors hinted at on the nose: leather, burnt coffee, herbs and roasted berries. Feels pretty good, but the stalky, burnt core dominates.",Crianza,Viña Bujanda
"This simple Sicilian red delivers bright berry fruit, blue flower and white almond skin. It shows almost Pinot Noir-like aromas and the power and gritty mouthfeel usually associated with Nero d'Avola.",,Resonata
"A crisp, lemon-scented wine, then layering on butter, toast and ripe melon fruit flavors. It's immediately attractive, not needing any aging, with a soft, yet fresh, finish.",L'Aurore,Cave de Lugny
"A blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato, Fiore is a sharp, tonic red wine that would pair with fried dough or cheese melts. Bramble, berry, cola and bitter almond appear on the close.",Fiore,Corvo
"Made with 70% Cab Franc and 30% Merlot, there is a green streak to this wine that runs alongside tart notes of currant and rhubarb. The mouth is straight-forward but juicy, and the finish mouthwatering.",,Flam
"Sugary sweet and simple in the modern style, with vanilla, caramel, buttered popcorn, orange jam and toast flavors.",,Foodies
Famiglia Cielo (a Sicilian blend of 80% Nero d'Avola and 20% Syrah) opens with simple fruit tones and a touch of burnt toast or roasted almond. The Syrah component adds some extra density and richness to the finish.,Famiglia Cielo,Cielo e Terra
"This dry, full-bodied Syrah is impressively packed with blackberry, currant, crispy bacon and black pepper flavors. On the downside is an overripeness suggesting raisins, with the tannic bitterness of raisin skins. Drink now.",,Eagle Castle
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, Rasula opens with sharp and somewhat sour aromas of white cherry and bitter almond. It's a simple, no-fuss wine for informal occasions.",Rasula,Maggiovini
"This creamy expression of Insolia is redolent of citrus mousse, melon and a touch of baked apricot. Pair it with spaghetti and clam sauce.",Pithoi,Maggiovini
"Slightly dusty, but piquant aromas of freshly pressed apple cider are pleasant in this fairly dry Michigan Riesling. Bright, appley flavors make for easy drinking, but finish with just the right hint of bitter lemon and lime pith.",Dry,Peninsula
"Too sweet and soft, like a confection in a glass. Tastes like a raspberry and cherry tart, spiced with cinnamon and dusted with cocoa, and turns hot and Porty-like on the finish.",Estate Grown,Petroni
"Enrico VI is an elegant and unique expression of Nebbiolo with impressive finesse and sophistication. Save this bottle for an important occasion and cellar age the wine five to 10 more years at a minimum. Aromas include coffee, tar, dried tobacco, leather and delicate forest fruit. There are hints of vanilla and toast on the close that will soften with time.",Enrico VI,Cordero di Montezemolo
"Barolo Sorano (from the Serralunga d'Alba area) is an impressive wine with big color and extraction followed by aromas of cherry liqueur, spice, vanilla, clove and ginger. The wine is chewy and succulent in the mouth with firm tannins that will soften with time. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Sorano,Claudio Alario
"This year's best expression from the celebrated Rabaj_ cru, Bruno Rocca presents a beautifully integrated Barbaresco that shows equal parts fruit (prune, plum and cassis) and spice (vanilla, root beer and clove). The wine is smooth, silky and very enduring on the close with excellent structure. Drink after 2015.",Rabaj_,Bruno Rocca
"The beauty of Krug's rosé is the sense of bottle age, of that extra richness. That means the wine is not just the sum of its delicious red berry fruits. It's also the way the wine is rounded out, filled with secondary flavors, toast and almonds and a taut minerality. The aftertaste is taut, dry, seamless, complex.",Brut Rosé,Krug
"With its minimum of six years' bottle aging, this is a beautifully integrated, mature wine. It has a wonderful toast character, layered over sliced pears and ripe acidity. With its complex poise between lightness and richness, this remains an intensely impressive wine.",Grande Cuvée Brut,Krug
"Here's an excellent measuring stick with which to gauge some of the world's best Nebbiolo-based wines. This bright Barolo from the Sarmassa cru delivers textbook aromatic nuances of small berry, cinnamon, dried currants, licorice and balsam freshness. Tight tannins and a fine texture will enable longevity. Cellar this wine ten years or more.",Sarmassa,Marchesi di Barolo
"With a pretty pink-salmon color, this Pinot Noir-based blush is rich and full-bodied. It has considerable weight for a bubbly, but the acidity and freshness and yeasty tang lift it up to Champagne elegance. Impossible not to fall in love with this raspberry-scented beauty, but why wouldn't you want to?",Brut Rosé,Schramsberg
"Here's a super-modern, piacione (roughly translated from the Italian as __o one can resist it_) wine with deep layers of vanilla, toast, roasted espresso bean, blackberry, balsam notes, smoke, spice and tar. The wine is thick and soft in the mouth and almost ready to drink now (or in five years). The finish is delicious with a long cherry-flavored fade.",Rocchettevino,Viberti
"This is an impressive Barolo by a wine company (with superstar consulting enologist Carlo Ferrini at the head of winemaking) that is relatively new to the scene. Due Corti proves this winery knows what it's doing. Aromas of red rose, violet and exotic spice come forward immediately. Indeed, this is an extremely floral and perfumed wine with silky, smooth tannins.",Due Corti,Tenute Costa
"Executed in a plump, modern style (the wine is aged in small oak barrique), this delicious cru expression from Barbaresco is truly irresistible. The extraction is dark, thick and redolent of cherry, currant, blackberry, vanilla, spice and cinnamon. In the mouth, it is generous, smooth and long-lasting. This wine will appeal to modernists more than traditionalists.",Montersino,Orlando Abrigo
"This is a rich and beautifully extracted Barolo that opens with concentrated aromas of toasted hazelnut, chocolate fudge, cherry, licorice and exotic spice. In the mouth, it offers firm, finely textured tannins and a powerful but delicious finish.",Margheria,Massolino
"A beautifully balanced wine, with bitter cherries in a core of dry toast. It is already mature, its freshness transformed into a rich texture. Like many rosé Champagnes, this is made for food.",Dom Pérignon Rosé Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Such are the tannins in this 100% Cab that it demands cellar time. It's really shut down and astringent in youth, which emphasizes the dryness. But it's very fine, with a solid core of ripe black cherry fruit that will express its sweetness when the tannins melt away. Winemaker Amy Aiken is really showing her stuff with this polished ager. Best 2013_2019.",Morisoli Vineyard,Meander
"Wow, what a wonderful wine, delivering rich notes of black fruit, vanilla, cherry and spice. But the aromas are in no way obvious. In fact, this is an ethereal and elegant wine that pays attention to the little details,   like the light shadings of polished stone and violets that liven up the long finish. Drink after 2018.",Cascina Nuova,Elvio Cogno
"Here's a fantastic addition to your cellar collection of Barolos. Gianfranco Alessandria's San Giovanni Barolo is at the top of its class. The wine is elegant and ethereal with dark, spicy concentration and loads of pulpy fruit, licorice, ginger, cola and leather. Open this bottle in ten years or so.",San Giovanni,Gianfranco Alessandria
"This 100% Cabernet's dark, saturated color testifies to its extracted ripeness and richness. It's a gigantic wine, buried at the moment under smoky oak, but tremendous underneath in blackberry, cherry, currant, sweet herb, violet and cured meat flavors. A big success even in this vintage. Now, with decanting, and through 2019.",Campbell Vineyard,Honig
"Nei Cannubi from Poderi Einaudi is textbook Barolo; the kind of wine you can bank on for an elegant and enlightening drinking experience. You see that, here, all the elements are perfectly in place and stacked for maximum pleasure. Aromas of blue flower, berry and shaved mineral build in intensity and the wine is determined and persistent on the palate.",Nei Cannubi,Poderi Luigi Einaudi
"The best things about this Merlot are its extreme dryness, tannin integrity and relative austerity. It's a pleasure to drink a Merlot that's not a fruit bomb. That doesn't mean you won't find complex flavors of blackberries and currants. You will. It means that this extraordinary Merlot is pushing the envelope on what California, and Napa Valley in particular, is able to achieve in making Merlot along classically structured lines.",Estate,White Cottage Ranch
"Dark in color with a modern style and velvety extraction, the gorgeous Marcenasco expression of Barolo is redolent of blackberries, cherries, spice, leather and tobacco. The finish is long and elegant but not without power and determination. Keep this wine cellared for ten years plus.",Marcenasco,Renato Ratti
"Riserva Barolo Prapò delivers modern oak tones followed by nice integrity of fruit and well-integrated aromas of spice, prune, blackberry and cola. The mouthfeel is very velvety and smooth and the tannins show an extreme fine grain quality. Hold ten years or more.",Prapò Riserva,Schiavenza
"There's a tannic toughness to this young wine. It's like chewing on dried black currants. Once they start to dissolve in the mouth, lovely flavors of sweet blackberries emerge, and then take over through a very long, spicy finish. It's quite a beautiful Napa Cabernet, but it does need time. Best 2013_2019.",,Alpha Omega
"Impressive on so many levels, this vineyard designate Riserva Barolo shows excellent aromatic intensity and purity. Black cherry, plum, smoke, spice, asphalt, root beer and black tar are evident elements of the bouquet. The mouthfeel is full, firm and generous with a lingering vanilla fade.",Bricco Rocca Riserva Tistot,Cascina Ballarin
"Barolo Riva is a fantastic wine with enormous personality and charm. At the outset, the wine appears modern and bold with determined aromas of black fruit and spice. But wait a second and the wine will surprise you with its sassy complexity and finesse. Give it 10 more years of cellar aging. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Riva,Claudio Alario
"Made in the Heirloom style, which is huge, extracted and potent. The '07 shows the preternatural ripeness of the vintage, offering massive cherry and black raspberry fruit, along with sizable tannins. The winemaker has framed this power with considerable oak. The result admittedly is seismic, but it is another success for Heirloom, and is likely to age for at least a dozen years.",Heirloom,Etude
"Rich, concentrated, and loaded with smoky, dark, spicy fruit flavors, this is a full-on Bordeaux blend, with Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot. There's plenty of barrel influence, from 70% new French oak, but it's welcome, and appropriate, perfectly matched to the power of the fruit. An underlayer of woodsy earth and mushroom adds further complexity.",Minnick Hills Reserve,Dumas Station
"A beautiful orange pink-colored wine. Young and fresh, it has great depth of raspberry and red fruit flavors as well as a delicious summer fruit brightness and liveliness. A beautiful Champagne, that will repay some bottle aging.",Rosé Brut,Louis Roederer
"Here's a vintage-driven wine that needs the right conditions to succeed, which 2006 provided with its long, cool hangtime. The fruit has ripened to perfection, offering deep flavor notes of blackberries and raspberries. But there are also exotic and delicious notes of bacon, mocha and cola with a blast of black pepper throughout. The wine is full-bodied and dense in tannins, impressive from start to finish. Great now, and should age for 4_6 years.",Wildcat Mountain Vineyard,MacRostie
"Barolo La Serra from Gianni Voerzio would make a perfect companion to pulled pork smoked over hardwood charcoal. There's a sassy spice element here backed by plush layers of blueberry, blackberry and plum. The tannins are still on the young, astringent side; give this wine some time to unwind in the cellar.",La Serra,Gianni Voerzio
"Barolo Ornato is a beautiful wine: rich in flavor, intensity and personality. You can taste the quality of the fruit here thanks to the pristine notes of cherry, wild berry, spice and ginger that emerge from the nose. Oak notes of vanilla and cinnamon are nicely integrated and folded within the wine's dense, supple texture.",Ornato,Pio Cesare
"Top lots from Sheridan, Dineen and Meek vineyard grapes go into this reserve. This is always the most thick and dense of the Stevens wines, and the tannins, though very well managed, are chewy and substantial. They dominate this young wine, but the stacked and subtle layers of red and black fruits, leaf and forest floor materials, moist earth and ashes keep the flavors complex and interesting. This wine absolutely must be decanted, and can be cellared almost indefinitely.",XY Reserve,Stevens
"This is a sweet, oaky, simple Chardonnay. It's forward in ripe pineapple, orange and melon fruit flavors, with a honeyed finish.",Red Label,Newton
"Call this wine rustic for its berry and cherry flavors that are so ripe, they veer into raisins. It's almost like a minor Port, with an inky black color and an overtly sweet, milk chocolate finish.",,Storrs
"Pretty floral and white grapefruit notes on the palate scream Gewürz, but fresh apple flavors layered in smoke and a chalky, crushed stone minerality make this unusual New Mexico bottling an interesting treat.",,St. Clair
"Sweet and sour in apricot, orange and vanilla flavors, this simple Chardonnay is fairly priced for the quality.",,Napa Family Vineyards
"This dessert wine is sweet in honeyed orange, mango and pear flavors. It's simple, soft and easy to drink.",,White Truck
"Basic tropical aromas suggest apple and slight minerality. The feel is standard and melony, with sweet, chunky flavors of melon and green banana. Round and turning bitter on the finish, with a sugary sweetness and stalky notes.",Casa Grand Selection,Lapostolle
"A rustic, sweet Cabernet, with an irregular, mouthfeel and sharp, jammily candied blackberry flavors. The sharpness is unlikely to age away.",,Padilla Erickson
"Rugged and astringent in texture, with jammy blackberry and spice flavors.",Estate Grown,Petroni
"Fiore is a down-to-earth Sicilian wine that offers simple and pure aromas of small berry fruit, almond paste and blueberry. It closes with fresh tones of citrus and spice.",Fiore,Corvo
"This is a tart, lean, somewhat ungenerous Pinot Noir, but one that still manages to deliver an attractive, creative tension between its earthy, composty aromas and bright cranberry fruit.",,Dashwood
"This simple, easy-going Nero d'Avola opens with a slightly burnt or charred characteristic that recalls asphalt and rubber tire. Wait a few minutes for the red fruit and almond to come through.",,Feudo Maccari
"This wine features soft apple and pear fruit with light tannins and grapefruit freshness. It is clean, well-made and ready to drink.",Branco,Finisterra
"Roasted, oaky and creamy smelling, with baked berry aromas. Conversely, it's rather edgy and citric in the mouth, with plum, citrus and tomato flvors accented by dill weed. Ends in herbal fashion, with crisp acidity.",Vendimia Seleccionada Crianza,Bodegas Muriel
"Ripe and oaky, with vanilla, buttered toast, pineapple jam, orange cream and butterscotch flavors that are rich and sweet. A bit simple and soft, but it offers plenty of crowd-pleasing Chardonnay richness.",,Geyser Peak
"Sweet scents of cherry blossoms and forest greenery abound in Glenora's off-dry Pinot Noir rosé. It's off-dry, with a concentration of candied, sweet cherry flavors, bright acidity and balanced alcohol keep things restrained. Drink now.",Pinot Noir,Glenora
"Made from Syrah, Merlot and Zinfandel, this is a toughly tannic, rustic wine. It has berry, earth and spice flavors.",House of Reds,Wild Coyote
"Too sweet, with sugary orange, pineapple and banana flavors.",,Sonoma Hills
"Bright red cherry fruits, fresh and light with fruit acidity and the minimum of tannins.",Nouveau,Thorin
"Easy-drinking and straightforward, this approachable Pinot offers bright notes of red cherry, blueberry and strawberry framed by dusty tannins and a softly herbal finish.",Classic,Barkan
"There's a high-toned streak to the red fruit core of this wine, with secondary accents of chocolate-milk mix and vanilla extract to keep things from being too sharp. Drink now.",Reserve,Alexander
"Crisp and grassy on the nose, then lemony in the mouth, with narrow citrus and white peach flavors along with a hint of the veggies. Tangy, lean, slick and acidic in terms of feel, with a tight, lemony finish.",Gran Reserva,Indomita
"Lots of zippy acidity in this Chardonnay. Lots of sweetness, too. Tastes like lemon and pineapple pie filling, with heat from the alcohol.",,La Merika
"Terrale Oro is a perfect pasta or pizza wine to drink on nights at home with family and friends. It delivers bright red fruit, blackberry and almond paste.",Terrale Oro,Calatrasi
"There is a layer of tannins here that impart a dry edge to what is otherwise sweetly fruity wine. It is full and juicy, with strawberry fruit flavors.",Nouveau,Georges Duboeuf
"All red cherry and banana fruit, this is a soft, juicy and bright wine. Attractive and fresh, just edged with a slightly dry texture.",Nouveau,Georges Duboeuf
"A fruity wine, full of red cherries and plenty of acidity. There is dry structure, making it food friendly, but the wine is not for aging.",,Gérard Brisson
"Here's a simple, clean white wine that opens with grassy tones, citrus and stone fruit aromas. The mouthfeel is somewhat heavy and thick.",Baglio del Sole,Feudi del Pisciotto
"This is an easy-drinking Sicilian white to pair with salmon, grilled tuna or Thai spring rolls. It's crisp and clean, with notes of citrus, peach and candied fruit.",Baglio del Sole,Feudi del Pisciotto
"Light and fresh, although on the thin side. The wine has some delicate white fruit and toast flavors, light acidity and some minerality. Drink now.",,Domaine Corine Perchaud
"Too extracted by far, so rich and sweet in fruit, it's like a blackberry and cherry Slurpee. Doesn't really showcase Howell Mountain at all, except for the polished, firm tannins.",,Cornerstone
"A wonderfully toasty, yeasty wine, with creamed apple fruits, flavors that show some softness but never deviate from a crisp, steely character. Although this wine is ready to drink, consider keeping for 3_4 years.",Brut Millesimé,Taittinger
"A beautiful, rich, elegant, fancy sparkling wine. Feels so fine in the mouth, all silk and satin, with deep, dry raspberry, strawberry, vanilla, toast, yeasty lees, brioche and honey flavors. Superb, but young. Needs time. Give it until 2011, if you can keep your hands off, and should develop until 2015, if not longer.",J. Schram,Schramsberg
"Here's a wine that shows careful craftsmanship in both the vineyard and the winery. Silvio Grasso's Barolo Bricco Luciani is a bold and expertly extracted wine with heft and determination that is in no way overdone. You'll identify aromas of spice, smoke, cinnamon and clove lavished over a bright core of blackberry and plum. The wine also offers interesting earthy tones, with smoked or cured meat nuances.",Bricco Luciani,Silvio Grasso
"Barolo Ciabot Manzoni is a tremendous wine with rich notes of cherry, vanilla and chocolate. Yes, it's a bold, modern wine but there's no denying the quality and beauty here. Give it more time in the cellar to allow those oak notes to integrate and give more prominence to the sophisticated aromas of wild berries, mineral, cola and licorice that are generously present. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Ciabot Manzoni,Silvio Grasso
"Rusack's best 2008 Pinot comes from this great vineyard that displays such fine Santa Rita Hills character. It's ripe enough in cherries to satisfy, and also brisk in acidity, with complex mineral and herb notes, and the oak barrel layering is perfect. Lovely now for its silky texture, and will develop over the next 5_7 years.",Rancho Santa Rosa,Rusack
"In acknowledgement of the superior quality of 2002, Moët has released this wine well after the 2003. The decision is fully justified, for this is still young. It is impressive, intensely concentrated, mineral, showing tight grapefruit and apple flavors. Excellent aging potential.",Grand Vintage Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Rivetto has delivered an impressive portfolio this year with vineyard-designate Barolos and a stellar Riserva. This Serralunga expression is ripe with generous, velvety fruit tones and loads of mineral, cola and spice. The wine shows balance and personality and definitely has the qualities needed for long aging.",Serralunga,Rivetto
"This outlier wine sparked much controversy at the Nebbiolo blind tastings because of the thickness of its extraction and the darkness of its appearance. Serracapelli is a beautifully rich wine that doesn't necessarily highlight Barbaresco typicity. You'll get opulent aromas of black cherry, spice, leather and moist tobacco. The mouthfeel is rich, round and velvety.",Serracapelli,Poderi Elia
"Erupts out from the glass with beautiful Cabernet perfume, suggesting cherry pie from the oven, licorice, sandalwood and dusty dried herbs, like sage and thyme. Very dry, with a long spicy finish, but also quite tannic, although lots of the tannins come from new oak. Best to age this polished 100% Cab for at least six years.",Reserve,Peju
"Here's yet another extraordinary wine from the famed Cannubi cru of Barolo. In this expression from the Brezza family, you'll be rewarded with bright aromas of forest berry, licorice, earth, leather and cola. The wine is intense, generous and very elegant. Pair it with chicken in morel mushroom sauce.",Cannubi,Brezza
"This is Chimney Rock's best Stags Leap Cabernet since the 2005, and continues a string of successful vintages. Dry and smooth and silky in the mouth, it's pretty tannic, but very rich, offering waves of cherry, blackberry, blueberry, cocoa and sweet cedar flavors. Absolutely delicious, wonderfully elegant, and should age well for a decade.",,Chimney Rock
"With fruit sourced from some of Barolo's best vineyard crus, this beautiful wine offers fullness, character and longevity. Textbook Nebbiolo aromas include wild berry, blue flower, white pepper, cola and tar. The mouthfeel is spicy, fresh and well structured. Pair this wine with steak au poivre (in 5_10 years or so).",Cannubi San Lorenzo Ravera,Giuseppe Rinaldi
"Tight, mineral, taut wine, showing citrus, lime zest and pear skin flavors. Stone fruits emerge in an elegant texture. This is structured, powerful, offering serious aging potential.",Gloria,Kollwentz
"A tremendous wine that easily held its own against Napa Cabs and blends, and a worthy followup to the wonderful 2006. Mainly Cabernet Sauvignon, with small amounts of Cabernet Franc and Merlot, the wine is extraordinarily rich and balanced and refined, showing Paso softness, but no absence of complexity. Really impresses for the depth and range of berries, currants, licorice, mocha, herbs, spices and oak. Now_2015.",Isosceles Reserve,Justin
"Mainly Pinot Noir, with some Chardonnay for brightness and citrusy zest, this brilliantly clean wine has an incredibly fierce mousse. It seems to boil in the glass, and the followup mouthfeel is as creamy and refined as any California sparkler in memory. The Pinot asserts itself in delicate touches of raspberries and strawberries. Delicious and compelling now. Try with sushi.",Blanc de Noirs,Schramsberg
"This is a crisp, high-wire-walking wine, just so poised. Its youthful red fruits, laced with citrus, taste so fresh, with a strawberry bite. At this stage, it is intensely enjoyable as young Champagne, but it does need to age for several years.",Rosé Brut,Louis Roederer
"The Luigi Pira estate delivers a knockout Barolo (from the Marenca vineyard in Serralunga d'Alba) with impressive integrity of fruit, vibrant cherry and blackberry backed by warming aromas of chocolate and spice. The wine is velvety-rich and opulent in the mouth. Drink after 2018.",Vigna Marenca,Luigi Pira
"Here's another Barolo from the Coste di Rose cru that will blow your mind. This is a big, bold expression of Nebbiolo with thick and longlasting aromas backed by impressive intensity in the mouth. Espresso bean, cherry, spice, leather and licorice all make an appearance and the finish can be counted in many long, long delicious minutes.",Coste di Rose,Bric Cenciurio
"This is a very rich wine. Complex, too. With every sip, it seems to offer a little more of itself. On the surface, it's dry, tannic and fruity, with blackberry, black currant, dark chocolate and cedar flavors. But it has mineral and herb nuances that seem to spring from the soil, and the depth and finish are impressive. Drinkable now for sheer luxury, and should continue to develop over the next decade.",Dancing Bear Ranch,Cakebread
"The Barolo Fossati from La Morra opens with huge intensity and determined aromas of black cherry, tobacco, licorice, mesquite wood and crushed mineral. What really sets this wine apart is the immediacy and confident delivery of its aromas. That same self-awareness transfers to the mouth, where the wine is long, satisfying and rich.",Fossati,Enzo Boglietti
"Shows the Etude signature of extraordinary richness and great structure, along with the paradox of early appeal combined with ageability. Floods the mouth with raspberry, cherry, orange zest, Dr. Pepper cola, vanilla and sweet oak flavors that turn dry and refined in the finish. This bottling continues to be one of the best, most flamboyantly enjoyable Carneros Pinot Noirs.",Temblor,Etude
"A Barolo superstar on the rise__eep a close watch on the wines of Gianni Gagliardo and family. This expression from the prized Cannubi cru offers impressive intensity and personality with enticing aromas of black fruit, cola, root beer, cured beef, cedar and white truffle. The wine is ethereal and elegant but the tannic touch is firm enough to promise a long cellar future ahead.",Cannubi,Gianni Gagliardo
"Dominated by rich Pinot Noir, this is still impressively youthful. It has a sense of power and concentration, with intense white fruit, yeast and just a hint of honey. It could age, but is ready to drink.",Celebris Vintage Extra Brut,Gosset
"You'll absolutely love this wine. Barbaresco Santo Stefano offers intensity, harmony and imparts delicious aromas of sweet spice, wild berries, licorice, tar and light touches of smoke or graphite. It boasts a smooth, rich texture with bright acidity on the close. This is a very pure and pristine expression of Nebbiolo that will live long in the cellar.",Santo Stefano,Castello di Neive
"Although this Riserva already has six years of age, it opens with surprisingly bright and youthful tones of cherry, blackberry and cassis. Those fruit aromas are folded within evident oak-driven aromas of spice and vanilla. The mouthfeel is firm, polished and this Barolo should age more years in the bottle.",Monvigliero Riserva,Castello di Verduno
"A wonderful soft, rich and toasty wine. It reflects the generosity of the 1995 vintage in a mature context, all ripe textures, acidity that has a sweet edge to it, and a lovely final bite of freshness. A delight to drink.",Grand Vintage Collection Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Rich, almost unctuous, with a lush, lanolin mouthfeel, this is a passionfruit creamsicle of a wine. The fruit is a seductive and generous mix of peach, Asian pear and tropical; the alcohol a full-bodied 14.5%. The Roussanne part (58% of the blend) is barrel fermented; the Viognier done in stainless. Blended together they harmonize beautifully.",Slice of Pape Blanc,Tranche
"This famed single vineyard on its steep slope above Mareuil-sur-Aÿ produces a warm, always elegant wine. This 1999 is softer than some vintages, while still having a power and texture to go with fruit that is now maturing, giving a yeasty final character. Drink now, or age another few years.",Clos des Goisses Brut,Philipponnat
"Riserva Broglio Barolo from Schiavenza opens with generous tones of red berry fruit, spice, vanilla, polished mineral, licorice and cola. It is already showing some delicate tertiary aromas and, in the mouth, you can feel the fine texture of the tannins. Hold five more years.",Broglio Riserva,Schiavenza
"From the Bricco Boschis cru in Castiglione Falletto, this luminous Barolo offers pretty elements of wild berry, forest floor, leather, tar, licorice and eucalyptus. There's loads of power and personality here and the mouthfeel is elegant and long lasting. Drink after 2018.",Bricco Boschis,Cavallotto
"Made in the popular style, with sweet vanilla, buttered toast and orange jam flavors. Proceeds from the sale of this wine go to animal shelter groups.",The Loyal Companion,Cru Vin Dogs
"On the plus side, the wine is exotic and different, with blueberry, herbal notes, juniper and roasted aromas. But in the mouth, it's lean to the point of being thin, with sharp acidity and tight red plum, pie cherry and herbal flavors. Short on the finish, with tang and scour.",Miros de Ribera Crianza,Bodegas Peñafiel
"Fiery and pushy on the nose, with pine and sharp cherry aromas. Comes across both lean and tight as well as oaky, with wood tannins present on the mouthfeel and oak driven into the core red berry flavors. Despite being crisp it's chocolaty tasting on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"For $12 or less you get a fruity, clean wine, with berry, cherry and spice flavors. It's easy to drink with pizza, burgers and similar fare.",,Tractor Shed Red
"Savory scents of smoke and roasted nuts lend an uncharacteristic earthiness to sweet lemon and orange blossom notes on Standing Stone's Gewürztraminer. Quite lush on the palate with a slightly viscous slick; lemony acidity adds a nice, steely bite to the finish.",,Standing Stone
"Made from organically farmed fruit, this fresh Sicilian red is appropriate for informal occasions or stay-home TV dinners. It shows bright berry fruit and bitter almond.",,TerrAmore
Haermosa is made with organically-farmed fruit. It shows milky notes of peach yogurt and white chocolate. But it also shows zesty crispness on the close despite the thickness and fullness of the wine's overall texture.,Haermosa,Masseria del Feudo Grottarossa
"Simple and green, with mint, tobacco and cherry flavors. It's a sound, clean wine. Even though the fruit isn't exactly concentrated, it's an easy wine to drink at parties.",Proprietor's Reserve,Glen Ellen
"Thick and heavy in texture, with rather sweet, candied blackberry, cherry and cola flavors. Drink now.",,First Press
"This Contra Costa-grown SB, fermented entirely in stainless steel, has grassy and flinty aromas and flavors but could use a little more oomph in its middle.",,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"The wine has a bitter edge with a burnt character that clashes with the red fruit and banana flavors. Maybe better in a few months, but by then, of course, it will have been drunk.",Nouveau,Albert Bichot
"Made from undisclosed grape varieties, this wine is simple and candied. It tastes like red cherry jam, spread on buttered white toast and sprinkled with brown sugar and cinnamon.",Secret Blend,Amberhill
"Redolent of sweet plum compote, this semidry Missouri rosé made from native Catawba grapes is an interesting alternative for White Zin fans. Full bodied, with a slightly sugary palate, it finishes with a hint of that foxy Catawba musk. Drink now.",Pink Fox Foxy Sweet,Les Bourgeois
"There's too much overripe fruit in this Zin, in the form of dried raisins. It's a fault, even though the taste isn't bad. The shriveled fruit yields bitter tannins from the grape skins.",Mischievous,Wild Coyote
"Raw and fresh, with jammy mulberry, blackberry and pepper flavors. A rustic wine for rustic food.",Proprietor's Reserve Old Vine,Glen Ellen
"Dark, deep purple in color, this Petite grown in Contra Costa is still quite closed and tight with no signs of opening anytime soon.",Reserve,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"Overripe and raisiny, with sweet, shriveled blackberry and oak flavors, leading to a hot finish. Drink now.",Zenith,Midnight
"Unabashedly bold, this Texas rosé hits the nose with a dose of lilac and rose perfume that lingers a bit obtrusively onto the palate. Off-dry in style, it's chunky on the palate, but finishes nicely, with a hint of tart red-plum flavors. Drink now.",Sophia Marie Sweet Beginnings,Messina Hof
"At the age of four-plus years, this bone dry Cabernet still is tannic and sharp, with green, unripe flavors of mint and peppercorn. It's classically structured, but not going anywhere.",,Rutherford Hill
"Terrale Oro is a simple, somewhat watered down expression of Nero d'Avola that would pair well with easy pasta dishes or take out pizza. Cherry, blueberry and almond flavors characterize the palate.",Terrale Oro,Calatrasi
"Pinched and hard, no two ways about it. The bouquet is herbal and rubbery, with blackened berry and plum aromas. Feels clampy, with hard tannins and herbal berry flavors. Leafy as it bangs and clangs its way along.",Los Lingues Gran Reserva,Casa Silva
"Subtly scented with orange rind and spice, this dry Michigan Riesling has pleasant apple and orange zest flavors accented by brisk black tea notes that leave a pronounced astringency on the palate. An easy-drinking choice from an up-and-coming wine region.",Dry,Chateau Grand Traverse
"A soft, open wine with only light tannins. The fruit is just as light, with strawberry and some spice. For drinking now.",Tinto,Finisterra
"Soft and simple, with sweet, easy cherry and strawberry jam flavors and a silky texture.",Selected Vineyards,Concannon
"Made from all five classic Bordeaux varieties, this wine is overripe. Although it's dry and the tannins are fine, it's dominated by raisiny flavors.",Mare Nectaris,Midnight
"Yellow in color, then fleshy and floral on the nose, with a hint of peach but also corn stalks. Feels full and clumsy, with sharp acidity and corny, cidery key flavors. Struggles to reach that next level.",Castell de Raimat,Raimat
"Sweet and simple, with dessert-wine flavors of pineapples, oranges and vanilla.",,Terlato
"Very tannic, without the necessary fruit to make it sing, this Sierra Foothills' Cab Franc has some pleasant spiciness to it that veers dangerously close to pepper land.",Estate,Naggiar
"Stalky and reedy smelling, with a touch of cherry and plum to the bouquet. There's not much to the palate other than mild citrus and red plum fruit, while the finish is little more than zesty. A fresh quaff.",Monte Clavijo,Criadores de Rioja
"Harsh and rustic, with jellied berry and red pepper flavors. Feels soft, simple and sweet. The blend is Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah.",Trinity,Eagle Castle
"From the celebrated Bricco Asili cru, this Barbaresco is a beautiful embodiment of elegance, grace, harmony and complexity. Fine aromas of small berry fruit, violets, cola, dark spice and fresh licorice root peel off layer after layer. The wine shows excellent structure, with tight, firm tannins and a bright touch of acidity on the long finish.",Bricco Asili Bricco Asili,Ceretto
"More than the tight and tannic 2005 Corliss Red, this Cabernet Sauvignon is immediately fragrant and open, with a mix of sweet fruit and sweet oak. Black cherry, cassis, subtle notes of lavender, and a foundation of wet stone are all nicely balanced and surprisingly elegant, given the relatively high (15.1%) alcohol. This wine seems now to be entering its prime time__t benefits from decanting, and will cellar well, but should probably be consumed within the next 2_8 years.",,Corliss Estates
"This Barolo from the La Serra vineyard in La Morra really hits all the right marks. The wine is rich, complex and enticing with aromas of cherry, mesquite, herbs, tar, earth and cassis. It's elegant and traditional with a bright tonic finish. What's really nice is that the wine is not too big. It's just right.",La Serra,Agostino Bosco
"Barolo Badarina is a soft, velvety wine with loads of spice, vanilla and clove. Those pleasurable aromas are woven between lively notes of fresh fruit and crushed mineral. The wine is supple, rich and opulent on the close. Cellar it five years or more.",Badarina,Grimaldi Bruna
"For years, Foxen has been producing one of the best Chenin Blancs in California, and with this 2009, they have outdone themselves. It's so rich in orange, honeydew and pineapple flavors, it might almost be Chardonnay, except it's drier and more minerally, and there's a wonderful note of dried herbs. Although production was only 575 cases, this wine is worth a special search, especially for sommeliers.",Ernesto Wickenden Vineyard Old Vines,Foxen
"Francesco Sobrero is an up and coming wine star in the Italian media. Indeed, this is a fascinating wine that offers a unique glimpse into Barolo typicity. This is a wine with a holistic approach: the spice and fruit notes are well integrated and the wine offers aged aromas of earth, leather and root beer. It's definitely worth a peek.",Ciabot Tanasio,Francesco Sobrero
"Cascina Adelaide always stands out in a crowd of Barolos thanks to the overall intensity of its Nebbiolo characteristics. Thanks to careful winemaking techniques, Preda takes that extra step: the fruit is brighter here and the spice notes are noticeably more piquant. You'll also taste fine mineral notes, violets and green olive.",Preda,Cascina Adelaide
"A Pinot Noir-dominated Champagne from 70-year-old vines, this is gorgeous, rich and concentrated. It has certainly benefitted from its aging before release. With a small production of 11,000 bottles, this is both serious and impressive.",Les Echansons Brut,Mailly Grand Cru
"This is a lovely, layered wine with unusual (but seductive) aromas of cassis, wild berry, violet, chopped mint, pine nut, iron, clove and savory black pepper. The finish is tight and dusty with finely textured tannins that fade after a long while. Drink after 2015.",Brunate,Marcarini
"This is a loaded wine, ripe with aromas of cherry cola, chopped herbs, white chocolate, blackberry and cassis. The aromatic presentation is never overpowering and the wine is in fact delicate and elegant with finely tuned finesse. Pair this Barolo with truffle-stuffed veal roast.",Brunate,Mario Marengo
". Christoph Neumeister's top wine, this is a classic among Sauvignon Blancs. It is tightly structured, very herbal, with greengage and gooseberry flavors over asparagus and spice. It can age well, needing 3_4 years to reach its peak.",Moarfeitl,Neumeister
"Oak aging (with 25% new French barrel) has helped shape sweet aromas of vanilla and exotic spice backed by loads of cherry and ripe forest berry. Characteristic aromas of violets, wet earth and graphite appear at the back and the wine is firm, thick and smooth on the close. Consider long cellar aging: 10 years or more.",Cottá,Sottimano
"Ugo Lequio offers one of the best expressions of Nebbiolo from the Gallina cru. His beautiful Barbaresco from Neive delivers impressive extraction and aromatic intensity. The wine is rich and opulent with aromas of spice, wild berry, red rose, licorice and a touch of white truffle. The mouthfeel is smooth, elegant and the finish is long.",Gallina,Ugo Lequio
"This special cru selection Barbaresco offers enormous intensity and persistency of flavor. This is a supremely elegant wine with ethereal aromas of cassis, tar, licorice and root beer. There's tannic structure and a fine texture here and the wine should age well for many more years.",Camp Gros Martinenga,Tenute Cisa Asinari dei Marchesi di Gresy
"Barolo Colonnello is a determined, confident wine with a rich, succulent style and ripe aromas of blackberry, spice, sweet vanilla and polished black stone. The chewy mouthfeel also shows a precise stylistic choice and __he colonel_ is richly opulent and enduring on the finish.",Colonnello,Poderi Aldo Conterno
"The Preda Sarmassa Barolo Riserva offers an interesting and immediate bouquet of cola, currants, dried mint, green olive and capers. This is a distinctive and special wine that would pair wonderfully against a meat dish with an herbal element. Try it with beef and mint jelly or herb-encrusted lamb chops.",Preda Sarmassa Riserva,Virna Borgogno
"Barolo Case Nere from La Morra opens with extremely dark and concentrated extraction followed by young oak-related aromas of spice, leather and tobacco. But, thanks to the bright fruit notes at the back__lueberry, cassis and pomegranate__hose toasted notes will fade further into the background as the wine evolves in time.",Case Nere,Enzo Boglietti
"Sassy spice and piquant touches of furniture wax, root beer, wild berries, licorice and white truffle open the nose of this vineyard-designate Barolo. In general, the spice aromas stand out most and the wine is squeaky-polished in the mouth. Drink after 2015.",Vigna Mandorlo,Giacosa Fratelli
"This is a lovely wine with a generous disposition and intense aromas of forest fruit, nutmeg, clove, anise seed and licorice. In the mouth, it boasts a broad, round feel with a long, velvety finish. Pair this wine with thin slices of grilled steak topped with porcini mushrooms.",,Gianfranco Alessandria
"Gianni Gagliardo's Barolo Serre is an impressively delicate wine with layers of wild berry, red rose, pressed violets, smoke and mineral. The mouthfeel is fresh, tannic, clean and very long lasting. This classic expression of Nebbiolo shows the best qualities of this noble Italian variety.",Serre,Gianni Gagliardo
"A soft and beautifully ripe Champagne, albeit with a steely, mineral core. It is very much in the Gosset pure, dry style, full of apple and grapefruit acidity to go with a light yeast character. Unlike some 2000s, this should age well.",Grand Millésime Brut,Gosset
"This is a lovely Barolo with oak-driven aromas of vanilla and sweet spice between delicate layers of rose, tar and wild berry. There's plenty of tasty pulp and substance backed by tight tannins that will undoubtedly relax with more time in the bottle. Cellar age this wine five to ten more years.",Ciabot Berton,Ciabot Berton
"Deep, a bit reduced on the nose, and full as can be, with blackberry, cassis and prune aromas. The palate is super rich and concentrated, and frankly a bit heady. Flavors of burnt brown sugar, toast, tobacco, pepper and baked berry fruits are delicious, and the finish is dense and long. Drinkable now but best in another two to four years. This marks the 20th anniversary of Concha y Toro's Don Melchor Cabernet.",Don Melchor,Concha y Toro
"The best of Belle Glos's 2008 Pinots. It's notable for the extreme richness of the raspberries and cherries, which have a jammy intensity with even more succulent notes of vanilla cream and smoky butter. But the finish is dry, while acidity and tannins bring the wine to earth. Delicious now and through 2014.",Taylor Lane Vineyard,Belle Glos
"There's something very fine and compelling about this Merlot-based Bordeaux blend. It's powerful in oak-inspired blackberry, black cherry and black currant flavors, but even more noteworthy is the quality of the tannin structure, which is firm and classic. Just feels rich and dramatic, with great weight and density. Give it a few years in the cellar to mellow, and it should develop for a decade or more.",Proprietary Red Wine,Alpha Omega
"Thanks to its plush and velvety nature, this is a wine with universal appeal. Barolo Bricco Sarmassa opens in big fashion with aromas of black cherry, Indian   spice, vanilla and dark espresso bean. It's tight and tannic in the mouth but, fundamentally, the wine's saving grace is that it's never too extracted or overblown.",Bricco Sarmassa,Brezza
"Always a rich nonvintage, this latest bottling doesn't disappoint expectations. It has a rich, biscuity character, hints of toast along with pure citrus and fresh apricots. It is ripe, generous, to be drunk with food.",Special Cuvée Brut,Bollinger
"Dark, bold, potent and young are just a few words to describe this Cabernet, which contains a splash of Petit Verdot and Malbec. Shows concentrated blackberry, black currant and violet flavors that turn sweet and chocolaty on the finish, although the wine itself is perfectly dry. Quite tannic, which suggests ageability, although high alcohol of 15.5% will be controversial in some circles. Best after 2013, in a proper cellar.",Georges de Latour Private Reserve,Beaulieu Vineyard
"Boroli is a young and dynamic winery to watch. This Barolo from the gorgeous Cerequio cru is ripe with traditional aromas of wild berry, leather, soft spice and white truffle. Extra character is added by slightly oddball aromas of carrot and smoked ham that work overall to the wine's favor. Drink after 2015.",Cerequio,Boroli
"The beautiful Brunate cru is known for heavier, darker expressions of Nebbiolo and this wine does a wonderful job of showing off its territorial traits. Aromas here include coffee, hazelnut, wild berries, tar, leather and exotic spice. It's balanced and firm and will surely evolve favorably over the next decade.",Brunate,Damilano
"Nero d'Avola is enhanced by 10% Perricone (a second native red grape of Sicily) to produce a simple, easy-drinking pizza wine that is redolent of clove, dark berry, asphalt and dill weed.",Castello Svevo,Azienda Agricola Milazzo
"A difficult Zinfandel, harsh and scoury in the mouth, with mint, raspberry jelly and black pepper flavors.",,Goats Trail
"Moscato aromas leap from the glass, taking the form of shampoo, lychee and jasmine. Feels light but choppy, with dilute lychee and green melon flavors. Not too sticky or cloying.",Opera Prima Sweet White,J. Garcia Carrion
"Big, jumbled and foxy, with forced berry aromas. Feels full and bulky, with roasted, herbal flavors that suggest cherry and cassis. Mildly astringent and chalky feeling on the finish.",Reserva,Sundance
This vintage of Cadetto (a pure expression of Nero d'Avola from Sicily) shows distant signs of volatility with apple skin and bright berry aromas.,Cadetto,Tenuta Barone Nicolò La Lumia
"The flavors of this rugged wine are extracted and sweet in berry jam, raisins, pepper and oak.",,Leese-Fitch
"Slightly vegetal on the nose and palate, with hints of green peppers, this dry Riesling gains freshness on the palate with tart apple-skin flavors accented by hints of black pepper spice.",Dry,Brotherhood
"Grillo Parlante (__alking cricket_) is a pure expression of Grillo with slightly oxidized aromas of butterscotch and caramel. Fresh fruit comes through as melon, apricot and candied lemon.",Grillo Parlante,Fondo Antico
"This all-Sicilian Syrah opens with smoky or burnt aromas of asphalt and toasted nut. There is some distant red fruit in the background, along with tangy citrus and dill.",,Di Giovanna
"Baked and raisiny smelling, with kirsch. In a word, it's stewy. Ditto for the mouthfeel, which is chunky and heavy. Features thick black plum, herb and carob flavors and feels beefy on the finish.",Monte Real Crianza,Bodegas Riojanas
"Stick to the Andes, guys. Terranoble's CA1 Andes Carmenère is better than this condensed, oaky coastal specimen with outsized acidity. Aromas of oak-based lemon rind and spice blend with graphite, tea and herbs. Dark flavors don't do so well with blazing acids; too much mixing and matching.",CA2 Costa,TerraNoble
"Tough in tannins and bone dry, this Merlot's raisin and blackberry fruit simply isn't strong enough to stand up to the astringency.",North Peyton Block,Parkers Estate
"A simple, thin wine, with vegetable aromas and flavors that warm up a little in the glass to turn into sweet cherries.",Oso Malo,Alta
"Not much going on in this dry, unripe wine. It's vegetal, with thin, acidic flavors of berries and spices.",,Wilson Daniels
Simple and sugary sweet with pineapple and mango fruit.,Secret Blend,Amberhill
"Gerbino is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Nero d'Avola and Syrah that offers an awkward bouquet of red fruit, bitter almond and tangy dill. A charred burnt note also appears on the close.",Gerbino,Di Giovanna
"Dry and gritty, with rugged tannins and lots of acidity. Unfortunately, the fruit just isn't powerful enough to stand up to it, making this Merlot tough to like.",Selected Vineyards,Concannon
"Fresh apple and lemon on the palate of this Lake Erie Riesling are pleasant, but overwhelmed by oddly perfumed lemon-pine and floral notes. Simple and a bit savory. Drink now.",,Mazza Chautauqua Cellars
"Herbal, spicy and rubbery smelling, with mulchy berry aromas. Feels soft, creamy and confected, with more milk chocolate and vanilla flavor than legitimate fruit. Sweet and soft on the finish.",Gold Reserve,P.K.N.T.
"Hot and fiery up front, with raspberry and leather on the nose. Feels astringent, with tomatoey acidity and pointed cherry flavors that come with an herbal, peppery aftertaste. Has an aggressiveness to it.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Entropy only made 30 cases of this SB, sourced from the Blanches Vineyard in Livermore Valley. It's a tad thin, made in the grassy style of the variety.",,Entropy Cellars
"Way too ripe, with raisiny, porty aromas and flavors that turn bitter on the finish.",,Madrigal
"Surprisingly unripe for an Amador County Zinfandel. Smells like dried twigs, turns obscure and heavy in the mouth, with sweet cherry pie and prune flavors, framed in hard, green tannins.",The Messenger Old Vine,Ministry of the Vinterior
"The light bouquet offers faint notes of toasted red apple, while in the mouth this flabby wine exhibits notes of mealy flesh accented with soft spice.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"Heavy and dull, with extracted raspberry jam flavors.",Effort,Center of Effort
"Way too ripe, with raisined flavors, including raisin-skin bitterness and alcholic heat on the finish. The dominant variety is Sangiovese.",Capriccio Italien,Midnight
"Made from organically-grown fruit, this wine opens with muddled aromas of cherry fruit and dillweed. Chalky, earthy tones appear on the close.",,Poggionotte
"Muted on the nose and palate, with dusty notes of mealy apples, this full-bodied, dry blend of Cab Franc and Malbec finishes with just a whisper of dried cherry and strawberry flavors. Drink now.",Topiary,Boxwood
"Barbera can be made well, but this one isn't even particularly Barbera-esque. It's soft, acidic and sweetly simple, with jammy flavors that are overripe and pruny.",,Eagle Castle
"An unbalanced wine, with harsh tannins and some overripe, pruny flavors. Oddly enough, there also are underripe, green notes.",Warnecke Ranch,Ancient Oak Cellars
"This is 100% Cabernet Sauvignon from an all-star collection of Walla Walla vineyards. It shows excellent structure and depth, with plenty of herbal character. The black fruits are abundant, spicy and sharp; this is a young wine from a great vintage than needs more bottle age. The layering, though still tight and compact, suggests that with cellaring this will evolve into Bordeaux-like complexity, with a mix of herb, mineral, leaf and berry flavors. The barrel flavors (40% new) are subtle and elegant.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"A firm and closed wine, packed with quince, pear, spice held in a mineral structure. It is potentially rich, but is still closed, needing several months to broaden out in all its richness.",Berg Reserve,Markus Huber
"Here's a sophisticated and austere Barbaresco from the excellent 2007 vintage with an attractive garnet color backed by aromas of spice, mesquite, cedar and black fruit. The oak element is still overt, so give this wine five years of cellar aging. That wonderful intensity and acidity will ensure that it ages gracefully.",Sorì Sartù,Massimo Penna
"The quality and persistency of the fruit is impressive. This Riserva Barolo is extremely generous in terms of its cherry, blackberry, cola and exotic spice aromas. The wine sports fine texture and smooth flavors of plum and leather on the close.",Vigna Rionda Riserva,Massolino
"This gorgeous Barbaresco from the celebrated Bric Balin cru opens with natural heft and opulent layers of cherry, vanilla, wild berry, spice, old leather, chocolate and smoke. The wine's consistency is on the dark, heavy side and the feeling it imparts on the palate is one of richness and smoothness. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Bric Balin,Moccagatta
"So many great years in Champagne__ike 2002__ive the most wonderful complexity to the wines. This rosé is no exception, very crisp, shot through with acidity, with delicious mulberry and cherry flavors, just a hint of grilled nuts. It could well age for many years.",Grand Vintage Rosé Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Here's a big and brawny Barbaresco with loads of intensity and fruity pulp (as demonstrated by the wine's dark appearance). The wine moves thickly over the palate, imparting perfumed tones of church incense and wild berries along the way. It also offers tart, firm tannins and promises a long aging future ahead. Drink after 2015.",Palazzina,Montaribaldi
"Fratelli Alessandria's flagship Barolo opens with pretty spice nuances followed by cherry, blueberry and loads of buoyant fruit. This is a happy, cheerful wine with a vertical lift and tonic notes of eucalyptus and root beer. The tannins are drying and fine. Drink after 2018.",Monvigliero,Fratelli Alessandria
"This Barolo enjoys broad appeal thanks to its forthcoming bouquet of ripe forest fruit, chocolate and espresso bean. The wine offers loads of exotic spice, leather, tobacco and chewy tar. In the mouth, it is much more elegant and compact than you'd expect.",Prapò,Schiavenza
"San Pietro is a beautifully perfumed Barolo with delicate tones of blue flowers, violets, licorice, crushed mineral, cola and forest berry. The floral nuances transfer to the mouth, adding to the wine's overall persistency and complexity. Hold five more years.",San Pietro,Tenuta Rocca
"This edition of the prized Cerequio Barolo by Michele Chiarlo flaunts its own unique personality with immediate aromas of white cherry, red apple, tar, licorice powder and root beer. It's a polished, squeaky- clean wine with a long finish that seems more buoyant and vertical compared to past vintages.",Cerequio,Michele Chiarlo
"Loaded with fresh oak tones (that will integrate as the wine evolves in time), this is a modern Barolo with good pulp and loads of aromatic intensity. Mesquite wood, vanilla, spice and black fruit set the stage. The wine is ripe with density and structure and will easily age 10 years plus.",Vigna Gancia,Mauro Molino
"A beautiful wine that sings out with its delicious fruits and tight, mineral structure. It has a purity of line, citrus and apple flavors vying with spice. The wine finishes with high, vibrant acidity.",Berg Reserve,Markus Huber
"This is a gorgeous Barolo with a full and elegant personality backed by big berry notes, spice, cherry, pressed violets and cola. The finish is long and extremely well balanced on a solid base of tannin and natural acidity. Drink this beauty after 2015.",Terlo Ravera,Marziano Abbona
"From young vintner Giovanni Abrigo in the Treiso area, this is a lovely expression of Barbaresco with immediate aromas of cherry, cassis, spice, smoke, leather and tobacco. The wine is approachable now, but it's also built to last: natural concentration, bright fruit flavors and acidity will hold ten years or more.",Rongalio Meruzzano,Orlando Abrigo
"This beautifully pristine Barolo opens with ethereal notes of wild berries, exotic spice, leather, tobacco and tar. The wine offers a complex aromatic embroidery with an elegant and fine texture in the mouth and slowly evolving tannins. Hold this wine five to 10 years.",Rocche dell'Annunziata,Rocche Costamagna
"Le Vigne is an evolved and elegant wine with dark fruit backed by smoke, spice and toasted nut. It's a full, ripe, plump and linear wine with a dense, succulent close and sophisticated accents of mineral and cola on the long, long finish. Overall, this Barolo is beautiful and special.",Le Vigne,Luciano Sandrone
"Here's a Barolo with a sense of humor: the whimsically named Big d'Big does indeed offer big and bold aromas of red fruit, spice, plum with elegant tones of licorice and cola. The wine ends with sweet fruit flavors and smooth tannins. Very nice.",Big d'Big,Podere Rocche dei Manzoni
"Corsini is a thickly extracted and velvety Barolo that opens with a deep dark color and confident aromas of Indian spice, cigar box, leather, blackberry, maraschino cherry and plum. The solid but astringent mouthfeel reveals that this wine still needs more time to age.",Corsini,Podere Ruggeri Corsini
"A very nice Chardonnay that offers enough richness to justify the price, yet retains an elegant restraint that won't overpower food. Dry, creamy and brisk, it shows pineapple tart, ripe white peach, buttered toast and vanilla flavors, with a mouthwatering minerality. Production was 800 cases.",,Petroni
"Here's a bold and modern Nebbiolo from the San Cristoforo cru with a rich, extracted appearance followed by intense aromas of ripe cherry, spice, black licorice, slate roof and dried tobacco leaf. The tannins are dusty and drying but give excellent structure to the wine's overall richness and opulence.",Vigna San Cristoforo,Pietro Rinaldi
"Massara is textbook Barolo with elegant and ethereal layers of wild berry fruit, underbrush, hazelnut, cola, tar and licorice. The finish is characterized by bright acidity and fine, polished tannins. Pair this wine with any dish that includes wild mushrooms or truffles.",Massara,Castello di Verduno
"After a few down years and a couple of winemaker changes, Domus Aurea is back in fine form. The nose is heady, leathery and powerful, while the palate is compact, bullish and tannic. Tastes fabulous with its dynamic mix of brawny berry, tobacco, toast and leather. A Maipo Valley gem with length and complexity. Drink now through 2014.",,Domus Aurea
"Don't reject this Syrah, Petite Sirah and Cabernet blend because it's non-vintage. So are many great Champagnes. Made from the 2006 and 2007 vintages, it's absolutely delicious, so stuffed with blackberry, black currant and bacon flavors, you can't help but be impressed. It's also very young and fresh in acids and tannins, so give it a year or two in order to knit together.",Annaté II,Falcone
"Barolo Rocche scored considerably higher than Aurelio Settimo's base Barolo this year and would make a wonderful addition to your cellar. This is a gorgeous wine with impressive intensity and penetrating aromas of balsam, chopped mint, forest berry, underbrush and white mushroom. It's elegant and compact in the mouth with a long, firm finish.",Rocche,Aurelio Settimo
"This is a very impressive Riserva that shows personality and longevity. Tar, asphalt and licorice notes are enhanced by delicate tones of balsam, cola and candied orange peel. In the mouth, this Barolo is a real charmer: the fullness and long persistency will win you over. Drink after 2015.",Monvigliero Riserva,Bel Colle
"This Riserva Barolo from the La Morra subzone opens with a surprisingly bright and concentrated color, followed by rich aromas of cherry, black fruit, exotic spice and smoke. There are dusty layers of crushed stone as well and the wine fades long with polished tannins.",Riserva,Fratelli Casetta
"Rich red fruits, wood spice and austere tannins have produced a wine that is intense and powerful. Layers of freshness and acidity moderate this dark concentration. Age for at least five years.",Point,Kollwentz
"Josetta Saffirio delivers an impressive portfolio of wines that show the fruits of careful work in the vineyard and the winery. This base Barolo from the Monforte d'Alba area opens with lush fruit tones of cherry, wild berries, cassis and spice. What sets this expression apart is the attractive contrast between the wine's juicy nose and its drying mouthfeel.",,Josetta Saffirio
"This is an impressive Barolo that offers a far-reaching bouquet of wild berries, toasted hazelnut, hummus, cola, ginger and blue flowers. In the mouth, you'll feel rich, ripe fruit and elongated, polished tannins. Hold this wine for five to ten more years.",Gabutti Bussia,Stroppiana
"A gloriously rich rosé that is full of ripe raspberries that burst in the mouth. It has a tight texture, balanced by a rounded feel. It is still young, of course, and the sweet finish needs time to integrate. Even so, relish the wine now, or wait 3_4 years.",Comtes de Champagne Rosé Brut,Taittinger
"Here's a dark, thick expression of Nebbiolo that is enhanced by modern touches of vanilla, espresso bean and sweet Christmas spice. There are background notes here of smoked ham, prune and earth and this beautiful wine radiates elegance and complexity. Pair it with gourmet Kobe beef.",Vigneto Rocche,Andrea Oberto
"Vigneto Brich Ronchi opens with bright and plump fruit tones that recall black currant, cherry and cassis followed by elegant tones of smoke, leather and tobacco. The wine is intense and powerful with a soft, velvety texture backed by structured tannins that give it backbone and staying power. Very nice. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Vigneto Brich Ronchi,Albino Rocca
"Brilliant wine, honey and intense acidity over the crispest lemon and spice flavors. From Chardonnay grown in the Tatschler vineyard, this is lively, fresh and sumptuous all at the same time.",Trockenbeerenauslese 375ml,Kollwentz
"This beautiful Riserva Barolo from the Josetta Saffirio winery opens with ripe aromas of blackberry and cassis syrup followed by nicely evolved tones of espresso, root beer, licorice and spice. The wine offers depth and personality with a very smooth, silky quality in the mouth.",Persiera Riserva,Josetta Saffirio
"Judith Beck's namesake wine is rich, opulent, piled high with ripe fruit and sweet, structured tannins. The wine has floral notes, chocolate and great complexity. For aging over 4_5 years.",Judith,Judith Beck
"This prestige cuvée from Mumm is maturing well, although still with many years' development left. It has a rich, toasty character, with fresh grapefruit and crisp greengages. Drink this opulent Champagne now, or keep for several years.",Cuvée R. Lalou Brut,G. H. Mumm
"Barolo Cerretta is a cheerful and friendly wine with defined aromas of cherry, wild berry, dusty mineral, bright spice, root beer and ground ginger. This wine is built to last and will age gracefully ten years or more.",Cerretta,Giovanni Rosso
"Here is a beautifully extracted and voluptuous Barolo from the Cannubi cru that would pair with tender veal shank, slow cooked until falling off the bone. Black cherry, spice, root beer and fragrant earthy tones all appear on the nose and the wine closes with tight, firm structure. Cellar age ten years or more.",Cannubi,E. Pira e Figli (Chiara Boschis)
"From iron-rich soils, this expression of Barolo offers elegant mineral tones and slate backed by plump aromas of blackberry, currant, cola, leather, spice and smoked cedar wood. There's also an attractive floral note at the back. The wine offers notably fine textured tannins, with a smooth and polished feel.",Bricco Rocche Prapó,Ceretto
"Richly textured, this Pinot comes from the Sebastopol area. In this cool vintage, it has a bright burst of acidity and is very dry, with intricate flavors of raspberries, cherries, pomegranates, licorice, sweet oak and lots of dusty spices. Now_2014.",Russian River,Conspire
"Deeply scented, a big, powerhouse Cabernet grown on the Rutherford bench. It's dense, chewy and meaty, showing blackberry jam, blueberry, chocolate and sweet smoky oak. The tannins are thick and furry, as befits such a young, ageable wine. Hold until 2013, and it should develop through 2019.",Tietjen Vineyard,Monticello Vineyards
"This wine would make a great impression on an elegantly dressed table with a fine meat-based menu. The wine's natural structure and freshness make it very food friendly and its elegant aromas of cassis, small berry, cola and white truffle will evolve beautifully throughout your meal.",Gaiun Martinenga,Tenute Cisa Asinari dei Marchesi di Gresy
"As in past vintages, this is half DuBrul and half Meek vineyard fruit. It's a far cry from what most consumers would think of as Merlot__his is a stiff, tannic, muscular wine, with a deep earthiness that speaks of rich loam and ancient rock. It strikes me as more typical of Malbec. The tannins are firm and dense, and the fruits are black as coal and laced with tar and smoke.",,Stevens
"A beautiful Pinot Noir. So dry and elegant, so light and crisp in the mouth, and yet so complex. Continues a string of impressive wines from this remote vineyard. Shows mineral-inflected cherry, currant and cola flavors, in a full-bodied wine with great density and finish. Now_2016, at least.",Brosseau Vineyard,Testarossa
"With its distinctive flower bottle, this is an immediately recognizable Champagne, both in its looks and its distinctive Perrier-Jouët elegance. Lively white fruits play with acidity and a tangy backbone of apple skins. Age this for 4_5 years and maybe more.",Fleur de Champagne Brut,Perrier Jouët
"This wine is on the dry side of Brut. It is rich, at the same time crisp with a delicious creamed pear and apple flavor, lifted even further by pineapple acidity. Congratulations to Philipponnat for indicating disgorgement date and even the dosage on the back label.",Grand Brut Blanc,Philipponnat
"New oak stands out in toast and caramelized wood sweetness on this Cab, overshining to some degree the underlying blackberry, cherry and black currant fruit. It's quite a fashionable, delectable young wine, and will probably be consumed too early by many people who buy it, but it's really a cellar candidate. Made with a few drops of Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc, it should develop for 12_15 years.",,Rubicon Estate
"Pale pink in color, this is stylish rosé. It has the intense acidity of the 1996 vintage, meaning that it still tastes young, crisp, vibrant. The only suggestion that this is 14 years old is in the slight toastiness. But it should go on for many more years.",Dom Ruinart Brut Rosé,Ruinart
"This Barolo from the Cannubi vineyard opens with a delicate aromatic embroidery of vanilla, forest berry, cola, spice and licorice. The texture here is tight, fine and very silky and those characteristic Nebbiolo flavors last a long time on the finish. You could save this wine five to 10 more years and pair it with slow-cooked duck confit.",Vigneto Cannubi,Comm. G. B. Burlotto
"Here's a generous, opulent Barbaresco Riserva with aromas of black cherry and soft vanilla. The wine is not overdone, but elegant: You'll detect soft hints of coffee and roasted almond as well and the tannins are tight and firm on the close.",Basarin Riserva,Adriano Marco & Vittorio
"This Barolo with the vocally challenging name Pichemej reveals a dark and moody side that is reinforced by aromas of black fruit, plum, pressed rose, tar and asphalt. There's a textured, earthy quality here followed by firmly drying tannins. Pair this wine with tender beef ribs.",Pichemej,Gian Piero Marrone
"A very focused wine with a core of strong structure along with apple, tight acidity and citrus. This is powerful, intense, with impressive aging potential.",Singerriedel Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"Compared to the estate's S. Caterina expression of Barolo, the Lazzairasco cru delivers higher intensity in terms of its spice and vanilla tones. The wine is young, well structured, lively and fresh with a very elegant mouthfeel.",Vigna Lazzairasco,Guido Porro
"One of the driest Viogniers in California, and also one of the most elegant. Doesn't explode with exotic richness the way some Viogniers do, but it's a very fine white wine, noble and minerally, with nuances of tropical and citrus fruits. Really opens up a whole new direction for Viognier.",,Jorian Hill
"Firm and structured, packed with ripe berry fruits, a touch of pepper and firm, solid tannins. The delicious fruit is sustained by acidity, and a dry, elegant structure.",Altenberg,Judith Beck
"Here's an evolved and sophisticated Barolo Riserva with savory aromas of crushed black pepper, balsam, humus, old spice, licorice and root beer. The wine is drying and streamlined in the mouth, and the long finish is accented by lively fruit flavors.",Pernanno Riserva,Francesco Sobrero
"Just approaching toasty maturity, this is a rich and full wine, its white fruits and perfumes floating above yeast, cookie and pine nut flavors. It has a great mouthfeel, a tingling character, acidity and richness in harmony.",Brut Saphir 1.5 liters,Louis Barthélémy
"With a fine sense of maturity, this is rich, toasty, full-bodied and concentrated. It is a Champagne with weight, showing pink grapefruit, melon and green plum flavors inside an intense texture. At the end, acidity combines with a fine toasty flourish.",Grande Réserve Grand Cru Brut,Lallier
"There's lots of new French oak on this Cabernet, but the underlying wine is powerful enough to take it. Shows rich, gentle tannins and fine acidity framing complex, flavorful cherry, blackberry and raspberry fruit. The near-perfect balance suggests cellaring for a decade or longer, although the wine is pretty enough to drink   now.",,Slaughterhouse Cellars
"Sweet and simple, with pineapple and apricot jam flavors.",Proprietor's Reserve,Glen Ellen
"Grassy and green on the nose, and then lean, light and crisp in the mouth. Tastes brambly and herbal, with a thin finish. O.K. but not really rewarding.",Roble,La Mano
"A superspicy Zin, marked by a blast of black pepper, clove and anise. The flavors are extracted and sweet to the point of appearing overripe, with blackberries and prunes leading to a tannic, bitter finish. Drink now.",Pagnano Vineyard,Ancient Oak Cellars
"With overripe raisin and prune flavors, this Cabernet is almost like a Port, except that it's dry. The official alcohol level is 13.9% by volume, but it tastes hotter and headier than that.",Limited Production,Magistrate
"Harsh and pruny, with overripe flavors that are like Port, except the wine is dry. Wildly over-priced for the quality.",,Eagle Castle
"Made with undisclosed grape varieties, this rustic, softly sweet wine has apricot, honey and herb flavors.",Angel Food,Cupcake
"A rare, maybe unique, blend of Arinto and Sauvignon Blanc, which imparts a curiously mineral character. The fresh character of both grape varieties seem lost in the rounded character of the wine.",Casa de Santar Terras do Dão,Dão Sul
"This is a silly name, and it's not a very good wine. Acids and tannins dominate, making it astringent and bitter, and the cherry fruit is thin and rather overripe.",Poggio Alla Pietra Brunello di Sonoma Estate Grown,Petroni
"The mouthfeel on this Merlot is all wrong. It's harsh and jagged in tannins, and raspingly dry. And the fruit is lacking. A real disappointment.",,Markham
"Subdued florals and apple scents have a slightly dusty, chemical edge on the nose of Mazza's Reserve Pinot Grigio. Slight in body but it finishes briskly on the palate. Drink now.",Reserve,Mazza Chautauqua Cellars
"Feels harsh and sharp in the mouth, with cherry-berry flavors. Pretty rustic drinking, with a bitter finish.",Prankster,Wild Coyote
"Gritty cherry and plum aromas lead into a sheer, high-acid palate with citric burn and tart flavors of raspberry and plum skins. Finishes with limited flavor and leftover acid.",Cantos de Valpiedra,Finca Valpiedra
"Made from organically-farmed fruit, this Sicilian expression of Cabernet Franc is heavily marked by sour aromas of green vegetables and chopped dill.",,Di Giovanna
"Stalky smelling, with a minerally streak. Feels tangy and lean, with lemon, sour apple and white currant flavors. Short on the finish.",Serres,Carlos Serres
"A big, thick, somewhat dull wine, with candied fruit and sweet cherry cough-medicine flavors.",,Hideaway Creek
"Smells raisiny, feels hot, tastes overripe.",Imagine Reserve,Hunt Cellars
"Unusual aromas of creamed corn and exotic notes are too unfamiliar to register properly. It's thick but not entirely cloying, with powdered sugar and dried mango flavors. Weird stuff that probably won't find too many takers.",Viña Albina Semi Dulce,Bodegas Riojanas
"Powdery and oaky smelling, with not much fruit to get excited about. Feels soft and mushy, with banana, pear and resiny vanilla flavors. Feels resiny on the finish, too.",,Vega Sindoa
"Bottled for the World Market Cost Plus chain, this Cabernet is harsh, dry and simple, with watery flavors.",,Foodies
"Hits heavy with the olive and burnt rubber aromas, then turns ultrazesty and citric in the mouth. Tastes tangy and herbal, with tomato and sour plum flavors. A raw, tart wine.",,Root:1
"A curious sauerkraut perfume leads to a hard edged wine, the wood not in balance with the fruit. It is raw and not completely clean. Two bottles tasted.",,Quinta do Pinto
"Strained from front to back. The nose smells pickled and funky, while the palate is boring in feel and tastes candied but also a lot like brine or caper juice. Sweet on the finish.",Sweet Chardonnay-Moscato,Torito Bravo
"Even in a flight of top BAs and TBAs, this one stood out. It's hugely sweet and viscous, yet also has amazingly fresh acids that really prolong the finish and promise decades__f not centuries__f cellaring. Golden raisin and dried apricot notes are true to type, and the wine's balance is impeccable.",Trockenbeerenauslese,Schloss Johannisberger
"So delicious now, you can hardly keep your hands off it. Blackberry tart, ripe blueberry, cassis, milk chocolate, licorice and sweet, smoky cedar flavors flood the mouth, dramatically huge and memorable, and lasting long into the finish. The tannins are obvious, but sweetly ripe and soft. A brilliant evocation of Napa Cabernet, despite a high production level of nearly 30,000 cases, which is about the same size as a Bordeaux first growth. Shows the class and potency this bottling has exhibited for many years, and believe it or not, the price is a relative bargain these days. Drink now_2020.",Special Selection,Caymus
"Hugely sweet yet reasonably balanced given its enormous concentration, this is a tremendous example of the quality heights sweet Riesling can achieve. Golden raisin, dried apricots and candied pineapple all swirl together in a delicious haze of sugar-coma-inducing syrup that nevertheless goes down easily. Will age easily for decades.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Trockenbeerenauslese,Robert Weil
"This eiswein is supersweet, yet remains decently balanced, thanks to a laser beam of bright acidity. After an initial hint of volatility, the flavors of preserved citrus and stone fruits are almost painful in their intensity, so sip it in small doses and savor the nearly endless finish.",Bernkasteler Johannisbrünnchen Eiswein,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"A wonderfully drinkable beerenauslese, which makes it a serious accomplishment__ometimes these wines can just be too much. This one balances its intense dried apricot and golden raisin notes with tropical and citrus fruit and lively acidity.",Hochheimer Domdechaney Beerenauslese,Domdechant Werner
"Wow, this is a glorious bottle of Pinot Noir. It was designed to celebrate the winery's 10th vintage (hence the name, Dix) and is a barrel selection of Maresh Vineyard grapes. Textural, lush, smooth, supple and utterly delicious, its red and black fruits are dappled with dusty spices, dusted with coffee grounds, and glide into a silky finish. Yummy beyond words.",Dix,Scott Paul
"Von Schubert bottled two eisweins from the Herrenberg in 2009. This one is pale in color, with intense pineapple and honey flavors. The wine is sweet, luscious and viscous yet never cloying, with a long finish that features unfolding layers of fruit flavor.",Herrenberg Eiswein,Maximin Grünhäuser
"A superb wine, the product of a great vineyard site and old vines. The wine is concentrated, very rich, beautifully balanced between considerable acidity and sweet white fruits and mandarin oranges. With its tense, edgy texture, it is a wine that will age for many years.",Zöbinger Heiligenstein Erste Lage Alte Reben Reserve,Bründlmayer
"This lesser-known vineyard is the source of at least two stupendous eisweins in 2009. This one features demerara syrup and ripe peaches imbued with an incredibly lush texture, yet balanced by bright acids and a slightly briny quality on the finish.",Bernkasteler Johannisbrünnchen Eiswein,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"This remarkable Cabernet was grown and produced by a longtime Mexican-American immigrant. It is an extraordinary wine, rich and full-bodied, explosive in sweetly ripe blackberries, cherries and black currants, yet given firmness by a firm minerality that must come from the soil. Defines André Tchelistcheff's description of Stags Leap Cabernets as an iron fist in a velvet glove. Drink now_2020.",,Renteria
"The scents of dried apricot and honey are made even more captivating by intriguing hints of musky spice. This is viscous, luscious and complex, with bergamot notes that lend another exotic element. Long and mouthwatering on the finish.",Jungfer Auslese,Prinz
"A terrific wine, smooth, complex and ageworthy. Mainly Cabernet Sauvignon from Diamond Mountain, it shows mountain intensity of fruit, with a molten core of blackberries and black currants. The tannins are bigtime, yet smooth and refined in the modern style, and the finish is elaborate in fruits and spices. A monument to what this fine winery can achieve at the top level. Hold until 2015, after which it should provide great drinking for additional years.",Synthesis,Martin Ray
"Showing the art of blending, this small-production Pinot was made from the fruit of six vineyards. It is an exceptional expression of the Sonoma Coast, being translucent in color, dry, silky and crisp in acids. The flavors are complex and delicious, with berries, cherries and persimmons conjoined with mushrooms, spices and new oak. Lovely now, and should develop interestingly over the next 6_8 years.",Akiko's Cuvée,Freeman
"One of the palest icewines to come across our tasting table, this is an extraordinarily fine example, with great purity of fruit and incredible balance. Tangerine and pineapple flavors shine with pristine clarity from start to finish, making it very drinkable.",Serrig Schloss Saarsteiner Eiswein,Schloss Saarstein
"Sweet and viscous, this ratchets up the level of sugar and concentration beyond that of Weil's 2009 auslesen. Dried apricots rule, but nuances of musky spice and candied pineapple play supporting roles. Unctuous enough to pair with dessert if need be, but better on its own, or perhaps with aged hard cheeses.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Beerenauslese,Robert Weil
"Terrific, from its nearly indefinable aromas akin to Cloud Ear fungus to its intensely sweet yet racy palate. Dried apricot, peach and pineapple flavors give it substance without excessive weight, finishing long and intense. Drink now_2030.",Kiedrich Turmberg Auslese,Robert Weil
"From vines trained on the lyre system, here is one of the classics of Austrian wine. Its richness and concentration are present from the first taste. As the wine opens, it brings out perfumes and intense fruit flavors. A great wine that needs long-term aging.",Zöbinger Heiligenstein Erste Lage Lyra Reserve,Bründlmayer
"A joy to drink. It's so ripely exuberant in fruit, explosive in wild berry, dried red currant, licorice, cocoa and dusty spice flavors that sink deep into the palate and last forever on the finish. Yet it's dry, and the structure is entirely elegant. The two vineyards that are source to this wine are old and dry-farmed. A very great Dry Creek Valley Zinfandel, a real classic. Drink now_2015.",Cortina,Seghesio
"The vineyard is severely vintage-dependent, with some years much better than others, but the superbly generous 2007 harvest has resulted in this delicious mountain wine. It's perfectly ripe, offering an array of blackberries, cherries and currants wrapped into beautifully mature tannins and grounded with a firm minerality. Defines the elegant concentration of a high Mayacamas Mountain Cabernet. Drink now and over the next 10 years, at least.",55% Slope,Hidden Ridge
"Tense, dry wine that brings out all the minerality of the Käferberg Vineyard. This is an impressive, ageworthy wine, dominated at this stage by citrus and green apple flavors. Likely to age over many years with its structure intact.",Käferberg Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Extraordinarily delicious. Earns its reserve citation for the sheer power and audacity of fruit. Masses of ripe raspberry and cherry tart, vanilla and cola flavors dazzle the palate. The all-important tannins are softly refined, and the acids are crisp. Designed to dazzle now, and does, but should gain traction and age in interesting ways over the next six years.",Reserve,Matrix
"Starts off a bit sweaty, then develops passion fruit and tangerine aromas. It's a medium-bodied auslese, sweet but balanced, with peach and apricot, ripe citrus and honey all coming together in lovely harmony. Delicious now, and should age well for 10_20 years.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,S.A. Prüm
"So unctuous and decadently sweet that this is one of those TBAs that's best taken in very small sips. Dried apricot, candied pear and caramelized pineapple flavors are concentrated and intense, lingering sweetly on the long finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Vat 59 Trockenbeerenauslese,S.A. Prüm
"Intensely rich wine that flows opulently. Rounded warm and concentrated, it has spice, pepper as well as pineapple and peach fruit. It is not sweet but the unctuous character makes it feel so. Needs at least five years in bottle.",Kammerner Lamm Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Spicy, fruity and extremely youthful, this complex wine brings black cherry and cassis flavors with subtle notes of cola, licorice, allspice, sandalwood and pine needle. Still quite tight and primary, it has been beautifully sculpted into a focused wine with a long life ahead.",Arcus Estate,Archery Summit
"This very limited, concrete-egg-fermented, and thoroughly splendid Pinot Gris is a good indication of the potential for PG in Oregon if the price limitations are lifted. Stunningly rich with citrus, lemon curd, ripe apple and light tropical fruits, this concentrated, deeply driven wine is both roundly full and amazingly dense. Certainly the best Oregon Pinot Gris in memory.",AB OVO,Archery Summit
"This is a frankly delicious young Cabernet, hailing from a small vineyard to showcase its qualities. It's deeply flavored in blackberries and currants, with the most delicious dark chocolate sweetness. Yet it also has the tannic backbone to last. It's one of those wines you can drink now, or age for at least six years to see what it can do.",Tomahawk,Chimney Rock
"Another fine 9-3-5 Cabernet from Hunnicutt. The numbers symbolize the proprietors' wedding date. It's a splendid wine, if a little too young. Toasty oak and tannins dominate, but way underneath is a vast, sweet network of blackberries and black currants. You can certainly decant it for a few hours and enjoy now, but this is a wine that should age seriously for a good 8, 10, 12 years. It's a blend of St. Helena, Rutherford and Oakville fruit.",2009/3/5,Hunnicutt
"One of the best Merlots of the vintage. Does what Merlot's supposed to do, flatter the palate with soft, voluptuous richness. Blackberry pie, red cherry, currant, licorice, mocha, bacon and pepper flavors flood the mouth, leading to a long, spicy finish. Defines the opulent, cult style of California Merlot.",Fortuna Vineyard,Turnbull
"This historic estate certainly excelled with sweet wines in 2009. This auslese is lusciously sweet yet lithe, its ripe stone fruit__pricot and peach__alanced by citrusy notes. Finishes long and clean, not cloying. Delicious now, but should easily be capable of aging for 20_30 years.",Auslese,Schloss Johannisberger
"All kinds of fantastic things swirl together in this complex, intricate Pinot Noir, but it's too young to touch for a while. The '09 vintage was a great one for Arista's Pinots, and this bottling is their best, a small-production blend of four vineyards. Purists will object that it's a little too forward in sweet fruit, but the raspberries and cherries have interesting cola and mushroom complexities that sing of the soil, while lots of new oak adds rich layers of toast. Beautiful, but needs 4_5 years to begin to come around.",Two Birds,Arista
"The top wine of Château du Cèdre is beautifully balanced, its chewy tannins given the right perspective by the impressively dark fruits. The wine is brooding, profound, concentrated and complex. Age for at least 6 years.",Le Cèdre,Château du Cèdre
"Perhaps a step behind Weil's other supersweet 2009s, this eiswein remains a prodigious effort. The candied pineapple and golden raisin notes are so intense, so concentrated that they're almost painful to taste, lingering virtually forever on the finish.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Eiswein,Robert Weil
"Masses of lemondrop candy, pineapple tart and mashed ripe pears in this marvelous wine, but that's not all. Buttered toast, crème brûlée, bananas sautéed in butter and brown sugar are some of the additional complexities. That makes the wine sound sweet, but it finishes dry. High in alcohol, but balanced, this flamboyant Chardonnay is best enjoyed now.",Hawk Hill Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Like all of the Schloss's noble sweet wines, this one isn't overblown, displaying ample sweetness but also zesty acidity. There's a slight greenish hint to the candied citrus and dried pineapple flavors, with a lemony streak on the finish that balances the sweetness impeccably. Should last for 40_50 years__ossibly more__n a cool cellar.",Serrig Schloss Saarsteiner Beerenauslese Goldkapsel,Schloss Saarstein
"A rich wine, very balanced with ripe peach flavors enlivened by acidity, orange zest and an edge of spice. The wine is lush while also mineral and will likely develop over the next 3_4 years. The aftertaste is gorgeous and very ripe.",Loiser Berg Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"A terrific auslese, sweet but balanced near perfectly by lime-like acids. It's stony yet honeyed, concentrated yet somehow light on its feet. Then it's bright, fresh and full of juicy citrus fruit on the finish.",_rziger Würzgarten Auslese,Dr. Loosen
"Lush and luscious, this is a standout among the 2009 Erath Pinots. The richness of the fruit gives this zaftig wine immense appeal, with deep cherry flavors streaked with gun metal, anise, mocha, and coffee. A lick of dark chocolate ensures a glorious finish.",Prince Hill,Erath
"This intense and determined Nebbiolo from the Martinenga cru of Barbaresco delivers enticing aromas of black fruit, smoke, tar, licorice and old spice. The wine is elegant and ethereal with a polished nature to its firm tannins capped by pleasantly piquant freshness on the finish.",Martinenga,Tenute Cisa Asinari dei Marchesi di Gresy
"This has been Riverbench's best Pinot and it still is. Shows the wonderful ability to be deliciously drinkable now, yet with the stuffing for the cellar. Dry and crisp and full-bodied, it shows berry, currants, mushroom, grilled meat and sandalwood flavors, dusted with Indian spices. Now_2015.",Mesa,Riverbench
"With its high percentage of Champagne's third grape, Pinot Meunier, as a result of the growing conditions of 2003, this is a great wine that is developing fast. It has more toast, less fruit, although its richness and weight are finely in balance with a yeasty cookie dough character.",Grand Vintage Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Nebbiolo, the grape, and Nubiola, the designate name, stem from the same Italian word: nebbia, or __og_ that regularly blankets the Langhe. This bright Barbaresco is defined by a distinctive aroma of tar or freshly applied street asphalt that is typical of the variety. Additional aromas include back fruit, prune and plum. The mouthfeel is streamlined, tight and elegant.",Nubiola,Pelissero
"A relative newcomer, Massimo Rattalino makes an impressive debut with this tasty Barbaresco. The wine is beautifully tonic with vibrant tones of rose, pressed flower, wild berries, almond skin, cinnamon and new leather. Those bright aromas are surrounded by drying graphite nuances, bright acidity and polished tannins.",Quarantadue42,Rattalino
"Classic Rutherford Cab. Dry, dusty and slightly herbal, with refined, jammy flavors of red and black cherries, currants, mocha and cedar. The alcohol is a little high, giving this 100% Cabernet a warm, full-bodied feel. The tannins suggest mid-term aging. 2013_2018.",Firehouse Vineyard,Piña
"Shows enormous complexity of flavor, a wine that really impresses for its myriad blackberry, cherry, currant, cola, grilled meat, sautéed mushroom, violet and chocolate flavors. If the structure were more firm, it would be a perfect wine. But this is Paso Robles, where the wines will always be soft. A blend of Syrah and Petite Sirah.",Syrée,Vina Robles
"Intense acidity, with the sweetness held in check by a bright, crisp character. Rich honey is balanced by an exquisite freshness, lightly perfumed, so clean and clear in final taste.",Eiswein 375ml,Zull
"With 14 years age, this Champagne shows plenty of beautifully mature fruit. At the same time, its petrol and toast aromas and flavors are balanced by soft richness, a rounded citric and pear flavor and a gentle, ripe aftertaste.",Carte d'Or Brut 1.5 liters,Drappier
"No winery in California has explored this French variety more than Cambiata, and with the '06, they've produced another interesting wine. It has weight and body and tannins, with wild black and red berry, currant, cherry liqueur, Provençal herb, tobacco and roasted meat flavors that finish with sweetness, although the wine is totally dry.",,Cambiata
"Although there's a lot of oak on this wine, it's not heavy or fat in the excessive California style, because the underlying wine is so crisp and elegant. Call it Chablisian. It shows mineral, Meyer lemon and lime flavors, with brilliant acidity. Really quite a fine Carneros Chardonnay.",,Etude
"Barolo Bricco delle Viole is a lush and generous wine with a bright ruby color and attractively intense aromas of cherry, wild berry, nutmeg, clove, powdered licorice and root beer. The oak influence is still obvious at this early stage, but will no doubt integrate with time. The mouthfeel is exceedingly soft, smooth and velvety. You don't need to wait too many years before uncorking this bottle.",Bricco delle Viole,G D Vajra
"Very different than the 2005 vintage, Barolo Le Coste from Giacomo Grimaldi opens with a brownish-amber color and ripe berry or candied fruit aromas. There are beautifully fine aromas of tar, asphalt and licorice in the background that help balance it out. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Le Coste,Giacomo Grimaldi
"There are some ripe notes here of black cherry and raspberry (2007 was a hot, dry vintage in Piedmont) but you'll also get territory-driven notes of wet earth and dried beef or bresaola. The mouthfeel is dry and firm thanks to the elegantly polished nature of the tannins.",Sorì Burdin,Fontanabianca
"Bernardot is a bold and plump expression of Barbaresco with soft, ripe tannins and expressive aromatic layers of cherry, plum, prune and new leather. The elegance and detailed nature of Nebbiolo shines through but the emphasis here is on opulence and richness overall.",Bricco Asili Bernardot,Ceretto
"Monsordo is an innovative concept and is a premier example of a modern, international wine with unmistakable roots in Piedmont. Fruit used here includes Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Nebbiolo and the overall effect it that of harmony and power. The wine is packed tight with red fruit, spice and tobacco and its texture is smooth, dense and rich. Very nice.",Monsordo,Ceretto
"Here's a hefty, big expression of Nebbiolo with thick spice notes and touches of vanilla and cinnamon that sit over a core of bright fruit. The wine offers a soft quality of tannin, followed by tart freshness, resulting in a pleasurable sensation of richness and opulence on the palate. Drink now until 2018.",Cascinotta,Angelo Negro & Figli
"Very young wine, one which is full and rich, but which needs several years to blossom into its full potential. It is in the dry Deutz style, emphasizing acidity and elegance, even though it also has a wonderful ripe intensity.",Rosé Brut,Deutz
"Here's a wine that begs a pairing with a truffle dish: black truffle Cornish hen or creamy risotto with white truffle flakes would do the trick. Cannubi San Lorenzo's aromas include spice, cherry, cola, white licorice, white mushroom and smoked ham. This is a beautiful wine with a firm, determined but elegant finish.",Cannubi San Lorenzo,Cavalier Bartolomeo
"Neirane is a balanced Barolo with soft notes of cherry, black fruit and spice wrapped tight around a solid core of quality fruit. The wine tastes tight and tannic at this young age (it makes your mouth pucker) but it's a very nice example of a beautifully made Nebbiolo.",Neirane,Agostino Bosco
"A rich wine, with delicious cream and apple flavors, lifted by fine acidity. It is opulent, packed with apricot and light honey character encased in a dry, mineral framework.",Millésime Grand Cru,Lallier
"The word inky must have been invented for this pure Cabernet Franc, sourced from the Weinbau vineyard (the label is misprinted). In the world of Cabernet Franc, many are called, and few are chosen. This is one of the chosen. Dense, tightly threaded with smoke, earth, black olive, black cherry, cassis and mocha scents and flavors, this nonetheless drinks smoothly. The tannin management is superb, softening up the hard edges without stripping the wine of flavor.",,Nefarious Cellars
"Very rich in texture while also balanced, this is a wine that shows extreme concentration__oney, yellow fruits and final sugar all wrapped in lively acidity.",Beerenauslese 375ml,Zull
"Sure this Barolo is slightly on the ripe side with mature fruit notes of strawberry and raspberry aromas. But it also offers elegance and complexity with supporting notes of coffee, espresso and spice. A long finish and drying tannins close the deal.",,Piazzo Armando
"This beautiful Bordeaux blend is based mostly on Cabernet Sauvignon. It's likeable now for the soft, refined texture and luscious flavors of tart cherry candy, accented with nearly half new oak. Shows real balance and flair, from a winery known for objective pricing. Now_2013.",,Provenance Vineyards
"Immediately appealing, this blend of 39% Cab Franc, 36% Cabernet Sauvignon, 16% Merlot, and 9% Petit Verdot really expands the midpalate, without sacrificing the overall muscularity and density that are the hallmarks of Stevens reds. The best 424 to date, this brings Petit Verdot into the blend for the first time, expanding the floral aromatics and deepening the tannins. Fruits are a complex mix of black cherry, blackberry and raisin, with licorice streaking into the finish.",424 Red Blend,Stevens
"Here's a very attractive and seductive Barolo with chiseled mineral tones that really help the wine stand out in a crowd. Layers of graphite and slate give purity, linearity and clarity to this austere and elegant expression. Earthy tones, as well as forest berry flavors, appear on the long finish.",Costa di Bussia,Tenuta Arnulfo
"Young and oaky now, with toast, vanilla and woodspice aromas and flavors that tend to dominate the underlying cherry, cranberry and raspberry fruit. Feels fat and sweetly opulent, with smooth, fine tannins. Should develop gradually over the next decade.",Perspective,Tres Sabores
"A wood-fermented wine (in 225 litre barrels), this is naturally a rich Champagne. With the added ripeness of 2003, this is big-hearted, glowing with yellow fruits, the lightest touch of wood and a generous, full and balanced aftertaste.",Cuvée 225 Brut,Nicolas Feuillatte
"Both crisp and rich, a magical combination with beautiful acidity, light currants, the whole wine infused with honey. The final acidity leaves a long-lasting aftertaste.",Eiswein 375ml,Norbert Bauer
"A helluva Cabernet. Extraordinarily rich and opulent in blackberries, currants and dark chocolate, with elaborate oak, yet completely dry, and given balance by firm, hard tannins and a fine cut of acidity. Really impressive now, after decanting, and should develop over the next six years, at the very least.",,Nice
"A selection of the best lots of the vintage, here sourced entirely from biodynamically-farmed blocks of the Maresh Vineyard in the Dundee Hills. Among the most Burgundian of all Oregon Pinots, this complex, cellar-ready wine shows ripe red and black fruits, old vine hints of dried leaves, light herb and autumnal profundity.",La Paulée,Scott Paul
"As chewy and umami, salty delicious as a mouthful of crunchy bacon. Throw in dried blackberries and blueberries, with a touch of smoky new oak, and that describes this fantastically pure, addictively good Zinfandel. The grape sourcing is from old vineyards in the Alexander and Dry Creek Valleys. Truly a great Zin, and relatively easy to find, with 9,000 cases produced.",Old Vine,Seghesio
"From the foothills of the Pyrenees mountains comes this perfumed, wood-aged wine. It has orange peel, toast and Earl Grey tea flavors, very textured and fresh. The wine brings great acidity to balance the more exotic fruit elements. Ideally age for 2_3 years.",Emotion,Château de Jurque
"Loosen's '09 auslese from the Sonnenuhr unleashes a cavalcade of ripe tropical fruit, ranging from pineapple and guava to carambola and lime. It's very sweet and isn't showing much more than fruit at this point in time, but it should develop additional complexity with cellaring.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,Dr. Loosen
"Absolutely delicious, offering a flood of ripe, sweet blackberry, blueberry, currant, chocolate, anise and spice flavors. Impressive for its savory power, this blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petite Verdot will easily ride out the next 8_10 years.",Elevage,Chimney Rock
"A beauty__oft, round, bursting with cherry and raspberry fruit, blood orange, bracing acids and satiny tannins. Succulent and mouthfilling, with following notes of light chocolate, coffee and a streak of gun metal.",Looney Vineyard,Archery Summit
"Tapiz's best wine to date, and the first one to shoot higher than the basic or reserve level. Aromas of fresh balsam wood, ripe blackberry and cola are clean and deep. Feels just right, with rich, rewarding flavors of molten berry, chocolate and coffee. Finishes warm, toasty and with focus. Has it all; drink now through 2015.",Selección de Barricas Reserva,Tapiz
"A blend of Duras and Braucol, grapes local to Gaillac, this wine is named after the spirit (Ame) of wine. Showing the potential of red Gaillac, this is a beautifully balanced and concentrated wine, with tannins that are already well integrated into the wood and sweet fruits. Age for 4_6 years, but can be drunk sooner.",L'Ame,Domaine Rotier
"The wine's floral aromas and somewhat restrained fruit on the nose strike a refined tone, while on the palate the wine is lush, round and sweet, buoyed by bright pineapple, peach and lime flavors. Finishes long and sleekly elegant.",Erdener Prälat Auslese Goldkapsel,Dr. Loosen
"This TBA features almost endless variations on the sugary theme: caramelized sugar, demarara syrup and honey all swirl together, wrapped around a bit of citrusy acidity. A distinctly musky spice note adds interest. Drink now_2040.",Bernkasteler alte Badstube am Doctorberg Trockenbeerenauslese - 375 ml,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Intense wood-aged wine. The wood is still apparent in this intense, youthful wine, although the richly concentrated mint and black fruit flavors are sure to come through in a year or two. This is certainly ageworthy, a wine that packs all the right structure and dark fruit character.",GC,Château du Cèdre
"This is the top wine from Fabien Jouves's estate. There is some new wood aging here and it shows in the polished edges of the very firm tannins. Burnt coffee and plum skin flavors add to the considerable power, the fruit just beginning to push through the tannins. Age for several more years.",La Pièce,Mas del Périé
"A big, ripe, opulent and oaky Pinot Noir, forward in fruit and needing a little time to knit together. It's massive in raspberry and cherry pie filling, milk chocolate, vanilla oak and smoky butter flavors, spiced with cinnamon and cloves. Absolutely delicious now, with a good decant, and should develop additional bottle complexities over the next 6_8 years.",Reserve Buoncristiani Vineyard,Matrix
"The vineyard has been a Zinfandel source to St. Francis, as well as other wineries, for years, but this is St. Francis's best in a decade. The wine is fantastically concentrated in dried blackberry, blueberry, dark unsweetened chocolate, tobacco and elaborate spice flavors. Defines complexity in Zinfandel, although the very high alcohol will bother some people.",Pagani Vineyard,St. Francis
"This is the winery's highest-end bottling, this year a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Sangiovese, from Alexander Valley and Mount Veeder. It's charming to drink now, with deep, impressively ripe blackberry, blueberry and dark chocolate flavors wrapped into soft, thick tannins. The finish is dry. Despite the deliciousness factor, it should hold and develop for at least six years.",Omaggio,Seghesio
"Lush and decadent, with intensely sweet notes of demarara syrup, peach and citrus, yet there's enough acidity to bring you back for another sip, and another. The sugar clings to the palate for a long time on the finish. Drink now_2030.",Graacher Himmelreich Vat 69 Eiswein,S.A. Prüm
"A terrific mouthfeel highlights this mix of berry and cherry fruits, toast and cinnamon. Tart and focused, it was aged in roughly half new French oak for the first 10 months, then transferred to neutral barrels for another five months. Fine-grained tannins give it an elegant finish.",Red Hills Estate,Archery Summit
"A textbook illustration of Stags Leap Cabernet. The __elvet glove_ is the elaborately ripe, sweet blackberry, cherry and chocolate fruit. The __ron fist_ is the tannin structure, so finely woven you hardly notice it, but there it is, offering a coat of astringency and protecting the wine over the next decade.",Ganymede,Chimney Rock
"Showing apricot and honey flavors with a refreshing dash of lemon acidity, this is an intensely sweet and rich wine. The texture is smooth, mellifluous, the dryness of botrytis providing just the right contrast. For aging over many years.",Cuvée Trockenbeerenauslese,Esterházy
"The acidic, minerally earthiness of Carneros Pinot Noir is uplifted by the ripe, fruity vintage, resulting in quite a fine young wine. May well be Merryvale's best ever. Their regular '09 was a beauty. This takes the dry, crisp fruitiness to new heights in richness and complexity. Silky and elegant in cherries, raspberries and cola, it should gain traction over the next six years.",Stanly Ranch Estate,Merryvale
"Wow. An incredible (and affordable) example of what Mourvèdre can be in certain nooks and crannies of the Sierra Foothills and in certain hands. Here winemaker and owner Hank Beckmeyer has made a silk mountai wine out of a tough vintage, taking organically farmed Mourvèdre from the folks over at Cedarville (who have their own label too) and made a gorgeous, pure and rich Rhône with perfumed notes of plum, smooth spice and a good dose of earth, all easy on the palate with fresh acidity and a velvety texture. Very little sulfur was used.",Cedarville,La Clarine Farm
"A fantastic Zinfandel, Sbragia's best in years, and one of the best of the vintage. Shows classic Dry Creek wild blueberry and briary blackberry flavors, with exotic spices, and the exuberance you want in a Zin. Yet it exhibits a rare control, making it elegant despite the power. Drink now for sheer joy.",Gino's,Sbragia
"You could use this as a teaching tool for classic Sonoma County Zinfandel. It's full-bodied, dry and spicy, with briary flavors of wild berries, mocha, tobacco, leather and exotic spices. More importantly, it's absolutely delicious. The grapes come from Seghesio's best vineyards in the Alexander and Dry Creek valleys. At this price, it's an astonishing value, especially considering that production was nearly 80,000 cases.",,Seghesio
"A single-vineyard wine whose grapes evidently were allowed to get very ripe. Caberent doesn't get much richer than this, with massive waves of blackberries, black cherries, currants, dark chocolate and minty oak. Earns extra points for the elegance of its tannin structure. Drink now_2015.",Leopoldina,Turnbull
"An extraordinarily elegant wine that will satisfy diehard Burgundians as well as fans of sweeter, riper Pinot Noir. It's generous in cherries, raspberries, chocolate and smoky sandalwood, yet shows a mushroomy earthiness that adds rich complexity. It will not be surprising if this delicious wine ages well for at least six years.",Londer Vineyard,Davies
"Ripe, full-bodied black cherry fruit shines here, with good tannin support. The wine is rich across the palate, with clean, focused, lingering flavors that really extend into a terrifically long finish.",Leland,Erath
"A great Petite Sirah, one that continues an amazing string of successes for the winery. Combines the variety's robust and full-bodied berry, cherry, mocha and pepper flavors and bigtime tannins with classic Napa elegance and balance. Drinks beautifully now and will develop throughout the decade. The wine is based on fruit from a century-old vineyard.",,Girard
"A beautiful sparkling wine, rich and refined in the mouth, with creamy flavors that show ripe, sweet California strawberries and limes. This bottling gets better and better with each new release.",Royal Cuvée Brut,Gloria Ferrer
"Earns its high score by virtue of sheer power. Just explodes in the mouth with raspberry and cherry fruit, as well as spicy complexities of cola, red licorice and smoky oak. Dry and full-bodied for a Pinot Noir, it's a little brawny now, but should develop bottle complexity over the next 6_8 years.",Van Der Kamp Vineyard,La Follette
"Here's a beautiful expression of Barolo with finely textured tannins, bright acidity, drying talc powder or mineral notes and tons of fresh berry and cherry intensity. This is a particularly refined and elegant wine that, when aged a few more years in the bottle, will pair with veal, pork or beef.",Serralunga,Palladino
"White flower and pear aromas offer a wine that is mineral, nervy, vibrating with the freshest white fruits and lemon juice. It is concentrated, showing strong signs of toast, mature flavors, while keeping great richness.",Blanc de Blancs Brut,Ruinart
"This is a fine example of a fresh, complex, young Santa Rita Hills Pinot Noir. It's bone dry and elegantly crisp, with intricate flavors of cherries, rhubarb, pomegranates, Dr. Pepper cola and minerals, along with sweet, smoky notes from oak barrel aging. Best of all is the silky texture. Fine now, with decanting, and through 2014.",Reserve,Rusack
"Textbook Rutherford Cab. It's forward and lush now in ripe black and red cherry pie and dusty spice flavors, with oak adding caramel, smoke and buttered toast notes. Feels opulent and fat and just plain good. Should continue to evolve in the bottle for years.",,Rutherford Grove
"This beautiful, vineyard-designate Barbaresco from the Ausario cru is marked by distinctive mineral notes of graphite and slate followed by pristine aromas of wild berries, tar and light smoke. The wine is plump, thick and enduring with highly polished tannins. Drink after 2015.",Ausario,Molino
"This new brand is sourced from various vineyards throughout the valley. It's very ripe and interesting, offering the rich flavors and balance of the vintage. Gentle now in blackberries, black currants, anise and sweet cedar wood, and should develop over the next 5_6 years.",,6 North
"Here's a vineyard-designate Barolo Riserva with pristine aromas of cherry, wild berry, smoke, tar, licorice and leather. The streamlined mouthfeel is polished yet firm, and the wine offers a long fade of cherry and spice flavors.",Bricco Boschis Riserva Vigna San Giuseppe,Cavallotto
"This bright and lively base Barolo from Bric Cenciurio delivers a full hand of aromatic cards: you'll detect fresh berry fruit, spice, espresso bean, mineral and licorice. It's a very smooth and polished wine that could use a few more years of cellar aging to loosen up the firmness of its tannins.",,Bric Cenciurio
"A wonderful red wine, full-bodied, dry and elegant. It shows Cabernet character in the blackberries, cherries and black currants, but that's balanced with an earthiness and minerality and even some smoked meat notes that must come from a percentage of Syrah and Petite Sirah. Tasted in a flight of much more expensive Cabs, this one easily stood out. Drink now_2011.",,Bonterra
"Barolo Bricco Rocca still needs a few more years in the cellar to allow for full integrations of its spice, fruit, tobacco and mineral components. This beautiful wine is ripe with potential and the mouthfeel is plush and velvety with a wonderful fade of smoke and black fruit. Drink after 2018.",Bricco Rocca,Cascina Ballarin
"You'll enjoy the elegance and refined nature of this Barolo from the Serralunga d'Alba municipality. Bright aromas of cherry, vanilla, cola and ginger are carefully woven into the wine's bouquet and the mouthfeel is characterized by long, drying mineral notes.",Cerrati Vigna Cucco,Cascina Cucco
"Bright and tonic, this cheerful Barbaresco delivers pretty aromas of perfumed spice, wild flowers, licorice and light shadings of talc powder. In the mouth, it offers an especially smooth and silky feel. Pair this elegant wine with lamb chops topped with crispy fried shallots.",,Castello di Neive
"The prized Cannubi cru offers fruit that is interpreted by some of the finest winemakers in northern Italy. This expression from the dynamic Damilano winery is characterized by tight tannins, power, personality and ripe berry flavors. Pair this Barolo with risotto topped with thinly shaved truffles.",Cannubi,Damilano
"Tons of flavor in this Pinot. Dazzles with waves of cherries, rhubarb, pomegranate, cola, currants and licorice, accented with swanky oak. The texture is firm and silky, the finish thoroughly dry. A real beauty that should develop complexity for a decade. The grapes are from Santa Rita Hills, so why doesn't the label say so?",,Feliz Noche
"Here's a rich and densely extracted Barbaresco from the Erte vineyard in Neive that will appeal to those who like a bigger, more extracted style of Nebbiolo. The wine is bursting with intense layers of black fruit, prune and plum followed by sweet tones of exotic spice. The mouthfeel is chewy, tart and very firm.",Vigne Erte,Cigliuti
"Chile's most expensive wine is excellent, and with only 50 cases being imported it's definitely a collector's edition. The nose is deep, dense and black as night, with olive, tobacco, coconut and bold black fruit aromas. The palate is racy and tannic, and the flavors of plum, cassis, blackberry, chocolate, prune and fig are elevated. A tough and ribald wine that will be at its best from 2012_2015.",Viñedo Chadwick,Errazuriz
"Here's a Cabernet to age for a while. It's very dry and richly flavored in classic varietal flavors of blackberries, black currants and cedar, with finely ground, intense tannins. But it has a youthful immaturity that simply isn't ready to appreciate now. Really needs time for all the parts to mesh together. Give it until 2012, and it should develop bottle complexity for another 5_6 years.",,Etude
"Tart and leafy, this is still resolving into a fully integrated wine. It already shows balance and depth, with a mix of plum, fig, black cherry and cassis fruit, a streak of sweet chocolate and hints of baking spice. From a great vintage, this has the balance and stuffing to age, but if you can't keep your hands off it, decant.",Seven Hills Vineyard Estate Perigee,L'Ecole No. 41
"Steely. Cool fruit joins an immense series of flavors__risp citrus, lime zest, pink grapefruit in the tightest texture. For aging over 3_4 years, probably longer.",Engelreich,Markus Huber
"The Barolo Pressenda opens with bold, black aromas of toasted hazelnut, crushed granite, prunes, plums and smoky barbecue sauce. That thick intensity follows through to the mouth where the wine shows concentration and a tight, dense style: Hold for five to ten years.",Pressenda,Marziano Abbona
"Onion skin color, showing signs of aromatic toast character, this is a rich, round wine from the hot 2003 vintage. Raspberry fruits are rich and full, lifted by acidity. A great success.",Grand Vintage Rosé Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Giovanni Rosso's Barolo Serralunga opens with bright intensity and lively aromas of black cherry, raspberry, smoke, mineral, red rose, licorice and root beer. Those floral-rose nuances are especially beautiful and the wine should age at least five more years so that the tannins soften.",Serralunga,Giovanni Rosso
"This Barolo exhibits sweet aromas of berry fruit, Christmas spice and vanilla. It's a bold, confident wine with a smooth but firm quality in the mouth that hits all the right marks. Pair this Barolo with marinated lamb and dried fig jelly.",Camilla,Grimaldi Bruna
"Apricot aromas are followed by ripe fruit flavors, giving a rich texture, yet retaining a very clean, fresh character. Opulence with steel.",1000 Eimerberg Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"From slate and limestone vineyards, this is an intense wine, full of tropical fruit flavors, spice, toast and hints of ginger. The wine rolls richly around the mouth, a gorgeous, opulent texture.",Tatschler,Kollwentz
"This is an elegant and refined Barolo with focused aromas of black fruit, drying mineral and root beer. There's also a playful side that emerges thanks to the wine's ripe and plush mouthfeel. Sure, it's a structured, tannic wine but its fine texture helps make it approachable within the next five years or so.",Vigna Mandorlo,Giacosa Fratelli
"The Basarin cru has performed very nicely in 2007 by absorbing the heat, but not in an exaggerated way. This expression opens with ripe fruit notes, black cherry and wild raspberries with elegant background tones of graphite, smoke and blue flower. The wine imparts an elegant and smooth feel thanks to the polished nature of its tannins.",Basarin,Punset
"Shows the weight, complexity and sheer deliciousness that this bottling almost always displays. Chardonnay fans will love the oaky, creamy flavors of pineapple tart, pear and lemon jam and buttered toast. The winemaker recommends pairing with black cod, and if you have a Chinese restaurant that makes a good version of this honey and soy inspired dish, it will be heaven.",,Talley
"Named after the winery's founder, Francesco Costamagna, Bricco Francesco is a ripe and juicy Barolo with pulpy fruit and intense aromas of cherry, tobacco, strawberry and cola. There's a bit of vanilla and sweet spice as well and the wine is generously textured with smooth tannins.",Bricco Francesco,Rocche Costamagna
"This is a lovely Chardonnay, a super restaurant wine list bottle. Dry and creamy, it offers pleasantly rich pineapple, lime pie, green apple, exotic spice and buttered toast flavors, accented with crisp, clean acidity.",Russian River Ranches,Sonoma-Cutrer
"Here's a big, bold Zinfandel, explosive in wild forest berries, perfectly ripe and picked under the summer sun. It's softly smooth, with rich tannins and a long, sweetly spicy finish. Ed Sbragia has mastered the difficult art of elevating Dry Creek Valley. Drink now_2015.",La Promessa,Sbragia
"Extraordinarily rich, this Pinot Noir dazzles with extracted cherries and raspberries, with exotic mulberry additions that have a spicy, feral, meaty quality. Top Anderson Valley vineyards often show this wild note, so welcome in an era when ripe fruit is easy to achieve. On a par with MacPhail's great 2007 Frattey Shams bottling, and the good news for consumers is that they've lowered the price considerably. Drink now_2016.",Frattey Shams Vineyard,MacPhail
"Intense freshness and acidity follow the most delicious perfumes in this crisp wine. It shows considerable minerality, bursting with citric flavors and a mouthwatering aftertaste. Age for several years. Screwcap.",Heiligenstein Erste Lage,Bründlmayer
"Seriously deep, the weight and concentration immediately apparent, this Hyland Pinot requires extra breathing time, and probably some years in the cellar. Red and black fruits penetrate into a silky, spicy, supple core. It's a bit lower in alcohol than most of the other single vineyard Pinots from Erath, but all the more cellar-worthy.",Hyland,Erath
"With the heart-stopping acidity and intensity of an ice wine, this is an orange marmalade- and honey-flavored wine. It has a poised freshness to go with that great fruit flavor, delicious to drink now but sure to age.",Cuvée Eiswein,Esterházy
"The estate wine of Aydie is the most serious and long-lasting of the range produced by the Laplace family. It has an intense, concentrated structure, very dark and rich, with a mineral edge. Age for 4_5 years.",,Château d'Aydie
"A spectacular Syrah, distinctly Californian in the ripe blackberry and blueberry fruit, with rich, firm tannins and a finish of spice. The tannins really mark this wine, so creamy and smooth, making the mouthfeel a delight. Drink now_2014 for youthful exuberance.",Susan's Hill Vineyard,Novy
"Made in the white Burgundy style, this Chardonnay features enormously ripe flavors complexed with oak and lees aging. It offers a blast of pineapple tart, pear jam, crème brûlée, vanilla custard, buttered toast and cinnamon spice flavors, accented by high, crisp acidity. A blend of some of the best vineyards Pessagno accesses.",Intrinity,Pessagno
"Dark, almost russet in color, this is an eiswein that's definitely out of the ordinary, with notes of fusty library, walnut, dried apricots and figs that come across as a bit syrupy in texture. It seems a bit advanced compared to other eisweins, but it will likely remain at this plateau for decades.",Herrenberg Eiswein 82,Maximin Grünhäuser
"Rich without being overly sweet, this wine's aromas are redolent of dried apricots, with a hint of shiitake mushroom as well. Gingery spice balances the honeyed richness on the palate, and extends through the long finish.",Berncasteler Doctor Auslese,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Müller-Burggraef)
"Quite an interesting Chardonnay, in an era when so many are too sweet and extracted. There's plenty of orange and apricot fruit flavor, but also a brilliant streak of minerality, like a lick of cold steel, and the overall taste is dry. Really easy to like, with lots of complexity to warrant repeated sipping.",Weka Ranch Vineyard,Corvalle
"A dark streak runs straight through this excellent Pinot. It's a whirl of smoke and chocolate, focused right through the core of rum-soaked cherries. Tannic and deep, big and bold__ull this out for your heartiest meal.",Niederberger,Erath
"Perfumed wine, from a blend of Tannat and Cabernet Franc. Here is a powerful expression of intense terroir. Very concentrated and dense, with the tannins just beginning to soften, the wine is packed with black ripe fruits, solid and chunky.",,Château Peyros
"Shows the flashy, voluptuous nature of California Viognier, offering delicious waves of mango, pear, honeysuckle, vanilla cream and mineral flavors. Surprisingly, there's no oak, although the wine was aged on the lees. With brisk acidity, this is a fine Viognier for drinking now with Asian fare.",,Inception
"Are the '09 auslesen from Manfred Prüm just in a dull phase? This wine still impresses for its scents of crushed stone and latent power, but the peach, melon and citrus notes fall a little short of expectations for this venerated estate. Give it 10 years or more to come around.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Edging towards minerality, this is a textured wine, its acidity penetrating right through. This intense, crisp character is complimented by the balanced fruit with its ripe apricot and kiwi flavors. Age for 2_3 years. Screwcap.",Berg Vogelsang,Bründlmayer
"The alcohol is high, giving the wine a peppery burn, but that's part of its charm. Without such ripeness, the wine wouldn't have the briary berry, sweet dried currant and leathery flavors. New oak, to the tune of 25%, adds an even richer layer of char. Quite an accomplishment. Drink with barbecue or big, hearty beef dishes.",,Seghesio
"Oak brings strong buttered toast and vanilla flavors to this Chardonnay. But it's also a powerhouse from the vineyard, with massive orange, pineapple and apricot flavors. May even have some botrytis, to judge from the honeyed sweetness. Yet for all the opulence, the finish is dry.",Barrel Fermented,Mer Soleil
"Old vines give an extra concentration in this intensely spice- and green plum-flavored wine. With its considerable freshness it should age well, its rounded character likely to develop. For now, enjoy its beautiful purity of fruit.",Alte Reben Reserve,Bründlmayer
"The Tuenge (tongue-GEE) Vineyard was originally Chehalem Mountain Vineyard, first planted almost 40 years ago. A complex nose of spiced plums and cherries opens into a fruit-laden midpalate, adding blackberries and a thin vein of citrus. Firmly tannic, this precise, sculpted effort brings a refined structure, with just a whiff of volatility.",Tuenge,Erath
This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Blaufränkisch is dominated by the black currant flavors of the Cabernet. It is tight at this young stage with firm fruit tannins that lie under the acidity. This is a wine for long-term aging over at least 6 years.,Estoras,Esterházy
"An elegant, elaborate Pinot Noir, clearly well grown. The structure is impeccable, with brisk, citrusy acidity and finely ground tannins. The flavors show long hangtime ripeness, flooding the mouth with raspberries, Dr. Pepper cola and exotic pie spices. There's even a note of balsam and mushrooms. Very fine now, with decanting, but should develop bottle complexity over the next six years.",,Freeman
"A first-rate Syrah, exhibiting all the desirable aspects of the variety. It's dry, full-bodied and tannic, with blackberry, pie spice, grilled bacon and sandalwood flavors, and enough black pepper to fill a shaker. Drink now_2015.",Baker Vineyard,Corvalle
"Powerful, pure and tightly wound, meaning it's a candidate for short-term cellaring, say 2_5 years. Smells ripe and fruity, with blackberry, cola and coconut resulting in a spot-on nose. Concentrated and juicy, with a strong constitution and potent plum, berry and cassis flavors. Toasty and lightly oaky on the finish; 73% Malbec and 27% Cabernet Sauvignon.",Zeta,Zuccardi
"Löwengang is one of the few Italian white wines built to age many long years in the cellar. Chardonnay is farmed according to bio-dynamic ideals and shaped by oak barrique. The result is creamy, rich, structured and redolent of apricot, vanilla, citrus cream and spice.",Löwengang,Alois Lageder
"A stunning Cab that's a little bit of an easy-pleaser with an assertive oaky streak througout. Hints of cigar tobacco, fresh coffee grinds and whole vanilla bean infuse the dark, jammy berry fruit flavors. The mouth is round and lush, but firm tannins and a crushed velvet texture provide structure and linger well into the spiced chocolate close.",,Anthonij Rupert
"A flashy, opulent Cabernet. You could even call it sexy. It's so soft and luxurious in blackberry, blueberry and cassis flavors. Absolutely delicious by any standard, yet the dry structure maintains elegant balance. Drink soon for youthful drama. Hard to believe production was nearly 72,000 cases.",,Caymus
"With the richness of the vintage, the natural tannins of Tannat are tamed by the welter of intense black fruits, sweet berries and Arabica coffee. The structure is exhibited in the dusty tannins under all the fruit.",Madiran Laplace,Château d'Aydie
"Fruity, dusty and soft, a dark cherry and plum Graciano grown and made in Lodi with great depth, balance and earthiness. The grape is native to Rioja where it is usually blended with Tempranillo, but does deliciously here on its own. From Lodi Rules Certified Green grapes.",Las Cerezas Vineyard,Bokisch
"Richness marks this flamboyantly fruity, sweet young Pinot Noir. It erupts in jammy cherry and raspberry flavors, while new oak brings sweet, toasty complications of smoky butter and vanilla. Would be just an ordinary fruit bomb except for the wonderful acid-tannin structure. So delicious.",Ferrington Vineyards,Davies
"From the celebrated Cannubi Boschis cru, here's a bright and luminous Barolo that opens with a deep ruby color and aromas of cherry, cola and cassis. Black fruit, tar and spice appear on the palate and the wine tastes tart, plumy and surprisingly succulent compared to most Nebbiolo-based wines.",Cannubi Boschis,Virna Borgogno
"A beautiful 100% Cabernet that comes from Rutherford and St. Helena. It's soft and dry and ultrarich, with blackberry, cherry, licorice, cola, spice and smoky new oak flavors. Seems best now and through 2014.",,Meander
"This is estate grown, from a Lake Chelan winery in an emerging region. Riesling is clearly a strength, as this has a delicate elegance often missing from the fruit bombs that can be grown in warmer sites. Bone dry, dusty and lightly floral in the nose. The balance of blossom, yellow fruits, juicy acidity and wet rock is impeccable; the wine extends itself gracefully into a lingering finish.",Stone's Throw Vineyard,Nefarious Cellars
"This valley in Santa Barbara County continues to prove its relevance to California Chardonnay, as proven once again by this dry, crisply elegant and decadently delicious wine. It bursts in the mouth with juicy pineapple, white peach and honeysuckle flavors, generously oaked, but is balanced in acidity and minerals.",Chapel View,Riverbench
"Rivetto is making some very interesting wines and is worth keeping a close eye on. The Leon Barolo opens with plump aromas of coffee, cherry, blackberry, spice and ripe berry fruit. It's a generous and velvety wine with firm tannins and a dusty, finely textured mouthfeel.",Leon,Rivetto
"Made in a lean, elegantly structured manner, with modulated coffee, violet and mineral notes to the sour cherry candy fruit. Quite tannic, too, with a zesty bite of acidity. A bit austere and shut down now, and should slowly develop bottle softness and complexity after 2013.",Auberge Road,Lieff
"All raspberries and red currants, this is a delicious, instantly approachable wine. It also has a more complex side, intense acidity, a tight texture followed by a juicy fruit character. It is a wine for celebration as well as more serious appreciation.",Fleur de Champagne Rosé Brut,Perrier Jouët
"Cascina Adelaide consistently offers a modern (ie: plump, ripe, dense) taste profile on its important wines. Even this expression from the Cannubi cru, a vineyard noted for the elegant and ethereal nature of its wines, delivers a bolder, bigger style. Aromas include roasted espresso bean, blackberry and polished black stone.",Cannubi,Cascina Adelaide
"This is a very nice Cabernet that feels rich in the mouth, a wine that will have everybody remarking on its smooth, velvety texture. Taste-wise, it shows an olive tinge to the red and black cherry fruit, with a beautiful overlay of smoky oak. You can drink it now, with a good decant, and it should develop in the bottle over the next 6_9 years, if not longer.",,Etude
"Warm and rich, even if still young, this is a rounded Champagne, full of ripe apple and spice, pink grapefruit, lined with intense acidity. Because it is still so young, it needs several years' aging.",Grande Sendrée Brut,Drappier
"Barolo Gramolere offers an attractive window onto the Nebbiolo grape with peek views at its inherent complexity and elegance. The wine opens with a ruby-garnet color and offers aromas of wild berry, white cherry, tar, licorice, hazelnut and ginger.",Gramolere,Fratelli Alessandria
"Here's an expression of Nebbiolo from the celebrated Bussia cru that opens with juicy fruit tones of cherry and blackberry backed by charred notes of campfire, cured beef, cigar box, leather and crushed granite. The tannins here boast a very polished, almost squeaky quality. Hold for five more years at least.",Bussia,Giacosa Fratelli
"Here's a Barolo that lives up to its __iserva_ status thanks to aged aromas of old spice, leather, black mineral, root beer, tar and menthol-like intensity. There are some earthy, dusty tones on the finish and the wine imparts firm, ripe tannins in the mouth. Riservas are usually aged one more year than base Barolos.",Preve Riserva,Gianni Gagliardo
"Elegant and pure in essence, this traditional interpretation of Barolo offers a long and steady aromatic lineup of wild berry, spice, cola and mineral aromas. The wine feels streamlined and pristine in the mouth and will age many more years in the cellar.",Vigna S. Caterina,Guido Porro
"A classic Austrian blend of Zweigelt, Blaufränkisch and St Laurent, this is big, bold and ripe, structured, powerful and dense. Pure juicy black berry fruits drive right through the tight tannins. Age for 3_4 years.",Pannobile,Judith Beck
"Here's a powerful Cabernet Sauvignon, ripe and opulent, offering summer blackberry, sour cherry candy, currant, dried herb and rose petal aromas and flavors. The addition of 21% Merlot brings a candied softness, but it's still pretty tannic, and wants 4_5 years in the cellar.",Estate,Sullivan
"The Martinenga cru selection of Barbaresco offers beautiful complexity and elegance with firm tones of red berry fruit, cassis, white truffle, cola and lingering aromas of exotic spice. Thanks to its freshness and fine tannins, this wine will easily age five to ten more years.",Martinenga,Tenute Cisa Asinari dei Marchesi di Gresy
"A little soft in acidity, in the way of Paso wines, but with just-in-time zest and tannins that give the flavors some structure. Mainly Cabernet Sauvignon, with 14% Petit Verdot, the wine is dry and rich, with blackberry, currant, cola, dark chocolate, violet, anise and cedar flavors. One of the more complex Bordeaux-style wines from this area. Drink now.",Suendero,Vina Robles
"Aromatically forward and lush, this greets you with lemon polish, beeswax, Satsuma oranges, and Key lime, backed with barrel-influenced coconut flavors. The flavors meld together in the mouth, holding firm with extra phenolic density through a lip-smacking, luscious and lingering finish.",Divio,Stevens
"Mario Battaglio offers a truly fantastic expression of Nebbiolo from the hot 2007 vintage that is packed tight with intensity and larger than life aromatic opulence. In a surprise twist, the wine also boasts a feminine side thanks to delicate aromas of wild flowers, licorice and light graphite or mineral shadings.",,Battaglio
"A soft, ripe Champagne, as befits the year. Attractive apples, spice and toast go beautifully with sweet acidity. It is developing richness and weight, although not likely to age over many years.",Brut Millesimé,Laurent-Perrier
"Bruno Rocca releases yet another beautiful Barbaresco. In the 2007, the wine delivers a hearty, genuine feel that is reflected in aromas of black fruit, spice, bresaola, wet earth and tar. The wine boasts a clean, fine texture with polished tannins and bright acidity. The finish is long and spice driven.",,Bruno Rocca
"Fully loaded and packed tight, this rich Barbaresco ushers forth aromas of ripe cherry, wet earth, smoked bacon, black stone and licorice. There's a strong spice element as well and the wine tastes thick and ripe in the mouth with firm, finely textured tannins.",San Cristoforo,Elio Filippino
"Earns a high score for sheer richness and decadance. Huge in blackberry, blueberry, cassis, dark chocolate, bacon, pepper and oak flavors, wrapped into big, velvety tannins. Impresses for its size, but is totally dry, and retains balance and elegance. Now_2015.",,Falcone
"Drier and more minerally than Foxen's other Chardonnays, because it is the least oaked. It's vibrant in grilled pineapple, mango, apricot and vanilla spice flavors, brightened by beautiful acidity. Alcohol is quite high, but the wine never tastes hot or unbalanced.",Bien Nacido Vineyard Steel Cut,Foxen
"Very different from the Bricco delle Viole cru expression from the same producer, this wine offers bold, ripe fruit with lingering tones of red cherry, leather, charcoal and campfire. The fruit is thick and succulent and the finish offers sweet, succulent spice flavors. Multiple U.S. importers.",Luigi Baudana Cerretta,G D Vajra
"Extreme elegance and balance characterize Gianfranco Bovio's Barolo Rocchettevino. The wine is studied and sophisticated with a clean presentation of fruit, spice and ethereal balsam or herbal aromas. It's a toned and carefully structured wine that will last many long years in the cellar.",Rocchettevino,Gianfranco Bovio
"This is a balanced wine, moving easily between rich fruit and a tight mineral and grapefruit texture. There is a hint of toast to give extra weight. Worth aging for several years.",Millésime Exception Brut,Drappier
There's a beautifully delicate nature to this wine that is evident in its pristine floral aromas and its feminine notes of raspberry and wild berry. Hints of smoke and tar appear at the end and the wine is tight and firm in the mouth. Don't worry about longevity; there's enough pulp and structure to guarantee a   long aging future ahead.,Sistaglia,Deltetto
". Though it is five years old and just being released, this thick, tannic and rich Bordeaux blend still requires decanting, cellaring, and/or extensive breathing time. A full day after first being tasted, it came together for me; the initial, aggressively herbal character is equally matched to ripe black cherry fruit and massive tannins. The nose suggests sweet cherry, but the palate leans more to the herbal side, with flavors of earth, stem and leaf, and there is a green tea residual flavor that infuses the finish. A wine to cellar and to savor with a fine steak.",Red Wine,Corliss Estates
"Blackberry, sweet vanilla and candied fruit are backed by oak-related aromas of spice and tobacco: But, the real beauty of this wine is that those determined aromas are backed by a delicate fluttering of cola, licorice and eucalyptus. This is a long aging wine and the natural heft and thickness of its texture suggests that it has many years to go.",Roggeri,Ciabot Berton
"Cantina del Pino delivers a standout base Barbaresco with a bright ruby color and distinct aromas of dried cassis, leather, tobacco, prune, chestnut honey and blue flower. The wine is packed with bright acidity and tight tannins for long aging. The complexity here is really very special.",,Cantina del Pino
"Cascina Ballarin delivers a clean and straightforward expression of the famed Bussia cru with all the depth and complexity you can expect with Nebbiolo. This is a steady, confident wine with solid tannins and a bright, mouth-cleansing finish.",Bussia,Cascina Ballarin
"The dynamic Rivetto family has been making wine since 1902 and the newest generation of winemakers is worth keeping an eye on. This bright and elegant Barolo shows aromas of spice, cola, cherry, tar, prune and black currants. It tastes smooth and elegant and shows firm structure in the mouth.",Leon,Rivetto
"Founded in 1986, Tenuta Rocca is a hilltop property in Monforte d'Alba that overlooks some of the most beautiful landscapes in the Langhe. This wonderful Barolo opens with sweet smells of candle wax, nutmeg, ginger, chocolate and bright red fruit. The wine imparts a squeaky clean, polished feel in the mouth.",,Tenuta Rocca
"With the whimsical name Paesi Tuoi (__our countries_), this youthful Barolo will definitely appeal to refined, international taste buds. The wine opens beautifully with loads of rose, violet and blue flower. In the mouth, it shows soft, silky tannins and bright acidity. Drink after 2015.",Paesi Tuoi,Terre da Vino
"From a steep vineyard above the village of Straden, this has wonderful tropical fruit aromas, the fruit beautifully ripe. Ripe, smooth, rounded, the acidity giving just the right final burst of herbal freshness.",Klausen,Neumeister
"Here is a classic expression of Barolo from a very good vintage that opens with bright fruit aromas that are embellished by carefully measured oak tones. You'll recognize blackberry, cassis, tobacco, mineral, cola and humus. The tannins are young and this wine requires more years of bottle aging.",,Pio Cesare
"A beautifully accessible wine, polished, pretty and likeable now for its gentle texture and silky tannins. The sweet cherry and raspberry fruit is encircled with a coat of fancy smoked oak. Made from 100% Cabernet, the wine is balanced enough to gain bottle complexity for a decade.",,Sawyer
"Le Coste Mosconi delivers a very attractive ensemble of ripe fruit aromas with oak-driven shadings of vanilla, cinnamon and clove. No single aroma is over the top and the wine is indeed nicely integrated and balanced. The tannins are drying and tight, creating a firm impression on the close.",Le Coste Mosconi,Parusso
"A smooth and creamy Champagne, delicious peach and apricot fruits linked by acidity into a harmonious whole. There is a great apple skin texture that gives a bite, just enough to shape the rich aftertaste.",Grand Cru Le Mesnil sur Oger Blanc de Blancs,Pascal Doquet
"Here's a nicely concentrated Barbaresco with distinct notes of tar, leather, asphalt and spice backed by softer notes of berry fruit, plum and prune. There's immense personality and power here with drying tannins and plump fruit on the close.",Ad Altiora,Michele Taliano
"Almost all of California's best Viogniers are oaked, but not this one. As with Tangent's previous bottlings, it just shows that this particular wine doesn't need wood to be opulent and completely satisfying. With brisk, clean acidity, it displays complex citrus, white peach, green apple, wildflower and mineral flavors. What a wonderful wine, and a worthy followup to the sensational 2008.",Paragon Vineyard,Tangent
"Most of this Sauvignon Blanc was tank fermented, but a portion received oak. That gives a welcome layer of smoky richness and vanilla to the beautiful, underlying Meyer lemon, lime, pear and green apple flavors that are so rich and mouthwateringly tart. A very drinkable, dry white wine.",,Chateau St. Jean
"Milky chocolate and creamy almond paste open the nose of this ripe and rich Barolo. Shadings of citrus, spice, plum, licorice and root beer add to the complexity. This is a pure, elegant and traditional expression of Nebbiolo that needs another five to 10 years in the cellar.",Acclivi,Comm. G. B. Burlotto
"This is textbook Barbaresco from the well-received 2007 vintage. Vigneto l'Ciaciaret (the vineyard is part of the Gallina cru in Neive) offers a delicate embroidery of wild berry, spice and mineral aromas. The wine is rich and firm in the mouth with dusty, drying tannins.",Vigneto l'Ciaciaret,Antichi Poderi dei Gallina
"From a great year for vintage Champagne, this is a fine wine, bringing out minerality, green stone fruits and mouthwatering acidity. It is a wine for aging, so give this impressive Champagne 3_4 years.",Vintage Premier Cru Brut,J. Dumangin Fils
"This elegant Riserva expression from the Bussia cru has some ripe flavors of wild berry and raspberry followed by nicely evolved aromas of leather, spice, cola and fine Indian spice. The mouth feels tight and compact and this wine sports a long, mineral finish.",Bussia Riserva,Giacomo Fenocchio
"Harvested on December 15, this rich and sweet wine is light on acidity but heavy on concentrated apricot jam and honey flavors. It is opulent, intense, with a bright ginger spice aftertaste.",Eiswein 375ml,Josef Ehmoser
"Without a doubt one of the most successful vineyard crus in Barbaresco, Rabaj_ delivers unique intensity and sophistication. You'll notice aromas of black fruit, spice, tar and licorice and there's good balance between the wine's acidity and its tannic structure. Pair this wine with roasted pork stuffed with prunes.",Rabaj_,Ca' du Rabaj_
"Cadaretta's largest production red is drinking beautifully in this exceptional vintage. It seems to be moving into midlife softness, with a well-integrated blend of plums, cassis and black cherries, highlighted with clove and coffee. Complex and detailed, its tannins are grainy and dark, adding heft and gravitas to the fruit.",,Cadaretta
"This impressive Barbaresco shows generous intensity and a very nice equilibrium between wild berry fruit and oak-driven tones of spice and tobacco. There's a fun touch of pepper and white truffle as well and the wine is compact, firm and elegant on the close.",Montefico,Carlo Giacosa
"Barolo Leon makes a wonderful first impression thanks to its aromas of ripe berry fruit, Indian spice, cola, licorice and ginger. There's deep dimension and personality here and the wine ends with firmly polished tannins.",Leon,Cascina Luisin
"A worthy followup to the wonderful 2006. Shows equal concentration of blackberry, blueberry and licorice flavors, with a bacon and pepper savoriness that tantalizes. The structure is fine and firm, the finish dry and spicy. Drink now for sheer deliciousness.",,Bonterra
"Somehow this pure Chardonnay wine suffers from the Roederer preference for a higher dosage. With the Blanc de Blancs style, more minerality, something altogether more taut, would be better. That said, there is plenty to enjoy in this rich, full-bodied wine, with apricot as well as citrus flavors.",Blanc de Blancs Brut,Louis Roederer
"Barolo Bergeisa reveals itself to be an elegant and sophisticated wine with delicate shadings of lead pencil, earthy tones, fragrant violets and black currants. The mouthfeel is tight with finely textured tannins and the finish is very polished and refined.",Bergeisa,Le Strette
"This pure varietal, single-vineyard, barrel-fermented wine perfectly captures the baseline flavors and qualities of the best Washington Sémillons. Complex and slightly high-toned, it brings ripe stone fruits, a hint of honeyed tea, impressive length and penetration, and a waxy, polished, lingering finish.",Fries Vineyard,L'Ecole No. 41
"The fruit is half Sheridan and half Dineen vineyard. Although stylistically a brother to the Stevens Merlot, this has the varietal earmarks of Cabernet Franc _ some green, leafy streaks, more spice and sharpness to the tannins, and a definite herbal component. The fruit is an equal but not dominant partner _ blackberry, cassis, and black olive, finished with a whiff of very dark chocolate.",Franc,Stevens
"Barolo Vigna San Giacomo is a meaty, masculine expression of Nebbiolo with dense, dark fruit, cherry, plum and prune with accents of bresaola, smoked beef and spice. The tannins are drying and firm and this style of wine could pair with turkey roast with raisin, apple and sage stuffing.",Vigna San Giacomo,Stroppiana
"Giuseppe Nada brings us a gorgeous Barolo that oozes elegance and intensity. The wine is redolent of tar, black currant, spice and dried licorice powder. The tannins are drying and fine and leave a long, polished sensation in the mouth. It's a very nice ensemble.",,Nada Giuseppe
"Very smooth, concentrated blend of Merlot and Blaufränkisch. There are considerable smoky wood flavors along with ripe berry fruit notes and a dark, firm edge that will soften as the wine ages. It has power, density and finishes dry. Age for 5_6 years.",Tesoro,Esterházy
"Absorbingly complex with racy, textural, mineral-driven flavors, this excellent wine features fleshy apple and pear fruit, crisply defined and extended. The low alcohol__ust a tad over 13%__eeps the acids front and center; the wine is immaculately fresh, with just a touch (0.7%) of residual sugar.",,Lujon
"Russian River-based MacMurray Ranch turns to the Central Coast's Santa Lucia Highlands for Pinot Noir, with admirable results. This is a terrific wine for drinking now, dry and powerful in red fruits, cola and spices, yet elegantly tailored. Might develop for a few years, but best now for youthful exuberance, although you do want to give it three hours in a decanter.",,MacMurray Ranch
"Scores high on the deliciousness factor, with waves of blackberries, blueberries, currants, dark chocolate and smoky oak. A little on the soft side, which might limit ageability, but it sure is opulent.",Fortuna,Turnbull
"Shows the opulent fruit of the vintage, when long hangtime made ripeness so easy to achieve. The jammy raspberry and cherry flavors are spicy, with a sweet, smoky coating of oak. Brisk acidity and a savory minerality lift the fruit into complexity. Should age well, so drink through 2016 or so.",Ferrington Vineyard,MacPhail
"Tastes thick, heavy and sweet in youth, showing the fantastic ripeness of the vintage, with a flavor of cherry and raspberry marmalade. Oak shows up in the rich addition of buttered cinnamon toast. If that sounds good, it is, and you can enjoy it now. But it will improve with 3_4 years in the bottle.",Wildcat Vineyard,MacPhail
"Deeply flavored in raspberries, cherries, red licorice and exotic dusty spices, this Pinot Noir has a tannin-acid tightness that makes it aloof and hard. Although it's dry, it's so rich in fruit, it tastes sweet. A very fine wine, but needs some time to come around. Give it four or five years to mellow.",Reserve Nunes Vineyard,Matrix
"Tart now, with lots of acidity cutting across the blackberry and mineral flavors. As rich as it is, there's a taut elegance that makes the wine tense. Clearly too young, it should develop fine bottle complexity over this decade.",Reserve,Broman
"The Loin de l'Oeil is the local white grape of Gaillac and is very happy to produce sweet botrytized wines. This is rich, full of botrytis flavors along with fig, sultana and apricot. Age the wine for 2_3 years, but it is ready to drink now.",Renaissance Doux,Domaine Rotier
"Stuhlmuller's regular 2008 Cabernet, released a year ago, was quite good. This one's even better. It has all the hallmarks of a superior Cabernet, with rich, delicious blackberry, cherry, licorice, Dr. Pepper cola and oak flavors, framed into soft, intricate tannins. With a pleasant minerality, it should age well through 2016, gradually losing fruit.",Reserve,Stuhlmuller Vineyards
"A standout Pinot, expressive from the first sniff to the last swallow. Elegant and precise, with deep notes of black cherry fruit, set into a balanced framework of tannin and acid. Barrel notes of coffee and cinnamon are expressive and beautifully integrated.",Marylhurst Estate,Vista Hills
"Fermented in a Taransaud French oak open top tank, using Maresh Vineyard grapes exclusively, this delicious wine combines pretty cherry and pomegranate fruit with dusty spices, leading into a finish dappled with cinnamon toast and coconut. Lovely now, or give it a few more years in bottle.",Audrey,Scott Paul
"The extra heat of Calistoga shows in this wine's softness, which limits its ageability. On the other hand, it's supremely ripe in blackberries, cherries, currants and milk chocolate, while oak adds elaborate layers of buttered toast and caramel. Drink now_2015.",Amoenus,Turnbull
"This is a serious, firmly structured wine, impressively rich as well as tannic. Black fruits push through the considerable structure, offering balance as the wine ages. It is young now, with hints of mint from wood aging. Powerfully textured, give this 4_5 years.",Château Labrande,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Light, racy and delicate, with hints of vanilla and coconut adding a sexy layer to the citrus-dominated fruit. There are hints of riper fruit, but this is wonderfully clean and precise, with a long, citrusy finish.",Graacher Himmelreich Spätlese,Dr. Loosen
"An impressive quality of Cahors is that you can find a wine as concentrated and dense as this without excessive alcohol. This 2006, wood aged, with touches of eucalyptus, is a big hearted, black fruit dominated wine, smooth and powerful, and just so well balanced for food. Can drink now, but better age for 3_5 years.",,Château Lagrézette
"A powerful wine, very concentrated, the tannins a part of the richer fruit and dark brooding character of the wine. There is good juiciness as well, black fruits and acidity cutting through the dominant young tannins.",Vieilles Vignes,Château Peyros
"Without doubt the most full and complete Chardonnay from Argentina that this critic has tried. It smells lush and toasty, with elegant apple and pear aromas. The mouthfeel is rich and balanced, while flavors of baked apple, vanilla cream and woodspice are endearing. Long and flavorful on the finish, and not overoaked. A serious Chardonnay to drink now.",White Stones Adrianna Vineyard,Bodega Catena Zapata
"Smooth, dry and rich, this Merlot-based Bordeaux blend shows complex flavors of black currants, black cherries, mocha and cedar. The tannins are thick, but very finely ground, with a sweet nutty taste. Shows real class and finesse. Should develop in the bottle through 2014.",Elevage,Chimney Rock
"With a small amount of Tannat in the blend, this is a severe, tannic wine that will age. It has plum skin fruits, great weight and concentration, a dark, brooding structure, firm and solid. Age for 4_5 years.",Cuvée Réservée de l'Aïeul,Château Eugénie
"Flors di Uis is a gorgeous white blend of Malvasia Istriana, Friulano and Riesling Renano that opens with a complex bouquet of yellow flower, stone fruit and spice. The mouthfeel is generous and thick with long-lasting floral nuances spread over the finish.",Flors di Uis,Vie di Romans
"There's nothing elegant about this Cabernet, but it does score high on the deliciousness scale. Shows Dry Creek's rustic tannin structure, with a scoury mouthfeel, but the blackberry, blueberry and currant flavors, which are accented with smoky oak, are incredible. Drink it over the next few years, and watch it change as it breathes in the glass.",Andolsen,Sbragia
"Who wouldn't love this Cabernet? It defines the famous description of wines from this district as an iron fist in a velvet glove. Shows a firmly tannic structure, with good acidity and a firm minerality. That's the iron. The velvet is the ripe, rich black currant and cherry fruit. Glamorous and delicious, it gives its best over the next six years.",Reserve,Martin Ray
"A big, rich, flashy Chardonnay that's designed to impress, and does. Almost too much of a good thing, with massive lemondrop candy, pineapple, lime and kiwi fruit flavors, as well as firm minerality and lots of toasty oak. Drink now with opulent fare, such as shellfish.",Drake Estate Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"A big and powerful wine with a vibrant, rich texture. Dense black plum and ripe berry fruits push through the firm tannins. The wine is smooth and perfumed with a big spicy aftertaste. Drink now, or keep for 2_3 years.",L'Oratoire,Domaine de l'Hermitage
"A dark and rich wood aged wine, packing the intense punch of Tannat while smoothing and rounding it with spicy wood, dark chocolate and sweet plums. Age for 3_4 years and more.",Vignes Vieilles,Domaine du Crampilh
"For the second year in a row, Decoy has released one of the best values in Zinfandel of the vintage. This year, Sonoma County is source to the grapes, and the wine shows classic wild berry, cola, anise, pepper and sandalwood flavors. Most remarkable is the tannic structure, which is smooth and distinguished. Easy to find, with 15,000 cases produced.",,Decoy
"This gorgeous Riserva Chardonnay shows modern oak touches of vanilla and toasted almond backed by apricot, honeysuckle and creamy lemon mousse. It's a thick, structured white wine with a creamy finish that would pair with chicken, shellfish or pork.",Castel Ringberg Riserva,Elena Walch
"Doesn't say so on the label, but according to the winery the grapes come from the highly regarded La Encantada Vineyard. It's a very fine wine, showing cool-climate acidity, bright, ripe red fruits and fuzzy tannins, to which oak contributes a smoky, buttery sweetness. Good now, and should hold over the next six years.",,Inception
"A big, sturdy auslese, nearly dry in style yet showing some botrytis and plenty of concentration. Hints of dried apricots and mushrooms lead the way, and there is some citrusy character, but this brooding wine is best served with cheeses or savory dishes.",Erbacher Steinmorgen Auslese,Baron Knyphausen
"Dense and complex wine, packed with the ripest fruit. It has powerful tannins, although they are easily balanced by the rich plum and damson flavors. The wine is solid, chunky, based on a dry and firm core, ready for aging over 4 years.",,Château du Cèdre
"Also known as Mourvèdre. This Spanish-inspired Monastrell from Bokisch, grown on a hillside, is brawny with plenty of earth and bacon bite to it, yet also floral, rich yet also bright, tasting of black cherry and pomegranate with a menthol tobacco chaser.",Belle Colline Vineyard,Bokisch
"A surprisingly perfumed, well-integrated and delicious Cab from the Santa Monica Mountains, where newcomer Howard Leight is starting to craft some superb juice. With some room to grow, this wine has plenty of elegant red plum and anise and its tannins are present but not overwhelming. Grab a steak and give it a go, especially at the price.",Reserve,Malibu Rocky Oaks
"A worthy tribute, this dark and concentrated Shiraz oozes rich fruit notes of mulled boysenberry, blackberry and cherry all dusted with cocoa powder, whole baking spice and tree bark. Big and gripping with assertive tannins and a firm structure, this is one that should age nicely; try after 2014.",Ronnie Melck A Tribute,Muratie
"An interesting blend of Cab Sauv, Merlot, Malbec and Tempranillo, this red boasts a beautiful array of aromas and flavors: cassis, eucalyptus, blackberry, fig, tobacco and cinnamon. With a velvety texture and medium tannins, there's a good grip to the long finish laced with accents of leather and black tea leaves.",Scaramanga,Nabygelegen
"Gorgeous, opulent and intense, Chardonnay Ciampagnis Vieris boasts a precise vein of dusty mineral or crushed stone that serves as the wine's backbone. Surrounding it are plusher tones of stone fruit, creamy vanilla and exotic fruit.",Ciampagnis Vieris,Vie di Romans
"Softly delicious, this Cabernet is perfect for drinking now. Its blackberry, currant and cocoa flavors are housed in wonderfully ripe, accessible tannins. Shows the elegance of a superior Napa Cab.",Estate Grown,Turnbull
"Although it took a little while to open up, the wine eventually expresses itself beautifully with deep notes of crushed purple florals, black cherry and blueberry along with a hint of game. Lush and full with a satiny texture, the mouth is heady and satisfying with a concentrated fruit core supported by cedar and mocha on the close.",Unfined and Unfiltered,Stark-Condé
"This is Rochioli's basic Pinot Noir. It's a beautiful wine, marked by great structure and accessible fruit. Near-perfect acids and tannins lend it elegance, while the cherry and cola flavors have a rich touch of smoky oak. Drink now.",,Rochioli
"With the richness of the vintage in mind, this wine makes a powerfully extravagant statement. There is nothing subdued about the concentrated tannins or the intensely rich black fruits. Even with 3_4 years aging, this will still be a bold wine.",La Roque,Mas del Périé
"A seductive and easy-pleasing wine, this ripe and lush beauty, named after the winemaker's daughter, will draw you in with its sultry notes of ripe brambly berries, forest floor, cured meat, sweet smoke and spice. The mouthfeel is like velvet and the finish long, with a gorgeous mocha- and licorice root-flavored finish.",Cuvée Ameena,Vins d'Orrance
"A fine value among moderately aged Malbecs. Smells like a well-grilled steak along with earthy berry and dry oak. Feels fresh and pure, with proper balance and a lively mix of toast, coconut, blackberry, spice and textured tannins. Compact and just right on the finish. 500 cases made; excellent for under $20.",Reserve,Proemio
"This gorgeous Cape blend, made from 30% Pinotage, 31% Syrah, 30% Cab Sauv and 3% Mourvèdre, is ripe and immediately enticing on the nose with aromas of crushed Thin Mint cookies and iris petals mingling perfectly with the blackberry, blueberry and fig fruit core. Well balanced and firmly structured with a spicy, lingering finish.",Three Cape Ladies,Warwick
"The best of the 2009 lineup from Willamette Valley Vineyards, this Eola-Amity Hills single-vineyard offering has the most complexity, in both nose and mouthfeel. Balanced fruits fill the palate, with spicy hints of earth, leaf and a wash of barrel-induced mocha.",Elton,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"Opens with lovely blackberry and herb aromas that suggest richness and ripeness but not overt weight. It feels lush and deep, and tastes totally pleasant and easy, with black fruit, toast and pepper flavors. A thorough and balanced blend of Malbec, Cabernet and Syrah.",Reserva,Sottano
"Rudera, derived from the Latin word rudus meaning broken fragments of stone, is a heady and deep Cab matured in French oak for 22 months. Dark and rich, there's ample cigar box spice, bramble and cocoa accents to the black fruit core. The mouth is lush, like crushed satin, with good grip and balanced acidity.",,Rudera
"From the Frescobaldi's wine venture in northeast Italy, Cicinis is a rich and sophisticated blend of white grapes (Sauvignon, Friulano and Pinot Bianco) that delivers toasted almond, apricot, pineapple and freshly baked piecrust. This luscious, oak-driven white would pair with risotto, chicken or lobster.",Cicinis,Attems
"A beautiful Cabernet Sauvignon, balanced and elegant. It's flashy in blackberries and currants, with an elaborate coating of oak, yet not over the top, withdrawing its fruit at the last minute to finish in a swirl of minerality and spice. Should develop over the next six years.",,Broman
"A warm, beautifully balanced wine, with a fine weight of black fruits, juicy acidity, all rounded with tannins and some wood. This ageworthy wine is concentrated while remaining poised and elegant.",La Gloire de Mon Père,Château Tour des Gendres
"This iconic Syrah is big and gripping in every sense: a dark, boysenberry and raspberry fruit-infused bouquet; a spicy, deeply flavored palate; a thick and chewy texture with superb strength. Luckily, there's enough acidity and supporting elements of earthy tobacco and wild animal to keep it balanced and lifted enough. Decant if drinking now, or hold for another couple of years.",,Boekenhoutskloof
"The vintage has given a rich wine, one that is still young. Over the wood notes are ripe yellow fruits, orange marmalade and intense acidity. Age this concentrated wine for 2_3 years.",Cuvée Pauline,Château Jolys
"Lis is a gorgeous blend of Pinot Grigio, Chardonnay and Sauvignon that shows the best of northeast Italy. Beautifully balanced aromas, including stone fruit and vanilla cream, are offset by a smooth, creamy mouthfeel.",Lis,Lis Neris
"A succulent Pinot Noir, rich and ripe in cherries, tart cranberries, orange zest and Dr. Pepper cola, with sweet, smoky notes from oak barrel aging. The tight tannins and zesty acids together suggest midterm aging. Should hit its stride after 2013.",R. Buoncristiani Vineyard,Matrix
"There's great spice and depth to this tribute wine in honour of Graham Joseph Beck. Intense notes of cigar box spice, black pepper, cedar bark and cocoa powder all abound in the bouquet and follow through all the way to the long close. Black fruit flavors are present, but the spice takes center stage. Firm, gripping tannins flood the mouth and linger endlessly; try from 2014 on.",Ad Honorem,Graham Beck
"A medium-bodied auslese that's very sweet but balanced by lime-like acids that extend through the lively finish, with dominant notes of dried apricots and candied pineapple.",Serrig Schloss Saarsteiner Auslese,Schloss Saarstein
"A textbook example in how to make a Chardonnay that's ripely fruity and oaky, yet maintains impeccable balance. The orange, apricot, green apple and lime flavors hit the jackpot, while brisk acidity and minerality provide equilibrium. Possesses that rare quality of elegance.",,Rochioli
"Mixing delicate highlights of dried leaves with generous flavors of ripe berries, this appealing, open, delicious Resonance Reserve is finished at just 13.8% alcohol. It is a pretty wine, balanced and lightly annotated with caramel and milk chocolate.",Resonance Vineyard Reserve,Sineann
"This is a seriously gorgeous Sauvignon that bursts opens with enormous fragrance and finishes with piquant spice that tingles in the mouth. In between are luscious layers of citrus blossom, exotic or passion fruit and tomato leaf.",Kirchleiten,Tiefenbrunner
"This big, soft, delicious Syrah tastes like a candy bar. It's rich and sweet in blackberry jam, blueberry pie with the crust, cocoa and spice flavors, with an umami tanginess like bacon. Easy to savor it through the entire bottle, although the alcohol level is high.",Christensen Family Vineyard,Novy
"You'll want to give this young Cab some time in the cellar, because it's locked down in tannins. Buried underneath the astringency is a wealth of sweet black currants and savory anise and sandalwood. Try after 2011.",,Chimney Rock
"Vigneto La Villa opens with ripe, pulpy fruit and fresh aromas of plum, blackberry, crushed mineral and exotic spice. The wine takes on a ruby color and there is slight browning on the edges. The mouthfeel shows great balance between the fresh acidity and drying tannins. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",Vigneto La Villa,Seghesio
"From a hard-edged vintage, this Bordeaux blend is just beginning to open up, but has a firm structure and a steely spine. The aromas are strongly varietal, with a mix of fresh herbs and sharp tannins. The fruit is subtle, black cherry and cassis, threaded with smoke.",,Tranche
"The percentage of Grenache has been bumped up in Rôtie's second vintage, now at 70%, with the rest an even split between Syrah and Mourvèdre. Soft and spicy scents are laced with a mix of rock and vanilla. This nicely structured yet approachable wine might be mistaken for a Washington take on Priorat. The underlying minerality gives the light, plummy fruit a solid footing, and extends the length considerably.",Southern Blend Red,Rôtie Cellars
"Here is a clean and straightforward Barolo from the Monforte d'Alba area that offers feminine aromas of blue flower, pressed rose, licorice, ginger and root beer. The wine delivers a compact, streamlined feel and a very polished, fine   finish.",,Monti
"This Barolo with fruit sourced from the Rocche cru in Castiglione Falletto offers slightly aged aromas of old spice, candied fruit, smoked ham and cured beef. The wine is elegant and very drying on the finish. Hold until 2015.",Rocche,Monchiero
"Give this fresh young Pinot a few years to come around. Right now, it's brisk in primary fruit cherry, blackberry and cola flavors, with bright acidity and furry tannins. Shows all the hallmarks of a wine that wants age. Should develop after 2013.",Solomon Hills Vineyard,Rusack
"What a nice Cabernet this is. It's so dry and well-structured, tantalizing your palate with hints of richness instead of swamping it with fruit and oak. Shows summer-ripe, briary blackberry and black currant flavors, with grounding notes of dried herbs, violets, tobacco, licorice and cedar, leading to a distinguished finish. Now_2013.",Risa,White Cottage Ranch
"Beautifully light, a steely core wrapped in apricot, citrus and the brightest, perfumed acidity. A delicious wine, packed with fresh, pure fruit character.",Innere Bergen,Zull
"This Right Bank-styled blend includes 19% Cabernet Franc and 5% Petit Verdot. Despite its high (15.3%) alcohol, it's a meaty, complex wine that drinks much lighter. The berry/cherry fruit flavors are woven into a tapestry of earth, herb and spice, smooth and detailed, and the wine has a mouth-pleasing seamless quality that invites another sip, and another.",,Dumas Station
"Here's a distinctive expression of Nebbiolo with aromas of sweet cherry, vanilla, caramel, ground clove, cassis and moist pipe tobacco. The wine is tart and streamlined in the mouth with impressive intensity and persistency.",Rocche,Brovia
"This Riserva opens with a garnet color and browning edges, followed by sophisticated aromas of old spice, cola, licorice and tar. The wine treads over the palate in light, delicate steps and leaves loads of menthol and eucalyptus-like intensity. Hold five years or more.",Bussia Munie Riserva,Franco Conterno
"Prapò is textbook Barolo with classic aromas of wild berry, white truffle, cola, ginger and root beer. The wine has a menthol-like lift and tastes elegant and fine on the close. This is a perfect wine for Barolo purists.",Prapò,Germano Ettore
Smoky graphite notes with spice and black cherry open the nose of this nicely concentrated Barolo from the Sorano cru in Serralunga d'Alba. The wine is well textured with firm but velvety tannins and refreshing crispness on the close.,Sorano,Giacomo Ascheri
"There's a very interesting and unique Asian quality here that reveals itself on the nose as saffron, soya, clove and Chinese barbecue sauce. The wine is lean and compact in the mouth with a long, silky finish: Hold five to 10 years in your cellar.",Sorano Coste & Bricco,Giacomo Ascheri
"Earthy and a touch shy at first, with lightly floral aromas that blend well with the scents of baked plum, prune and blackberry. It's heavy and cheek-grabbing, but also hugely flavorful and loaded with cassis, blackberry, herbs and tobacco. Long as a marathon on the finish. Drink from 2011 through 2014. 1,000 cases made.",Founder's Selection,Echeverria
"The celebrated Cerequio cru is known for its elegant and refined wines. However, in this hot vintage, you can taste the maturity of the fruit thanks to the wine's aromas of plum, prune and spice cake. Clay soils help shape the wine's natural density and structure.",Cerequio,Contratto
"The 2004 Bricco Riund Riserva makes a very nice first impression thanks to the elegant and fine nature of its aromas. There's a definite aromatic lift here, spurred forward by buoyant aromas of root beer, cherry, menthol, white stone and dried currants. Give it a few more years in the bottle to soft those firm tannins.",Bricco Riund Riserva,Cascina del Monastero
"This is a big Barbaresco executed in a bold, modern style that can either be consumed immediately, or can be put aside to age in your cellar. Soft layers of spice, nutmeg and vanilla are enhanced by bursting flavors of cherry and blueberry. The wine is rich, dense and opulent overall.",Sori Paolin,Cascina Luisin
"The Vignolo Barolo Riserva opens with ripe aromas of black cherry and strawberry followed by leather, tobacco, tar and black licorice. The wine still has more aging to do: the mouthfeel is sharp, generous and polished.",Vignolo Riserva,Cavallotto
"Boroli is a dynamic winery worth keeping a close eye on. Barolo Villero takes a traditional approach that speaks highly of the beautifully hilly area that shaped the wine. Delicate aromas include wild berries, dried orange zest, apple skin, licorice, tar and cigar box. In the mouth, the wine is streamlined and tight.",Villero,Boroli
"Here's an earthy, savory expression of Barolo from the prized La Serra cru that truly shows Nebbiolo typicity. You'll recognize aromas of iron and mineral backed by cola, white mushroom, tar and cassis fruit. That earthy personality is followed by drying, dusty tannins and the wine is exceptionally long on the finish.",La Serra,Marcarini
"Loads of crushed mineral__late and white stone__haracterize the bouquet at first but are soon followed by delicate aromas of cherry cola, balsam and exotic spice. The Serragrilli Barbaresco offers an intense and pristine aromatic presentation backed by thick extraction and dense opulence.",Serragrilli,Marchesi di Barolo
"This is pure Chardonnay, from cool-climate sites, showing a lean, sculpted spine that both defines and expands the flavors. Exceptionally complex for Washington Chardonnay, with good natural acidity, a mix of peach, apple and pineapple fruit, and a finish that shows tight layering. There is a dense core that should unravel with bottle age; this is that rare Washington Chardonnay that will prosper with cellaring.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Barolo Castelletto opens with ripe aromas of blackberry and strawberry with background tones of old leather, spice, espresso bean, tar and root beer. There are drying mineral tones as well and the wine ends with young, slightly astringent tannins.",Castelletto,Mauro Veglio
"Essenza is a ripe expression of Nebbiolo from the 2006 vintage with earthy nuances, wild berry and pressed red rose. This Barolo offers very good dimension and overall depth of aroma, backed by a thicker, pulpier mouthfeel. The tannins are still young so let this wine age at least five more years.",Essenze,Terre da Vino
"This is 100% Pinot Noir, which gives richness to the wine. It is generous, with red apple and pear flavors, still very fresh. An attractive final bite says that it will age.",Cuvée Garance Blanc de Rouges,Thiénot
"Perfumed and restrained, with aromas of rose oil. The wine is balanced, elegant, restrained, acidity pairing with flavors of star fruit, peach and just a touch of spicy sweetness.",Steintal,Neumeister
"Kudos to Jorian Hill for crafting a rosé that's truly dry. It's a sophisticated, elegant blush wine with subtle raspberry, herb, rose petal, spice and mineral flavors, finished with a wonderfully clean scour of acidity. This Provençal blend of Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre is one of the best rosés of the yearn and is reasonably priced.",Hope Springs Eternal,Jorian Hill
"Impresses for the sheer volume of fruit, offering waves of pie filling raspberries, cherries and red currants, with notes of cocoa, bacon, sweet oak and savory spices. A good bite of Central Coast acidity fortunately brings briskness to the richness. Drink now_2012.",Las Alturas Vineyard,Belle Glos
"Zonchera Barolo is presented as the estate's soft and most __odern_ interpretation of Barolo (a sometimes austere and shy wine). This expression, on the other hand, is bold, bright and packed tight with fresh fruit nuances as well as tangy spice and tobacco. You don't need to cellar age this wine long because it's perfectly ready to drink now.",Zonchera,Ceretto
"In style, Coutale doesn't make many concessions to Malbec tannins. What you get is an impressively structured, firmly tannic wine, packed also with black fruits. The solid structure and the weight of fruit demand aging for at least 5 years.",,Clos la Coutale
"Black in color, this rich and dense wine shows powerful black fruits, the tannins forming a dusty core. The vintage has given a wine that is superripe and concentrated, with chocolate and some burnt character from wood. Age for 3_4 years.",Eulalie,Château de Cénac
"This is the most affordable Pinot from Archery Summit, a blend of multiple clones and vineyards, and it's a gem. Full and fruity from the moment you pull the cork, it hits you with flavors of ripe strawberry, blackberry and black cherry, a big mouthful of lush fruit flavor. The finish brings on hints of truffle, licorice and dark chocolate.",Premier Cuvée,Archery Summit
"Bright and earthy, dense and dark, this New World Tempranillo has an Old World soul, with dark cherry and strawberry going on as well as a touch of cocoa and tobacco. Its acidity adds a spark on the finish; this Ribera del Douro native grape seems plenty happy in the middle of California, at least in Bokisch's hands.",,Bokisch
"Soft and relatively open in style, with captivating aromas of wet mossy stones and ripe melon and hints of pear and lychee on the palate. Very approachable now for a young Prüm.",Graacher Himmelreich Auslese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Fruit-forward, showing ripe, sweet blackberry, cherry, blueberry and cocoa flavors, elaborately uplifted by toasty oak. Made in the modern style, it's rich and delicious now.",Cardinal's Peak,Terlato
"Honig's basic Napa Valley Cabernet is consistently rich and drinkable at a young age. This 2008 is their best in many years, showing ripe blackberry, black currant and dark chocolate flavors, grounded with a firm minerality. Give this elegant young Cabernet a few hours in a decanter.",,Honig
"Rich yet subtle wine, full of balanced wood, tarry fruit, flavors of mint and blackberry along with sweet tannins. It marries spice and rich fruit. Well worth aging.",Renaissance,Domaine Rotier
"Somewhat brittle and nervous in the mouth, with lots of tart acidity. The flavors are brilliant, suggesting ripe cranberries, cherries and cola, with a fascinating edge of mushrooms and leather. All indications are that the wine needs time in the bottle to mellow. Drink after 2013.",Estate,Esterlina
"Only 30 cases of this gorgeous wine are imported, so snag what you can when you find it. It's a deep and complex Syrah, exuding attractive aromas and flavors of juicy red cherry and fresh raspberry spiced up with accents of vanilla crème, sweet wood, soft Earl Gray tea and whole baking spice on the close. Creamy and lush with a silky texture; drink now_2014.",Estalét,Bizoe
"Lafòa is one of the best expressions of Sauvignon from Italy. Careful fruit selection and oak aging create a wine that is important aromatically, as well as structurally. Pristine flavors of citrus, peach and honeysuckle are backed by a creamy feel and a touch of -piquant spice.",Lafòa,Colterenzio
"A Bordeaux blend based on Cabernet Franc, this savory wine has rich flavors of baked black cherry pie, with the crust. The firm edge of tannins gives it a dry astringency, and it's clean and balanced throughout. Doesn't seem like an ager, though, so drink now_2013.",Devil's Peak,Terlato
"A vibrant, fresh, violet petal and orange oil streak cuts through the overall heavy character of this wine. Brimming with black cherry, plum skin and blueberry fruit aromas and flavors, the palate is big and gripping with an earthy black tea leaf- and spicy-bark flavored finish that lingers nicely. Drink now_2015.",,Radford Dale
"Good price for such a lush, likeable Merlot. It's soft and rich in cherries, red currants and licorice. This is easly the best Sebastiani Merlot in many years.",,Sebastiani
"Earthy notes of fresh whole tobacco leaf, licorice and vanilla bean spice up the blackberry and cassis fruit on the nose and palate. The velvety mouthfeel is loaded with dusty, fine-grain tannins, with a lifting acidity that keeps the long, cedary finish fresh and vibrant. Ready to drink now, but should also keep nicely for another 2_4 years.",Peter Barlow,Rustenberg
"From southern, coastal Tuscany comes this opulent, richly textured Chardonnay that competes with the best of France and California. Thick layers of yellow rose, vanilla and apricot drive a creamy, long-lasting mouthfeel. The wine delivers sophistication, class and personality.",,Monteverro
"Creamy, rich and immensely satisfying, this carefully crafted Trebbiano d'Abruzzo opens with mature notes of apricot, lemon zest, vanilla cream and pineapple. The mouthfeel is what sets its apart, however: It's decadently opulent and long-lasting.",Marina Cvetic',Masciarelli
"Hugely concentrated wine, full of new toasty wood flavors, its structure packed with tannins. That said, there is also a weight of black currant fruit, richly jammy, adding to the sense of power.",Moulin des Dames,Château Tour des Gendres
"Formigar is a gorgeous and opulent Chardonnay with lavish aromas of mature fruit, apricot, honeysuckle and toasted almond. It's super smooth and creamy in the mouth and those cool-climate, passion fruit flavors really pop on the finish.",Formigar Cornell,Colterenzio
"As much rich as sweet, this is a honey- and dry botrytis-flavored wine, with tropical mango flavors complementing lemon acidity. It's a complex, intense wine, textured and ageworthy. Screwcap.",Cuvée Beerenauslese,Esterházy
"Rich, spicy wine with many flavors of new wood to go with the blackberry acidity and dark tannins. It is developing into a smooth and polished wine, ripe and, at the end, deliciously juicy.",Föllig,Esterházy
"Benefiting from the ripe 2009 vintage, this is an intense and concentrated wine, full of jammy plum and red berry flavors, spiced with licorice and pepper. The wine has good concentration. Ready to drink now or age 3_5 years.",Les Gravels,Domaine Rotier
"Hard to explain why this Cabernet is so good at such an affordable price, but there you are. It's dry, smooth and complex in blackberry, black currant, mineral and oak flavors that are a joy to drink now with your best beef dish. Easy to find, with almost 31,000 cases produced.",,Decoy
"Tuscan dishes celebrate fresh, seasonal ingredients such as fava beans, artichokes, asparagus, zucchini and extra virgin olive oil. This structured white wine offers the richness of texture and aromatic intensity to pair with the best of that culinary tradition.",Bat_r,Agricola Querciabella
"This oak-aged blend of equal parts Pinot Bianco and Chardonnay opens with a beautifully intense bouquet of vanilla bean, peach cobbler and citrus mousse. White almond and toasted spice make for rich accents on the long fresh finish.",Bat_r,Agricola Querciabella
"Yes, this does not shy away from the herbal bite often found in Oregon Pinot. But that accent is nicely integrated into a firm, balanced wine with penetrating red fruits and darker notes of black coffee, black licorice and a whiff of fresh truffle.",Reserve,Illahe
"Pure and striking from the start, with menthol aromas that come with blackberry and cassis. Feels dense and concentrated, with blackberry, prune and dark spice flavors. Layered, mellow and slight jammy on the multitiered finish. Drink now.",Blue Melosa,Gouguenheim Winery
"Ripe, rich and overall yummy, this Syrah offers bright notes of red plum and cherry laced with a touch of gaminess and soft foliage. The medium-weight mouthfeel boasts fine tannins and prominent acidity that provides a nice lift to the long, spicy finish.",The Ridge,Graham Beck
"Dry, firmly tannic wine, dominated by mint and coffee flavors along with wood. The fruit underneath has a suggestion of ripe blackberry flavors but will need at least 3 years to come out. It is a powerful, complex wine for aging.",Cuvée Prestige,Château du Port
"This is a big, full-bodied Pinot Noir. If you're seeking a delicate style, go elsewhere. It's fleshy and precociously rich in cherry and mulberry fruit that's soft and chewy, like a candy bar. Such are the acids and tannins that you'll want to cellar it for three or four years.",Estate,Boekenoogen
"In the case of this Champagne's label, it's the women seducing the man. And, yes, this is an elegant Champagne, dominated by crisp Chardonnay acidity, ripe apples and citrus. There is minerality to add to the stylish mix.",Séduction Brut,Charles Ellner
"Marked by big, ripe, juicy blackberry, raspberry and currant fruit, this single-vineyard Syrah is saved from simplicity by two things. There are complex notes of bacon, sautéed mushrooms, black pepper and smoky oak, and the tannins are wonderfully rich and ripe. Really delicious. Probably best soon, though, before the fruit fades.",Grist Vineyard,Bradford Mountain
"From a vineyard sited near the winery, this is the most supple, balanced and evenly detailed of the 2007 red wines from Fidélitas. The lightly muscled, compact fruit flavors bring black cherry, cassis, and plum together, with a strong minerality providing subtext. A suggestion of smoke suffuses the finish.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Fidelitas
"From the Sottocastello, __nder the castle_ cru, comes this silky, polished Barolo. The bouquet here is redolent of exotic spice and church incense and there's plenty of currant berry and forest berry to give the wine a vibrant, youthful personality. But elegance is also present and so are firm tannins that suggest longevity.",Sottocastello,Le Ginestre
"Rich and creamy, yellow fruit ripeness over lime zest acidity. This is powerful wine, although not heavy, its acidity bursting out through the complex flavors.",Leithagebirge,Kollwentz
"A sensation of polished black stone with cherry, leather, tar and spice opens the nose of this beautifully elegant Barolo made with fruit sourced from the Case Nere vineyard. The wine is soft, modern and plush with a rich velvety finish and a savory end note.",Vigna Case Nere,Fratelli Casetta
"This is a straightforward and genuine Barolo with deep layers of bright fruit, spice and mineral packaged seamlessly together as a whole. In the mouth, the wine is clean and elegant with dry, finely textured tannins.",Cerretta,Germano Ettore
"Giacomo Fenocchio's Barolo Villero is an extremely clean and polished wine with cheerful aromas of eucalyptus, root beer, humus, crushed stone, smoke, tar and small forest berries. This is the perfect wine to pair with stewed veal or lamb.",Villero,Giacomo Fenocchio
"The Bussia cru boasts elegant, feminine wines and this expression is no exception. You'll get tight aromas of blue flower, cassis, wet earth and white chocolate. The wine is elegant and silky on the close. The young tannins need another five years of cellar aging to soften.",Bussia,Giacosa Fratelli
"This Barolo from the Gattera vineyard of La Morra opens with bold personality and chiseled aromas of cola, spice, black fruit, root beer, licorice, dried tobacco and herbs. The wine holds the banner high as far as Nebbiolo tradition goes and offers a long, spice- filled finish. Drink after 2015.",Vigne Gattera,Gianfranco Bovio
"Black in color, with sweet, full-force aromas of cola and black fruits. There's staunch acidity on the palate, something that will barely be noticed if drunk with food. Meanwhile, the flavors are flashy but smooth, with a play toward coffee, blackberry, chocolate and herbs. Dense and deep; very nice Merlot.",Cuvée Alexandre Apalta Vineyard,Lapostolle
"A nutty aroma follows through to the mature palate of this distinguished Blanc de Blancs. It has a good element of acidity, toast and spice and an intense pear and mineral aftertaste.",Fleur de Champagne Blanc de Blancs Brut,Perrier Jouët
"This is an extremely distinctive and site-specific expression of Barbaresco from the celebrated Roncaglie cru. The wine is characterized by feminine, delicate tones of subtle Indian spice, pressed rose petal, violets and light vanilla or white chocolate. It boasts well-integrated freshness and finely polished tannins.",Roncaglie,Poderi Colla
"Prunotto tends to exemplify a ripe, almost jammy style of Barolo with succulent cherry and smoked meat characteristics followed by vanilla, cinnamon, mineral, blackberry and licorice. The intensity is wonderful here but the wine still needs a few extra aging years in the bottle to relax those young tannins.",,Prunotto
"A soft product of a soft vintage, offering rich fruit as well as a crisp texture. The balance is just right: green apples and lime to go with yeast and acidity that lies neatly under everything. Age this excellent wine for 2_3 years.",Cuvée Spéciale Millésimé Brut,Nicolas Feuillatte
"This expression of Nebbiolo from the Le Coste vineyard opens with fresh and vibrant aromas of cherries, raspberries and cassis. Those fruit notes are enhanced by spice, vanilla and smoky highlights that brighten up the wine's firm but streamlined mouthfeel.",Le Coste,Pecchenino
"This is just the third Sauvignon Blanc from Stevens (none was made in 2008), sourced from Klipsun vineyard and stainless steel fermented. Richly textural, with a creamy minerality, this has a pleasing intensity, a sort of nervosity (as the French might put it), lined with a sweet grain character. The fruits are tart and racy, a mix of citrus rind and pulp, tangerine and pineapple, finished with natural acidity.",AnotherThought,Stevens
"An interesting wine for its moderate alcohol and extreme dryness. Leaner and more structured than a plump Napa Cab, it shows juicy blackberry, currant, mineral and oak flavors that are streamlined and elegant. A bite of alcohol makes this pretty wine balanced and clean through the finish.",,Skyhawk Lane
"Sottimano makes five expressions of Barbaresco and this wine from the Pajoré cru delivers surprisingly ripe aromas of cherry, wild berries, white truffle, chopped herbs and drying mineral. It's an elegant and refined wine with noticeable acidity and a sharp finish, yet the 2007 summer heat shows up in the wine's flavors and fleshy aromas.",Pajoré,Sottimano
"A mature, beautifully balanced wine, with great fresh raspberry and red currant flavors. It is rich, dense, balancing toast, yeast and fresh fruit. With its dry edge, think of this as a food wine.",Brut Rosé,Ruinart
"Smooth and rich, with ripe, spiced peach as well as a mineral edge. The acidity tightens the generous texture of this powerful wine, leaving the concentration deliciously fresh.",Alte Setzen Reserve,Markus Huber
"Pian Cavallo is a unique and distinct wine that will appeal to those who appreciate a bigger, more robust style of Barbaresco. The very intense bouquet brings forth aromas of perfume, scented candle and sweet Christmas spice. Bright fruit tones appear in the mouth along with firmly structured tannins that will ensure a long aging future.",Pian Cavallo,Negro Giuseppe
"A wood-aged Grüner, with a definite toast and caramel element, concentrated ripe plums and greengage. The aftertaste reveals fresher fruit and acidity.",Haidberg,Norbert Bauer
"Putting your nose into a glass of Oddero Barolo Villero is like sniffing a handful of Langhe soil. This wine speaks highly of its territory with aromas of smoke, earth, forest berry, white truffle, hazelnut, cola, root beer, humus and dried apple skins. In the mouth, the tannins are impressively polished and fine.",Villero,Oddero
"Here's a compact, streamlined wine that very much lives up to Barolo tradition. Aromas here include ethereal balsam notes, eucalyptus, coffee, tar, black fruit, mineral and honey-roasted ham. In the mouth, the wine leaves a tight, tart and long-lasting impression.",Rocche di Castiglione,Roccheviberti
"First to arrive, straight to your awaiting nose, are complex aromatics, with a mix of floral and spicy highlights that surround the black and purple fruits with exotic nuances. The fruit is nigh perfect__ipe, round, forward and loaded with plummy, sweet berries. It gathers strength in the core, holds, and then expands into a finish dusted with cocoa and coffee.",Pepper Bridge Vineyard Apogee,L'Ecole No. 41
"Here's a dark and brooding Barolo that opens with masculine aromas of dark fruit, Indian spice, black tea, tar, resin and licorice. The intensity and complexity are impressive. The wine needs five more years of bottle aging to soften those young tannins.",San Giuseppe,Pecchenino
"Barolo Meriame is a surprisingly tonic and bright wine with a ruby color and amber highlights. The wine is elegant and smooth on the nose with wild berries, ginger, hummus and powdered licorice. It finishes with bright menthol and balsam nuances.",Meriame,Paolo Manzone
"Cantina del Nebbiolo is a cooperative winery with 175 members. This gorgeous base Barbaresco has been shaped by light wood influences that are integrated so well, they appear only as aromatic highlights over the wine's rich fruit component. There's spice, cinnamon and clove and the wine's mouthfeel is rich and continuous.",,Cantina del Nebbiolo
"Lively cherry, blackberry, cola and cedar tones mark the bouquet of this ruby-colored Barolo from the Cerrati cru. Toasted oak and spice aromas are delicately woven within and the wine finishes with crisp freshness and firm tannins.",Cerrati,Cascina Cucco
"Soft and unctuous, this wine has sweet flavors of ripe fruits, glycerine and new oak, balanced with crisp acidity. Pinotage is the South African cross between Pinot Noir and Cinsault, and the wine has a silky texture and luscious flavors of cherries, red currants, vanilla and pepper spice. Terrific with mushroom risotto.",Wholer Vineyard,Longboard
"A clean and attractive Chard with no malo, this is a perfect choice for folks looking for that magical balance between ripe fruit and toast. Red apple flesh, peach pit, orange oil and toasted egg bread all abound on the nose and mouth, with a long and mouthwatering finish that evolves from ripe fruit flavors to soft oaky spice.",,Mulderbosch
"Novy's Syrahs have really hit their stride lately. This one, from this little Sonoma County appellation, is soft and rich in blackberries, blueberries and Canadian bacon, with a smoky layer of charred oak. It is, in a word, delicious.",Judge Family Vineyard,Novy
"Light (for Sineann) and almost delicate, but expressive and delightful, with lovely fruit displaying highlights of peach, cherry and hard candy. Broadly appealing, with a lick of light chocolate in the finish.",Yates Conwill Vineyard,Sineann
"Pinot Grigio Unterebner offers a beautiful contrast between cool-climate aromas of white flower and passion fruit and spicy, oak-driven aromas of vanilla and cinnamon bun. Pair this wine with a savory appetizer strudel filled with spinach, cheese and pine nuts.",Unterebner,Tramin
"Burnt toast aromas show the youth of this wine. Their tannins dominate, giving a bitter chocolate and coffee character. The fruit is still lost here and needs 3_4 years to come out. An impressive wine for the future.",Les Acacias,Mas del Périé
"Textbook entry-level Riesling, tightly coiled and medium-bodied, with lovely tension between sweet green-apple fruit notes, minerally hints of crushed stone and zesty acids that recall pink grapefruit. Drink now.",,Peter Nicolay
"Here's a top-shelf expression of Pinot Grigio that shares the best qualities of a high-level white wine. In fact, it offers a whole new face for the popular Italian white wine thanks to its complexity and rich density. It delivers aromas of mature fruit, vanilla cream, honeysuckle and stone fruit.",Sanct Valentin,Cantina Produttori San Michele Appiano
"Elena Walch produces one of the finest Pinot Grigios available (aged 25% percent in oak and the rest in stainless steel) with citrus, peach and almond paste aromas. The wine stands out both for the quality and the intensity of its beautiful bouquet.",Castel Ringberg,Elena Walch
"A spicy, wood-aged Chardonnay, its ripe tropical fruit deliciously melded into the texture. It is rounded and full-bodied with a fine citrus acidity among all the richness. Age for another and it will be delicious.",Lama,Esterházy
"Campanaro is a unique blend of Fiano and Greco grapes that opens with a beautiful bouquet of stone fruit, honey, white almond and Golden Delicious apple. It a dry, crisp wine with a focused, fine feel in the mouth.",Campanaro,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Almost black, this is a concentrated, black plum skin- and blackberry-driven wine, laced throughout with dense tannins. It has weight and concentration as well as the ripest juicy fruit. Age for 3_4 years.",Patiement,Château Ponzac
"What a great red wine, just about perfect for steak. It's dry, full-bodied and tannic, with big, ripe blackberry and blueberry flavors. A little rustic, yes, but terrific for drinking now, and easily one of the best California Malbecs ever. And look at that price.",Reserve,Courtney Benham
"Black cherry and cola flavors are entwined, with a hint of earth. Assertive and flavorful, though still wrapped up tightly, this shows a darker side of coffee and licorice, all nicely balanced with the fruit.",Paciência Estate,Coelho
"A big and rich wine, packed with fine blackberry and red plum fruits, with bitter chocolate and toast flavors. The wine is full-bodied, fruity and also stylishly elegant. Worth aging for 2_3 years.",Classik,Château Jonc Blanc
"Opens with leathery, slightly cheesy aromas before settling on dark fruit. Shows form and layering, with spicy flavors of dried red berry, wild herbs and licorice. Toasty and tightens up on the finish; in good shape for drinking now through 2014. Good value as well.",,Benvenuto de la Serna
"An interesting, well-made blend of Malbec, Petit Verdot and Tannat that deals lemony oak, spice, coconut and ripe berry aromas. Stocky and firm, with nice balance and bold tannins framing flavors of lemon peel, clove, herbs, toast and berry fruit. A complete package; drink now through 2014.",Trisagio,Benvenuto de la Serna
"Yellow tinted, with toasty, creamy aromas of baked apple and pear. Feels round and fleshy but fresh, with peach and baked apple flavors blended with copious toasty oak. Toasty and long on the finish; a high-quality Chardonnay for sure.",Catena Alta,Bodega Catena Zapata
"Loosen's best Dr. L to date, this is a terrific value, delivering typical Mosel Riesling notes at a great price. Citrus blossom, lime and crushed stone aromas are followed by apple and citrus flavors in this just-slightly-sweet wine. Drink it now and over the next year or so.",Dr. L,Loosen Bros.
Soft layers of Chardonnay with aromas of vanilla cream and stone fruit are blended with fresh notes of citrus and passion fruit from the Vermentino element found within. The two varieties complement each other very well and produce an elegant wine for shellfish or seafood risotto.,Torveto,Lungarotti
"Bright black berry and purple floral notes immediately waft from the glass, followed shortly after by glimmers of sweet smoke, tea leaf and soft leather. Fruit-forward and balanced, the round mouth is framed by medium-fine tannins and lifting acidity. A hint of milk chocolate sexes up the close.",Estate Wine,Kanonkop
"Generous in blackberries, blueberries and cedar, with a pleasantly meaty, smoky edge. Quite fine in its own way, but a bit angular at this time. Blame it on immaturity, and give this young Cabernet at least five years to mellow out.",Montecillo Vineyard,Keating
"Premstaler Sauvignon shows wonderful balance and pure fragrances of exotic fruit, citrus and fresh sage. The rich aromatic component is countered beautifully by a silky, fine mouthfeel that shows density but not heaviness.",Premstaler,Kellerei Kaltern Caldaro
"This plush, rich expression of Pinot Grigio from northeast Italy would pair with white meat, seafood risotto or spicy dishes from the Far East. The mouthfeel is smooth, rich and long-lasting.",Gris,Lis Neris
"Mer Soleil's Chardonnay grapes dependably get so ripe, they offer explosive flavors even without oak. You won't miss a thing without that barrel. The pineapple, orange and golden mango flavors are delicious on their own, and even offer a hint of vanilla. A mouthwateringly fresh squeeze of acidity makes everything bright and clean.",Silver Unoaked,Mer Soleil
"Like the label says, this Viognier is sweet, with honey, apricot, orange and vanilla cream flavors, brightened with fine acidity. Give it more concentration, and the score would soar. Still, it's a very nice dessert wine for the price.",Oley Late Harvest Sweet,Novy
"Enosi is a cool-climate blended white with a beautifully aromatic component that would pair with dishes flavored with wild herbs and fresh cheese. A welcoming floral component is followed by passion fruit, kiwi and chopped basil.",Enosi,Baron di Pauli
"Celebrating its 10-year anniversary, Vespa (a creamy blend of Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc and Picolit) shows rich texture and compelling aromas of apricot, honeysuckle, pineapple and vanilla mousse.",Vespa,Bastianich
"Perfumed, minty wine, very solidly structured, while also showing delicious red berry fruits. The tannins have a distinct mineral character, chewy although well integrated with the fruit.",Prestige,Château Saint-Sernin
"There's a soothing, silky quality to this sunny Tuscan Chardonnay that sets it apart in a crowd. The wine is aged in both stainless steel and oak in order to maintain its fresh aromas of apricot and candied citrus as well as the richness of its texture.",Fabrizio Bianchi,Castello di Monsanto
"Barolo Lorens offers a hearty, meaty expression of Barolo that would pair with beef and wild mushroom stew or bacon-wrapped quail served with wild rice. The wine boasts deep, concentrated extraction with aromas of bresaola, smoke, spice, ripe cherry and red rose accents. It's thick and long lasting with slightly textured tannins.",Lorens,Eredi Lodali
"Scents of licorice, coffee and tobacco move into concentrated blueberry and cassis fruit flavors that wrap into a tannic, chewy midpalate. The fruit here is outstanding, and the wine delivers excellent, clean, concentrated flavors at this price point. An outstanding value.",Quarry Butte Destiny Ridge Vineyard Red Wine,Alexandria Nicole
"The rigorously en famille Anselma estate offers a bold and innovative interpretation of Barolo with loads of red fruit, cola and exotic spice. Despite its big aromatic personality, the wine is subdued and elegant in the mouth with silky smoothness and a long, mineral-driven finish.",Famiglia Anselma,Anselma
"Beautifully pale in color, this is serious rosé. Its rich and dry character and its red cherry and raspberry flavors are tied together by the finest acidity. Like most Bollinger Champagnes, this needs food.",Rosé Brut,Bollinger
"The Riserva Barolo from the Vigna Liste cru proves to be an enticing and inviting wine with pristine aromas of forest berry, cola and leather. The wine's persona is traditional and elegant and there's enough structure and freshness to ensure long cellar aging: at least five to 10 more years.",Vigna Liste Riserva,Borgogno Giacomo e Figli
"This is a fully unique expression of Nebbiolo with distinct aromas of bacon fat, dried salami, bresaola and playful accents of black fruit and exotic spice. The intensity and power are terrific and the wine is tart, chewy and bright on the close. That inherent freshness makes a nice contrast to those heavier meaty aromas.",Basarin,Adriano Marco & Vittorio
"Once called Crémant de Cramant, this has long been Mumm's signature Champagne. Creamy and soft, it is deliciously balanced, a wine that is both crisp and toasty, with mouthwatering acidity to go with its white currant and green apple flavors.",Mumm de Cramant Grand Cru Brut,G. H. Mumm
"From the celebrated Bussia cru, this elegant Barolo shows pristine aromas of cherry cola, tar, licorice, violet and dried beef jerky. True to Barolo tradition, the wine shows a garnet color and firm, drying tannins.",Bussia,Giacomo Fenocchio
"Gianni Gagliardo is producing excellent results from the estate's newly refurbished winery. This expression from the Serre cru shows elegance and harmony, especially in how its aromas of black fruit, tar, licorice and white truffle come together. Drying tannins and firm structure promise long aging.",Serre,Gianni Gagliardo
"Let's face it, my scores for Indomita's wines have never been very high. But this high-end, best-of-lot Cabernet is excellent and an eye-catcher. The nose of mocha, coconut, blackberry and herbs is classic Maipo Valley, while the mouth is lush, correct and full of sweet cherry, cassis and tobacco flavors. Comfortable throughout, with unbreakable smoothness. Drink now through 2013.",Zardoz,Indomita
"A really nice, elegant Chardonnay at a good price. The wine is dry and lightly oaked, showing rich pineapple, peach, vanilla and buttered toast flavors enhanced with crisp acidity. Only 731 cases were produced of this lovely, food-friendly wine.",,Talley
"Here's a beautifully bright Barolo with characteristic aromas of moist earth, pipe tobacco, wild berries, forest floor and asphalt. The mouthfeel is polished and fine in texture. Pair with tender, hardwood smoked pork.",Montanello,Tenuta Montanello
"Here's a big, bold interpretation of Barbera that sees 18 months of careful aging in oak to achieve aromas of black spice, cassis syrup, cola, mesquite and cedar. You can taste the youthfulness and the freshness of the fruit in the palate, and the wine ends with persistency and a silky texture.",,Tenuta Olim Bauda
"Barolo Vigna Merenda opens with a bright bouquet composed of cherry, spice, floral and balsam elements. This is also an extremely mineral-driven wine that exposes a vein of graphite or crushed stone at its core. Thanks to the wine's natural structure and long persistency, it would make a perfect pairing partner to any dish with black truffles.",Vigna Merenda,Scarzello
"This is tight when first opened, with a hard-edged herbal character. Beneath that shell are richer, tropical fruit flavors of ripe banana, yellow apple and a hint of papaya; and with plenty of breathing time the wine softens and opens out. Roughly two thirds of the barrels were new French oak; and that is still being resolved into the fruit. This wine has a good 6_8 years of life ahead of it, but if you are drinking it now, decant it.",,Tranche
"Tangent makes the best, most consistent unoaked Sauvignon Blanc in California. The 2009 is another classic, offering brilliantly clean, crisp flavors of citrus fruits, green apples and gooseberries. Just beautiful.",Paragon Vineyard,Tangent
"Riserva Vigna Castellero is an approachable and elegant food wine with focused aromas of wild berry and cassis, backed by mineral, cola and powdered licorice. There's a polished and fine nature to the mouthfeel and the wine would stand up to juicy filet mignon topped with foie gras and mushroom pâté.",Vigna Castellero Riserva,Barale Fratelli
"This beautiful base Barbaresco from Albino Rocca (a family-run winery with 45 acres of vine) offers elegant and extremely floral aromas of blue flower, rose petal and cedar followed by bright shades of tar and licorice. The wine is firm and drying with polished tannins on the close. A Marc de Grazia selection; various American importers.",,Albino Rocca
"From the Castiglione Falletto subzone, this classic Barolo delivers delicate aromas of spice, eucalyptus, root beer, hazelnut, underbrush and smoked ham. You'll even notice savory elements of prosciutto or bresaola. The mouthfeel is elegant and bright with drying tannins.",,Livia Fontana
"This Barolo delivers simple and clean fruit tones (think cherry and raspberry) that are shrouded in delicate veils of root beer, white mushroom, bresaola, shaved mineral and dried herbs. On the whole, this is a tight and compact wine that is elegant and complex. Pair it with wild mushroom crepes with creamy gruyère cheese.",Vigna San Biagio,Luigino Grimaldi
"Focused aromas of tar, asphalt, wild berries and blue flowers open the nose of this bright and lively Barbaresco. The wine offers aromatic nuances that peel back slowly and seductively to reveal red fruit and spice. In the mouth, it delivers firm, drying tannins and bitter cherry.",,La Ganghija
"Smooth, nutty character, with fine maturity along with grapefruit acidity. The Champagne is beautifully elegant, with hints of orange zest, finishing with a balanced toastiness.",Brut Millesimé,Laurent-Perrier
"This is a beautiful wine from the nose on out. Complex and aromatic, it has Italian-style tobacco scents, fresh acidity, leafy highlights, and undertones of tar, licorice and clove, all wrapped around tart, pie cherry fruit.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Blended with 17% Sauvignon Blanc, this lovely Sémillon is exceptionally fragrant, satiny and rich, with fleshy, ripe fruits and just a hint of toast. A warm streak of caramel enlivens the finish, which lingers gracefully and fills the palate with delicious flavors of apples and spicy pears.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Literally timeless, L'Intemporelle is an elegant, almost discreet style. It downplays the rich fruit to present a stylish wine, with citrus highlights over ripe yellow fruit. This 2005 is still young; age for 3_4 years.",L'Intemporelle Brut,Mailly Grand Cru
"Elegance and finesse characterize this wine and suggest that it may already be suitable to drink within the next five years or so. Aromas include dark chocolate, tar, espresso grinds and smoked beef. Those aged tertiary fragrances are emerging now and the wine is thick, firm and luscious on the close.",Riserva,Mario Gagliasso
"The Ferrero factory in Alba fills the air with delicious aromas of melted chocolate and roasted hazelnut. Those are the same fragrances you will enjoy here backed by standard Nebbiolo tones of wild berry, cola and earth. The tannins are drying, firm and help keep the palate clean.",Gavarini Chiniera,Elio Grasso
"The Brunate cru, with denser soils, is known for meatier, more structured wines. This Barolo offers elegance, power and complexity with lingering aromas of exotic spice, black fruit and root beer. It's also exceptionally bright and lively in the mouth and would pair with a hearty wintery dish such as beef Bourguignon.",Le Brunate,Francesco Rinaldi
"Frog's Leap strove for elegance above power in this modulated, ageworthy wine. Tasted against bigger, riper Cabs, it's almost lean, with herb-infused red cherry, violet and mineral flavors, wrapped into complex tannins. The alcohol is a refreshingly low 13.6%. This is a connoisseur's wine, and it should develop for 10_15 years in a proper cellar.",,Frog's Leap
"Wines from the Villero cru tend to show great elegance and complexity of aromas. This expression does just that and adds tones of spice, tar, black currant and cola along the way. The tannins are dry and dusty and the wine will age nicely for ten years or more.",Villero,Giacomo Fenocchio
"There is a danger that the otherwise fine wines of Daniel Fournié are becoming excessively alcoholic. That's the feeling here. So although the black fruit is ripe, opulent and packed with tannins, there is a nagging burn and pepper character. A degree less alcohol and this would be a fabulous wine.",Pur Plaisir,Château Haut-Monplaisir
"Representing the best of Abruzzo winemaking, this hearty Pecorino opens with a deep, off-gold color and tangy aromas of butterscotch, caramel and candied fruit. The wine would pair with a hearty regional specialty such as endive, cheese and egg soup.",,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"Serve this beautiful wine with buttery lobster bisque or steamed mussels in cream sauce. Pinot Bianco delivers natural heft and consistency, with intense aromas of peach, apricot and almond paste.",Kastelaz,Elena Walch
"Big, spicy wine with its dark tannins and black fruit. Dark chocolate flavors go with the fruit, a rich and complex array of flavors that bring in herbs and spices as well as wood. Age for another 1_2 years.",Les Clos,Henri Milan
"If you love Italian whites, Confini is definitely worth your attention. It represents a blend of Pinot Grigio, Traminer and Riesling. The obvious outcome is that the first variety supplies the density and creaminess, and the last two drive the fragrant floral bouquet.",Confini,Lis Neris
"A beautiful wine, rich, dry and crisp, offering waves of satisfying flavor. Raspberries, cherries, red licorice and cola flood the mouth, accented with sweet, smoky new French oak, and wrapped into firm, dusty tannins. Drink it over the next four years.",SLH Estate,Hahn
"A wild animal character and soft gaminess infuses the nose of this classic South African Pinot, but the red cherry and plum flavors still take center stage on this delicate wine. Hints of forest bark and soft menthol grace the finish, while the soft tannins and balanced acidity carry long into the close.",,Hamilton Russell
"Delicious is the word for this single-vineyard wine, which is a rich blast of raspberry and cherry pie, cola, milk chocolate and sweet, caramelized oak flavors. The alcohol is quite high, but the wine wears it well. Give it a few hours of decanting.",Sangiacomo Vineyard,La Follette
"Eclisse (a terrific blend of Sauvignon, Chardonnay and Friulano) offers creamy density and luscious aromas of mature fruit, yellow flower and honey. It would make a perfect pairing to lobster tail with butter.",Eclisse,La Roncaia
"This is a lifted and fresh Chardonnay with vibrant notes of red apple flesh, hard Anjou pear and fresh orange essence. A touch of toast and nectarine pit unfold in the mouth, with a soft suggestion of sweet spice that lingers on the back of the palate through the long finish.",,Jardin
"As pure an expression of a Malbec dominated blend as possible, this is ripe, juicy, packed with fine acidity and underpinned by solid, dry tannins. It balances the firm, dry character with delicious, forward, juicy fruit.",Clos Triguedina,Jean-Luc Baldès
"This is a gorgeous Italian white (made with Pinot Bianco grapes) that shows promising food pairing potential thanks to its silky, creamy mouthfeel and non-intrusive aromas. The wine offers a steady flow of stone fruit, melon and honey-like flavors.",Penon,Nals Margreid
"A strong spicy meat and smoky aroma adds interest to the mulled boysenberry and blackberry fruit core. Dark fruit flavors continue in the mouth, where licorice, plum sauce, cigar box spice and a touch of black olive also unfold to add depth to the palate. Firm but fine tannins and a long finish seal the deal nicely.",,Snow Mountain
This oak-aged expression of Pinot Grigio is compelling and outstanding. The wine opens with ripe aromas of papaya and apricot with slight touches of vanilla and lemon cream. The rich mouthfeel would match hearty clam chowder or lobster.,Sot Lis Rivis,Ronco del Gelso
"There remains a hard, tight, tannic shell around this young Pinot; it seems to have slid into a bit of a dumb phase. But peeking through is clean, ripe, black cherry fruit, with excellent concentration. A smoky finish adds complexity.",Tualatin Estate,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"Lodano (a beautiful blend of Traminer, Riesling and Chardonnay) from coastal Tuscany seems perfectly engineered for local dishes such as cacciucco, a spicy fish soup from Livorno. The wine opens with bright, intense aromas of candied lemon, pineapple and apple piecrust.",Lodano,Tua Rita
"True to the Sauvignon Blanc variety, this lively white wine opens with defined aromas of citrus, kiwi and tangy tomato leaf. The wine's natural intensity spans both the nose and the mouthfeel where fresh acidity and finesse help revive your palate sip after sip.",Vieris Sauvignon,Vie di Romans
"This creamy blend of Friulano and Ribolla Gialla offers beautiful intensity and bold aromas of yellow fruit, Golden Delicious apple, almond and honeydew melon. The wine's rich texture is both smooth and fine.",Biancosesto,La Tunella
"Big and forceful and loaded with coconut, mint, blackberry and boysenberry aromas that settle on inky. Quite juicy and tight in the mouth, with sharp acidity and oak-based flavors of vanilla, spice and licorice accenting blackberry fruit. Finishes steady, bright and fresh, but sharp on the acidity. Drink now through 2016.",Matilde Single Vineyard,Lamadrid
"A thick coating of tannins makes this Cabernet hard in the mouth, but even so, the blackberry, blueberry, currant and sweet oak flavors poke through to the surface. It's a fine young wine that needs two or three years to knit together.",Reserve,Martin Ray
"The name of this wine doesn't lie; if you like mint, then this one's definitely for you! Gorgeous notes of fresh eucalyptus take center stage to the blackberry and boysenberry fruit backbone. The menthol continues on in the mouth, with a gripping and structured finish that tastes like Thin Mint crumbles.",Mint Haven,Morgenhof
"The most impressive of the range of wines from Laurenz Moser V. It is tight with minerality, pepper and apple skin flavors. With a steely texture and intense youthful acidity, it's a wine that needs to age for at least 2 years. Screwcap.",Charming,Laurenz V.
"A fine Chardonnay, creamy, flavorful and complex. It's as soft as buttercream, yet a vital streak of acidity brightens the tropical fruit and vanilla richness. Showcases the Santa Rita Hills in a good, cool vintage.",Courtney's,Lincourt
"A bright and lifted three-grape blend with red berry, bright plum and mild oak aromas. The feel is firm but round, with raspberry, plum, pepper and other dry spice flavors. Finishes smooth and uncomplicated, with lingering vanilla flavors. A complete wine made from Malbec, Cabernet and Merlot.",Trinit_ Grand Reserve,Piattelli
"Cedar plank-grilled meat and herbal accents jazz up the heady black fruit core of this wine. Rich and dark, flavors of black berry, plum flesh, cigar box, licorice and pepper dance in the mouth and stay through the solid finish. Fine but firm tannins provide structure and texture, and the wine, though delicious now, should age nicely through 2014.",Reserve,Remhoogte
"This is a blend of Sauvignon Blanc and the relatively rare variety, Sauvignon Gris. It's basically a white Bordeaux-style wine, with considerable oak influence. You'll find citrus, tropical fruit and hay flavors, brightened by crisp acidity, making for a stylish, upscale white wine.",Elevage Blanc,Chimney Rock
"Honey flavored wine, packed with botrytis and also with intense acidity. That makes the wine light, dancing, while also showing richness. It is all so light, delicate, so delicious.",Cuvée Jean,Château Jolys
"Certainly tannic but at the same time richly black fruited. This is solid, chunky, with plum and sweet fig fruits, lining a bitter chocolate and dark tannin outer shell. For aging over several years.",,Château Peyros
"This is a fantastic expression of Pinot Grigio that demonstrates the width and versatility of this workhorse white grape variety. Clean, focused lines and fragrant tones of pear, stone fruit and lemon zest underline the wine's evident quality.",Penóner,Cantina Cortaccia
"An elegant expression of Tannat, with plum skin spice and a delicious juiciness showing well. The acidity, the wood and a smoky flavor add complexity. Age this balanced wine for another 2_3 years.",Ode d'Aydie,Château d'Aydie
This moderately oak-driven Barbaresco from the Basarin cru delivers rich layers of spice and vanilla lavished over wild berries and white cherries. The wine is silky and smooth with drying tannins on the close.,Basarin Vigna Gianmatè,Giacosa Fratelli
"Initially smooth and rich, this slowly reveals a taut mineral character that acts as a powerful structure. Yellow fruits and mangos are woven into this texture, leaving the final acidity to suggest aging potential.",Steinporz Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"Sourced about equally from Kiona (on Red Mountain) and Rosebud (in the Wahluke Slope), this deep, dark, well-made Syrah offers exception value. The fruit is plenty ripe, a mix of berries, raisins and plums; there is a generous chocolate note, firm tannins, and the grapes' earthy, lightly funky side displayed as well. It's all beautifully balanced.",,Davenport Cellars
"A lovely white Bordeaux-style blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Sauvignon Gris, rich, opulent and full-bodied. Shows citrus, tropical fruit, pear, white flower, green apple and oak-inspired vanilla flavors that change with every sip, as the wine warms in the glass.",Elevage Blanc,Chimney Rock
"This 2004 Riserva Barolo opens with beautifully seasoned and savory aromas of balsam, humus, dried tobacco and white stone. The wine is firm with dusty tannins that leave a drying impression in the mouth.",Riserva,Ciabot Berton
"Here's a ripe expression of Nebbiolo from the dry and hot 2007 vintage. You'll recognize tones of cherry, raspberry and blackberry backed by loads of spice and leather. There's a tart feeling in the mouth and the tannins are firm and tight.",Canova,Ressia
"This Riserva Serraboella Barbaresco from the tricky 2005 vintage shows nice concentration and density backed by generous aromas of smoke, ripe cherry and smoked ham. There's a touch of overripe or candied fruit that only helps add to the overall intensity. In the mouth, this wine is silky and very smooth.",Serraboella Riserva,Rivetti Massimo
"Here's an elegant and pure Barbaresco that delivers an aromatic embroidery of spice, wild berry, incense and sandalwood fragrances. The wine is firm and tart in the mouth, with an excellent balance between freshness and tannic structure.",Froi,Rivetti Massimo
"This bold wine from the acclaimed Bussia cru delivers meaty and masculine aromas of blackberry, smoked ham, vanilla bean, cured beef, nutmeg, clove and polished black stone. The thick, rich mouthfeel is irresistible and the wine is long lasting and elegant on the close.",Bussia,Silvano Bolmida
"Continues a string of successful bottlings of this Cabernet. The flavors are strong but subtle, suggesting blackberries and black currants, with earthier notes of dark chocolate and roasted almonds. Very good, but also pretty tannic. You'll want to cellar this for 5_6 years to let it mellow.",Oroppas,St. Clement
"Here's a rich, ripe expression of Barbaresco with loads of bright fruit followed by generous notes of exotic spice and scented candle. The wine is smooth, rich and drinkable almost immediately. Or, you could safely cellar this wine five years or more: the natural fruit promises to evolve evenly   over the years.",Campo Quadro,Punset
"Despite its young age now, the 2006 Dardi Le Rose Bussia Barolo will go on record as a classy, charming wine with long aging potential. The mineral tones are well etched and are followed by luscious layers of red fruit and spice. The tannins still need time to soften.",Dardi Le Rose Bussia,Poderi Colla
"Broglio is a vineyard in the Serralunga d'Alba area of the Langhe and this expression of Nebbiolo offers a ruby color with orange highlights, followed by aromas of cola, wild berry, lemon zest and leather. The mouthfeel is drying and firmly tannic.",Broglio,Schiavenza
"This is a beautiful Pinot Noir for drinking over the next few years. It's bone dry, and shows the classic structure you want from a Pinot Noir, with brisk acidity and gentle tannins framing spicy flavors of black cherries, pomegranates and cola.",,Rusack
"Here's a light, bright and tonic Cannubi-based Barolo that delivers aromas of wild blueberry, white almond, spice, violets, licorice and cherry cola. There's a touch of red apple in there as well and the wine washes clean over the palate, imparting structure and freshness along the way. Drink after 2015.",Cannubi,Michele Chiarlo
"Named for the Sentinel Gap, a nearby landmark, this is the top wine from Milbrandt. Supple and complex, it shows a sensuous mix of fruits, ranging from mixed berries into black cherries, plums and cassis. The barrel notes of coffee and toast are carefully worked, and the tannins polished and sleek. A wine that may be savored immediately, or cellared for up to 10 years.",Northridge Sentinel Red,Milbrandt
"Planted with cuttings from many Austrian wine regions, the Aussere Bergen vineyard produces a ripe, full wine, packed with yellow fruits, spice and a feeling of opulence, while always balanced.",Aussere Bergen,Zull
"Made with no oak, this pretty wine stars fresh fruit and clean acidity. With orange, honeysuckle, melon, mineral and vanilla flavors, it has a mouthfeel midway between a crisp Sauvignon Blanc and a creamy Chardonnay. Production was low, only 559 cases, but worth a search.",Paragon Vineyard,Tangent
"This beautiful Riserva della Famiglia offers immense sophistication and density with loads of spice, dark fruit and oak-related aromas. It is unlike any other Barbera you will taste thanks to the depth of its complexity and its overall intensity.",Riserva della Famiglia,Coppo
"Winemakers for many long generations, the Lodali family (now with Walter Lodali at the helm) is slowly penetrating the international wine consciousness. The 2007 Lorens Barbaresco offers pronounced aromas of smoke, tobacco, tar and licorice embellished by red rose and violet. The wine is smooth, silky with polished tannins and an elegant finish.",Lorens,Eredi Lodali
"Dark, sultry and hard at first, but with airing comes a wave of cola, vanilla and black fruit notes that settle in the right way. The palate is healthy and balanced, and the flavors of cherry, currant, plum and tobacco are enticing and long. Herbal in some ways, but not too much. Shows quality and some short-term aging ability; drink now through 2012.",Single Vineyard,Errazuriz
"Frog's Leap strove for elegance above power in this modulated wine. It's delicate in the mouth, with complex notes of herbs, cherry tart, cherry Lifesaver candy and cedar wood. Turns a bit sharp in the finish, with a cut of acidity that should help the wine age for 6_8 years.",,Frog's Leap
"Barolo Arborina is slightly raw and sharp at first but the quality of the fruit is evident and, in general, this wine needs more time to evolve in the bottle. At this young stage, you'll taste white cherry, Spanish cedar, graphite tones, tobacco and light shadings of smoke. It's a fine, elegant wine with a long tannic fade.",Arborina,Gianfranco Bovio
"This single-vineyard blend is drinking very well. There is an unusual minty spice underlying the cassis and cherry fruit, and it provides a nice line for the flavors as they weave across the palate. This wine is among the best balanced of the 2007 reds from Fidélitas, and shows some well-managed herbs and baking spice flavors along with soft, light tannins.",Red Mountain Vineyard Red Wine,Fidelitas
"From young vines, this is a big, berried wine, dense and concentrated. Sweet cherries, juicy texture and light tannins give a tasty, ripe wine.",Heideboden,Judith Beck
"There's a firmly elegant and traditional aspect to this ruby-hued Barolo that suggests a pairing with something like bacon-wrapped scallops: in other words, a dish that is textured, delicate and aromatically intense at the same time. The bouquet here is redolent of violets, white cherry, spice and powdered licorice.",Cannubbio,Francesco Rinaldi
"Fragrant and delicate, with aromas of blue flower, scented candle, forest berry, earth and perfume, this Barbaresco shows the ethereal nature of Nebbiolo. It performs beautifully in the mouth thanks to the smooth, silky tannins.",I Patriarchi,Francone
"A deeply colored, rich, vibrant Syrah, ready to drink now. It's gritty in tannins and bone dry, but offers a wealth of ripe, jammy blackberries, cherries, bacon, peppery spices and smoky sandalwood.",Estate,Bugay
"The steep Ovello vineyard overlooks the hilltop hamlet of Barbaresco and beautifully trellised countryside. This cru expression shows aromas of spice, mesquite, cedar, clove and black fruit. In addition, there are distinguishable aromas of blue flower and green olive, backed by silky tannins and a smooth but drying finish.",Ovello,Cascina Morassino
"A beautiful Syrah, richly textured and delicious. Held back for three years, it's perfect now for the soft texture, and the raspberry, cherry and orange zest flavors have a spicy edge. Complexity is enhanced with additions of Petite Sirah, Sangiovese, Barbera, Grenache and Viognier.",,Kunde
"This bright and fruity wine is attractively ready to drink. It is fresh, crisp with apples and lightly touched with citrus.",Chêne Marchand,Domaine Reverdy-Ducroux
"The apricot and star fruit aromas start out quite reticent, with barrel notes providing accents. The vanilla and stone fruit flavors are full in feel and walk together through the finish.",,Doyenne
"Blue-black in color, this wine is dense in leather and grippy oak, a coming together texturally and on the palate in baked plum and blackberry. Full bodied, the wine settles in the glass to offer breadth and depth.",Estate Grown,Reynoso
"Sweet-tart raspberry and cranberry aromas are lifted and spry on this fresh, aromatic Pinot Noir. The palate is markedly riper and richer, boasting dark cherry and berry flavors and heady spice tones that linger. Tannins are a bit craggy and bitter but finely grained.",,Tousey
"Supple white-fleshed fruits, from pear to cherimoya, touch the nose, as do aromas of lemon rind, struck match and dried apple on this blend of 90% Sauvignon Blanc and 10% Viognier. A gravelly, pencil lead minerality on the palate is boosted by sliced lemon wedges, cut grass and gooseberry notes.",Fletcher's,Westerly
"Named after a term for beautiful gesture, this wine is mostly Cabernet Sauvignon with small amounts the other primary Bordeaux varieties blended in. Aromas of dark cherry, black tea, pencil lead and vanilla are followed by well-constructed smoke and dark fruit flavors with grainy, compact tannins that need some time to stretch their legs.",Beau Geste,3 Horse Ranch Vineyards
"This blend of 68% Sangiovese, 20% Cabernet Sauvignon and 12% Merlot hits the nose with aromas of brick, uncrushed clove, red cherries, wet gravel, rosewater and a touch of tobacco. The palate is surprisingly light, but packs cedar, pipesmoke, clove and nutmeg against a red cherry and cranberry backdrop.",Jovial,August Ridge
"This is a 100% Prokupac from Serbia that leads with red cherry, black plum and some mild eucalyptus scents. In the mouth, there are flavors of black fruits, spice and a touch of mint. The tannins are well rounded and the finish is spicy.",Triada,Budimir
"From La Moussière vineyard, this Pinot Noir-based wine is refreshingly crisp with red fruits and tight lemon and orange-zest acidity. It is lightly textured, with a minerality that comes from the chalk soil of the vineyard. Drink now.",La Moussière,Alphonse Mellot
"This wine has aromas of black plum, freshly baked pie crust, dried lavender and a touch of menthol in the nose and flavors of sweet cherry and red raspberry in the mouth.",Via Etulia Reserve,Bostavan
"Tart cherry, cranberry and dried lavender scent this his blend of Rara Neagra and Cabernet Sauvignon . Full bodied in the mouth, it puts black cherry, and black plum on the palate along with a touch of powdered cocoa in the finish.",Dor Rara Neaga-Cabernet Sauvignon,Bostavan
"This wine is ripe with a texture that remains tangy while also showing rich yellow and white fruits. A rustic edge adds interest rather than detracting from the quality. With its acidity and zesty citrus character, the aftertaste leaves a fresh, crisp feeling. Drink now.",,Château de Santenay
"This wine is perfumed and fruity while also having a rustic edge. Tannins and acidity cut through the red plum and berry fruits. It does need to age, so drink from 2017.",,Château de Santenay
"Produced in western Touraine, close to Chinon and its red wines, this soft wine is ready to drink. With its smoky character and jammy fruit flavors, it is very much a light, perfumed Cabernet Franc. The aftertaste is dry, although the fruit is always there.",Cuvée Réserve,Château du Petit Thouars
"This wine was made from grapes grown on the Petit Thouars estate by sparkling-wine producer Langlois-Château. It is ripe, deliciously fresh with touches of yellow fruits as well as brighter citrus. Fruity acidity comes in at the end. Drink now.",Brut du Petit Thouars,Château du Petit Thouars
"Black cherry, vanilla, wet rocks, anise and damp herbs show on this take on the rare but increasingly popular grape. It's a tart and more medium-bodied expression of this often black-as-night varietal, showing boysenberry, a touch of tar and herbal spice on the palate.",,Chateau Lettau
"This wine shows the intense fruitiness of the 2014 vintage. It's all about crisp acidity, green fruits and tight, steely texture. It's a refreshing wine, with a bright aftertaste. Drink now.",Les Chailloux Vieilles Vignes,Cherrier Frères
"Violet, iris, red-berry, toast, clove and menthol aromas take center stage. The mature palate offers oak, dried black-skinned berry, anise and a hint of tobacco alongside close-grained tannins. It's already rather shy on fruit richness so drink sooner rather than later. Drink 2018_2022.",,Collelceto
"This ripe, fruity wine has shiny red-berry fruits and attractive, open acidity. A tang of tangerine zest gives extra zing, although it is the ripe fruit that sings. Drink now.",,Domaine Chavet
"Based in the village of Les Loges, close to the Loire, this producer has made a light, fruity style of wine. It is crisp with citrus, bright acidity and only the hint of a more mineral texture. It can be drunk now for its fruitiness.",Les Vieilles Terres,Domaine Dominique Pabiot
"Light and fresh, this wine has intense, spicy strawberry fruits. The acidity is balanced, adding lift to the ripe fruitiness. It has an attractive, tangy aftertaste.",,Domaine Jean-Paul Picard
"Lush but fine-tuned aromas of lemon skin, pineapple, daffodil and melon are cut by chamomile and mineral tones on the edges of this good-deal wine. It's also well designed on the palate, where butter and oak-smoke flavors meet with chalky minerality, Asian pear flesh and jasmine notes.",,Estancia
"This is a blend of 94% Merlot with 3% Zinfandel and 3% Petit Verdot__ commingling not often seen, but one that in this case works. Blackberry and black currant rise to the occasion, along with a bite of fig, the wine structured in herb with a knock of cedar and gunpowder on the juicy finish.",The Crucible,Foundry
"An herbally prolific blend of 46% Cabernet Franc, 41% Merlot, 9% Syrah and 4% Petite Sirah, this wine packs dried oregano on top of plump strawberries, ripe plums, grape jelly and a touch of cedar. Bay leaf and sesame-oil elements show once sipped, along with black plums, dark strawberry and savory soy-sauce flavors, altogether nicely intriguing.",Farmer Mickey's Limited Edition,Four Sisters Ranch
"Garnet colored with a light brick rim, this opens with aromas of leafy underbrush, leather and a whiff of menthol. The palate is straightforward for a Brunello and already surprisingly accessible, offering dried wild cherry, licorice and a hint of baking spice alongside ripe tannins.",,Kirkland Signature
"Aromas of toast, coconut, thyme, vanilla and sugared plum cake lead the nose. The round, accessible palate offers black-cherry-marinated in spirits, licorice and a confectionary note framed in mature tannins. Ripe and evolving quickly, this is best suited for near- to mid-term enjoyment.",,La Rasina
"Earthy truffle stars around a thick, spicy bulwark of cardamom and dark black cherry and plum in this powerhouse of a Pinot Noir. Full bodied and self-assuredly robust, it's for fans of a larger, denser style of the variety, ready to be enjoyed with friends.",Vagon Rouge,MacPhail
"Tight and minerally aromas of gray slate and river stones meet with light and delicate scents of daffodil and nectarine blossoms that take some effort to coax from the glass. The palate is high-toned with lime zest and lemon-juice acidity, opening steadily toward blanched Marcona almonds and toast.",North Highlands Cuvee,Manzoni
"Aromas of citrus, especially white grapefruit and lime, are spunky and sweaty like Sauvignon Blanc or Verdejo. A solid, fleshy palate is home to a mix of citric and tropical flavors, while the finish reverts back to grapefruit, with a monotone feel. This is Macabeo, Garnacha Blanca and Pedro Ximénez.",_lbia,Marco Abella
"Lemon peel, grapefruit and yellow apples constitute the fruit here, with minimal impact from aging in 20% new French oak. The wine is stylish and the acid-driven flavors penetrating. It's a fine food wine.",Tribute Series Pat Quinn,Meyer Family Vineyards
"Tobacco and tar stand out in this densely packed, robustly built estate, 100% varietal wine. Full bodied, it's a study in dark chocolate and smoked meats, wrapped in oak and black pepper. There's some serious power to this wine.",Logging Road Vineyard Estate,Gustafson Family
"A fairly complex, rich and layered nose of stewed plum, root beer, mace and allspice is set against an oak-laden, vanilla-based structure on the nose of this bottling. The palate offers rich black plum, but with decent tang, as well as earthy chipped slate and iron elements, before settling into light licorice spice.",Fog's Reach,J. Lohr
"Succulent, juicy fruit flavors combine lemon drop and butterscotch hard candy, buttressed with vivid acidity. This irresistible wine is drinking beautifully already.",,King Estate
"Reduced and highly concentrated, this powerful wine is brooding in black peppercorn, leather and a wealth of black color and black fruit. Chewy on the entry, it softens and integrates over time, getting better in the glass as it goes, a rich, rewarding mix of blackberry, clove and cigar.",Lot No. 1,Louis M. Martini
"This deservedly popular value bottle gets the star Pinot treatment__ine months in French oak, 27% new. It's spicy and full-flavored, with resonant blue plum fruit, buttery toast and a tannic frame.",Sharecropper's,Owen Roe
"Fairly tight in aromas with cranberry, tart cherries and gravel, this shows fresher squeezed bramble berries the longer it's opened. The palate is also tart with cranberries and anise, though streamlined with tones of gravel, slate and dark chocolate.",Fiddlestix Vineyard,Pali
"Only produced from Grand Cru vineyards, this ripe wine offers yellow fruit flavors cut by dry tangy citrus acidity. It's full in the mouth, with a creamy mousse and attractive freshness. The wine, with its hints of toast as well as fruit, is ready to drink.",Face Nord Brut Grand Cru,Pehu-Simonet
"Violet, boysenberry, sandalwood and pencil lead converge on this nose of this 72% Cabernet Sauvignon bottling, which is boosted by 25% Sangiovese and 3% Petite Sirah. The palate is loaded with interesting flavors, from dried raspberry to crushed wild chaparral and black rocks.",Tuscan Nights,Pianetta
"Smoky cigar and toffee caramel hit the high notes in this soft, thick and rich reserve-level wine, sure to please fans of a full-bodied, generously layered style. Blackberry and blueberry jam provide the fruit to match the savory elements.",Back Forty,PreVail
"This is a creamy ripe wine, spicy and toasty in character with rich Chardonnay and local grapes to give a balanced texture. Acidity is there along with pineapple and white peach flavors. The rich rounded texture is generous and opulent. The wine needs to age, so drink from 2017.",Terras do Anjo Branco,Quinta do Pinto
"The majority of the grapes for this lithe, elegant wine come from the Zio Tony Vineyard, with the remainder from Red Car Estate. Cool-climate in its high-toned acidity and delicate features of rose and lavender, it's smooth, soft and vibrantly shaken with white pepper, a classic call-out to the Northern Rhône.",,Red Car
"Soft and layered, this wine has firmness and depth to its structure, and is dark in brooding baked plum and cinnamon stick. A pungency of tight oak wraps its way around the fruit and savory spice, suggesting additional time in cellar, through 2023.",Van der Kamp Vineyard,Siduri
"This wine skirts the limits of low alcohol, given added weight and body through 75% whole-cluster fermentation and time in 25% new French oak. Light in color and weight, it's sauvage and floral in a crispness of rose petal, with accents of cranberry and cherry. Tightly wound, it could stand some time in the cellar, through 2021.",Baranoff Vineyard,Small Vines
"This grippy Cab exhibits the power of the 10% Petit Verdot in the blend, softened by 6% Merlot and 5% Cabernet Franc. Cassis and raspberry provide a fruity core around lush, tight tannins and a black pepper-seasoned finish. Full bodied, it remains elegant in the glass.",,Spring Mountain Vineyard
"A new designation from the producer, made in tiny amounts, this wine is sourced from vines on the Donum Ranch property grafted to cuttings from the Ferguson Vineyard. Cardamom, dark plum and earthy black cherry mingle on the palate around medium-bodied, softly layered texture and a medium length. A persistence of savory black pepper and black olive tease on the finish.",Ferguson Cuttings,Stemmler
"A new, reserve-level wine from the producer's estate Winside Vineyard, Laura is both floral and sauvage, spicy, dense and full-figured. Blackberry compote and black-cherry pie come to mind through its intensity, while it ends packed in tight-grained tannins. Drink now through 2023.",Laura,Stemmler
"A little bit softer on the nose than the winery's appellation blend, this shows cola, candied purple fruit and cinnamon on the nose. The palate focuses on tight cherry and wild berries, made tart with black cherry and plum skins. It manages to show a great deal of balanced restraint for rather ripe fruit.",Fiddlestix Vineyard The Barn Find,Wedell Cellars
"Some years ago, Willamette Valley Vineyards purchased the Tualatin Estate vineyards and winery founded by Bill Fuller in 1973. To mark the return of Mr. Fuller to winemaking, the new cuvée celebrates his 40th vintage. A tawny gold, it's scented with honeycomb and pineapple. Potent and focused, it carries those flavors into a finish rich with bee pollen and preserved lemon intensity.",Vintage 40,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"The Legacy estate reserve is a limited selection from the original mid-1970s vines. It remains stubbornly closed, even after hours of breathing time. Grudgingly, pomegranate and cranberry fruit flavors peek through a high-acid base with mineral undertones. The balance is there for further aging.",Winderlea Legacy,Winderlea
"Produced from old vines, this is a serious and concentrated wine. It has a strong mineral texture that adds to the dark tannins to make a forceful structure. Powered by the structure and the black fruits it will age well. Start drinking in 2018.",Aguia Moura em Vinhas Velhas Garrafeira,Wines & Winemakers
"Tart aromas of sour cream, yogurt, candied lime and pressed quince show on the nose of this stylishly structured Chardonnay. The palate carries the theme forward, with pithy pink grapefruit notes, lime ade and brie rinds, showing firm tension on the tongue and bound-up energy that will keep this bottle alive for years.",,Zaca Mesa
"Inky red violet in the glass, this wine features aromas of raspberry, vanilla and violet. Ever-present tannins form a backdrop for flavors of blackberry, ripe summer cherry, vanilla and black pepper that are heightened by opulent floral notes. The finish offers a pleasing amalgam of rose petal and cherry pie.",Second Generation,1848 Winery
"This is made in a steely, high-acid style, harvested at low (18.5) brix and put through 25% malolactic just to keep it all in proportion. Give this some time in the glass and it shines, with a focused mix of lemon, apple and mineral flavors. This can easily age for another decade at least. Drink 2020_2030.",Knudsen Vineyard Blanc de Blancs,Argyle
"Strawberry fruit sails above a light layer of milk chocolate, leading into a well-textured wine layered with leafy highlights. The tannins have a breakfast-tea component, keeping them dry, rather light and lifted. The overall texture and balance are spot-on. Give this extra breathing time and it gives you extra depth and flavor.",Reserve,Argyle
"Dark berry, violet, anise and cake spice aromas lead the way. The ripe palate doles out fleshy black cherry, ground pepper, licorice and grilled sage while an espresso note closes the finish. Firm, polished tannins provide the framework. Drink 2019_2029.",Bussia Riserva,Barale Fratelli
"From the only estate in Sonoma County growing the variety, this full-bodied white was aged in a combination of neutral French oak and stainless steel. Sly on the nose, it opens slowly with a whiff of sour apple and a squeeze of lemon, an intensity of savory dill and white pepper at its core.",Estate Grown,Belden Barns
"The great 2010 vintage has produced an appropriately powerful and dense wine. With its tannins and concentrated, dry flavors, this wine is still young. It has power, the rich black fruit still masked by the structure. It will need long aging, so drink from 2018.",Ortus,Château Bélingard
"Cola, Dr Pepper, licorice, blueberry paste and smoked meat show on this blend of 80% Syrah and 20% Grenache, which is an ode to Adam Comartin's butcher ancestry. Dense and chalky dark fruit on the palate is boosted by tobacco, asphalt, black plum skins and good grip. It's full bodied but tart on the edges.",The Porterhouse,Comartin
"Rose petal, violet, red berry, white pepper and eucalyptus scents meld together on this bright, structured expression of Nebbiolo. The linear, elegant palate doles out juicy red cherry, mint, aromatic herb and star anise while firm, polished tannins and fresh acidity provide the framework. It's already accessible but will also age gracefully over the next several years. Drink through 2024.",,Cornarea
"On the right bank of the Serein river, Vaucoupin gives rich wines, showing its sunny exposition. This bottling is ripe, full in the mouth and intense with fragrant white fruits, vanilla and youthful acidity. With freshness still to the fore, it will age and will be better from 2017.",Vaucoupin Premier Cru,Domaine Céline et Frédéric Gueguen
"Opening with earth and herb, much like its companion vineyard-designated Bucher Vineyard Pinot, this wine is lean on the midpalate but builds character and strength as it goes, and is delightfully measured in tart cherry with memorable subtlety.",,Thralls
"Savory notes of saffron and pressed apple are countered by heady blossom and honey on this elegantly balanced Riesling. The palate is unctuously fruity with flavors of sweet peach and hibiscus nectar, but cut with a shock tangerine acidity that reverberates through the finish.",Berncasteler Doctor Spatlëse,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Müller-Burggraef)
"Dusty mineral tones fade to reveal a glorious perfume of blossoms and grapefruit on this elegant, aromatic Riesling. Semi-dry in style, it's pristine with sun-kissed peach and melon flavors accented by a shower of tangerine acidity. Enjoy now for it's youthful beauty.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Made without adding the customary sweetening dosage, this elegant blend of Chardonnay, Pinot Bianco and Pinot Nero opens with floral aromas of passion fruit, ripe pear and walnut. The subtle palate delivers citrus, Golden Delicious apple and toasted walnut alongside brisk acidity and a fine mousse.",Pas Dosé Vintage,Fratelli Berlucchi
"This wood-aged wine has juicy black fruits that are given shape by the firm tannins and dense, concentrated structure. Initially austere and packed with acidity, it needs time to develop. Drink this powerful wine from 2016.",Gerações Colheita Seleccionada,Herdade Grande
"Spring blossoms and white peaches perfume this dainty, delicate Riesling. The palate penetrates deeply with apricot and marmalade flavor, but brash lemon-lime acidity and crisp, revitalizing minerality keep the wine refreshing and quaffable.",Graach Josephshöfer Spätlese GL,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"Kopke has an impressive quantity of old tawnies, some of which will have ended up in this wine. It certainly seems older than its 20 years with strong wood flavors, smoky toast and beautiful mature acidity. It is very ready to drink, a fine mature tawny.",20-Years-Old Tawny,Kopke
"The cool Côte de Lechet, facing north, produces a classically steely Chablis. This is still young, very tight and nervy, its acidity prominent even though the texture is ripe. Aging will bring balance between the crisp character and the richer green and white fruits. Drink from 2018.",Côte de Lechet Premier Cru,La Chablisienne
"Fresh green herbs and zesty white grapefruits scent this brisk, revitalizing Riesling. Sweet peach and mango flavors are concentrated, but bristling layers of wet steel and crushed stone lend a mineral complexity that drives the finish.",Nierstein Rehbach Spätlese,Louis Guntrum
"The winery's most accessible and available Pinot Noir__till quite small in production__s from several vineyards, including single-vineyard sites like Jenkins. It offers classic Russian River Valley cola spice and bright aromatics and acidity, the texture soft and structured, a smaller percentage of new French oak used for aging.",,Lynmar
"The warm Beauroy vineyard has produced a rich, full-bodied and concentrated wine. It has a ripe structure that's cut with mineral notes, honey and apple and pear flavors. The wine is still developing and needs to age. Drink from 2017.",Beauroy Premier Cru,Pascal Bouchard
"Totally fresh, this is crisp and packed with citrus. A complex, tight texture brings out nervy acidity, a strongly mineral character and a firm structure. Age this youthful wine and drink from 2018.",Montmains Premier Cru,Pascal Bouchard
"Beautifully perfumed, this has ripe blackberry flavors and a relatively dry character. The spirit is now well balanced, giving a backbone to the violet aromas and spicy character of this still-young LBV. It is good to drink now for its fruit, but it will improve and show more complex flavors after 2017_2018.",RPLBV Late Bottled Vintage,Ramos-Pinto
"Delicate flavors of baking spices like cinnamon, allspice and ginger light up this very dry, firm-textured bubbly. Vivid acidity keeps it light and lively. Plenty of citrus and green apple notes and a refreshing dryness make the mouth water.",Blanc de Noirs,Schramsberg
"Zesty limes and lemons brighten aromas of fresh pear on this irresistibly nimble-bodied Riesling. Ripe tangerine and peach flavors are semi-sweet on the palate, but zippy with acidity and a delicate fringe of minerals that lend complexity to the finish.",Piesporter Goldtröpfchen Erste Lage Kabinett,St. Urbans-Hof
"From one of Soave's leading estates, this bubbly is made with Trebbiano di Soave grapes and without added sulfites or dosage. Crisp and clean, it delivers flavors of tart green apple, citrus, roasted almond and a hint of pastry cream alongside refined effervescence and brisk acidity.",Opera Semplice,Suavia
"Tantara's 2012s are a soft shade of red in color, with a bit of unfiltered cloudiness, qualities that deliver, in this case, aromas of Indian food, white pepper, curried lamb and anise. It's extremely soft on the palate and lightweight, but bursting with well rounded tart and savory flavors.",Rio Vista Vineyard,Tantara
"Cedar, tobacco and berry aromas are more general than specific. The palate is on the heavy side, with grabby tannins. Flavors of roasted berry fruits and cocoa finish dense, steady and with depth. While this is a bit heavy and ripe, it speaks of Rioja in a positive way; drink through 2020.",Lanzaga,Telmo Rodríguez
"This is an elegant Champagne, with a burgeoning sense of maturity as well as fresh acidity. Flavors of ripe pear are cut with a light touch of lemon while the overall texture is soft and on the sweet side of Brut. It could age a few more years, so drink now and until 2019.",Memory Brut,Veuve Doussot
"Tilled earth, blue flower, leather, blueberry and cured meat aromas jump out of the glass of this concentrated wine. The rich palate delivers black berry, licorice, chocolate, clove and black pepper alongside firm, chewy tannins. Drink 2016_2023.",Tremenel,Villa Erbice
"Stony mineral notes accent fragrant blossom and grapefruit notes on this dry, elegant Riesling. The palate is lean and steely, with a distinct line of struck steel and lime, but it's also buoyantly fruity with notes of luscious white peach and honey. A dramatic wine with a long, lingering mineral finish.",Wachenheimer Belz Dry,Villa Wolf
"Made from 80-year-old Glera vines that have never been doused with herbicides or pesticides, this boasts an enticing floral fragrance of jasmine and honeysuckle. The elegant, reserved palate has a pristine quality, delivering green apple, lemon zest, nectarine, pastry cream, herb and mineral alongside a fine perlage. It finishes crisp and clean.",Dosaggio Zero,Ca' dei Zago
"Fragrant and floral, this blend of 55% Chardonnay, 30% Pinot Nero and 15% Pinot Bianco offers aromas of lemon blossom, white flowers and toasted almond. The palate shows an impressive depth of flavors, including yellow apple, lemon cream pie and peach alongside an elegant mousse. The creamy flavors are brightened by lively acidity.",Vintage Collection Brut,Ca' del Bosco
"Creamy and fresh, this sparkling Lugana shows real class, starting with its floral aromas of lemon blossom and stone fruit. The crisp palate delivers green apple, peach and yeasty bread crust alongside a refined perlage and bright acidity.",Brut 36,Citari
"This Malbec-led blend is quite oaky, thus maple, molasses and chocolate aromas ride high alongside blackberry and mild floral notes. In the mouth, this is quasi-syrupy and very rich. Flavors of baked black fruits and brown sugar finish sticky, with chunky weight. Drink through 2018.",Gran Estirpe,Clos de Chacras
This wine is a great mix of fruit and a tight texture. The two are joined easily by the wood-aging flavors that give a smoky character as well as toastiness. The citrus and crisp peach skin acidity leave a lively aftertaste. Drink from 2016.,Conceito,Conceito Vinhos
"Structured but remarkably approachable, this offers lovely aromas of blue flower, black plum, ripe berry and clove. The delicious palate delivers Marasca cherry, blackberry, nutmeg, and white pepper alongside smooth but chewy tannins and surprisingly fresh acidity.",,Corte Adami
"This is an austere wine, packed with tannins and tight acidity. The red fruits are right at the back behind the firm structure. A mineral character supports the dusty texture and suggests long-term aging. Drink from 2018.",Cent-Vignes Premier Cru,Albert Morot
"Dry, leathery and earthy up front, this mature Mencía is all about grip and complexity. In the mouth, it's tight and tannic. Flavors of dry cherry and berry are layered and earthy, while hard tannins and additional earth notes steer a long, spicy finish. Drink through 2019.",Xestal,Gancedo
"Ripe black cherry, graphite, clove, grilled herb and leather aromas lead the nose on this structured wine. The extracted palate delivers mature black plum, prune, black pepper and mocha alongside tightly packed tannins that need a few years to unwind. Drink 2016_2022.",,Giuseppe Campagnola
"The Ataíde estate in the Alto Douro is one of the rare Douro vineyards to be relatively flat. From old vines, it produces a solid, structured and rich wine, with ripe swathes of plum and berry fruits that are structured by firm tannins. Young and fruity, this will age well, although it is drinkable now.",Altano Quinta do Ataíde Made With Organic Grapes,Symington Family Estates
"This bright, fresh wine offers aromas of woodland berry, alpine herb, graphite, and a touch of cake spice. On the palate, green tomato and peppermint accent the bright strawberry core.",I Vigneti,Tenuta Peter Sölva & Söhne
"This opens with smoke, mint, coconut, red berry and graphite aromas. The palate offers dried red cherry and mineral alongside drying tannins. Enjoy it soon to capture the fruit flavors.",Linticlarus Riserva,Tiefenbrunner
"Oaky aromas of almond, vanilla and peach settle on a palate with grip and acidity. Flavors of toasted almond, baked apple and briny apricot finish with forward acidity. This is a blend of Garnacha Blanca and Macabeo, but it's the white Garnacha that sticks out.",Saó Blanc,Mas Blanch I Jové
"This is a successful straight-ahead Chardonnay, with aromas of buttercream, vanilla and orange cake developing complexity thanks to alkaline, pithy notes. For such a rich nose, it proves quite clean and crisp on the palate, with lemon-lime soda, wet slate and just a touch of buttered apples.",,Demetria
"Fermented in wood, this rides the dichotomy between wood and the Melon de Bourgogne easily and successfully. It has lost none of the fresh fruits while it has gained an extra layer of richness and spice. Drink now.",Tradition Sur Lie,Domaine de la Foliette
"Crisp and stylish, this bright and lightly fruity wine is full in the mouth with soft apple and citrus flavors. Its acidity and fruitiness are still coming forward, so drink from 2016.",Cruet Vieille Vigne de l'Idylle,Domaine de l'Idylle
"From the mica soil of Goulaine, this single-parcel wine is rich and full in the mouth. Aged for three years in tank, the wine is now mature, ripe and rounded with yellow fruits as well as a strong citrus element. Drink now.",Excelsior,Domaine Luneau-Papin
"This soft wine has red berry fruits and gentle tannins. It is dry, the fruitiness conveying a fresh character, a tang of acidity and black currant intensity. It is ready to drink, although it will be better from 2016.",Origine Rouge,Domaine Matthias et Emile Roblin
"This wine shows quite a bit of tropicality on the nose, with lychee and kiwi fruits, yet manages to remain restrained at the same time. It's soft on the palate, with white peach flesh, and shows a very intriguing herbal side, with tarragon and mint flavors, but not in a green pepper way at all.",,Consilience
"Enticing aromas of honeysuckle, citrus blossom and stone fruit take shape in the glass. The palate offers juicy pineapple, green apple, white peach, mint and mineral alongside bright acidity.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Fresh and fruit forward, this is a fine value in a most enjoyable style. Bananas, pears, apples and more are in play, with a mouthfilling, generous midpalate.",,Foris
"Aromas of brick dust, vitamins and baked fruits are gritty and require some navigating. This has a wiry, tight feel, yet in terms of flavors, it's ripe almost to the point of being raisiny. Heat, hard tannins and dried berry fruit flavors direct the finish. Drink through 2017.",,Genium Celler
"Ripe and fruity, this immediately attractive wine has a crisp texture, giving prominence to apple and grapefruit freshness. The light spritz from bottling from the lees adds bright lift to the aftertaste. Drink now.",La Louvetrie Sur Lie,Domaines Landron
"Black cherries, turned loam and black slate swirl into a standard nose for this winery's workhorse bottling. It's quite tasty on the palate, with blackberries and boysenberries finding complexity amid licorice, slate and black dirt.",,Jaffurs
"Fresh and creamy, this spent time in 80% neutral oak, which smoothed out the flavors. Pear and banana fruit flavors are textural and wrapped in lemony acidity. The creaminess is impressive.",,Keeler
"Aromas of pressed white flower and orchard fruit waft from the glass. On the palate, a nutty note of toasted hazelnut and a mineral vein add depth to the dried apricot, baked yellow peach and citrus flavors. Enjoy soon.",Il Rintocco,Marangona
"Aromas of wildflower, hay, stone fruit and citrus lead the nose. The vibrant palate delivers tart Granny Smith apple, juicy citrus and peach alongside crisp acidity. The clean finish closes on an almond note.",,Marangona
"Pressed white flower, nut and dried apricot lead the nose. The firm, structured palate offers baked yellow peach, candied citrus zest, toasted almond and mineral alongside bright acidity.",La Vila,Lis Neris
"Fresh aromas of stony minerals, white grapefruit and passion fruit are a proper opening for a zesty, cutting palate that's loaded to the brink with citric acidity. Flavors of wet stones, lime, lemon and green apple finish long, zesty and without a stumble.",Coastal Cool Climate Estate Bottled,Lomas del Valle
"Labeled both as Orange and Rosé, this is Pinot Gris fermented on the skins, then aged in neutral oak for several months. A pretty sunset color, slightly oxidized, and aromatic with dried apricot and pear fruit, it's a wine for those with more-than-average curiosity. Highlights of dark chocolate and coffee creep in to a lingering finish.",Treehouse Orange Wine,Vista Hills
"Pretty aromas of white spring flower, orchard fruit and a tad of candied citrus zest mingle in the glass. The vibrant palate delivers crisp yellow apple, Bartlett pear and nectarine alongside firm acidity. White almond marks the finish.",,Olivini
"This barrel-fermented Sauvignon opens with aromas of toast, baked stone fruit, yellow flower and citrus zest. The round palate offers ripe yellow peach, celery, juicy grapefruit, crystalized ginger, roasted almond and vanilla bean alongside soft acidity.",Cicinis,Attems
"The granite soil of Clisson is a special part of the Muscadet region. It gives a wine that is structured, firm and needing to age. With five years, this wine is just ready to drink. The white fruits are integrating into the tight texture and leaving room for minerality. Drink now, although the wine will continue to age until 2016.",Clisson,Bruno Cormerais
"This medium-bodied white opens with aromas that recall citrus blossom and stone fruit. The vibrant palate doles out creamy white peach, juicy tangerine, lime and bitter almond alongside fresh acidity. A mineral note signals the close.",,Borgo San Daniele
"Pepper, ollallieberry, roasted pork and a violet-flavored candy aroma comprise the nose on this wine from a vineyard north of the Santa Maria Valley. Zesty acidity on the palate cuts through the boysenberry, anise and game flavors, making for a lively wine.",Colson Canyon Vineyard,Brander
"Aromas suggest red berry, pomegranate and violet. The vibrant palate delivers crushed sour cherry, tangerine zest and a hint of baking spice alongside bright acidity and silky tannins. Enjoy soon.",,Weingut Niklas
"Mineral and dry are apt words to describe this intensely smoky, granite-toned Riesling. Zesty lime and lemon notes are razor-sharp, but softened by a swathe of crisp greengage plum and apple flavors.",Mineral Dry,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"This blends intensity and nutty richness on the nose, backed up by a full, balanced palate. Flavors of dark caramel, toffee and chocolate end with the distinct flavor of café mocha and a lasting streak of caramel.",Cream,Osborne
"Part of the winery's line of single-clone Pinots, this is a bit chunkier than the others, with strawberries and cherries lightly finished with a milk chocolate frame. The midpalate is medium bodied and holds together through the finish.",Wadenswil Clone,Amalie Robert
"Slight tar notes hold the brimming dark berry fruit in check for now. The palate is structured and mouth-filling. Glints of peppery spice appear among the crushed blackberry. This is muscular and toned: Drink now with steak or keep until 2016_2017, when this will be perfect for braised venison and game.",Rosso e Nero,Pöckl
"This winery was originally developed as a Cabernet specialist, and the regular 2012 bottling is another fine success. Briery, herbal shadings frame blackberry fruit, while the finish features a mouthwatering combination of mocha, dark fruit and lingering tannins. Drink this medium-bodied Cabernet now through 2025.",,Wakefield Estate
"Charred strawberries and very ripe cranberry sauce make for a very compelling nose on this rare single varietal bottling of this lighter Rhône red. It's full and light on the palate, with tanned leather, sandalwood and more spiced strawberry. A very nice change of pace from the region's big reds and good way to impress wine geek friends.",,Tuxedo Cellars
"Made with bush-trained vines that give very low yields, this delivers concentrated flavors of spiced plum, ripe blackberry, nutmeg, orange peel and black pepper. It's vibrant, smooth and balanced with firm, velvety tannins. The lingering finish closes on a licorice note.",Papale,Varvaglione Vigne & Vini
"This is part of the range of three wines from different soils. Marne, or clay and chalk soil, is relatively heavy and produces a rich style of Sauvignon Blanc. This brings out the more tropical fruits and ripe pineapple that dominate the youthful acidity that cuts through the texture. Drink from 2016.",Terre de Marne,Vignobles Berthier
"This may be the best vintage of this wine yet. The aromas and flavors are a lovely blend of citrus, stone fruit and roasted cashew, while the mouthfeel is creamy and lush without being soft or flabby. Drink now_2017.",Prelude Vineyards,Leeuwin Estate
"Of all the various d'Arenberg Shiraz bottlings, this may be the silkiest in texture this vintage. It's still a full-bodied wine, filled with savory, earthy notes of black olive and espresso, but the finish stands apart for its length and suaveness. Drink now_2025.",The Other Side Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"The seductive, woodsy aroma and complex flavors of tea and cherry are true to the variety. With a medium body that doesn't overwhelm, it offers a firmly tannic and lively texture plus a long finish. Very little oak comes through, yet the grapes themselves offer great complexity.",Valenti Vineyard,Drew
"Overtones of candied lemon peel steal into the more general fresh zestiness here, hinting at aromatic richness and purity. The palpable, zesty midpalate highlights the citrus qualities even more. Verve and freshness in a glass.",Der Königsberg,Gruber Röschitz
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (54%), Merlot (33%), Cabernet Franc (8%) and Petit Verdot hails from six up-and-coming vineyards on Red Mountain. It suggests coffee and cream, vanilla and dark cherry, with a high-toned herbal grace note. The feel is soft and supple with coffee flavors that linger, winning on its elegant, ultracharming appeal.",4040,Fidelitas
"The winemaker has said he makes Russian River Valley Pinot Noir to support his Syrah habit. Here he offers a compelling case in point, making a velvety, substantial 100% Syrah that's more elegant than overpowering. Mocha-kissed tannins play nicely with black and red berry fruit, providing a structure built to age, through 2021.",,Longboard
"Vibrant and elegant, this opens with aromas of bright red berry, rose petal and savory herb. The sleek palate delivers juicy wild cherry, crushed raspberry, white pepper and intense licorice alongside firm but fine-grained tannins and bright acidity. It's impeccably balanced. Drink 2018_2028.",,Cantina del Pino
"Part of Bryan Babcock's annual series of creatively named Pinots, this has smoky aromas of smoldering campfire, with brown spice and Bing cherry. The flavors tend toward brown as well, with burned orange, smashed cranberry and clove spice.",Je Ne Sais Quoi,Babcock
"Aromas of cooked red cherry, blackberry liqueur and smoke waft from the glass. Layers of flavor emerge once sipped__assis, elderberry jam, cracked pepper, cardamom and espresso__roving more approachable than heavily tannic versions of the grape.",Hidden Path Estate Grown,Burbank Ranch
"Pure on the nose, with a delightful mix of graphite, wild berry, cedar and minerally aromas, this is a rich, plump, mildly tannic Cabernet that will show best in the near term. Flavors of cassis, subdued oak spice and vanilla finish with ripe dark-berry sweetness and proper overall weight. Drink through 2018.",El Recurso Single Vineyard Block N°18,Cono Sur
"This is a solid, complex, complete and evocative five-grape Bordeaux blend. It has distinctive characteristics reflective of the region's terroir. Threads of soy and balsamic run across deep cassis fruit. The stiff acidity has a citrus flavor, and details of clean fresh herb add further interest. It's a wine with a fine sense of detail, balance and length.",Estate Grown Red Icon,Painted Rock
"A kitchen-sink blend of varieties with Merlot (44%) and Cabernet Sauvignon (26%) taking the lead, this wine offers appealing aromas that suggest high-toned, sweet barrel spices, plum and herbs. It's loaded with cranberry, cherry and plum flavors with a rich mouthfeel that keeps the interest high.",,Pendulum
"Concentrated and complex, this is a layered and packed wine. Dark chocolate, black cherry and pomegranate flavors are animated by a lively current of fine tannins, fresh acidity and full body. It includes 24% Cabernet Sauvignon. Delicious now, but will improve through at least 2018.",,Ray's Station Vineyards
"Mostly Merlot and Cabernet Franc, this wine from the cool 2011 vintage is light in color, with notes of raspberries, green herbs and flowers. It's on the lighter side of medium bodied__leshing out over time__ith abundant savory flavors and a firm handshake of tannins. It will benefit from additional time in the cellar. Best after 2018.",Uriah Estate Grown,Spring Valley Vineyard
"From the Napa side of Carneros, this Merlot is blended with 1% Petit Verdot, which presumably has added a smidgen of weight and color to the mix. Supersoft, the wine is well-rounded in ripe cherry and blueberry notes, with ample acidity, textured tannins and a strong finish that's awash in mocha flavor.",,Starmont
"This comes across as so light, friendly and easy to drink that one almost forgets to note the outstanding purity of fruit. Fresh cherries and blueberries present themselves honestly. Silky tannins and a spicy aftertaste suggest that it took top-quality fruit and lots of experience to make something so deceptively simple.",Novemberlese,Steininger
"This Riesling specialist strikes a unique chord, with precise yet individualistic wines. Crisp, tart, tongue-tickling flavors of green apple, grapefruit and orange peel are among the penetrating highlights. Concentrated and high in acid, this rocks on through a long finish.",,Tantalus Vineyards
"Strawberry and a rich streak of raspberry liqueur play nice in this fresh, zesty Pinot. Tight with tension on the palate, it also features layers of earthy forest-floor mushroom. Big in style, it comes together nicely and makes for an enjoyable wine.",,Terra Valentine
"Rich and velvety on the palate, this Pinot is cohesive in soft, pretty layers of light spice and red raspberry and cherry. Nuanced, it develops complexity as it goes, finishing as it started, rich and velvety.",,Tobacco Road
"Ripe, soft and creamy, this is a gold-colored, fresh Champagne, with yellow and white fruit flavors. The wine is open, softly rich with a light, bright mousse and finishing acidity. The aftertaste adds an attractive yeasty character.",Memory Brut,Veuve Doussot
"Full bodied and supple, this is one of the more opulent and open of d'Arenberg's array of single-vineyard wines. Notes of vanilla, maple syrup and bramble berries mark the nose, while the flavors add cassis and tobacco elements. It's a pretty, fleshy wine for drinking now_2020, although it may age well even past that.",The Fruit Bat Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"This is a concentrated, firmly built example of Grenache, with herbal overtones to its black cherry fruit. Despite the dark plum and cherry fruit, the impression is one of tautness and freshness. Drink it with red meat now, or give it until 2017 to settle down.",Old Vine,Yangarra Estate Vineyard
"Initial woody aromas evolve in the glass to show perfume, raisiny ripeness and spice notes. In the mouth, this delivers a crunchy, tannic feel and vibrant acidity. Plum, raspberry, baking spice and earthy flavors end with oaky vanilla notes offset by baked berry, cassis and rooty flavors. Drink through 2020.",Lot #36 Maipo Alto,Garage Wine Co.
"This top-flight effort reveals bold aromas of lime and crushed oyster shells. It's a medium-bodied wine that's tight and zesty, filled with flavors reminiscent of iodine and citrus on the long, dry finish. It should age gracefully through at least 2025.",Mort's Reserve Watervale,Kilikanoon
"Opulent, lush and round in style, this leads with ripe aromas of apricot, yellow apple and mange, laced with hints of clementine oil, marzipan and toasted baking spice. The palate is full and creamy, but balanced by ample acidity, lifting the texture from an overly flabby impression. Flavors of woody spice and peach pit dance on the lingering finish. Drink now_2017.",Nine Yards,Jardin
"This is a ripe, honeyed, single vineyard wine. It's textured and with a hint of steel, but the main character is rich fruit, peaches, apricots and quince. Warm and rich, it can be drunk now, but will be better in a year.",La Carte,Cave de Lugny
"A fruity, fragrant wine that has both a crisp, steely texture and a riper, more tropical element. Both characters are held together by the toast and fresh acidity. The wine is ready to drink, but would be better in 2015.",,Chartron et Trébuchet
"A very attractive wine that has ripe yellow fruits that are cut by acidity and citrus flavors. The texture is soft, rounded and lightly creamy. It's can age a few months, so wait until the end of 2014.",,Château Ducasse
"A classically firm wine, it gains weight and richness from the juicy black plum fruits. The firm, dry structure underlies the natural ripe fruitiness. It needs to soften out, so don't drink before 2017.",,Château Haut Boutisse
"While the tannins are still powerful and dense, the wine has rich berry fruits and juicy acidity that give freshness. It's ripe, well balanced, and full bodied, with a dark, concentrated character at the end. Drink from 2016.",,Château les Reuilles
"With hard tannins, sharp acids and dry, somewhat austere mouthfeel, this wine, blended with a drop of Malbec, distinguishes itself for its complexity. Blackberries, black currants, cassis liqueur and espresso flavors combine for interest. Yet the wine doesn't seem to be an ager. It needs rich, fatty meats and cheeses to balance the astringency.",Texas Ranch Vineyard Reserve Rows,Cinnabar
"A lively, fruity and perfumed wine this is just what a young Fleurie should be. Structure supports the ripe cherry fruits and floral character. Its tannins will soon soften and leave a ripe wine with fruitiness.",,Domaine de Leyre-Loup
"This fresh, cherry fruit flavored wine blends fruit from Beaujolais Villages and Morgon. It is ripe, while also crisp and bright. The soft tannins, juicy berry fruits and acidity give a fruity while dry finish. Drink now.",,Domaine Dominique Piron
"At 12g/L residual sugar, this just barely qualifies as dry. Fruit flavors suggest lemon curd and green pineapple, and there's an interesting savory note. But flatness across the palate keeps the score from going higher.",Nicholas Estate Dry,Anam Cara
"The mint-green bottle color presages the minty flavors of this dry, crisp wine. The fruit feels delicately balanced between underripe and fine, with suggestions of white peach and mango. It shows some real complexity, and the all-important acidity is wonderful.",,Angeline
"This medium-bodied wine conveys fragrances of yellow flowers and exotic fruit. The palate offers ripe apple, mature pear and white peach alongside fresh acidity. It closes on an almond note.",Colli Scaligeri,Sandro de Bruno
"Ready for drinking now with its raspberries, currants, persimmons and oak. The acidity is bright, and the finish is clean and spicy. Pair now with lamb dishes.",,Sanglier Cellars
"This vibrant wine begins with aromas of apples, stone fruit and mineral. The savory palate offers ripe Bartlett pear, citrus and peach alongside bright acidity. It closes on a bitter almond note.",San Vigilio,Selva Capuzza
"This blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Syrah and 10% Sangiovese opens with aromas of toasted oak, espresso, black fruit and whiffs of green pepper. The densely concentrated, low-acid palate is one-dimensional, delivering fleshy black cherry and bell pepper accented with roasted coffee bean and sweet vanilla. Drink soon.",Acciderba,Serni Fulvio Luigi
"It's loaded with juicy green apple, white peach and lemon sensations accompanied by a light mineral note. Crisp acidity gives a clean, quenching finish.",,Tiefenbrunner
"Blended from Marsanne and Viognier in equal proportions, this wine is marked by ripe, opulent mango, peach, orange, vanilla and honey flavors. It feels sweet as you taste it, but the finish is dry.",,Treana
"It's properly dry and brisk in acidity, with a light, silky mouthfeel framing sour cherry candy, cranberry and pomegranate flavors. Drink now.",,Windsor Oaks
"The second label of Alorna, Portal da Aguia wines develop early. This bright and fruity red is based around soft tannins, very ripe fruits and a juicy, full-in-the-mouth texture. It needs little time to age, so drink from the end of 2014.",Portal da Aguia Tinto,Quinta da Alorna
"A fifty-fifty blend of Sangiovese and Syrah, this densely concentrated wine has aromas that suggest underbrush, wet leaves, black berries and prune. The palate delivers fleshy black cherry, raisin, black pepper, espresso, bitter dark chocolate and a sugary vanilla note alongside solid tannins. It's at its ideal drinking window so enjoy soon.",Memento,Olivi
"This straightforward, medium-bodied Pinot Grigio opens with floral aromas and a whiff of tropical fruit. The round palate offers juicy Bartlett pear and green apple alongside fresh acidity.",,Elena Walch
"Floral aromas recall jasmine and other spring flowers along with a whiff of graphite. The linear palate offers yellow peach, golden apples, citrus and a mineral note. White almond marks the finish.",Danieli,Fattori
"Smoky and dark, in both aroma and flavor, this hits quickly with flavors of black cherry, chocolate and espresso. The finish is tight and quick.",,Grochau
"This refined, vibrant Pinot Bianco opens with floral aromas and apple scents. The juicy yellow apple carries over to the palate along with a refreshing citrus note and crisp acidity that gives a clean, quenching close.",,Kössler
"This opens with intense floral aromas and a whiff of candied citrus. The slightly sweet palate offers lemon drops, exotic fruit and notes of honey and almond.",Carniga,Cantina del Castello
"Subdued aromas of Alpine wild flowers, earth and mineral come with a whiff of hay. The reserved palate offers green apples, pineapple and mineral notes. It has nice weight and a smooth texture.",Aristos,Cantina Valle Isarco
"This is a spicy, rich, smooth wine, immediately attractive and ready to drink. It has ripe tannins, black fruits in abundance and delicious acidity to give a lift. It's a classic barbecue wine and great for summer parties.",Quinta das Setencostas,Casa Santos Lima
"This opens with aromas of canned pears packed in syrup, lemon peel and mineral. The palate suggests sweet golden apple and lemon drop balanced by fresh acidity. It closes on a dry note.",15,Castelfeder
"This is a rich, ripe wine that is full of black fruits and fine, dusty tannins. It's full-bodied, the fruitiness rounded out with some light wood aging. Juicy and fruity at the end, this could age for a year or two, so drink from 2016.",Cuvée Prestige,Château Belvue
"Made from old vines, this concentrated wine has weight and a tight, mineral texture. Pears and hints of yellow fruits combine with acidity and a contrasting touch of honey. Drink from 2015.",,Château de Pizay
"This is a ripe, fruity wine that is firmly structured. It has rich tannins, a touch of licorice as well as black plum flavors and acidity to balance. With its dry texture, solid backbone and fresh aftertaste, it will be ready to drink from 2016.",,Château le Castellot
"From vines close to the premier crus, this is firm and solid while generous. It conveys power and structure along with a more delicious, perfumed side. Drink from 2017.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"This gets an extra year in barrel and bottle prior to release. It's two-thirds Cabernet Sauvignon, 28% Syrah and 5% Petit Verdot. Still tart and tannic, the wine carries a full load of herb and earth characteristics, with less impact from the fruit than the high alcohol would suggest.",,Chester Kidder
"Medium- to full-bodied, it's very smooth, well polished and easy to enjoy. Not too ripe or too sweet, but sophisticated in style, it delivers moderately ripe raspberry and blueberry flavors, soft tannins and a lingering fruity finish.",Ten Zin,Deaver
"This is a superb Cab at this price and case production level, tasting like one much smaller in production. With hearty tannins, it offers nuanced cranberry fruit and notable acidity, full body and a finish combining black olive and tobacco. Ready to enjoy now, it'll be just as good 2017_2019.",,St. Francis
"Medium garnet in color, this wine has a bouquet of cranberry and chocolate. It is simultaneously bright and velvety, with an interesting flavor profile of fennel bulb, strawberry, lemon zest and coffee. The mellow finish has a lingering note of toasted coriander seed.",,Suvla
"This wine is dark garnet in the glass, with aromas of raspberry and boysenberry that set the palate up for flavors of eucalyptus, thyme, oregano and black cherry. The flavor profile leans a little too far towards the herbal end of the spectrum, but it is ultimately a pleasant and easy-drinking wine.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"Made with 80% Nerello Mascalese and 20% Nerello Cappuccio, this opens with aromas of black fruit, subtle oak, toast and vanilla. The palate offers juicy black cherry and raspberry flavors that are lightly accented by notes of clove and chocolate. The tannis are polished.",Martinella,Vivera
"Consulting winemaker Michel Rolland oversees this bottling in the Long Shadows series. Fans of his forward, sometimes voluptuous style may find this vintage a bit thin. The fruit is peppery and the tannins chewy, while the barrel flavors of chocolaty oak have not quite assimilated. Further bottle age might improve the wine.",,Pedestal
"Aromas of blue flower, mature black fruit, underbrush and subtle oak lead the nose of this Taurasi. The palate offers solid tannins and flavors of mature plum, stewed prune and plum cake, accented by a hint of allspice.",,Pietracupa
"Made with native grape Casavecchia, this opens with a fragrance of blue flower, plum, earth and leather. The dense, juicy palate offers fleshy black cherry, cinnamon and black raspberry alongside soft, round tannins and fresh acidity.",Trebulanum,Alois
"This full-bodied wine just lacks that bit of freshness that would've taken it to the next level. Stewed plums, black olives and espresso notes are rich and complex, ending on a long silky note. Drink now and over the next few years.",Vin Rare,Dauvergne & Ranvier
"This is a bit plummy and stewed on the nose, but shows more life on the palate, where some chewy tannins provide backbone and richness. Powdered cinnamon and cocoa notes mark the long finish. Drink now_2018.",Roquedon,Alain Jaume et Fils
"Direct berry fruit aromas are firm and tight. This feels ripped, honest and authentic, but ultimately approachable and uncomplicated. Black fruit, raw oak and licorice flavors precede a woody and weighty yet fresh and clean finish.",,Luna Beberide
"While Marsannay is mainly planted with Pinot Noir, there are small vineyards of Chardonnay, like this six-acre parcel. It has produced a fruity, ripe wine with a touch of minerality, along with wood and crisp acidity. Light, fruity and ready to drink soon.",Le Clos,Domaine René Bouvier
"The terse nature of Assyrtico finds a friend in oak when properly administered, as this wine exhibits. On the nose, citrus and mineral harmoniously mingle with spice and toast. On the palate, the wine retains its bright lemon and citrus flavors but is given extra body through the subtle oak. A lovely wine with a clean finish.",Fermented in Oak Barrel,Domaine Sigalas
"Under the Feather label, this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon styled by Napa's Randy Dunn s the only one pure varietal red wine in the Long Shadows collection. Eucalyptus aromas rise instantly as it's poured, leading into a smooth, appealing flavors of plum and cassis fruit. It fades rather quickly, even after being open for a few hours, leaving just an impression of chocolate from the barrel aging. It lacks the heft of past vintages.",,Feather
"In this pungent wine, Syrah is co-fermented with a touch of Viognier, then blended with 33% Grenache. Interesting scents of diesel, soil and stem wrap into the tight red berry fruit. It rounds into a rather soft, easy-drinking red that should be consumed through 2017.",Lawrence Vineyards Vaucluse,Gård
"An aromatic blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, it conveys generous barrel notes of coconut, clove and baking spices matched with dried cherries. Tart cranberry flavors are ripe and lush with a touch of midpalate bitterness that holds it back.",Three Sheets Super-Tuscan-style,Genoa
"Made from the native grape Nerello Mascalese grown on Mount Etna, this salmon colored rosato offers bright red cherry, juicy pink grapefruit, nectarine, white pepper and mineral sensations. The savory palate is balanced by vibrant acidity.",Rosato,Graci
"A hearty Cabernet rich in cranberry and cassis with streaks of earthy cedar and a pleasant herbal undertone. The tannins are young still, pleading to wait until 2017_2019 in the bottle, or for some air before enjoying.",Red Ranch,Hanna
"Intensely mineral on the nose with aromas of wet granite and steel, this delicate dry Riesling builds in floral, fruity exuberance on the palate. Fleshy and ripe with white peach and honeydew flavors, it finishes long with hints of zesty lime pith.",Homestead Reserve,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"Heady aromas suggest cinnamon and clove wrapped around black cherry and chocolate. Silky on the palate, it's structured in juicy red fruit and black licorice, lingering on the balanced finish.",,Honrama
"Despite the delicate salmon color, the flavors of this medium-bodied rosé have a bit of the breadth and depth of a red wine. The texture is smooth, and the flavors lean towards savory and earthy rather than out-and-out fruity. It will be good as an apéritif and even better with a meal.",Made With Organic Grapes,Horse & Plow
"A bold Chardonnay that embraces new oak barrels and has the flavor profile to show for it. Hovey fermented it in 50% new oak barrels, matured it on the lees and bottled it a few months after harvest. The scent and flavor of toasted oak comes through from the first sniff to the finish. But enough fruit, butter and almond flavors lie beneath the toasty overlay to make us come back for another sip.",Duende,Hovey
"Lots of fun to sip this showy, overt, no-holds-barred Zin. Lavish use of new oak gives aromas of toasted bread, maple syrup and smoked bacon. The flavors say ripe strawberries and sweet blackberry jam, and the finish is sweet and spicy at the same time.",Old Vines,Ironstone
"A soft wine with attractive fruitiness and lemon and lime flavors. Fresh and rounded, it shows its northern French origins with the tight acidity at the end.",Fourchaume Premier Cru,Joseph Faiveley
"This pleasantly perfumed wine has some acidity, jammy red fruits and soft tannins. It feels very rounded and smooth, with a structure that is totally integrated into the velvet texture. Drink from 2016.",Les Charmes Premier Cru,Joseph Faiveley
"An alluring combination of smoked meats and roasted peppers__hink chile relleno with chorizo__rame the the aromas of this bottling, alongside espresso, mocha and fresh cigar. Once sipped, there's a smooth mouthfeel with cedar and cherry flavors, a touch of oregano and an oaky vanilla sense on the finish. The 19% Merlot evens things out.",,Leoness
"Rounded and ripe, it has tannins nicely embedded in the red plum and strawberry flavors. It's full-bodied and already showing a delicious, seductive side. Drink from 2016.",,Maison Ambroise
"Buttery and aromatic, this is a broad and ripe wine. It has attractive acidity as well, giving freshness and a sense of structure. It's rich, rounded and ready to drink.",Uchizy,Maison Champy
"Dry, dusty plum and apple skin aromas hold steady. This feels rubbery and tastes lightly candied, with generic berry, vanilla and toasted flavors emerging. A raw and tannic finish says this needs something like pizza or flank steak to help it along.",Hacienda Araucano Reserva,François Lurton
"The nose on this Chardonnay is quite attractive with notes of mango and musky florals accenting aromas of apples and sugar cookies. The dry, medium-bodied palate is a bit more subdued, with subtle apple and pear flavors accented with soft acidity. Finishes a bit short, but has a hint of spice.",,Silver Thread
"This unusual Barbera is aged 72 days in Bourbon casks, lending intense notes of vanilla, graham cracker and spice to more delicate flavors of blackberry and cherry. It's quite puckery with acidity and softly tannic on the finish.",Estate Bourbon Cask Aged 72 Days,Three Brothers
"Cranberry sauce flavors and refreshing acidity make this a very delicious wine to be consumed young. Unhindered by oak or undue extraction, this shows its charming, primary fruit in an open, uncomplicated way. This is a winner with charcuterie and salami.",Hedwighof,Sepp Moser
This is a midweight Grenache with fruit that's straightforward in its ripeness. The palate is more dark plum than strawberry with a tar-like character to the finish.,Estate,Fenestra
"Young and fruity, this is a wine without wood aging. The palate is full of bright red fruits, light tannins and an attractive acidity. The wine is ready to drink.",Les Amis,Domaine de Sulauze
"Overripe notes of raisins and prunes detract from this wine's enjoyment. Its tannins are augmented by a hint of bitterness and it's a bit hot on the finish, but a juicy cheeseburger will resolve any of these problems.",Sandpiper,Porter Family Vineyards
"Though just four years old, this wine seems a bit dried out with notes of dried cherry, huckleberry and brown sugar. It's supple in feel but the acids are surprisingly tart and take over.",,Tildio
"Notes of sour apple and lemon accompany this wine's dialed-high acidity. Priced to sell, it'll suffice in certain settings as an apéritif or quaffer with snacks.",,un4seen
"Blended with 14% Merlot and aged in a mix of French and American oak, this opens with pleasant, simple raspberry fruit scents and flavors. In the mouth it turns thin and bitter, with a burnt flavor in the finish.",Barrel Select,Vin du Lac
A direct and appealing wine with notes of freshly cut grass and citrus. It's medium bodied and off-dry (15 g/L residual sugar) with sweet fruit flavors that come off as a bit diluted.,,Washington Hills
"This is a simple, soft wine which has some sweetness as well as easy fruit. There is some perfume and a spicy edge as well as rounded orange flavor. Drink now.",Gentil,Dopff & Irion
"Similar to previous Ballatore Spumantes, this bubbly is sweet with honey notes and a bit scoury in the mouth. Flavors of orange jam, vanilla and yeast are balanced with fine acidity.",Gran Spumante,Ballatore
"You'll find lots of ripe orange, pineapple, lemon and honeysuckle flavors in this crisp, acidic Pinot Grigio. It finishes with a hint of maple syrup.",Los Alamos Vineyard,Bianchi
"A heavy dose of oak takes center stage in this blend of 85% Montepulciano and 15% Cabernet and Syrah. Coffee, vanilla and toasted notes leave very little room for any fruit, which appears to have faded away entirely, leaving only astringent wood tannins on the close.",Casirano,Conte Leopardi
"This blush wine will appeal to the Moscato crowd that likes sweet wines. With pretty pink and orange hues, its scoury bubbles frame flavors of honey, raspberry jam and yeast.",Moscato Rosé,Ballatore
"With easy raspberry, cherry and mocha flavors, this is a likeable wine to drink now. The soft suppleness suggests tacos, burgers and other everyday fare.",,Brander
"Husch has been making Sauvignon Blanc since 1980. This one is fairly full-bodied with a thread of acidity weaving in and out of the tropical fruit flavors. In the background, hints of peach and grass linger.",,Husch
"A mix of blackberry and red currant flavors play on the nose and palate. Fruit is undoubtedly the core of this wine, with easy tannin and fresh acidity channelling it into a pleasant, fruity red for early drinking.",,Judith Beck
"Oily, gritty, almost nutty aromas open this blend of 85% Viognier and 15% Chardonnay. The palate is plump, weighty and melony in texture, with honeyed flavors of banana and tropical fruits. A soft, dense, thick finish is par for the course.",Estate,Estampa
"New oak takes the limelight in this blend of 90% Montepulciano and 10% Sangiovese. The palate is dominated by wood, espresso, toast and vanilla alongside rubber, leafy sensations. It lacks fruit richness and has a drying, astringent finish.",Lailum,Fattoria Laila
"This simple, everyday white offers wispy floral aromas and delicate flavors of tropical fruit and citrus. Pair this with light pasta dishes or lightly seasoned fish.",Ampor,Le Corti dei Farfensi
"Sharp scents of raspberry tinged with a hint of plastic lead into a wine that falls flat in the mouth. Color is fine, vintage is recent, but there's little life to it.",Cuvée Rouge,Vin du Lac
"Too much of a good thing is how to characterize this Merlot. It's exceptionally ripe with cherries, red currants and mocha. It's also strong in oak. The result is a soft, syrupy confection.",,Westerly
"Dusty apple and melon aromas come with a whiff of oak. The palate rides high on citric acid, while flavors of peach and nectarine are chunky. On the finish, this loses some clarity, which is replaced by mealy notes.",Albamar,William Cole
"This fruity wine balances citrus and ripe white fruits. There is a steely edge that lends freshness and structure, and suggests the wine could age well. The aftertaste has some tight citrus acidity.",Réserve,Dirler-Cadé
This is a particularly creamy wine that's ripe and fruity with only a light touch of acidity. It has a soft feel with notes of creamed apples that makes it a wine to drink now.,,Domaine Allimant-Laugner
"This is a light, fragrant wine that has just a touch of spice and some fresh acidity. It's an easy, simple wine that's very ready to drink, .",,Helfrich
"Floral potpourri, mango and apple aromas are inviting on this slightly off-dry Gewürztraminer. The palate is subtle with apple and pear flavor, and finishes slightly tart.",Estate Reserve,Stony Lonesome
"The 2010 vintage was cold by Chilean standards, and that's reflected in this strange-smelling wine that's loaded with pine, juniper and foresty aromas. In the mouth, it's both chunky and acidic, while flavors of blueberry have a green core. A short, mellow finish with sweetness confirms this wine's weak points.",Espino Gran Cuvée,William Fèvre
"Fleshy blackberry and cassis aromas are jammy and grapy, with a note of iodine. This is very tannic and textured on the palate, with flavors of baked blackberry, stewed fig, burnt toast and bitter chocolate finishing hard and rubbery on a sizzling, stewed character.",Romanico,Teso La Monja
"This medium-bodied red opens with aromas of red berry, tilled earth, underbrush and dried herb. The firm palate doles out black cherry, plum, licorice and crushed mint alongside modest acidity and fine-grained tannins. Drink through 2017.",Tenuta Il Monte,Fattorie Parri
"Fruity and dense in brambly blackberry, with a waft of smoky oak, this wine offers a lean, balanced entry before taking on complexity and concentration on the finish, softly layered as it goes.",,Folie _ Deux
"All varietal from up-and-coming Scooteney Flats Vineyard, this wine displays aromas of fresh herbs, dark raspberries and barrel spices. There's no lack of richness to the fruit flavors but the chalky tannins need time to stitch together.",,Foundry Vineyards
"Soft gold in color, this wine offers fragrances of apple tart and vanilla. Flavors of pear, apple, lemon curd and eucalyptus come on strong but mellow as it moves into the pear and lemon peel finish.",Yiron,Galil Mountain
"Aromas of orange peel, blue fruit, flowers and dried herbs are appealing and direct. The flavors and feel are elegant, showing freshness and acidity.",Estate Grown,Gordon Estate
"This wine is principally Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with the balance other Bordeaux varieties. Aromas of clove, sweet plum, vanilla and tire rubber lead to sweet, palate-coating blueberry and smoke flavors that linger.",Alluvial,Gravel Bar
"This dry rosé has a bright pink color, subtle aromas like strawberry and watermelon, and fairly rich fig flavors that are well balanced by crisp acidity. Light and refreshing on the palate, this style of rosé seems to be the profile of choice for a growing number of California winemakers.",,High Valley
"Savory notes of yeast trump fruit on the nose while the palate counters the spiciness with lots of zesty citrus. A very refreshing, lip-smacking Grüner, ideal for hot summer days.",,Hillinger
"Tart greengage plums join grapefruit and lemon in this fresh, light-bodied offering. Traces of yeast add some midpalate texture to a very refreshing, easy-drinking wine.",Zöbing,Hirsch
"Very slight hints of fresh pear peel on nose and palate are joined by fresh lemon concentration on the palate. Chardonnay in the blend provides midpalate texture and with a bit of air there also are notions of riper, jucier yellow pear. Not a showy but rather subtle and light-bodied. Will work on its own or as a versatile accompaniment on the table.",Pannonica,Höpler
"Dominated by Pinot Noir, this Champagne is rich, full and creamy. With some bottle age, it has become lightly toasty while still retaining a fruity citrus and apple character.",Alliance Brut,Jean Josselin
"Showing this variety's more savory side, this wine has aromas of dried leaves and herbs. The fruit flavors seem a bit dried out and raisinated, with a grip of dry tannins on the finish. Drink now.",,Kontos
"Nectarine and apple aromas are good, while this feels plump and melony, but with spine. Briny flavors of gooseberry, apple and orange finish with a note of sea salt. Drink this fresh, minerally wine now.",,Lagar de Indra
"This blend of near-equal parts Grenache, Syrah and Mourvèdre hails from Den Hoed and Ambassador vineyards. Aromas of herbs and tire rubber are somewhat uneasy, but lead to dense, layered cherry and blackberry flavors that make up for them.",Cuvée Mirabelle,Lauren Ashton Cellars
"Here's a hearty, friendly red that delivers ripe wild cherry, ripe black plum, dried mint and black pepper sensations accompanied by a eucalyptus note. It's at its ideal drinking window so enjoy soon.",Riserva,Le Torri di Campiglioni
"In Champagne-speak, Extra Dry means sweeter than Brut, so this is a soft wine, fruity rather than mineral. Pear and fresh green plum flavors are balanced by orange zest and final acidity. The wine could do with more time in the bottle to ensure that the fruitiness is better integrated into the texture. Drink this from early 2016.",Cuvée Tentation Extra Dry,Louis de Sacy
"Aromas of charred earth, grilled sage, allspice, pressed blue flowers and a whiff of game emerge in the glass. The palate offers ripe black cherry, overripe plum, mocha and a hint of leather. It's evolving quickly so drink soon.",Villa Bossi Riserva,Marchesi Gondi
"This is rich and generously spiced, smelling and tasting like chocolate, vanilla, smoke and blackberries. Aging for 19 months in American and French oak certainly boosted the spices. It tastes full-bodied, very deep and almost sweet in flavor, with moderate tannins to lend some support.",Epicenter Old Vine,Mettler Family Vineyards
"Peppery spice is as important here as ripe, luscious cherry and plum fruit: this blend unites the pepperiness of Austrian Zweigelt with the fleshy roundness of Merlot. There is a lick of vanilla on the finish to accompany the ripe fruit flavors.",Classic Cuvée,Nastl
"The aromas of pear, butterscotch and apricot show plenty of detail. The palate is full bodied in feel but with lighter-styled fruit flavors.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"This offers subdued aromas of scorched earth, leafy underbrush and ripe dark-skinned fruit. The evolved palate delivers dried black cherry, raisin, clove, leather and ground pepper alongside polished tannins. Drink soon to enjoy the remaining fruit flavors.",Riserva,Poggio Bonelli
"An unusual aroma profile of sandalwood, broccoli and exotic spices leads to coffee and dark cherries. The fruit flavors are silky in feel, showing plenty of depth with lightly grainy tannins supporting them.",,Reininger
"No punches are pulled on this 100% varietal wine. Aromas of freshly sliced red apple, cranberries and milk chocolate lead to candy-bar-sweet cherry and chocolate flavors. It doesn't entirely come together but provides enjoyment.",,Revelry
"Fleshy, ripe black cherry fruit pervades nose and palate, there are some palpable tannins framing all that fruit and of course the telltale notes of Zweigelt pepper. An uncomplicated red for every day. Drink soon.",,Rosenhof
"Aromas offer raspberries, stemmy herbs, jalapeño and spice while the palate brings plush and lightly sweet cherry and blackberry flavors.",,Six Prong
"Aromas of pressed blue flowers, ripe plum, dark berry, anise, coffee and nutmeg lead the nose. The lively palate delivers juicy black Morello cherry, milk chocolate, orange zest and a hint of baking spice alongside bright acidity and supple tannins. Made to be drunk young so enjoy now.",,Tenuta Pierazzuoli
"Well balanced, this red fruited-wine is also fully structured with a mineral background. With a dosage that brings out the texture as well as the fruit, this is a great apéritif-style of wine. Drink now.",Brut Rosé,Thiénot
"Produced with Sangiovese, 5% Canaiolo and 5% Mammolo, this opens with subtle aromas of turned soil, ripe plum and dark cooking spice. The palate offers dried black cherry, licorice, coffee, oak and a leathery note accompanied by solid tannins.",Podere Le Caggiole,Tiberini
"This 100% varietal wine is wound up tightly. Blackberry, coconut, vanilla and high-toned green herb aromas lead to ripe, full-bodied dark fruit and baking-spice flavors. The oak plays a lead role in the show.",,Trellis Gate
"This blend of Merseguera and Sauvignon Blanc is modest as a church mouse, with clean but dilute green-apple aromas. An easygoing, round palate offers orange and lime flavors in front of a pithy, citrusy finish.",Winemaker's Selection,Castillo de Liria
"Production from 41 acres of land donated over more than a century to the Hospices of Lyon produces an attractive and aromatic wine. It is full of light, juicy fruit and fresh red cherries. Drink this refreshing wine now.",,Domaine des Hospices Civils de Lyon
"Grassy, flat aromas are inoffensive but don't bring much to the table. This feels citrusy and foamy, with generic flavors of brown sugar and melon. Touches of milk chocolate and bitterness work the finish on this Pinot Noir-led rosé blend.",Anna Brut Rosé,Codorníu
"This full-bodied wine owes a lot to oak flavors. Aromas like maple syrup and brown sugar lead to nearly sweet flavors that resemble boysenberry jam. It is tannic, robust and rather stiff in texture.",The Cab,Cosentino
"Fresh and fruity, this is a ripe, cherry-flavored wine (hence the name Griottes, a type of cherry). It is light with a straight line of acidity that cuts through the attractive fruitiness. Drink immediately.",Les Griottes,Domaine du Vissoux
"Banana aromas don't intrude too strongly into the fruity palate of this wine that has a crisp character. Tart red-berry fruits and and bright acidity give the wine a fresh, totally fruity appeal with only a hint of tannin. Drink now.",Les Pays de Pierres Dorées,Domaine Pral
"Dried herbs, blueberry and then a bit of forest-floor funk show on the nose of this affordable, widely available bottling by a reliable producer. The palate tastes like grape juice, proving even more pleasant when licorice elements emerge. It's perfect for a backyard barbecue.",,Esser
"This wine has structure and freshness although the fruit is on the lean side, offering black cherries and swathes of crisp acidity. The aftertaste is juicy, fresh and mineral.",Domaine dit Baron,Georges Duboeuf
"Root beer and slate show on the very restrained nose of this wine that combines fruit from Monterey County (66%) and Santa Barbara Counry (34%). The palate is light and slightly metallic, with iron as well as eucalyptus and shreds of cranberry and raspberry fruit.",Grand Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
Cranberry and fennel elements entertain the nose on this widely available wine. Raspberries and black licorice show on the light and easy palate.,,Magnolia Court
"Stone-fruit aromas are the opening, and they're on the full, waxy, fleshy side. This weighs in with low acidity, and that results in broad flavors of papaya and green melon. A round finish, much like the nose, shows a fleshy component.",,Mantel Blanco
"The local grape Castelão is blended with Cabernet Sauvignon in this soft, spicy and fruity wine. Red fruits and balanced acidity are given a shove by a lightly tannic structure. The wine is ready to drink.",Terra de Lobos Tinto,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Produced from high altitude vineyards to retain acidity, this is a fruity, crisp and bright wine. It has an herbal character along with lively lemon and quince flavors. The wine is ready to drink.",Evel Branco,Real Companhia Velha
"It seems perverse to plant Gewürztraminer in the Douro and this wine is as much a curiosity as it is attractively perfumed. Showing all the hallmarks of the grape, the palate carries flavors of lychee and rosewater, although it all seems muted. The acidity does give a final lift.",,Real Companhia Velha
"This dense, full-bodied wine exhibits characteristics of savory dried cranberry and pomegranate as well as an earthy sense of rose and herb. The contrast reaches its apex on the slightly sour finish.",,Andretti
"The impression is that some of the fruit may have teetered on the edge of overripe, as the wine has a grainy, sugary mouthfeel. It's not overtly sweet, just granular, and the pear fruit flavors are lightly honeyed. It's best to drink this by late 2016.",Estate Bottled,Cardwell Hill
"Saucy raspberry aromas are herbal and briny. This feels chunky and round. Jammy raspberry flavors turn medicinal and herbal, ending with notes of latex and Band-Aid.",Made With Organically Grown Grapes,Domaine Jean Bousquet
"This light, fresh Chardonnay has lively pear and apple flavors. A crisp texture gives zing to the brightly fruity wine. Drink now.",,Jean-Marc Burgaud
"Faintly floral in lemon and grapefruit, this is a tightly woven, smooth 100% varietal white, shy in flavor and body. Enjoy it cold as an apéritif.",Yount Mill Vineyard,Mason Cellars
"This smells like waffles and maple syrup, and feels very generous. The smooth texture shows moderate tannins, while a brown-sugar note rounds out the finish.",,Sand Point
"Earthy, leathery aromas of plum and berry are a touch rustic. This feels rubbery and raw, but fresh. Dry, earthy plum flavors are limited, while the finish is short, with a tight, chalky feel.",Hoya de Cadenas Reserva,Vicente Gandia
"Briary and powerful smelling, with leathery aromas of blackberry and dark plum, this heavily extracted Malbec is grabby and tannic. Earthy, roasted blackberry and leathery flavors end with simmering heat. This is a big, fruity and gripping Malbec.",Juan Benegas,Benegas
"A helping of Petit Verdot adds to the strength and power of this gigantic, full-bodied wine, which shows elements of waxy plum, dried herb and even a touch of bell pepper on the palate, not quite resolved.",Limited Release Cold Springs Vineyard,Charles Krug
"This Chardonnay is soft, with attractive and gentle green fruit and sliced-apple flavors. A tang of lemon juice gives extra freshness.",,Domaine Dupeuble Père et Fils
"This wine is totally fresh, with crisp red currant and riper banana flavors__ bright wine that's all fruit and refreshing acidity. The family has been in the wine business since 1811 and today works with some 50 small-production growers.",Beau!,Loron et Fils
"Light and poised, this crisply fruity wine is all juicy acidity and red berry fruits. It is balanced, bright and ready to drink.",Automne Ensoleillé,Vignerons de Bel Air
"Standard berry aromas come with sharp, warm notes. A punchy, angular, high-acid palate delivers potent red-fruit flavors along with an active, fiery finish.",Reserve,Red Rock
"Cherry and plum aromas are aggressive. This energetic Malbec is beyond snappy and juicy, while salty plum and currant flavors are racy and edgy. A briny aftertaste and peppery spice flavors dominate a tough finish.",Leo,Valentin Bianchi
"A blend of modest floral and mustard aromas makes for a quiet bouquet. Chalky and acidic in feel, this Malvasia-Viura blend tastes of tart peach, lemon and mustard. A stony feeling, borderline sour finish is angular and grabby.",Antea Limited Edition,Marqués de Cáceres
"Leathery and somewhat green, this wine has yet to find its balance, combining 95% Cabernet Sauvignon with 3% Malbec and 2% Petit Verdot. It veers between heavy, ripe tension and an underripe underbelly, finishing unsure.",Vintage Selection,Charles Krug
"Fruity and dense in brambly blackberry, with a waft of smoky oak, this wine offers a lean, balanced entry before taking on complexity and concentration on the finish, softly layered as it goes.",,Folie _ Deux
"All varietal from up-and-coming Scooteney Flats Vineyard, this wine displays aromas of fresh herbs, dark raspberries and barrel spices. There's no lack of richness to the fruit flavors but the chalky tannins need time to stitch together.",,Foundry Vineyards
"Soft gold in color, this wine offers fragrances of apple tart and vanilla. Flavors of pear, apple, lemon curd and eucalyptus come on strong but mellow as it moves into the pear and lemon peel finish.",Yiron,Galil Mountain
"Aromas of orange peel, blue fruit, flowers and dried herbs are appealing and direct. The flavors and feel are elegant, showing freshness and acidity.",Estate Grown,Gordon Estate
"This wine is principally Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with the balance other Bordeaux varieties. Aromas of clove, sweet plum, vanilla and tire rubber lead to sweet, palate-coating blueberry and smoke flavors that linger.",Alluvial,Gravel Bar
"Dominated by Pinot Noir, this Champagne is rich, full and creamy. With some bottle age, it has become lightly toasty while still retaining a fruity citrus and apple character.",Alliance Brut,Jean Josselin
"Showing this variety's more savory side, this wine has aromas of dried leaves and herbs. The fruit flavors seem a bit dried out and raisinated, with a grip of dry tannins on the finish. Drink now.",,Kontos
"This dry rosé has a bright pink color, subtle aromas like strawberry and watermelon, and fairly rich fig flavors that are well balanced by crisp acidity. Light and refreshing on the palate, this style of rosé seems to be the profile of choice for a growing number of California winemakers.",,High Valley
"Savory notes of yeast trump fruit on the nose while the palate counters the spiciness with lots of zesty citrus. A very refreshing, lip-smacking Grüner, ideal for hot summer days.",,Hillinger
"Tart greengage plums join grapefruit and lemon in this fresh, light-bodied offering. Traces of yeast add some midpalate texture to a very refreshing, easy-drinking wine.",Zöbing,Hirsch
"Very slight hints of fresh pear peel on nose and palate are joined by fresh lemon concentration on the palate. Chardonnay in the blend provides midpalate texture and with a bit of air there also are notions of riper, jucier yellow pear. Not a showy but rather subtle and light-bodied. Will work on its own or as a versatile accompaniment on the table.",Pannonica,Höpler
"In Champagne-speak, Extra Dry means sweeter than Brut, so this is a soft wine, fruity rather than mineral. Pear and fresh green plum flavors are balanced by orange zest and final acidity. The wine could do with more time in the bottle to ensure that the fruitiness is better integrated into the texture. Drink this from early 2016.",Cuvée Tentation Extra Dry,Louis de Sacy
"Aromas of charred earth, grilled sage, allspice, pressed blue flowers and a whiff of game emerge in the glass. The palate offers ripe black cherry, overripe plum, mocha and a hint of leather. It's evolving quickly so drink soon.",Villa Bossi Riserva,Marchesi Gondi
"This offers subdued aromas of scorched earth, leafy underbrush and ripe dark-skinned fruit. The evolved palate delivers dried black cherry, raisin, clove, leather and ground pepper alongside polished tannins. Drink soon to enjoy the remaining fruit flavors.",Riserva,Poggio Bonelli
"This is rich and generously spiced, smelling and tasting like chocolate, vanilla, smoke and blackberries. Aging for 19 months in American and French oak certainly boosted the spices. It tastes full-bodied, very deep and almost sweet in flavor, with moderate tannins to lend some support.",Epicenter Old Vine,Mettler Family Vineyards
"Peppery spice is as important here as ripe, luscious cherry and plum fruit: this blend unites the pepperiness of Austrian Zweigelt with the fleshy roundness of Merlot. There is a lick of vanilla on the finish to accompany the ripe fruit flavors.",Classic Cuvée,Nastl
"The aromas of pear, butterscotch and apricot show plenty of detail. The palate is full bodied in feel but with lighter-styled fruit flavors.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"Initially this smells rugged and choppy, but calmer aromas of spice, red plum and cherry emerge with time. A fruity, approachable palate and straightforward cherry and plum flavors finish fairly long, with a touch of controlled bitterness.",Tilenus,Estefania
"Rich and thick in blackberry and licorice, this wine is also soft and juicy on the midpalate, with big black fruit, vanilla and leather. Integrated tannins remain chewy until the finish, when a taste of bittersweet chocolate comes into play.",,G. Reedy
This wine offers bright aromas of watermelon and cherry Jolly Ranger. It drinks dry with candied fruit flavors that show a pleasing sense of texture and richness.,,Gramercy
"This well-balanced, medium-bodied wine blends ripe strawberry aromas and blackberry flavors with a lively texture that's bolstered by good acidity and firm tannins. It's easy to enjoy the fresh fruitiness.",Estate Bottled,Greenwood Ridge
"A rather subdued nose turns into a citric pool of grapefruit pulp and peel on the palate. This is fresh and easy, light and zippy. The finish is clean-cut and refreshing. Drink soon.",Jakobi,Gross
"Fresh green pear and hints of ivy on nose and palate create a light-bodied, friendly, easy-drinking summer white. Zippiness and fruitiness are the hallmarks. Drink as soon as possible while fruit flavors are at their peak.",Von den Rieden,H. & M. Hofer
"All varietal from one of the state's most highly regarded vineyards, this wine offers aromas of dark raspberries, green herbs, vanilla and barrel spices. The fruit and barrel flavors show concentration and depth, with a light chalkiness to the tannins.",Klipsun Vineyard,Januik
"Hailing from Les Collines and Seven Hills vineyards, this 100% varietal wine displays aromas and flavors of cedar, herbs, licorice and red fruit that seem a bit dried out. It's lighter in style, showing elegance along with a light squeeze of tannins.",,Kontos
"This is a well-crafted, well-distributed wine, from sustainably farmed and estate-grown grapes. It offers a scent of jasmine and anise around flavors of Meyer lemon and grapefruit. Well rounded and medium bodied, it stays lively and refreshing in the glass.",,Kunde
"Despite its light color, this wine's aromas pop with notes of flowers, orange peel, red currant and earth. Grapes largely come from River Rock Vineyard. The fruit flavors are light and delicate with the oak pulled way back. It's a very pretty expression of the variety.",Grenache Noir,Lantz
"Though not labeled as such, this is a single-vineyard wine coming from Dineen Family Vineyard. It shows appealing aromas of toast, nut oil and melon. The flavors are lighter in style but bring a sense of balance that carries through the finish.",,Lauren Ashton Cellars
"Aromas of sawdust, espresso and ripe dark-skinned fruit lead the nose. The plush palate offers dried black cherry, coffee, toast, licorice and black pepper alongside evolved tannins. Drink soon to capture the remaining fruit and freshness.",Riserva,Le Bocce
"With its lively mousse, this is a bright wine, fruity and stylish. Citrus dominates, along with pink grapefruit that is shot through with lime. There is just a light, more mineral, texture with a dry, crisp aftertaste.",Brut,Liebart-Régnier
"Here's a savory, late-harvested Soave with a fragrance of Spanish broom, hay and chamomile. The round but fresh palate delivers lemon drop, honeydew melon, and white peach notes with a hint of mineral. It finishes on an almond note.",I Tarai,Corte Moschina
"A little watery but elegant, this Pinot is dry and crisp, with a light, silky texture. The flavors veer towards sour cherry candy, cranberry and tart, winter persimmon. Ready to drink now.",Appellation Series,Cru
"This partner of the red Grilos is intense and fruity. It shows fresh acidity while also having ripe apricot, tangerine fruit and a lightly mineral texture. It is still young, so will be better drunk at the end of 2014.",Grilos Branco,Dão Sul
"A solid, firmly tannic wine, it has swathes of fruit that are showing richness. Spice, a warm texture and a fresh aftertaste make for a wine that is ready to drink, ripe and fruity.",,Domaine du Théron
"From one parcel of vines, this Chablis is warm, ripe, full of yellow fruits and the softest texture. It's very fruity with tangy lemon zest acidity and a light, crisp aftertaste. Drink now, but it will be better at the end of 2014. Screwcap.",Saint-Martin,Domaine Laroche
"Hailing from a cool vintage, this Chardonnay smells oaky and resiny to an extreme. In the mouth, it's lifted by a beam of acid but still comes across woody. Flavors of sawdust, barrel resin, stone fruits and citrus finish with a good feel.",Amelia Limited Release Las Petras Vineyard,Concha y Toro
"Made from Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Zinfandel, this is one of Rock Wall's drier, lower-alcohol wines. It's high in acidity, with a silky mouthfeel. A little rustic, it shows cherry skin, tobacco and white pepper flavors.",Super Alamedan,Rock Wall
"With ripe blackberry, beef jerky and cassis flavors, wrapped into strong tannins, this is good to drink now with foods that want a dry, full-bodied and fruity red wine. It should hold in the bottle for a couple of years.",Kemp Vineyard Folded Rock,Sanglier Cellars
"This dry Sauvignon Blanc is wonderfully adaptable to today's wide variety of foods. Bone dry and crisp in acidity, it has rich, varietal flavors of Meyer lemon, lime, pink grapefruit and blood orange.",,Sivas-Sonoma
"Good price for a Napa Merlot this rich. It's a soft, fleshy wine, with silky tannins and red cherry pie, licorice, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood flavors. Drink now with beef.",Lot #11,Tangley Oaks
Pretty fragrances of white spring flowers and pears lead to a lively palate that offers white peach and green apple alongside bright acidity. It finishes clean and crisp.,,Tolloy
"It's dry, silky and crisp, with pleasant sour cherry candy, pomegranate and rhubarb flavors. Drink now, although you do want to decant it for an hour or two.",Reserve,Windsor Oaks
"It's absolutely dry, with hard tannins, brisk acids and berry fruit that has an undertow of dried herbs. There's some heat from the alcohol. It's the kind of wine Nonno used to bring up from the cellar to drink with pasta and marinara sauce.",Cuccio,Pech Merle
"Aromas of beeswax, lychee and fragrant white flowers take center stage in this wine. The juicy palate offers ripe Bartlett pear and lemon drop alongside fresh acidity.",Rohracker,Peter Zemmer
"With blackberry, blueberry, currant and tobacco flavors that finish dry and smoothly tannic, this is a sound Cabernet for drinking now. For the quality and price, this is an attractive selection for entertaining.",,Baron Herzog
"This straightforward, medium-bodied Pinot Grigio opens with floral aromas and a whiff of tropical fruit. The round palate offers juicy Bartlett pear and green apple alongside fresh acidity.",,Elena Walch
"Floral aromas recall jasmine and other spring flowers along with a whiff of graphite. The linear palate offers yellow peach, golden apples, citrus and a mineral note. White almond marks the finish.",Danieli,Fattori
"Smoky and dark, in both aroma and flavor, this hits quickly with flavors of black cherry, chocolate and espresso. The finish is tight and quick.",,Grochau
"This refined, vibrant Pinot Bianco opens with floral aromas and apple scents. The juicy yellow apple carries over to the palate along with a refreshing citrus note and crisp acidity that gives a clean, quenching close.",,Kössler
"Intensely perfumed with notes of white flowers, fresh herbs and citrus rind, this off-dry Riesling is exuberantly floral and fruity from nose to finish. Juicy and ripe, with mango and guava flavors, it bristles with power and energy on the palate.",Kabinett,Gerd Anselmann
"This is a cool wine from hill vineyards, one that has a strongly mineral, steel texture as well as good fruit. Apples and lime come across strongly over the tangy orange peel texture. With a rounded texture and plenty of acidity, it is ready to drink.",,Jean-Claude Boisset
"Subtle aromas include fresh hay, exotic fruit and apples. The linear palate isn't very expressive but it reveals raw yellow peach, pineapple, light oak and a hint of mineral teamed with racy acidity.",Castel Giovanelli,Kellerei Kaltern Caldaro
"This low-alcohol wine is beginning to pick up bottle age. The orange and mango flavors are quickly drying out, turning toward cashew nut and dried apricot notes. The acidity is mouthwatering.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,La Montagne
"Pungent in classic varietal aromas, this is a floral, slightly off-dry, zingy wine with a touch of honeyed vanilla on the otherwise spicy finish. It'll pair well with spicy fare.",,McNab Ridge
"With attractive nutty aromas and ripe fruits, this wine treads the line between wood aging and fruit. It is rich, with touches of spirit while keeping a hint of red fruits and tannins. Spice and sweet toffee at the end add extra interest.",Pátria 10 Years Old,Messias
"Aromas of green apples, peach and citrus carry over to palate. The juicy flavors are accompanied by lively acidity that makes this wine very food friendly.",,Mezzacorona
"A full-bodied white, it leads with aromas of jasmine, honeysuckle and stone fruit. The linear palate offers ripe golden apple, white peach and a mineral note alongside fresh acidity. Bitter almond marks the finish.",,Niedermayr Josef
"A blend of 80% Chardonnay and 20% Pinot Bianco, this has sensations of yellow apples, beeswax, citrus and mineral. It's simple but well made and would work well with lightly seasoned fish or pasta dishes topped with vegetable sauces.",San Siro Bianco,Pisoni
"This Cabernet shows its Spring Mountain terroir in the big-time tannins and concentration of black currant fruit. It's almost a wine-reduction sauce, but there's a loss of weight on the midpalate that suggests this isn't a wine to cellar, but to enjoy now.",Premium Limited Edition,Publix
"Berry, plum and dusty earth aromas control the nose on this full-flavored wine. In the mouth, this offers weight but good framing and edging. Flavors of ripe red fruits fall into the tutti-frutti category, while creamy oak and spice notes spill onto a medium-long finish.",Gran Reserva,Viña Tarapacá
"From parcels around the village of Maimbray, this wine is structured and tight. It has attractive fruit potential with plenty of lively acidity, surrounded by a strong mineral texture. The wine will be best from 2017.",Domaine des Hauts de Maimbray,Michel Vattan
"Rich and spicy on the nose, this wine offers aromas of clove-laced cherry-pie filling. The mouthfeel is soft and the flavors are straightforward, with plush blackberry fruit, dark chocolate, licorice and a minty lift on the finish.",Starlight,Midnight
"This opens with aromas suggesting spearmint, blackcurrant jam, toasted oak and roasted coffee bean. The aromas follow through to the evolved palate along with raisin and anise while raspy tannins clench the finish.",Flauto Magico Riserva,Paradiso di Frassina
"Aromas of blue flower, red berry, baking spice and toasted oak lead the nose. Made entirely with Sangiovese, the bright palate offers red cherry, raspberry and a hint of cinnamon alongside polished tannins.",Carandelle,Podere San Cristoforo
"Aromas of stewed prune, grilled pepper and roasted coffee bean join in this blend of 45% Merlot, 35% Cabernet Sauvignon, 10% Sangiovese and 10% Cabernet Franc. The evolved palate shows date, vanilla and coconut. Drink sooner rather than later.",Chance,Poggio Verrano
"Blades of spearmint and cardamom are prominent on the nose of this wine, followed by a palate rich in pine and black cherry. Lithe with a dense ripeness, the finish is prickly in Asian spice.",,Reaper
"Bright and straightforward, this opens with aromas of wild berry, blue flower and a whiff of eucalyptus. The easy drinking palate offers red cherry, star anise and a hint of chopped herb alongside polished tannins. Drink through 2017.",,Dievole
"Quite green out of the gate, the aromas display notes of savory herbs, cedar and spice, with a reduced note that blows off. The plum and dark-fruit flavors are tart and elegant with dry tannins that don't seem to have fully ripened. It has potential at the dinner table but doesn't quite stand up on its own.",,Silver Totem
"Heady with aromas of rose petals, this wine has a thin, light-bodied texture and tastes of black licorice and black cherry. With a surprising ripeness of fruit, it ends without tension or nuance.",District 3 Growers Reserve,Sonoma Collection
"This hearty red opens with aromas of sunbaked earth, leather, menthol and aromatic herb. The solid, one-dimensional palate offers dried black cherry, blackberry confiture, licorice and tobacco alongside bracing, close-grained tannins that leave an astringent finish.",Andretta Riserva,Tenuta Vitanza
"Fresh aromas of honeysuckle lead to a palate where honey and vanilla come together atop ripe peach. Medium bodied, the texture is unctuous before finishing lean and light.",,Terlato
"Forest floor, grilled porcini, charred earth and a whiff of leather lead the nose. The ripe palate offers dried black cherry, raspberry, clove, licorice and tobacco alongside chewy tannins. You'll also detect the warmth of alcohol on the close.",,Terre Nere Campigli Vallone
"The somewhat prominent herb aromas don't seem varietal. The red-fruit flavors are considerably more germane, though the tannins come off as a bit sticky.",Pepper Bridge Vineyard,Two Vintners
"This wine is just over three-quarters Cabernet Sauvignon with the rest Cabernet Franc, Petit Verdot and Merlot. Aromas of black currant, woodspice and a violet top note are followed by plentiful black-fruit flavors supported by firm tannins that need time to stretch their legs.",Legit,Two Vintners
"Stony, minerally aromas of green apple and lemon are clean and focused. The palate follows that lead, showing minerally crispness along with firm but not cutting acidity. Apple, pear and peach flavors finish glassy and fresh.",Minius,Valmiñor
"This low-oaked wine is somewhat sour with a Lemonheads sensibility, light bodied and defined by minerality. The long-lasting finish is reminiscent of lemongrass and ginger.",,Zepaltas
"This blend of 35% Kékfrankos, 34% Merlot, 27% Pinot Noir and 4% Cabernet Franc has aromas of tart cherry, pomegranate and black pepper. It is medium bodied with flavors of red plums and tart cherry.",,Weninger
"This 100% Tamjanika from Serbia has gooseberry, mango and white flowers leading the nose. Following that, it is soft on entry with flavors of pronounced florality, white peach and yellow peach.",Župska,Budimir
"It's rare in Bordeaux to find a single-varietal wine, particularly made from Cabernet Franc.This impressive, spicy wine brings out all the perfumed character of the grape. It could do with some aging, so drink from 2017.",Franc de Bel,Château de Bel
"This blend of Mencía, the local Grand Noir and Merenzao opens with raisiny, spicy, slightly baked aromas that suggest nutmeg. The palate is drawing and hard, with earthy, slightly cooked flavors of cherry and kirsch that end with a dash of lemony oak.",Amandi,Don Bernardino
"This blend of 70% Blaufränkisch, 20% Pinot Noir and 10% Zweigelt has aromas of cranberry, pomegranate and dried cherry with flavors of blackberry and red raspberry. There's a pleasant touch of spicy black pepper in the finish.",Benedict Cuvée,Dveri-Pax
"Tropical and fleshy with upfront acidity, this wine has a full-bodied richness on the nose and overtone, despite a more light-bodied midpalate and finish. Along the way, lemony brightness mingles with a taste of yellow apple.",,Kunde
"Earthy berry and leather aromas are fairly quiet. A more lively palate offers good weight and overall composition, while plum, raspberry and spice flavors finish with sweeter notes of raisin and baked berry.",Pagos de Tahola Crianza,Larchago
"Smoky oak and hickory aromas are gaseous early on but come with ripe notes of raisin and plum. This Tempranillo-led blend feels round and grabby, but a touch hollow. Flavors of cherry, plum and chocolate are lightly oaked and finish with grabby tannins and modest earthy complexity.",86 Winegrowers,Les Useres
"This pale pink rosé offers a reasonably complex array of aromas and flavors, ranging from anise to wet stone, and cracked pepper to wild strawberries. It's medium to full in body, with a finish that resonates of wet stone and spice. Drink now.",,Louis Bernard
"Aromas of waffles and corn flakes suggest maturity and complexity. This feels open and wide, with depth to the palate. Direct flavors of lime and tangerine finish more citric and minerally than the nose, with a lasting sense of freshness.",Brut Exclusive Gran Reserva,Marqués de Gelida
"Earthy aromas of brick dust blend with spiced cherry and tomato notes. A chewy, solid palate registers as correct, while this tastes of ripe, candied berry fruits and chocolate. A long, warm, slightly oaky finish sends this on its way.",Crianza,Siglo
"Stony and tropical in personality, this full-bodied white wine conjures up the taste and aroma of vanilla crème brûlée with a twist of lemon. The body is tense in acidity and the finish lean and mid-length.",Aveta,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"This opens with aromas of stewed plum, leafy underbrush, scorched earth and leather. The palate offers dried black cherry, white pepper, clove and tobacco set against bracing, tightly knit tannins. Give the tannins another year or two to unwind then drink up to capture the remaining fruit.",Il Margone Riserva,Il Molino di Grace
"Aromas of fragrant blue flower, menthol, spirits and plum cake lead the nose on this brawny wine. The hefty palate offers raisin, fig, vanilla, coconut and oak-driven spice alongside smooth, densely packed tannins and the warmth of alcohol. Showing the heat of the vintage, the fruit is starting to dry up so drink sooner rather than later.",Riserva,Le Fonti
"Whiffs of turmeric and saffron lend exotic flair to this bracing lemon-lime Riesling. Off-dry in style, it's refreshing and quaffable, yet remarkably complex if you'll give it the time and attention it deserves. Drink now through 2020.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Müller-Burggraef)
"From a vineyard in the heart of the appellation comes this bottling that's redolent with hibiscus, Earl Grey tea, orange rind, black cherry, spiced plum and fennel bulb on the nose. The palate plays a bit lighter, with brisk cranberry, more hibiscus and lots of cola, proving quite light and easy to sip though well structured as well.",La Encantada Vineyard,Foxen
"Fresh cherry blossoms and cranberries breathe zest into luscious notes of preserved black cherry, sweet beets and earth in this ruddy, ripe and yet complex Pinot Noir. Dense on the palate and framed in baby-soft tannins, it's enjoyable now.",Schwarzer Adler,Franz Keller
"Made in an Alsatian style from a 150-plus-year-old estate vineyard, this dry, well-crafted white is 90% stainless-steel fermented, with the rest fermented in neutral oak. It conveys jasmine and ripe stone fruit, crisp, clean with very little oak intrusion and sharply etched acidity. Flavors of pear and green apple mark the finish.",Estate Vineyard Dry,Gundlach Bundschu
"Light bodied and highly aromatic in petrol, waxy apple and pear, this vineyard-designate is crisp and floral, with buoyant acidity. It lists the residual sugar at 9 g/L but tastes more dry than sweet, finishing with a touch of cream.",Heritage Tree Vineyard Estate,Gustafson Family
"This is a tight and structured wine, showing a fine balance between tannin and acidity, with dark, brooding fruit that still need time to develop. Give this wine until 2018.",Domini,José Maria da Fonseca
"A blend driven predominantly by Petit Verdot, with lesser percentages of Merlot and Cabernet Franc, this wine is soft and spicy, with waves of blackberry flavor. Brightly balanced, it finishes in a mix of cola and clove, the tannins well under control.",Pickett Road Red,Kenefick Ranch
"Opulent fruit flavors and an almost thick texture make this delicious and dramatic. The aromas pop with blackberry and cherry, flavors resemble blueberry juice and the mouthfeel is rich and nicely tannic.",,Kimmel
"Waxy pear and white plum provide the fruit-forward flavors of this wine, which exhibits plenty of minerality on the midpalate before offering a wave of richness and vanilla cream. The finish finds a focus and balance between these two ends, ending light and bright.",Reserve,La Chertosa
"A 100% varietal wine, this comes from a property formerly known as the Preston Ranch, with which the producer has worked for a long time. The wine coaxes silky-smooth, leathery tannins into a sinewy texture bounded by meat, cigar and decadent amounts of white pepper. Complex and layered, it'll sit well in the cellar, through 2023.",Ledbetter Family Vineyard,Longboard
"Briny, with a taste of salted kettle corn, this offers a nice balance between an edgier, more savory character and the fine-tuned minerality that extends into the finish as bristles of Meyer lemon and wet stone. The aromatics reveal an inviting touch of orange peel and lemon custard.",Quail Hill Vineyard,Lynmar
"The largest production offering of this variety for this producer, this features fruit sourced from a who's who of local growers, including Sangiacomo, Dutton and Martinelli, in addition to the estate-run Wildcat Mountain Vineyard. The result is satisfyingly impressive in viscous oak, graham cracker and Meyer lemon. Tangy and flinty on the finish, it's smooth and focused.",,MacRostie
"Dark, structured and bringing out the natural minerality of the Douro, this is a dense and tannic wine at this stage. It has layers of black currant, rich and full of juicy acidity. The wine really needs to age, so drink from 2017.",Tom de Baton,Magnum Vinhos
"Rose, iris, dark berry and baking spice aromas emerge on this taut wine. The dense palate doles out mature black cherry, resin, cinnamon, vanilla and a hint of toast balanced by fine-grained tannins and bright acidity.",Bricco delle Viole,Mario Marengo
"Pomegranate aromas on the fairly tight nose of this wine combine with sandalwood, hibiscus tang and minerality. It's tight, bright and rocky on the palate, with chipped slate flavors providing an earthy backbone to the cranberry fruit.",Clos Pepe Vineyard,Nuggucciet
"This eight-year-old blend of 68% Nebbiolo, 12% Sangiovese, 8% Merlot, 8% Cabernet Sauvignon and 4% Cabernet Franc shows very reserved plum fruit on the nose alongside leather, dust, cedar and just-snapped pencil. The palate offers a complex array of roasted beef crust, stewed plums, Mission figs and roasting herbs like oregano.",Jovis Italic Blend,Oso Libre
"This wine has a bouquet of black currant, cassis and juniper berry. There is a very pleasant balance of fruit and cool herbal flavors, with an emphasis on black cherry, peach, anise and eucalyptus. The sense of coolness that persists on the palate is slightly overshadowed by a flash of brightness on the finish.",Matar Stratus,Pelter
"Aromas of underbrush, scorched earth and dark baking spice lead the way on this firmly structured wine. The tense, full-bodied palate delivers dried black cherry, licorice, leather and tobacco supported by bracing, fine-grained tannins. Drink 2019_2029.",Ornato,Pio Cesare
"Who puts their lowest-priced Pinot Noir in 20% new French oak, and includes fruit from their best vineyards in the blend? Ponzi does, and the result is a terrific vintage for Tavola. Bright, compact, aromatic and lushly fruited with plum and black cherry, this is a stunning value. Cola, caramel and cinnamon spice add further details and highlights.",Tavola,Ponzi
"Celebrating its 25th anniversary in 2015, this brand was the among the first Douro still wines. This Reserva, with its wood-aged flavors, is rich and full of ripe white fruits while not losing sight of the mineral texture of white wines from the region. While it is drinkable now, it will be much better from 2018.",Duas Quintas Reserva Branco,Ramos-Pinto
"Shy at first aromatically, this wine slowly reveals blueberry candy, hoisin sauce, dried plums and pencil shavings on the nose. The palate is thick and lush, with lots of slate-driven structure and ample black-plum fruit spiced up with charred tobacco and singed wood.",SBR,Rotta
"Ginger and saffron intensify the spicy mineral-toned complexities of this gorgeously silky nectar. It's lusciously fruity as well though, boasting cutting white grapefruit and lemon flavors that penetrate through a long, tea-stained finish. Drinks beautifully now but should only intensify through 2024.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese Grosse Lage,S.A. Prüm
"Wonderfully aromatic and packed with flavor, this outstanding value opens lightly spicy with zingy raspberry fruit. It's like a tart jam, with citrus-peel highlights peeking through in the sappy finish.",,Sineann
"Feral and smoky, this light-bodied, light-colored estate-farmed wine gives way to dark cherry, white pepper and pronounced floral elements of rose and violet. Given time in 35% new French oak, it's structured and intriguing, with a tannic punch on the finish.",,Small Vines
"Ripe aromas of honeydew are cut down the middle with a pointed petrol note as well as lime skins and grapefruit pith. The palate on this bottling from popular Riesling source Kick-On Ranch is wound up very tight, showing lime skins, focused acidity and a gray-rock minerality. This would go great with shellfish now, or continue to emerge and uncurl in the cellar from 2018_2030.",,Solminer
"Light banana flambée, vanilla meringue and yellow-cake aromas show on the generous but not overbearing nose of this blend of 49% Grenache Blanc, 31% Viognier, 12% Roussanne and 8% Marsanne. The tropicality of the nose disappears on the palate, which is tart and grippy with green apple and Anjou pear flavors as well as a touch of melon and smoke.",Patelin de Tablas Blanc,Tablas Creek
"Fresh green florals and melon rind lend a breathlessly cool tone to this elegantly composed dry Riesling. Forward flush yellow plum and gooseberry flavors are offset by lime zest, fresh sage and bristling acidity. It finishes with persistence and length. Drinks well now but should improve through 2020.",Saulheimer Hölle Trocken,Thörle
"Lime and gooseberry are gilded with candle wax and smoky minerals in this bracing dry Riesling. Lemon and tart tangerine flavors drench the palate, leaving a honed, steely focus on the finish.",Trocken,Thörle
"Cool briary plum and blackberry aromas show lactic, creamy oak, which is nothing unusual for Cobos. Plump, dense and saturated in the mouth, this block-selection Malbec is extremely ripe, with medicinal black fruit and raisiny flavors touched up by mocha and peppery spice. An oaky, spicy finish is par for the course. Drink through 2021.",Marchiori Vineyard Block C2,Viña Cobos
"Tart, firm and (for this lighter vintage) showing good concentration, this well-constructed effort is built around tangy cherry/berry fruit. With above-average length and depth, and naturally high acidity, this can continue to develop further refinement through 2026.",Crawford Beck Vineyard,Winderlea
Banana flavors spoil this otherwise attractive and fruity wine. A dry core of tannins is surrounded by creamed banana and red fruits. Drink now.,,Georges Duboeuf
"This is a soft, rounded and ripe wine. Attractive raspberry fruits are filled out with a light tannic character. The freshness and acidity do cut the full texture although perhaps not enough. Drink now.",Rosé d' Folie,Jean-Paul Brun
"Aromas of cured ham and funky, gaseous notes are heavy. Lime, mango and melon flavors persist on a chunky, slick feeling finish. This is good but oily and strange on the nose.",Dry,Juan Gil
"A blend of Touriga Nacional and Syrah, this rosé gives ripe red fruits that are cut with lively acidity. There is a jammy, caramel-flavored backdrop to this wine that makes it heavy rather than fresh. Drink now.",Terra de Lobos,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Ripe plum and berry aromas come with notes of wet earth and animal hide. A jammy, fleshy palate brings baked plum and berry flavors as well as notes of prune and raisin. A mellow, chunky finish tastes loamy and like spice cake.",Crianza,Torre Oria
"Leathery and somewhat green, this wine has yet to find its balance, combining 95% Cabernet Sauvignon with 3% Malbec and 2% Petit Verdot. It veers between heavy, ripe tension and an underripe underbelly, finishing unsure.",Vintage Selection,Charles Krug
"A good, basic wine, this has a mix of fruity and vegetal aromas, tart cherry and watermelon flavors, firm texture with moderate tannins, medium body and a slightly astringent finish.",California Series,Cambridge & Sunset
"Damp, rubbery aromas of berry fruits and cured meat amount to a weird ensemble. This is decidedly grabby on the palate, with salty, herbal plum flavors. A leafy, herbal, mildly green finish wraps up this kitchen-sink blend of Mencía and other grapes.",Tradición Joven,Adegas Moure
"Cherry and plum aromas are aggressive. This energetic Malbec is beyond snappy and juicy, while salty plum and currant flavors are racy and edgy. A briny aftertaste and peppery spice flavors dominate a tough finish.",Leo,Valentin Bianchi
"Oaky, jammy aromas are wayward and slightly green. This blend of Tempranillo and Monastrell delivers heavy tannins on a widespread but unfocused palate. Oaky, drying berry flavors are more bitter than fruity, while the finish is choppy in feel and woody in taste.",Alcanta Crianza,Bocopa
"This Chardonnay from Marcel Grillet's horse-plowed biodynamic vineyard called Pizay is still very young, showing a candy, confected flavor that needs to calm down. It has the potential for attractive fruit from 2016.",,Domaine de la Bonne Tonne
"Aromas of yeast, talcum powder and grass set up a palate of pithy citrus and pyranzinic flavors that are green and grassy. The finish on this Sauvignon Blanc, a grape you don't see too often in hot Jumilla, is green-flavored and snappy.",,Monterebro
"Rubbery plum and berry aromas and an alert, aggressive palate give this punch from the start. Black plum, spice and chocolate flavors end with heat and kick.",,Raiza
"A dark color and candied, pruney aromas give way to jammy black cherry flavors and a lightly tannic texture. This is tart and medium bodied, with straightforward ripe flavors.",Manchester Ridge Vineyard,August Truth
"Rubbery, sweaty, muted aromas lead to a dilute, fizzy palate. Prickly green citrus and melon flavors end on the vegetal side.",,Bouza de Carril
"From the sandy soil near the Tagus river, this is a soft, fruity wine showing enough acidity and lemon flavors to give a fresh, crisp texture. It is bright and ready to drink.",,Casal da Coelheira
"Ripe and caramel-flavored, this has fresh acidity supporting rich red-berry flavors. It's fruity, full in the mouth and round textured. Drink now.",Baronne du Chatelard Rosé d'Eté,Château de Chatelard
This wine is soft and rounded. It has lemon and light spiciness along with cool acidity. It is an easy wine that is ripe with apple and fresh lemon juice and ready to drink.,Barão de Figueira Branco,Companhia das Quintas
"Ripe red berries and a touch of red plum give this wine a full, fruity character. Light tannins add a suggestion of structure. It's juicy and ready to drink.",Domaine de la Madone des Loges,Georges Duboeuf
"Light and clear in color and texture, this wine is both slightly sour and sweet, swerving between savory leather and clove notes and a more ripe aspect of black cherry and strawberry.",Jeff Gordon Collection,Jeff Gordon
"Forest berries, perfumed violets and pine needles entertain the nose on this widely available bottling. The palate shows dried herbs, tar and smashed blackberries.",,Limited by Cambridge Cellars
"Both citrus and apple notes are dulled by very earthy notes. The slender palate frothes softly but does not provide more fruit, either. This is dry and muted, but fresh.",Réserve,Pierre Sparr
"Dry, briary, leathery aromas come in front of a high-acid palate that's almost shocking in its zestiness. Tart but generic flavors of cherry and red plum finish with a skins-like texture and lasting acidity.",Clásico,Altos Las Hormigas
"At first, this sparkling Muscat smells like salad dressing and green strawberries. It's foamy but mostly healthy feeling on the palate, with sugary, grassy flavors of mango and pineapple. Overall, this has a strongly candied flavor profile.",Botani Sparkling,Jorge Ordoñez & Co.
Red fruits and banana aromas lead to a wine that has a lightly tannic touch over bright cherry fruits. Intense acidity and a herbaceous character come from grapes that are barely ripe. Drink now.,Cuvée les Chalandières,Château de Chatelard
"Tight acidity, cherry flavors and a hint of banana give this wine a light and fruity character. It has probably too much acidity for its own good, making it too crisp, missing out on richness.",Château de la Perrière,Georges Duboeuf
"Sweet on the nose with honeysuckle, golden honey, apple syrup and a touch of cement minerality, this wine is aimed at pairing with Asian food. The palate may be a touch too treacly for that, with rich honey-orange-vanilla elements.",,Roku
This wine is all about fresh cherries with only the lightest structure. It would be delicious drunk lightly chilled on a summer day.,Cuvée Rochebonne,Trenel Fils
"Jumpy cherry and plum aromas are fresh and direct. This has a wiry, grabby palate, with raspberry and spiced plum flavors. Rubbery tannins, edgy acidity and reedy red-berry flavors create an intense but rough ending.",,Tussock Jumper
"Generic, yeasty white-fruit aromas are reasonably fresh and inoffensive but fall off with time in the glass. This tastes pithy and slightly bitter, with a grapefruit citrus character to the front palate and finish.",,El Coto
"Opening with gorgeous aromas of pear, fig and mineral-laden melon and vanilla, this substantial Viognier also manages to stay fresh, vibrant and fruity, a bite of preserved lemon lifting off the finish.",Catie's Corner,Whetstone
"This aromatic wine brings a pleasing assortment of smoke, bacon fat, citrus, plum and blue-fruit notes. It coats the palate from end to end with sultry fruit flavors that lead to a tart, dry finish.",,William Church
"Half Syrah and half Cabernet Sauvignon, with 40% new French oak, this wine draws you in with its notes of blackberries, milk chocolate and anise. It's broad and fleshy in feel, with abundant coffee and cherry flavors backed by ample acidity.",Tradition,Gordon Estate
"A pleasant vein of freshness runs through this crunchy, refreshing and intriguing red. Notes of cured meat, white and black pepper, earth and red berry all appear at intervals. Underneath it all is a heart of true red fruitiness that flirts pleasingly with notes of undergrowth.",Hillside,Hillinger
"Cracked pepper and sagebrush aromas give a sense of importance to the more hedonistic scents of buttered blueberries on this top-end bottling from the longtime producer. Black cherries and elderberries arise on the otherwise minty palate, and the tannins prove quite gripping. They will unwind and be best 2018_2022.",Hilltop,J. Lohr
"Ripe red and black cherry with a lick of elderberry spice creates a warm, fruity feel. The palate remains svelte but is beautifully rounded and shows soft but palpable tannins. This is very balanced and will show its true aromatic potential 2017_2018.",P,Fritsch
"Dry Jurançon has all the richness and hints of honey of its sweet partner. The two Manseng grapes give apricot, white peach and a full, ripe character that is cut by the typical acidity of these mountain vineyards. The wine, with its zesty aftertaste and delicious tension between fresh and rich, is ready to drink.",Cami Salié,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"Yeast and earth can be smelled as much as tart apple, ripe yellow plum and fresh lemon. In the mouth there is concentration and more of that expansive, savory yeastiness. A summoning streak of fresh lemon acidity provides a whistle-clean finish.",Steingraben Reserve,Mantlerhof
"Initially this is closed, but slowly some leesy notes appear. While some may look to Sauvignon Blanc for its usually overt aromatics, in this wine the creamy but streamlined midpalate texture is the real interest. For those who like their Sauvignons restrained and very food-friendly.",Moarfeitl,Neumeister
"This blend of 55% Tempranillo, 22% Grenache, 14% Mourvèdre, 8% Malbec and 1% Alicante Bouschet is a good example of the intriguing blends made by this winery in the Templeton Gap area. An aroma of smoked game combines with tightly wound graphite and purple fruit scents, followed by a palate that blends cured meats with dried herbs and blackberries.",Praetorian,ONX
"Merlots from the Okanagan are more sculpted, less fleshy than those from Washington or California. That said, this wine offers great finesse, tension and detail. Tart plum, black cherry, red licorice and a streak of sandalwood are nicely integrated and buttressed with juicy acids. Tannins are firm and tight, and the structure suggests it will age gracefully through 2025.",Estate Grown,Painted Rock
"A blend of Merlot (51%), Cabernet Sauvignon (37%), Cabernet Franc, and Petit Verdot, this wine (predominantly sourced from Horse Heaven Hills) offers appealing notes of graphite, cocoa, cherry cola, barrel spices and red and blue fruit. It's focused, rich and flavorful with a silky, captivating, refined feel.",JRG,Pamplin
"Putting two naturally tannic grapes together seems to soften them both. The blend gives this rich wine structure, as well as rich plum and damson, leather and smokiness. The wine finishes on a high note of acidity. Age and drink from 2016.",,Château Peyros
"This 100% varietal comes from two standout vineyards__oushey (70%) and Red Willow.Made with native yeast and barrel-fermented, it is aromatically mesmerizing with kiwi, lemon oil and herbs. As opulent as the aromas seem, the wine is quite restrained in style with a panoply of citrus and stone fruit flavors framed by vivid, mouthwatering acidity.",Oliane,Avennia
"Harvested in October, this gold-colored wine has a wonderful line of acidity that gives freshness. At the same time, there is richness, honey, ripe apricots and a hint of noble rot. Drink either as an apéritif or with fruit at the end of a meal.",Château Bouscassé Vendemiaire,Alain Brumont
"The second vintage from this winery brings roasty-toasty barrel notes along with coffee, butterscotch, cherry, pencil lead and an herbal grace note. The chocolate and cherry flavors are silky in feel backed by a gentle squeeze of tannins, with coffee flavors lingering on the finish.",Stone Cairn,Andrew Januik
"From cellars in the heart of the village of Pouilly-sur-Loire, the seventh generation of the Masson family produces this classic Pouilly Fumé, structured and full of ripe fruits. It is a wine for aging, with its tense minerality and tight texture that parallel the fruitiness. Wait until 2016.",,Domaine Masson-Blondelet
"The dazzling cherry-rhubarb character starts in the aroma, expands on the palate and cruises through the finish, making this a memorable wine. In a no-nonsense way it serves up vivid, bracing flavors with virtually no oaky notes while displaying lively tannins and great acidity. Tempting to drink now but will improve through at least 2018.",Balo Vineyard,Drew
"Tart berry and sour cherry fruit is set amidst a well-balanced, pure varietal expression of Cab Franc. A touch of stem, earth and coffee carry out the varietal flavors, with a firmness to the tannins.",Coyote Bowl Series,Church & State
"Made from 90% Cabernet Sauvignon with Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Malbec sprinkled in, this wine starts out quite reticent, with notes of scorched earth, mocha, herbs, woodspice and cherry. It's full bodied and very tightly wound at present, with firm, chalky tannins that need significant time in the cellar to stretch their legs. Best after 2018.",,Col Solare
"This wine from the Fess Parker-owned Rodney's Vineyard shows inky purple color, offering slightly reductive aromas of tar and charred meat but also violets and black pepper. It's full on the palate, hitting first with purple fruit and dried purple flowers before delivering plum-skin acidity and peppery spice. It's an attention-grabber.",,Standing Sun
"This wine comes from all free-run juice and was aged 16 months in three- to four-year-old French barrels. The result is a luxuriously pure wine that puts a premium on the feel of its plum and cranberry flavors, with a light squeeze of tannins that brings it home.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Syncline
"Coming in at a low (for Washington) alcohol level for this variety, this 100% Grenache shows light aromas of mint and other herbs with elusive raspberry and plum accents. It's medium bodied with an elegant, supple feel, showing little obvious new-oak influence to the red fruit flavors. A very intriguing wine where the texture plays a starring role in the show.",Riviere Galets Estate Vineyard,Tertulia
"Aromatically alluring, this features notes of raspberries, Red Vines and cherry candy. It brings a full-bore, plush, richly flavored feel with abundant raspberry flavors that linger on the finish__n unapologetically lush example of 2012 vintage fruit.",,Trust
"Soft, supple and mouth-coating, this wine dances in cola, forest floor and subtle red and black berry, building power and concentration as it goes. Already given time in bottle, it's ready to enjoy now.",Semper Ellenbach Vineyard,Tuck Beckstoffer
"Crisp and compact, the 2011 Diana Madeline undoubtedly needs at least another couple of years in the cellar. The nose is leafy and herbal, but the flavors show cherry fruit framed by subtle shadings of vanilla. The tannins are firm, imparting a drying sensation to the long finish.",Diana Madeline,Cullen
"A blend of 55% Cabernet Sauvignon, 25% Shiraz and 5% each of Merlot, Cabernet Franc, Malbec and Petit Verdot, this rich and approachable wine boasts lush aromas and flavors of brambly black berry, cherry and currant alongside notes of violet and chocolate fudge. The mouthfeel is like crushed velvet, with a creamy texture and a decadent finish reminiscent of chocolate-covered espresso beans.",Proprietor's Blend,Ernie Els
"Rich and full in the mouth, this is a ripe, tropical fruit flavored wine. With a year in bottle, the herbaceousness has softened and become rounded. The wine is still tangy and mineral at the end, and could age further, but is ready to drink now.",,Château de Sancerre
"A light golden hue, this richly aromatic wine offers notes of toasty barrel spices, apricot and dried mango. It's full bodied, almost unctuous in feel, with abundant, sweet stone-fruit flavors and a lingering finish.",Reserve Estate Grown,Gordon Estate
"The nose is rather shy but reveals ripe black fruit, plum cake and baking spice. The densely concentrated palate doles out mature blackberry, crushed raspberry, allspice and licorice alongside smooth, velvety tannins. There's also the heat of alcohol.",Raccontami,Futura 14
"Clove and barrel spice are dominant factors in this ripe Tannat, from first whiff to the finish. In between, there's char on the nose and palate as well as ripe blackberry and black currant flavors blended with wood-based pepper, nutmeg and more. A smoking, chewy, tannic finish closes this out. Drink from 2016_2019.",A8 Parcela _nica,Bouza
"Earthy, this wine offers substantial layers of dried herb and cranberry. Denser overtones of oak and tannin are pronounced on the midpalate, the tannins weighty and firm. A lift of acidity picks up on the finish. The wine will benefit from time in the cellar, through 2015.",Single Vineyard Estate,Ilsley
"Black cherry, plum and currant aromas are young, bouncy and fresh as a whole. That pretty much describes the palate on this Garnacha-led blend: It's lively, rubbery, tannic and fresh. Blackberry, plum and black currant flavors finish tannic and grabby. Drink through 2017.",Vespres,Josep Grau Viticultor
"There's welcome austerity to this wine, which expresses the temperamental variety with class and composure. Herb, sage and cedar wrap themselves around a leathery mid-section, carried through by sharply etched acidity and a peppery finish.",Two Fourteen,Lang & Reed
"Aromas of tropical fruit, peach, white flower and cut grass lead the nose on this medium-bodied white. The round, juicy palate offers peach, tart green apple, banana and nectarine skin alongside tangy acidity.",Mandolara,Le Morette
"Savory, earthy aromas contrast against a palate full of peachy, blossomy flavors in this delightfully quaffable wine. Off dry, but balanced with sunny, soft tangerine acidity, it's a remarkably pretty wine to be enjoyed now for its fresh, fearless style.",,Nightstar
"Aromas of white flower, beeswax, pear and a hint of vanilla lead the nose. The medium-bodied palate offers crisp yellow apple, citrus zest and a mineral note alongside tangy acidity.",Demesse Vecchie,Olivini
"Light, tart cherry fruit beckons for further exploration. The ripeness is there, and the wine comes across as clean and elegant in its modest proportions. As it breathes open there is a slight hint of volatility which, for most tasters, will be a plus.",Holstein Vineyard,Purple Hands
"Bombastic and burly, this wine holds a depth of black raspberry and cherry at its edge, surrounded in swathes of smoky oak. Rich and full bodied, it is a testament to the intrigue of baking spices and black tea, but more significantly to dark chocolate and espresso.",Dutton Ranch,Sonoma-Loeb
"A distinct aroma of freshly ground coffee hit the nose on this wine, followed by intriguing wafts of dark chocolate, aged Gouda, soy sauce and Oaxacan mole sauce. The palate is more familiar, with dark flavors of blackberry, black cherry and a touch of mint.",Estate,Still Waters
"This opens with aromas of toasted nut, pressed white flower, straw, exotic fruit and honey. The firm palate has a smoky, mineral quality that accents citrus zest, pineapple, toasted hazelnut and sliced apple. It's balanced and fresh, with tangy acidity.",Tenute di Altavilla,Villa Matilde
"Though quite light in color, this is a very ripe-smelling wine, with aromas of honeysuckle, peach, pineapple and guava. It proves light on the sleek palate, with subtle tropicality emerging via tuberose flower flavors that are cut with a green apple skin bitterness.",,Westerly
"Rich, ripe yellow peach and mango flavors are deeply concentrated in this fruity, off-dry wine. It's plush and delectably juicy, but clean lines of steel and lime lend balance and vibe.",,Johann Falkenburg
"Soft layers of faint lemon, fig and yellow apple stand out in this pretty, straightforward and slightly tart white, the whole of the palate lingering in long-lasting minerality. A versatile food wine, it offers a lot of elegance.",,Keenan
"Touches of honey, saffron and spice lend warmth and suppleness to this dry, exceptionally brisk Riesling. It's a bit lean on the palate, but vivaciously fresh, finishing on a deliciously astringent bite of lime pith.",Hochheimer Trocken,Domdechant Werner
"Spine-tingling acidity runs throughout this off-dry Riesling. Swathes of honey and fresh apple, saffron and dried berries lend sweetness and warmth, but this striking kabinett does not surrender its sharp edges easily.",Ockfener Bockstein Kabinett,Dr. Fischer
"Aromas suggest red berry and plum with a hint of cake spice. The palate is elegant and reserved, offering sour cherry, toast and vanilla alongside fine-grained tannins. It closes on a light mineral note.",Cornell Villa Nigra,Colterenzio
"Boldly tannic, this structured, wood-aged wine is just starting out. It's as much dry wood and tannins as fruit at this stage, although the fruit and mineral texture do promise aging. There is significant acidity at the end. Drink from 2016.",Réserve Louis Leyre-Loup,Domaine de Leyre-Loup
"Aromas of baking spices and pears lead the way, followed by flavors of pear and pineapple. This medium-bodied wine has a pleasantly toasty-grainy note as well, then finishes crisp and citrusy.",Sexton Vineyard,Giant Steps
"Flower and melon aromas are light and easy. This feels stony and citric, while flavors of lime, orange and mango finish crystal clear, with freshness and some pulp to the texture.",Old Vines Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Marqués de Gelida
"Herbal aromas of olive, thyme and juniper are classic Chilean. This feels jammy and chunky, with more weight and power than elegance and refinement. Flavors of blueberry and raspberry run low on complexity, while the finish is grapy and rubbery in feel, but deep and long.",Dueño de la Luna,Meli
"Rich, chocolaty, toasty aromas of lactic oak and vanilla match red-fruit scents of raspberry and strawberry. This is lively on the palate, with an acidic pulse. Flavors of raw oak, creamy vanilla, plum and boysenberry finish overtly woody, with a lasting flavor of oak grain. Drink through 2018.",Amplus Old Vine,Santa Ema
"Rusty in color and earthy on the nose, with capped aromas of cedar and herbs, this mature Catalonian Cabernet is compact on the palate and fused by firm tannins. Flavors of dried berry, stone fruits and toffee finish long. This ranks as a fun challenge for Spanish wine geeks.",Chateldon Reserva,Pinord
"Smoke and pressed apple notes are savory on the nose, but the palate of this zesty off-dry Riesling is fresh with sweet-tart peach and honeydew. It's refreshing and straightforward in style, but finishes with lingering mineral complexities.",Nik Weis Wiltinger Alte Reben,St. Urbans-Hof
"Pretty aromas of red berry, crushed flower and a hint of rosemary lead the nose on this bright red. The fresh palate offers crushed raspberry, green tomato and cinnamon. It's fresh, sleek and balanced.",,Tramin
"Crisp red cherry and berry flavors are pristine and forward in this bright, vivacious wine. Yet it's also surprisingly nuanced with deft touches of bitter coffee bean, vanilla, bramble and herb that last through the finish.",,Villa Wolf
"This lightly colored, luminous 100% Schiava offers aromas of wild berry, pomegranate and violet. On the bright palate, notes of mandarin orange and almond accent the red cherry core. It's easy drinking and balanced with crisp acidity and silky, soft tannins. Drink soon.",Lago di Caldaro Classico,Weingut Niklas
"Enticing aromas of Alpine wildflowers, chopped herbs, toasted nuts and citrus zest mingle in the glass. The vibrant palate offers hazelnut, juicy nectarine, pear and energizing mineral alongside refreshing acidity.",Fontanasanta,Foradori
"Fragrant and refined, this opens with intense floral aromas and wafts of perfumed berry. The elegant, structured palate delivers layers of red cherry, juicy raspberry, cinnamon and a mineral note alongside firm, fine-grained tannins.",,Franz Haas
"Bright and elegant, this features aromas of rose petal, woodland berry and a hint of cake spice. The palate delivers sour cherry, crushed raspberry, mineral and a touch of cinnamon alongside fresh acidity and smooth tannins.",Riserva,Cantina Produttori San Michele Appiano
"Milan is a specialist in Blanc de Blancs wines, and this is a top-quality example of that skill. It is as crisp as possible, very tight and bright. With a nervy, mineral character it speaks of the chalk soil of the vineyards. This is still young, very drinkable now while also ready to age for several more years.",Terres de Noël Vieilles Vignes Blanc de Blancs Grand Cru Brut,Jean Milan
"There's a wild array of aromas to this appellation blend, including wild mint and huckleberries. It's bright red fruit at first sip, then the wine downshifts into cloves, wet asphalt and anise. A direct but clean and very appealing selection, ready for enjoyment now.",,Fess Parker
"From an outstanding vintage in the Willamette Valley, here's a beautifully blended Pinot with impressive concentration and detail. Spicy berry and red plum fruit is speckled with chocolate drops, coffee beans and a whiff of clean straw. Drink any time; it's ready to go.",Three Hills Cuvée,Lange
"Production is down, quality, cost and finished alcohol are all up for this estate-grown designate, now labeled as a reserve. There's a sniff of leather and underripe blackberry and black cherry fruit, along with a somewhat unusual, though not unpleasant, scent of chicken boullion. The wine opens up quickly but stops just a bit short of a full-length finish. Give it extra breathing time if you plan to drink it soon.",Rocheux Reserve,Le Cadeau
"With its beautiful pale pink color and bright fruitiness, this delicious wine also has a good depth of texture, mineral strength and tight acidity. Even though it is now six years old, it is showing no sign of maturity, so drink from 2016.",L'Intemporelle Brut Rosé,Mailly Grand Cru
"A perfumed Moscatel, it features spice, honeyed fruitiness and a strong spirit character. When it was bottled, it had just begun to exhibit the old-wood aging flavors and resulting acidity.it offers a delicious orange-peel aftertaste.",Colheita,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A dry wine, this offers intense acidity, bitter chocolate flavors and dried raisins. Full of complex aromas and flavors, it's full in the mouth, finishing dry with an intense aftertaste.",Feuerheerd's 10-Year-Old Tawny,Barão de Vilar
"This is a seriously dry wine. Arnaud Margaine works each harvest to create freshness and a totally crisp texture, generally dismissing malolactic fermentation. It is balanced, allowing the fruitiness to shine through the tight, mineral texture from the predominant Chardonnay in the blend that comes from a mere 16-acre Montaigne de Reims vineyard surrounded by Pinot Noir. It could age through 2015 in bottle to be even better.",Le Brut Premier Cru,A. Margaine
"A terrific value in a benchmark Oregon Pinot Gris, this is bright and refreshing, with the palate-cleansing minerality that characterizes all of the Adelsheim white wines. Jicama and melon and pear fruits mingle seamlessly, and the wine's texture and length are impressive.",,Adelsheim
"The millennium year, 2000, was not the greatest Champagne vintage. However, Boizel has released a prestige cuvée from that year and produced a well matured wine with a dry character and plenty of toasty notes. Dominated by Pinot Noir, it is deliciously rich and totally ready to drink.",Joyau de France Brut,Boizel
"Sta. Rita Hills stars Greg Brewer and Steve Clifton deliver a golden-hued sparkler with aromas of yellow flowers, fresh picked pears and pressed apples. It explodes on the palate with lemon zest followed by a cooked apple soda, with a touch of tannic tartness on the end.",3D Sparkling,Brewer-Clifton
"A superb value, this estate-grown Pinot brings dense fruit flavors of raspberry and cherry, sourced from Dijon clones. Firm and slightly high-toned, it spent 17 months in one-third new oak, resulting in baking-spice notes that unfold on the finish.",Redhawk Estate,Redhawk
"An estate bottled Pinot, this wine is inviting in floral and fruity characteristics, offering concise layers of red cherry, rose petals and a spark of oak that builds in intensity through the finish. This is a nice place to start on the winery's lineup of Carneros-Napa Valley Pinot Noir.",Brown Ranch,Saintsbury
"Beautifully balanced between maturity and freshness, this elegant bubbly combines appetizing cherry, almond and ginger flavors with a suave texture and long finish. It achieves a level of personality and sophistication beyond simple fruitiness.",Brut Excellence,Scharffenberger
"A sour-spicy nose of stewed cranberries, chai and floral infusions reveal the nuances of this single-vineyard offering from a coastal appellation, just over the hills from Pismo Beach. Bright red fruit flavors are laid across an herbal backbone with anise and black olive in the midpalate, finishing with bitter greens.",Wolff Vineyard,Summerland
"Ripe dark fruit, leather and chocolate aromas lead the nose on this rich, full-bodied wine. The concentrated palate delivers layers of crushed black cherry, blackberry, cinnamon and clove. Accents of mocha and clove add depth while polished tannins give it a velvety texture. Drink 2015_2019.",,Pietro Zardini
"A welcome barnyard funk of sour cherry, wet leather and mulched shrubbery kicks off the nose on this wine from the likable Joey Gummere, once know for the Kenneth-Crawford wines. Fennel seed flavors and violet characters emerge on the very pretty palate, which has both tannins and mouth-washing acid on the finish.",F Street,Transcendence
"Dusty mineral notes accent aromas of fresh lemon and pear on this racy, light-footed Riesling. The palate is sweet with ripe grapefruit and Meyer lemon flavors, but touched with earthy hints of pollen and saffron that linger on the finish.",Berncasteler Doctor Kabinett,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Scents of waxy lemon peels and candles meld with delicate peach on this refreshing off-dry Riesling. On the palate, hints of lemon verbena and lime zest lend a herbal tone that highlights the wine's revitalizing lime-juice finish.",Kabinett,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Zesty tangerine and lemon peels accent citrus-blossom aromas on this pert, light-bodied Riesling. Off dry in style, the palate showcases layers of sweet yellow peach and apricot dusted with earthy pollen and saffron. A shock of pineapple acidity extends the finish.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"Crushed slate and mineral notes lend elegance to decadent yellow cherry and pineapple notes on this juicy semi-sweet Riesling. Ripe and lush yet brisk with acidity, it's an approachable, irresistible and squarely balanced wine.",H,Dr. Hermann
"The nose of this dry Riesling is subdued with faint hints of blossom, wet stone and lime zest. The palate, however, is anything-but subdued, with ripe yellow-cherry and peach flavors that linger lusciously. Almost oily in texture, it's richly bodied, but brightened with a sheen of lemon-lime acidity.",_rziger Würzgarten Alte Reben GG Dry,Dr. Loosen
"The entry-level Pinot Noir in FEL's lineup of several Anderson Valley Pinots has toasty, oaky aromas, sweet oak flavors and smoky accents. A big, full-bodied, new-oak style wine, it's substantial and structured.",,FEL
"Dry, spicy red-fruit and sawdust aromas are elegant. This is fresh, crisp and refined on the palate, with oak, plum, raspberry and tomato flavors that dry out and narrow down on a tight, well-framed finish.",FH Castrijo Crianza,Finca Hispana
"Intoxicating in vanilla and peach, the aromas telegraphing honeysuckle and anise, this balanced, dry vintage Brut from 100% Chardonnay grapes is soft, food-friendly and easy to drink.",Late Disgorged Blanc de Blancs,Gloria Ferrer
"Made with 70% Pinot Nero and 30% Chardonnay, this salmon-colored sparkler opens with aromas of woodland berries, pastry cream and baking spices. The palate offers mature yellow apple, grapefruit and white pepper alongside a fine perlage and bright acidity.",Parosé,Il Mosnel
"Made with 100% Pinot Noir, this opens with fragrances of violet, rose and perfumed berry. Cinnamon-spice and a pastry note accent the juicy strawberry and wild cherry flavors while a soft mousse lends an elegant finish.",Brut Rosé,Maso Martis
"Aromas recall nail polish remover, black cherry marinated in spirits and exotic spice. The thick palate delivers prune, mocha, dark chocolate and coffee bean alongside velvety tannins. It has a long finish and closes on a bitter, nutty note.",Crosara de le Strie,Corte Rugolin
"Muscular in brambly black cherry and spicy cola layers, this lingers on the palate long after the initial sip. A fine example from what the Russian River Valley winemakers call the Laguna Ridge, a not-too-cool, not-too-warm section of the appellation with shallow Goldridge soils.",Soul Patch Estate Grown,Davis Family
"Spice, licorice and herbal notes complement red-fruit aromas, while the palate offers plenty of structure and tannic grab. There's an avalanche of blackberry, cassis, fig, chocolate and herbal flavors to process, while the finish is rich and rewarding before breaking up in bits.",Broquel,Trapiche
"Orange, lemon, vanilla and white flower start this fresh and spicy white. Fruity, but balanced by a lime and wet stone base, the wine is elegant and food friendly.",,Boutari
"Pointed red-fruit aromas of currant and plum are light but direct. This feels fresh, with mild raspberry flavors and not a whole lot else. On the finish, mellow notes of vanilla and red plum are supported by not overly aggressive tannins. Drink this fresh Garnacha through 2015.",,Fernández Gómez
"This is a serious Cava for the money. It's mildly briny and dusty up front, with peach and apple notes filling out the nose. The palate is elegant and smooth enough, while apple and melon flavors are naturally spicy and ripe given the warm conditions of the '09 vintage. The long, nectarine-flavored finish will win you over.",Vintage Reserva,Freixenet
"The wine is touched by wood, giving a toasty character over crisp acidity. It is rich and creamy although with a tighter, steely texture that promises a few years aging. Drink from 2015.",,Bouchard Père & Fils
"The wine is broad, ripe and full-bodied. A great layer of wood gives richness along with yellow fruits, a touch of mango and a crisp end of acidity. Drink now.",La Verchère,Bret Brothers
"There is a vividly refreshing nose to this biodynamic wine, full of aromatic lift from brisk stone fruit and white rock minerality. It's full on the mouth, nicely balanced with no edges sticking out at all, and just a tad of tart apple on the finish.",Cuvée Papou,Demetria
"With an opulent texture, this is ripe and packed with yellow fruits. There is just a hint of the wood aging along with great acidity and citrus flavors. Although full-bodied, the wine finishes crisply fresh.",,Domaine Chantal Lescure
"With residual sugar at 200 g/L, this is much more concentrated than the average wine labeled Late Harvest. With enough acidity to stay focused and avoid any suggestion of syrup, it's an exceptional value. Deep peach and apricot flavors and a hint of caramel linger through a satisfying finish.",Late Harvest,Airfield Estates
"This is unusual, a Pinot Blanc with a Burgundy appellation. But with its creamy texture and soft fruitiness, it fits well into the Burgundy flavor spectrum. There is some crispness, bright acidity and a fresh final taste. Drink now.",,Alex Gambal
"This is a light, floral wine by Ribera standards. Rosy aromas include baking spices and loamy red-fruit notes. The palate is kind of thin, but with enough tannic bite to make it lasting. Vanilla, raspberry, red plum and tobacco flavors finish with vanilla and coconut accents along with juicy acidity. Drink through 2016.",Crianza,Aticus
"Rubbery, dark-fruit aromas are generous and come with a blanket of mild, chocolaty oak. This is round and punchy on the palate, with raspberry, plum, herb and spice flavors. On the finish, it is fresh and not too demanding, with steady, firm tannins.",Ebeia de Bodegas Portia Roble,Portia
"This solid Aglianico opens with aromas of leather, underbrush, game and ripe plum. The structured palate delivers ripe blackberry accented by notes of licorice, sage and eucalyptus. There's a subtle warmth of alcohol and firm tannins. Best after 2016.",Donp_,Regio Cantina
"This is 58% Cabernet Sauvignon, 34% Malbec and 8% Syrah. The influence of 18 months in oak is showing strongly, though some very pretty raspberry candy flavors come through also. Give it extra breathing time to help balance it out.",Rock Island,Ryan Patrick
"With scents reminiscent of an early morning hike through a foggy forest, it features aromas of cola, sassafras and a damp, earthen funk. It hits the palate with a medium body, delivering some violet florals at first and, with enough swishing, finishing on sanguine flavors of red meat.",KW Ranch,Scratch
"From one of the Benziger family's coolest-climate vineyards, and one that is Demeter-certified Biodynamic, there's a richness of cherry amid subtle aromatics of rose and cinnamon spice. A delicate wine that's light in texture, it offers earthiness and a long, balanced finish.",La Reyna,Signaterra Benziger
"A bouquet of blackberry, violet and subtle rose petal is the precursor to rich flavors of cherry, blackberry, strawberry, clove and mint. A blend of Syrah and Merlot, this offers a chewy texture and refreshing astringency that carries through to the velvety finish.",Sir,Suvla
"Pleasing aromas of guava, watermelon rind and a hint of lemon zest set the stage for flavors of Cavaillon melon, peach, marzipan and orange rind. Smooth in the mouth, this wine features a nice interplay of bright and savory notes. A cool finish washes across the side palate, punctuated by a burst of acidity.",,Suvla
"A bouquet of white peach, honeysuckle and rose petal with a whiff of freshly mowed grass yields to flavors of cantaloupe, Turkish delight and nutmeg joined by a touch of salinity. Soft mouthfeel and well-integrated flavors make way for a bright floral splash on the finish.",Adama,Tabor
"Blue flower, tilled soil, leather, blackberry, licorice and black pepper sensations all come together in this vibrant, straightforward Aglianico. The dense, juicy palate is framed by tightly woven, brooding tannins and a vein of mineral.",,Taverna
"Here's a fresh, delicious Nero d'Avola, loaded with juicy blackberry and black cherry sensations that are accented by hints of black pepper and nutmeg. It's a delightfully easy-drinking, fruit-forward style meant to be enjoyed young.",Kudyah,Terre di Giurfo
"This delicious and velvety expression of Nero d'Avola opens with aromas of earth, ripe black berry, leather and clove. The juicy palate offers blackberry pulp and ripe blueberry, accented by a note of unsweetened black licorice.",Il Moro,Valle dell'Acate
"This is a nice value-priced Albariño, with a minerally nose also offers aromas of melon, apple and peach. The palate is citrusy in feel, with lemony acids. Citrus and stone-fruit flavors finish stony and crisp, with a final blast of lemon.",,Viña Cartín
"Peach-blush in color, this is a pretty, floral and aromatic wine, dry and delicious in peach and strawberry flavors. A hint of herbs marks the finish. Enjoy with a picnic, especially goat cheese and charcuterie.",Rosé of,Ousterhout
"Perhaps this rating will seem conservative in time, but for now this wine shows a bit too much oak-derived toast and vanilla, giving it an air of superficial attractiveness. Cracked pepper, cassis and mixed berries mingle easily on the palate, but seem to fade on the finish. Drink now, or hold another 4_5 years and see what direction things go.",Les Archevêques,Les Vins de Vienne
"The wine has the firmness of a Pommard along with ripe fruits full of sweetness and acidity. That makes it structured and with a good future, while being totally fruity at the same time. Drink from 2015.",,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Tannat is hot right now, but Eric Laumann__hose 30 years of winemaking experience recently landed him the top spot at Castle Rock__as been making it for years now under this personal brand. This one begins with deeply penetrating aromas of mace and black cherry liqueur. The ripe spiciness continues once sipped, with a pleasingly soft mouthfeel. The tannins aren't bombastic at all, and the wine flattens a bit toward the finish",Rocosa Loma,Cambiata
"Underbrush, black pepper and dark berry aromas lead the way on this blend of 80% Aglianico and 20% Piedirosso. The vibrant palate boasts racy acidity and velvety tannins, with juicy red cherry and spicy undertones of clove and nutmeg.",Rais,Cantine Astroni
"It's uncommon to find Grenache Noir in a white blend, but it's a tasty experiment nonetheless. Well rounded and evenly presented, the nose of lemon and honeysuckle is prominent but delicate. The slightly oily palate comes alive with vanilla, pear candy, peach and bubblegum, finishing with a brush of acidity.",Hadley's Cuvee,Clos La Chance
"Lush with ripe red raspberry and cherry flavors, yet nervy with acidity and minerality, this dusty-rose rosé is quaffable yet remarkably nuanced. It's rich and silky on the palate with a lingering cherry blossom perfume on the finish.",Dry,Damiani
"Made on the slopes of Mount Etna, this structured wine opens with aromas of mature black raspberry, fig and chocolate. The warm palate delivers stewed prune, strawberry jam and black cherry, with hints of carob and clove. It's a bit evolved, so enjoy this soon.",Aithos,Destro
"Intense blueberry and blackberry notes penetrate through this fruity, forward Pinot Noir. Hints of savory herbs add elegance to an otherwise one-dimensional palate that finishes with big, coarse tannins.",,Belhurst
"Botrytis aromas feature touches of peach and honey. This is sticky but reasonably acidic, with flavors of peach, lychee and honey. On the finish, it falls off in terms of clarity and turns somewhat bitter.",Reserva Late Harvest,Maray
"After a rough, rubbery start to the aromatics, herbal spice and dark fruit notes come out. This shows a racy palate with high acidity. Herbal red-plum flavors are scratchy, while the finish loses fruit and replaces it with espresso bitterness.",Hacienda Araucano Reserva,François Lurton
"Green aromas of grass and mint lead the way on this unspecified blend of red grapes. The palate is full and solid in feel, while sweet, almost candied flavors of blackberry finish creamy but with a sweetness that seems artificial.",Casillero del Diablo Reserva Winemaker's Blend,Concha y Toro
"Aromatic notes of lychee and rose are accented with a foresty note of pine needles on this curious Gewürztraminer. It's dry and lean on the palate, with a bitter palate that overwhelms otherwise pleasant floral and fruit tones.",,Treleaven
"Crisp red-fruit aromas are simple, direct and clean. This bounces along on rubbery tannins and tastes like blackberry and toast. Mild bitterness and grabbiness get going on the finish.",3 Generaciones,Soleca
"This easy-drinking Cabernet has flavors of blackberry jam and toast, wrapped into firm tannins. It won't improve with age, so drink up with a juicy burger.",,Acronym
"This is a curious, soapy wine with considerable bitterness. There is a toasty edge that shows some bottle maturity, and contrasts with the tense, tight acidity.",Rosé Brut,Domaine Allimant-Laugner
"Just lightly spicy, this is a simple, gentle wine. It is on the dry side, and hints at apple and pear flavors. There's a light acidity on the finish. Screwcap.",Réserve,Gustave Lorentz
"Savory red-cherry notes domaine this wine, with a light body, some spicy accents and lots of refreshing, enlivening acidity.",Classic,Iby
"Simple, direct flavors of pineapple and orange jam, vanilla bean and buttered popcorn mark this Chardonnay. It has just enough acidity to keep things balanced.",,Vinterra
"Fans of fresh, juicy fruit will love this wine's raspberry and cherry jam, red licorice and strawberry Twizzler flavors. The blend is based on Syrah, and the alcohol is high enough to give it some heat on the finish.",Red Dirt,Vinum Cellars
"The blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon is ripe with raisinated fruit flavors that finish a bit Port-like. It's hot with alcohol, but finishes dry.",Capriccio Italian Reserve,Midnight
"Soft and rich with pineapple, lemon candy and oak flavors, this simple Chardonnay has the benefit of acidity for balance. It's a nice, basic Chard at an everyday price.",Private Selection,Robert Mondavi
"This Sangiovese is ruby-brick in color with a texture that's light and silky. Not the best representation of this otherwise fine vineyard, here, high alcohol gives cherry flavors a jalapeño pepper heat..",Stolpman Vineyard,Santa Barbara Winery
"Barrel aging and contact with lees give this wine a rich creaminess, and there's also plenty of acidity. Hints of unripe grapes lend mint and ammonia notes that dominate citrus flavors.",,Patland
"Just off dry, this is a ripe and full-bodied wine that's balanced with acidity. Touched with delicate spice, it has an attractive, open feel that makes it very drinkable now.",Cuvée Famille Willm,Willm
"Light in color and with considerable acidity, this wine boasts cherry fruits along with a dry texture and spice. It is not for aging.",Exception,Cave de Kientzheim-Kaysersberg
"This is an easy, light and fragrant wine that seems destined to accompany fish. It has a touch of spice from the Pinot Gris and Sylvaner in the blend, along with a creamy, light aftertaste.",Sushi Sélection,Cave de Hunawihr
"Blended from Petite Sirah, Syrah and Barbera, this is a hearty red wine that's tannic and jammy, with a honeyed finish. It's fine with burgers.",,Rhiannon
"This wine lacks freshness, although it does have some attractive red berry flavors. Firm tannins and wood aging notes give the wine a drying aftertaste.",Bargemone,Commanderie de la Bargemone
"Aromas of tarmac, burned rubber and oak open this 70-30 blend of Montepulciano and Sangiovese. The heavy dose of oak carries on to the palate along with espresso, vanilla and saucy sensations of stewed, sweetened plum. This lacks balance and finesse. Terroir Society, Potomac Selections.",,De Angelis
"Usually Natura is better than this; this hot-vintage wine shows animal notes, spice and jumpy plum and cherry aromas. It's edgy and raw in feel, with hollow, green-leaning flavors and minty oak. An echo of green rattles across the finish.",Natura,Emiliana
"Here's a basic Pinot Noir, simple and rustic, but not without its charms. It's dry and silky, with cherry pie and oak flavors.",,10Span
The Rocky Top Zin has a backbone of cinnamon and ripe plum amidst puckering tannins and a hint of barnyard.,Rocky Top,Sobon Estate
"Mulchy, ashy and green up front, this is a tough one from the start. Crisp, raw, hard and rough in the mouth, with leafy flavors of green herbs and olive, this is varietal to an extreme, with finishing notes of carob and green-leaning red fruits.",Envero Gran Reserva Estate Bottled,Apaltagua
"There's a perfumy floral note that persists through the nose and palate of this Riesling. It's bright with acidity, but lacks concentration on the palate. Finishes briskly.",Beartown Block 28,Fulkerson
This is a Pinot Noir rosé that is very light and dry. The acidity is strikingly high leaving an impression of sharpness.,,La Cave des Vignerons de Pfaffenheim
"This smells pretty good: cherry and plum aromas with mild oak are solid. The palate, however, is hard and has a plastic-like feel. Flavors of plum and berry finish bitter like espresso.",Momentos Reserva,Château Los Boldos
This is a dry wine that's a bit acidic and watery with thin sour-cherry candy flavors and a hit of oak.,Signature Selection,Pedroncelli
"Volatility interferes with the otherwise pleasing mixture of fruit and barrel, with notes of raspberry jam, fresh and dried fruit and vanilla. Flavors are quite sweet and ripe, showing a hedonistic styling. Drink now.",,McCrea
"This is a wine with potential. For now, it is textured and tight. For the future, plenty of citrus, crisp acidity and ripe apple flavors promise a fruity, fragrant wine. The grapes, vinified in wood, are from the Graves and Entre-Deux-Mers. Drink from 2016.",,Michel Lynch
"This saignée-style, Cabernet Franc rosé has a pale salmon color, with aromas of pink grapefruit and strawberry. It drinks a hair off dry with spritzy melon and berry flavors that linger.",Sonas Devon's,OS Winery
Minerally peach and apple aromas are typical of the region and variety. A fairly racy palate with good weight brings standard orange and grapefruit flavors prior to a citrusy finish with a touch of pithy bitterness.,Lolo,Paco & Lola
"Underbrush, dark berry and spice aromas lead the nose. The palate doles out ripe blackberry, raspberry, clove, espresso and a hint of herb alongside soft, supple tannins.",Riserva,Piccini
"Aromas of Golden Delicious apples, nectarine flesh, lemon-lime soda and poached pears drizzled lightly with agave syrup show on the nose of this wine made by Mike Roth. The palate offers apple and pear cider along with white peach and a steely, nearly gunmetal minerality.",,Piro Piro Piccolo
"Underbrush, espresso and plummy aromas take shape in the glass. The tight palate offers dried cherry, grilled sage and anisette alongside packed tannins. Drink after 2018.",Stielle Gran Selezione,Rocca di Castagnoli
"Muted red cherry and blackberry commingle for a fruity character in this variety not found much these days in Sonoma County. Soft and high-toned in acidity, the wine finishes in a swirl of wild vanilla bean.",,Seghesio
"Zestiness pervades nose and palate: this is so citric and fresh that grapefruit peel is the chief marker. This typical Thermenregion blend of its two indigenous white grapes, Zierfandler and Rotgipfler, shows briskness throughout and will deliver welcome, clean-cut refreshment on a hot day. Drink soon.",Klassik,Gebeshuber
"Dense, juicy and spicy, this easygoing and easy-to-like wine will please a range of palates. Blackberry and black cherry dominate on the palate, softened by fine tannins and integrated oak.",Old Vines,St. Francis
"This well-made wine has appealing aromas of milk chocolate, coffee and plum. The style is lighter, with the concentration not seeming quite all there, but it still provides plenty of appeal with its elegance. Put it at the dinner table to see it at its best.",,Telaya
"Made with 95% Sangiovese and 5% Canaiolo, this offers a fragrance of woodland berry, iris and pressed violet. The easy-drinking palate doles out red cherry, crushed raspberry and a hint of baking spice alongside soft, loose knit tannins. Enjoy soon.",Scassino,Terrabianca
"This wine leads with somewhat locked-up, slightly porty aromas of herb, barrel spice and dark fruit. The ripe, rich dark fruit flavors show considerably more generosity, with firm, slightly gritty tannins backing them up.",Blue Mountain Vineyard,Tranche
"A brooding foundation of blackberry and mushroomy earth lift this full-bodied, tannic wine, which needs further time in bottle to develop. Spicy cinnamon, clove and pepper keep it lively on the palate, between the density and concentration of oak. Let this wine unwind in the bottle through 2020.",,V. Sattui
"Pale in color, this wine shows perfumed aromas of potpourri, wild strawberries and smoke. The palate reveals mesquite and juicy berry flavors that show a lot of delicacy and restraint.",,Voila!
"Aromas of lychee, wet slate and just-cut kiwi combine for a tightly wound nose on this wine from one of the region's pioneering properties. The palate clings close to the lime, lemon and pink grapefruit pith flavors that open a little toward apple flesh and a pinch of herbs.",,Zaca Mesa
"Aromas suggest pink watermelon and bubble gum ester, with an intriguing twist of licorice. It's high and tight on the palate with pink lemonade-driven acidity, offering strawberry fruit in the midpalate and more bubble gum on the finish.",Z Gris,Zaca Mesa
"Slightly broader, less focused notes of cherry play about the nose, the same ripeness of fruit is apparent on the palate where it is tempered by fresh acidity. An easy-drinking, medium-bodied red with party potential.",,Zantho
"Made with Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo, this offers aromas of ripe red berry, fragrant blue flowers and grilled herb. The straightforward palate delivers dried black cherry, clove, black pepper and a hint of espresso. Fine-grained tannins and fresh acidity make it enjoyable now.",Contesa di Radda,Agricoltori del Chianti Geografico
"Aromas of raisin, blackcurrant and a whiff of blue flowers lead the nose. The tightly knit palate offers dried black cherry, vanilla and mocha alongside dusty tannins that leave a drying, rather astringent finish. Hold until 2016 to let it unwind then enjoy soon to capture the remaining fruit.",Duca di Saragnano,Barbanera
"Oak takes the lead on this wine. Aromas of dill, black licorice and woodspice are followed by baking spices and dried dark fruit. It's dry and chalky in feel with dark fruit flavors.",,Barons
"Minerally grapefruit, white peach, lettuce and scallion aromas are clean, inviting and textbook for Verdejo. A fresh, racy, cleansing palate holds grapefruit, orange and briny flavors. This is crisp as a whistle on the finish, but light on flavor and complexity. Drink now.",,Blanco Nieva
"Medicine cabinet, licorice, leather and dried and fresh red and black fruit aromas lead to rich, concentrated flavors. The variety seems subsumed by the style but it's still pretty delicious.",,Boudreaux Cellars
"Aromas of forest floor, game and ripe berry come together on the nose. The earthy palate delivers dried black cherry, clove, smoke, baked plum and aniseed alongside chewy tannins. Drink through 2016.",Single Estate,Cafaggio
"A blend of 85% Sangiovese and 15% Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, this offers aromas of blackcurrant, cedar, underbrush and black pepper. The palate offers dried black cherry, blackberry, clove, anise and espresso alongside assertive tannins. A slightly bitter note of dried sage marks the finish.",Riserva,Castello di Monastero
"Wild berry, fragrant blue flowers, pipe tobacco and sun-baked earth aromas come together in the glass. It's bright, with notes of clove, white pepper and tobacco adding interest to the black cherry core. Lithe tannins and fresh acidity support the juicy flavors.",Oro,Cennatoio
"This Sauvignon Blanc, Sémillon and Muscadelle blend is rounded and ripe, with yellow fruit flavors to go with the fresher acidity. It shows the ripe, tropical side of the Sauvignon Blanc__ich and full in the mouth. Drink from early 2016.",,Château Borie de Noaillan
"This is fully mature with its leather and toast flavors enhanced by a smooth, rich texture. It is a delicious wine to drink now, with some red fruits and final acidity.",,Château des Annereaux
Attractively perfumed this ripe wine has hints of the crisp acidity that is also there. It's a fresh wine with the potential of richness. Ripe pink grapefruit and tangy acidity are balanced by the warmer flavors of pear and quince. Drink from late 2015.,,Château la Croix de Roche
"This wine is full of juicy fruit along with a dark, smoky character. A firm undertow of very dry tannins brings out a firm structure. The hard edge needs to soften, so wait to drink until 2018.",,Château la Patache
"Bright and crisp, it has a steely edge that is crispened with acidity, a strong citrus element and a very pure fruitiness. The wine should age until 2016 to be at its best.",Aux Morlays,Manoir du Capucin
"Brisk and fruity but with a distinctive note of spice and pear, this Moschofilero offers approachable, ripe-fruit expression with an exotic edge. Pair with grilled seafood, Chinese cuisine or fruit salad.",,Nasiakos
"The wine has the firmness of a Pommard along with ripe fruits full of sweetness and acidity. That makes it structured and with a good future, while being totally fruity at the same time. Drink from 2015.",,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Tannat is hot right now, but Eric Laumann__hose 30 years of winemaking experience recently landed him the top spot at Castle Rock__as been making it for years now under this personal brand. This one begins with deeply penetrating aromas of mace and black cherry liqueur. The ripe spiciness continues once sipped, with a pleasingly soft mouthfeel. The tannins aren't bombastic at all, and the wine flattens a bit toward the finish",Rocosa Loma,Cambiata
"Underbrush, black pepper and dark berry aromas lead the way on this blend of 80% Aglianico and 20% Piedirosso. The vibrant palate boasts racy acidity and velvety tannins, with juicy red cherry and spicy undertones of clove and nutmeg.",Rais,Cantine Astroni
"It's uncommon to find Grenache Noir in a white blend, but it's a tasty experiment nonetheless. Well rounded and evenly presented, the nose of lemon and honeysuckle is prominent but delicate. The slightly oily palate comes alive with vanilla, pear candy, peach and bubblegum, finishing with a brush of acidity.",Hadley's Cuvee,Clos La Chance
"Lush with ripe red raspberry and cherry flavors, yet nervy with acidity and minerality, this dusty-rose rosé is quaffable yet remarkably nuanced. It's rich and silky on the palate with a lingering cherry blossom perfume on the finish.",Dry,Damiani
"Made on the slopes of Mount Etna, this structured wine opens with aromas of mature black raspberry, fig and chocolate. The warm palate delivers stewed prune, strawberry jam and black cherry, with hints of carob and clove. It's a bit evolved, so enjoy this soon.",Aithos,Destro
"Pegau's rare white Châteauneuf-du-Pape is a blend of 60% Clairette, 20% Grenache Blanc, 10% Roussanne and 10% Bourboulenc. Despite being full bodied and viscous on the palate, there's no sense of heaviness__he wine's aromas and flavors of barely ripe melon, anise and honeyed citrus seem to float on the palate, ending in a mouthwatering finish.",Cuvée Réservée,Domaine du Pegau
"From the good-value Fixin appellation, this full wine offers minerality but, more noticeably, a ripe, red-fruited feel, with acidity to give freshness. Hints of licorice show the wood aging. Drink from 2016.",Crais de Chêne,Domaine René Bouvier
"This opens with fruity aromas of plum and black berry, alongside whiffs of tilled earth and spice. It's still a bit closed but the palate reveals black cherry, raisin and clove supported by a tannic backbone. Drink 2015_2021.",Siir,San Martino
"Made of Kalecik Karasi, an indigenous Turkish grape, this wine has aromas of strawberry and orange rind that are a pleasant prelude to flavors of tart and ripe summer cherry, pomegranate, vanilla and a whisper of salinity. Tongue-coating tannins fade into the smooth, bright finish.",Denizli-Güney Plateau,Sevilen
"While demure on the nose with just hints of yellow peach and spice, this dry, medium-bodied Riesling builds in intensity on the palate with concentrated flavors of tangerine and yellow cherry. A streak of lemon-lime acidity stretches out the finish.",Reserve Dry,Sheldrake Point
"This hearty Nero d'Avola opens with aromas of black fruit, turned soil and spice. The soft, juicy, palate offers a dense blackberry flavor that's accented by chocolate, carob and clove. While it's not complex, it has delicious fruit and a smooth texture.",Schietto,Spadafora
"This Napa-side-of-Carneros Chardonnay is resplendent in crisp yet hearty aromas of apple, pear and flowery jasmine. Well put-together, it offers electric acidity and enough rounded texture to pair magnificently with food. On the finish is a hint of tarte Tatin, a tiny seasoning of cinnamon and nutmeg on top.",,Starmont
"Just a bit of Cabernet Franc and Cabernet Sauvignon is added to the blend, most of which comes from the Ciel du Cheval, Tapteil and Weinbau vineyards. In this cooler vintage, an herbal character emerges, lending firm tannins and structure to the tight black cherry and cassis core.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Here's a refreshing and savory blend of Catarratto, Pinot Bianco, Sauvignon and Traminer. It's loaded with succulent white peach, juicy pineapple and citrus zest. Crisp acidity gives this a clean, quenching finish.",Leone d'Almerita,Tasca d'Almerita
"Dusty apple, melon and saline aromas are nice but not too intense or exact. This is tight and juicy but textured on the palate, with nectarine, peach and saline flavors. A round feeling finish offers up minerality and length.",,Terras de Lantaño
"Here's a bright and delicious wine made with the native grape Frappato. It opens with intense fruity aromas of crushed strawberry, Morello cherry and orange peel that continue on to the palate along with nutmeg, white pepper and vibrant acidity. Chill for 15 minutes for a perfect summer red.",Belsito,Terre di Giurfo
"Juicy and inviting, dark ruby in color, this racy rosé made from Syrah grapes is nuanced with tropical guava and peach that linger on the palate. Dry, it'll pair with lounges on the porch or by the pool.",Dragonsleaf Vineyard Dry,Wines Gone Wild
"A blend of Conner Lee and Stillwater Creek vineyard fruit, this carries tart, wild berry flavors on a sea of bright acidity. Streaks of anise and a touch of floral aromatics add zest and interest.",LMS,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"Browned butter, cinnamon-like spices and blackberry pie frame this Syrah from an estate vineyard owned of Zaca Mesa, the first winery to plant the grape in Santa Barbara County. There is more brown spice and blackberry on the palate, which is couched in an appealing tannic structure that smooths out as you drink it.",Chapel G Syrah,Zaca Mesa
"Toasty, oaky aromas of popcorn and modest fruits set up an elegant feeling palate with a mild but present bubble bead. Apple, nectarine and citrus flavors finish long and pure, with a dry, citrusy feel.",L'Hereu Reserva Brut,Raventós I Blanc
"Of all the Angosto 2011s, El Jefe del Tribu is the most smoky and roasted of the group. Savory aromas of beef jerky and baked blackberry filter onto a ripe, slightly flat palate. Flavors of baked black fruits are gritty and mildly stalky, while the finish tastes of cooked berry fruits and generic blackness.",El Jefe de la Tribu,Angosto
"While the wine is structured, it does also have plenty of ripe, juicy fruitiness that is already delicious. It's an open wine, rounded and rich in fruit flavor. The tannins are likely to smooth out soon, so drink from 2016.",Château de Mercey,Antonin Rodet
"The Miller's Cove Red is a blend of Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon that shows an exceptionally fine calibration of ripe, concentrated cherry and berry flavors against a backdrop of bristling acidity. It's refreshingly quaffable, yet nuanced with hints of spice, mineral and violet that linger softly on the finish.",Miller's Cove,Keuka Spring
"This is a supple, medium- to full-bodied red for drinking over the next few years. The plummy flavors are a bit earthy, dark and indistinct, but pleasant enough, and the wine's silky finish features a bright burst of red fruit.",,Château du Trignon
"This cleanly made blend of 50% Grenache Blanc, 25% Clairette, 20% Bourboulenc and 5% Roussanne displays an exotic ginger note on the nose. Melon and citrus flavors dominate this medium- to full-bodied wine that's slightly creamy in texture. Shows good length and hints of wet stone on the finish. Drink now.",,Domaine la Mereuille
"Leesy, bready aromas are ripe and fruity. This is soft in feel and a touch heavy, which may be a reflection of the warm 2009 vintage. Nectarine and other ripe flavors finish full and sweet. This almost tastes like a brut Cava despite being a brut nature.",Brut Nature Gran Reserva Reserva de la Familia,Juvé y Camps
"Dry and refreshing, it's steely in stone fruit and pineapple. The acidity is clean and bright but not so overpowering that the wine won't develop more nuance over time. It balances well between cool-climate minerality, an underpinning of herb and fresh California fruit.",,Longboard
"It's a midnight-black wine, full-bodied and tannic, with immense black currant, grilled meat and black pepper flavors that finish bone dry. Already throwing some sediment, it will live for two decades, without gaining in complexity. Drink now_2025.",,Santa Barbara Winery
"Coming from the cool 2010 vintage, this 100% varietal wine doesn't quite seem to have fully ripened but still offers plenty of enjoyment with its savory notes of leafy herbs, olive and cherry. It's elegant in its styling with a fresh feel and a cinnamon-speckled finish.",,Schmidt
"In this crisp, fresh, very dry rosé Champagne, the red fruits are laced with acidity and apple. A touch of bitterness suggests the wine needs to age a few months in bottle, to soften and get a more generous feel.",Cuvée Rosé Brut,Tendil & Lombardi
"Racy acidity and oak-inspired lemon, lime and tropical fruit flavors mark this bone-dry, elegant wine, with a minerally edge. Don't drink it too cold.",Reserve,Windsor Oaks
"Simple but with depth, this wine has structure and some good tannins, along with the bright cherry fruit flavors and balanced acidity. It's a wine to drink now, full of flavor and ripe fruits.",,Domaine de la Prébende
"This brightly acidic, clean wine doesn't appear to have any oak influence. What you get are pure, ripe orange, Meyer lemon, lime and peach flavors that finish honeyed, yet dry. It's an easy wine to drink with many foods.",,flipflop
"This single-vineyard selection is aggressively tannic, earthy and herbal. Time may help smooth it out. There's plenty of black fruits and dark chocolate, and chewy, somewhat rough tannins.",Bjornson Vineyard,Grochau
"Richness and rusticity ride side by side in this Pinot Noir. It has enormously ripe raspberry, cherry and persimmon flavors, with a balanced jacket of oak and crisp acidity. On the other hand, the tannins are edgy, giving the wine a jagged feeling. The wine will age for many years, without gaining complexity.",Soberanes Vineyard,Bernardus
"Subdued aromas recall Alpine wild flowers and lychee. The fresh, linear palate offers Golden Delicious apples and citrus notes with a hint of wax alongside crisp acidity.",Vom Stein,Castelfeder
"Chatons, which means __ittens,_ indicates this is a younger style of wine from Château du Cèdre. The dark, perfumed, mint and black berry flavored fruits give richness and precociousness. The wine is going to develop over the short term so drink from 2016.",Chatons du Cèdre,Château du Cèdre
"An unusual blend of Zinfandel, Petite Sirah and Teroldego, this red wine is dry and tannic. The blackberry, currant, mocha and white pepper flavors are drinking well now.",Sorcerer's Stone,Cinnabar
"This wine opens with an intense bouquet of white roses with accents of baking spices. The flowery sensation carries over to the palate along with ripe banana, pear and clove, plus the heat of alcohol. It concludes with a slightly sweet finish.",Movado,Andriano
"Very Douro in its mineral texture and dry core, it also has a surround of ripe black fruits. It's concentrated and has some aging potential, although it can be drunk now.",Porrais,Quinta de Porrais
"Still young, it is full of spice from wood aging along with juicy black fruits. It is soft, dominated by black currant and acidity. Not for aging, it will be ready by the end of 2014.",,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Reedy berry aromas mixed with herbal notes set up a chunky, voluminous palate. Spicy flavors of olive, green herbs, tobacco and oak run alongside berry and plum fruit. On the finish, a resiny oak flavor and herbal notes meld then fade away. This is 55% Carmenère, 30% Petit Verdot and 15% Syrah.",Anke Blend 2 Carménère-Petit Verdot-Shiraz,Santa Alicia
"A ripe, rich and deliciously spicy wine, it has a light touch of white pepper, red berry fruits and a broad brush of acidity. It's rounded, although with some tannic structure, and can certainly be drunk now.",Merlot/Duras,Domaine D'en Ségur
"This Merlot-based blend is dry, hard in tannins and brisk in acids. It has an intense core of blackberries, black currants and oak. Ready to drink now, it needs rich, oily foods, like short ribs, to cut through the astringency.",The Immigrant,Donati
"Notable for a soft, buttery creaminess that makes it feel caressing in the mouth. There's just enough acidity to give a boost to the intense lemondrop candy, pineapple, crème brulée and vanilla flavors. Drink up with roast chicken, grilled salmon or portobello mushroom risotto.",,Gainey
"This wine shows its high alcohol with pepperiness and too much fruit richness. There is certainly power there, followed by superripe plums and dark tannins that are almost enveloped by the fruitiness. Drink from 2015.",Colheita Seleccionada,Herdade das Servas
"A wine that packs a punch of black fruits and dark tannins, it is very structured. Still dense and dry, it needs to soften so the berry fruits will show, giving a rich wine with a fresher aftertaste. Drink from 2016.",Dornas,Herdade do Rocim
"Perhaps it's the bottle age but this Zin is plush and voluptuous, bright in red raspberry and blackberry fruit with a smoky undertone. Layered, the texture is dense and the finish long. A good pizza wine.",Family Vine Old Vine,Herman Walters
"It flatters with ripe apricot, orange, lime and papaya flavors, enhanced with oak and brightened with acidity. Bone dry on the finish, it has a firm edge of minerality.",,Hoyt Family Vineyards
"It shows good acidity, a pleasant scour of tannins and complex flavors of raspberries, currants and mushrooms. But a tannic graininess results in a lack of delicacy. Already throwing some sediment, it will age for many years.",Estate,Kings Mountain
"Pretty fragrances recall white spring flowers and white fruit. The bright palate offers juicy Granny Smith, yellow peaches and citrus alongside crisp acidity that leaves a clean, dry finish.",,Kris
"The grapes are from Mount Veeder, and the wine shows that appellation's strong tannins, as well as its classic black currant and mineral flavors that finish so dry and clean. Made from 100% Cabernet, it was aged in 50% new French oak. The end result is complex, but astringent, not a wine you want to drink now. Give it until 2020 and see what it's doing.",,Kukeri
"This is one of those Chardonnays that's delicious from the first sip. It's not complicated, but is rich in mango, yellow peach and oak-inspired buttered toast, butterscotch, honey and vanilla bean flavors. The grapes are from the Oak Knoll District, and the wine has refreshing acidity.",Red Hen,Laird
"This well-priced Moscato offers intense sensations of honeysuckle, tropical fruit, ripe yellow peach and juicy honeydew melon. The palate is brightened by fresh acidity, which imparts a lively, bright character.",,Mezzacorona
"Aromas include white spring flowers, tropical fruit and a hint of graphite. The juicy palate offers green apples, white peach and melon alongside fresh acidity. Delicate almond marks the close.",Montunal,Montonale
"Fragrant in tropical guava and grapefruit, this is a clean, crisp Chardonnay. Layered with acidity and textured enough to go with food, it's a good wine to serve on occasions big and small.",Rock & Vine,Nine North Wine Company
"This 100% Merlot has elevated qualities of complexity. It's dry and quite tannic, with raspberry, cherry, licorice, herb and sandalwood flavors that finish with a rich spiciness. Drink now_2016.",,Pech Merle
"An array of damp, dank herbs shows on the nose of this bottling from the Fairbairn Vineyard, with aromas of oregano, thyme, chaparral and moist earth. The palate is relatively light in body, showing flavors of oregano-crusted pork roast and a woody character.",The Conspirator's Reserve,Cloak & Dagger
"This aromatic, herbal wine is crisp and lively, with bright acidity and green fruits. Citrus and gooseberry flavors bring out an even fresher side. It finishes light and fruity. Drink now.",,Domaine de Villalin
"Intensely herbal, this is a crisp, cool wine. Layers of citrus, grapefruit and gooseberry mingle with grassy, herbal flavors. Green, fresh and drinkable now, this is a fine apéritif style.",Cuvée des Victoires,Domaine Philippe Portier
"This wine is soft, lightly fruity and refreshing. Apple and ripe pear flavors contrast with the textured acidity. It's a balanced wine, full of fruitiness and ready to drink now.",Côte de Reigny,Domaine Sautereau
"From vines nearly 30 years in age, this is Pinard's immediately attractive, drink-now wine. Fresh lemon and grapefruit flavors are lightly herbal in character. Juicy, lively and crisp, it's ready to drink.",Florès,Domaine Vincent Pinard
"A majority varietal with 10% Merlot, 8% Cabernet Franc, 3% Malbec and 2% Petit Verdot, this wine offers dusty tar, tobacco and chocolate around more succulent flavors of blackberry and black cherry. It finishes lean.",,Envolve
"Oak, coconut, toasted nut, porcini mushroom, steeped prune and dried sage aromas lead the nose on this robust wine. The warm, one-dimensional palate offers dried berry, raisin, vanilla, anise, oak-driven spice and mocha framed in velvety tannins. The heat of alcohol marks the close.",,Ferrero
"This wine starts out strongly reduced, making it a challenge to get at the pink grapefruit, lychee and spice aromas. The flavors drink just off dry, with high wire acidity. There are good things going on but the reduction is a challenge to overcome.",Dragonfly,Francis Tannahill
"Named after the matriarch of the Riboli wine family, who founded what may be the first tasting room in California, this shows light yellow fruits on the nose. The palate combines lemon and apple with a slight hue of brown spice, offering plump fruit with a tang.",,Maddalena
"An estate wine blended with 6% Sémillon, this was aged in 50% neutral oak. The texture provides the illusion of a bigger body and more power than it should have, given the alcohol level. It finishes in a twist of fresh tangerine.",Danielle Estate,Merriam
"The aromas explore this variety's savory side, with notes of green herbs and dill followed by vanilla, char, burnt coffee and green wood. The palate shows flavors of char and game, with the tannins seeming gritty.",Seven Hills Vineyard,Merry Cellars
"Young and firm to the point of tightness, this suggests a light mix of celery, cucumber, lemon and apple, with a whiff of coconut. There's a woody__ot toasty__cent underlying it and carrying through on the palate.",,Meyer Family Vineyards
"Cedar, herb, mushroom and woodspice aromas are followed by tart cranberry and flavors that show some astringency. The wood gets out front.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,:Nota Bene
"Deep straw to the eye, this wine has a bouquet of lemon curd and apricot. Slightly savory flavors of pear, apricot, lavender and thyme are joined in the finish by the faintest hint of sweetness and a floral note.",,Ouled Thaleb
"This deep red-violet colored Bordeaux-style blend offers a bouquet of elderberry and black currant. Strong tannins stay in the forefront amidst cooked fruit flavors of elderberry, cassis and blueberry with hints of mint and anisette that linger into the cool, syrupy finish.",K2,Pa_aeli
"Medium-straw colored in the glass, this has a soft bouquet of guava and pineapple. It is slightly stiff at first, but tropical fruit flavors of guava and passion fruit with touches of lemon curd quickly wash across the palate. The citrus-laced finish offers long-lasting floral notes.",,Pa_aeli
"A bit thinner aromatically than some other Cabs, this shows black cherry, tobacco ash, soft cedar and rose petals on the nose. The palate is also relatively light, but offers complex black pepper, thyme, red cherry, turned earth and dried-mint flavors.",,Pegasus Estate
"Charred earth, toasted hazelnut, grilled porcini and funky notes of game and farmyard emerge in the glass. The aromas carry over to the robust palate, along with leather, dried black cherry, oak, anise and espresso alongside a tannic backbone. The heat of evident alcohol dominates the finish.",,Podere La Vigna
"Made with 100% Sangiovese, this straightforward red has subdued aromas of red berry, toasted oak and a whiff of blue flower. On the tart, tangy palate, zesty acidity and round tannins underscore sour cherry, fresh raspberry and white pepper.",Amaranto,Podere San Cristoforo
"This unusual five-grape blend includes Chardonnay, Sémillon, Sauvignon Blanc, Viognier and Muscat. It maintains a sense of focus, with the grassy, herbal character of Sauv Blanc and Sémillon commanding most of the attention. It's stiff, woody (rather than oaky) and herbal. Try it with fresh goat cheese.",Oldfield Series 2Bench,Tinhorn Creek
"The first sniff is yeasty and beery, a nod to the wine's youth. With ample air it brings in light hints of citrus blossom, lemon verbena and mint. Flavors of lemon and pineapple come next, and the small percentage that was barrel fermented helps to round off the acids.",,Township 7
"The chef returns to wine in this blend of mostly Chardonnay with 4% Viognier. A smooth, round and ripely agreeable quaff, it's thick in oak with a taste of vanilla.",Blending Sessions Blend No. 3,Tyler Florence
"Leathery plum and berry aromas come with a touch of char. This blend of Shiraz and Tempranillo feels round and solid. Familiar flavors of berry fruits and cherry are a bit spicy, while the finish tastes of black fruits and feels right.",El Miracle 120,Vicente Gandia
"Apple and peach aromas are basic but clean and fresh. So is the palate on this Chardonnay-Sauvignon Blanc blend. Flavors of nectarine and apple don't stray far from basic, while green apple and citrus flavors are propped up on the finish by racy acidity.",El Miracle 120,Vicente Gandia
"Aromas of freshly cut pear, apple and almond butter mix with assorted spices. The flavors are elegant in style, pulling up toward the finish. It provides easy drinking enjoyment.",,Waterbrook
"Made at a somewhat approachable price point, this blend of coastal vineyard sites holds back on fruit and texture. It provides a tightly closed and still youthful touch of savory herb and tea, finishing lean.",,Zepaltas
"Aromas of toasted oak, roasted coffee bean and dried black-skinned fruit lead the nose. The firm, astringent palate offers raisin, dried black cherry and star anise alongside close-grained tannins. Drink soon to capture the remaining fruit richness.",,Livernano
"Aromas of wild red berry, pressed violet and a whiff of baking spice flow through this simple, easygoing wine. On the easy-drinking palate, round tannins support mature black cherry, cinnamon and a hint of mocha. Drink through 2017.",Rubinoro,Vecchia Cantina di Montepulciano
"Aromas of underbrush, toasted oak, coffee and a whiff of roasted herb emerge on this. The brawny palate displays dried black cherry, hazelnut, anise and vanilla alongside astringent tannins that leave a tongue-drying finish. A green note of powdered sage marks the close.",,Albatreti
"Fresh, fruity cranberry and raspberry flavors penetrate through this vivaciously brisk blend of Cabernet Franc and Lemberger. It's fairly straightforward in style, but hints of herb and bramble lend a savory complexity to the midpalate. The finish is moderately long, marked by a spray of fine tannins.",Cabernet Franc-Lemberger,Anthony Road
"Concentrated, ripe blackberry and cassis aromas come with peppery spice and cedary oak notes. This is big and generous on the palate, with roasted, well-oaked blackberry flavors. A touch of heat lends sizzle to the finish. Drink through 2020.",The Apple Doesn't Fall Far From The Tree,Matias Riccitelli
"Moorooduc's estate Pinot Noir is a solid value among the boutique offerings from the Mornington Peninsula. There's a supple cushioning of flesh wrapped around a firm backbone of acid, while the flavors run from black cherry and mint through earthier notes of brown sugar and roasted parsnip. Drink now through 2020.",,Moorooduc
"Smoky aromas of fresh-cut wood blend with berry and cassis form a welcoming, generous bouquet. This feels lively on the palate, albeit tartaric. Oaky plum, cassis and vanilla flavors finish full and agreeable. Drink through 2019.",Alegoría Gran Reserva,Navarro Correas
"This offers aromas of red rose, wild berry, dark cooking spice and a whiff of sun baked earth. The ripe palate offers black cherry marinated in spirits, licorice, game and a hint of chocolate alongside velvety tannins. The warmth of alcohol closes the finish. Drink 2018_2029.",Bussia Riserva,Silvano Bolmida
"Massively fruity, this is an apple/pear bonanza, fleshy and almost lasciviously delicious. The huge fruit flavors convey an impression of sweetness, though this is not identified as off dry. It has tremendous density and length.",,Trinity Vineyards
"It is the ripe dark Alicante Bouschet that dominates this firmly structured wine. It is packed with tannins along with a hugely dense texture and concentrated juicy berry flavors. It is very firm, still young. Wait until 2017.",Premium,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"An elegant blend from different estate vineyards, this widely available cuvée brings sturdy tannins and red currant fruit, highlighted with pretty baking spices. It would be an ideal match for roast duck with an orange sauce.",Premier Cuvée,Archery Summit
"This wine is bone-dry, although with some age the shock of the acidity has been rounded out by a hint of toast. It's linear, fresh and intensely crisp, with citrus and almond tones. Drink this wine from a good vintage now.",Le Nombre d'Or Brut Nature,Aubry
"Given four months in concrete egg, this is an exotically crisp and textured white, lean and high in acidity with plenty of mouthcoating body to find its balance. Lemon, grapefruit and tangerine are the highlights, finished in refreshing layers of white peach.",Juliana Vineyard,B Cellars
"This wine over-delivers in quality for the price. It's made from mostly Cabernet Sauvignon, with handfuls of Merlot, Malbec, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc blended in to good effect. The whole combines into layers of chocolate and graham cracker, dappled in vanilla and jam. Thick tannins suggest a swirl or two of the glass. The finish is all tobacco.",,B Side
"Underbrush, smoke, mocha and dark fruit aromas lead the nose and carry over to the ripe palate along with dried black cherry, licorice and clove. Firm, velvety tannins provide the framework. Drink 2018_2028.",Boscato,Bel Colle
"Generous black-cherry fruit anchors this barrel-aged wine that remains tartly acidic, with pretty accents of toast and mocha. Focused, young and fresh, it should drink optimally 2018_2028.",Aeolian,Bethel Heights
"Dark red violet in color, this wine has aromas of cherry, lavender and rose petal. It is a well-balanced wine with flavors of black cherry, raspberry, Turkish delight and herbes de Provence. Silky tannins coat the palate into the lasting finish, which is punctuated by a note of bright cherry.",Reserve,Binyamina
"Berry, baking spice, dried iris, mint and a hint of vanilla come together on this structured wine. On the palate, notes of white pepper, sage, anise, orange zest and yellow peach accent the red cherry core while a balsamic note closes the finish. Firm, refined tannins provide the backbone.",Palliano Riserva,Ceste
"L'Homme Mort is a northern extension of the Fourchaume Premier Cru vineyard, so called because this was where a local lord dispensed justice by death. It often produces cooler wines such as this. It is tight, with toasted bread hints and with a strongly tangy character. It does need to develop and shouldn't be drunk before 2018.",L'Homme Mort Premier Cru,Domaine Chenevières
"This is a super-ripe, still very young wine. It's showing all its concentrated fruits, wood aging flavors and dense texture as well as the firm tannins that will allow it to age. With its combination of black plum skin, blackberry and dark concentration, leave the wine until 2018.",,Herdade do Rocim
"Fresh boysenberries and a blueberry sorbet character mix with notes of minty tarragon, dill and hot gravel on the nose of this wine, from an area between Gilroy and Morgan Hill. Peppercorns are prominent on the relatively light palate, along with tobacco, espresso and boysenberry.",Estate Select,Jason-Stephens
"The steely character of a young Chablis is very apparent in this wine. It is crisp, lemon flavored and with a mineral edge. The wine has a juicy freshness, still young at heart and needing to age. Drink from 2018.",Fourchaume Premier Cru,Louis Max
"From the producer's monumental Atlas Peak vineyard, this is a tightly wound, solidly constructed mountain Cab, blended with a handful of Petit Verdot. Tobacco, black tea and a sliver of coconut intermingle around a medium-bodied whole that will benefit from cellaring, through 2021.",Animo,Michael Mondavi Family Estate
"Big, bold, dark and chewy, this builds upon substantial black-cherry fruit and supporting acids. Still knitting together, it shows highlights of cedar and tobacco, along with thick tannins. Give this a couple more years of bottle age, and drink after 2018.",Schindler Vineyard,Panther Creek
"A juiciness of cherry and vanilla spark the opening of this wine, a celebration of the vintage, appellation and in this case, fruit-forwardness of the variety. With a backbone of oak and cedar, it has smooth tannins and medium weight, finishing in mocha chocolate. Drink now through 2022.",Barrel Select,Provenance Vineyards
"Sweetened tannins highlight a depth of chocolate and blackberry in this 100% varietal wine made in small amounts. Soft and juicy, it crafts a balance of richness and density around elegant spicy clove and cinnamon.",District Collection,Raymond
"This wine draws from a handful of tremendous vineyard sites, including the producer's estate, Platt and Clary Ranch, all cool-climate and windswept. It's a tight, light and minimally messed-with wine, bright in cherry, pomegranate and rose.",,Red Car
"Caramelized white peach, salted lemon, pear skin, red apple and the hint of white flowers show on the nose of this wine by these longtime but under-the-radar producers. The palate blends orange skins and grapefruit pith with buttered toast, sea salt and a dill-like herb character.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,Wedell Cellars
"A limited, popular entry in Winderlea's extensive single-vineyard lineup, this suggests cherry kirsch with streaks of coffee and tobacco. The pretty fruit leads into darker notes of tar and espresso. Still young and primary, the Juliard may be among the vintage's most long-lasting wines.",Juliard Vineyard,Winderlea
"This is a very lively wine with a creamy mousse. The wine is towards dry, bringing out great white and citrus fruit flavors with a burst of tangy acidity. It comes from the village of Chouilly in the Côte des Blancs, which gives the wine a tight mineral texture at the end.",Grand Cru Blanc de Blancs Chouilly Brut,A.R. Lenoble_
"A Garrafeira wine is a special selection and this wine, which was aged for 30 months after bottling before being released, shows its quality quickly. Now reaching drinkability, its tannins have softened leaving rich full black currant and fresh acidity along with a more mature leathery character. Drink now and until 2020.",Garrafeira,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Principally Pinot Noir, the blend includes 25% Pinot Meunier and a splash of Chardonnay. It's a light and pretty salmon pink in hue, with hints of honeysuckle and moist earth in the nose. Flavors suggest tart raspberries and Bing cherries, with impressive minerality in the crisp, lingering finish.",Brut Rosé,Argyle
"Restrained aromas of black plum barely set the stage for flavors of dark plum, cherry-vanilla, mint eucalyptus and ground black pepper. Fruit flavors are soft, but the minty notes never overpower brightness and acidity. Tannins are just shy of opulent, and the finish is marked by a note of tart apple crispness.",,Bazelet HaGolan
"Creamy on the nose, this wine shows seared pineapple, apple custard, lemon oil and faint iodine aromas. The flavors are evenly placed between lemon yogurt and salted apples, mixing a bit of tang and ripe fruit with a savory sea salt.",Rosella's Vineyard,Bernardus
"This lightly colored, luminous 100% Schiava offers aromas of wild berry, pomegranate and violet. On the bright palate, notes of mandarin orange and almond accent the red cherry core. It's easy drinking and balanced with crisp acidity and silky, soft tannins. Drink soon.",Lago di Caldaro Classico,Weingut Niklas
"Smoke and pressed apple notes are savory on the nose, but the palate of this zesty off-dry Riesling is fresh with sweet-tart peach and honeydew. It's refreshing and straightforward in style, but finishes with lingering mineral complexities.",Nik Weis Wiltinger Alte Reben,St. Urbans-Hof
This is a big wine with dark tannins and rich black fruits that are powerful and dense. The strong mineral texture comes from the rocky soils of Catapereiro. Wood aging adds to the complexity. Drink from 2017.,Companhia das Lezírias Herdade de Catapereiro,Wines & Winemakers
"Layers of rich white peach and pink grapefruit sweeten this delightfully piercing spätlase. It's dainty in mouthfeel, but sumptuously ripe, balanced by a bracing strike of acidity.",Niersteiner Auflangen Spätlese,Gustav Adolf Schmitt
"This vibrant, linear wine opens with aromas of lemon-lime, pear and a whiff of alpine herb. The vertical palate offers crunchy apple, white grapefruit and a hint of mango alongside zesty acidity.",,Abbazia di Novacella
"Aromas suggest citrus, acacia flower, and hints of vanilla and honey. The creamy palate offers Bartlett pear, sage and lemon drop brightened by fresh acidity.",Praepositus,Abbazia di Novacella
"From a magical place in the heart of Sonoma Valley, near several marquee spots for Zin, this estate-grown brawler is high-octane, yet drinkable, a yeasty, brambly expression of tar, leather, meat and black licorice. Only the second vintage from the producer, the wine's weight doesn't overpower its potential, which should develop further in time.",Estate Grown,Beltane Ranch
"Sleek and polished, this opens with aromas of raspberry preserve and rose petal. The elegant palate offers crushed red berry with hints of green tea, cinnamon and a mineral note alongside firm acidity and supple tannins.",,Cantina Terlano
"This unusual, brass colored-white opens with aromas that recall candied orange, flint and pressed yellow flowers. Fermented on the skins in cement and aged in acacia casks, this wine shows tertiary flavors on the palate, including smoky mineral, dried herb, dried apricot and ginger drop as well as a hint of nectarine zest. Bright acidity keeps it fresh. Drink through 2018.",Fontanasanta Manzoni Bianco,Foradori
"Vibrantly effervescent, this is gorgeously perfumed with orange blossoms and tangerine zest. Fresh peach and grapefruit flavors are laced with delicate shards of lime acidity that linger elegantly on a long herbal finish.",Brut Sekt,Hansen-Lauer
"Boysenberry, blackberry, charred oak, herb and spice aromas dominate this Carmenère blend. Grabby, full and tannic on the palate, with steely grip, this shows flavors of prune, baked plum, herbs, spice and coffee-like bitterness. A leathery, earthy, herbal finish is chewy, blocky and tannic. Drink now, but let this bruiser air as much as possible.",Viola,Maquis
"Delicate aromas of wild berry, violet and a whiff of baking spice come together in the glass. The elegantly structured palate offers crushed black cherry, alpine herb and a trace of vanilla alongside firm, fine-grained tannins.",Mezzan,Erste Neue
"This has oodles of ripe boysenberry and huckleberry in the aroma, and the overt fruitiness continues in the flavors. A nice touch of oak sawdust in the aroma comes off more like a touch of sweetness in the flavors. There is a rich mouthfeel, soft tannins and full body. It's enjoyable and easy to drink.",Estate Grown,Fields Family
"Ripe, earthy aromas of plum and berry are oaky and give off a note of maple. Angular and intense on the palate, this blend of Cab Franc, Cab Sauvignon and Carmenère is bolstered by tartaric acid, while the flavor profile is earthy, baked and includes herbal plum and berry. A peppery, spicy, minty finish is typical of high-end Chilean red blends. Drink through 2016.",Triple C Estate Bottled,Santa Rita
"Wild red berry and crushed flower aromas lead the nose on this lively red. The juicy palate doles out sour cherry, raspberry, almond and a lightly balsamic note. It's nicely balanced with bright acidity and soft, polished tannins.",Passion Vernatsch,St. Pauls
"This Zin speaks to compelling red fruit, plum and vanilla, with light oak presence. It's balanced yet still plenty big, showing off its well-worn roots within an historic vineyard. Before veering into syrupy territory, it pulls back, letting leathery cinnamon and black pepper have their say.",Monte Rosso Vineyard,Rosenblum
"This intensely fragrant wine leads with aromas of red currant and violet. The palate offers strawberry, mandarin orange and almond alongside fresh acidity and delicate tannins. Enjoy soon.",Schiava Gentile,Peter Zemmer
"Hints of smoke and toast mingle enticingly amidst ripe black plum and cherry in this rich, lusciously textured wine. It's bold and a bit brawny on the palate, but reined in elegantly with a cool mineral tone and bright acidity. It finishes long with a ruffle of soft tannins.",Friedelsheimer Pinot St. Laurent,Pflüger
"Viosinho, more often found in the Douro, dominates this ripe and full-bodied wine. Lemon acidity is integrated into the rich yellow fruit flavors to give smoothness and roundness. The intense fruit needs to soften a little, so wait until 2016 to drink.",Branco,Quinta de Chocapalha
"This is a ripe, smooth, gently tannic wine. It is dominated by rich red berry fruits, black plum skins that are balanced by a light layer of wood aging that adds some spice. It is sophisticated, structured and ready to age for a few years. Drink from 2017.",Clavis Aurea Reserva,Quinta do Casal Monteiro
"This is the entry-level wine at Vallado, one of the Douro's top quintas. Full of berry fruits, it also has layers of tannins and acidity, but is rich and soft enough now not to need much aging. Although it could be drunk now, it will be better from 2016.",Vallado,Quinta do Vallado
"Leather, meat and rubber aromas run with dark-berry and charred notes on this barrel-heavy Rioja that's full, round, chewy and bit saucy in feel. Baked, oaky flavors of vanilla, mocha and berry fruits finish with a wave of toasty oak and mocha as well as clove. Drink through 2018.",,Sancho Barón
"An unusual late release to the American market, this wine shows its maturity, but elegantly. It still boasts bright black cherry flavor, but also prominent tones of mushroom, earth and leather. Puckery acidity adds freshness to the finish.",Monzinger Frühlingsplätzchen Trocken,Weingut Weber
"Much of the fruit for this wine came from Alexander Valley and it represents the appellation well, combining the ability to be juicy and approachable with powerful tannins and the potential to age. Cassis, raspberry and black pepper are standout characteristics, and the wine is big, but balanced.",,Ghost Waltz
"The blend here is 60% Syrah, 20% Petite Sirah, and 20% Portuguese varieties. It's a nod to the Spanish influence in Southern Oregon, and it comes together beautfully. Aromatic with cedar wood smoke, its flavors recall black tea, tobacco and smoked paprika. The fruit is ripe and full, but it's the nonfruit complexity that captivates. The balance is just right, and for the price, it's a unique and fascinating wine.",Avanté,J. Scott Cellars
"Delicate and attractive aromas of white spring flower and stone fruit mingle in the glass. The round palate offers nectarine skin, yellow apple, juicy peach and bitter almond alongside soft but refreshing acidity.",Roccolo del Durlo,Le Battistelle
"This tight, taut and crisp wine needs some time to bring out its true fruity character. Behind the texture, ripe green plums and fresh apples are cut with lime juice. The wine is still young and could benefit from a few more months. Drink from late 2015.",Domaine de la Fruitière Gneiss de Bel Abord Sur Lie,Lieubeau
"Fermented in oak barrels, this has aromas that recall white flower, toasted oak, baked pear and dried apricot. The palate offers butterscotch and mature Golden Delicious apple alongside fresh acidity. Toasted hazelnut signals the finish.",Gris,Lis Neris
"Aromas of butter, toast, oak and dried citrus lead the nose. The round, structured palate offers baked Golden Delicious apple, nectarine zest, vanilla and butterscotch. Enjoy soon before the fruit fades.",Jurosa,Lis Neris
"Aromas of pear, pressed white flower, exotic fruit and hints of toasted oak lead the nose. The round palate offers nectarine zest, apricot, dried herb and vanilla alongside soft but refreshing acidity.",Molamatta,Marco Felluga
"A closed, tight and grippy wine, this has a big tannic structure that supports a landscape of cassis, cranberry and ripe plum, along with clove and tobacco. Fuller-bodied in style, it finishes smooth and lean.",Crazy Creek,Katherine Goldschmidt
"A basic, light-bodied red, this has earthy and raspberrylike aromas, a firmly tart and slightly tannic texture and lean fruit flavors like cranberry. Its tangy and appetizing mouthfeel is the best attribute.",,Gravelly Ford
"Initially, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Tempranillo smells vegetal, although the nose settles on saucy tomato and bell pepper. Fairly raw and astringent on the palate, this tastes like pizza in a glass, meaning basil, oregano and tomato flavors are dominant. The finish is mildly green but feels right.",Old Vines,Casa L'Angel
"Cloudy and reddish-brown, this is a funky, spritzy wine with a taste of red cherry that falls somewhat flat on the finish.",,Corkscrew
"This is a soft, gentle and ripe Chardonnay by Laurent Perrachon, current winemaker from a Beaujolais family making wine since 1877. Lemon acidity is submerged by the warm apricot and white peach flavors. It is ready to drink.",,Domaine des Mouilles
"With its bright pink color and fruity acidity, this is a candy-flavored, crisp wine. It is as bright in its flavors as it is in its color. It is light and ready to drink.",,Domaine Dupeuble Père et Fils
"This textured, mineral Chardonnay has fresh apple and strong citrus flavors. It is lively, crisp and ready to drink. The producer is a member of Terroirs Originels of Beaujolais and Burgundy's Mâcon.",,Domaine Emmanuel Fellot
"This young, fruity wine is soft and fresh with acidity. It is light, rounded and, with its red-cherry flavors right to the fore, ready to drink. Pierre Ferraud created the wine in 1986 to show that a simple red Beaujolais is not just nouveau.",Cuvée des Montagnards,Ferraud et Fils
"Light and fruity, this is full of strawberries. The wine has a fresh character with a light touch of pepper and spice. It's attractive, bright and ready to drink.",Rosé de Soirée,Château de Pizay
"This is a broad, earthy wine showing black fruits and a rich aftertaste. It has spice, juicy acidity and tannins in the background. The fruit is verging on overripe, giving a jammy aftertaste.",Alves Vieira,Espaço Rural
"This is a fruity wine showing a touch of wood aging alongside juicy red fruit flavors. A blend of Touriga Nacional, Syrah and Alicante Bouschet, this wine has a bright youthful color and fresh acidity at the end. Drink now.",Selection Tinto,Quinta da Lapa
This wine offers appealing aromatics of caramel apple before delving into viscous territory on the palate. Flavors fall somewhat flat and the finish is muddled.,,Cairdean Estate
"The Blanc de Noir name would suggest it's a sparkling wine; it is not. The label also reads Estate White Wine. It is not. Rather, it is a rosé of Pinot Noir, lightly orange in color. Flavors recall a Pop Tart sort of pastry, simple and slightly sweet.",Blanc de Noir,Cardwell Hill
"Medicinality, animal notes and rubbery scents interfere with this magenta-colored Monastrell's berry aromas. Scratchy and somewhat abrasive on the palate, with high acidity, this tastes of herbal plum and medicinal raspberry, with a gripping finish.",,Casa Castillo
"Blackberry and ripe black currant flavors are interspersed with acidity and a juicy texture. The wine has a dry, tannic core, with flavors of old wood that spoils the general fruitiness of the wine. Drink now.",,Casal da Coelheira
"This wine is all crisp cherries and lively acidity. Only the lightest edge of tannin gives the wine some structure, followed by more fruit all the way. Drink now.",,Château de Pizay
"This is a soft wine, light and fresh. It has a citrus character, lemon squeezed over apples that give crispness. Some minerality to the texture adds interest and puts the wine in the food-friendly category. Drink now.",,Château de Pizay
"With intense banana aromas, this is a tight wine with high acidity. It has crisp red-currant fruits that are not quite ripe. Tangy and shot through with banana flavors, the wine will be better from 2016.",Domaine des Darroux,Georges Duboeuf
"Just-squeezed lime aromas mesh with riper green and yellow apples and wet stone on the nose of this simple yet quaffable boxed wine. The flavors lack energy, but show familiar apple and lime characteristics.",,Jewelry Box
"Tight wild berry and cherry aromas come with a soapy accent. This is blocky and fiercely tannic, with muscular, grapy flavors that hint at blackberry before turning hot and bitter on the finish.",ROD,Mascota
"This is a highly unusual blend of Marsellan and Touriga Nacional, and it smells reduced, lemony and like cola and coffee. The mouthfeel is grating, with sandpaper tannins. Odd, herbal, citrusy notes infiltrate core blueberry flavors, while the finish is hard as nails and tannic to an extreme. Only 200 cases made.",El Jefe de la Tribu,Angosto
"This wine is crisp in character, with flavors of caramel and fresh red currants. The fruity tone provides a rich character that lies under the bright final acidity. Drink now.",Vintage,Laurent Gauthier
"Yellow in color, this blend of 80% Macabeo and 20% Sauvignon Blanc smells waxy, with notes of lanolin, peach and papaya. It's sharp and fairly austere on the tongue, with tart, lemony flavors that end pithy, citric and slightly bitter. Drink immediately.",Fuenteseca,Sierra Norte
"This wine is lean, based more on acidity and structure than on fruit. It has hints of red-cherry flavors although they ought to be more developed. It leaves a smoky aftertaste.",,Domaine du Clos du Fief
"Earthy, wet-stone aromas and very tart flavors make for a lean, dry character in this light-bodied wine. The aroma and initial flavor are sharp and smoky and the texture is a bit rough.",,Manifesto!
"This medium-bodied wine is dry and crisp, showing light dried herb, celery and nut aromas. Lively citrus flavors are tinged with earthiness and a tangy texture.",,Loft
"Mint and jammy plum and raspberry aromas are a touch spicy. This is astringent in feel, with dry, oaky red-berry and tomato flavors. An angular, tart finish fades quickly.",Tinto,Palacio del Burgo
"The nose on this appellation blend is kind of sour, with gravel, blackberry and blueberry. The palate is also a bit sour and bitter, with beet juice, juniper and eucalyptus notes.",,Acumen
"Leafy, earthy red-berry aromas are backed by a grabby, drying, tannic palate. Lightly herbal black-fruit flavors are followed by dry, rubbery cherry and plum blandness.",Hacienda Lopez de Haro Tempranillo,Bodega Classica
"Aromas of apple cider are oxidized and grassy. This offers mealy peach flavors that, like the nose, seem oxidized. A bland but not bad finish sends this Viura-Verdejo blend on its way.",Conde Valdemar,Bodegas Valdemar
"The two-acre Clos du Chapitre vineyard is in the center of the Gevrey-Chambertin village. The wine is rich, full-bodied, full of red fruits, dark cherries and a rounded, perfumed character. It's powerful with its firm structure and complex balance between fruit and acidity. Drink from 2017.",Clos du Chapitre Premier Cru,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"Everything about this Tempranillo-led blend rings true. It's full and flush on the nose, with clean berry and snappy tomato and spice notes. The mouthfeel is wiry and bold, with darts of acidity. Flavors span the red-berry spectrum, while the finish condenses in juicy, classy fashion. Drink through 2019.",B Crux,O. Fournier
"This is a Blanc de Noirs, white sparkling wine made from red grapes, in this case Pinot Noir. That gives both richness and a tense acidity to a ripe, fully fruity wine. Spiced pear flavors partner with vanilla and youthful acidity. It could bottle-age to mid-2015 to bring out its best.",Brut,Bailly-Lapierre
"Ripe, rich yellow peaches and nectarines abound on this lush, fruity, yet elegantly structured, Riesling. While medium-sweet with a deliciously sunny, almost tropical, disposition, it's kept in check by a jolt of lemon acidity, along with delicate mineral tones on the finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Spätlese,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Dried oregano and sage notes lend a dusty, savory tone to the nose of this racy, light-bodied kabinett. The palate, by contrast, surprises with layers of lush, ripe tropical fruit cut with a razor's edge of acidity and lime zest. Finishes snappy and bright.",Herrenberg Kabinett,Maximin Grünhäuser
"Honey-kissed peaches waft from this ripe, rich off-dry Riesling full of juicy, luscious stone fruit and citrus. It's quaffable and thirst quenching, yet refreshingly brisk with a lingering shower of lemon-lime acidity.",Erdener Treppchen Feinherb,Peter Nicolay
"Bold berry, leather and rubbery aromas show a minerally side. This is a big Malbec-driven blend with nice layering and structure. The flavor profile features reduced, roasted black-fruit flavors along with hints of herbs and leaf. The finish is generally smooth and long, with a pinch of heat. Drink through 2017.",Corte C,Vistalba
"A heady bouquet of orange blossoms opens this lithe, vivaciously sparkling Riesling. Delicately moussed, it's elegant and spry on the palate with a shock of lemon-lime acidity that highlights luscious flavors of peach, apricot, honey and blossom. Lingers long on the finish with a delicate crushed-stone minerality.",Sekt Brut,Hansen-Lauer
"Pointed, toasty aromas of black fruits and graphite are lemony, woody and not bashful. A giant palate with rock-hard, piercing tannins is drying but generous. Flavors of wild berries, earth and oak finish toasty and tannic, with lasting acidity. Drink through 2023.",Ucedo,Gancedo
"Made by Ross Cobb and Katy Wilson, a rockstar winemaking team, this Pinot is earthy and spicy, a light, softly textured example of the complexity and nuance possible out of the cooler sites of the Sonoma Coast. Dark in color and savory it's made in small quantities, but do try and seek, then let it develop in the glass over time.",Rice-Spivak Vineyard,CC Pachyderm
"This is a soft and intense Pinot Noir from three different appellations that's affordable and approachable. It's well-made, with earth, candied citrus and Bing cherry notes intermixed with hints of anise and subtle oak.",Overlook,Landmark
"Fresh and crisp, this is bright with acidity as well as warmer fruitiness. It brings out the dry Laurent-Perrier style, balanced by soft creamed apples and fragrant acidity. Light and fruity at the end, it is ready to drink.",LP Brut,Laurent-Perrier
"Pinot Blanc is both under-produced and under-valued, yet delivers exceptional flavor and a distinctive profile, especially in the better vintages, such as 2013. Generous fruit flavors of apple and Asian pear dominate, buoyed with a refreshing amount of natural acidity. Delicious now, and should age well through 2017.",,J. Scott Cellars
"This dark-colored rosé comes from a single vineyard in the village of Dizy. It is certainly dry as its Extra Brut description indicates, but it offers so much ripe red fruitiness that it is also rich and concentrated. There is bright acidity at the end. Drink now.",Dizy Terres Rouges Extra Brut Rosé,Jacquesson et Fils
"A ripe and creamy wine that has also managed to retain a strongly mineral character. It's a rich wine from the heart of Champagne's Côte des Blancs Chardonnay vineyards. Apples, spice and tight lime and lemon flavors give a crisp aftertaste. It is ready to drink.",Millénaire Blanc de Blancs Grand Cru Brut,Jean Milan
"Made with 100% Chardonnay, this creamy wine delivers golden apple, Bartlett pear, bread crust and pastry cream sensations. Vibrant acidity brightens the juicy palate while the fine perlage adds elegance.",Millesimo Brut,Enrico Gatti
"The nose on this Fess Parker study of barrel age is dominated by Christmas trees and eucalyptus, with subtle red fruit in the background. The palate is woody too, with tart cranberry amidst camphor, burnt cedar and spicy forest herbs. A very intriguing bottle.",Older Barrels,Fess Parker
"The Rusack family's entry-level Pinot Noir is a great taste of Santa Barbara County, with scents of red fruit, dark earth and cinnamon. The flavors are rich with spice and fruit, like a cherry compote spread on thin slices of warm toast.",,Rusack
"A complex wine that takes time to unveil itself, this offers muted dark cherry and exotic cardamom spice, light and layered through the midpalate before revealing a taste of toasty oak on the finish.",Lee Vineyard,Saintsbury
"This dry, balanced aged tawny is both fruity and showing good aging characters. Red fruits are cut with acidity and shaped by the old wood and spice flavors. It has a delicious, ripe aftertaste.",10-Years-Old Tawny,Quinta do Noval
"Roberts Road is one of the Sangiacomo family's coolest-climate sites, and it offers light, clear color and deliciously floral notes of violet and rose on the nose. In taste it is earthy and full of dark plum and black cherry, the backbone deeper and darker in mushroom and fresh dirt.",Sangiacomo Vineyards Roberts Road,Ram's Gate
"Sourced from 35-year-old vines, this offers both elegance and structure in a fairly light, nicely composed wine with interesting details. Its berry fruit has a vein of iron ore, and continues with some deft barrel flavors of nougat and toast.",Pataccoli Family Vineyard,Redhawk
"Aromas of tilled earth, blackberry, cedar and raisin jump from the glass. The dense palate delivers mocha, vanilla, mature plum, bitter prune and black pepper supported by velvety tannins. The warmth of alcohol shows on the finish. Masciarelli Wine Co, Vinity Wine.",Acinatico,Stefano Accordini
"Round, savory aromas of orange-cranberry with a sprig of sagebrush lead the nose on this single-vineyard look at the western end of the Sta. Rita Hills. Spicy notes of chai and burnt caramel lead the flavor profile, which is expansive with cooked fruit on the midpalate.",Cargasacchi Vineyard,Pali
"The style of Piper-Heidsieck's nonvintage Champagne is getting more and more refined. It is drier than in the past while also full of ripe white fruits. There is a tight structure, a hint of toast from bottle age and fresh acidity at the end. Ready to drink.",Brut,Piper-Heidsieck
"Richer than many Champagnes from 2007 that focus on delicacy, this ripe, full-bodied wine has a dominance (75%) of fruity, textured Pinot Noir. It features berry fruits, fresh pears and quince, along with a great clean line of acidity. Drink now and until 2018.",Millésime Brut,Mailly Grand Cru
"This ivery complete aged tawny has all the right nuts and fruit characters that show a Port that still looks back to its fruity origins. The style is ripe, full and sweet, a mellow wine that only hints at the spirit behind it.",10-Year-Old Tawny,Taylor Fladgate
"Made from 90% Chardonnay, the remainder Pinot Gris, this light-golden sparkler is well-composed, with a maturity on the palate leaning towards flavors of almond and anise. Floral and creamy, it has buoyant acidity that gives an impressive lift.",Blanc de Blancs,Mumm Napa
"Concentrated, potent aromas of earthy blackberry and cassis bring notes of briar patch, prune and exotic spices. The palate is full and oaky but fresh, with flavors of berry, cassis, herb and wood grain. A heavy finish with overt oak and related spice is modern in style. Drink through 2017.",,Abad Dom Bueno
"Sourced from estate vines planted in 1972, this is historic, yet not quite as rich in the details that some newer Pinot clones might provide. Cranberry and raspberry fruit hit the palate in a tangy twirl, with a kiss of oak from 25% new French barrels. It's well-balanced and fresh, with a chance to improve considerably with a few more years of bottle age; try after 2017.",Quarter Mile Lane Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Leathery and mouth-coating in chocolate, red meat and black cherry, this earthy, herbal wine comes from the highest-elevation vineyard in Sonoma County. Tannic and bold, it should soften with air and time, holding on to enough acidity to keep it balanced.",Upper Ridge Vineyard,Imagery
"Coming from a who's who of Red Mountain vineyards, the inaugural release of this brand from Duckhorn Vineyards offers generous notes of dark coffee, espresso bean, dark cherries, sage and vanilla, with a pleasing interplay between fruit and barrel (64% new French). The plum and coffee flavors are restrained in style, with well-integrated tannins.",,Canvasback
"A Pinot unusual for its small percentages of Alicante and Petite Sirah, this wine is tightly wound and intense, but shows promise in its earthy waves of strawberry and silky, structured acidity. Let it lie through 2018_2020.",,Castello di Amorosa
"Earthy yeastiness combined with soft lemon freshness creates a very savory wine. While the palate has umami-like spice, it also has a linear lick of clean lemon acid. The two work in contrast and will show their best with a mixed cheese platter.",Ortolan Cuvée Prestive,Dürnberg
"This approachable Cab is from both estate and sourced fruit, all Cabernet Sauvignon. It opens with a waft of tropical coconut before delving classically into smooth black cherry, cranberry and licorice, the tannins still monstrous and the oak packing a punch.",,Janzen
This wine offers an aged quality to its accompanying freshness. A taste of honey and dried apple surround soft layers of citrus and a toasted oak finish.,Oro de Plata,Keller Estate
"Named for a small family property in the south of France, this wine is all about small production and small lots. Fruit is sourced from the grand Klopp Thorn Ridge Ranch. Slightly cloudy, the wine is powerful and concentrated in oak at first, followed by ripe, bright approachable red fruit. Give it through 2020 to get even better.",,La Pitchoune
"There is a very fleshy fruit smell on this wine from west of Paso Robles, with Meyer lemon and barely ripe melon aromas. The palate is nicely wide and ripe, with flavors of lemon-sprayed nectarines but also with elements of honey butter and honeysuckle that are reminiscent of oak.",Derbyshire Vineyard,Derby
"This more structured, concentrated version of Nero di Troia opens with aromas of allspice, mature black fruit, violet and a whiff of leather. The bold palate delivers ripe black cherry, black pepper, grilled herb, vanilla and a chocolate note alongside big, velvety tannins.",Puer Apuliae,Rivera
Zesty lemon paired with riper tropical notes of pineapple counter the racy acidity of this full-flavored wine. This takes time to open up but the intense palate is worth the wait. So serious it should be had with food.,Kranachberg,Skoff
"This crisp Swiss white grape is rarely seen in the U.S. and that's a shame. Spritzy, racy, fresh as a mountain stream, it possesses impressive minerality under lemony fruit. Bone-dry, low alcohol, and surprisingly dense, it has a pleasing finish with a light almond note.",,St. Hubertus
"A lush fruit bowl of a wine, this brings delicious flavors of melon, peach, apple and pear, along with a buttery finish. There are some pleasing spicy highlights, and a residual smack of butterscotch invites the next sip.",,Tinhorn Creek
"Lurking, low-impact aromas of tropical fruits and honey set up a fairly sophisticated palate with papaya, apple, banana and oaky flavors. There's ample core acidity to this Chardonnay from Chile's south, while honeyed weight and tropical flavors on the finish push it to impressive heights.",Quinel Vineyard,Veranda
"Made with Negroamaro and Malvasia Nera, this bold wine opens with aromas of graphite, black-skinned fruit, cracked pepper and espresso. The concentrated palate doles out spicy plum cake, blueberry jam, blackberry, vanilla and nutmeg. Brawny and high-toned, it boasts firm tannins and surprising freshness.",Donna Lisa Riserva,Leone de Castris
"This is a big wine in all senses. Powerful and dense fruits form the basis of solid tannins that are still masking the full-bodied, rich berry fruits. It is still developing and needing aging. Drink from 2018.",,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"Here's a bright, savory Nebbiolo that opens with inviting aromas of perfumed berry, rose petal, savory herb and anisette. The sleek palate offers crunchy red cherry, white pepper, cinnamon and a mineral note alongside polished tannins and edgy acidity. Drink through 2018.",Podere dei Ginepri,Nervi
"Hints of waxy white florals and lemon zest persist from nose to finish on this intensely revitalizing semidry Riesling. Tart stone-fruit flavors penetrate the palate, highlighted by a stream of spine-tingling acidity.",Semi-Dry,Anthony Road
"Despite the low alcohol, this pure Carmenère is fully ripened, with a soft, seductive nose boasting highlights of baking spices and pipe tobacco. Wild blackberries, tart acids and streaks of earth and stem comprise the core flavors, with a finishing note of dark chocolate.",,Black Hills
"This dark-tinted Cab shows aromas of blackberry, spice and olive along with some grit and herbal character. The palate is jammy but propped up by juicy acidity. Herbal-leaning flavors of blackberry, black plum and cocoa finish fresh and snappy. Drink through 2017.",_eque,Viña Casas Patronales
"Prices have soared for this bottling, which used to be an excellent value within the Penfolds stable. The quality is still excellent, with this 2010 offering plenty of weight and power. Vanilla and cedar notes frame chunky, extracted dark-fruit notes that pick up hints of mocha on the finish. Drink 2016_2025, possibly beyond.",Bin 407,Penfolds
"On the big and bold side, this has abundant fruit flavors surrounded by equally abundant lip-smacking tannins, great acidity and a long finish. Not very oaky, it has a vibrancy and fruit focus that is mouthwatering and compelling. It's tasty now, but will also improve through 2017.",Made With Organic Grapes,Bonterra
"This full-bodied but agile wine combines smoky, toasty, peppery aromas with tasty black currant and dark chocolate flavors that remain on the austere side, but promise good development through at least 2018. The texture is tannic, but the mouthfeel is not harsh, conveying plenty of power gently contained.",Christian's Reserve,Six Sigma Ranch
"Plummy and meaty, this Cabernet is a bold, mouthfilling trip from start to finish. It's certainly not shy, boasting crisp acids and firm tannins to support the big fruit flavors. Drink now with a rare steak, or hold up to 10 years.",Jester,Mitolo
"Bold and full bodied, this offers aromas of steeped plum, prune, clove and blue flower. The concentrated, savory palate doles out mature blackberry, raisin, clove and licorice. Big but velvety tannins and just enough freshness give this a surprisingly drinkable quality that belies its heft.",Centosassi,Amastuola
"The aromas on this wine by Bryan Babcock find an intriguing balance between ripe nectarine flesh and tart stonefruit skins. It's a bit more lush in style than other Pinot Gris of the vintage, quite broad on the palate, with apple-pear flavors, lingering lemon skin bitterness and an acidity that soaks into the tongue.",Naughty Little Hillsides Estate,Babcock
"The Clos wine from Jean-Luc Baldès reveals juicy black fruits with plenty of young acidity. A firmly structured character powers through the fruits and gives density under the smoother surface. The wine is obviously still young, reveling in its youthful fruits. Drink from 2016.",Clos Triguedina,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Fermented only once in bottle, this wine is made in a traditional way used before Champagne was created. It's full in the mouth, nutty and rounded. It has ripe white fruits, greengages and a mineral texture. Ready to drink, it is rich and full-bodied.",L'Ancestrale,Domaine Vincent Carême
"With the palest pink color, this crisp wine is made from Pinot Noir and Chardonnay. It's fruity, layered with red currants and cherries that are tightly textured. The aftertaste, dry and fresh with a hint of spice suggests the wine could do with some more bottle aging.",Prestige Premier Cru Brut Rosé,Duval-Leroy
"This carries true-to-variety flavors of peppery blackberry fruit, here cloaked in coffee and toast from aging in 40% new French and American oak barrels. The lemony acids contribute to the overall balance and ageworthy structure.",Coyote Bowl Series,Church & State
"This is complex, delicious, bold and tannic, bringing the big structure that is expected without being heavy handed. It offers concentrated blackberry and fig aromas, richly jammy flavors that stay dry and a tannic but not tough texture.",Conservancy,Concannon
"Stalky raspberry aromas, a zesty palate and salty red-plum flavors are the bulk of this lightweight specimen. Overall it's fresh and snappy, a bit sour and herbal, and not all that substantive.",Albamar Estate Bottled,William Cole
"Plum and cherry aromas are generic in nature. This feels jammy and candied, while heavy berry fruit and oak flavors combine to keep things basic and muddled.",La Joya Gran Reserva,Viña Bisquertt
"A deep-purple look and aromas of cherry cough drop and berry jam announce a fruity wine with hard, drilling tannins. Seemingly overextracted, this is a packed, medicinal tasting red with toast and fire on the finish.",Grand Reserve,Château Los Boldos
"This coastal Syrah smells reduced and funky, with notes of juniper, blueberry and green herbs. A jammy, saturated palate is more flat and dull than ideal, while flavors of stewed, herbal blue fruits and carob finish minty and green.",,Amayna
"This is a heavy, syrupy Pinot, with caramelized, candied raspberry, cherry and spice flavors.",Estate,Scott Family
"Chunky and bland on the nose, this is honeyed and sticky in the mouth. Flavors of unctuous tropical fruits finish like candy corn. There's not much spine to this overly ripe Chardonnay.",Antiguas Reservas,Cousiño-Macul
"With refreshingly tart blackberry fruit, this Zweigelt has some concentration and displays a good balance between light body, refreshing acidity and clean, lively fruit notes. A great party wine.",Rubin Carnuntum,Netzl
"Pale in color, with a soft, silky body and candied strawberry and vanilla flavors, this blend straddles the line between a red wine and a rosé. You can treat it either way, at room temperature or chilled.",Tess,Peju
"A simple wine full of red cherry flavors on the nose and palate, with an enticing white pepper edge that makes it very refreshing. This could be chilled and is an ideal, lighter-style red for informal entertainment.",Vom Donaulöss,Fritsch
"Aromatically inviting, with notes of fresh apple, honeydew and white blossoms, this Chardonnay is a bit confected on the palate from candied, overripe flavors of apples and quince. It's a shade off-dry in style with soft, lemony acidity.",,Nearly Naked
"The blend is Zinfandel, Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petite Sirah. The wine is soft and luscious, with cherry candy and vanilla flavors.",Essential,Bogle
"This opens with a blast of bell pepper and leafy berry aromas. The palate is juicy but scratchy, while flavors of plum, raspberry and herbs finish tart, with no evolution.",Select Terroir,Santa Ema
"Chardonnay from a hot valley in a hot vintage equals something like this. Orange peel and oak aromas, a pulpy palate and warm flavors of orange and grapefruit.",Crucero Reserva,Siegel
"Fermented in 100% stainless steel, this priced-to-sell Syrah has some red fruit and violet character. On the finish it tastes slightly burnt.",,McManis
"Neutral aromas of dusty apple and peach are o.k. at best. Like most 2012 white wines from Chile, this seems heat-affected; the body is plump and heavy, while melon and citrus flavors finish soft and mealy.",Reserva Sauvignon Blanc-Carmenère,Oveja Negra
"This is a simple red wine with cherry notes and lively acidity striking a balance between primary freshness and appetizing acidity. Great for any occasion where an approachable red wines needs to complement a range of cuisine styles. The body is soft, easy and calls for early drinking.",Red Soil,Fritsch
"There's a prickly, acidic bite to this dry Cab Franc that gives it a sour finish, despite some solid cherry and oak flavors. Drink up.",Estate,Hagafen
"Gentle red-cherry fruit, soft and pliable tannins and fresh acidity combine to make this a simple and cheerful light red for drinking now.",,Höpler
"An aromatic offering with notes of tropical fruit, flowers, petroleum jelly and hazelnut. At 30 g/L residual sugar, it's sweet but could use a bit more acidic lift.",,B. Lovely
"Herbal aromas, a chunky palate and herbal cherry and plum flavors finish earthy and with a raisiny element. This is sort of amorphous and mealy on the palate.",Reserva Espiritu de los Andes,Santa Alicia
"While rather closed on the nose, this fresh, straightforward red shows ripe, red cherry on the palate with a generous, rounded mouthfeel and soft tannins. Uncomplicated and for immediate drinking.",,Preisinger
"This is a rustic Pinot Noir, soft and candied. It has raspberry, red plum and oak flavors. Finishes with a bit of heat from alcohol.",,Educated Guess
"Made from organically farmed grapes, this 50/50 blend of Montepulciano and Sangiovese opens with funky farmyard aromas and notes of leafy underbrush. The palate oozes dense, overripe black berry and prune. The heavy, extracted palate finishes on a sweet note, but lacks balance and freshness.",,Clara Marcelli
This sparkling wine is intense with startling acidity and very crisp citrus palate. Maybe a few months in bottle will soften it.,Bonheur Festif Brut,Rieflé
"Simple and soft, this Chard is a juicy, forward blend of pineapple, mango and peach flavors.",,Acronym
"This Pinot is marked with candied raspberry and cherry flavors, along with oaky vanilla and toast notes. It finishes rather soft.",Reserve,Castle Rock
"Soft, simple and overripe, this non-vintage Rhône-style blend has flavors of candied raspberries, prunes and oak. There's some bitterness that accentuates the tannins on the finish.",Valley Cuvée,Kobler
"Here's a soft, simple Pinot, with one-dimensional raspberry, cherry and oak flavors. It has a jammy, syrupy finish.",Garey Vineyard Signature Selection,Bianchi
Expansive cherry fruit make for a broad palate. A generous body falls in line with fresh acidity and ripeness to result in an easy-drinking party wine.,,Zantho
"A bitter wine with tart apple and pear flavors, this has a hard edge. Drink now.",,Wunsch & Mann
"This is totally fruit-driven wine. With very fresh citrus acidity, it is as crisp as possible while not losing sight of the potential of its white fruits. There is a delicious steely edge as well as great acidity at the end. The wine is a blend from vineyards planted with 60% Sauvignon blanc, 30% Sémillon and 10% Muscadelle. The estate has been in the Le Grix de la Salle family for 100 years.",,Chateau le Grand Verdus
"Here's an easygoing blend of Sangiovese, 18% Merlot and 2% Malvasia Nera that opens with aromas of wild berry, violet and a whiff of baking spice. The fresh palate offers crushed wild cherry, raspberry, white pepper and a sprinkle of cinnamon alongside sleek tannins.",I Bastioni,Collazzi
"Sweet oak aromas, ripe fruit flavors and a firm texture make a complete and enjoyable package in this full-bodied wine. It has a toasted oak flavor, tasty plum and cinnamon nuances, good acidity and supportive tannins.",Eagle Peak,Fetzer
"A blend of Syrah (40%), Merlot (30%), Malbec (16) and Cabernet Sauvignon, this is dark in color, with aromas of plum, chocolate, orange peel and peppery spices. Flavors are soft and full, bringing appeal at a seldom-seen in this appellation.",Foundry,Foundry Vineyards
"Concentrated, muscular aromas of leathery blackberry set up a full, grinding, powerful palate with dark, earthy flavors of toast, blackberry and black plum. A peppery, spicy finish simmers with mild heat and burn.",Made With Organic Grapes,Venta Morales
"This Waiheke Island-based winery sources its Sauvignon Blanc from Marlborough. The result is a rather leafy, slightly vegetal wine that's reminiscent of tomato stalk and celery leaf, yet remains refreshing and pleasant, with a strong citrus core. Try it with ceviche or simple broiled sole.",,Kennedy Point
"Yeasty, briny scents define the nose on this smooth, round-bodied Cava. Flavors of apple, lime, tarragon and lemongrass veer towards green, while the finish is slightly oxidized, which results in a bready aftertaste and a soft ending texture.",MIM Natura Brut Reserva,Marqués de Gelida
"Pretty aromas of violet, iris, pressed powder and perfumed berry mingle in the glass. The ripe, round palate offers juicy black cherry, ripe raspberry, nutmeg and licorice alongside dusty tannins and fresh acidity. Drink through 2016.",Mauro,Agricola Tamburini
"Made with 90% Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo, this opens with pretty aromas of crushed berry, violet and a whiff of menthol. The juicy palate offers black cherry, white pepper and licorice alongside firm but fine-grained tannins.",,Donatella Cinelli Colombini
"This pure Chardonnay has a tight, nervy mineral texture that gives great freshness as well as a crisp apple skin and lemon zest character. It is fruity, full of lively acidity that goes with the perfumed, refreshing aftertaste.",Brut Blanc de Blancs,Goutorbe-Bouillot
"An appealing pale salmon color, this blend of 50% Cinsault, 28% Grenache and 22% Syrah displays aromas of strawberry, cherry Jolly Rancher and melon. Reflective of the warmth of the vintage, it's fruitier than recent vintages but it's still hard to put down.",Olsen Vineyard,Gramercy
"A touch of smoke precedes notes of ripe, black cherries and baked plums whose fruit becomes even fleshier on the rounded, fruit-forward and rather juicy palate of this blend. Tannins are very soft. Fresh acidity keeps the rounded fruit in check. Drink soon.",Pannonica,Höpler
"A lovely, lemon-scented freshness, almost of lemon balm, leads on the nose. The palate is similarly citrus-focused but also holds notes of savory yeast. A simple, superrefreshing wine.",Von den Terrassen,Josef Ehmoser
"Raspberry and vanilla introduce this wine, made from a selection of vines 21 to 130 years old, with some planted in 1882. Lusty and lush layers of cinnamon and cola accent the fruit and provide complexity, the tannins resolved and thick.",Reserve Century Vines,Kunde
"Red cherries, ripe strawberries and recently tanned leather aromas greet the nose on this wine. It's quite lively and spicy once sipped, with more strawberry fruit as well as a plum skin tartness and pencil lead tannins.",Di Domenico,Le Vigne
"A very neutral but clean nose is followed by a slender palate with soft tones of pear and white plum. A subtle, quiet wine that will serve well in situations where a versatile crowd-pleaser is needed. This one has purity and freshness.",Klosterkeller Siegendorf,Lenz Moser
"This soft, light-bodied wine is on the savory side, a taste of cranberry and rhubarb at its core. It dances in cooler-climate aspects of forest floor and herb, with an unexpected aroma of menthol sneaking into the mix.",Hurst Vineyard,Les Voleurs
"There's a generosity of tannin and richness to this wine, which offers a depth of high-toned cranberry and strawberry-rhubarb. Still a baby, it needs to open in the glass or decanter to reveal its more shyly etched elements of forest floor and black tea.",,Malk
"Aromas of dark berry, cedar and allspice take shape in the glass. The straightforward, medium-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, licorice and espresso alongside round, ripe tannins. Drink through 2017.",Terrarossa,Melini
"Lovely, fresh and enticing green Conference pear flavors abound on nose and palate where they are met with a tangy grapefruit zestiness. This is ultralight and very refreshing. Drink soon.",Klassik,Nastl
"A strong marking of cedar, pencil and green tobacco exude aromatically and emphatically before soft, silky waves of integrated oak and tannin play on the palate. Elegant, this wine finishes in a hurry.",,Patel
"Toast, coffee, dark-skinned fruit and vanilla aromas take shape in the glass. The firm palate delivers crushed plum, ripe black cherry, oak-driven spice and espresso. It's already accessible with soft acidity and smooth tannins so enjoy soon.",Collezione Oro Riserva,Piccini
"Aromas of charred soil, dark spice and a whiff of barnyard lead the nose. The palate offers fleshy black cherry, baked plum, mocha and a confectionary note alongside dusty tannins. It's a bit rustic and shy on fresh acidity, so drink soon.",Vigna Vecchia Riserva,Podere il Pozzo
"Baked plum, truffle and mocha aromas emerge on this blend of 85% Sangiovese and 15% Merlot. The warm, chewy palate offers ripe black cherry, coffee, vanilla and anise alongside brooding tannins. Drink through 2018.",Curva del Vescovo,Poggio Borgoni
"There is rich blackberry juice enhanced by campfire ash and a touch of roasted game on the fruity nose of this wine. Black cherries power the palate, but in a restrained fashion, with graphite, black loam and pencil shavings adding to the mix.",,Pugilist
"On the one hand, this wine offers juicy, varietally characteristic layers of juicy plum and red cherry. Seamless tannins provide more pleasure, with a compelling end note of candied cherry and cranberry.",Otton Vineyards,Ramspur
"A distinctly musky note mingles amidst pretty orange blossom and grapefruit on this dainty, but surprisingly complex Sauvignon Blanc. Mouthwatering acidity yields a brisk but clean finish.",,Raphael
"Pungent clove and cinnamon appear upon entry to this medium-bodied wine, which also offers smooth, rounded tannins and subtle oak. Plum, raspberry and tobacco all make an appearance, finished off by a healthy dose of black pepper.",,Robert Mondavi
"Almost entirely Cabernet Sauvignon, with 9% Petit Verdot, this wine spent two years in barrel. There's a lightness of being to the overall texture and flavor, a high-toned sensibility that remains lively and fresh on the palate. Cranberry, black cherry, clove and cigar have had time to intermingle and accent the velvety tannins.",,Saddleback
"Just a hint of cinnamon hovers over the scent of ripe blueberry. On the palate, Zweigelt's pepperiness pervades the juiciness of the fruit. This is simple, light-bodied, with barely any tannins, but full-fruited and fun. Drink soon.",Hedwighof,Sepp Moser
"Leathery plum and berry aromas come with a touch of char. This blend of Shiraz and Tempranillo feels round and solid. Familiar flavors of berry fruits and cherry are a bit spicy, while the finish tastes of black fruits and feels right.",El Miracle 120,Vicente Gandia
"Apple and peach aromas are basic but clean and fresh. So is the palate on this Chardonnay-Sauvignon Blanc blend. Flavors of nectarine and apple don't stray far from basic, while green apple and citrus flavors are propped up on the finish by racy acidity.",El Miracle 120,Vicente Gandia
"Aromas of freshly cut pear, apple and almond butter mix with assorted spices. The flavors are elegant in style, pulling up toward the finish. It provides easy drinking enjoyment.",,Waterbrook
"Made at a somewhat approachable price point, this blend of coastal vineyard sites holds back on fruit and texture. It provides a tightly closed and still youthful touch of savory herb and tea, finishing lean.",,Zepaltas
"Aromas of underbrush, toasted oak, coffee and a whiff of roasted herb emerge on this. The brawny palate displays dried black cherry, hazelnut, anise and vanilla alongside astringent tannins that leave a tongue-drying finish. A green note of powdered sage marks the close.",,Albatreti
"Fresh, fruity cranberry and raspberry flavors penetrate through this vivaciously brisk blend of Cabernet Franc and Lemberger. It's fairly straightforward in style, but hints of herb and bramble lend a savory complexity to the midpalate. The finish is moderately long, marked by a spray of fine tannins.",Cabernet Franc-Lemberger,Anthony Road
"Smoky leather, concentrated red-cherry fruit and crushed-brick aromas show on the nose of this bottling. More cherries and cranberries appear on the palate, where rocky flavors and dark spices keep the sip lively against a fairly rigid structure, five years in.",,August Ridge
"Strawberry jam, espresso, toast, menthol and dark spice lead the nose. The straightforward, rather lean palate offers dried cherry, star anise and a hint of tobacco alongside firm, fine-grained tannins that grip the finish.",,Barone Ricasoli
"Pollen and dusty minerals lend an earthy savoriness to lemon, saffron and honeysuckle in this off-dry Riesling. The palate is bright and brisk, finishing on a delicately honeyed note. Drink now through 2019.",Tuller Vineyard,Bellangelo
"This Merlot has a nose of violets, cherry cola and talc powder. In the mouth, it tastes like red berries, blackberries and finishes with touch of milk chocolate.",Via Etulia Reserve,Bostavan
"Dusty, chalky tannin and earth provide character to this blend of 48% Cabernet Sauvignon and 52% Sangiovese that is smoothly tannic. Coffee and cocoa provide a savory aside to the fruitiness of dried cherry and cranberry.",Montona Super Tuscan Reserve,Andretti
"Mild aromas of dried stone fruit and maple syrup come together on this full-bodied dessert wine. The sweet, one-dimensional palate delivers dried apricot, acacia honey and a hint of toasted walnut.",San Lorenzo a Bibbiano,Bibbiano
"Aromas of scorched earth, game and a whiff of farmyard lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, leather, anise and sage alongside bracing but fleeting tannins. It finishes abruptly, leaving a rather astringent close.",Molino della Suga,Bonacchi
"Blue-flower and red-berry aromas lead the way along with a whiff of eucalyptus. The firm palate offers hints of star anise, espresso and a green note of powdered sage that back up unripe red cherry. It closes on a coffee note.",Riserva,Casa Sola
"Minty, earthy aromas suggest Christmas spice and fruit cake. This is saturated but a bit soupy and drying. Flavors of prune, plum, raisin and spices are a touch stewed, while this finishes ripe but short on freshness.",Crianza,Conde Bel
"Forest floor, iris, menthol, mature blackberry and leather aromas unfold on this firmly structured red. On the palate, ground pepper, licorice and a green note of powdered sage accent a core of mature black cherry. An assertive tannic backbone provides support but leaves a somewhat gritty, astringent finish.",,La Ciarliana
"Dense and hearty, this has subtle aromas of stewed prune, espresso and French oak. The brawny palate offers blackberry extract, licorice, ground pepper and the heat of evident alcohol alongside tightly packed, close-grained tannins that leave an astringent finish. Give the tannins another year or two to unfurl then drink up before the remaining fruit dries up.",Riserva,Le Bèrne
"What a great wine for the price. This doesn't have too much tannin, but instead features plenty of tempting black cherry and olive flavors. It's a delicious, dry wine in a classic style.",,Loft
"Dark berry, truffle, toast and kitchen spice aromas meld in the glass. On the palate, notes of roasted coffee bean, powdered sage and ground pepper accent a core of dried black cherry while assertive tannins provide the framework. It ends on an astringent note.",Vaggiolata,Monterotondo
"A blend of 80% Sangiovese and 20% Merlot, this robust wine shows the heat of the vintage. It opens with aromas that recall scorched earth, espresso, French oak, dark spice and a balsamic note while the warm palate offers dried black cherry, raisin, licorice and menthol framed in bracing tannins. The finish is dominated by evident alcohol that throws it somewhat off-balance.",Don Tommaso Gran Selezione,Principe Corsini
"This wine has aromas of freshly mowed grass, peaches and white flowers. It is slightly sweet with flavors of canned peach, white peach juice and apricot nectar.",,Puklavec & Friends
"Aromas of scorched earth, prune and dark cooking spice lead the nose while the mature palate shows raisin, dried berry, leather and a hint of anise. Smooth but fleeting tannins indicate this has seen better days. Drink now.",Riserva,Villa Montignana
This sparkling Riesling smells of canned yellow peaches and apricots. It is effervescent on entry with flavors of white peach nectar and white flowers. There is a slight sweetness in the finish.,Tradition Rizling Brut,Vino Kupljen
"There's a high-tone brightness of cassis and plum in this juicy, estate wine. A fruity character balances well against savory leather and black pepper that ride a thick wave of tannin.",Block 35a Estate Grown,Balverne
"Light cherry red to the eye, this wine made of 100% Karalahna yields little on the nose, offering a soft aroma of cranberry. Flavors of cherry confiture, black currant, cranberry, spearmint and black pepper are set amidst ever-present tannins that linger on the front of the tongue.",,_amliba_
"Scorched soil, black-skinned berry, worn leather and dried herb aromas come together here. The jammy palate is already rather evolved, offering dried black cherry, clove and star anise alongside bracing tannins. Give the tannins a few more years to unclench then drink up to catch the remaining fruit.",Le Bruciate,Canneta
"Produced from old vines grown on the property, this fruity wine is packed full of red berries. It is well balanced between fruitiness and acidity, with just a light touch of tannin to give this ready-to-drink wine its shape.",Vieilles Vignes,Château de Santenay
"This is a fruity wine, full of herbal and apple flavors. The vines are planted on slopes across the Loire from Sancerre, giving minerality as well as juicy acidity. Young and fresh, the wine will benefit from waiting a few months more. Drink from early 2017.",,Clement et Florian Berthier
"Aromas of marmalade, squeezed lime, red apple and apple blossoms hit the nose on this bottling from the Morgan Hill area producer. Ripe with Gala apple and pear flesh, the palate is also cut with lime juice and tangerine skin.",Whisper,Clos La Chance
"Underbrush, sunbaked earth, cured meat, menthol, toast and mature plum aromas unfold in the glass. The ripe palate is mature and offers dried black, cherry, truffle, licorice, espresso and a funky hint of game alongside firm but somewhat fleeting tannins that leave a drying finish.",,Collosorbo
"Scents of woodland berry, rose petal, grilled herb, anisette and a balsamic note emerge on this firmly structured wine. On the robust palate, white pepper, licorice, sage and a hint of toast weave through the black cherry core. You'll also detect the warmth of alcohol on the close. Drink 2018_2028.",Monvigliero,Fratelli Alessandria
"Juicy, sun-kissed grapefruits and apple blossoms explode from this buoyantly fresh, off-dry Kabinett. Invigorating acidity lends backbone and a steely focus that resonates long on the finish. It's beautiful now, but should hold nicely, and perhaps improve, through 2020.",Graacher Himmelreich Kabinett,Friedrich-Wilhelm-Gymnasium
"Dense, rich red fruit belies an elegant wine that finds balance despite the concentration of vanilla and berry. Soft, approachable and integrated tannin and oak let the whole exist as one, instead of separate parts. This shows off the appellation's mountain fruit and rocky minerality.",Latro,Galerie
"Lightly leesy aromas of vanilla cookie are offset by crisp minerally apple and stone-fruit scents. This is pure and lifted by fine acidity, while flavors of apple, pineapple and lemon-lime end fresh, with a distant note of citrus pith. Drink immediately.",Etiqueta Ambar,Granbazán
"From the Lovall Valley section of the Napa Valley quite near Sonoma, this lovely wine is awash in tropical mango, with lilts of pear and vanilla. Creamy, it's made in a fuller-bodied style but never gets ridiculous, instead offering balance and elegance, finishing with a squeeze of grapefruit.",Grieve Family Vineyard,Grieve
"The top wine in the Rocim range is produced from selected Alicante Bouschet grapes. It is huge and powerful, perhaps too much in its concentration, richness and density. Dark and brooding, it is super everything and certainly needs to calm down. Drink from 2019.",Grande Rocim Reserva,Herdade do Rocim
"There's a cantaloupe-like ripeness on the nose of this blend of 37% Grenache Blanc, 33% Viognier and 30% Roussanne, but not overdone, layered with seared white peach, caramelized pear, poached apple and almond aromas. The palate is more restrained and quite grippy, with flavors of green-apple skins, Bosc pear and a touch of honey.",XCV,Jada Vineyard & Winery
"This lush offering opens with appealing aromas of rose petals and fresh strawberries, then glides into a smooth-as-silk midpalate. The berry/cherry fruit is nicely adorned with toasty barrel flavors, and it's as satiny as new sheets. You'll find it hard to keep from gulping this by the glassful.",,La Crema
"A pretty salmon-pink in color, and a lovable quaffer, this wine is dry, crisp and brightly refreshing in succulent waves of grapefruit and tangerine, remarkably light in alcohol but not shy in flavor. Enjoy it on its own or with a range of foods__ts lightness begets versatility.",Rosé of,Lawer
"Aromas of slightly stewed fruit, steeped berry, spice and menthol unfold in the glass. The firm palate delivers juicy cherry, crushed raspberry, licorice, ground pepper and a mint note while bracing tannins and racy acidity provide the backbone. This needs a few more years to calm down and will continue to age well for a decade or more. Drink 2018_2026.",Bergera Pezzole,Le Strette
"Pretty aromas of blue flower, rose, wild berry and graphite lead the way. The firm palate delivers mature black cherry, raspberry, star anise, black pepper and chopped sage alongside bright acidity and tightly knit tannins that need to unwind. Drink 2018_2026.",Coste di Rose,Marchesi di Barolo
"Bittersweet at first, with sizable tannins, this Cab also contains 13.8% Petit Verdot. Red and black berries give it a juicy palate atop dusty, chalky tannins and a richness of leather and clove on the finish.",Emblem Oso Vineyard,Michael Mondavi Family Estate
"Aromas of perfumed berry, mint, baking spice and a whiff of oak emerge on this structured wine. The firm palate offers wild red cherry, crushed raspberry, mint, grilled sage and a touch of oak-driven spice alongside bracing tannins and nervous acidity. Give it time to soften and fully develop. Drink 2019_2031.",Brunate,Oddero
"Aromas and flavors of sandalwood and grenadine layer around this velvety, seductive wine. It offers black tea, truffle and forest floor, the body sinewy and complex. Savory in cinnamon and clove on the finish, it needs more time to open; decant or cellar through 2021.",Estate Cuvée,Small Vines
"A classic northern Rhône valley blend of Syrah with a touch of Viognier, this massive wine is made from grapes grown on granite soil, which leaves its mark in dense minerality and great power. It is a wine for lovers of the big stuff, concentrated and needing to age. Drink from 2018.",Telhas,Terras de Alter
"This is a rich, full-bodied wine that is ready to drink now. It still has a dry core of tannins, although they are overwhelmed by the rich, juicy black fruits and generous texture. It's a concentrated wine, high in alcohol, although that is really balanced by the fresh aftertaste.",Terra d'Alter,Terras de Alter
"Warm vanilla notes are laid across ripe nectarine, apple skin and a twist of lemon rind on this single-vineyard study by the Los Gatos-based winery. Pencil lead kicks off the palate, which then opens into poached apples and lemon oil, laid across a sizzling acidity that lasts long.",Lone Oak Vineyard,Testarossa
"Lemony and light on entry, this tropically kissed, textured white develops body and weight over time, finding a balance and elegance that's hard to ignore. A touch of white peach wraps up the finish.",Starr Ridge Vineyard Estate,Thomas George
"Often herbal and a bit green in nature, Silvaner is a much maligned grape. Yet at Thörle, it seems to blossom into something perfumed and quite fruity, redolent of peaches and fresh pears. Characteristic herb notes are fresh and nuanced, highlighted against brisk citrus and apple flavors and a silken supple mouthfeel.",Saulheimer Probstey Trocken,Thörle
"Engaging aromas of red rose, iris, wild berry, cinnamon and a balsamic note waft out of the glass while juicy cherry, white pepper, anise and chopped mint drive the spicy, polished palate. Firm but refined tannins provide structure. Drink 2017_2021.",Paesi Tuoi,Vite Colte
"Caramelized white peach, salted lemon, pear skin, red apple and the hint of white flowers show on the nose of this wine by these longtime but under-the-radar producers. The palate blends orange skins and grapefruit pith with buttered toast, sea salt and a dill-like herb character.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,Wedell Cellars
"A limited, popular entry in Winderlea's extensive single-vineyard lineup, this suggests cherry kirsch with streaks of coffee and tobacco. The pretty fruit leads into darker notes of tar and espresso. Still young and primary, the Juliard may be among the vintage's most long-lasting wines.",Juliard Vineyard,Winderlea
"This is a very lively wine with a creamy mousse. The wine is towards dry, bringing out great white and citrus fruit flavors with a burst of tangy acidity. It comes from the village of Chouilly in the Côte des Blancs, which gives the wine a tight mineral texture at the end.",Grand Cru Blanc de Blancs Chouilly Brut,A.R. Lenoble_
"A Garrafeira wine is a special selection and this wine, which was aged for 30 months after bottling before being released, shows its quality quickly. Now reaching drinkability, its tannins have softened leaving rich full black currant and fresh acidity along with a more mature leathery character. Drink now and until 2020.",Garrafeira,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Principally Pinot Noir, the blend includes 25% Pinot Meunier and a splash of Chardonnay. It's a light and pretty salmon pink in hue, with hints of honeysuckle and moist earth in the nose. Flavors suggest tart raspberries and Bing cherries, with impressive minerality in the crisp, lingering finish.",Brut Rosé,Argyle
"Restrained aromas of black plum barely set the stage for flavors of dark plum, cherry-vanilla, mint eucalyptus and ground black pepper. Fruit flavors are soft, but the minty notes never overpower brightness and acidity. Tannins are just shy of opulent, and the finish is marked by a note of tart apple crispness.",,Bazelet HaGolan
"Creamy on the nose, this wine shows seared pineapple, apple custard, lemon oil and faint iodine aromas. The flavors are evenly placed between lemon yogurt and salted apples, mixing a bit of tang and ripe fruit with a savory sea salt.",Rosella's Vineyard,Bernardus
"Lush aromatics conjure up dreams of strawberry cream. This is quite pretty, with perfect balance among its components of fruit, acid and tannin, set comfortably in a compact frame.",,Big Table Farm
"Enticing aromas of crushed rose, red berry, wild mint, menthol and a hint of oak come together. The linear, focused palate offers raw red cherry, strawberry, white pepper, licorice and chopped sage accompanied by tightly knit, close-grained tannins and bright acidity. Drink 2019_2026.",Parej,Icardi
"Ripe berry aromas blend nicely with earthy leathery scents. With a full and easy palate, this generous Crianza delivers blackberry and chocolate flavors that veer toward raisin and prune, especially on the finish, which is lightly toasted and dense in feel. Drink through 2019.",Crianza,Matarromera
"This tight, taut and crisp wine needs some time to bring out its true fruity character. Behind the texture, ripe green plums and fresh apples are cut with lime juice. The wine is still young and could benefit from a few more months. Drink from late 2015.",Domaine de la Fruitière Gneiss de Bel Abord Sur Lie,Lieubeau
"Fermented in oak barrels, this has aromas that recall white flower, toasted oak, baked pear and dried apricot. The palate offers butterscotch and mature Golden Delicious apple alongside fresh acidity. Toasted hazelnut signals the finish.",Gris,Lis Neris
"Aromas of butter, toast, oak and dried citrus lead the nose. The round, structured palate offers baked Golden Delicious apple, nectarine zest, vanilla and butterscotch. Enjoy soon before the fruit fades.",Jurosa,Lis Neris
"Much of the fruit for this wine came from Alexander Valley and it represents the appellation well, combining the ability to be juicy and approachable with powerful tannins and the potential to age. Cassis, raspberry and black pepper are standout characteristics, and the wine is big, but balanced.",,Ghost Waltz
"The blend here is 60% Syrah, 20% Petite Sirah, and 20% Portuguese varieties. It's a nod to the Spanish influence in Southern Oregon, and it comes together beautfully. Aromatic with cedar wood smoke, its flavors recall black tea, tobacco and smoked paprika. The fruit is ripe and full, but it's the nonfruit complexity that captivates. The balance is just right, and for the price, it's a unique and fascinating wine.",Avanté,J. Scott Cellars
"Aromas of pear, pressed white flower, exotic fruit and hints of toasted oak lead the nose. The round palate offers nectarine zest, apricot, dried herb and vanilla alongside soft but refreshing acidity.",Molamatta,Marco Felluga
"Delicate floral aromas suggest beeswax and honeysuckle. The bright, refreshing palate offers juicy white peach, Bartlett pear and a white almond note alongside crisp acidity.",Il Lugana,Pasini San Giovanni
"Oak and related toasty aromas drive the nose on this schisty-smelling wine that also shows plum and raspberry scents. A full, creamy, grabby palate is ripe and syrupy, while plum, wild berry, herbal undertones and raw oak flavors finish full, chubby and sticky, with a medicinal component.",Coma Vella,Mas d'en Gil
"Juniper and eucalyptus aromas are front and center on this dark-tinted Syrah that also brings aromas of olive, blackberry and coffee. A sinewy, tight palate has little give to it, while flavors of toasty oak and spice wrestle with herbal plum and berry notes. A toasty, herbal, oaky finish is spicy and rustic.",Corralillo,Matetic
"Coonawarra is Cabernet country, but this Chardonnay is a solid contender. Subtle toast and citrus aromas show admirable restraint, while there's ample weight and the flavors of pineapple and melon finish clean and citrusy.",Aradia,Penley Estate
"Classic old-school Carmenère aromas of bell pepper, olive and hard spices accent black cherry and plum notes in front of a full, mostly well-balanced palate. Herbal red-plum flavors are a touch salty, while the finish is minty and oaky tasting, with a hint of green.",Single Vineyard,Valdivieso
"Roasted, leathery plum and berry aromas are a bit stalky. A blend of Tempranillo, Syrah and Garnacha, this is balanced on the palate but also juicy and alert. Blackberry and dark plum flavors come with an herbal, slightly stalky edge, while the finish tastes authentic but baked and leathery.",Alges,Clos Pons
"Honeysuckle, chamomile, pear and passion fruit aromas meld together in the glass. The palate offers pear, apricot, nectarine peel and a touch of tropical fruit alongside brisk acidity. It closes on an almond note.",Rayon Blanc de Morgex et de La Salle,Cave du Vin Blanc de Morgex et de la Salle
"This copper-colored wine, the result of extended contact between the just-pressed juice and the grape skins, opens with pretty aromas of wildflower, stone fruit and an herbal note. The savory palate delivers juicy apple, peach, pink grapefruit and a mineral accent alongside zesty acidity.",Ramato,Attems
"A smoky nose with hints of flint and stone fruit leads the way on this linear white. The juicy palate delivers yellow peach, crisp apple, lemon drop and a hint of ginger alongside bright acidity.",Monte Fiorentine,Ca' Rugate
"Lime pith and tangerine notes lend an intensely zesty, racy feel to this dry, medium-bodied Riesling. The palate is lean but vivaciously fresh, with a pristine, mineral finish.",Hochheimer Kirchenstück Trocken Gold Cap,Domdechant Werner
"This is a beautifully fresh wine, very crisp and deliciously fruity. With attractive lemon and grapefruit flavors that are given a richer character by ripe apples, it's fragrant, lightly spicy and ready to drink.",La Grande Réserve du Moulin Sur Lie,Gadais Père et Fils
"Clear, well-defined varietal scents of pepper, licorice and boysenberry cut through, with a hint of fresh-cut tobacco. A substrate of granite underscores this ripe, supple, medium-long wine with good grip and a polished mouthfeel. Drink 2015 through 2020.",Estate Grown,Girardet
"A scent of leathery funk inhabits this wine, yet never overtakes the balanced flavors. A mix of blueberry and cherry fills the palate with lush flavors, and highlights of coffee, mocha and salted caramel add further interest. It drinks as a more mature wine than the vintage date might suggest.",Pelos Sandberg Vineyard,Iota Cellars
"A, unusual blend of Pinot Grigio, Gewürztraminer and Riesling, this wine delivers sensations of pressed white rose petal, pineapple, pink grapefruit, crystalized ginger, bitter walnut and a balsamic note. Fresh acidity gives it a clean finish.",Confini,Lis Neris
"Aromas of pressed white flower, citrus and beeswax unfold in the glass. The palate offers citrus zest, dried apricot and lemon drop. It has nice depth but drink soon to capture the remaining fruit.",Riserva,Marangona
"Prominent yet not overpowering oak smoke aromas lead the nose, with buttermilk, wet wool and chopped green herb elements as well. It's salty on the palate, with cooked apples and dried pineapple flavors, proving a nice balance between the familiar buttery and more elegantly restrained styles.",Bien Nacido Vineyard Reserve,Rideau
"Thanks to wines like this, expect a bright future for this appellation, which is just south of the Santa Lucia Highlands. Aromas of ripe plums, brown spices, turned earth and black slate lead into a silky palate, where red fruits are cut with an emergent, cinnamon-y spice and slightly leathery tannic grip.",Dijon Clone,Scott Family
"This bottling by Jim Clendenen is all about subtlety, with red currants, tiny bits of strawberry and iron showing on the nose. A rusty cherry character shows once sipped, with chaparral and pencil lead emerging as well. This wine requires attention, but rewards those with focus and patience.",La Bauge Au-Dessus,Au Bon Climat
"Subtle aromas of toasted oak, pressed flower and dried orchard fruit lead the nose. The firm palate offers nectarine, lemon drop, dried apricot and ginger alongside bright acidity. Drink soon to enjoy the remaining fruit flavors.",Fabio Contato,C_Maiol
"Rubbery berry and plum aromas come with a note of latex. In the mouth, this is juicy, bright and focused, with good raspberry and plum fruit. Textural balance is an attribute, while the finish is round, lively and full of tasty berry flavors. Drink through 2018.",Serras del Priorat,Clos Figueras
"Lightly herbaceous, this is a ripe, lively wine. Grapefruit and lemon zest flavors are complemented by fuller apple and quince flavors. A tight minerality in the background will allow the wine to age. Drink from 2016.",,Domaine de l'Ermitage
"This is a ripe, fresh and fruity wine that's filled out with a tangy, mineral texture. Grapefruit and lime juice flavors give a zesty feel as well as intense acidity. It is ready to drink.",,Domaine de Rome
"From old vines, this now-mature wine shows almonds, touches of toast and gentle acidity. It has a creamy texture that only hints at the original minerality and crispness. Now, it is a smooth wine with only a light connection to the Melon grape, offering concentration and a rich aftertaste. Drink now.",Signature,Domaine du Haut Bourg
"For such a young wine, this seems surprisingly developed__r maybe it's just riper than usual. It may lack in bracing lemon-lime department, but hints of apple blossoms and tropical fruit turn spicy and a bit apricot-like on the long finish.",Individual Vineyard Selection Dry,Pewsey Vale
"Made from Sangiovese with 5% Cabernet Sauvignon, this straightforward wine conveys aromas of stewed prunes, plum and black spices. The palate offers fleshy black cherry and black pepper alongside soft, round tannins. Enjoy soon.",Riserva,Piccini
"With brisk acidity, a bone-dry finish and some dusty tannins, this is an interesting Pinot Noir, with a silky texture and cherry jam, pomegranate and cranberry flavors that are ready to drink now.",Premium Limited Edition,Publix
"There's zero doubt about this Chardonnay's ripeness. The nose is warm, honeyed and a bit leaden. Round in the mouth, it offers tropical flavors of orange and nectarine. On the finish, a buttery note blends with residual citrus fruit.",Medalla Real Gran Reserva,Santa Rita
"This Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre blend shows hot alcohol and superripe flavors of blackberries, cassis, dark chocolate and raisins. It's a big, rich, thick wine that sticks to the gums, almost syrupy, but fully dry. Decant it and drink with stews, casseroles, barbecue.",Aurelio's Selection,Star Angel by Montes
"Made entirely with Sangiovese, this earthy wine leads off with aromas of red berries and wet soil. The juicy palate delivers wild cherry lightly accented with notes of white pepper alongside smooth tannins and fresh acidity. It's an ideal match with a variety of dishes, including pizza. Enjoy soon.",Pio II,Tenuta Santo Pietro
"With firm tannins, acidity and cool-climate notes of grilled meat and black pepper riding high over the blackberries and oak, this Syrah would be ageable, if it were just a bit richer. Give it a few hours to air and drink it now.",,Varda
"Deeply colored, it offers ripe berry and plum aromas in front of a tangy, juicy, somewhat clipped-feeling palate. Flavors of plum and raspberry come across chunky, while juicy acidity adds brightness but also roughness to the finish.",Quinel Single Vineyard Estate Bottled,Veranda
"With delicate aromas of yellow flowers and notes of exotic fruit, this is a classic, bright Soave. The juicy palate offers subtle peach, apples and honeydew melon and a hint of almond alongside fresh acidity. Sip as an apéritif or pair with light first courses and appetizers.",Vigne di Sande,Villa Canestrari
"Sourced from a single vineyard, this spent 17 months in French oak, 38% new. It's light and spicy, with pleasant fruit flavors of apple and pear.",Elton,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"Here's a zesty wine with attractive aromas of freshly picked roses, lychee and mineral. The palate offers juicy yellow grapefruit accented by spicy notes of white pepper and clove that add depth.",Aristos,Cantina Valle Isarco
"Rich, smooth and generous, this is a ripe wine yet with a solid structure of tannins. Dark chocolate and spice are paired with the full black fruits and full-bodied character. It should be aged until 2015.",,Château le Castellot
"A ripe and juicy wine, it's full of blackberry jelly flavors. The tannins are cushioned by the plump fruit texture and given a lift by acidity. The result is a wine that is developing quickly, and will be ready to drink by 2016.",,Château Moulin de Cassy
"With firm tannins and a solid texture, this rich wine has delicious juicy black fruits and dry tannins. It's delicious now, but it will also improve and evolve with time. Drink from 2016.",Cuvée Sarah,Château Petit-Freylon
"This estate-grown Pinot Gris is all about ripe, round, forward fruit. A juicy mix of apple and pear hits home, with just a hint of cinnamon. A good sipping wine.",,A Blooming Hill Vineyard
"The dryness and low alcohol are praiseworthy, but more challenging are hard tannins and biting acidity. With blackberry and sweet green-herb flavors, it's the opposite of today's ripe cult style, but by no means unattractive.",,Donati
"Primary fruit flavors of cranberry are at the core here, with medium concentration and acidity. Flavors of leaf and stem come into play and turn the finish slightly bitter. Give this until 2015.",Fries Family Cellars,Duck Pond
"Perhaps because of the cold vintage, the wine is unsatsifyingly dry, tannic and acidic, showing only hints of sour cherry candy, cola and green mint tea. Not an ager, so drink up.",Doctor's Vineyard,Due Cani
"There's an oddly sweet-ashy aroma and taste to this Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend. It comes from the oak, which overpowers the underlying blackberry, cherry and currant fruit flavors.",Trilogy,Flora Springs
This straightforward wine is bone dry and brisk in acidity. The pink grapefruit and Meyer lemon citrus flavors are enriched with riper notes of papayas. But there's also a strong streak of tart green gooseberries.,River Ranches,Geyser Peak
"A medium-bodied wine, it delivers sensations of Alpine wild flowers and Granny Smith apple. The round palate is brightened by fresh acidity but you'll also feel the warmth of evident alcohol.",,Girlan
"Lots of oaky flavors mark this dry wine. Buttered toast, brown butter and vanilla flavors dominate the underlying peach, pear, citrus and mango flavors.",Grand Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"The aroma shows old wood flavors that don't work. On the palate, the wood also gives some bitterness that needs to disappear to bring out the best of the red fruits. It's probably always going to be on the hard side.",,L. Tramier & Fils
"A blend of Sangiovese and 20% Canaiolo, it conveys spicy aromas of black pepper, spearmint and toast. The palate delivers black berry and cherry alongside bright acidity. Simple but well-made, it would pair well with hearty pasta dishes.",,La Calonica
"Dull and dusty on the nose, this burly Zin opens up in the glass, offering a slight sweetness of blackberry and vanilla amid its soft texture and structure.",Rocky Draw,Lava Cap
"With a delicate, silky mouthfeel and bright acidity, this wine fulfils Pinot's basic requirements. It has raspberry, persimmon and mushroom flavors, and also is quite tannic. Drink now, after decanting it for a while.",,MacMurray Ranch
"Aromas include subtle yellow apple, pear, lemon zest and a hint of peach. Fresh acidity gives it a clean finish.",,Mezzacorona
"This is pure fruitiness, a wine packed with spice, berry fruits and soft, open tannins. It is a great barbecue-style wine, ripe, with good acidity and a bright, crisp aftertaste. Drink now.",Quinta Essência,Casal da Coelheira
"Clean and tart in lemon flavor, it has a bright streak of acidity throughout. Refreshing, it'll work well as an apéritif, a hint of pear lingering on the soft palate and finish.",Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Chacewater
"This very rich, wood-aged wine is dense and powerful. The power takes away from the natural balance of a Bordeaux, giving dark tannins that dominate. Spice from the wood is also a strong element. It will round out, but will remain very ripe.",Cuvée Compostelle,Château Côte Montpezat
"While the wine does have some firm tannins, it also bears rich black fruits that envelop and cushion the dry core. They give the wine weight, ripe fruitiness and jammy red berry flavors. It would be worth aging until 2016, but can be drunk now.",,Château Nozières
"Here, Pinot Noir master Richard Longoria offers a more affordable taste of his Fe Ciega estate vineyard (whose other expressions cost upwards of $45 each). Aromas range from cranberry and tart blackberry to black pepper and wet slate, and the flavors hone in on sour cherry and tar. This wine features gripping tannins, so wait until 2016 for an even more optimal experience.",,Longoria
"Vibrant black-fruit aromas come across young and vital, with a lot of oak topping. The palate is chunky, with pulpy weight and plenty of body. Blackberry and black currant are the lead flavors, and they are backed by chocolaty oak. This feels meaty and bulky, with tons of fruit-forward heft and power.",Single Vineyard,Volver
"Powdery, perfumed aromas of raspberry and red plum announce a palate with ringing acidity. Plum, red currant and strawberry flavors come with moderate loamy weight, while the finish takes on an earthy quality that's balanced by shearing, tangy acidity. This is only 60% Tempranillo while the rest is Garnacha, Graciano and Mazuelo. Drink through 2020.",Norte,Pujanza
"There is nothing wimpy about this Bordeaux-style blend except the price. It way over-delivers, loading your palate with full-bodied, fruit-powered flavors of strawberry and raspberry jam, bolstered with bracing acidity. It's balanced and complete, with crisp, ripe tannins.",,Renegade
"Minerality takes center stage on the nose from Roblar's top-end line of wines, with limestone and wet slate getting boost from fresh squeezed lemon. On the palate, the crushed rock flavors continue with some pear as well, making for a mellow sipping experience. Serve with shellfish, white fish or a soft cheese.",Gold Collection,Roblar
"Light straw in color, this wine offers aromas of pineapple, river rock and toast. Flavors of honeydew, guava, orange blossom and bitter almond are evident on the palate. The symmetry of creamy and tangy sensations continues into the smooth finish.",Denizli-Guney Plateau,Sevilen
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Franc, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot, this deep violet-red wine has a nose of black cherry, crème brulée and black pepper. Cool and fruity notes play well together on the palate, shored up by flavors of black cherry, orange zest, menthol, clove and a touch of seawater. Mevushal.",Mosaic,Shiloh Winery
"This was pressed whole-cluster and fermented in French oak, roughly one-third new. It's a flavorful wine with caramel apple appeal, good definition and medium length. The barrels put a pleasing toasty frame around the finish.",Lumière,Sparkman
"Direct and easy drinking, this is full of ripe blueberry aromas and flavors, framed by hints of toast and a dusting of cinnamon. Drink now.",Estate Grown,StoneCap
"Principally Malbec, with 18% Tempranillo filling out the blend, this tangy and appealing wine wraps its red currant fruit in streaks of vanilla, tobacco and light herbs.",Hombre,Stottle
"Deep ruby in color and with aromas of cherry and butterscotch, this wine has flavors of black cherry, lemon zest, thyme and mint. Heady tannins endure through the smooth yet unpredictably zippy finish.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"Perfumed and aromatically distinctive wine, it carries notes of juniper, sagebrush, black pepper and cranberry. It's soft and sultry, lighter in feel, narrowing toward the finish.",May's Discovery Vineyard,Two Vintners
"From a low-elevation parcel of vines below the village, this ripe wine has had its tannins smoothed by wood. It is fruity but offers a dense texture, finishing richly and ripely. Drink now, but better from 2015.",,Domaine Chantal Lescure
"With attractive wood aromas, this is rich and bright, with touches of butteriness. It has weight and plenty of ripe fruit. The acidity at the end is fresh and crisp.",Les Perrières,Domaine Ferret
"Firm tannins don't completely hide the bright red berry flavors of this full wine. Red cherries dominate, giving a broad feeling even while the tannic structure is still in charge. Good acidity at the end adds to the sense of aging potential. Drink from 2017.",Les Pimentiers,Domaine Jean Petitot et Fils
"A very buttery wine, it is soft, smooth and creamy in texture. Contrasting citrus flavors add a crisp touch. The acidity winds through the ripe fruit to give a bright edge.",,Domaine Sophie Cinier
"Though less expensive than the Artisan series releases from Foundry, the Alla Prima seems better balanced. There's less new oak (though 40% is not insubstantial) and the alcohol is well under 15%. The wine weaves together cherry, dark chocolate and espresso with plenty of tart acidity to buoy it up.",Alla Prima,Foundry Vineyards
"Earthy and feral, this Pinot from the Sonoma County sparkling wine house of Gloria Ferrer shows the producer's attention to detail with still wines. With soft layers of balanced wild strawberry, cedar and distinctive brambly spice, it'll serve perfectly alongside roast duck.",Estate Grown and Bottled,Gloria Ferrer
"Imagine coffee ice cream drizzled with boysenberry syrup and you get the gist of the flavors of this full-bodied, rather sweet Zinfandel. Aromas of toasted oak barrels and fresh roasted coffee beans leap out of the glass as you sniff, then rich cherry and boysenberry flavors coat your tongue.  The alcohol is noticeable, but it carries so much flavor along with it that it comes off as decently balanced.",,Harney Lane
"This single-vineyard Chardonnay remains detailed and aromatic, though not quite as ripe as one might wish. Scents and flavors of herb, grain and green fruits mix and mingle, with plenty of underlying acidity.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Buty
"Winemaker Eric Laumann, who was recently hired to head up the quality-at-good-price Castle Rock team, focuses on obscure varietals, this time taking on the deep-red German grape Dornfelder. The nose combines cinnamon, black currant, pure black cherry, pipe tobacco, and chocolate cake, while the palate delivers ripe plum, cherry pie and licorice.",McIntyre Vineyard,Cambiata
"A dark-hued wine, it's richly fruity with spice and wood flavors. It is ripe, full in the mouth, offering solid tannins as well as attractive acidity. It's suited for medium-term aging, so drink from 2016.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"It already has a balance between acidity and rich red berry fruits. Red cherries add extra fruitiness to this structured, ripe wine that will age well. Drink from 2017.",,Chevalier Père et Fils
"This versatile red offers cola, cocoa and coffee aromas and earthy, balanced flavors of plum, dried cherry, cocoa and spice. Approachable but true to the variety, this wine is still evolving and can age for years to come.",,Chrisohoou
"This Bordeaux-style blend of 48% Merlot, 42% Cabernet Sauvignon, and 10% Cab Franc looks a bit murky, unfiltered, and is currently showing a lot of influence from barrel aging. Medium-weight blackberry and cassis fruit is married to dark chocolate, with a dash of black olive in the mix. It's tasty for drinking 2017_2019.",Reckoning,Adams Bench
"This bottling offers the tart berry and fresh herbal flavors for which the vineyard is famous. It's balanced and aromatic, though does not have the ripe flavors that the relatively high abv might suggest. Hints of tobacco adorn the astringent finish.",Red Willow Vineyard,Adams Bench
"Dusty apple and a hint of scrambled egg define the nose on this brut nature. As you'd expect given the lack of dosage, this is citric and linear in the mouth, with stony lime and green-apple flavors. The finish is refined, clean and lemony, with green-herb flavors.",Privat Reserva Brut Nature,Alta Alella
"Leather, game, wet soil and ripe berry aromas take center stage on this savory blend of Nerello Mascalese and Nero d'Avola. The lively, easy-drinking palate delivers ripe black cherry and raspberry, accented by white pepper and mineral notes. Fresh acidity brightens up the dense fruit.",Rosso,Hauner
"There's a steady aromatic focus of graphite, Bing cherry and a brief herbal lift to this offering from a sustainably minded winery run by the Zahoudanis family. Once sipped, the delivery is more subtle, with lavender, rose, fennel, dill and a finish of bitter mustard greens framing sour cherry fruit.",Pantheon,Demetria
"Layers of wood are strongly evident in this very rich wine. The yellow fruits, still behind the toasty structure, are going to be delicious as the wine develops. It is ripe, full-bodied and generous. Drink from 2015.",Hors Classe Tournant de Pouilly,Domaine Ferret
"This is complex, delicious, bold and tannic, bringing the big structure that is expected without being heavy handed. It offers concentrated blackberry and fig aromas, richly jammy flavors that stay dry and a tannic but not tough texture.",Conservancy,Concannon
"Citrus and orange blossom waft from the glass followed by plump minerality, Meyer lemon and crème brûlée, wrapped in restrained oak. Fruit sources range from Carneros to Mount Veeder and Oak Knoll, providing a well-balanced range of flavor and tension.",Signature Series,Darioush
"This is an earthy, chalky wine, medium bodied and silky in wild strawberry, garden herb and fresh mint notes. From estate-grown Pinot, it is a balanced, accessible selection to drink now.",Dijon Clone Selection,Gloria Ferrer
"A Blanc de Blancs, just with Chardonnay, often brings out the minerality and the chalk soil of the vineyard. This is a great success, fresh and crisp with bright acidity, apples and a good line of citrus. Drink now.",Blanc de Blancs Brut,Gremillet
"Dark golden in color, with a taste of caramel-toffee apple, this is the winery's classically produced late-harvest blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Riesling and Gewürztraminer. Recalling toasted caramel corn, fig and orange, the aromas are intense and the palate balanced.",Violetta Late Harvest,Grgich Hills
"A dark, cedary nose pumps out volumes of baked plum and blackberry aromas. A beefy, full-bodied palate is fiercely tannic, while black cherry, dark plum and blackberry flavors are more fruity than herbal or spicy. The finish is gritty due to drilling tannins, so wait this out a bit and drink  through 2022.",,Maquis
"New oak figures prominently on the palate of this generous and ripe wine, an impression that's nicely offset by ample structure and juicy acidity. It's balanced and approachable, so enjoy now.",,Martin Ray
"A partnership between growers Corinne and Charles Reichel and winemaking team Denis and May-Britt Malbec, this is a soft, round, oaked Cabernet Sauvignon that's blended with small amounts of Cabernet Franc and Malbec. It dances in blackberry, tobacco and chocolate, still chewy on the back of the palate.",Reichel Vineyard,Respite
"From a warm vintage, this aromatic offering has notes of candy corn, corn silk, pear and tropical fruit. It's full bodied with sweet fruit flavors that have a creamy feel and lead to a lingering finish.",Reserve,Ryan Patrick
"Ripe, almost candied aromas of berry fruits are offset by creamy oak scents and a touch of olive. This is chunky, weighty and trying hard to keep its form. Flavors of roasted black fruits, chocolate and herbs finish soft and low on structure. Drink this warm-vintage, full-flavored Cab through 2017.",Reserva de Familia,Santa Carolina
"The juiciness of crushed forest fruits along with some slight woodsmoke is evoked on the nose. Meanwhile, the palate follows suit with gentle red fruit aromas and edges of clove. A very elegant wine of slender proportions but with a delicious core of ripe red berries.",Mavie,Münzenrieder
"Made with native grape Erbaluce, this elegant, refreshing white offers a lovely fragrance of wild flower, alpine herb and stone fruit. On the palate, a light mineral vein accents fresh apple and white peach flavors, while bright acidity provides balance and freshness. It closes on a note of white almond.",Bianca,Nervi
"Sourced from all over the Napa Valley, this wine blends 87% Cabernet Sauvignon with 1% Syrah and other unnamed red varieties. The effort works, resulting in a glass of concentrated red cherry, herb and spice, the tannins tight yet approachable enough for the wine to remain juicy.",,Oberon
"Aromas of underbrush, leather, black-skinned fruit and tobacco lead the nose. The firm, structured palate offers mature blackberry, black cherry, coffee bean and licorice alongside a tannic backbone. It closes on a mineral note.",Essentia Loci,Ognissole
"Given ample time in oak, this wine delivers size and strength, a feisty celebration of big blackberry fruit and muscular tannins, well representative of both the vineyard and the vintage. Strawberry, mushroom and truffle figure prominently, with a finish of black tea.",Durell Vineyard,Pali
"Celery, lemon and zesty grapefruit are the dominating aromatic trio on this slender, moreish offering. The palate is balanced__ven rounded__or such a slender, zippy and refreshing wine. The aromatic intensity becomes even more pronounced on the palate.",Kranachberg,Skoff
"Not much Cabernet Sauvignon remains in the Russian River Valley, making this wine an outlier worth seeking. Cinnamon and nutmeg dust the entry, followed by a persistent level of baking spice on the palate. Approachable blue fruit and licorice dominate midway, revealing the 5% Malbec that's been blended in.",Lagomarsino Vineyard,St. Francis
"Seriously savory watercress and yeast notes take the aromatic lead. The palate follows suit with pepperiness and lemony, citric verve. Zippy, lively and fresh, but with weight and resonance.",Grand Grü Reserve,Steininger
"Still closed, this emanates earthy notes at first while the palate shows pink grapefruit zest hugged by very ripe, lemon-toned peach with tropical overtones of fresh and canned pineapple. A textural, structure-giving phenolic element on the midpalate leads to an earth- and lemon-tinged pineapple finish.",Steinertal Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"This is a hearty Meritage employing all five red Bordeaux varieties. The color is black and the fruit equally dark and rich, offering muscular tannins around rich notes of blackberry, cedar and herb.",,Trinchero
"This is a mineral-driven take on the grape by Westside Paso vintner Michael Gill, with sharp wet stone and grapefruit peel aromas. The palate is tightly wound and very fresh, with flavors of lime juice and lemon zest.",Fleur de Xel,Tuxedo Cellars
"Given more than two years in all-French oak, this 100% Cabernet impresses in balancing juicy red currant and cherry fruit against more savory tannin and herb. Structured, it should gain traction and mellow in severity through 2020_2025.",,Vineyard 511
"Any description of this wine__qual parts Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon__ust start with the word delicious. It offers aromas of pencil lead, coffee, herbs and cherry along with abundant chocolate and cherry flavors.",Bello Rosso,Walla Walla Vintners
"This 100% varietal wine, which saw 30 months of oak aging, is lightly aromatic with notes of cherry, anise, berry, vanilla and woodspice. It's quite restrained in feel__ very pretty wine__ith elegant, sumptuous cherry flavors and a lingering finish.",Wautoma Springs Vineyard,Wautoma
"Bold and full bodied, this offers aromas of steeped plum, prune, clove and blue flower. The concentrated, savory palate doles out mature blackberry, raisin, clove and licorice. Big but velvety tannins and just enough freshness give this a surprisingly drinkable quality that belies its heft.",Centosassi,Amastuola
"The aromas on this wine by Bryan Babcock find an intriguing balance between ripe nectarine flesh and tart stonefruit skins. It's a bit more lush in style than other Pinot Gris of the vintage, quite broad on the palate, with apple-pear flavors, lingering lemon skin bitterness and an acidity that soaks into the tongue.",Naughty Little Hillsides Estate,Babcock
"Aromas of ripe plum, black cherry, leather and ground white pepper follow through to the smooth, full-bodied palate along with a mineral accent. Supple tannins and fresh acidity provide the framework while a licorice note signals the close.",,Cantina del Pino
"Bold and pretty at the same time, this has oodles of crushed berry aromas. Ripe fruit flavors that recall black cherry and boysenberry come with hints of toasted oak and a silky smooth texture. It's full bodied but not too stiff or tannic, just concentrated and almost sweet in its richness.",Seleccion,Borjón
"Plump, supple and a joy to drink, this wine features a complex mélange of aromas and flavors, ranging from menthol and cracked pepper to mocha and roasted meat, all wrapped around a core of red berries. Drink now_2018.",Bush Vine,Yalumba
"There's a lot going on in the expressive bouquet of this wine__ipe, brambly raspberry, cocoa powder, cinnamon, clove and licorice root. Those notes continue through to the satiny palate, where medium tannins lend ample texture and grip to the long, spicy finish. Drink now_2017.",Galpin Peak,Bouchard Finlayson
"Grassy and dull, this white tastes diluted and is lacking in flavor. The few decipherable notes lean toward fresh-cut lime.",Kick Ranch,Delectus
"Rustic, rubbery, leathery aromas are highly suggestive of animal hide and stalky berry fruits. This is hard as rocks on the palate, with an astringent mouthfeel. Briny, leathery berry and plum flavors end with a stalky aftertaste.",Estate,Doña Paula
"There is a skill to making an off-dry Champagne, blending sweetness and the fresh, lively character. This wine doesn't quite make it. The two elements__ruit and sweetness__re not integrated and leave a candied character.",Elixir Demi-Sec Premier Cru,Bertrand-Delespierre
"This waxy, petrol-infused wine underwent both barrel and stainless-steel fermentation. It's dark in color, exhibiting a majority of barrel-induced flavors like caramel and toast with any hint of fruit remaining elusive.",,Educated Guess
"Bright pink in color, this 100% Touriga Nacional rosé is ripe with caramel and red berry flavors. It misses out on acidity, leaving the wine flat at the end.",,Quinta da Alorna
"A bright cranberry color, this is fruity and dry, simple and ready to drink immediately. It brings some slightly bitter tannins into the finish.",Rosé from,Cardwell Hill
"While the wine is fresh, it also has a bitter, cheesy character that is more funky than fruity. The acidity is very present, giving a crisp edge. Drink now.",Les Pays de Pierres Dorées,Domaine Pral
"With light tannins and herbal fruit flavors, this is a crisp, tight wine. Red-berry flavors show through along with a greener character and tannins that are not quite ripe. Drink now.",,Georges Duboeuf
"Dry, saline-like overtones on jumpy plum and berry aromas and a hard, tannic palate make for a tough beginning. Equally tough berry fruit flavors have skins and bitterness issues, while the finish is peppery, acidic and hard.",,Gorrebusto
"Hard, rubbery cherry and berry aromas lead to a raw, underdeveloped palate. This wine made from the local Valencia-region grape variety Forcall_ is outright tart and tomatoey, with a touch of red-plum flavor. An herbal, rubbery, tannic finish tastes saucy.",,Rafael Cambra
"Stewy, muddled, herbal aromas come prior to a chunky, chewy palate. Flavors of compost, nutty berry fruits and turned earth lack freshness, while a stewed finish tastes mulchy and feels tannic.",Ultra,Kaiken
"Initial stalky aromas are low on freshness and vitality, and with time, this blend of Macabeo and Chardonnay smells more artificial and soapy. Round on the palate, it tastes fairly bitter and pithy, with a modest white-fruit character that makes a soft impression.",Route 33,Les Useres
"It is the Fernão Pires that gives this wine its class and freshness. The Sauvignon Blanc in the blend, with its herbaceous character, seems to clash. The wine is crisp with lemon flavors and brings an intense final acidity.",Terra de Lobos Branco,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Funky aromas of nutty, briny citrus fruits and apple come with a whiff of skunk. This is flat in feel, with sugary, creamy flavors of green melon. A foamy, flowery finish tastes candied and feels borderline cloying.",Aria Estate Extra Dry,Segura Viudas
"Sour blackberry and smoked meat aromas greet the nose on this bottling from a small, relatively unknown appellation in Monterey County. The flavors are a tad flat, with some sour cherries and tar.",,Lockwood
"Tight, clean and fresh but reluctant aromas of apple greet the nose on this boxed wine. The palate lacks discernible flavors, with just a touch of steely apple flesh.",,Loft
"This is tan in color, with a flat, murky nose of stone-fruit aromas and chemical harshness. A round, oily textured palate tastes of briny nectarine and pithy bitterness. In many ways, this is like sucking on a peach pit.",The Angel Oak,SignoSeis
"Lychee, lemon-lime and bath soap aromas set up a foamy, rough, coarse palate. Flavors of soapy tropical fruits seem almost artificial, and so does the finish, which is sugary sweet.",Flare Sparkling,Anecoop
"Gaseous aromas are thick and upfront, with a hint of lychee. This tastes and feels pithy, with a heavy skins component that causes bitterness. Amid that, this dry Muscat tastes soapy, with an oddly floral finish.",Cosecha Dorada Seco,Bodegas Gutiérrez de la Vega
"On the nose, this is fully oaked, charred, spicy and familiar. In the mouth, however, it takes a dive; brutal, scouring acidity and killer tannins create a rugged, lemony mouthfeel. Flavors of toasty oak and sour black fruits devolve into a pool of tartaric acidity on the finish.",MC,Marqués de Cáceres
"Damp, earthy cherry aromas and saucy plum notes amount to a rocky opening. A grabby, drying, tannic palate and wiry plum flavors end with burnt overtones, a drawing feel and bitterness.",Ampakama Intenso,Casa Montes
"Rooty initial aromas veer toward animal and stalky berry fruits as this unfolds. Raw, hard and leathery in feel, this turns out to be low on ripeness as leafy, stalky flavors take over before ending salty, with firm tannins.",Reserva,La Cuna de la Poesia
"Leafy aromas of tomato and green herbs pile on the pyrazines. This distinctly herbal Cabernet is full and chunky in feel, with flavors that follow the nose: bell pepper and spicy tomato lead the way. A peppery finish is herbal to the last note.",Nonni,Angulo Innocenti
"Cherry, plum and spice aromas are lively, but the palate is highly citric and acidic. Short, drying sour cherry and plum flavors turn hot, peppery and ultimately bitter on the finish.",Tinto,Burgo Viejo
"Green bean and bell pepper mark this wine that lacks flavor. It tastes watery and diluted, a faint hint of lemon lurking in.",,Voss
"Yeasty, bready aromas of cantaloupe and citrus feed into an undefined palate that foams up on tongue. Citrus and melon flavors are bland, with powdered sugar and orange notes on the finish.",Sparkling Rosé,Tarantas
"This smells like beef broth and tastes savory, vegetal and smoky. The impression is rustic, earthy and lean.",Caiden's Vineyards,Block Nine
"Candied cherry and strawberry aromas are soft, artificial and not convincing. Jammy on the palate, this tastes dull, with a touch of raspberry fruit. Bitter notes and latex dominate a flat finish.",Daimon,Bodegas Tobía
"Grassy strawberry and raspberry aromas smell false as well as floral. A blocky palate with jammy stickiness and rubbery tannins carries medicinal, resiny, candied berry flavors, with green overtones. This feels raw on the finish while tasting green and jammy.",Reserve,Region 1
"Apple and lime aromas are basic and distant. This is light on the palate, while green melon, lime, apple and green-bean flavors finish grassy, leesy, tart and bitter.",,Tarantas
"Beautifully crafted, this is racy and mineral-soaked. Mountain herbs are in abundance, along with clean, green (in a good way) berry, banana and pineapple fruit. It's balanced throughout, with excellent length and texture.",Bryan Creek Vineyard,Adelsheim
"Ayala, based in Aÿ in the heart of Champagne, has been transformed since Bollinger bought it in 2005 and this nonvintage proves it. This is a balanced blend of 40% Chardonnay, 40% Pinot Noir and 20% Pinot Meunier. The result is crisp while not too dry, and therefore drinkable as an apéritif. Apple and bright citrus combine with green plums to give a fruity wine that is also structured. The cellarmaster continues to reduce the dosage (sugar) so there is a crisp, tight aftertaste.",Brut Majeur,Ayala
"With half the blend Chardonnay, this has a crisp and steely character. It also has richness and the first signs of maturity. It is full in the mouth, an elegant Champagne that would be good to drink now, but will also develop further.",Grand Vintage,Boizel
"Jammy aromas of plum and berry are oaky and come with a hint of rubber and/or latex. This is weighty yet balanced. Earthy flavors of baked black fruits, tea and spice are slightly minerally, while the finish is oaky and generous, with a touch of menthol and heat.",Flavium Selección,Vinos de Arganza
"The small, little-known Vaulignot premier cru has produced a juicy, while still mineral wine. Ripe red currant fruit and pineapple flavors give a rich character. It's a delicious wine to drink young like this, although the structure does promise aging until 2019.",Vaulignot Premier Cru,Domaine Louis Moreau
"There are weight and richness here, along with warm yellow fruit and balanced acidity. The wine is ripe with hints of wood aging giving spice and rounding out the fresh, steely character. It's worth aging, so drink from 2017.",Blanchot Grand Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"Tangerine and pineapples scent this intensely ripe semi-sweet Riesling. The palate is fleshy with peach concentrate, but touches of dusty slate and mineral lend elegance. Sunny citrus acidity shines softly through the finish.",Bernkasteler Badstube Spätlese,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Ripe stone-fruit, pineapple and tangerine flavors are marked by streaks of lime and lemon acidity on this irresistibly vibrant semi-dry Riesling. Touches of berry lend a sweet, summery warmth that lingers on the finish. Enjoy now for it's fragrant, fruity exuberance.",,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Compact aromas of fresh berry fruits, herbal notes and oak-based sawdust are lively and fun. There's acidic kick to the palate, and overall the body is healthy and balanced. Blackberry and cured meat flavors dominate, while the finish is chocolaty and brings a salt-and-pepper finale.",,Durigutti
"Dig into this if you like superripe, rich Malbec. This is loaded with graphite, smoky oak, blackberry and baking spice aromas. Expect maximum ripeness across the palate, meaning bearish flavors of berry fruits, wood and toast. There's not a lot of distance or complexity to the finish, but getting that far is half the fun.",Colección,Finca Perdriel
"Made with 50% Pinot Bianco, 35% Chardonnay and 15% Pinot Nero, this offers aromas of green apple, dried chamomile and a whiff of nut and honey. The creamy palate delivers mature Golden Delicious apple, peach, lemon peel and candied ginger flavors that are brightened by refreshing acidity and a persistent perlage.",Freccianera Brut,Fratelli Berlucchi
"This is a heady, seriously generous Pinot Noir from a coolish site in the Sonoma Coast AVA that clearly had a banner ripening year in 2012. The fruit is smoky and concentrated in dark berry and cherry, an intriguing bit of spearmint playing around in the background. Rodgers Creek is an estate vineyard for the brand, planted to Pommard clones. A steal at this price.",Rodgers Creek Vineyard,Garnet
"Zesty orange and tangerine rinds are marked with honey and sweet spice on the nose of this exuberant off-dry Riesling. Ripe peach, melon and yellow-cherry flavors are lush and sweet on the palate, but countered with a jolt of lime and lemon acidity. It's a beautifully nuanced wine that's effortlessly tasty.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Black plum, blue flower, oak, espresso and chocolate aromas waft from the glass of this densely structured wine. The palate delivers blueberry extract, roasted coffee bean, vanilla and spice alonside tightly packed wood tannins that generate an astringent, mouth-drying finish. Give it time to unwind. Drink 2018_2030.",Pergole Vece Riserva,Le Salette
"While demure and mineral at first whiff, this revitalizing Riesling blossoms on the nose as it aerates, accumulating layers of citrus and floral aromas. Off-dry in style, it boasts ripe yellow-cherry flavor streaked with lime-juice acidity.",Abtsberg Superior,Maximin Grünhäuser
"Here's a Prosecco with real personality. Left to finish fermentation in the bottle on its lees and made without any added dosage, it displays a slightly cloudy appearance from fine sediment deposited at the bottom, which gives it another dimension. Pure flavors include tart green apple, lime, white peach and kiwi, with a hint of lemon pastry. It's balanced in mouthwatering acidity and finishes bone-dry.",Col Fondo,Ca' dei Zago
"While this is a nonvintage wine, it is still very young and will benefit from time in bottle. That will allow the rich apple and crisp lemon flavors to round out, calming the intense acidity. The potential of this rich wine is considerable.",Emotion,Domaine Charles Baur
"Aigrots is one of the Beaune premier crus that produces white as well red wines. In its white manifestation, it is full and dense with structure and ripe fruitiness. A rich wine, it has textured white fruits that are underlined by toastiness. Drink from 2017.",Aigrots Premier Cru,Albert Morot
"Airy and woody on the nose, this textbook Rioja crianza is woody, dry, light and elegant, with a smooth but juicy palate that brings raspberry, plum and brown sugar flavors to the fore. Spice and dry red-fruit flavors meld with juicy acidity on the finish. Drink through 2017.",ADM Crianza,Altos del Marqués
"A blend of 55% Pinot Nero and 45% Chardonnay, this opens with aromas of honey, beeswax, acacia, vanilla and toast. The rich palate shows some complexity, delivering bread crust, lemon, apple, hazelnut and candied ginger alongside vibrant acidity and a soft, persistent mousse.",Quintessence Extra Brut Riserva,Antica Fratta
"Resin, nail polish remover and stewed prune aromas carry over to the concentrated palate along with blueberry extract and milk chocolate. Soft and round, with chewy tannins, it closes on an almond note. Drink 2015_2020.",Ca' Coato,Antolini
"Waxy-white flowers and grapefruit zest scent this elegantly structured, full-bodied Riesling. It's dry and intensely mineral in style, but ripe, concentrated flavors of white peach and honeydew lend a lavish richness to the palate. Finishes long and lean with a honed, steely focus.",Lorche Trocken,August Kesseler
"Aromas of blue flower, tilled soil, graphite and crushed black currants leap from the glass of this structured wine. The dense palate delivers black cherry, bitter prune, nutmeg and white pepper alongside tightly packed tannins. Give this a few years to fully develop. Drink 2016_2020.",,Rubinelli Vajol
"Made with Nebbiolo and Pinot Nero, this delivers freshness and structure. Intriguing aromas suggest rose, tilled earth, red apple, berries and a whiff of cake spices. The palate offers wild cherry and cinnamon alongside an elegant, persistent mousse and crisp acidity. Enjoy through 2018.",Duemilaotto Metodo Classico,Rivetti Massimo
"Intensely bright and crisp, this also has a full weight of fruitiness. Apples, creamed pears and a light touch of vanilla give a complex, dense wine that's so fresh at the end. It's still youthful; better wait until 2016.",Vau de Vey Premier Cru,Romain Bouchard
"This cuvée is put together from several estate vineyards, most of them marked by low vigor and cool ridge-top climates. The blend shows them all off well. Dark cherry and plum delve into classic earthy forest floor and sautéed mushrooms, the texture soft and silky.",Estate Cuvée,Small Vines
"Made from vines that are over 55 years old, this refined wine has concentrated flavors of white peach, citrus, yellow apple, exotic fruit and white spices alongside energizing mineral accents. The creamy palate is brightened by firm acidity. It closes on an almond note.",Vigne di Catullo,Tenuta Roveglia
"Rose petals and honey perfume this gorgeously aromatic dry Riesling, accenting ripe, succulent flavors of caramelized sugar and peaches on the palate. It's big bodied and slightly viscous in mouthfeel, but a shock of grapefruit acidity lends elegance and balance.",Wachenheimer Dry,Villa Wolf
"Lightly baked, mildly raisiny aromas include notes of vanilla and cake. This feels ripe, steady and round, with solid acidity. Flavors of loamy berry fruits blend with riper raisin and prune characteristics, while the finish is mild in power but stout in feel.",Crianza,Viña Valoria
"From one of the Veneto's leading producers, this is made with native Turbiana grape. Creamy flavors of lemon pastry, Bartlett pear and yellow apple are brightened by refreshing acidity and a fine perlage. It finishes on an almond note.",Metodo Classico Brut,Zenato
"Raw, leafy aromas announce a hard, astringent wine with green, herbal flavors of juniper and raspberry. A rubbery finish confirms that this is base level and acceptable in the scheme of things.",Single Vineyard,Cremaschi Furlotti
"The cold vintage seems to have affected this wine. It lacks its usual richness and instead, is acidic and lean, even vegetal.",,MacRostie
"Mellow and floral on the nose, this turns loud and aggressive in the mouth. Candied lime and mango flavors finish rugged and screaming.",,Cousiño-Macul
"This blend is comprised of Merlot (70%) and dabbles of Mourvèdre, Petit Verdot and Shiraz, sourced mainly from the Clements Hills region of Lodi. The wine is marked by a strong streak of green bell pepper and herbal scents, and is a tad dull on the palate.",Oe-lixir Red Mélange,Oenophile Wines
Tart acidity combined with candied flavors of pineapples and butterscotch mark this simple Chardonnay. Finishes a bit sour.,,Vinum Cellars
"Very primary, with tart blackberry fruit and a slim, refreshing body, suggesting that this young wine could also work well chilled when its lively, uncomplicated nature will show best.",,Kirnbauer
"The blend of this wine is Viognier, Marsanne, Chardonnay and Roussanne. It's honeyed on the palate with tropical fruits, but marred by a vegetal streak of boiled asparagus that's hard to get over.",Cass Vineyard Elevation,Ascension Cellars
"Pleasant apple, pear and white-flower aromas are accompanied by a slightly earthy, mushroom-like note on this dry Pinot Blanc. It's stark and lean with acidity, savory apple flavors and a brisk finish.",,Hector Wine Company
"While the nose is pungent and true to the variety, there isn't much else positive to say about this cypher of a Sauvignon Blanc. The palate is plump yet fizzy, while the flavor profile offers citrus, bitterness and nothing more.",,Llai Llai
"Candied white-fruit aromas are generic and rudimentary. This feels flat and doesn't show much life on the palate. Flavors of canned pear, oak and related spice finish bland.",Petirrojo Reserva,Viña Bisquertt
"This dusty Zinfandel has ripe tannins and ripe fruit, along with a puckering sourness on the finish.",,Black Sheep
"A straightforward red, with ripe cherry flavor and lively freshness in a light, soft body. It's uncomplicated, but easy drinking.",Schellmann An der Südbahn,Loimer
"A tannic blend of Montepulciano, Sangiovese, Merlot, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon, this is closed in the nose and dense in texture.",Full Fathom Five,Orfila
This is a strangely chemical wine that has overripe fruit. It misses out on initial acidity and fruitiness.,Lauze,Domaine de Sulauze
"A GSM blend, aged in neutral oak, this is a dark and heavy blush wine showing Lifesaver candy cherry and raspberry flavors.",Belle-Amie,Vie Winery
"This was a hard vintage, especially in cool places like Monterey, and this Syrah-Grenache blend is decidedly lean. There's enough raspberry fruit to get by, but green mint and vegetable flavors distract.",Cotes du Crow's,Morgan
"While juicy and ripe with red fruit, this Zin lays a little flat on the palate. A handful of Sangiovese is blended in.",Romanza Moon Shoup Vineyard,Lapis Luna
"The raspberry, cherry and dried cranberry flavors of this soft, silky wine are marred by excessive sharpness and acidity on the finish.",Eclipse,River Star
"This is a simple Merlot, but it's dry in style with tart sour-cherry flavors.",,Round Hill
"Ripe with cherry-berry juiciness, this is a value-priced Zin that's straightforward all around, with a bitter taste to the finish.",Vicious,Sobon Estate
"This wine appears to have suffered from the cool 2011 vintage with prominent herbal notes that lean far into the green. It seems to carry noticeable residual sugar, with the sweetness making for an odd juxtaposition to the aroma profile.",,Sagelands
"Light and tropical on the nose, this is flabby on the palate and tastes dull and sweet, with a creamy aftertaste and low acidity.",Reserva,Chilensis
"This wine's red fruit flavors have sharp, vinegary tones, giving it a hint of Balsamic. It's all right for drinking now.",Mélange Maison I Old Vines,Vie Winery
"With little varietal character on the nose, this qualifies as a basic, plump white wine with mild fruit, oily notes and some bitterness.",Gato Negro,San Pedro
"Odd aromas of pomegranate and grapefruit are off the grid. This is citric and austere in feel, with sour, herbal flavors mixed with oak. A minty, herbal, green finish raises questions.",Boya,Garces Silva
"Fenestra's blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Malbec, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot is aromatically interesting with hints of Dr. Pepper and spice. The palate devolves with strong herbal aromas and light fruit flavors before finishing slightly high in alcohol.",Conjugation,Fenestra
"Marked by aromas of raspberry liqueur, this is a sweet, listless Grenache. Sourced from a good site in Mendocino.",Rhodes Vineyards,Claudia Springs
"This perenially mediocre wine is a little worse in 2012. It smells blowsy, floral and strange, while in the mouth it's like oaky apple cider. Flavors of cider and faux oak are less than impressive, as is the overall balance.",Sepia Reserva,Vistamar
"A dull Rhône-style blend, this is soft and hot with alcohol. You'll find some green vegetable and mushroom notes that mar the ripe flavors of red cherry jam.",Dalliance,Ascension Cellars
"The winery held this back for four years before releasing it. While it's dry and silky on the palate, it has raisiny flavors, and a touch of volatile acidity.",,La Rochelle
"This straightforward red opens with aromas of scorched earth, ripe dark-skinned fruit, clove and an earthy whiff of game. The palate offers dried plum, ripe blackberry, ground pepper and grilled herb while assertive but fine-grained tannins provide support.",,Vecchia Cantina di Montepulciano
"This kitchen-sink blend is fruit forward with aromas of raspberry jam and plum along with pencil lead and vanilla accents. Flavors are sweet and generous, with a rounded feel and a lingering finish. It drinks best at a cool 62.",Mélange Red Varietal Blend,Waterbrook
"Subtle aromas of plum, blackberry and a whiff of baking spice emerge in the glass. The polished palate offers black cherry, clove and a hint of tobacco alongside sleek, smooth tannins. Drink through 2018.",,Gattavecchi
"Aromas of vanilla, coconut and clove mix with dark fruit and black pepper on this fruit-and-barrel-style wine. It's full bodied and high octane, needing more fruit intensity to balance it out.",Cellar Select Artist Series Dan Ostergaard Estate Bottled,Goose Ridge
"This pure Chardonnay has a tight, nervy mineral texture that gives great freshness as well as a crisp apple skin and lemon zest character. It is fruity, full of lively acidity that goes with the perfumed, refreshing aftertaste.",Brut Blanc de Blancs,Goutorbe-Bouillot
"An appealing pale salmon color, this blend of 50% Cinsault, 28% Grenache and 22% Syrah displays aromas of strawberry, cherry Jolly Rancher and melon. Reflective of the warmth of the vintage, it's fruitier than recent vintages but it's still hard to put down.",Olsen Vineyard,Gramercy
"A touch of smoke precedes notes of ripe, black cherries and baked plums whose fruit becomes even fleshier on the rounded, fruit-forward and rather juicy palate of this blend. Tannins are very soft. Fresh acidity keeps the rounded fruit in check. Drink soon.",Pannonica,Höpler
"A lovely, lemon-scented freshness, almost of lemon balm, leads on the nose. The palate is similarly citrus-focused but also holds notes of savory yeast. A simple, superrefreshing wine.",Von den Terrassen,Josef Ehmoser
"Raspberry and vanilla introduce this wine, made from a selection of vines 21 to 130 years old, with some planted in 1882. Lusty and lush layers of cinnamon and cola accent the fruit and provide complexity, the tannins resolved and thick.",Reserve Century Vines,Kunde
"Aromas of dark berry, cedar and allspice take shape in the glass. The straightforward, medium-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, licorice and espresso alongside round, ripe tannins. Drink through 2017.",Terrarossa,Melini
"Lovely, fresh and enticing green Conference pear flavors abound on nose and palate where they are met with a tangy grapefruit zestiness. This is ultralight and very refreshing. Drink soon.",Klassik,Nastl
"Red cherries, ripe strawberries and recently tanned leather aromas greet the nose on this wine. It's quite lively and spicy once sipped, with more strawberry fruit as well as a plum skin tartness and pencil lead tannins.",Di Domenico,Le Vigne
"A very neutral but clean nose is followed by a slender palate with soft tones of pear and white plum. A subtle, quiet wine that will serve well in situations where a versatile crowd-pleaser is needed. This one has purity and freshness.",Klosterkeller Siegendorf,Lenz Moser
"This soft, light-bodied wine is on the savory side, a taste of cranberry and rhubarb at its core. It dances in cooler-climate aspects of forest floor and herb, with an unexpected aroma of menthol sneaking into the mix.",Hurst Vineyard,Les Voleurs
"There's a generosity of tannin and richness to this wine, which offers a depth of high-toned cranberry and strawberry-rhubarb. Still a baby, it needs to open in the glass or decanter to reveal its more shyly etched elements of forest floor and black tea.",,Malk
"Pretty aromas of violet, iris, pressed powder and perfumed berry mingle in the glass. The ripe, round palate offers juicy black cherry, ripe raspberry, nutmeg and licorice alongside dusty tannins and fresh acidity. Drink through 2016.",Mauro,Agricola Tamburini
"Yeasty, briny scents define the nose on this smooth, round-bodied Cava. Flavors of apple, lime, tarragon and lemongrass veer towards green, while the finish is slightly oxidized, which results in a bready aftertaste and a soft ending texture.",MIM Natura Brut Reserva,Marqués de Gelida
"Made with 90% Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo, this opens with pretty aromas of crushed berry, violet and a whiff of menthol. The juicy palate offers black cherry, white pepper and licorice alongside firm but fine-grained tannins.",,Donatella Cinelli Colombini
"Nectarine and fig notes mark the nose, while the palate is mellow and well-ripened, then delivers a refreshing citrusy kick on the long, grapefruit finish. Drink this medium-bodied wine over the next 6_9 months.",,Tussock Jumper
"There's the slightest touch of oxidation on the nose of this wine, with aromas of roasted walnut and seared lemons. The palate is quite interesting, with lemon oil, hints of toasted nuts and a faint marshmallow element on the finish.",,Dark Earth
"This wine doesn't entirely seem in harmony with aromas of tire rubber, coffee ice cream, herbs and barrel spice. The dark fruit flavors have a full feel but a bitter note that runs from head to tail distracts.",,Lauren Ashton Cellars
"Here's an earthy expression of Sangiovese that opens with aromas of truffle, forest floor, ripe plum and a whiff of barnyard. The rustic appeal carries over to the palate, which offers ripe blackberry, ground pepper, bitter sage and a gamey note. Assertive tannins provide backup but leave an astringent finish.",Quercetonda,Le Casalte
"Solid tannins still dominate this potentially ripe and full-bodied wine. It has the richness and structure of the vintage, giving ripe red fruits from the Merlot as well as tight tannins that need to soften. Drink from 2016.",Réserve du Château,Dourthe
"This offers an unusually full-bodied take on this variety. It shows a vivid gold color, with generous apricot and pear aromas followed by a lush texture that carries apricot, vanilla and almond flavors across the palate. This was barrel-fermented and had extended aging before release.",Barrica,Metate Hill Vineyards
"A blend of organically farmed Sangiovese and 5% Malvasia Nera, this opens with aromas of scorched earth, underbrush and roasted coffee bean. Reflecting the hot vintage, the palate is evolved, offering raisin and dark spice alongside firm tannins. The fruit richness is already drying up so drink sooner rather than later.",Seretina Riserva,Monterotondo
"Initially savory tones of bramble and dried herb dissipate to reveal delicate floral and raspberry aromas on this refreshing Pinot Noir rosé. Dry in style with crisp, cutting acidity, it's a versatile and thirst quenching summer quaffer.",Rosé of,Fox Run
"Blue flower, wild berry and baking spice aromas unfold in the glass. The straightforward palate offers dried wild cherry, licorice and black pepper alongside ample, polished tannins. The fruit is drying up quickly so drink sooner rather than later.",,Gattavecchi
"This fresh, crisp wine has layers of lemon over a lively mousse. It offers a mineral texture allied to great fruitiness and youthful acidity. Drink now, although this bottling will benefit from further aging.",Carte d'Or Brut,Goutorbe-Bouillot
"Robust and brawny, this substantial offering features concentrated layers of smoke, leather and sage-inflected tannins. It finishes in a wrapping of bittersweet chocolate.",Estate Grown and Produced,Oakville Winery
"Grapefruit, lime and leesy aromas feed into a healthy palate with adequate acidity and raciness. Pithy, briny citrus flavors of lime and orange finish with notes of grapefruit and scallion. Drink now.",,Palma Real
"With its bitter cherry flavors and light, smoky tannins, this perfumed wine has a richer juicy element in the background. Lightly textured, it's more about fruit that is up front and refreshing. Drink now, although the wine will be better from 2017.",,Denis Jamain
"This fruity, light wine is full of red berries. The tannins are there, playing a supporting role to the intense fruitiness and acidity that's typical of the vintage. This wine will develop quickly, so drink from 2017.",Charmes,Domaine Belland
"Very herbal and grassy, this crisp wine emphasizes fruit rather than texture. It is ripe, fruity with citrus and gooseberry flavors that are heightened by the acidity. It's a wine to drink now.",,Domaine Dyckerhoff
"Produced from young vines, this is a fresh, fruity, and crisp wine. It has attractive apple and pear flavors, brightened further by citrus overtones. Drink this attractive wine now.",Sur le Fort,Domaine Fouassier
"Reserved in aromas at first, this shows charred wood, red cherries, pomegranate and graphite on the nose. Quite intriguing texturally, the palate is sticky with tannins but light in body, offering flavors of cola and tart cranberry.",Rancho Santa Rosa,Foley
Aromas of bright pink roses and soft cherry fruit are a bit shy on the nose but pretty when they do arise. The palate of this 85% Syrah and 15% Viognier blend shows raspberry fruit and lime-rind tartness.,Sunset,Four Lanterns
"Orange peel, dill, herb and red-fruit aromas lead to elegant, soft, sultry feeling fruit and barrel flavors with a smoky finish. The oak gets a bit in front of the fruit but it still brings plenty of interest.",Estate Grown,Gordon Estate
"Leafy underbrush, espresso, baked plum, menthol and toast aromas slowly emerge. The straightforward palate offers ripe Morello cherry, star anise and chopped herb while assertive tannins clench the abrupt finish. Give the tannins some time to unfurl then drink up.",Sassocheto,Il Grappolo
"Coming in a bottle adorned with an informational treasure map of the region, this wine conveys bubble gum, honeysuckle and Pink Lady apples on the nose. A similar apple character shows on the palate, along with riper grapefruit notes, Anjou pear slices and graphite. The apples get more sour as the sip lingers.",Queen of Tides,Inconceivable
"From Pinot Noir grown on clay and limestone soils, this aromatic, fresh wine offers a delicious balance between the red fruits and acidity. A ripe wine, it shows a distinctly fruity character, and is ready to drink now.",Châtenoy,Isabelle et Pierre Clément
"Honeyed layers of yellow peach and tangerine seem to be dusted by bramble and mineral tones in this semisweet Riesling. It's a spry, zesty wine with a lip-smacking, juicy finish. Drink now through 2019.",Full Monty,Lakewood
"Attractive and fruity, this warm wine is crisp and fresh at the same time. Yellow fruits and tangy orange zest are complemented by minerality and a refreshing aftertaste. It is ready to drink.",,Louis Chevallier
"Roasted coffee bean, baked plum, charred earth, toast, vanilla and menthol aromas come together on this. The palate is firm but rather evolved, offering dried, dark-skinned berry, mocha, anise and a confectionary note wrapped in assertive close-grained tannins that dry out the finish.",,Madonna Nera
"This wine is all fruit, with bright acidity and refreshing apple and Rocha pear flavors. It is juicy, light and crisp, a fine apéritif style with its perfumed final acidity. Drink now.",Tradition,Michel Vattan
"Carignane and Petite Sirah join the party in this stewy, big and juicy wine, from head-trained vines averaging 45 years old. Briary blackberry mixes leather and fig compote with a strong seasoning of black pepper. There's no shortage of heat on the finish.",Estate Grown Old Vine,Mounts
"Made with 85% Cabernet Sauvignon and 15% Petit Verdot, this shows subtle aromas of blackcurrant, bell pepper and a whiff of black olive. The round, straightforward palate shows black cherry, toast and a hint of vanilla. Drink through 2018.",Il Cucchetto,Pepi Lignana
"A tangy, zesty wine with a strongly mineral texture, this is fruity and fresh. It's full of green plum, herbal and gooseberry flavors. With its texture and structure, it needs to age, so drink from 2017.",,Philippe Girard
"In this wine, herbal, green flavors bring out a bright, fruity character. It's fresh and crisp, while also having ripe green fruits and a light touch of spice. Drink now.",Tradition,Roland Tissier et Fils
"Toast, oak, roasted coffee bean, mature plum and underbrush aromas lift out of the glass. The taut palate is loaded with oak-driven spice, espresso, a green note of bitter sage and dried berry but it lacks fruit richness. Astringent tannins clench the finish.",Riserva,Solaria
"Very deep color, potent aromas and a dense, but velvety texture paint a bold picture for this full-bodied wine. It has the drama and flavor recalling an expensive red, without overpowering tannins or a high price.",Nighthawk Black,Bota Box
"Grapefruit, pear and vanilla mark this medium-bodied, moderately dense and youthful wine that also offers peeks of caramel and toffee midpalate. The weight and length give way to a zesty, pithy finish.",CCR Single Vineyard,Cambridge California
"Friendly and flavorful, this offers bright butter and fruit aromas, opulent pear and baking spice flavors and a lingering, vanilla-like finish. The texture is plush and the balance leans toward ripe and rich.",,Dachshund
"Fresh apple, pear and tangerine flavors revitalize the palate in this crisp, approachable Sauvignon Blanc. It's uncomplicated yet elegant, finishing on a penetrating streak of lemon-lime acidity.",,Hosmer
"A blend of fruit from Williamson, Bitner and Hells Canyon vineyards, this wine offers aromas of woodspice, mulberry, vanilla and mesquite. There's texture to the flavors along with some astringency to the tannins.",Three Vineyard Cuvée,Koenig Vineyards
"Plum and currant aromas are gaseous at first, then minerally. This is tight, high in acidity and tannic. Rubbery, lightly briny cherry and plum flavors are held together by firm acidity, while this feels tight and wiry late, with herbal notes and tannic grab.",,Les Mines
"Aromas of toast, cedar and black currant jam lead the nose. The rather lean palate offers tart red currant, ground pepper and oak-driven spice but not a lot of fruit richness. Assertive, astringent tannins leave a mouth-puckering finish.",,Poggio al Lupo
"An extremely pungent florality hits the nose on this sweeter bottling, with orange blossoms, strong white flowers and a quinine character. The palate is brightly sweet but far from overly done, with perfumed night jasmine mixing into more orange-blossom elements. Perhaps this wine is an acquired taste, but it's clean and crisp.",Margaret's Vineyard,Robert Hall
"Young and sharp-toned, this shows a strong streak of oak with a bitter edge to it. More bottle age may help to soften it up a bit, but for now it's all about oak and apple without much else. Cellar it awhile or give it extra aeration.",,Tinhorn Creek
"Aromas of pine forest, wild berry, chopped herb, brown spice and a toasted note lead the nose. The ripe palate shows dried cherry, sage, anise and coffee bean alongside a backbone of assertive tannins that grip the somewhat abrupt finish.",,Tornesi
"A bouquet of peach, melon and freesia sets the scene for flavors of white peach, apricot, watermelon and rose petal with a touch of spearmint. It is bright on entry and soft in the mouth, and the spearmint note holds strong into the bright finish.",,Turasan
"Rich blackberry and chocolate form around chalky tannins and a juicy palate, with a waft of cigar in the distance. Medium bodied, round and soft, the finish is brushed in cherry and pomegranate.",,Louis M. Martini
"Tim Knappstein's decision to focus on the Adelaide Hills bears fruit in this terrific-value Pinot Noir. The aromas and flavors are a colorful mélange of beets, black cherries and purple heirloom tomatoes, backed by a rich texture and a long velvety finish. Drink now until 2020.",The Dagger,Riposte
"Stewed prune marinated in spirits, coconut, espresso and grilled herb aromas unfold in the glass. The firm palate offers dark cherry, coffee, anise and tobacco alongside bracing tannins bright acidity. Best after 2019.",Cannubi Boschis,Virna Borgogno
"A strongly wood aged wine, powered by tannins and dense fruits, it is concentrated and still young enough for the wood to show through although the fruit is developing well. This is a structured wine that will need plenty of time to age so drink from 2018.",Casa Velha Colheita Seleccionada,Adega de Favaios
"This nose is rather closed but the firm palate offers ripe sour cherry, dark cooking spice, pipe tobacco and chopped herb. Fresh acidity and youthfully austere but refined tannins provide the backbone. Drink after 2019.",del Comune di Serralunga d'Alba,Alessandro Rivetto
"Vanilla, black-cherry soda and a berry crème brûlée character combine for a very playful and fun nose on this bottling. The palate tightens up that fun a bit but stays sexy, offering dark chocolate, red-berry jam and a shred of mint.",Soul Shaker Cass Vineyard,Ascension Cellars
"Stainless-steel fermented, this wine remains pungently aromatic in woody, earthy tones, with accents of fragrant orange blossom and pear, while staying crisp and light on the palate. Honey and lemon combine on the complex finish.",Estate Grown,Balletto
"Classic Nebbiolo aromas of red berry, underbrush, tilled soil, aromatic herb and spice lead the nose. The bracing palate offers dried black cherry, anisette, mocha, toast and grilled herb alongside extremely assertive tannins and brisk acidity. Drink 2019_2031.",Sottocastello di Novello,Ca' Viola
"Aromas of red berry, sage, cinnamon and a whisper of menthol lead the nose and carry over to the solid palate together with juicy sour cherry, black raspberry, licorice and tobacco. It's a classic Barolo, straightforward and delicious, with ripe, integrated tannins and fresh acidity.",,Cantina del Nebbiolo
"This opens with aromas of woodland berry, crushed herb and a whiff of well-integrated oak. The firm palate delivers dried Morello cherry, baking spice and mocha alongside firm, fine-grained tannin. It closes on a note of star anise. Drink 2016_2021 to capture the fruit richness.",Bricco Rocca,Cascina Ballarin
"Firm and full-bodied, this opens with aromas of mature plum, underbrush, baked earth, vanilla and exotic spice. The high-toned, chewy palate doles out ripe black cherry, raspberry jam, vanilla, mocha, white pepper and mint alongside polished tannins.",Sil Nizza,Cascina Liuzzi
"Classic Albariño aromas of sea brine, tropical fruits, lees and dust precede a minerally lemony palate with tangy flavors of lemon, lime and gooseberry. This is a fresh clean example with a long stony citrusy finish.",Sin Palabras Castrovaldés,Castro Brey
"Nicely layered aromas of clove, graphite, iron and simmering black cherries show on the complex nose of this well-priced bottling. More iron and raspberry appear on the palate, where a balanced acidity pairs well with the strong mineral character.",Estate Grown,Chamisal Vineyards
"This wine is all about juicy blackberry and delicious ripe black plums. It is structured, with dry tannins in the background, but up front is fruity, bold and with a lightly smoky, perfumed aftertaste. It is almost ready to drink; just wait until late 2016.",Prieuré de Cénac,Château Saint-Didier-Parnac
"Vineyards in the upper Douro Superior region are able to produce surprisingly fresh and fruity whites like this, despite the heat and dry climate. Old vines go into this yellow and green fruit flavored wine with its lively acidity and totally refreshing palate. Drink from summer 2016.",Contraste Branco,Conceito Vinhos
"Though 28 g/L of residual sugar is indicated, this lushly fruity and thoroughly delicious wine does not seem at all sweet, and just barely off dry. Peaches and pears combine in a lightly spicy but intensely flavorful wine with a myriad of food pairing possibilities, notably Thai noodle dishes, or poultry with a fruit sauce.",Estate,David Hill
"This is a floral blend of 48% Roussanne, 35% Marsanne and 17% Viognier. The Roussanne speaks loudest, while the whole offers a mix of dried and fresh apricot and creamy vanilla wafer that's light bodied and fresh with acidity.",Cuvée Luke Saralee's Vineyard,Davis Family
"This blend of Bordeaux grapes with Syrah is rich and spicy. It is made to be drunk young, with touches of toast and a dense texture that brings out the perfumed character of Syrah balanced with Bordeaux structure. The wine is ready to drink, although it will be better from late 2016.",La Croix d'Argon,Domaine d'Arton
"From vines on the cooler left bank of the Serein river, this wine offers notes of toast, spice and ripe yellow fruits cut by tense, zingy lemon zest. It is textured, tense and full of minerality. Drink from 2017.",Vaillons Premier Cru,Domaine Gérard Duplessis
"Delicate whiffs of tangerine and lime intensify on the palate of this Spätlese Riesling, complemented by swathes of green herb and pine frond. It's superlight in texture, yet penetrating, showering the palate in sweet-tart grapefruit and Meyer lemon flavors. The finish is crisp and clean.",Graacher Himmelreich Spätlese,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"While soft and approachable, this wine also offers a density of black currant and cherry that gives significant power and juicy exuberance. Sizable tannins risk overtaking the fruit, but never do, with the oak imparting a jolt of smokiness on the finish.",Laki's Vineyard Estate,Eleven Eleven
"Aromas of mature dark-skinned fruit, scorched earth, exotic spice and a whiff of blue flower lead the way. The vibrant, savory palate doles out juicy black cherry, plum, ground pepper and anise set in a framework of racy acidity and softly polished tannins. Enjoy through 2018.",Bricco dei Merli,Elvio Cogno
"In this ripe vintage Folin has produced a full-throttle Tempranillo: tannic, chewy and firm. Blue plum and black cherry anchor the palate, with notes of tobacco, toast and composted earth.",Estate,Folin Cellars
"Dark and brooding, this opens with aromas of French oak, espresso, clove and mature blackberry. On the extracted palate, licorice, vanilla and sweet baking spice accent a core of baked plum while bracing, fine-grained tannins provide the framework.",Marasco,Franco M. Martinetti
"This appealing, youthful wine wraps bright raspberry fruit in a fragrant blanket of toasty oak. It's lively, detailed and impeccably fresh, with the balance to age gracefully through at least 2021.",Backbone,King Estate
"Big red fruit embraces chewy, integrated tannins in this vineyard-designate, a full-bodied explosion of ripeness and bold expression. While powerful, it holds on to nuance via streaks of high-toned citrus, allowing the wine room to breathe and remain lighthearted.",Campbell McKinney Vineyard,Kobler
"This 100% Dijon-clone bottling offers a bold mix of peach, banana and pineapple. It's fruit-driven from top to bottom, with supporting acids to keep it fresh and invigorating.",Truffle Hill,Left Coast Cellars
"Aromas of baked plum are joined by earthy whiffs of truffle, leather, game and cured meat. The aromas carry over to the ripe, dense palate along with fleshy black cherry, anise, mocha and mint. Velvety tannins provide the framework while a confectionary note backs up the finish. Drink 2017_2022.",Fraschin,Manzone Fratelli
"Alluring aromas of violet, rose, dark berry and a hint of cured meat emerge on this firmly structured wine. The palate is rather extracted, offering rich black cherry, chocolate, tobacco and sweet spice alongside grippy tannins.",Pressenda,Marziano Abbona
"Waves of French oak, coconut, espresso and menthol lead the nose. The dense, extracted palate offers raspberry jam, vanilla, toasted oak and kirsch alongside packed, fine-grained tannins. The warmth of alcohol and a leathery note signal the finish. Nebbiolo purists may find the new wood sensations excessive but if you're into concentrated, oak-driven wines, you'll especially enjoy this.",Roche d'Ampsej,Matteo Correggia
"Red currant and alpine herb aromas lead the nose on this blend of Schiava and 5% Lagrein. The bright palate offers sour cherry, strawberry, tangerine zest and a touch of toasted almond alongside fine-grained tannins and fresh acidity.",Glogglhof St. Magdalener Classico,Franz Gojer-Glögglhof
"Wild strawberry and alpine herb aromas mingle in the glass. The bright palate delivers crushed red cherry, cinnamon and green tea alongside firm but polished tannins and fresh acidity.",,Franz Haas
"Aromas of candied fruit, toasted oak, vanilla and a balsamic note lead the nose. The palate offers dried apple, dried apricot, almond and a honey note alongside soft acidity. It closes on a note of roasted coffee bean. The fruit is already fading so enjoy soon.",More Maiorum,Mastroberardino
"A mix of strawberry-rhubarb compote, mocha-chocolate and chalky tannins are featured in this 80% Cabernet with smaller amounts of other Bordeaux varieties blended in. Dense and meaty, a powerful jolt of cassis rears its head on the finish.",,Terra Valentine
"This wood-aged Guru is a rich (while lemon- and lime-flavored) spicy wine. It has a strong mineral element with a crisp, tangy, steely character. Its fruitiness is tempered by the complex texture that promises aging for a few years. Drink from 2017.",Guru,Wine & Soul
"This has some of the concentration you would expect from old vines, along with a lighter, fresher character that gives the wine a lift. It's as much young and fruity as structured, a well-balanced wine that will be ready to drink from 2016.",Lua Cheia em Vinhas Velhas,Wines & Winemakers
"Tart white peach and green apple flavors penetrate through the palate of this intense, focused wine. Steely and dry, it finishes long with a revitalizing streak of lime and green floral notes.",Dry,Peter Nicolay
"Aged in French oak for 16 months, this soft and supple Pinot is ready for immediate enjoyment. The fruit leans toward raspberry and Bing cherry, with subtle streaks of tea, chocolate and a finishing kick of heat. The balance and texture suggest that it can be cellared for a few more years.",Reserve,Argyle
"Delicate aromas of white spring blossom, Bartlett pear and white peach lead the nose. The vibrant, refined palate delivers tart green apple, lemon zest and a mineral note alongside tangy acidity.",,Borgo San Daniele
"Two small schist plots provide the basis of this wine. They give a tight texture, very crisp in character, that needs aging. Green apples, grapefruit and lemon zest add the fruit, although the texture dominates at this young stage. Drink from 2016.",La Grange Vieilles Vignes Sur Lie,Domaine Luneau-Papin
"Generous tannins surround a core of ripe, brawny blackberry fruit and a powerful imprint of dried herb in this wine, which is rich and concentrated. Earthy tobacco and chocolate seal the finish.",,Cliff Lede
"This is already tan in color and showing some signs of premature aging. Aromas of white gumdrop, peach, nutmeg and wood resin set up a full, woody, resiny palate that matches the bouquet. Savory, oaky flavors of dried stone fruits__pricot in particular__inish long, nutty, savory and woody.",Nelin,Clos Mogador
"This wine's nose begins very steely, with fresh cracked chalk aromas, then allows soft caramel candy, pound cake and white flowers to emerge. The very inviting flavors include apple flesh and skins, fresh cut pineapple and slated nuts, all clinging to a very pithy element that cuts the entire palate.",,Consilience
This wood-aged wine is full of toasty fruits and a mineral texture. Ripe apricots and sweet apples give a fruity aspect that is balanced by the toast and spice. Perfumed acidity finishes this wine that suggests further aging. Drink from 2016.,Monte Cascas Grande Reserva,Casca Wines
"This vibrant wine opens with varietal aromas of cut grass, passion fruit and crushed tomato vine. The linear palate offers up yellow peach, cantaloupe and a hint of ginger drop alongside racy acidity. It offers excellent value.",,Cembra
"With a bright purple tint, this opens with aromas of raw oak, pencil lead, lettuce leaf and black currant. It's pinching and tannic on the palate, with lightly green, juicy blueberry and cassis flavors. A rubbery feeling, tannic palate is potent and calls out for a pairing of steak or lamb. Drink through 2019.",,Polkura
"Made with organically farmed grapes, this opens with aromas of honeysuckle and peach blossom. The palate doles out juicy peach, tart apple, white almond and a mineral note. It's balanced with bright acidity.",Catulliano,Pratello
"From vineyards in the southern Minho, close to the Douro Valley, this blend of Loureiro and Arinto is rich and full in the mouth. It has spice from wood aging as well as crisp apple and pear flavors that are laced with pink grapefruit. Drink from 2016.",Edição Reserva,Quinta da Calçada
"This blend of Alvarinho and Trajadura is initially crisp and fresh. Gradually, it broadens out into a rich wine with a blend between lemon and yellow fruits that is delicious and concentrated. This tangy wine is developing well, and is ready to drink now although it will age.",Torre de Menagem Escolha,Quintas de Melgaço
"A strength of oak and burly black fruit in this single-vineyard designate makes it intense and big. In the background, an unexpected minty, forest floor quality overtakes the aromas at first, but blows off over time. The wine finishes as intensely as it starts, awash in toasty oak.",Bush Crispo Vineyard,Ram's Gate
"Made with overripe Garganega grapes, this opens with aromas of baked yellow fruit, lightly toasted oak and roasted almond. The round palate offers candied citrus zest, mature apple, dried apricot, a confectionary note and a hint of liqueur. Soft acidity accompanies the rich flavors.",Le Rive,Suavia
"Floral, this medium-bodied white is creamy and touched by richer notions of pear, pineapple and vanilla, reflective of its warmer appellation in a warm year. French oak (40% of it new) aged the wine for under a year. With a touch of honeysuckle and nutmeg, the minerality is subtle.",Stuhlmuller Vineyards Reserve,Summers
"Made predominantly with Chardonnay and partly fermented in oak, this elegant wine unfurls with aromas of chamomile flower, Golden Delicious apple, Mediterranean herb, honey and a whiff of toast. The vibrant palate offers white grapefruit, crisp apple, toasted hazelnut and lemon drop. It's well balanced, with bright acidity.",Villa Margon,Tenute Lunelli
"The immediate impression is that this wine is heavy, ripe and oaky. Sawdust and wood grain are the lead aromas. In the mouth, this chunky Priorat is hard, with grating tannins. Hickory and toasted berry flavors finish hot and resiny.",,Vall Llach
"Aromas convey pear, green apple and flint. The crisp palate delivers nectarine, Granny Smith apple, pineapple, mineral and tinge of Mediterranean herb. It's nicely balanced, with bright acidity.",Ventidue,Villa Raiano
"From a warm, ripe vintage, this reflects those characteristics with fruit-driven flavors of plum, berry and apricot. Round and full-bodied, it finishes with a lick of orange liqueur.",Treehouse Estate,Vista Hills
"An exotic collection of olive, rubber, blackberry, blueberry and cardamom aromas stirs interest. The palate is at first high in tartaric acid but later reveals itself to be loamy and chunky. Baked flavors of blackberry and earth finish short, salty and blocky, with a reverberation of pointed acidity.",Cuvée Alexandre Apalta Vineyard,Lapostolle
"From a very reliable series of well-priced wines, this one shows a clean nose of slate, rose petals and a hint of lilac. The light and airy flavors are reminiscent of rose water, with olallieberry and hibiscus elements spicing up the palate.",667,Noble Vines
"Aromas of woodland berry, pressed rose petal and alpine herb lead the nose. The firm palate offers dried cherry, anise and espresso alongside mellow, buffed tannins.",Praepositus Riserva,Abbazia di Novacella
"Apple, pear, clover honey and mineral aromas make for a fresh, clean nose. Similarly, the palate is fresh and zesty, with crisp flavors of orange, grapefruit and nectarine. A fresh, stony finish fits the bill.",Organic,Alta Alella
"The wine is full of ripe berries, red and black fruit flavors. Soft tannins are a subtext to the main fruitiness. Although the tannins are still dry, they will soften to give a fresh wine that will age quickly. Drink from 2016.",,Château Vrai Caillou
"From the cool 2011 vintage, this wine brings notes of black tea, dark raspberries and herbs. It's tangy with lip-smacking plum and cranberry flavors backed by firm tannins.",Grenache 42,Cowhorn
"Pretty and polished, this Pinot is delicately structured, with a great burst of acidity and a dry, spicy finish. The raspberry, vanilla and toast flavors are a little thin, but pleasant and complex. It's ready to drink now.",Vineyard Montage,Cru
"Peppery and bright in acidity, this blend of half Grenache and lesser percentages of Mourvèdre, Syrah and Counoise is a bit mixed. On the one hand it offers red raspberry and pomegranate and perfumed aromatics; on the other hand, the earthiness detracts.",Coda Rouge,David Girard
"Simple but friendly aromas of green fruits and spring vegetables set up a lemony feeling palate, with flavors of lime, green apple and herbs. This shows pyrazines on a juicy finish, but not so much that the wine comes across green, vegetal or bitter.",Select Terroir,Santa Ema
"This starts with aromas of lemon peel, grapefruit and mineral, with a hint of toasted bread crust. The linear palate offers lemon drop, nectarine and apples alongside racy acidity but it lacks fruit richness.",Madre Perla,Perla del Garda
"Subtle aromas of smoke, Bartlett pear and Granny Smith apple carry over to the palate along with a citrusy note and a hint of raw almond.",,Peter Zemmer
"This is soft, fruity and already delicious with ripe red fruits. There's no wood aging, and the wine displays berry flavors, balanced acidity and a soft, jammy aftertaste. Drink 2014.",Terra de Lobos,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Rich blackberry and currant flavors mark this Cabernet. It's bone dry, very tannic and acidic, giving it a severe mouthfeel that's not likely to age out. But it's elegant and food-friendly. Decant it for a few hours.",,Reaper
This attractively priced wine has nice acidity and subtle flavors of pear and lemon. A pronounced swaddling in oak reveals itself on the nose and mid-palate. Enjoy it with food on the richer side.,Estate Grown,LangeTwins
"This wine boasts blackberry, raspberry, white pepper and earthy sensations. It's simple but well-made and cries out for food such as hearty minestrone soup.",Drago,Lechthaler
"An apple-driven wine, with great flavors of red apples, light pears and intense, tangy acidity. It's already a delicious, with freshness and a touch of minerality. Drink now.",,Domaine Laroche
"The challenge for the winemaker in future vintages is to tame these hard, fierce tannins. With sour cherry candy and sandalwood flavors and tart acidity, this '11 is rustic-chic. Enjoy with an upscale hamburger.",,Donati
"Saline and basic citrus aromas feed into a fresh, light-bodied palate with citrus, lettuce and minerally flavors. A modest, firm finish is light but clean. This epitomizes the good qualities of value-priced Chilean SB.",Classic Collection,Echeverria
"An easy-drinking wine, it conveys aromas of tropical fruit, Bartlett pear and a hint of saline. The palate offers green apple, banana and almond alongside crisp acidity.",Pansere,Fraccaroli
"This jammy, crowd-pleasing Zin is well put-together, soft in blackberry spice and has just a trace of wintergreen on the nose. Widely distributed and value-priced, it's a steal worth stocking up on.",Old Vine,Gnarly Head
"A little oak, brisk acidity and good flavors of lemons, limes and mangoes mark this dry, stylishly creamy wine that's fine for drinking now, at a good price.",,Hess Select
"Subdued aromas include white spring flowers, pear and apple. The palate delivers green apple along with a hint of lemon peel and almond. You'll notice the warmth of alcohol on the close.",,Kellerei Kaltern Caldaro
"This single-vineyard Pinot is a bit tough. The main issue is the tannins, which are edgy. It's ripe in raspberries, pomegranates and cola, with good acidity and a jacket of oak. Drink up.",Huber Vineyard,La Montagne
"This Livermore Valley producer travels to Lodi to make this Zin, a smattering of 4% Petite Sirah blended in. Intense in cherry-watermelon candy aromas, its flavors develop into tart cherry, blueberry and spice. With soft tannins this wine is straightforward, with the finish all about dusty cigars.",,Longevity
"It opens with aromas of pineapple, papaya and stone fruit. The lively plate offers sweet yellow peach, mango and cantaloupe alongside crisp acidity.",I Prandi,Marcato
"This blend of Merlot and Cabernet has aromas of bell pepper, black currant and a hint of cedar wood. The palate shows one-dimensional flavors of plum, black currant and oak.",Tabbor Selezione,Piera Martellozzo
"Despite ripe cherry, red licorice and cola flavors, this Pinot feels heavy and tannic in the mouth. It lacks the delicacy you want in the variety. It will age for many years, never quite shedding its rusticity.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Bernardus
"A ripe, full wine that has almost too much weight, it offers a very rich texture and firm tannins. The blackberry jelly fruits are dense and powered by a fruity feel. Drink from 2016.",,Château Larteau
"Obviously young and still showing the brief wood aging, this is an attractive and juicy wine with ripe red berry fruits, spice from the wood and a soft texture. It should be ready to drink by 2015.",Cuvée Michael,Château Petit-Freylon
"This is a smooth, attractively ripe and aromatic wine. It has soft black fruits, and full tannins. Developing quickly, it already shows attractive fruitiness Drink from 2016.",,Château Tour Haut-Caussan
"Plenty of rich, forward raspberry and cherry pie filling flavors in this Pinot, which shows a delicate, silky mouthfeel. With crisp acidity and a spicy finish, it's easy to drink now with burgers and grilled salmon.",Appellation Series,Cru
"A familiar brand on Portuguese wine shelves, this is a ripe wine, soft and smooth. Light tannins are finely integrated with the red berry fruits and juicy acidity. It's an easy wine that has good structure. Drink now.",Cabriz Colheita Seleccionada,Dão Sul
"Prominent notes of char and toasted wood lend a dark, oaky tone to preserved black cherry and plum flavors on this medium-bodied Pinot Noir. The palate is brightened by crisp acidity and faint hints of violet and blackberry, but overwhelmed at present by oak.",Lahrer Trocken,Weingut Stadt Lahr
"Blended from all five classic Bordeaux varieties, based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine suffered from the cold vintage. The wine is tannic and acidic, and the cherry and currant flavors are modest. The winery did its best to install elegance, and succeeded, but it's a wine to air and drink now.",Symmetry Red,Rodney Strong
"Made from a blend of 80% Nero d'Avola and 20% Merlot, this hearty wine opens with aromas of underbrush, tobacco leaf, mature plum, bell pepper and black berry. The round palate offers notes of juicy blackberry, cocoa, vanilla and expresso.",Triskelè,Duca di Salaparuta
"This single-vineyard selection is 100% varietal, with deep cassis, dark chocolate and espresso flavors. The alcohol comes out as a slight burn, but the tannins have been nicely rounded off and this will drink well immediately.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Fidelitas
"Firm and concentrated, this 80/20 Viognier/Roussanne blend brings bright and fresh scents and flavors of lemon peel and grapefruit, with bracing acidity. It's just right for warm weather outdoor dining.",Lawrence Vineyards Freyja,Gård
"This wine has unusual, penetrating, floral aromatics and a liqueur-like character. It was fermented in a mix of new and neutral French oak, and a caramel character comes in as the wine breathes open. Citrus peel and floral flavors remain through an extended finish.",Lawrence Vineyards Grand Klasse,Gård
"For the vintage, this is a surprisingly soft wine. It's already juicy, full of fresh strawberries and soft tannins. That makes for a delicious wine, rounded with a touch of wood. It's not likely to age much beyond 2017,  but is certainly attractive now.",Les Vaucrains Premier Cru,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"A dark tint and ripe aromas of blackberry, black plum and leather are appealing and inviting. This is weighty and full-bodied, with blackberry, boysenberry and cassis flavors. There's not a lot of nuance or complexity, but overall this is clean, tasty and generous.",Roble,Tierras Guindas
"A blend of Xinomavro and the native grapes Krasato and Stavroto, this is an elegant wine showcasing aromas and flavors of plum, cherry, tobacco and violet. Mineral and coffee notes add to the poised character.",Reserve,Tsantali
"This is a luscious wine but has an elegant balance, thanks to the mineral undercurrent so typical in Greek wines. On the nose, toast, vanilla and smoke lead, while flavors of apple, peach and flower follow. Soft and generous in style, but finishes clean.",Reserve,Santo Wines
"The nose is lifted with bright spice and suggestions of pungent herbs. Black fruits carry a touch of mocha and lead into a crisp, moderately tannic finish. Balance and length are excellent.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Kaella
"Dry and layered in crisp melon, lime and lemon zest, this aromatic SB is complex and kissed by honeysuckle. It's a natural go-to for shellfish, especially Hog Island oysters from the coast near Point Reyes. A warm goat cheese salad would also do nicely.",Magnolia Lane,Kunde
"Fresh, crisp apple and pear are touched with delicate swathes of cream and oyster shell on this elegant, impeccably balanced Chardonnay. The palate is brisk with lemon and lime acidity, but builds in richness and texture on the finish. A remarkable value at $13.",Estate Bottled Barrel Fermented,Lamoreaux Landing
"Concentrated, compact aromas of black fruits are generous but also monotonous and low on character. A big, bulky palate is round but offers enough acidic kick to keep everything above water. Baked, flat flavors of black fruits and roasted meat finish smooth but low on pulse. Drink through 2017.",Reserva,Linaje Garsea
This attractive village wine has ripe fruits as well as a more steely texture. Wood flavors give smoothness that rounds out the wine and enhances the yellow fruit flavors. Drink now.,,Louis Latour
"Aged for a year in new oak, this hefty wine opens with aromas of vanilla, chocolate, plum and toast. The dense, juicy palate delivers concentrated blackberry, blueberry extract and vanilla, but you'll also notice an alcoholic warmth.",Don Antonio,Morgante
"This opens with barrel-based aromas of resin and spice. It's round, creamy and Burgundian on the palate, with flavors of spiced apple, walnut and a hint of oxidation. Things flatten on the finish, which tastes yeasty and like toffee.",Ultreia La Claudina,Raúl Pérez
"A citrus-inflected, vanilla-leaning nuttiness consumes the aromas of this offering, which makes for a very pleasant sipping experience. There is good acidity, with apple, lemon and a bit of tropically, including nicely rounded fruit in the midpalate. A dazzling zest continues to the finish as well.",,Roblar
"Here's a perfect go-to, every day Riesling for warm weather. Pretty fruit flavors of peach and apple are laced with orange pekoe tea. Medium-bodied and mouthfilling, it's got excellent length and structure.",Ryan's,Ryan Patrick
"Inky red violet to the eye, this wine offers fragrances of blackberry, roast meat and espresso bean. There is a pleasing interplay between acidity and tannins on the palate, backing flavors of ripe cherry, almond blossom, Mediterranean herbs and a drop of salinity. Heading into the sleek finish, the plush texture does not overstay its welcome.",Centum,Sevilen
"Well structured, it places its raspberry fruit in a compact, focused core. An appealing and balanced mix of herb, baking spices, citrus and white pepper highlights give the wine complexity beyond its apparent lightness. Drink now_2019.",Good Earth Vineyard,Stottle
Mature black berries and dark baking spices take center stage on this refined Nero d'Avola. The palate delivers juicy blackberry and black pepper notes alongside subtle oak and firm tannins.,Lamùri,Tasca d'Almerita
"Steel is the medium and the message, meaning it's completely unoaked, with no malolactic fermentation. The flavors are spicy and bright, mixing cucumber, mint and green melon with a dash of white pepper.",Steel,Three Rivers
"Kicking off with a tight nose of lemongrass and limestone, this is a Viognier for fans of Sauvignon Blanc. It keeps a razor-sharp focus on the palate, with tart apple flavors and zesty acidity that wipes the flavors clean rather quickly, but it verges ever so slightly towards a hint of tropical papaya.",Zaca Mesa Vineyard,Zaca Mesa
"Wood flavors initially dominate this wine. Then the more fruity character shows through to give a toast and citrus character, rounded while tightly textured. The wine has some aging potential, although it could be drunk now.",Climat La Martine,Bret Brothers
"Made from Catalanesca, a rare grape from Campania, this vibrant wine opens with delicate aromas of white flower, beeswax and white tree fruit. The easy-drinking but savory palate offers juicy pear, apple and a hint of hazelnut on the finish. Vinity Wine, Panebianco.",Kat_,Cantine Olivella
"Here's a bright, linear wine that opens with alluring floral aromas that recall Spanish Broom and acacia, with just a whiff of beeswax. The juicy palate offers grapefruit, exotic fruit and pineapple flavors that are accented by energizing mineral notes.",Falango,Colli di Castelfranci
"True to it's name, this blend of traditional Bordeaux grape varieties plus Syrah is big and bold in flavor and mouthfeel. It's also remarkably elegant, however, balancing rich black cherry flavor with tart cranberry notes and layers of savory spice and herb. Fine-grained tannins penetrate the finish. Drink now with a decant, or allow to mellow over the next 3-5 years.",Big Blend,Atwater
"Guigal's regular Saint-Joseph is very good in 2010, combining crisp blackberry and plum notes with savory elements reminiscent of black olive, roasting meat and peppery spice. It's reasonably full bodied, yet finishes crisp and clean, with just a whisper of dusty tannins. Drink it now and over the next several years.",,E. Guigal
"Black as night in the glass, this packs a bit of mystery behind its opaque coloring. There is an intriguing funk on the nose, mushroom-like with a lift of sagebrush but bordering on rich meat. The flavors begin with blackberry before the tannins overtake the mouth with ferocious viscosity__ven more than two hours after being opened. There is something special about this wine, but it may take serious decanting to unlock the gate.",Star Lane Vineyard,Dierberg
"With spice and dark coffee flavors, this wine shows some wood aging. It also has considerable acidity and the brightest strawberry fruit. Lively and fragrant at the end, it can be drunk now.",Côte de Grisey Cuvée Juliette,Domaine Dominique Gruhier
"Light and crisp, it offers layers of lemon chiffon and spicy pear. The at-first luxurious mouthfeel evolves smoothly into crisper, citrus-wrapped acidity. This is a sippable, ideal summer wine.",Foggy Oaks,Dry Creek Vineyard
"Ripe, almost sweet, fruit is full of delicious black plum and berry flavors. The wine is rounded, opulent and generous to a fault. A solid core of darker tannins hold all this richness together. Drink from 2015.",,Château Haut-Monplaisir
"Pristine grapefruit and apple blossom notes lend perfume and elegance to this dry, intensely mineral Riesling. Bracing lemon-lime acidity shocks the palate to attention, intensifying a lean, lingering finish.",Dry,Anthony Road
"Grassy and pungent, this Sémillon-Sauvignon Blanc blend shows excellent structure and vivid fruit character. The grapefruit and pineapple flavors are accented with diesel highlights and a whiff of barrel toast.",Alibi,Black Hills
"A sexy, spicy oak character enlivens this full-bodied and supple-textured wine, standing out in the aroma and then mostly blending into ripe black cherry flavors on the palate. It has a firm, rather tannic texture, a feeling of richness, hints of cinnamon for complexity and a lingering finish.",Manchester Ridge Vineyard,Castello di Amorosa
"As the Riverside County region finds its way, this grape may make a good white option. This winery, which was founded in 1969 by the golf magnate, delivers aromas of salted and honeyed apples, following by a balanced, precise and mineral-driven palate of apple, lemonade and grapefruit.",Reserve,Callaway
"The producer adds a small percentage of Pinot Blanc to the wine to great effect, combining seamlessly with the Sauvignon Blanc and resulting in notes of honeydew, green fig and subtle herb. The blend offers layers that are both fresh and fruity.",,Flying Horse
"Though not labeled as such, this thrilling Riesling comes from the Ancient Lakes appellation and brings aromatic notes of peach, orange blossom and pear. It drinks medium-sweet with abundant stone fruit flavors.",Caliche Lake Vineyard,For a Song
"This firm Pinot Noir has made subtle use of wood aging to round out and become rich. Red cherry fruits fill the mouth with soft tannins and toasty spice giving some complexity. The wine could age, although it is ready to drink now.",,François Millet
"This wine is rich and ripe, oozing with black cherry, boysenberry and strawberry jam aromas and flavors. It feels full and rather soft on the palate, as the acidity and tannins appear very mild.",,Freeman
"Oaky and full bodied, this conveys a strong impression of big berry fruit. Spice and herbal components are underplayed, letting the fruit come forth in all its glory. This is an attractive and ready-to-drink wine.",,Fritz
"This aromatic wine brings aromas of blackberry, vanilla, licorice and medicine cabinet. It's reserved in style but flavorful, with abundant notes of blackberry and anise backed by lightly chalky tannins.",Danforth Reserve,Genoa
"Haute-Serre is high on the plateau above the Lot river. It produces wines that are structured with complex tannins and an austere fruit character. This 2011 is in that mold. It has acidity as well as juicy black fruits, plus striated tannins that are in the process of being smoothed by the wood aging. Drink from 2018.",Château de Haute-Serre Grand Vin Seigneur,Georges Vigouroux
"Very ripe, almost overripe berry fruit greets the nose. Black cherry is in abundance on the palate. This is juicy and full, with notions of compote fruit. The tannins are velvety and ripe, and there is a focusing ray of acid down the middle.",,Gernot and Heike Heinrich
"An unusual yeasty smokiness plays in the ripe apple fruit here. The midpalate is textured and shot through with lemony, bright acidity. The smoky glimpses pop up in numerous places, sometimes even with a caramelized edge. Very interesting and unusual",Spiegel,Johanneshof Reinisch
"Peppery, berry-ish, full-fruited smokiness leaves no doubt that Blaufränkisch is in the glass. This has verve, energy and dark blackberry fruit while freshness lends focus. Very enjoyable indeed.",Goldberg Reserve,Kirnbauer
"This has a pale salmon color and aromas like those of Pinot Noir, including the walk-in-the-forest smell. Crisp cherry flavors lead to an intriguing mushroom note on the finish. Nearly dry, the texture is plush and soothing, while the finish is soft and lingering.",Brut Rosé,Korbel
"This could be considered a liquid dessert, with a rich gold color, abundant aromas of baked apple and pear tart, and tasty vanilla and marzipan flavors. But with 1% dosage it's not overly sweet, just very lush in texture, concentrated in flavor and long on the finish.",,Korbel
"Chunky, ripe blackberry and cassis aromas come with baking spice scents. In the mouth, this feels broad, jammy and tannic, but under control. Ripe flavors of baked blackberry and graphite finish full and creamy but with solid tannic framework. Drink through 2019.",Royale Los Lingues Vineyard,Koyle
"Tightly wound in oak and smoky forest floor, this intriguing wine walks a tightrope between savory characteristics and power that somewhat over take the fruit.",Tomahawk Vineyard,Chimney Rock
"Made from 100% Syrah sourced from the cooler climes of Oak Knoll, this light, easily quaffed wine offers lots of personality and complexity. Luscious watermelon, strawberries and cream are bound within a dry, balanced body. Aromas tend toward the rose garden, with the tiniest, worthwhile suggestion of dried herbs.",Corallina Rosé of,Cornerstone
"This was 100% barrel fermented, and it shows in nose and flavor profile. Apple and melon fruit anchors an unabashedly oaky, buttery-style wine.",Qwam Qwmt,Nk'Mip Cellars
"Delicate notions of white blossom join hints of Galia melon on nose and palate, where the yeast-buffered weight makes itself felt. This is creamy, rounded but elegant and already delicious with its immense floral charm.",Reserve,Martinshof
"Elegantly structured, this offers floral, wild berry and spice aromas. The focused palate delivers bright red cherry, crushed raspberry, leather, white pepper and licorice flavors presented with laser-like precision. Chewy but fine-grained tannins and fresh acidity provide the framework. It's already tempting but it's not fully developed. Drink 2016_2026.",Dei Mazzoni,Tiziano Mazzoni
"This comes from a single vineyard that is owned by several growers but whose fruit is made into a single wine. It is rich, ripe and fruity, a powerful and full-bodied Muscadet. It has spice as well as citrus fruitiness and a rounded texture. Some aging has really improved this wine.",Monnières-Saint-Fiacre,Domaine du Fief aux Dames
"Well structured, this ripe and fruity wine is impressive in its structure. It has smoky flavors, acidity from the red fruits and a firm lining of tannins. Aromatic and rich, still firm and dry, it should age but can be drunk now.",Le Clos,Domaine les Pins
"Lemon balm, peppery arugula and yeasty savoriness combine into a sleek, streamlined wine that goes down all too easily__otwithstanding its wonderful layers and length. The lemony finish lasts and refreshes.",Tradition,Dürnberg
"Hints of char and green tobacco rest alongside spicy berry and cherry aromas. This is juicy and crisp, which reflects 2010's cool conditions. Flavors of currant, plum and spice, particularly pepper, finish toasty and with elegance. Drink now.",Limited Edition,Echeverria
"Ripe and fruity, rich and generous, almost soft in texture, this starts with strawberry-syrup aromas, then tastes like sweet red cherries with light spicy oak accents. It's basically a big soft pillow of fruitiness, but a touch of tannin kicks in on the finish to keep it refreshing.",Old Camp,Sanglier Cellars
"The nose does not want to give too much away, apart from delicacy and ripe yellow pear. The palate is ripe and rounded and has a distinct yeasty, almost nutty savoriness. Pepper then makes an entrance and stays right there to linger beautifully.",Schnabel Reserve,Sepp Moser
"A percentage of Cabernet Sauvignon is blended into this Merlot to give structure around its otherwise soft, round and lingering combination of dark candied plum, cinnamon and cedar. Medium-bodied and not overdone on the oak, the wine finishes with a touch of smoke.",,St. Francis
"Full-bodied and fresh, this offfers attractive aromas of blue flower, crushed black plum, and baking spices with a whiff of graphite. The smooth palate delivers blackberry, bitter cherry, raisin, black pepper and clove alongside firm tannins. Drink 2015_2020.",,Zonin
"A blend of 70% Chardonnay and 30% Pinot Nero, this begins with aromas of chamomile, honey and acacia. The lively palate offers ripe yellow apple, candied citrus and walnut alongside a persistent perlage and bright acidity.",Contessa Maggi,Montenisa
"Crisp plum and floral aromas rest on rocky base and offer up balsamic notes. This Monastrell-driven blend is full in body, with spicy, herbal, wild-brush flavors accenting core dark plum and berry. A lasting finish is herbal, deep and potent. Drink through 2017.",Crianza,Monterebro
"Underbrush, tobacco leaf and raisin aromas lead the way on this structured wine. The smooth palate delivers black plum, prune, black pepper and exotic spice alongside velvety tannins and surprising freshness for the vintage. It closes on a licorice note.",Capitel della Crosara,Montresor
"The wine is structured and concentrated, showing a strong sense of minerality. Citrus and ripe apple fruits are complemented by richer apricot, always cut through with acidity and a tense texture. It needs to age, drink from 2016.",,Olivier Leflaive
"The wine has a great balance between its rich fruits and the wood aging. It shows concentration, the ripe peach and apricots full in the mouth and laced with acidity and full-bodied fruitiness. It's both serious and full of charm, a wine that's developing well and should be ready to drink by 2016.",,Olivier Leflaive
"While the wine is beautifully fresh, it is also structured with tense acidity, strong minerality and layers of citrus and tropical fruits. It's full of fruitiness and likely to be even better in 2016.",Varanda do Conde,Provam
"This is a blend of Alvarinho and Loureiro from the best parcels of Calçada estate. That gives it gravitas, that also comes through strongly from the wood aging. Vanilla and green fruits complement each other, leaving a wine that is both rich and fresh. Drink now.",Edição Reserva,Quinta da Calçada
"Named after the 13th-century house at the center of the estate, this is a rich, full-bodied wine. With citrus flavors at its heart, it also shows a texture that gives minerality from the granite soil, followed by juicy yellow fruits and finishing with intense acidity. Give this wine until mid-2015 to settle down.",Casa do Capitão-mor,Quinta de Paços
"This is another fine vintage for this rare wine. It's loaded with cool climate, mineral-laced scents of grapefruit, kiwi and melon. A whiff of fennel adds further interest. Super refreshing and a nice change from the ordinary sipping whites.",Ribbon Springs Vineyard,Adelsheim
"This fresh, pure value red cranks out raspberry and boysenberry aromas in front of a crisp, tight palate. Ripe, quick-hitting flavors of red-berry fruits and toasty smoke finish zesty, with a lasting note of pie cherry.",Roble,Encanto
"Floral in aroma, this was aged in one-third new French oak and left unfined and unfiltered. It offers tart cherry and wild strawberry notes in a light-toned, ripe package, the secondary characteristics herbal and earthy.",,Cobden Wini
"With a great balance between fruit and acidity, this is just what a 10-Year-Old tawny should be. Ripe fruits are cut by acidity and given a shot of wood aging. Spice and old gold flavors lead to a delicious fresh aftertaste.",His Eminence's Choice 10-Years-Old Tawny,Delaforce
"Fans of no-dosage sparklers will appreciate this elegant, bone-dry wine. Made with Chardonnay, it offers pretty aromas of chamomile, hay, citrus and pear. The sleek palate delivers yellow apple, ginger and herbs alongside a fine perlage and vibrant acidity.",Pas Dosé,Ferghettina
"Packaged in an elegant square-bottomed bottle, this opens with fragrances of peach blossom, stone fruit and citrus. Showing its 100% Chardonnay pedigree, the creamy palate delivers mature yellow apple, white peach and lemon zest alongside bright acidity. White almond and mineral note back up the finish.",Milledì Brut,Ferghettina
"Lime and pineapple, peach and crisp acidity mark this as a fresh, go-to style. The label notes it was fermented both in stainless steel and French oak barrels. It's balanced and true to the fruit and the elegant vintage. Just a hint of butterscotch comes through.",,Lange
"Grapefruit, apple and walnut aromas lead the nose on this graceful blend of 80% Chardonnay and 20% Pinot Nero. The smooth, creamy palate offers pear, lemon zest and roasted almond alongside soft bubbles and fresh acidity. It boasts enough depth and complexity to age for several years. Drink now through 2018.",Electo Brut,Majolini
"While this wine shows plenty of the structure and richness associated with Vosne-Romanée, it also has an open, warm character that shows it developing quickly. Ripe plums and deft tannins combine with attractive acidity to give a full-bodied balanced wine. Drink from 2017.",,Manuel Olivier
"At nearly 30 years old, this is a mature wine. Toast, almonds and honey are the dominant character. It is soft, although still with structure and crisp acidity. The flavors give a sense almost of sweetness, rounded vanilla as well as the brighter freshness. It is fascinating for its age and, like many older Champagnes, it needs to breathe before drinking.",Grand Vintage Collection Brut,Moët & Chandon
"Pali's relationship with Shea vineyard grapes goes back at least eight vintages. Done in a lighter style, this new release spent 10 months in 25% new oak. It's pretty, with beguiling flavors of raspberry and red plum, and a vein of minerally acidity that runs through the core. It's approachable now, but should age well through 2020.",Shea Vineyard,Pali
"Blue flower, crushed black cherry and spice aromas lead the nose on this lushly textured wine. The thick palate doles out mature black cherry, plum, raisin and black pepper aromas alongside velvety tannins. It closes on a licorice note. Drink through 2020.",Leone Zardini Riserva,Pietro Zardini
"Earthy, rubbery berry aromas are a touch smoky. This is broad, bold and firm in the mouth, with gritty flavors of briary black fruit, spice and minty green. Chocolate and coffee flavors on the finish come with modest burn and bitterness. Drink through 2018.",,Pittacum
"Aromas of spicy plum cake, blackberry, dried cranberry, freshly ground black pepper, toasted almond and exotic spice all weave together and carry on to the palate. Polished tannins give a smooth texture.",Corte Br_,Sartori
"Willful is the successor to Daedalus. Still quite tight, the regular Dundee Hills bottling has medium concentration and well-ripened strawberry, raspberry and black cherry fruit. Some rose petal aromatics and a streak of cherry cola add complexity and depth.",,Willful
"A Pommard clone, single-block bottling, this is the most complete and satisfying of the winery's block series of Pinots. Cinnamon toast frames a full-bodied wine loaded with blackberry fruit.",Block 10,Winter's Hill
"Here's a boldly structured wine that also displays finesse. It opens with aromas of blue flowers, Asian spices, toast and mature black fruit. The concentrated palate doles out intense blueberry, blackberry and licorice alongside notes of spearmint, roasted coffee bean and black pepper. It's soft and velvety with a nutty finish. Drink from 2016_2023.",Castelrotto,Domìni Veneti
"Pristine apple and lemon aromas are glazed with honey on this sprightly, fresh sweet Riesling. The palate gushes with juicy nectarine and peach flavors, but maintains brisk composure from start to finish.",Bernkasteler Badstube Auslese,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"A blend of Chardonnay, Pinot Bianco and Pinot Nero, this savory sparkler opens with an inviting fragrance of baked bread, tangerine and red berry. The creamy palate delivers crunchy strawberry, baking spices, toasted almond and cookie dough alongside crisp acidity and an elegant perlage.",Brut Rosé,Fratelli Berlucchi
"The Loureiro grape, grown mainly in the Lima Valley in the center of Vinho Verde, produces a distinctly mineral style of wine. This wine has that character as well as some riper tropical fruit notes and pure citrus acidity. The combination is intensely fruity and very refreshing.",,J. Portugal Ramos
"Strongly wood-aged, this is a ripe, toasty wine. The citrus and creamed apple fruits are still working their way through the wood flavors. It's going to be richly fruity wine with a round texture that is cut by acidity. Give it time and drink from 2018.",Clos des Guettes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Mossy, spicy blackberry aromas are more encouraging than what comes after. This is rubbery and astringent, with blackened flavors of licorice and toasted oak.",,San Felipe
"This earthy Chardonnay from a limestone plot has more to do with texture and tight acidity than fruit. It presents a sharp, too-crisp edge.",La Réserve d'Amélie,Gérard Charvet
"There's an assertive green character to this wine, presented in notes of green bean, pepper, tomato leaf and lime peel on the nose and palate. The mouthfeel is broad and slightly flat, with a jalapeño accent on the finish.",,Eikendal
"This Monastrell-Syrah blend feels grabby and tight, while the flavor profile goes in the direction of weedy and resiny. A stalky tasting, almost green finish has a rubbery feel to it.",,Equilibrio
"This forceful Mencía blend pounds away with heavy oak, lemon and violet aromas. The palate is scorching, scouring and short on balance. Inky berry and bitter flavors come with overpowering oak-based clove notes in front of a short finish.",Tradición Barrica,Adegas Moure
"Aromas of candied berries, cinnamon, nutmeg and compost are present on the nose. An edgy, tannic mouthfell and baked, oaky flavors of stewed berry fruits and spice finish hard and tannic.",Alcanta Gran Reserva,Bocopa
"This quirky medium-bodied wine has a flavor spectrum all its own. It smells floral and tastes like spiced red candy, and is noticeably sweet.",,One Hope
"Sharp berry and cherry aromas are like nail polish. A hard palate offers zero give, while plum and cherry flavors are tart before turning more sour and medicinal on the finish.",,25 Lagunas
"This Tempranillo-Cabernet Sauvignon blend smells like mushy strawberries, loamy earth and animal fur. It's jammy and not well balanced, with gummy, candied raspberry and plum flavors. Flat and earthy on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Torre Oria
"This electric pink colored wine is both too rich and too heavy. It only survives because of a fresh streak of acidity that comes through at the end. Otherwise, it is too much.",,Casal da Coelheira
"Elegant and complex, this gorgeous wine is all about finesse, offering enticing aromas of rose petal, iris, perfumed berry, baking spices, anise and chopped aromatic herbs. The structured but silky palate seamlessly melds together juicy Morello cherry, crushed raspberry, cinnamon, clove, licorice and tobacco while bright acidity and ultrafine tannins provide the framework. It's already tempting and impeccably balanced but will be even better in a few years. Drink 2018_2030.",Monprivato,Mascarello Giuseppe e Figlio
"Named for winemaker Ross Cobb's late mother, who more than 20 years ago planted the Coastlands Vineyards' dry-farmed vines__ome of the oldest in the region__his exquisitely distinctive wine celebrates all that is extreme and remarkable about the marriage of site, style and variety. Offering bay laurel in abundance, it has plenty of body to remain vibrant and complex, marked entirely in forest floor and heady allspice, with a nuance of cherry and white pepper on the finish.",Diane Cobb Coastlands Vineyard,Cobb
"This has a grand array of exotic flinty, meaty, smoky and spicy aromas. The powerful flavors taste a bit restrained at first sip, then unfold and seem to expand on the palate. Pure and brilliant layers of ripe blackberry, smoked herbs and darkest chocolate ride on an elegant texture of fine tannins and supportive acidity. Drink from 2018_2030.",Ascent,Terre Rouge
"Still tight, and expertly crafted and structured, this single-vineyard estate wine is meticulous in velvety, plush texture, completely seductive at every angle. Rich red cherry, pomegranate and vanilla improvise against one another without ever missing a beat, finishing in fully integrated flavor. Drink now through 2022.",Katherine Lindsay Estate,Paul Hobbs
"Fresh scents of just-picked rose, bright red berry, baking spice, leather and an earthy hint of game unfold on this stunning wine. The full-bodied palate offers juicy mature cherry, crushed raspberry, licorice, carob, chopped wild mint and clove alongside firm, velvety tannins and bright acidity. Gorgeous!",Lazzairasco,Guido Porro
"This wine stops you in your tracks with its aromas of earth, peat, fire pit, tapenade and coffee. The flavors are outrageously rich, dense and textured, with a lightly tacky feel to the tannins and a hyperextended finish. It's a knockout.",La Paciencia Vineyard,No Girls
"This gorgeous wine, made entirely with Sangiovese, delivers a multifaceted bouquet of blue flowers, ripe plum, black cherry, leather, menthol and clove. The powerful but refined palate doles out layers of juicy black cherry, baking spices, mint, orange zest, anise and tobacco alongside smooth, velvety tannins and surprising freshness for the vintage.",Riserva,Amantis
"Built for aging, this tightly wound, elegant and yet grand wine is sure to develop more nuances and smoothness with time. It smells enticingly like cedar, tobacco and dark chocolate-covered blueberries, yet retains a firmness and reserve that doesn't let those melt into richness on the palate quite yet. Store this confidently in a cool place and enjoy it 2020_2025.",Sentinel Oak Vineyard Pyramid Block,Terre Rouge
"The winery's first reserve-level Cabernet, this is pure Cabernet from the Phinny Hill (60%) and Bacchus vineyards. It offers heady aromas of dried herbs, black currant, cherry, tobacco and graphite. The flavors are tightly wound, immediately accessible but fleshing out and ramping up in intensity after several days open. It shows impeccable acid and tannin balance and has a long life ahead of it. Best from 2020_2032.",Reserve,Gramercy
"A deep color and aromas of toasted baguette, wood smoke and black cherry signal a classic style. The flavors are like dark-chocolate-covered cherries and cranberries. The toasted character of new oak barrels persists from the aroma to the finish, but it's well complemented by ripe fruit, an impressively tannic texture and lingering finish.",Estate,Hourglass
"This full-bodied wine has a treasure trove of flavor complexity and great balance. The color is a deep red with an auburn rim. Aromas present a fascinating medley of cherry, black tea, rhubarb and pine forest, while the flavors weave together ripe Bing cherry, crisp raspberry and subtle Asian spices. It's delicious, and best to drink after 2017.",Deer Meadows Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"All Cabernet from Champoux, Klipsun, Palengat and Wallula vineyards, this wine offers aromas of blackberry, incense, blueberry, pencil lead and barrel spices. On the palate, it's tightly wound with black fruit flavors and a firm backbone of tannins. The oak is primary right now. It needs extended time in the cellar to show itself fully, and will be best from 2022_2030.",,Quilceda Creek
"From a vineyard site at the southern end of Oakville, where it touches Yountville, this is a gloriously dusty, smooth and age-worthy wine, bright in crisp red cherry and cranberry while offering deeper, darker elements of licorice and toffee. Concentrated, it's substantial and yet balanced, with something to say on the long finish.",Beckstoffer Missouri Hopper Vineyard,Janzen
"Smoky leather and cigar make for a formidable entry on the nose before huge, layered tannins rise to the fore. A balance of acidity and brightness lurks beneath the weight, rounded by succulent blackberry and black cherry. Cellar through 2022.",,Darioush
"From a vineyard within the Santa Rosa Plains, this wine opens in pretty, floral aromas of violet and gentle rose. Seductive, it follows with bursts of blood orange and wild strawberry that remain faint and delicate on the palate, light and clear in color, and elegant in intensity. Still, there's enough backbone to the wine to keep it fresh and alive through the long finish.",Toboni Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"This wine speaks to cool-climate with a crispness of rhubarb and strawberry deftly held together by beguiling cinnamon, clove and a bouquet of rose petals. Spicy in acidity, it evolves in the glass to become velvety and seductive in texture, ending in a lingering warmth and depth.",Peters Vineyard Winemaker's Reserve,Kokomo
"From winemakers Dave Lattin and David Ramey, this tremendous wine is sourced from both Coombsville and Yountville, with small amounts of Petit Verdot, Malbec and Merlot in the blend, the latter from Soda Canyon. Smoky cigar, tar and meat direct the nose, atop concentrated, dark, brooding fruit and leathery tannins. Cellar through 2020.",,Merus
"A deep color and an aroma of extreme freshness are the first things to notice, then intense flavors of tart cherry and rhubarb kick in on the palate. This wine is light to medium bodied, and the texture is lively, with lip-smacking acidity and tannin. Best after 2017.",Mariah Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"Charred, smoky aromas of blackberry are ripe as can be, with a note of graphite. The palate is huge, polished, pure and ideal if you like ripe, modern Rioja. Flavors of toast, blackberry, spice and mocha finish toasty, with strong notes of pepper and coffee. Drink this smooth, silky single-vineyard Rioja through 2021.",Viña el Pison,Artadi
"This exuberant wine has aromas of raspberry jam, thyme, orange peel, earth, iron and olive. It's rich and intensely flavorful, with waves of mouthwatering fruit and savory notes that lead to an extended finish.",Jolie Bouche Boushey Vineyard,Efeste
"Aromas of canned pear and peach are not fresh. This is syrupy in the mouth, with a bland mix of vanilla and melon flavors. Oxidized on the finish.",Reserva,Oveja Negra
"Aromas of sweet corn and melon are not convincing. This has little in the way of mouthfeel or substance; flavors of candied fruits taste like corn and wheat, while the finish is spineless.",,Männle
"Wan in color, with vanilla and pear aromas that aren't too fresh, this is a syrupy, sweet, flabby Chardonnay. Soft flavors of pear and pineapple are overdone.",Reserva,Santa Carolina
"This mature PN from a hot vintage isn't showing much life. Earthy, raisiny aromas aren't fresh, while wood tannin and acid are keeping it afloat. Flavors of brown sugar and decayed berry fruits finish stale. This is on its very last legs.",20 Barrels Limited Edition,Cono Sur
"This wine has some good blackberry and oak flavors. But the strong, green hit of vegetable is distracting.",Signature Selection,Bianchi
"This has all the size and weight you've come to expect from Australia's most famous wine. Huge fruit and huge oak combine in a full-bodied, richly textured package that delivers waves of toasted coconut, vanilla and intense dark berries yet remains embryonic more than five years after the harvest. That said, the texture isn't quite as tight or as fine as some other vintages__xpect this to be early maturing by Grange standards, and best from 2020_2040.",Grange,Penfolds
"This is a wine with such a wonderful balance of fresh, lemon acidity and sweetness. Its honeyed texture is cut with a mineral bite that gives opulence and structure at the same time. The wine needs long aging so drink from 2017.",Nouvelle Vague Nummer 9 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"Let the conversations about minerality begin. Whatever it is, or wherever it comes from, it's here big time, adding a lick of steel and a metallic mouthfeel to the underlying fruit. And what powerful fruit it is, ranging from orange and guava to honeydew and citron. This bone dry, crisp Chardonnay is a game changer that will make you look at California Chardonnay differently.",Moon Select,Flowers
"This shows the strength of the 2010 vintage in the Barossa Valley, marrying incredibly ripe fruit with seamless structure. Cinnamon and vanilla notes from the French oak blend easily into blueberry fruit, all grounded by hints of dark chocolate and umami. It's full bodied, lushly textured almost to the point of creaminess and long__idiculously long__n the finish. Drink 2018_2030 and possibly beyond.",RWT,Penfolds
"This is dark and concentrated, as you might expect from Australia's most heralded wine. Oaky scents of maple syrup and vanilla frame hints of mint and superintense dark fruit. On the palate, it's a huge, tannic behemoth that needs 10 years of cellaring, but it delivers plenty of pleasure now in its ultraclean flavors of blackberries, baking spices and vanilla.",Grange,Penfolds
"Williams Selyem expresses the intricacies of this vineyard with more consistency than any other winery. This remarkably intellectual, ageworthy wine is bone dry, with marked acidity and complexity. The flavors range from wild cherries, cola and balsam to raspberry tart and buttered cinnamon toast. Its complexity is like a mandala, increasing in beauty the longer one examines it. A softly tannic bitterness lingers on the finish; drink 2019_2030.",Precious Mountain Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Kracher's sweet Scheurebe is consistently a remarkable wine. It's gorgeously opulent and tightly textured at the same time. Spice, sweetness and acidity combine harmoniously and seamlessly. Age this great wine and don't drink before 2017.",Zwischen den Seen Nummer 10 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"Winemaker Dave Powell is no longer with Torbreck, but the 2007 RunRig is one of his finest efforts. The complexity is almost overwhelming, as the aromas range from peppery spice and roasted meat to blueberry and tappanade. It's mouth filling and expansive, yet retains fine acids and just the right amount of slightly dusty tannins on the long finish. Approachable now, but capable of lasting at least though 2020.",RunRig,Torbreck
"This delicious blend is 70% Cabernet Sauvignon and 30% Syrah, sourced from the Old Stones vineyard. Young, tight and peppery, it gains briary boysenberry flavors as it opens up, along with hints of soy and umami. A streak of maple syrup richness fills out the finish.",The Creator Old Stones,K Vintners
"This opulent wine glides on the palate with richness combined with wonderful acidity. It is the intense freshness and sweetness that shows most strongly along with the super-rich, full texture. This is a superb wine for long aging, drink from 2018.",Nummer 11 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"This is always a major wine, and this vintage is no exception. It is spectacularly ripe, spicy, concentrated and fruity. The yellow fruits, tangy citrus and mineral structure all contribute to an intense complexity. Age this wine for many years and don't drink before 2017.",Dürnsteiner Kellerberg Smaragd,F X Pichler
"You can taste the California sun in every sip of this gorgeous Pinot Noir. It brims with luscious raspberries and cherries accented by brisk acidity and a hint of sweet, smoky oak. It's terrifically complex, with notes of mushroom, orange zest, cola, rosehip tea and persimmon. Dry and elegant, with a wonderful mouthfeel, it's gorgeous now, but will gain earthy complexity over the next 15 years.",Allen Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"RWT (unromantically derived from __ed Wine Trial_) is 100% Barossa Valley Shiraz, aged in 100% French oak. In some vintages, like this one, the combination is incredibly sumptuous, offering layers of blueberry and blackberry fruit intermingled elegantly with hints of French vanilla. It's long, subtle and complex on the finish__ stunning effort. It's approachable now, but should age well through 2030 or so.",RWT,Penfolds
"Old vines on the Heiligenstein hill offer a richly textured, impressive wine. There is terrific concentration allied to fragrant acidity, hints of white flowers and apricot fruit flavors. The future for this powerfully dense wine is considerable, so don't drink before 2018.",Heiligenstein Alte Reben Reserve,Bründlmayer
"As with previous vintages, this rare wine spent 38 months in barrel. Smooth and supple, it's a lush expression of purple and black fruits, generously endowed with darker flavors of smoke, tar, soy and licorice. There is a compelling, yet subtle, umami character overriding all else. It's drinking quite beautifully now, but could age considerably longer.",The Hustler,K Vintners
"Opulent, yes, but also deliciously perfumed, this is a full, rich and very sweet wine. Traminer lends its spice to the wine although the dominant characteristics are opulent botrytis and a liquorous texture. Age this gorgeous wine and drink from 2016.",Nouvelle Vague Nummer 8 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"Scents of honey and marmalade are accented with lemongrass and ginger on this exquisitely composed beerenauslese. It's lusciously rich, with flavors of peach preserves and mango, but accented with hints of warm, exotic spice and a streak of lemony acidity that reverberates on the finish.",_rziger Würzgarten Beerenauslese,C.H. Berres
"With aromas and flavors that range widely from grilled meat, espresso and black olive to dried herbs, cracked pepper and blueberry, this is an enormously complex wine. It's full bodied but balanced by ample acidity, which imparts terrific length to the finish. Drink now_2017, possibly longer.",The Factor,Torbreck
"Scents of sweet spice and orange marmalade waft exuberantly from this honey-kissed TBA. Lusciously sweet, the palate undulates with waves of mango, melon and pineapple flavor, accented with notes of potpourri and saffron. Lingers long with a shower of delicate acidity.",Berg Roxheim Erste Lage Trockenbeerenauslese,Prinz Salm
This is a rich and complex wine that shows spiced pear and a tense structure. It is very aromatic and fresh while also rich and concentrated. A powerful statement of the fruit and minerality of the Wachau and definitely for long-term aging. Don't drink before 2016.,Loibner Steinertal Smaragd,F X Pichler
"Full and very rich, this is an opulent style of wine. It has a ripe, tropical fruit feel to it, offering power as well as fresh acidity. Pineapples and lychees give fruitiness, perfume and spice. The aftertaste, with its liquorous character, is gloriously warm and concentated. Drink from 2018.",,Château Climens
"Great swathes of fruit cross the tannic core in this impressive wine. Hints of wood aging peek out from beneath the sumptuous richness and spice. It is ripe, dense and obviously set for long aging. Drink from 2018.",,Château Léoville Barton
"This is a gorgeously ripe, opulent wine that shows a rich fruit-salad ripeness, as well as darker notes of botrytis. The wine is full and very ripe with flavors of honey, fennel and lemon, with sweetness balanced by acidity. This is a wine that could be drunk soon but will age magnificently. Drink from 2016.",,Château Suduiraut
"This is likely the most ageworthy Shiraz winemaker John Duval has crafted since leaving Penfolds. The oak is subtle, the fruit still tight. It's full bodied but bursting with potential, shown in hints of black cherries and plums, mocha and mint. The finish is long, mouthwatering and softly dusty in texture, making it luscious yet firm. Drink 2018_2030.",Eligo,John Duval Wines
"This is a beautifully structured wine that has ripe apple flavor, as well as delicate acidity and minerality. There is a sprinkle of pepper, crisp citrus and a spicy aftertaste. This is a fine wine with taut texture that promises a good future. Drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Loibner Steinertal Smaragd,F X Pichler
"Aromas of coffee and plum lead the nose. The round palate offers black cherry, plum, espresso and a hint of mocha alongside soft acidity and polished tannins. It's at its ideal drinking window so enjoy soon.",,Pietralta
"Fruity aromas of red berry mingle in the glass together with a light note of cooking spice. The easygoing but rather fleeting palate offers wild cherry, strawberry and grilled herb alongside bright acidity and loose knit tannins.",,Podere il Pozzo
"Black cherry, plum and mint aromas lead the nose and carry over to the juicy palate. It's round, smooth and accessible thanks to soft tannins and fresh acidity. Enjoy soon.",San Enrico,Tenuta La Gigliola
"A blend of Sangiovese, 5% Merlot and 5% Colorino, this opens with subtle aromas of red currant, brown cooking spice and a whiff of sun-baked earth. The straightforward, accessible palate offers wild cherry, coffee, toasted oak and black pepper. Drink through 2018.",,Tenuta Santavenere
"Lees notes take the lead on this unusual wine, followed by aromas of apricot, almond butter and cream. It drinks a hair off dry with a lightly creamy feel.",The Composer,Rasa
"The hot 2003 vintage was probably not the year to make a vintage Champagne. Soft and rounded, this is missing texture and poise. Certainly now mature, it offers attractive acidity at the end.",Millésime Brut,Vincent Couche
"A direct-pressed wine, this has a pretty copper-pink color. It is intense in cranberry and subtle herbes de Provence, with notions of fresh-cut grass and tart Meyer lemon. Young, it needs time in the glass to reveal its complexity and range of flavor. The finish is dry and succulent on the palate.",Dry Rosé of,Virage
"This kitchen sink-style blend is made up of Cabernet Sauvignon (32%), Merlot (25%), Grenache (12%), Malbec (10%) and several other varieties. It's fruit forward, with aromas of raspberry jam, herbs and plum. Flavors are lightly sweet, with restrained but rich flavors and a light grip of tannins.",Mélange Red Varietal Blend,Waterbrook
"Robust and brawny, this substantial offering features concentrated layers of smoke, leather and sage-inflected tannins. It finishes in a wrapping of bittersweet chocolate.",Estate Grown and Produced,Oakville Winery
"Grapefruit, lime and leesy aromas feed into a healthy palate with adequate acidity and raciness. Pithy, briny citrus flavors of lime and orange finish with notes of grapefruit and scallion. Drink now.",,Palma Real
"A blend of organically farmed Sangiovese and 5% Malvasia Nera, this opens with aromas of scorched earth, underbrush and roasted coffee bean. Reflecting the hot vintage, the palate is evolved, offering raisin and dark spice alongside firm tannins. The fruit richness is already drying up so drink sooner rather than later.",Seretina Riserva,Monterotondo
"This medium-bodied, luminous red boasts a pretty fragrance of blue flowers and wild berry. The vibrant, easy-drinking palate doles out crushed raspberry, wild cherry and a hint of clove alongside racy acidity. Enjoy through 2016.",Ducceto,Bartali
"The color is deeper than usual. Aromas are thick with blackberry and boysenberry, and similarly generous flavors seem to spread out and coat the mouth. Accents of chocolate and vanilla add welcome complexity to this rich-tasting wine that's based on Tempranillo grapes.",Lot 466,Cameron Hughes
"Tight and tangy, this is the epitome of an herbaceous wine. Packed with fruit, it is just emerging into a rounder, fuller future, conveying great acidity along with hints of richer yellow and white fruits. Drink from early 2016.",,Chateau les Tuilleries
"This wine is lively and fruity, with a warm character from the ripe, wild-strawberry flavors. It is crisp, dry and deliciously refreshing at the end.",,Château Pey la Tour
"A large (for Saint-_milion) estate of 93 acres has produced a dark wine that is layered with tight, dry tannins. The fruit is still buried under this tough exterior, although there are strong hints of the juicy black currant future. Drink from 2018.",,Château Cantin
"Firmly tannic, this tough wine shows signs of over-enthusiastic extraction. That gives a bitter character that will always leave the wine with a dry core. The black fruits skins give acidity and some final freshness. Drink from 2018.",Les Armoiries de Belcier,Château de Belcier
"Coming from one of the state's most esteemed vineyards, this wine offers aromas of assorted dried herbs, tobacco and glue. The cherry, herb and plum flavors have good depth, with the tannins providing some heft.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Cana's Feast
"This wine tends toward an orange coloration, and shows aromas of warm watermelon, a touch of cantaloupe and even some orange rind. The flavors are very lively, if a little sour, with tangerine peels laced across the cotton-candy warmth.",Purisima Mountain Vineyard Grenache,Beckmen
"Dense blackberry, licorice, leather and herb aromas come together nicely on this Garnacha-Tempranillo blend. Bracing, racy acidity creates edge and sharpness on the palate, while hickory-smoked plum and raspberry flavors finish with firm tannins and dashing acidity.",Vendimia Seleccionada San Nicolás De Tolentino,Marqués de Almonacid
"Jammy aromas of ripe but flat berry fruits and tree bark settle on medicinal and rooty. This feels solid but a touch soupy, with leafy, herbal plum and raspberry flavors. An herbal, saucy tasting finish is easygoing, with drying tannins.",Crianza,Castillo Clavijo
"A bright blend of Sangiovese, 10% Canaiolo and 5% Colorino, this opens with classic varietal aromas of wild berry and fragrant blue flowers. The easygoing palate offers up black cherry and a hint of ground pepper alongside lithe tannins and fresh acidity. It's made to be drunk young so enjoy soon.",,Agricoltori del Chianti Geografico
"Blackberry and pressed violet aromas come together along with a whiff of espresso on this medium-bodied red. The easy-drinking palate offers wild cherry, plum and cooking spice accompanied by smooth, polished tannins. Drink through 2018.",Fonte alla Selva,Banfi
"Bright aromas of tangerine, cantaloupe and pear lead to just off-dry notes of tropical fruit and spritzy soda-water flavors. It goes down easy.",,Barnard Griffin
"Lots and lots of pear upfront on this simple, refreshing, easy-drinking summer wine. The light body and uncomplicated style make this a good party quaffer.",,Biokult
"The plush-feeling plum and blue fruit flavors provide much of the appeal on this pleasant, easy-drinking wine. Aromas of tar and berry provide accents.",,Boomtown
"While elegant and a bit restrained, this dry, mineral-laden Sauvignon Blanc boasts crisp white grapefruit and lemon flavors. It's refreshing and brisk, finishing on a delicate green, herbaceous tone.",,Bouquet
"This is interesting from the opening. Floral aromas include violet, bath soap and lavender along with blueberry. This is tight on the palate, with exotic flavors of blackberry and licorice that turn darker and grittier with airing. Cassis and exotic spice notes push the finish.",Roble,Casa de la Ermita
"Aromas of blackberry, plum, coffee and toast lead the nose. The full-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, toasted oak, coconut and oak-driven spice alongside assertive tannins that leave a drying finish. Drink soon before the remaining fruit disappears.",Clemente VII Riserva,Castelli del Grevepesa
"Aromas of violet, ripe plum and a whiff of espresso lead the nose of this straightforward red. The easygoing palate offers dried cherry, crushed raspberry and a hint of ground pepper alongside fresh acidity and dusty, rather fleeting tannins.",Castelgreve,Castelli del Grevepesa
"Mature berry, underbrush, leather, fennel and a whiff of grilled herb meld together in the glass. The firm, vibrant palate shows ripe wild cherry, black raspberry, licorice, coffee and a balsamic note while bracing, fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Give this a few years to come together. Drink after 2020.",San Bernardo Riserva,Negro Angelo e Figli
"Smooth and appealing, with a smoky edge to the purple plum and berry fruits, this is a flavorful, forward and easy-drinking rendition of what may become Southern Oregon's signature grape. The tannins are silky and the length impressive.",,Obsidian
"From grapes grown in the Douro Superior region, this is an open delicious fruity and ripe wine that is ready to drink. Its black currant and red berry tastes are balanced by spice, wood aged flavors and a core of tannins. The aftertaste introduces fresh juicy acidity.",Vale de Cavalos,Poças
"Ripe fruit flavors and a delicious spiciness combine to make this full-bodied but not very tannic wine easy to love. It smells like cherries and raspberries, tastes full but not sweet, and has a texture that spreads and softens on the palate like melting chocolate. It's made with 50% Zinfandel and almost equal parts Syrah, Carignane and Petite Sirah.",Coro Mendocino,Ray's Station Vineyards
"Resiny oak and mildly stalky berry aromas muscle out cherry and raspberry scents. This feels grabby and clampy, while oaky flavors of mixed berries and baked plum end with coconut-infused oak flavors and notes of raisin and licorice. Drink through 2020.",Reserva,Rioja Vega
"Aromas of mature black-skinned fruit, blue flower and Oriental spice float out of the glass. The round, full-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, blackberry jam, licorice and pipe tobacco alongside chewy tannins.",Zio Nando,Rivetto
"This wine is dark red-violet color to the eye, offering aromas of blackberry, roasted red pepper and juniper berry. It is very smooth on the palate, with flavors of black plum, blackberry, white peach, elderberry and violet. There is a slightly dominant eucalyptus flavor that backs off at the finish, replaced by a fresh cherry juice flavor.",Special Reserve,Segal's
"Wild strawberry and a thicket of dense tannin belie a powerfully strong and elusive wine, still very much tightly wound, indicative of the vintage. A portion (35%) of the grapes were whole-cluster pressed, from tight-spaced, low-yielding vines. A little more oak was used than in most of the producer's other wines, helping to impart a spicy finish.",MK Vineyard,Small Vines
Fresh apple and pear flavors are swathed in fresh herbs and citrus peels in this bristling medium-sweet wine. It's lusciously honeyed but finishes long with honed steely precision.,Bockstein Ockfen Auslese Erste Lage,St. Urbans-Hof
"Raisin and white pepper aromas, ripe fruit, floral and spicy anise flavors and full body add up to a big wine in which the whole-cluster fermentation method can be tasted. The hearty flavors, complexity and firm tannins paint a unique picture, and this bottling makes a dramatic contrast in style from the __egular_ Anderson Valley Pinot Noir.",Whole Cluster,Stemmler
"Dark garnet in the glass, this wine has a nose of strawberry, black plum, caramel and smoked meat. It offers a good balance of acidity and tannins, with flavors of blackberry, blueberry, smoked meat, vanilla and mocha. The vanilla flavor is extended on the palate thanks to lingering silky tannins that eventually dissolve in a note of orange zest.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"Blue flower, mature plum, licorice, clove, mocha and menthol aromas all come together on this brawny red. The warm, bold palate delivers juicy black cherry, espresso, ground pepper and anisette alongside a backbone of fine-grained tannins. Showing the heat of the vintage, it won't need years to come around. Drink 2018_2028.",Castelletto,Tenuta Duecorti
"This concentrated wine was wood aged for six months, giving the lightest touch of oak along with ripe yellow fruits and a crisp tangy aftertaste. It has a touch of spice along with bright acidity at the end. Drink now.",Terra d'Alter Reserva Branco,Terras de Alter
"A blend of three estate-farmed vineyards, this is a velvety-smooth expression of the variety. It conveys a touch more richness and concentration than some of the producer's other wines, at least at the beginning of the glass, when almond and hazelnut rule the day. But then it takes on a lightness toward the lengthy finish, ending in a mix of lemon zest and apple.",Estate,Thomas George
"This wine features a bouquet of cherry, pomegranate and freshly ground black pepper. It is well-balanced on the palate with flavors of pomegranate, strawberry, mace and anise. Smooth tannins are present into the bright yet lasting finish.",Espero,Tulip Winery
"The nose on this appellation blend is full of soft tones of ripe nectarine and pluot, though cut with walnut oil and a citrus edge. It's more pithy in flavor, showing orange bitters, dried apples and more nut oils, slightly oxidative in style.",,Wedell Cellars
"Planted in 1988, this vineyard 's fruit captures the unique minerality found in this AVA. It leaves an impression of sucking on rock__ot a bad thing in a wine. The black-cherry fruit grips the palate with real power and some density, with potent herbal highlights as well. Drink this now through the mid-2020s.",Meredith Mitchell Vineyard,Winderlea
"Dark black cherry in color, this wine offers a bouquet of cherry preserves, matchstick and petrol. It is far livelier on the palate than on the nose, featuring flavors of cherry, pomegranate and bell pepper with a light touch of florality. Chewy tannins make their way across the gum and tongues and are all but erased by a final note of orange zest and cranberry.",,Yatir
"Dark berry, mocha, toast and cooking spice aromas emerge in the glass. The taut palate offers mature black cherry, coffee and dried herb alongside assertive, fine-grained tannins.",Leon,Cascina Luisin
"Cherry-berry and vanilla surround a soft, spicy core of high-toned red fruit. Mellowed with age, the tannins linger in perceived sweetness.",,Azari
"Red rose, bright berry and anisette aromas lead the way. The taut palate offers sour cherry, tobacco, clove and chopped herb alongside bracing tannins and brisk acidity.",Cannubi,Borgogno Giacomo e Figli
"This brawny, forward wine opens with aromas that recall spirits, steeped plum, roasted coffee bean and menthol. The dense, chewy palate offers black cherry liqueur, licorice, espresso and the warmth of evident alcohol accompanied by brooding tannins. Drink sooner rather than later.",Rapet,Ca'Romè
"Aromas of rose, red berry, espresso, grilled herb and toast lead the nose. The taut palate offers crunchy red cherry, raspberry, star anise and white pepper alongside tightly wound, assertive tannins. It closes on a note of roasted coffee bean.",Bernardot,Ceretto
"Earthy aromas of leather, game, sunbaked earth and mature dark-skinned berry take center stage. The tense palate offers dried black cherry, mocha, espresso licorice and tobacco alongside fresh acidity and close-grained tannins.",Margheria,Luigi Pira
"Mature dark berry, crushed blue flower, spice and peppermint aromas lead the nose on this structured red. The firm palate offers ripe black cherry, white pepper, cocoa, star anise and a balsamic note accompanied by bracing tannins. Drink 2018_2016.",Ascheri,Reverdito
"Cherry and plum aromas are accented by buttery oak, leather and animal notes. Solid in feel with firm tannins, this warm-vintage Tempranillo is ripe, loamy and loaded with berry and cassis flavors. A lightly raisiny finish is friendly and round. Drink through 2019.",Reserva,Valdubón
"Aromas of wild berry, dark spice, menthol and a hint of pressed flower lead the way on this straightforward Barolo. The full-bodied palate offers dark cherry, licorice and dried herb alongside firm, ripe tannins. Drink 2018_2026.",Castiglione,Vietti
"This is strongly marked by new oak on the nose at this stage, suggesting toast, brown sugar and coffee, but fruit comes through on the palate where hints of dark berries, cola, clove and cinnamon mingle. The wine is creamy and lush in texture, with ample weight and a lingering finish of dried fruit, vanilla and mocha. Drink from 2018 to 2025.",Coal River Valley Single Site,Dalrymple
"One of the most beautiful package designs in the state introduces a fresh and toasty wine that translates this cool, wet vintage into a most delicate and enjoyable bottle of Pinot. Light cranberry and cherry fruit is set in a gently proportional bed of tart acid and pretty oak, 40% new.",Juel,Antiquum Farm
"Clean, crisp and bright, this was fermented in stainless (with just 10% in neutral wood), and not put through malolactic. The blend is 60/40 Chardonnay/Pinot Noir, yielding fresh fruit flavors of apple and melon that are focused and precise. A streak of ginger runs through racy acidity.",Vintage Brut,Argyle
"This wine comes from a wide selection of fantastic vineyards, including Pahlmeyer's coastal outpost, Wayfarer, as well as Ritchie Vineyard and a site on Atlas Peak. Dark golden in color, it's luscious in vanilla, ripe apple and Meyer lemon, medium bodied veering into rich. Buoyed by overtones of fresh peach, it's a worthwhile quaffer on its own or at the table.",Jayson,Pahlmeyer
"Aromas of blackberry jam, candied cherry, cake spice and graphite waft out of the glass. The thick palate delivers spicy plum, crushed black cherry, chocolate, clove and mint alongside velvety tannins. It's not very complex but it's seductively smooth and delicious.",Elegia Riserva,Produttori Vini Manduria
"A blend of Nebbiolo, Vespolina and Croatina, this opens with a medley of aromas that include ripe berry, underbrush, truffle, menthol, leather and spice. The firm palate delivers crushed black cherry, game, grilled herb, ground pepper and a balsamic note. It still has youthfully assertive tannins that need to unwind and soften. Drink 2016_2026.",Uvaggio,Propriet_ Sperino
"Hints of smoke and white peach mark the nose of this medium-bodied wine. It's a touch less expressive on the palate, but pleasantly plump, with great focus and length on the finish. Drink now_2016.",,Plantagenet
"Made in an elegant, filigreed style, this wine delivers understated hints of smoke, pear and melon. Given time in the glass, some peach notes emerge. Pleasantly plump on the midpalate, the flavors and textures tighten on the crisp finish.",Finisterre,Robert Oatley
"Ripe and fruity, rich and generous, almost soft in texture, this starts with strawberry-syrup aromas, then tastes like sweet red cherries with light spicy oak accents. It's basically a big soft pillow of fruitiness, but a touch of tannin kicks in on the finish to keep it refreshing.",Old Camp,Sanglier Cellars
"The nose does not want to give too much away, apart from delicacy and ripe yellow pear. The palate is ripe and rounded and has a distinct yeasty, almost nutty savoriness. Pepper then makes an entrance and stays right there to linger beautifully.",Schnabel Reserve,Sepp Moser
"A percentage of Cabernet Sauvignon is blended into this Merlot to give structure around its otherwise soft, round and lingering combination of dark candied plum, cinnamon and cedar. Medium-bodied and not overdone on the oak, the wine finishes with a touch of smoke.",,St. Francis
"Ripe, almost sweet, fruit is full of delicious black plum and berry flavors. The wine is rounded, opulent and generous to a fault. A solid core of darker tannins hold all this richness together. Drink from 2015.",,Château Haut-Monplaisir
"Pristine grapefruit and apple blossom notes lend perfume and elegance to this dry, intensely mineral Riesling. Bracing lemon-lime acidity shocks the palate to attention, intensifying a lean, lingering finish.",Dry,Anthony Road
"Grassy and pungent, this Sémillon-Sauvignon Blanc blend shows excellent structure and vivid fruit character. The grapefruit and pineapple flavors are accented with diesel highlights and a whiff of barrel toast.",Alibi,Black Hills
"A sexy, spicy oak character enlivens this full-bodied and supple-textured wine, standing out in the aroma and then mostly blending into ripe black cherry flavors on the palate. It has a firm, rather tannic texture, a feeling of richness, hints of cinnamon for complexity and a lingering finish.",Manchester Ridge Vineyard,Castello di Amorosa
"As the Riverside County region finds its way, this grape may make a good white option. This winery, which was founded in 1969 by the golf magnate, delivers aromas of salted and honeyed apples, following by a balanced, precise and mineral-driven palate of apple, lemonade and grapefruit.",Reserve,Callaway
"Aged for 36 months in barriques and 24 months in large casks, this opens with aromas of coconut, toasted oak and spicy blackberry. The palate offers sour cherry, mocha, tobacco and roasted coffee bean. The palate starts smooth and creamy but austere wood tannins impart a mouth-drying finish. Drink through 2022.",Percristina,Domenico Clerico
"Like Chambers' entry-level Muscadelle, this Muscat offers an affordable introduction to the Rutherglen style of sticky. The Muscat is full and round, with relatively simple notes of spiced orange and crème caramel and a finish that is sweet but balanced.",,Chambers Rosewood Vineyards
"This is a meaty, dark-fruited Shiraz. Seductive notes of caramelized beef and brown sugar dominate, while the wine's texture is a bit coarse, turning astringent on the finish. Try in 2017.",The Bamboo Scrub Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"There's an herbal streak to the red currant and strawberry hull aromas on the nose of this wine, alongside additional hints of sweet smoke, cured meat and fennel fronds. The palate offers riper notes of red cherry and plum, with touches of cinnamon and thin mint in the background. It's plush and velvety, with fine yet present tannins and ample acidity. Drink now_2016.",,Hamilton Russell
"Tobacco, cassis and vanilla notes bring the aromas and flavors, while the wine's firm structure gives a medium-weight feel and dusty texture. Drink now_2025.",Little Venice Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"Mocha and cracked pepper notes accent earthy flavors of black olive and dusty plum. This is full bodied and creamy in texture, with a long, velvety finish that suggests early drinkability, from now through 2020.",The Shipster's Rapture Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"Despite some plum fruit, this single-vineyard Shiraz tracks more to the savory side, blending notes of espresso, earth, roasted meat and black olive. It's full bodied and slightly creamy and dusty in texture, with a long finish.",Tyche's Mustard Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"Ripe black-fruit aromas get a boost from dark spice notes. Saturated, heavy and deep in the mouth, this is a meaty wine with blackberry flavors leading herb and leathery notes. On the finish, this remains dark and driven by black fruits and firm tannins. Drink through 2018.",,Maquis
"In the context of 2010, I have to admit to some disappointment with how this wine is showing. It's still an excellent wine, filled with luscious oak and bold fruit. But the fruit is slightly stewed, the tannins slightly coarse and the wine's structure a bit open knit. At least in this vintage, it seems more short-term drinker than true collectible.",G.A.M.,Mitolo
"Bright and delicious, this sleek, easy-drinking red delivers crunchy strawberry, sour cherry and savory herb. Silky tannins and fresh acidity balance out the juicy palate. Drink through 2016.",,Principiano Ferdinando
"A restrained, medium-weight Cabernet, the 2010 from this historic property boasts herb-tinged notes of cassis, brown sugar and hickory smoke. Fine, slightly dusty tannins mark the long finish. Drink now_2025.",,Tahbilk
"Aromas of melon, red apple and Bosc pear immediately waft from the bouquet of this wine, while beguiling hints of toasted oak, heather, yellow flower and lemon custard dance in the background. It's quite round and lush on the palate, with bold, ripe stone-fruit flavors that transition into notes of caramel corn and buttercream on the finish.",Appellation Series,Boschendal
"Offering classic cherry, herb and spice aromas and flavors, this is a bit on the lean side. Although not hugely full bodied, it's trim, balanced and built for a bit of aging. It should be best after 2016.",Thompson Vineyard Reserve,Charles B. Mitchell
"This wood-aged wine from old vines delivers good concentration and a firm tannic backbone to the red fruits and light acidity. It needs aging, so drink from 2016.",Le Grand Bouqueteau Réserve,Château Coudray Montpensier
"This luminous, garnet-colored wine opens with aromas that recall underbrush, earth, toast, red berry and hint of menthol. A framework of refined tannins support juicy red berry, mocha and baking spice flavors. It's already very accessible and should be enjoyed over the next few years. Drink through 2019.",,Coppo
"Lightly wood-aged, this is a smooth and ripe wine. A touch of toast rounds out the fresh fruit flavor of juicy Golden Delicious apple. The wine is dry, crisp and fruity at the end, with bright acidity.",Les Illustres Sur Lie,Chateau de l'Oiselinière
"Made from 40-year-old, bush-trained vines, this opens with earthy aromas of charred earth, smoke, grilled sage and black spice. The concentrated but elegant palate delivers mature blackberry, dried black cherry, allspice and pipe tobacco alongside velvety tannins.",,Cantine Paolo Leo
"This is a bright-fruited wine with lively acidity and apple flavors. It has a creamy texture, a touch of spice and a lemon zest aftertaste. Drink now.",,Trenel Fils
"The tannins are hard and strong. It's not undrinkable, but it is hard to enjoy, despite a solid core of black currants and cassis liqueur. The finish is bone dry and astringent. Drink now.",,Triumph Cellars
"Pure fruit flavors and zesty acidity mark this wine. It's rich and ripe in orange, apricot and papaya flavors, with little or no oak influence.",,Peter Cellars
"This light wine has vanilla flavors from wood aging, fresh red fruits and soft tannins. Acidity gives wine poise and an elegant touch. Drink from 2015.",Aluzé,Quinta do Pessegueiro
"The extreme dryness and minerality at first give this wine a Chablis-like interest. Then you find lemons, limes and apricots, framed in acidity and herbs. Drink up.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"It shows the variety's dryness, acidity and light, silky texture, with lemon, lime and gooseberry flavors that finish tart and spice.",,Red Cap
"Recalling the zesty style from New Zealand, it offers aromas of cantaloupe and crushed tomato vine along with exotic fruit that all carry over to the palate. It has a crisp, refreshing finish.",Torrediluna,Lechthaler
"This young wine is in your face now with strong acidity, powerful oak and jammy apricot, tangerine and green apple fruit. It's all too much of a good thing. It may be showing better by early 2015.",Dutton Ranch Rued Vineyard,Ernest
"Lightly tannic and attractively fruity, it's ready to drink. It has a soft structure, red fruits and a finish that is full of bright acidity.",Château de Bligny,Evening Land
"Here's a pretty, easy-drinking wine that reveals aromas of Granny Smith apple, hay and hints of exotic fruit that carry over to the palate. The ripe fruit is brightened by fresh acidity that leaves a clean finish.",,Franz Haas
"This is a big, fruity, oaky Chardonnay. What it lacks in subtlety it makes up for in sheer power. The flavors of apricots, tangerines and limes, with smoky oak influences, are rich and forward.",,Hess Collection
"There's something rustic about this Cab. Partly it's the tannins, which are fierce. Partly it's the alcohol, which sticks out and gives the wine a burn. Yet it's extraordinarily ripe and opulent in black currants, with the liqueur headiness of crème de cassis. The hot alcohol suggests it will not age.",,Juslyn Vineyards
"Aromas of pear, yellow apples and pineapple carry over to the palate along with a banana note. The juicy palate is balanced by bright acidity, making this perfect for everyday fare from lightly seasoned fish to pasta topped with tomato sauce.",K,Kellerei Kaltern Caldaro
"It opens with a delicate fragrance of yellow spring flowers and exotic fruit. The juicy palate offers up pear, honeydew melon and banana peel with a hint of nut on the finish. Simple but well-made.",,La Cappuccina
"A new luxury tier from Mendocino Wine Company, the folks who also produce the Parducci wines, Moniker Pinot is softly aromatic, leathery in dark berry fruit and dry, made in a big, rich style. Fruit is sourced from Anderson Valley, and also from inland Potter and Redwood valleys.",,Moniker
"This barrel-aged Soave conveys aromas of candied citrus, pineapple, and toasted oak. The palate delivers butterscotch, sugary vanilla and lemon drops in a low-impact, muted style.",Casette Foscarin,Monte Tondo
"A light-drinking, high-acid white that's crisp with layers of floral-laced citrus and herb. An enjoyable sipping wine or one that'll pair easily with fresh seafood.",Sesso,Monte Volpe
"Crisp aromas of zesty citrus fold in touches of brine and bitterness. Fresh and peppery on the palate, it has pyrazinic flavors of bell pepper, arugula and passion fruit. A juicy, briny, mildly bitter finish is typical for Leyda SB.",Reserva,MontGras
"Somewhat rustic aromas recall soil, ripe black berries with a whiff of farmyard. The simple, straightforward palate delivers juicy black cherry and a hint of baking spices. Pair it with hearty pasta dishes or pizza.",Dogajolo Rosso,Carpineto
"Scratchy, spicy aromas and a touch of juniper accent red-berry scents on this everyday Cabernet. The mouthfeel is dry, fresh and shows tangy acidity, while racy, edgy flavors of plum, spice and green herbs finish zesty.",Select Terroir,Santa Ema
"Subtle aromas of yellow peach, golden apple and honeydew melon lead off. However the palate is rather lean, with citrus and mineral notes alongside bracing acidity but not much fruit richness.",Monte San Piero,Sandro de Bruno
"Berry and currant aromas are jumpy and fruity in nature, while in the mouth, creamy oak creates a sticky feel. Candied, barrel-driven flavors of vanilla and clove outlast the wine's fruit content on the finish.",Reserve,Santa Ema
"This wine is dry, with a hint of oaky vanilla and buttered toast. Rich orange, peach and honey flavors are brightened by a burst of citrusy acidity.",Calling All Angels,Save Me San Francisco
"Beneath the come-hither packaging and name, this Zin offers velvety tannins and smoky fruit and spice, finishing with a powerful hit of alcohol and leathery cedar.",Old Vines,ZinPhomaniac
"Intensely ripe raspberry and cherry pie flavors mark this wine. Oak brings even greater richness, in the form of buttered cinnamon toast. The finish is dry, and there's a good burst of acidity. The alcohol is a little hot, but still, it's a nice, silky wine for drinking now.",Huntington,Pali
"This shows the fleshiness of Merlot. But it's also enormously tannic, with a mouth-numbing astringency, and the finish is severely dry. With black cherry and herb flavors, it wants an hour or two in the decanter, but it's not an ager.",,Pech Merle
"Made from one of the star grapes of Vinho Verde, this is a ripe, creamy wine. It has hints of lemon zest, along with grapefruit and a herbal aftertaste. It is crisp and ready to drink.",Arca Nova Colheita,Quinta das Arcas
"Great bursts of red fruits come strongly through the tannins of this powerful and structured wine. It's fruity and ripe, although an herbal element suggests a more green aspect. Tannins need to finish softening, so wait until 2015.",Bridão Clássico,Adega Cooperativa do Cartaxo
"With ripe, jammy blackberry and plum flavors, gently touched with smoky oak, this is a nice Cab for drinking now. Smooth and silky, the tannins will work well against grilled beef.",,Aquinas
"Ripe in tropical fruit, apricot and Meyer lemon flavors, it shows plenty of toasty oak. It's dry and creamy but not particularly complex. Drink up.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Bernardus
"New Dry Creek Vineyard Winemaker Tim Bell is showing finesse with this signature white for the winery. All stainless-steel fermented, it's racy in acidity and offers juicy fruit flavors of apricot, lemon and lime, plus fresh-cut grass and an herbal streak on top of stony minerality. It finishes long. Pair it with oysters and a day on the bay.",,Dry Creek Vineyard
"This big, earthy wine has aromas of ripe black plum, tilled soil, leather and coffee. The palate shows blackberry, prune marinated in sprits and black pepper alongside tightly woven and assertive tannins.",,Fattoria La Rivolta
"Blue flower, wild cherry, raspberry, cracked pepper and hints of tar and graphite all come together in this soft, easy drinking blend of Aglianico and Piedirosso. The juicy palate is supported by bright acidity and supple tannins. It's made to be drunk young, so enjoy it soon.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Aged in both mid-sized barrels and large casks, this robust Nero d'Avola delivers concentrated sensations of juicy blackberry and black cherry marinated in spirits. The fruity palate is lightly accented by notes of vanilla, chocolate and espresso.",,Feudo Principi di Butera
"Earthy aromas of mushroom and forest floor, plus cinnamon and sour cherry, are followed by vivacious cherry flavors. The wine evolves on the palate to reveal cedar, smoke and spice undertones. This is a memorable, modern style of this variety.",Agiorgitiko by Gaia,Gaia Wines
"Named after the ancient Greek practice of mixing seawater with wine for medicinal purposes, Thallasitis is a full-bodied white with aromas of flowers, tropical fruit and honeysuckle. On the palate, it's structured with a distinctive mineral base. Very unique and terroir driven in nature.",Thalassitis,Gaia Wines
"The nose of this Merlot is lush and seductive with whiffs of vanilla, mocha and spice melding into rich blackberry preserves. By contrast, the palate is quite restrained and mineral in character with flavors of tart, crisp berries and cherries lined with fine, dusty tannins. A happy medium of ripeness balanced with nuance and structure.",,Keuka Spring
"Scents of blossom and ripe white peach are touched with smoke and earth on this dry, full-bodied Chardonnay. Fermented and aged in stainless steel, the palate is chock full of juicy white grapefruit flavor. A touch of crushed-stone minerality adds elegance. Refreshing yet satisfying, this is a wine with wide appeal.",Estate Bottled Unoaked,Lamoreaux Landing
"With its tannins, the wine is firm, tight and dark. The black fruit flavors are just beginning to come through. It has power and structure and certainly needs to age. Drink from 2017.",Epenots Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Here's a powerfully built Aglianico that offers sensations of extremely ripe black cherry, blackberry, chocolate, toast and subtle oak. The dense palate is supported by a solid tannic backbone.",Satyricon,Luigi Tecce
"If oaky whites are your thing, this barrel-aged Viura is a good choice. Waxy, floral aromas of gardenia, lilly, cured ham and resiny oak play against white-fruit scents. The palate is not blowsy or resiny, while woody flavors of spice and white pepper accent core flavors of peach and baked apple.",Vetiver Vendimia,Bodegas Ontañón
Attractive and softly rich fruits are lined with excellent fresh acidity. The wine is full of ripe strawberry fruits and warm tannins that have additional red currant crispness at the end.,,Bouchard Père & Fils
"This late-harvested  Falanghina opens with intense aromas of fragrant white flowers punctuated by whiffs of mature stone fruit. The concentrated palate delivers dried apricot and candied citrus flavors, accented by aromatic herbs. It ends with a soft hazelnut nuance.",Cesco dell'Ermo,Cantina del Taburno
"This hearty Aglianico opens with earthy aromas of tilled soil, mature black fruit and a whiff of leather. The palate delivers black cherry, mint and Mediterranean herbs supported by a firmly tannic backbone.",,Cantine di Marzo
"A juicy, fruit-forward blend of 45% Syrah, 45% Grenache and 10% Mourvèdre, this unoaked offering bursts with cherry and berry aromas and flavors. It's medium in body, with just the right dry edge to partner burgers or pizza on a busy weeknight. Drink it over the next couple of years.",Buti Nages,Château de Nages
"This wine opens with aromas that recall mature black cherry, toast, vanilla, subtle oak, coffee and chocolate that carry through to the palate alongside bracing tannins. The fruity richness doesn't quite stand up to the oak influence.",Rosso,Cottanera
"An excellent addition to the winery's value lineup, it offers ripe fruit flavors of mixed red berries lightly framed with ripe, chocolaty tannins. The blend is mostly Merlot, with smaller amounts of Primitivo and Malbec.",Redhead,Ryan Patrick
"Scented with toasty oak, it conveys round, ripe fruit flavors. The Yakima Valley acidity keeps it fresh and lively.",Solitude,Sol Stone
"A blend of 80% Nero d'Avola and 20% Cabernet Sauvignon, this robust wine opens with aromas of red currant, black cherry and wild strawberry. The palate offers ripe blackberry and black cherry layered with notes of chocolate and vanilla.",Cantodoro,Stemmari
"Deep ruby in the glass, this wine has a nose of black cherry and vanilla. Flavors of black cherry, eucalyptus and menthol, encased in a smooth tannic structure, make their way across the entire palate.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"Woody, brambly notes lend an earthy complexity to fresh blackberry and cassis notes on this bright, brisk Merlot. A shower of cranberry acidity jolts the palate and cuts through the fine, but penetrating tannins that fringe the finish. An elegant, refreshing example of a cool-climate Merlot.",,Thirsty Owl Wine Company
"Made from 80% Aglianico and 20% Piedirosso, this opens with aromas of new oak, earth, leather and a funky hint of game. The palate offers blackberry, wild cherry, licorice and eucalyptus alongside aggressive, tightly knit tannins that need time to unwind and soften. Drink after 2017.",Vigna Camarato Riserva,Villa Matilde
"This concentrated wine opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, smoke and subtle oak. The densely packed palate delivers notes of black cherry, mineral and medicinal herbs. It's still young, with bracing tannins that result in a mouth-drying finish. Drink after 2018.",,Villa Matilde
"Floral, fresh, fruity and fun describes this attractive and affordable Moschofilero from lauded winemaker Yannis Voyatzis. Aromas of pear, citrus and flower are followed by vivacious fruit flavors and a mineral lift. This is easy drinking and great for light meals and patio parties.",Kyklos,Voyatzis
"Done entirely in stainless steel, this is young, tight and tart, with fruit flavors of green apple and pineapple. The impression is more of skin and rind than of flesh, but as a set-up to lightly sautéed poultry or fish, it would work nicely.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"The beautiful floral nose is inviting and intoxicating. In taste, it offers lemon, quince, plenty of acidity and a long finish, a touch of grass and vanilla-sugar just slightly in the background. Complexity makes the wine intriguing.",,Ziata
"A perfect dry white wine for warm weather sipping, when a cold salad or assortment of salty cheeses and snacks are on the menu. Gooseberry, grapefruit and a touch of white peach fruit flavors anchor this racy, ripe and refreshing wine.",Spring Creek Vineyard,Pacific Rim
"Tobacco smoke, blueberry pie and brown spice frame the nose on this well-priced, mostly Merlot-Cabernet Sauvignon blend, which is bolstered with touches of Petite Verdot and Petite Sirah. There's a thick blackberry presence in the mouth and the alcohol is noticeable, despite being low.",Platinum,Quadrant
"Punchy and bright with tones of honey, pineapple and quince, this medium-sweet Riesling is an alarm clock to the senses. Juicy and forward, with a streak of sunny, lemon acidity, it's a straightforward but unabashedly satisfying quaffer.",,Atwater
"The Edna Valley regularly grows wines with a refreshing, uplifting nose. This strong entry follows suit, with strawberry, raspberry, limestone and light mint as leading aromas. Once sipped, it discloses intriguing black cherry and Chinese pepper-sauce elements, a well-blended mix of ripe fruit and savory spice.",Firepeak Estate,Baileyana
"Gentle white blossom, white currant and Golden Delicious apple unite on an intriguing, subtly aromatic nose. Earthy, stony elements lend depth and resonance. This is so integrated that the delicious, ripe apple fruit is completely embraced by earth and subtle yet distinct autolysis. This is rich in style__ided by dosage__ounded and very elegant, with a sufficient structure for food pairing.",Blanc de Blancs,Hattingley Valley Wines
"A lifting mix of golden, ripe apple, chamomile, moss and honey signals richness and some maturity. The palate is poised and holds all of these flavours tightly in a soaring, slender structure that is built on a firm foundation of bright acidity and subtle earthiness. Grown-up, taut, generous and poised, this is a honey-edged homage to the South Downs.",South Ridge Cuvée Merret Brut,Ridgeview Estate
"This wine by winemaker Fintan du Fresne shows sea salt, apple blossom, cherimoya and tangerine rinds on the nose. Flavors are clean and pure, with dried apple, more sea salt, a bit of nectarine and orange spritz, offering a profile that could comfortably rest on the tongue all day long.",Chamise,Chamisal Vineyards
"A vivid bouquet of white flowers is cut by a pungent, pithy funkiness of crushed ants and iodine on this classic bottling by the Miller family and winemaker Trey Fletcher. The intriguing palate is tensely layered, with grapefruit pith, lime-sprayed limestone and a bit of almond oil on the finish, proving uniquely spicy and incredibly long-lasting.",,Bien Nacido
"Made only in exceptional vintages, and in minuscule amounts at that, this estate-grown concoction is gorgeous, big, bold and sizable in terms of fruit and oak, with a bite of leathery tannin midway through the full body that softens on the finish. Complicated and concentrated, it also offers a seizure of minerality and lushness that's divine. Drink now through 2022.",1870,Donum
"Ripe plum, mature black cherry, violet, clove, mocha, anise and grilled sage are just some of the sensations you'll find on this gorgeous wine alongside velvety tannins. It already has great depth but hold for more complexity. Drink 2017_2027.",Fontalloro,Felsina
"From the Beckstoffer Georges III vineyard in the heart of the appellation, this 100% varietal wine is immense in lushness, plush and alive in cinnamon, red and black berry and smoke. Soft tannins provide a lift and an enjoyable evolution to the finish, with a bite of heft on the last sip. This should cellar well through 2020_2022.",Beckstoffer G III,Hunnicutt
"Floral and soft, with a substantial foundation of leather and black licorice, this is a tremendously seductive wine, layered and complex, with years to go in terms of structure. Already it offers velvety tannins and dreams of blackberry patches gone by, finishing with succulence and a taste of pure dark chocolate. Cellar through 2022.",Beckstoffer To Kalon Vineyard,Janzen
"Steve Clifton's top-shelf study of this notoriously tough-to-tame grape is redolent with prunes, dried cherries, rose-petal extract and bloody steak on the amazing nose, which is leveled by a chipped slate minerality. Its sanguine character is approachable now, with red currants and cherries, but will drink well through 2025.",Rocca,Palmina
"Beautiful lychee and rose-petal aromas open the bouquet of this lithe late-harvest wine, made in small amounts. Apple and melon highlight the fruitier overtones atop a base of balanced minerality, which softens the sweetness. The finish is tangy and rich in nutmeg.",Vista Verde Vineyard Late Harvest,Williams Selyem
"Fermented 75% whole-cluster and then aged in neutral oak, this wine offers complex, expressive aromas of green olive, fresh herbs, grilled asparagus, earth and peat. The palate brings waves of intensity, with sensuous, layered savory flavors that lead to a hyperextended finish. It's an exclamation point of a wine that shows the promise of this young winery and vineyard.",Stoney Vine Vineyard,Ardor
"Pressed rose, dark berry, baked earth, forest floor, licorice, walnut and a balsamic note are some of the intriguing aromas you'll find on this fantastic, balanced Barolo. The structured, elegant palate delivers mature black cherry, dark raspberry, anise, white pepper, tobacco, orange peel and clove alongside assertive but refined tannins.",Monvigliero,Comm. G. B. Burlotto
"Full-bodied and intense, this delicious wine opens with aromas of woodland berry, star anise, chopped herbs, underbrush and a whiff of light oak. The firm palate doles out ripe black cherry, licorice, sage and chopped mint alongside big, velvety tannins and fresh acidity.",Ginestra Casa Maté,Elio Grasso
"This opens with a beautiful fragrance of rose, violet, perfumed berry, leather, baking spice and a balsamic note. The palate is still young, weaving together sour cherry, crushed raspberry, cinnamon, anise and mocha alongside assertive but finely grained tannins. Drink 2018_2024.",Lazzarito Riserva,Germano Ettore
"Etienne-Henri Bourgeois was a pioneer in Sancerre of vinification in barrels. This wine, produced in homage, is a beautiful expression of tightly coiled, mineral Sauvignon Blanc. Beautifully crisp, it is bright and packed with fruit that still needs time to develop. Drink from 2017.",Cuvée Etienne Henri,Henri Bourgeois
"Taut and crisp compared to the softer, riper Magdalena or Josef Vineyard bottlings, this polished, steely wine is a showcase of brash mineral style. It's dry on the palate, but flavors of white grapefruit and lime seem kissed with a spray of honey. Drinks beautifully now but should continue to improve through at least 2025.",HJW Vineyard,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Just over 75% Cabernet Sauvignon with the balance Malbec (10%), Petit Verdot (8%) and Merlot, this wine offers brooding but well-delineated aromas and flavors of blackberry, dried flowers, black tea, herbs, earth, barrel spices and light meaty notes. It's packed tightly with firm tannins and also shows great length. Drink 2022_2028.",Reserve,Leonetti Cellar
"Made from a majority Chardonnay with 23% Pinot Noir, this salmon-pinkish sparkler is a stunner, inviting in floral and fruity components and crisp acidity. Grapefruit, strawberry and a taste of subtle custard coat the palate, staying light and bright through a lengthy, delightful finish.",Querencia Brut,Schramsberg
"Sophisticated aromas of Golden Pearmain apples, cream and pastry take the part of the first violin__halky, resonant earth that of the sonorous cello. Their harmony and elegance together is astonishing. The crisp acidity is so well-integrated and illuminates the fruit and soil. The long finish again emphasizes absolute, uncompromising elegance of this wine.",Blanc de Blancs,Wiston Estate Winery
"Pioneering winemaker Josh Jensen delivers pure and focused aromas of deep red pomegranate and dark purple fruits, a shred of violet, a noticeable chalkiness and a hint of sweet sage. It's rich and zesty on the palate, offering dark fruit flavors with a pine sap backbone, finishing strong on chocolate-dipped cherries.",Jensen Vineyard,Calera
"Cola, sasparilla, cherry blossoms, hard cherry candy and a hint of black currant hit the nose on this rich wine from Josh Jensen. The palate shows brown spice, with clove and peppercorns wrapping around a rhubarb-licorice-thyme character and tart cherries, making for an incredibly distinctive wine.",Selleck Vineyard,Calera
"Closed-up at present, this aromatic brooder has notes of red and black fruit, scorched earth and herbs, along with a floral top note. It has a mountain-fruit profile of firm, chewy tannins, tart acids and dense flavors. Time in the cellar is required to fully appreciate it. Let it be until at least 2020 but it should have a good 15 years beyond that.",Estate,Figgins
"Both the fruit and the aromatic foliage of wild raspberries rise first from the glass. They are followed by richer, delicious strawberry and cream notes, with hints of almond patisserie and strawberry shortcake. The palate is resonant with yeasty, rounded autolytic notes that frame the wonderfully wilful English hedgerow character. The mousse is lively but soft and the finish long and echoing.",Rosé,Wiston Estate Winery
"Great balance, snappy acidity and concentrated fruit flavors make this grand wine especially appealing. The aromas of blackberry and red cherry are vibrant, the juicy, mouthwatering cherry flavors are dazzling and the finish lingers. It is balanced for good aging, so drink it from 2017_2020.",Oppenlander Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"Seductive aromas of dried tart Montmorency cherries, rose petals, pipe tobacco and tanned cowhides create gamy earthiness on this Steve Clifton bottling. The palate is lush with dried red fruit and brown spice, framed by grippy structure and bright, searing acidity. Wait until 2018 to open, but this will drink superbly through 2030.",Sisquoc,Palmina
"This is a big, flavorful wine, luscious in aroma, flavor and texture from the first whiffs of spicy oak and funky earth through saturated blackberry and clove flavors. The texture is both velvety and almost stiff at the same time. Drink now through 2020.",DTR Ranch,Terre Rouge
"A delightfully elegant wine, the majority of it Merlot, this exudes cassis, pomegranate and cedar. Soft, refined tannins make it a pleasure to enjoy, made from a minuscule single-barrel lot, the grapes sourced from the hillsides of Carneros. It finishes in a refinement of dark milk chocolate.",Barrel Select,Virage
"García Figuero had a great year in 2010, as did many high-end Ribera del Duero wineries. This reserva is heady up front, with malty aromas of vanilla, barrel resin, tobacco, blackberry and cassis. This is huge but holds onto its balance, while flavors of baked black fruits come with vanilla, coffee, mocha and chocolate accents. This modern marvel finishes with vanilla, pepper and chocolate flavors on top of lasting black currant and blackberry. Drink through 2025.",15 Reserva,García Figuero
"This has the crunchy, enticing freshness of the very first, pale, almost translucent apples of the year. Underneath it brings earth, chalk, stone and yeast. The autolysis is distinct but expresses itself as a restrained, chalky background that imbues the entire wine with a soft, gentle and very fine creaminess. This is elegant, serious and lasting.",Blanc de Blancs,Bolney Wine Estate
"Woodland berry, tilled soil, cake spices and a whiff of game are some of the aromas you'll find on this fragrant, impressive wine. The full-bodied, elegant palate delivers juicy red cherry, black raspberry, clove, chopped herbs and a hint of cured meat alongside a backbone of firm, refined tannins and bright acidity. Drink 2018_2026.",,Cantina Bartolo Mascarello
"Trefethen has been on a roll the last few years, producing some of Napa's most spectacular Cabernets. This bottling, which contains minor quantities of Petit Verdot and Merlot, spent 28 months in new French oak barrels. The fruit is incredibly ripe and intense, with flavors of black currants and chocolate-covered cherries. As hard as the tannins are, they must have been even more aggressive two or three years ago, so kudos to Trefethen for holding the bottle back for five years. This beauty is just now beginning its long journey. Drink now_2020.",HaLo,Trefethen
"The fruit for this offering comes from the Green's and Crowhurst vineyards. This wine brings a a sense of cellarworthiness, from the inky color and dense, impenetrable bouquet to the richly tannic palate and long, plushly textured finish. Right now, it delivers hints of toast and mint, blueberry and plum fruit and savory notes of roasted meat and mocha. Drink 2018_2025+.",R Reserve,Kilikanoon
"This bold, beautiful wine opens with earthy aromas of freshly tilled soil, violets, truffle and leather. The delicious palate offers succulent blackberry, woodland berry and cinnamon-spice accompanied by big, brooding tannins. It's already stunning, but give this terroir-driven wine time to develop even more complexity. Drink 2015_2024.",Colleallodole,Milziade Antano
"This is a solid, concentrated wine from a reliable chateau. It has weight and power, with rich black fruits balanced with fresh acidity. Touches of bitter extraction and wood aging are likely to integrate as the wine ages. It should develop into an impressive and powerful wine. Drink from 2018.",,Château Pichon Longueville
"Called Lyra because of the lyre-shaped vine training, this is a classic wine. Still very closed, it is currently all potential. The acidity, the tight and taut texture, and the hidden richness all point to a wine with a great future. Drink from 2017.",Zöbinger Heiligenstein Erste Lage Lyra Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Kracher always produces a blend in his range of TBAs. This is a hugely rich wine that's densely textured and with opulent fruit. Flavors of sweet oranges, honey and lemon juice makes up this impressively appealing wine. It does need to age, though, so drink from 2017.",Novelle Vague Nummer 6 Grande Cuvée Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"The most notable thing about this Pinot is its intensity of flavor. A blend of both new Dijon clones and older California selections of Pinot Noir, it is stunning with flavors of raspberries, cherries and Dr. Pepper. It's a balanced, elegant wine with vibrant texture , but needs time to truly shine. Hold till at least 2017.",Sea View Ridge Estate Vineyard,Flowers
"One sip is all it takes to be blown away by this Pinot's beauty. It's exquisitely crafted, a testament to both the vineyard and the winery's oenological talent. The palate is bright and tangy with acidity, and incredibly complex flavors of wild berries, mushrooms, balsam, cola and Asian spices. It's dramatic now, but will continue to improve for at least 15 years.",Hirsch Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"So lusciously ripe, with notes of mango and guava, this is an explosion of sweet fruit, honey and flowers. Searing citrus acidity cuts through the palate, highlighting layers of crushed stone and tea leaf that add complexity. It's so exquisitely delicate, but lingers endlessly on the finish.",Graacher Himmelreich Auslese GoldKap,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"This wine blends multiple clones of Pinot Noir from two of the winery's vineyards, Camp Meeting Ridge and Sea View Ridge. Both sites are high elevation, located only a few miles from the Pacific Ocean and extremely low in yields. Flowers negotiated a difficult vintage deftly with this low-alcohol wine of unusual delicacy and charm. It's complex and layered with cherry, raspberry, cola, wild thyme, balsam and sandalwood flavors. It's texture is like pure silk in the mouth. Drink now_2017.",Moon Select,Flowers
"Billowing with scents of marmalade, wildflower honey and raspberry preserves, this is an intoxicatingly perfumed TBA, but the palate doesn't disappoint either. Rich and creamy with undulating streaks of peach preserve and tangerine, it lingers on and on, with its tea and honey-kissed finish.",Rüdesheimer Berg Schlossberg Trockenbeerenauslese,Dr. Nägler
"Aromas of mango and candied-orange rind lend a heady tropical feel to this concentrated TBA full of peach and marmalade flavors. Unctuous with sweet nectar, yet exquisitely dainty on the palate, it quivers with tangerine acidity and a finish that's laced with saffron and honey.",Johannisberg Wallhausen Erste Lage Trockenbeerenauslese,Prinz Salm
"This estate continues to rise in quality, and this bottling is a serious and dense wine. It has obvious flavors of wood aging, but balanced with rich blackberry fruitiness. The texture is dark and concentrated. Drink from 2017.",,Château Batailley
"Cantenac Brown is on a roll now, and even in lesser vintages. This is a full, ripe wine packed with black currant flavor, but also structured with solid tannins. With a juicy acidity on the finish, and boosted by its dry core, it's certain to age well. Drink from 2018.",,Château Cantenac Brown
"This wine is firm and powerful while also showing sweetness. It's textured and structured, with a zesty, tangy character that also brings out minerality. The palate is ripe with flavors of honey and lemon zest. The wine does need aging. Drink from 2018.",,Château Clos Haut-Peyraguey
"Dense and opulent, this is a fine, ripe wine. There is great weight here, along with flavors of nutmeg and white peach. Acidity and a firm, youthful texture all promise aging. Drink this wine from 2017.",,Château Lafaurie-Peyraguey
"This is a really fruity wine that's opulent and gorgeously rich. There is a pepper edge, touches of new wood and a firm, dark core. Acidity and concentration are already integrated. Drink from 2018.",,Château Léoville Poyferré
"Yates Conwill is next to the Resonance vineyard, which was just sold to Burgundy's Louis Jadot. This vineyard is really reaching its prime, showing lovely ripe flavors of raspberry, red plum and sweet cherry. Generous acidity keeps the wine in proportion and leads through a generous midpalate with highlights of black tea and dried herb. Drink now and over the next 10 years.",Yates Conwill Vineyard,Sineann
"Co-fermented with 3% Viognier, this Tablas clone Syrah offers red and purple berry flavors that are deep and pure. Snappy and focused, it's layered with notes of smoke, dust, citrus, blood orange, baking spices and mineral. Beautiful indeed.",The Beautiful,K Vintners
"Extreme ripeness is the first thing that strikes on the nose; then there's raisin, spiced fig and minerally richness that's far from everyday. The palate is huge and fills all corners of your mouth, while flavors of raisin, brown sugar, mocha and coffee come to an almost nonending finish that's the definition of dark and brooding. Drink through 2020.",,O. Fournier
"This is a beautiful wine with lemon and bitter-honey notes that exibits both balanced acidity and richness. Botrytis at the core shows amazing intensity with a palate that's concentrated and full. Citrus freshness dominates the long, lingering aftertaste. The wine should age well so drink from 2017.",Nummer 7 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"This is a medium-bodied Zinfandel, with elegant weight and mouthfeel. The flavors are classic__ild raspberries and cherries, cola, cocoa and exotic spices. This is surely one of the best Zinfandels of the vintage.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"The color of this 100% Cabernet is as black as a moonless midnight sky. It's saturated with power and explodes on the palate with rich blackberries and chocolate. Those famous Mount Veeder tannins are tight and astringent, but the fruit is so intense, it busts right through them. This is a seriously ageable wine. Give it at least six years, depending on your taste for older Cabs. It should be going strong through 2025.",,Yates Family Vineyard
"Having earned its reputation as one of Australia's finest Chardonnays, the challenge is then to maintain that level of quality. The 2010 Art Series certainly does that. Enticing aromas of woodsmoke, peach and pink grapefruit give way to intense flavors of citrus and stone fruit on the palate. It's full bodied, yet with great focus and length, ending crisply despite the wine's inherent richness. Drink now_2020, perhaps longer.",Art Series,Leeuwin Estate
"Very textured, this is a complex wine. There is a strong sense of minerality here, along with flavors of ripe apricots, peaches and grapes. The texture is zesty and tangy, showing some taut, nervy acidity. This is a wine for serious aging so don't drink before 2017.",,Château Doisy-Védrines
"Power and ripeness walk hand-in-hand with this major player. The wine is opulent and extracted with flavors of rich blackberry fruits, but shows a firmness in tannins and dense texture. Drink from 2018 and it's sure to be a great success.",,Château Giscours
"The Singerriedel, one of Wachau's most famous vineyards, is a steep terraced hill above Spitz. With its great exposure, it is able to produce ripe, very rich wines like this. To contrast, there is a tight, steely texture with intense acidity that promises aging. Drink from 2016.",Singerriedel Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"This is a beautiful older Riesling that continues to have aging potential. It's rich, full of white currant, walnut, exotic spice and perfume. It still has the intense acidity of the Sunogeln vineyard that gives structure to the wine. It's ready to drink, but put a bottle away until 2018.",Sunogeln Priorissa Reserve,Josef Schmid
"From one of the longest established producers in Montefalco, this gorgeous wine shows the real potential of Sagrantino. It has an alluring fragrance of rose, violet, berry, spice and leather while the palate delivers lush black cherry, blackberry, licorice and white pepper. It has powerful but ripe tannins alongside vibrant acidity, and will develop beautifully. Drink 2015_2029.",,Milziade Antano
"This is a pure, aesthetic wine, delicately outlined and shaped. With its citrus flavors, crisp lines and tight, taut acidity, it shows both great minerality and a sharp final focus on fruit and structure. Age this wine, and don't drink before 2017.",Heiligenstein Erste Lage,Bründlmayer
"Dried cherry, dark berry, tobacco and grilled herb sensations all come together in this fresh, straightforward red. Smooth but rather fleeting tannins support the bright, juicy flavors. Drink through 2016.",Meleto,Castello di Meleto
"Tight, bright and very crisp, this is a lively and fruity wine. Citrus fruit flavors compete happily with the red berries to give a bone-dry wine, light and fresh at the end.",,Château Fonfroide
"This smooth wine has a good balance between a dry core and black currant fruit. It has a fresh character, typical of the vintage, along with acidity and smokiness from the wood aging. It will not age long, drink from 2017.",,Château Hourtin-Ducasse
"This is a soft wine, ripe with lime and grapefruit flavors that are sweetened with juicy red apple. It's tangy as well, laced with orange zest and filled with steely acidity. It should age a few months, so drink from late 2015.",,Château la France
"Structured and still dry with young tannins, this concentrated wine has the potential of fresh black currant fruits. For the moment, it is dark, showing some bitter chocolate flavors that need to soften. Drink from 2017.",,Château les Aubiers
"This is a spicy wine, but it is more about ripe fruits, apricot and peach as well as a twist of lemon. The aftertaste is fresh and fruity. The Queyren family's 100 years in the wine business makes good use of its Entre-Deux-Mers' vineyard of 80% Sauvignon Blanc and 20% Sémillon.",,Château Pilet
Caramel and ripe red fruits show the weight of this wine. It has freshness from the warm plum flavors along with ripe accents of spice and pepper. The end has tangy acidity. Bordeaux Clairet lies between rosé and red in color and in taste.,,Château Queyssard
"This wine offers delicious acidity, crisp fruit and plenty of red berry flavors. It has a lively, perfumed aftertaste.",,Château Roc de Minvielle
"Still young, this wine is showing intense herbaceous characteristics that need to soften. Plenty of fruit between the texture needs to fill out. Hints of apples, pears and quince are all there. Drink from 2016.",,Château Roquefort
"Superripe black cherry and dried plum aromas, generous and rich fruit flavors and a smooth texture make this appealing all the way through. Made from Tempranillo and four other varieties, it's boldly flavored but not especially full-bodied, and feels just grippy enough on the palate to go well with burgers and ribs.",Big,Dark Horse
"This blend of Sauvignon Blanc (65%) and Sémillon comes from Sagemoor, Boushey and Klipsun vineyards. It starts out barrel-forward with aromas of char and toast followed by citrus oil, spice and herbs. The concentration of the tropical fruit flavors is light and elegant but shows pleasing nuances and a good sense of balance.",Chaleur Estate,DeLille
"This nonvintage Brut is soft, creamy and rounded. It is only lightly textured with its peach and apple fruit flavors and a hint of spice. It is ready to drink.",Cuvée Céleste Brut,Demarjory
"This Tavel rosé contains six grape varieties, although 80% of the blend is Grenache and Cinsault. Despite ample weight on the palate, the result is a bit chalky on the finish, with flavors of underripe berries and melon.",La Forcadière,Domaine Maby
"This wine is fresh, crisp and still young. Crisp acidity dominates the strongly citrus character and gives a tight aftertaste of lime and pink grapefruit. This 100% Sauvignon Blanc was aged on the lees for six months to enhance aroma. Wait to drink until early 2016.",La Grande Cuvée,Dourthe
"Aromas of oak, toast and espresso lead the nose. Oak-driven spices takes center stage on the palate but don't mask the dried black cherry, plum, licorice vanilla and coffee in the background. Firm tannins provide structure. Drink through 2016.",Gelso,Fattoria Valacchi
"Flowers, melon and stone fruit inform the aromas and flavors of this unctuous, weighty and viscous wine, smooth with a lingering taste of ripe peach on the finish. Tiny percentages of Riesling and Gewürztraminer figure into the mix, too.",The Party Starter,FlyWine
"Pungent, briny aromas of sweaty citrus and green herbs are typical of the variety, while this feels fresh on the palate. Lime, lettuce and tarragon flavors end short, with modest acidity. Drink immediately.",Casamaro,Garciarévalo
"Earthy, musky notes lend a savory complexity to this bold, richly bodied Pinot Gris. Dry in style, it juxtaposes crisp white grapefruit and lime flavors against hints of smoked nuts. The finish is brisk and mineral.",,Hosmer
"Appealing aromas of apple, citrus, pear and corn husk are followed by light, elegant fruit flavors and a tart finish. The concentration isn't all there but it retains a sense of balance.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Januik
"This opens with aromas of blue flowers, ripe blackberry, aromatic herb and an earthy note of tilled soil. The palate offers dried black fruit, toast, vanilla and coffee alongside smooth but rather fleeting tannins.",Pian dei Sorbi Riserva,Marchesi Gondi
"A traditional blend of Grenache, Syrah and Mourvèdre, this medium-bodied rosé offers delicate floral aromas as well as some slightly confected bubble-gum scents. It's less overtly fruity on the palate, then finishes with a welcome burst of lime zest.",Roséfine,Marrenon
"Sizzling in high-toned citrus and a helping of freshly squeezed pineapple, this wine combines delicate floral aromas and refreshment with a more weighty complexity of caramelized oak, finding a sense of leanness on the finish.",,Pezzi King
"This robust wine opens with aromas of spiced plum, iris and grilled herb. The warm palate offers raisin, licorice, game, black pepper and the heat of evident alcohol. Reflecting the torrid vintage, this is evolving quickly and the fruit richness is already drying up, so drink sooner rather than later.",Vigneto Bucerchiale Riserva,Selvapiana
"Swathes of savory dried sage lend earthiness to deep, rippling cherry and raspberry flavors in this dry, Cabernet Franc rosé. It's zesty and bright, with a dancing, delicate mouthfeel.",Dry,Sheldrake Point
"Aromas of plum, blue flowers and a whiff of truffle lead the nose. The juicy palate delivers fleshy black cherry accented with an earthy hint of game while fresh acidity and refined tannins give it an immediate, easy-drinking quality. Enjoy now.",Vincenzo da Filicaja,Villa da Filicaja
"There's much to enjoy with this wine's aromas of vanilla, coffee, baking spices, raspberry and green wood. The sweet flavors show cranberry-like tartness and grainy tannins.",Reserve,Waterbrook
"Aromas of green, leafy herbs, plummy blue fruit and woodspices are followed by moderate flavors that show a mix of fruit and barrel. It's a pleasingly varietal wine at the right price.",,Waterbrook
It's difficult to find the aromas of stone fruit and herbs in the glass. The flavors show a lot of lightness and elegance but also a sense of balance.,,Watermill
"Made entirely with organically grown Sangiovese, with no added sulfites, this medium-bodied red opens with earthy aromas of tilled soil, underbrush, game and black-skinned fruit. The lively palate doles out ripe black plum, wild cherry and crushed raspberry accented by subtle notes of white pepper and clove.",Puro,Fattoria Lavacchio
"Ripe aromas of prune, blackberry, marzipan and leather announce a palate tougher than the nose indicates. Plum, cherry, prune and peppery flavors finish baked and loamy, with some heat. This is Tempranillo, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot.",Crianza,Príncipe de Viana
"The nose on this blend of Malbec, Merlot and Cabernet is leafy and a touch dilute, with basic cherry and berry notes. An angular palate feels zesty due to lively acidity, while flavors of herbal cherry and plum are somewhat tart and clipped. The finish tastes oaky and feels drying.",Malbec-Merlot-Cabernet Sauvignon,Trapezio
"Made with the indigenous Negroamaro grape found in southern Italy, this bright rosato shows sweet aromas of pink rose, grapefruit and crushed mineral, followed by a linear texture and fresh forest-berry endnotes.",Marangi,Tenute Mater Domini
"Here's any easy sparkling wine that opens with a pretty pink color and lively aromas of cranberry, white almond, citrus and lemon curd. A slight hint of sweetness would make this a perfect pairing partner to insalata caprese with fresh mozzarella.",Extra Dry Rosè,Bacio della Luna
"From the Treviso Prosecco production area, this easy-going sparkler offers no big surprises but it does do a good job of keeping the palate refreshed. Vibrant bubbling keeps it sharp and focused.",Extra Dry,Il Follo
"This is a wine with some tannic structure adding richness and shape to its red fruit character. Ripe cherries and red currants dominate, laced with acidity. It's ready to drink, but could improve over another year.",,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"A wine with fresh, bright, red cherry and black currant fruits along with a tight tannic edge that speaks of the granite soil. It's likely to age over the next year.",Domaine du Riaz,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"This has distinctive aromas of narcissus, cassis and cedar, plus a leather-like underpinning. The medium-bodied palate has balanced acids and open-knit tannins, which become more astringent on the cola-flavored finish.",Reserve,Jefferson Vineyards
"After a poor showing in 2009, Jigar has redeemed itself. Their 2010 Chardonnay is rich and smooth in tropical fruits, cream, buttered toast and cinnamon spices. It's starting to show its age, so drink up.",,Jigar
"This easy-going Prosecco Superiore Brut opens with a fresh bouquet of dried white flower, citrus and crushed mineral. The wine's dry, lively mouthfeel is backed by the softness of its creamy perlage.",Brut,La Farra
"Rich in apricot, orange and tropical fruits, with buttered toast, honey and creamy lees flavors, this Chardonnay leaves nothing to the imagination. It's flashy and forward, yet has enough acid and mineral balance to give it interest.",Spirit Hawk,Lander-Jenkins
"The sourcing on Landmark's Overlook bottling has changed constantly over the years. This 2011 is certainly rich in pineapples, nectarines, tangerines, Meyer lemons and smoky oak. It reflects the popular Chardonnay appetite.",Overlook,Landmark
"Very high in alcohol, nearly 18% abv, which gives the sweet blackberry, blueberry and chocolate flavors some heat. It lacks some complexity, and is too soft for development, but it's luscious. Drink up.",Zintage,Kasuari
Exotic fruit and pineapple open the nose of this bright Italian white. The wine shows slightly more heft and determination than your average Soave Classico and the mouthfeel delivers creamy peach and a long finish.,Il Roccolo,Le Mandolare
"Organic vintner Mauro Drocco presents a tangy and spicy red wine with cassis, red currant and cured meat. It ends with freshness but also some candied fruit.",Sorì Bric Camparo,Camparo
"This is a warm, honey- and apple-flavored wine. It's fresh and full in the mouth with tight mineral acidity. It could well age a year or two, but is ready to drink now.",,Domaine Talmard
"Fernão Pires and Arinto are blended together to yield this ripe and warm, while also poised wine. It has pear and creamed apple flavors that are shot through with orange-zest acidity. Ready to drink in six months.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Selecionada,Falua
"This Sangiovese from central Italy offers a very fresh and vibrant quality of fruit that is expressed as cherry, blackberry and sour plum. It's a simple, one-dimensional wine and its best attribute is precisely that.",Ceregio,Fattoria Zerbina
"This high altitude vineyard reliably produces enormously ripe fruit with correspondingly giant alcohol and tannin levels. The palate is full of chocolate-covered raisin and blackberry jam flavors, but it's a little over the top.",Bismark Mountain Vineyard,Hanna
"One of the best-selling Proseccos on the planet (thanks to very large case production numbers and good distribution), this well-priced sparkler is simple and fresh with loads of citrus, peach and melon.",Lunetta,Cavit
"Notes of honeysuckle, apple, Meyer lemon and legume dominate the nose, with a tropical fruit aroma arriving late. Medium bodied, the palate showcases zippy acidity that will pair well with chicken scallopini served with white beans and rosemary.",Church Creek Steel,Chatham
"This Navarran blend opens with spicy raspberry and red currant aromas. The palate is sharp, prickly and edgy in feel, with flavors of cherry tomato, herbs and racy red fruits. The hot, scratchy finish can probably best be tamed with food.",Viña Rubican Crianza,Bodegas Corellanas
"You'll love the easy, slightly sweet approach of this fresh Prosecco Superiore from the famed Cartizze cru. White flower, mineral and sweet peach appear on the foamy finish.",Dry,Colesel
"Here's the quintessential Soave Classico that veers on the side of informality and easy-drinking appeal. The wine is redolent of white peach, citrus and Golden Delicious apple.",Capocolle,Cantine Lenotti di Lenotti
"Colutta is a fun and consistent producer from northeast Italy who works with a long list of indigenous grapes. This sparkling Ribolla Gialla is redolent of exotic spice, stone fruit and dried herb. There's a very perky and sharp quality to the close.",Brut,Colutta
"From the estate of Massimo Pastura, this pretty Cortese-based white opens with floral notes of honeysuckle and yellow rose backed by citrus, melon and drying mineral. There's a waxy feel in the mouth followed by balanced acidity.",Il Poggio,Cascina La Ghersa
This vineyard-designate Brut sparkling wine opens with subtle tones of sweet grapefruit and lemon curd followed by softer touches of peach and honey. The creamy bubbling is followed by a touch of white pepper.,Vigna del Cuc Brut,Case Bianche
"Mionetto is a steady producer of clean, easy-drinking sparkling wine that is consistent and fun to drink year in and year out. This expression is ripe with sweet peach and lime.",Extra Dry,Mionetto
"Tastes higher in alcohol than the official reading of 14.5% abv, with some heat accompanying the raisin, cassis and sweet oak flavors. Doesn't conform to Ridge's house style, but it is a solid interpretation of Paso Robles Zinfandel. Drink now.",Benito Dusi Ranch,Ridge
"The nose on this heavily oaked, extremely ripe Malbec is minty and stuffed with raisiny notes along with wood-based chocolate and vanilla scents. The palate rests on a beam of acidity, but overall this is very thick and dense, with prune, molasses, mint and an abundance of oak influence. On the finish, the barrel element is omnipresent.",1955 Vineyard Estate Grown La Consulta,TintoNegro
"There's a sweet, floral touch at the open that is followed by peach nectar and lemon mousse. Small percentages of Bianchetta and Verdiso grapes give the wine a softer, plusher performance in the mouth.",Anno Zero Extra Dry,Valdellövo
"This is a lovely bottle from this Idaho producer with notes of hay, butter, spice and melon. It has a broad, creamy feel that lingers on the finish.",French Creek Vineyard,Periple
"This Amarone has a fragrance of blackberry, plum and oak, all of which carry over to the palate alongside notes of black licorice and pepper. You'll also detect a warm midpalate and warmth of alcohol on the close.",Monte La Parte,Piccoli
"Full, rounded and rich, this wine shows some wood flavors as well as complex tannins and acidity. There's a funky edge to it that suggests a rustic character. At the end, though, the acidity of the vintage dominates.",Vintage,Quinta Vale Dona Maria
"Charred aromas top this dark-fruited, high-quality Bobal from central Spain. While not very complex, this wine is exceedingly friendly and easy to like; it feels smooth and deep, with oaky goodness supporting black-fruit, carob and herbal flavors. Toast, blackberry, licorice and clove flavors all rise up on a clean, medium-length finish.",,Bovale
"This is fresh and lively, with a black cherry core accented by hints of nutmeg, mint, carob and fig. It has both elegance and structure. Pair this with meat-filled ravioli or seasoned cheeses.",Pariondo,Brunelli
"An intensely dark and elegant Malbec, structured in firm tannins and complex in black almost-liqueur-like cherry, and a finish of herb, oak and mocha. A full-bodied and yet soft wine that is ready to drink now that is poised to get more interesting in time. A small percentage (10%) of Cabernet Sauvignon is blended in.",Amber Knolls Vineyard,Cinnabar
"A strongly herbal, garrigue character dominates the overall personality of this wine, but is supported by ample black plum and cherry notes to keep it from being overly earthy or green. Firm, slightly astringent tannins coat the palate and remain well into the finish.",Carrément Rouge,Domaine de l'Edre
"Briny, slightly herbal aromas suggest lifted horse hide and leather notes. This is lively on the palate, with herbal, foxy flavors of plum and cassis that finish with toasty oak, licorice and heat. This is a bright, honest introduction to what Priorat wines are about.",Negre,Finca Tobella
"Brightened with zesty, lime-juice acidity and a cooling minerality, this Chardonnay features ripe, forward tropical fruit, orange and peach flavors, with a touch of buttered toast and vanilla. It's fancy enough to drink now with shellfish, tuna tartare, stuffed mushrooms, tempura, or even an upscale pizza.",Fleur de Edna Winemaker Series,Edna Valley Vineyard
"This structured ripasso has intense aromas of prune, raisin and graphite. The round and velvety palate offers a ripe blackberry core, spiced by accents of chocolate, mint, tobacco and bitter almond. Pair this with seasoned cheeses or spicy red-meat dishes.",,Arduini
"As light in color and silky in texture as a Pinot Noir, with refined tannins and a fine burst of acidity. The flavors are characterized by the cherries and raspberries associated with Grenache, along with notes of white pepper, cinnamon, bacon and a floral note. The alcohol is a little too high for comfort or ageability.",Hope Family Vineyard,Austin Hope
"Lightning is a Rhône-style white, half Viognier and half Roussanne, with a splash of Marsanne. In this vintage, the alcohol drops down below 13%, to good effect. Barrel fermentation has brought a lovely creaminess to both texture and flavors. It's a mix of stone and light tropical fruits, especially pineapple, peach and green banana, with highlights of toast and a streak of vanilla.",Lightning,Airfield Estates
"Sourced from the winery's highest, steepest site, and barrel-fermented with partial malolactic, this is a fine effort in a lighter vintage. Yeasty and creamy in the mouth, it melds a mix of banana, pineapple and coconut cream in a wine with excellent structure and length. The hint of caramel provides a flourish on the finish.",Reserve,Airfield Estates
"Attractive and fruity wine with a twist of tannin over the juicy yet bitter cherry fruit. The wine has a sense of structure, firm and showing some wood as well as tannin. Worth aging another year.",Flower Label,Georges Duboeuf
"This wine shows lots of finesse for the price. The mousse is exceptionally refined, carrying complex flavors of limes, strawberries, brioche, vanilla and honey. The blend is mostly Pinot Noir, with about 9% Chardonnay.",Sonoma Brut,Gloria Ferrer
"The blend of this wine has changed significantly in 2010, now an equal mix of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with 9% Syrah. As with other J. Bookwalter reds, it is loaded with appealing barrel toast, in both aroma and flavor. The Syrah shines through, adding spice and ripe berry flavors.",Protagonist,J. Bookwalter
"Though it's 92% Cabernet Sauvignon, this includes a splash of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Malbec. The pretty, floral nose is all about rose petals and milk chocolate. It tightens up in the mouth and battens down with blueberry, blue plum, milk chocolate and a somewhat astringent finish. A streak of smoke and tar runs through the tannins.",,Januik
"This 100% Pinot Noir is full-bodied and rich, with raspberry, cherry, yeast, toast and vanilla flavors that finish sweet and honeyed. The mouthfeel is soft and silky. Lovely for drinking now, as a toast or just Sunday brunch.",Blanc de Noirs,Breathless
"Here's an interesting Amarone that shows intense black pepper aromas, along with ripe plum and raisin notes. The palate delivers blackberry, plum, toast, coffee and chocolate notes. The oak is well integrated and the tannins are chewy, but this could use a bit more freshness.",,I Campi
"Structured wine, with firm tannins as well as a light touch of wood aging. It's a fruity wine, raspberry fruit cut with taut acidity. It can be drunk now for its fruitiness, but would be better allowing the tannins to soften. So drink from 2015.",Domaine des Perdrix,Domaines Devillard
"This has a fragrance of black fruit, vanilla and oak. On the palate, it shows mature blackberry and plum-cake flavors, along with very evident oak and toasted notes. While this is still alluring, the fruit and freshness are starting to fade, so drink soon.",Riserva Fondatori,Musella
"Delicious and soft in raspberries, cherries and the sweet vanilla and the cinnamon toast of new oak, this is a charming Pinot to drink now. It's light and airy in the mouth. Perfect with a simply prepared grilled steak or lamb chop.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Walt
"For a Beerenauslese this is more rich than sweet. It is very spicy and dry at the core with peppered pear flavors. It's powerful and concentrated, needing aging. Drink from 2017.",Beerenauslese,Tinhof
"Pure Petit Verdot has a loyal following, and fans of the unadulterated varietal version will find this a spot-on example. Scents of violets overlay dark red and black fruit aromas; flavors follow with earthy tannins well-modulated through a medium-long finish.",Underworld,Sparkman
"Here's a delicious ripasso, with mouthwatering aromas of black fruit, mushroom and white pepper. Mouthfuls of ripe black cherry, nutmeg and licorice flood the palate. Its velvety texture is uplifted by fresh acidity, making it perfect for rich pastas or steaks.",,Speri
"Made from a blend of Corvina, Syrah and Oseleta, this savory wine is made by one of Amarone's leading producers. It offers red currant, bell pepper and black pepper flavors. It's tightly wound but fresh, and would pair nicely with grilled portobello mushrooms.",La Grola,Allegrini
"The vineyard of the medieval Château de Mercey has produced a fully structured, fully fruity wine in 2010. It has ripe berry fruits, layers of acidity and a firm core of tannins. It should age over the next 3_4 years.",Château de Mercey,Antonin Rodet
"The best of a lineup of single varietal red wines, this melds raspberry and cassis fruit flavors into a wrapping of earth and licorice. The dark and roasted accents continue through the finish with earthy tannins and a hint of stem.",,J Bell Cellars
"A first for Lauren Ashton, this barrel-fermented Sémillon was sourced from the excellent Dineen Vineyard. It's firm and tightly packed with melon, jicama, pineapple and green banana fruit. Highlights of honeysuckle and lemon verbena are also in the mix. The finish is a little short, but more bottle age might well bump up the score.",,Lauren Ashton Cellars
"If fruit were the only thing that counted, this Pinot would get a perfect score, with an upfront burst of cherries, strawberries and raspberries. The oak appliqué is rich and balanced, and the tannin-acid structure is just fine. Its powerful fruit notes suggest to give it 6_7 years.",,Mansfield-Dunne
"88_90. Barrel sample. This wine is light, fruity and golden in color, with attractive acidity and soft hints of botrytis. The wine shows peach and ripe apricot flavors.",Barrel Sample,Château Bastor-Lamontagne
88_90. Barrel sample. Hedgerow aromas and herbal flavors open a wine that is lightly fruity and soft in texture. There is only the lightest touch of botrytis evident.,Barrel Sample,Château Doisy-Daëne
"88_90. Barrel sample. A full wine, on the dry side, showing its sweetness more through its richness. It has the character of a late-harvest wine, but it's structured and almost dry in character.",Barrel Sample,Château Clos Haut-Peyraguey
"86_88. Barrel sample. With a chemical aroma, this is a strange wine initially. It has some fruitiness, peach and spice flavors, but is soft with an almond and bitter aftertaste.",Barrel Sample,Château Suau
"This small, family-run estate in the heart of Bolgheri has delivered a wine so beautiful and elegant, it is catapulted to the level of landmark vintages of its celebrated neighbors, Sassicaia and Ornellaia. Inky concentration sets the stage for generous, but perfectly integrated, aromas of spice, chocolate and dark fruit. There's firm roundness in the mouth, followed by unforgettable persistence. Hold this wine 15 years or more.",Guado de' Gemoli,Giovanni Chiappini
"This is a landmark wine from a landmark vintage. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, which results in a generous, striking and unforgettable product. The bouquet is elegant and toned, with aromas of dark fruit, tobacco and chocolate. The mouthfeel is tight and firm, and it boasts persistence and impressive balance. It has all of the qualities required for long-term aging, so keep this for 10 years or more.",Guado al Tasso,Marchesi Antinori
"Made from 100% Cabernet Franc, Paleo opens with concentrated, sweet-smelling aromas of plum, cherry and cinnamon, which translate to the palate with added notes of spice, leather and tobacco. This is bold, opulent and delicious, and it's guaranteed to please. Hold for 10 years or more.",Paleo,Le Macchiole
"This is a big, dense wine that has great generosity. It's ripe, full bodied and opulent now, and it offers concentration and depth of flavor. The fruit used to make this wine was sourced from 60-year-old vines located near Clos de Tart. It has considerable aging potential, so cellar this for 8_10 years.",,Domaine Bruno Clair
"This 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is aged in 85% new oak, and it shows the essence of Oakville in its dry, tannic, ripe and complex identity. It would be hard to exaggerate the excellence of the blackberries, black currants, black cherries, dark chocolate and oak flavors, which have a Christmas-pudding-like headiness. A hint of raisin suggests it approaches overripeness, yet it maintains superb control. The tannins and overall balance should help this age for many years, but it can also be consumed now.",Game Ranch Single Vineyard Selection,Goldschmidt
"If you've ever wondered what makes this wine so special, the answer is simple: elegance. This shows polished fruit and spice aromas that are intense, balanced and beautifully integrated. The blend is 52% Cabernet Sauvignon, with the balance made up of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. The palate is dense, rich, smooth and supple. Drink this after 2018.",Masseto,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"If you've ever wondered what makes this wine so special, the answer is simple: elegance. This shows polished fruit and spice aromas that are intense, balanced and beautifully integrated. The blend is 52% Cabernet Sauvignon, with the balance made up of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. The palate is dense, rich, smooth and supple. Drink this after 2018.",Ornellaia,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"An unforgettable expression of Merlot from coastal Tuscany, this ranks among the top-scoring icon wines of the world. Smooth and intense, this selection's integration of fruit and oak-derived spice aromas is seamless. It feels silky yet firm, and it imparts beautiful cherry and chocolate flavors that last for many minutes. This is a keeper: Age it for 10 years or more.",Redigaffi,Tua Rita
"The vintage brings out the tension of this magisterial Chardonnay, and it layers nervy acidity with fresh apple and peach flavors and intense minerality. It is poised and ready to develop over many years.",,Louis Jadot
"Round, ripe and opulent, this landmark Merlot offers lingering tones of ripe black fruit, tobacco and spice. Oak-driven aromas are still evident at this point, so give it another 10_15 years of cellaring. Lingering smoke and spice notes add to the long finish. Messorio is one of the most complete and complex Italian interpretations of Merlot.",Messorio,Le Macchiole
"Bold and complex, this Syrah opens with intense, superrich notes of chocolate fudge, maraschino cherry, tobacco, sweet spice and rum cake. Smooth, elegant and persistent, this amazing expression boasts ripe fruit tannins. Drink after 2016.",Scrio,Le Macchiole
"Located in the northern end of Chambolle-Musigny, Bonnes Mares shows much of the same structure as Morey-Saint-Denis. This 2010 has so much weight and concentration, and it bears red fruit flavors and bright acids. It has a tannic side as well, which promises that this wine will age.",,Louis Jadot
"The nose demonstrates that this is obviously a wood-aged wine. The palate has a huge, dense structure, and the wood-derived tannins are buried within its powerful fruit and acidity. For those prepared to wait for 7_8 years, this has the potential to become rich and opulant.",,Louis Jadot
"One of the greatest Italian Merlots, the pedigree of L'Apparita is evident the minute you raise the glass to your nose. Notes of cherry and blackberry are seamlessly integrated with touches of oak spice, leather, tobacco and dark chocolate. The finish is long and smooth, and there's enough freshness and structure to allow this bottle to age for 10 years or more.",L'Apparita,Castello di Ama
"This is a blend of 81% Cabernet Sauvignon, 18% Merlot and 1% Cabernet Franc, and all of the fruit came from old vines from two of Washington's most revered vineyards, Champoux and Weinbau. Supple and ripe, it's packed with a brilliant, flavorful mix of berries, cherries and cassis. The tannins are polished, and the barrel-derived notes of toast, cinnamon, coffee and caramel linger through the long, smooth finish.",Reserve,Januik
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this shows compelling intensity and lovely layers of black fruit, ripe cherry, leather, tobacco, black pepper and licorice. The complexity is impressive, and so is the palate's persistence and elegance. Hold for 10 years or more.",Giusto di Notri,Tua Rita
"Structurally, this is near perfect, with sturdy yet supple tannins and bright acids that perk up the flavors of blackberry jam, milk chocolate, red currants and crème de cassis. This is classic Napa Cabernet Sauvignon; it's great to drink now, but it will also slowly evolve in the bottle over the next decade.","Good Times, Bad Times Beckstoffer To Kalon Vineyard",World's End
"Based on Cabernet Franc, with splashes of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this complex wine is rich and softly tannic. It shows the fat, fleshy appeal of Cabernet Franc from the great 2007 vintage, and it has developed a mellowness from bottle age. It still offers oak-infused blackberry, cherry and dark chocolate flavors, plus emerging notes of herbs.",El Alma de Jonata,Jonata
"Les Grandes Lolières is a vineyard in the large Corton Grand Cru. This Pinot Noir shows a delicate balance between fine structure and beautiful red-fruit flavors. At the same time, it has weight and richness that lend this wine power as well as the chance to age for many years.",Les Grandes Lolières,Roche de Bellene
"Corton-Charlemagne has produced a powerful and concentrated wine. The massive, opulent feel is balanced by tropical fruits and acids, which are layered between the toast and spice notes. It needs many years to mature.",,Louis Jadot
"This firm, tannic wine is made from fruit sourced from a vineyard in the heart of Morey-Saint-Denis. It's a solid selection, and it has enormous potential. The ripe black-cherry and plum flavors are dominated by the tannins. Concentrated, this is ready for long-term aging.",,Louis Jadot
"Made from fruit that was sourced from old vines, some of which were planted in 1912, this wine is dense and concentrated. It demonstrates both elegance and an immense tannic character. Acidity and flavors of blackberry and spice are all present. This demands to be aged for a long time.",,Domaine Bruno Clair
"There is a leafy, herbal component to this estate-grown Cabernet Sauvigon, plus suggestions of fresh-cut tobacco and black tea. Aromatic and inviting, the wine also offers a subtle moist-earth note under the ripe, rich flavor of black fruit. Delicious and beautifully structured, this is for aging over the next 5_10 years.",Heather Hill,Abeja
"The quality of fruit in this expression of Syrah is dark, plush, rich and opulent. The bouquet offers notes of black cherry, prune, smoked bacon, tobacco, white pepper and clove. The tannins are luscious and firm, and there's plenty of ripe fruit to keep the wine firmly fixed to the palate for many minutes.",Perbruno,I Giusti e Zanza
"The king of the Gevrey-Chambertin grand crus, this powerful, concentrated Chambertin is a blockbuster. It is currently dominated by its structure, which hides the ripe fruit. Made from grapes sourced from the upper portion of the Chambertin vineyard, this selection also has a mineral element, and it promises considerable aging potential.",Domaine du Clos Frantin,Albert Bichot
"Made from 100% Merlot, this wine is immensely soft and plush, and it offers blackberry, cherry and chocolate tones that build in momentum as the wine aerates in the glass. The mouthfeel is velvety, rich and generous, and there's an espresso note on the finish. Set this bottling aside for 10 years or more.",Poggio ai Merli,Castellare di Castellina
"Firm and focused, this lightly spiced effort supports its tart cherry fruit with ample acidity. Hints of toasted coconut build in the finish. A few more years of bottle age should bring further integration.",Nuthouse Lone Star Vineyard,Argyle
"A striking shade of amber/orange, this soft and fruity wine is open and loose knit, with broad flavors of mature, slightly oxidized tree fruits, plus lightly spicy notes of cinnamon and baking spices. It's very well made, but well apart from any standard approach.",Wirtz Vineyard,Big Table Farm
"A delicate streak of honeycomb gilds layers of yellow peaches, apples and tangerines in this off-dry Riesling. Its concentrated fruitiness is lip smacking, but it's also quite elegant, reverberating long on a steely strike of acidity and minerality. Drink now through 2020.",Piesporter Goldtröpfchen Kabinett,Bischöfliche Weingüter Trier
"Mature black fruit, toast and spice aromas lead the nose. The firm palate is still tightly wound, offering baked black cherry, licorice and espresso balanced by youthfully assertive, taut tannins. Drink after 2019.",del Comune di Serralunga d'Alba,Cantina del Nebbiolo
"Crushed rose, pressed violet, perfumed berry, sage and a balsamic note are just some of the aromas you'll find on this full-bodied red. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, black pepper and licorice alongside tightly knit tannins and the subtle warmth of alcohol. Give it a few more years to come together. Drink 2018_2016.",,Cantina del Pino
"A nose of wild blackberry and brambles lays the groundwork for a tender dance of fruit and herbal flavors, especially blackberry, pomegranate, eucalyptus and fennel bulb. Mouth-coating tannins dissipate on the finish, joined by a burst of tart pomegranate.",Kayoumi Single Vineyard,Carmel
"Produced from vines grown in a boulder and fossil strewn vineyard, this is a rich smoky wine. It has a deep color from the Alicante Bouschet in the blend, with firm tannins and dark juicy plum skin flavors. It's going to be a ripe rich wine as it develops. Drink from 2017.",Stones & Bones,Casa Santos Lima
"This lovely wine captures the floral, perfumed essence of the grape in a restrained, sippable style. It's dry and crisp, with lemony fruit and the delicate sensation that you are drinking fresh flowers.",,Château Bianca
"This opens with earthy aromas of scorched earth, ripe berry, leather and a funky whiff of game. The full-bodied palate offers mature black cherry, black raspberry, truffle, grilled sage, ground pepper and a hint of tobacco alongside youthfully assertive, solid tannins. Drink after 2018.",Olo,Clavesana
"Root beer, cola nut, black cherry, black raspberry and anise seed combine for an exciting nose on this bottling from a winery near Morgan Hill. The mouthfeel is full, with graphite and lively fennel-bulb spice mixing with blackberry fruit and an earthy elegance on the pleasing palate.",Murphy's Choice,Clos LaChance
"Juicy succulent tangerine and yellow peach flavors meld on the palate of this forward fruity off-dry wine. On first taste, it's quite straightforward, but added attention reveals glimmers of spice, saffron and mineral complexities. Drink now through 2024.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Kabinett,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Situated in the center of the premier crus of Puligny, Champgains produces an elegant, textured wine. This bottling, with the warmth of 2013 behind it, is fragrant with white fruits and has a soft aftertaste. It needs to age to bring it out its more complex character, so wait until 2018.",Les Champgains Premier Cru,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"With its appealing toast and fruit aromas, this is a rich wine. It does keep plenty of steely texture while allowing the yellow fruits, ripe pear and toast to shine. In style it hovers halfway between the ripe, buttery Meursault of the past and the crisper style of today, a fine compromise and ready to drink now.",,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"A minuscule amount of this wine is made, coming from 45-year-old vines. Ripe, dense and dusty red and black berries combine against soft, approachable layers of integrated tannin and oak, finishing with leather and cigar.",The Hidden One Exceptional Selection,Leto
"Aromas of pressed rose, dried berry, leather, chopped herb, cinnamon and a balsamic note emerge in the glass. The subtle palate delivers dried black cherry, black raspberry, licorice and a hint of tobacco alongside firm, ripe tannins. Enjoy sooner rather than later to capture the remaining fruit richness.",Rocche Rivera,Luigi Oddero & Figli
"Aromas of mature black plum, espresso, wild rose and spice emerge on this full-bodied red. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, menthol, mint, white pepper, well-integrated oak and licorice alongside fine-grained tannins.",Serragrilli,Marchesi di Barolo
"Pressed rose petal, red berry, chopped herb and a whiff of exotic spice come together on this elegantly structured red. The medium-bodied palate offers juicy wild cherry, crushed raspberry, ground pepper and anise alongside firm, polished tannins. Drink 2017_2023.",Treasurì,Mauro Sebaste
"The nose is initially rather closed but eventually reveals dark berry, blue flower and brown baking spice. The ripe palate offers mature black cherry, coffee, cocoa, star anise and chopped sage alongside tightly packed tannins. Give this another two or three years to let the tannins unfurl, then enjoy.",Arborina,Mauro Veglio
"Rose, red berry, baked earth, forest floor and grilled herb aromas lead the nose while the firm palate offers dried black cherry, cake spice and anise. Firm, fine-grained tannins provide the backbone. Drink 2018_2026.",Borzoni,Montaribaldi
"Offering aromas of black cherry and green pepper with a whiff of matchstick, this wine has flavors of black cherry, raspberry, smoked meat, mace and green tea. There is a good yin and yang of fruit and savory flavors, while chewy tannins wane at the first sign of orange zest on the bright finish.",Elima,Or Haganuz
"Blackberry and leather pouch jump from the glass from this full-bodied wine that stays light on its feet despite the generous ripeness. Cinnamon, black pepper and black licorice round out the flavors, finishing soft and with length.",,Papapietro Perry
"Although this wine is listed as a white blend, the producer says the variety is Vernaccia, not found often in California. Light in alcohol and approach, it opens in a bouquet of waxy apple and Meyer lemon, followed by a medium-powered palate of pear. The finish is crisp and lean.",Santo Giordano Vineyard Belle Torrette,Paro
"This pale-colored rosé is made from Chardonnay with the addition of Pinot Noir still wine to give the color. It is fresh and crisp, offering a lively mousse with attractive flavors of raspberry and fresh red currants. With its refreshing acidity, it is ready to drink.",Rosé des Blancs Brut Premier Cru,Pierre Gimonnet et Fils
"Aromas of dark berry, tilled soil, underbrush and espresso lead the nose while the taut palate offers sour cherry, sage, white pepper and star anise. It's still tightly wound and nervous, with bracing tannins. Drink 2019_2029.",Monvigliero,Pietro Rinaldi
"Aromas of oak extract, toast, red berry and espresso wrap around this structured wine. The firm palate offers up sour cherry, ground pepper and licorice alongside assertive, fine-grained tannins. Drink 2018_2028.",,Pio Cesare
"Dark plum and milk chocolate are the stars of this chalky, soft wine, almost entirely varietal, with a splash of Petit Verdot. Integrated oak helps make it approachable and fruit-forward, while the finish is subtle in fireplace smoke.",Estate Collection,Raymond
"In this blend, Cabernet Sauvignon was co-fermented with Petite Sirah, with 70% of the grapes grown in the Napa Valley. There's a compelling richness of earthy truffle and red berry in the wine, supported in full-bodied breadth by a grip of tannin. Bennett Valley Syrah and Dry Creek Merlot also figure into the mix.",,Red C
"The regular bottling from the estate vineyard takes the spotlight in 2013, with a lightness and delicacy that in no way means it is simple or insubstantial. There's much to admire, from the silky cherry fruit to the dusty traces of sandalwood, saffron and butter brickle.",Wits' End Vineyard,Roco
"All Pinot Noir, fermented in neutral oak and put through partial malolactic, this belongs in the rosé category. A pretty, pale-copper color, it offers a pleasing toasted-cracker frame around stone fruit and supple acids. Drink this chilled to white wine temperature.",Cancilla Vineyard Blanc de Noir,Swick
"This blend of 71% Roussanne, 21% Grenache Blanc and 8% Picpoul Blanc offers cut Meyer lemon, tangerine and pink-grapefruit aromas on the nose, along with the promise of a creamy palate. Instead, the palate is quite tight and restrained, starting tart but opening toward lemon rinds and pear flesh, and wiping up clean on the finish.",Esprit Blanc de Tablas,Tablas Creek
"There is no mistaking this for any other variety, with its unapologetic grassy aromas and snap-pea flavors, crisp balance, nervy texture and lively finish. Very refreshing and alive, it will be great with fresh cheeses and practically all kinds of seafood.",Estate,Casey Flat Ranch
"Château Bazin's wine comes from vineyards on slopes above the Garonne river. Made from a blend that includes Bordeaux grapes and the local Abouriou, it is powerful with mint and tar, perfumed and rich. Very structured and dense, it has firm tannins that will still develop. Best drunk from 2016.",Château Bazin,Cave du Marmandais
"Fresh and toasty, spicy and focused, this matches crisp fruit flavors of apple, citrus and pineapple to barrel-fermented grace notes. The overall length and definition are excellent, and the wine should drink well now through 2020.",,Black Hills
"This blend of Petit Manseng and Petit Courbu is dry, although the Petit Manseng gives its characteristic hints of honey even here. It is floral, fragrant, rich and balanced. Acidity cuts through the richness to give shape and allow the texture to fill out. The wine is ready to drink.",Château Montus Blanc,Alain Brumont
"Richness and ripeness combine with a multilayered and tannic texture that frames the flavors, massages the palate and carries the expressive fruit character through a lingering finish. Ripe blackberries and raspberries accompany a subtle vein of spice and mineral flavors that add complexity.",Reposado,Borjón
"Delicious, rich black cherry aromas lead to a very firm and moderately tannic texture and medium to full body that frames abundant fruit flavors. It's mouthwatering, intense and complex, but is still wound up tight, so it's best to drink after 2016.",,Cuda Ridge Wines
"This southern Rhône-style blend is soft, lush and heavy with a rich mix of peach, apricot and papaya fruit power. One-third new oak barrels put a patina of toast and butterscotch on the ripe fruit, with a finishing flavor of fresh roasted cashews.",Trebella,Church & State
"Softly layered in medium-sized waves of earth, rose and strawberry, this is a delightful wine with enough stuffing through the midpalate to enjoy on its own or with a meal.",Bella Luna Vineyard,Churchill Cellars
"This is all about juicy, ripe fruit, tempered by freshness and a velvety tannin structure. Fleshy, ripe red and black cherry is expansive and open on nose and palate. A joy to drink and ready now.",,Esterházy
"Spice, tar and crushed blackberries play on nose and palate. The midpalate is dense and still dominated by firm, drying tannins. This will benefit from some cellaring__annins will become more pliable and the firmly held fruit aromas will release into earthiness.",Admiral,Pöckl
"Tart and lively, this lip-licking Chenin includes 9% Sauvignon Blanc in the blend. Strong citrus flavors__emon and grapefruit__long with pineapple, provide the concentrated core. A perfect oyster wine, with sap, snap and tang.",,Quails' Gate
"Aromatic green pear with hints of peardrop dominates the nose and the palate is cushioned, despite the lively acidity. Plenty of verve and fruit in one compact package.",Schiefer Reserve,Forstreiter
"Definitely pink-colored, this tastes as much wine as Champagne. A rich strawberry and red cherry flavor gains texture from the tangy acidity and hint of lemon zest. It could age until late 2015 in bottle to be even better.",Rosé,H. Blin
"Rich and ripe, this wine smells sunny like plums and cherries pulled from the tree. It offers a broad and supple texture, with mellow spice and cherry flavors. All that flavor is wrapped in a soothing blanket of fine tannins and just enough acidity to keep it fresh.",,Handley
"This wine gets neutral French oak and it shows in its zesty profile of orange and tangerine over apple and pear. The fruit is hearty and juicy, the texture light and refreshing.",Magnolia Inspiration Vineyard,Krutz
"A late-harvest blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Chardonnay and Sémillon from a good year for botrytis, this is dark gold in color. It offers sweet, lush and satisfying swaths of dried apple and orange that linger on the palate, finished with a drop of honey.",Sweet Leslie Late Harvest,Kunde
"This offers ripe yellow and green pear shot through with grapefruit zest, with a yeasty, savory streak on the midpalate and a touch of pineapple. Certainly ripe and rounded__ut beautifully tempered by lively white pepper.",Spies,Kurt Angerer
"This warm-vintage wine strikes a perfect mix of restraint and intensity, with its abundant notes of peach and pear. It's lightly creamy in feel, with deft fruit flavors that show an exquisite sense of balance throughout.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Yeasty notes of pear with floral hints provide a nose that is both earthy and ethereal. The savory yeastiness is stronger on the rounded, structured palate framed by a phenolic edge.",Spiegel Reserve,Mantlerhof
"Tulip blossom, fresh green apple and feisty lemon acidity play on the palate of this wine that offers flavorful refreshment. The lasting length suggests hidden depths worth plumbing.",Klausen,Neumeister
"This solidly fruity wine comes with a generous application of toasty, buttery oak flavors. About 40% was barrel fermented, the rest done in stainless steel. Fleshy peach fruit is awash in buttery caramel and toffee flavors.",,Nk'Mip Cellars
"This soft and pretty wine offers lovely suggestions of rose and lavender on the nose, leading into a rich texture of bright red cherry and blueberry. An oak kicker on the finish serves as reminder of the 50% new French oak used for aging.",Windsor Oaks Vineyard,Pali
"Estate-grown from a small family winery and entirely Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine is savory in earthy truffle, subdued plum, black cherry and tobacco leaf. A complex intermingling of pencil shavings and cedar round things out. On the palate the generous tannins are sure to smooth over time.",Reserve,Summers
"Yeasty citrus notes dominate the nose while the palate is savory with chervil, sage and more yeast. A vein of crisp citrus acidity pulls it all together. The aftertaste lingers long with lemon zest.",Höhereck Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"This blend of Syrah (50%), Petit Verdot (18%) and equal parts Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon carries appealing aromas of herbs, cherries, orange peel and sweet barrel spices. It shows a pleasing sense of restraint, accenting the Syrah's suppleness with an elegant styling that keeps the attention high.",Turas,Telaya
"A blend of Merlot (58%), Syrah (35%), Petite Sirah (5%) and Primitivo, this hedonistic wine offers appealing suggestions of coffee, vanilla and cherry. Ripe, silky soft milk chocolate flavors finish warm.",Rock Island,Ryan Patrick
"Soft, cushioned, apricot-scented ripeness plays on the palate, with edges of yeastiness, spritz and fresh citrus buffered by plump apricots. This is gentle, fresh and pleasingly long, always with the scent of apricot.",Gelbling Reserve,Sepp Moser
"A reserve-level Merlot, this is blended with 9% Cabernet Franc and 2% Syrah, then barrel-aged for 18 months in new, one- and two-year-old French oak barrels. Oaky, smoky, charred and tannic, it's a bit of a bruiser. But dig down and you'll find cassis, black cherry, coffee, cola, licorice and tar__n short, a compelling range of dark flavors, all well-integrated. Drink soon.",Oldfield Series,Tinhorn Creek
"Made from Nebbiolo aged in large casks, this garnet-colored wine offers lovely fragrances of rose petal and woodland berry. The elegant palate doles out crunchy red cherry, crushed raspberry, clove and mineral, alongside smooth, polished tannins. Fresh acidity adds vibrancy. Drink through 2019.",,Travaglini
"Waxy lemon and the crisp bite of an apple open this wine that builds power as it goes, becoming a full-bodied expression of Russian River apple-kissed fruit. Toasty oak and silky tannins buoy the midpalate, ending with a lift of orange citrus.",River Road Ranch,Trione
"This Pinot Grigio from Trentino__art of which is barrel aged__ffers aromas of pear, apple, oak and flint. The linear palate delivers restrained lemon peel, apple and oak sensations in a lean but elegant style.",,Maso Poli
"Dusty mineral and herbaceous green notes juxtapose curiously with slightly overripe apple and peach flavors on the palate of this dry Riesling. Soft tangerine acidity lends a sunny, refreshing tone on the finish.",Trocken,Baron Knyphausen
"This is a ripe, lemon and orange zest-driven wine. It has a lightly mineral texture that gives structure as well as a cool feel. It's a delicious wine already but will be better by late 2014.",Marquês de Borba Branco,J. Portugal Ramos
"This rather sweet wine leads with heady floral aromas that recall red and white roses. The off-dry palate offers lemon zest, pink grapefruit and ripe apple alongside fresh acidity. Try this as an apéritif.",,Kellerei Kaltern Caldaro
"Here's your basic everyday Zindandel at a good-value price. It's dry and tannic, with spicy flavors of blackberries and plums. Easy to drink, and it gains traction as as it warms in the glass.",,Kenwood
"Aromas of toasted oak, vanilla and butterscotch carry over to the palate together with red apple skin and pear alongside fresh acidity. Not much fruit richness, but it's crisp and linear.",San Brizio,La Cappuccina
"Not very expressive, it opens with subdued aromas that recall lemon peel and toast. These carry over to the palate along with a note of butterscotch. There's not enough fruit richness to support the racy acidity.",Tasnim,Loacker
"This wine opens with vanilla, smoke, lemon peel and pear. The linear palate offers tart yellow apples, yellow grapefruit, graphite and a hint of vanilla alongside bright acidity.",Il Pigno,Marcato
"Notes of milk chocolate accompany black currant, green olive and toasty oak flavors in this dry, creamy 100% Cabernet. It's not an ager, but will be fine through 2017.",Heritage Selection,Pat Paulsen Vineyards
"This easy wine will pair nicely with slightly sweet fare, such as sausage risotto, Chinese pork and chicken dishes, or a ham sandwich with Dijon mustard. It's crisp in acidity, with flavors of honey, apricots, lemons and limes.",,Pech Merle
"Dry and tannic, this Pinot is heavy. It has strong flavors of blackstrap molasses, tea, black cherry jam and oak, and is ready to drink now.",,Peters Family
"Pineapple and mango dominate this full-bodied, ripe wine. Soft and given a lift by lime juice, it is a well-balanced blend of Arinto and Fernão Pires. The aftertaste is fresh and fruity.",,Quinta da Alorna
This fruity blend of Merlot and Cabernet Franc offers aromas of red currants and raspberry along with whiffs of bell pepper. The palate delivers vibrant blackberry and black cherry along with hints of black pepper. It's straightforward and made to be enjoyed young.,Red e.motion,Tenuta Luisa
"Delicate sensations of pear, citrus and peach team with crisp acidity that leaves a clean finish. Pair this with shrimp scampi or pasta topped with fresh vegetables.",Vigneti di Monteforte,Santi
"Subtle floral aromas and whiffs of tropical fruit lead to a lean palate that offers peach, papaya and mango alongside bright acidity. Pair it with lightly seasoned seafood dishes.",Auge,Villa Canestrari
"A fruity, lightly tannic blend that comes from a region just to the east of Bordeaux itself. It has ripe berry fruits, a sense of dry structure enveloped with juicy black currants and is finished with crisp acidity.",Chevalier du Grand Loc,Vincent Lataste
"This soft, round and fruity wine is styled for immediate consumption. Light fruit flavors of apple and Asian pear are finished with a lick of lemony acid.",Dijon Clone,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"This simplest, freshest and lightest of Chablis styles has a refreshing lemon character, a light touch of melon and crisp acidity. Drink now.",,Domaine Laroche
"Lemon and creamed pear flavors give this open, soft wine attractive fruitiness. The fruit is everything here, with acidity adding a crisp edge to the rounder textures. It is ready to drink.",,Evening Land
"A blend of 90% Sangiovese and 10% Merlot, this discloses weedy, leafy aromas. The one-dimensional palate offers toast, coffee, sweet chocolate and dark berry. It's not an an ager so enjoy soon.",,Fattoria di Montecchio
"Made from old vines and aged in small barrels, this wine is dominated by oak. Opening aromas include wood, toast and a hint of butter and apples. Oak extract takes center stage on the palate which also reveals citrus peel and a hint of apricot and mineral, as well as firm acidity. It lacks fruit richness.",Vegnie Vecie,Fraccaroli
"This is a warm, ripe and spicy wine. It is full of red fruits, black currant and soft tannins, with great acidity at the end. Drink now.",Monte das Servas Escolha,Herdade das Servas
"A warm, ripe and fruity wine that holds a mix of crisp apple acidity and richer yellow fruits. There is just enough acidity to give freshness while the wine has a richer, full character. It should age until 2015.",Branco,Herdade do Rocim
"This attractive and fruity rosé is very dry and rich. With red fruits, a sense of texture and just a hint of tannin, this is a food rosé, firm and ready for summer 2014.",Olho de Mocho,Herdade do Rocim
"The texture is off, resulting in a rustic feeling, despite lush flavors of raspberries, figs and sweet, toasty oak. Mainly the problems are jarring tannins plus alcoholic heat on the finish.",Pisoni Vineyard,Bernardus
"Buttered toast, honeysuckle and vanilla flavors dominate. The underlying fruit flavors suggest mangoes, pears and limes. Drink this oaky wine now.",Rosella's Vineyard,Bernardus
"This pretty wine showcases aromas of yellow flowers and exotic fruit. The bright palate offers honeydew melon, apple and a hint of almond alongside crisp acidity that leaves a quenching finish.",Rocca Sveva,Cantina di Soave
"An attractively aromatic wine, full of open fruitiness. It has layers of black currant fruit that go with the fresh acidity, plus a touch of herbs that are followed by firm tannins. Juicy and ready to drink from 2015.",,Château Crusquet de Lagarcie
"Ripe and creamy in texture, this is a pear and peach flavored wine. A touch of butteriness gives a rounded texture and a hint of vanilla. Drink this fruity wine from 2015.",,Château Philippe-le-Hardi
"Rubber, Band-Aid and iodine aromas mix with berry fruit and plum on the nose of this blend. The mouthfeel is choppy and light, while blackened flavors of blackberry and plum finish somewhat bitter.",Legado Reserva,De Martino
"Earthy, dried-fruit aromas are dessicated, while oaky scents of vanilla and licorice offer complexity. This Garnacha-led blend feels jammy in structure; flavors of plum and raspberry come with herbal notes, while the finish is tangy due to pointed acidity, with strawberry flavors in support.",Propiedad,Palacios Remondo
"Made with organically farmed grapes, this robust Nero d'Avola opens with aromas of black and red berries, spice and just-tilled soil. The juicy palate delivers flavors of ripe black cherry, blackberry and raspberry that are accented by notes of black pepper and cinnamon that add interest.",Donnat_,Alessandro di Camporeale
"Jammy berry and plum aromas are solid but sort of generic. This is fresh and lively on the palate, with a pointed, prickly overall feel. Standard berry and plum flavors are a touch earthy and finish with moderate depth.",Bruberry,Portal del Montsant
"This wine has a broad, ripe feel alongside a textured and toasty edge. Rich apple and white peach flavors combine with a more edgy citrus character to give a wine that needs a few more months. Drink from late 2014.",,Domaine Gerald Talmard
"A perfumed wine, it's very fresh and bright with strawberry flavors as well as a delicate touch of tannin. A delicious wine to drink now.",,Domaine Rossignol-Trapet
"While delicately floral on the nose, this Rkatsiteli (an ancient Georgian grape) builds in intensity on the palate with flavors of ripe white peach balanced with searing lime acidity. Light on its feet and zesty to the finish, it's a refreshing quaffer with wide appeal despite its unusual name.",,Dr. Konstantin Frank
"Mature plum, blackberry and raspberry sensations take center stage on this young Nero d'Avola. The ripe fruit is accented by notes of subtle oak, espresso, black pepper and mint, alongside drying tannins.",Passo delle Mule,Duca di Salaparuta
"Here's a savory and focused white that has layers of juicy peach, mature pear, green apple, lemon-lime and mineral. The creamy palate is brightened by crisp acidity and it finishes on a note of roasted almond.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Here's a bright wine that offers sensations of tropical fruit, lemon-lime and Bartlett pear that all carry through to the savory palate. Bright acidity gives it a clean, refreshing finish. Pair this with pizza Margherita.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"White peach, Bartlett pear, grapefruit and Granny Smith apple take center stage on this linear, refreshing wine. Mineral and almond notes add depth while crisp acidity gives generates a clean, bright finish.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"This Bordeaux-style red blend is 40% Cabernet Sauvignon, 43% Merlot and 9% Petit Verdot. Tart and also astringent, it is all about the 60% new French oak at the moment, with rather delicate suggestions of raspberry fruit.",Artisan Blend,Foundry Vineyards
"Crisp and tight, it shows the more mineral, steely character of Pouilly Fuissé. It is fresh with green fruits and citrus, but the strong, firm texture dominates.",Domaine Chataigneraie Laborier Terroir de Vergisson,Gilles Morat
"Estate-grown fruit is at the center of all the g3 bottlings. Here the flavors blend cilantro, green apple and botanical nuances with softer layers of lemon cream and vanilla. It's a good value and drinking well in a Chardonnay from a cool vintage.",g3,Goose Ridge
"This barrel-aged Piedirosso opens with aromas of tilled earth, plum, prune, tobacco and mineral. The palate offers black fruit and spice, but this has already hit its ideal drinking window and the juicy fruit is starting to dry, so enjoy this soon.",Montegauro Riserva,Grotta del Sole
"Warm and rounded, it has toasty wood flavors, spice, layers of acidity, yellow fruits and a tighter texture. What it misses in freshness, the wine makes up for in richness. Drink from 2015.",Château du Clos,Joseph Burrier
"There's an intriguing tension to this wine, shiny in plum and a taste of cherry pie. Soft and structured, it should develop more nuance and complexity in the bottle, but serves exceptionally well right now as a companion to risotto or artisan pizza.",Unti Vineyard,Kobler
"Made with the native grape Casavecchia, this has a lovely fragrance of blue flower, tilled soil, leather and balsamic herbs. The soft, juicy palate offers supple tannins and fleshy blackberry flavor, accented with spice.",Vinalia,La Masserie
"Full-bodied and swathed in oak, this shows the bigger side of Chardonnay, piquant and luxe with lemon and grapefruit swirls within larger casings of vanilla and caramelized oak.",Cold Creek,Laird
"Bright cranberry notes perfume this fresh, fruit-forward Cabernet Franc. Red cherry and berry flavors are tart and juicy on the palate, marked with soft tannins and just a hint of bitterness on the finish.",Estate Bottled T23 Unoaked,Lamoreaux Landing
"This full and heady wine offers marshmallow oak around a core of grapefruit and honeyed fruit. With soft acidity, it veers into darker fig and toasted oak characteristics before lifting again towards the finish, which swirls in lemon and grapefruit.",,Ledson
"Oceanic notes, white pepper, minerally whiffs and generic white-fruit aromas control the bouquet on this zesty Albariño. Minerally flavors of peach and nectarine come with a saline note, while the finish is firm and bright.",,Licia
"This structured wine is well balanced with fruit and acidity. Ripe fruits, a touch of wood aging and final acidity have given an elegant wine that's ready to drink.",,Louis Jadot
"This inviting blend of 60% Falanghina and 40% Biancolella has lovely aromas of jasmine, Spanish broom and citrus. The palate doles out ripe tropical fruit, green apple, nectarine and lemon zest flavors, balanced by just the right amount of fresh acidity.",Furore Bianco,Marisa Cuomo
"Assyrtico speaks of the sea, and this bottling drives home the mineral-driven, sea-salt character that makes the variety so special. Elegant and fresh, with a touch of light lemon rind and lime zest, this is a seafood lover's friend. Lots of balance and character.",St. Elias,Papaioannou
"Exotic spice and bramble notes accent rich, ripe aromas of blackberry preserves on this perfumed Bordeaux-style red. A blend of Cabernet Franc and Merlot, there's a plush, primary fruitiness to the palate, but it's elegantly structured with bright cranberry acidity and finely-grained tannins that add texture to the finish.",White Horse Unfined & Unfiltered,Bloomer Creek
"This is a ripe and fruity wine, with soft tannins and rich raspberry fruits. Already accessible, it's very full in the mouth, wonderfully juicy and jammy, yet with some freshness at the end.",,Bouchard Père & Fils
Honey aromas lead to a wine that is soft and gently tangy at this stage. It is still developing its full potential to give ripe acidity and fruitiness. Wait until 2016.,En Carementrant,Bret Brothers
"Here's a round, savory Nero d'Avola that's loaded with juicy blackberry, tart red cherry and black raspberry sensations. The juicy, easygoing palate is accented by hints of black pepper, clove and roasted almond that give it a pleasantly bitter finish. There's low complexity, but it is delicious.",Gradiva Collectio,Casa di Grazia
"Bright red cherry and raspberry flavors are pristine and ripe in this powerful yet nuanced Lemberger. It's remarkably rich and full in body, but cranberry acidity makes it zesty and refreshing on the palate. It finishes with a touch of white pepper spice.",Sunrise Hill Vineyard,Damiani
"Funky aromas of barnyard, animal and overripe black fruit lead the nose of this robust Taurasi. The palate offers dense black cherry, spearmint, bitter prune, toasted oak, espresso and chocolate alongside firm, drying tannins.",,D'Antiche Terre
"If you can only cellar one Sonoma Pinot Noir from the 2011 vintage, make it this one. It's a big, tight wine with strong tannins, but somehow never loses sight of Pinot's essential delicacy. Despite the dryness, the wine has a luscious core of raspberries, red currants, cola and rhubarbs, along with subtle oak influences. Do not touch this wine before 2017, although it should still be going strong 15 years from now.",Camp Meeting Ridge Block 16,Flowers
"From one of the oldest vineyards in Austria, this is a hugely ripe and intense wine. It has obvious power and concentration balanced with flavorful acidity and creamy pear. Rich, full bodied and dense, it is still young and should not be drunk before 2015.",Tabor Reserve Die Räritat,Forstreiter
"Zesty orange and honey notes are touched with saffron on this unctuous, exotically spiced TBA. Caramel and preserved-peach flavors give the palate a silky richness, but it's remarkably complex as well, with a dusty minerality and tones of tea and spice that reverberate on the finish.",Scharlachberg Bingen Trockenbeerenauslese GG,Rheingraf
"Eligo is winemaker John Duval's luxury Shiraz, drawn from selected Barossa parcels. The 2009 is a dark, tarry Shiraz, heavy on the savory elements of black olives and dark chocolate and buttressed by ample cassis-tinged fruit. It's full bodied and firm, with a long, finely textured finish. Drink now_2025.",Eligo,John Duval Wines
"Like virtually all of Penfolds' top-end reds, this is full bodied and densely concentrated. As it's aged solely in large vats, there's no oak influence and the wine needs a bit of bottle age to come around. For now, it's a bit monolithic, showing hints of mint, black olive and ripe raspberries before ending long and fine. Drink 2017_2030, and perhaps beyond.",St. Henri,Penfolds
The Burg mountain above Spitz is the site of the steep and stony 1000-Eimerberg vineyard. This rich wine contrasts ripe stone fruits with a tight acidity and crisp freshness. It gives a wonderful tension that will be resolved with aging. Drink from 2017.,1000-Eimerberg Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"This stunning offering is aged in large casks that soften the wine but don't add wood tannins to Sagrantino's naturally tannic backbone. It opens with an intensely balsamic fragrance of Mediterranean herbs, mint and berry accompanied by delicious blackberry, white pepper and cinnamon flavors. The wine boasts fantastic depth and will develop even more complexity over time. Drink 2017_2027.",,Tenuta Castelbuono
"This is a wine that is so young. It is aromatic, fruity and still settling together in its potential concentration and structure. Look forward to a wine that has pear fruits, a tight, mineral character, and structure. Look forward to an impressive and serious future. Drink from 2016.",Loibner Loibenberg Smaragd,F X Pichler
"Here's one for the cellar. The deliciousness factor is high, but right now, it's all about intense, primary flavors of red plums, rasberries and mulberries framed within bold oak and tannins (in part due to partial whole-cluster fermentation). Still quite immature, it needs at least six more years to meld, but eventually, it's sure to be fantastic.",Camp Meeting Ridge,Flowers
"Among Cobos's high-end 2011 Malbecs, this one comes across as the most complete, layered and complex of the group. Aromas of fine oak and pencil lead augment blackberry and baked plum scents. The mouthfeel is smooth, round and rich, while flavors of tea, savory spices and black fruits dance long into the night. A ripe but not too heavy finish is earthy, calm and complete. Drink through 2019.",Bramare Marchiori Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"With dense fruit and a powerful, complex structure, this is one of the best wines from this chateau. Blackberries, black plums and a rich, generous character are all here, along with fine tannins. Drink this great success from 2018.",,Château Branaire-Ducru
"This is typical of the ripe and opulent style of this property with superripe black currant fruit. It's concentrated in flavor, but also structured with smooth tannins. It's a wine both for short-term fruitiness and long-term power and density. Drink from 2017.",,Château Rauzan-Ségla
This is a powerful wine that's very richly textured and with a structure that promises aging. It has weight and superripe peach and apricot flavors. There is a fine cut of acidity to give both freshness and aging potential. Drink from 2016.,Lamm Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Powerful and supremely rich, this is concentrated Riesling. It combines a strong mineral texture with brighter acidity and complex citrus fruits. It's a wine with a great future, both steely and structured. Don't drink before 2017.",Steinmassel Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Don't be fooled by the easy fruitiness of this delicious wine, because underneath the blackberry flavors is a powerfully tannic structure. Opulent and dense, it promises considerable aging. Drink this complex wine from 2018.",,Château Pichon Longueville Comtesse de Lalande
"This wine deserves its lofty reputation as one of Italy's premier bottlings. It opens with a gorgeous fragrance of berry, leather, truffle and spice. The palate delivers ripe and delicious black cherry, black berry, white pepper and chocolate notes accompanied by firm but refined tannins. This will age beautifully and develop complexity for decades. Drink 2016_2028.",25 Anni,Arnaldo Caprai
"There is a peppery character to this fabulous wine, both from its aroma and its flavor. That gives both richness and adds to the dense, complex texture. The wine, with its finely textured acidity ,needs age over several years. Drink from 2016.",Käferberg Erste Lage Reserve,Bründlmayer
"This wine has a full-bodied character that is very ripe. Pepper dominates the flavors, showing off the quince and pear fruits. There is perhaps too much sulfur at this touch, so let it blow off when opening and before drinking. This wine has huge potential to age, so don't drink before 2015.",Dürnsteiner Liebenberg Smaragd,F X Pichler
"This small-production Chardonnay (only 272 cases) is exceptionally rich and ripe, as Williams Selyem Chardonnays consistently are. Intense flavors of tropical fruit and pear pie (with a smoky, buttery crust) make for a powerful palate. The acidity is mouthwatering. This is the ideal wine for cracked crab and a sourdough baguette with butter.",Drake Estate Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Waxy honeycomb and honeysuckle aromas are laced with earth and spice on this beautifully complex beerenauslese. It's intensely sweet, with notes of caramel and peach preserves, along with savory layers of smoke and saffron. So exquisitely delicate in profile, yet effortlessly languid on the finish.",Bernkasteler Badstube Beerenauslese,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"What a bargain for such a lavishly composed beerenauslese. Aromas of honey, spice and potpourri meld seamlessly on the palate, with flavors of caramel and peach preserves. It's luxuriously rich and creamy, but brightened by streaks of lemony acidity and a tea-leaf astringency that lingers long on the finish.",Rüdesheimer Berg Roseneck Beerenauslese,Dr. Nägler
"This is a luxurious wine that's opulently rich. Ripe black fruits dominate, lending fullness to the firm structure in the backdrop. It's a wine with great potential, density and weight. Touches of chocolate and licorice combine with flavors of dark plum, toast and spice. Drink from 2018.",,Château Lynch-Bages
"This is a very spicy wine with weight, great depth of flavor and concentration. Fine acidity cuts through the core, balancing sweetness and adding freshness to flavors of wild thyme-honey and orange marmalade. Drink the wine from 2017.",,Château Coutet
"This wine is sourced from a field blend of old vines grown on steep slopes behind Weissenkirchen. It has a very crisp character that's tight and mineral in style. Aromatic, spicy, herbal and perfumed, it needs time to open up and is still very young. Drink from 2016. Screwcap. Artisanal Cellars, Select Wines.",Weissenkirchner Zwerithaler Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"A partnership between the Metternich and Salomon families has produced this rich, elegant wine. It has such an aromatic, perfumed character and is so ripe and full. At the same time, it has a tight mineral edge, a fine streak of acidity and immense aging potential. Drink from 2016.",Pfaffenberg Erste Lage,Metternich-Salomon
"This is a super-ripe, rich wine that's very full in the mouth. It has an opulent feel to it, while also retaining acidity and crisp lemon and apple flavors. The aftertaste brings out pepper as well as a more mineral character. Drink from 2014.",Loibner Loibenberg Smaragd,F X Pichler
"This wine is bone dry, yet the fruit is so ripe and rewarding. Flavors of tangerines and apricots are accompanied by a tangy minerality and oak notes attributable to aging in 50% new barrels. So clean and vibrant, it makes for classy drinking now, but it will also be fascinating to watch its evolution over the next 6_8 years.",Camp Meeting Ridge Estate,Flowers
"Here's a rich, full-bodied wine that rolls from the first floral sniff into a wellspring of deep, briary, berry-cherry fruit. Peppery spices and dried Mediterranean herbs meld on an endlessly fascinating finish that promises decades of development ahead.",Block 33,Shea
"These 100-plus-year-old vines were transplanted to another site, but continue to yield outstanding wines. Intriguing aromas of fruit compote and roasted meat lead into a palate of blueberry and spice. It's medium to full in body, with supple tannins that finish on a faintly dusty note. Ready to drink now, but should hold at least through 2020.",Orphan Bank,Langmeil
"Aromas of sugar cookie and apple preserves entice on this ripe, rich spätlese. It's ethereally light on the palate, but deeply concentrated, with honey and peach flavors braced by soft pink-grapefruit acidity. It finishes elegantly, with a slick of honeycomb and lavender perfume. Drink now for its floral, fruity decadence.",Grünlack Spätlese,Schloss Johannisberger
"The 2013 Josef Vineyard is quieter on the nose than the more exuberant Magdalena, but the palate packs plenty of luscious fruit and floral punch. Semidry in style, it's feather light in texture yet concentrated apricot and yellow-cherry flavors are penetrating and persistent. Delicious now but will improve through 2023.",Josef Vineyard,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Made with 75% Merlot with the rest Cabernet Franc, this wine commands attention with aromas of dried and fresh herbs, black fruit, toast and flowers. The dark fruit flavors are rich, layered and tightly coiled, captivating attention with spot-on balance.",Star,Baer
"Cabernet Franc (84%) takes the lead on this wine with the balance equal parts Merlot and Petit Verdot. It opens with aromas of flowers, dried herbs, earth and mineral. The mouthfeel is dazzling, showing depth and intensity, with enough structure to go the distance.",Bel Canto Cara Mia Vineyard,Cadence
"Enticing aromas of rose, violet, mature berry and a whiff of leather lead the way on this structured red. The full-bodied palate offers layers of dried black cherry, leather, tobacco and grilled herbs, supported by a backbone of firm, ripe tannins. Hold for even more complexity. Drink 2018_2028.",Badarina,Grimaldi Bruna
"A perennial standout, this is an exuberantly rich, classic expression of the variety, with the heady, unmistakable imprint of the producer and vineyard. Expansive and generous in style, it offers baked honeycrisp apple and a jolt of lemon pith, with aromas of honeysuckle and vanilla. The finish is lengthy and substantial, with memorable minerality.",Red Shoulder Ranch,Shafer
"Focus and precision describe this wine. Subtle aromas of grilled herbs and wood smoke precede dark flavors of just-ripe black cherries and blueberries. A sleek texture of firm tannins and refreshing acidity gives a lot of personality. It is medium to full bodied, and will only get better with time. Best after 2020.",High Slopes,Terre Rouge
"Enticing aromas like salted nuts, exotic fruit flavors and a generous viscosity in the texture make this a luxurious and distinctive wine. Unusual for a white, it features savory hints of tobacco in the lush pineapple and guava flavors. Delicious and unique, it will also age well through 2020.",,Terre Rouge
"Equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot figure into this wine, along with 20% Malbec, all from the producer's estate. A mix of coconut and cherry-berry cobbler entice aromatically, seasoned in dried herb and black peppercorn. Dry, dusty tannins make their presence felt, the wine all in all tart, generous and lively, finishing in a slow drag of tobacco.",Reserve,Von Strasser
"Gorgeous, deep dark-fruit aromas waft from the glass in this vivid, racy and pure wine. A concentrated but not heavy black-cherry note starts in the aroma, drives through the flavors and on to the lingering finish. Bracing acidity and fine but firm tannins add an elegant, appetizing mouthfeel. It will improve through 2022.",The West End,E16
"Aromas of wild berry, underbrush and tobacco lead the nose on this classically crafted Barolo. The full-bodied palate delivers juicy Morello cherry, ripe black raspberry, baking spice and licorice alongside a network of ripe, assertive tannins and firm acidity. Drink 2018_2026.",Bussia,Giacomo Fenocchio
"Dark, rich mountain blueberry and blackberry form the core of this classically delicious Napa Valley wine from an estate vineyard. Velvety dark chocolate melts over integrated tannins and a medium-strength body, the finish lengthy, dusty and well-structured. Age through 2020_2022.",Cloudy's Vineyard,Janzen
"Earthy, dusty plum and berry aromas are concentrated, while this mature gran reserva is still vital on the palate due to fine, crisp acidity. Classic Rioja flavors of vanilla and tobacco accent raspberry and dried cherry flavors, while the finish is mild, harmonious and full of oaky vanilla notes. Drink through 2025.",Coto de Imaz Gran Reserva,El Coto
"Polished, elegant and supple, this offers upfront aromas of plum, strawberry and red cherry. The flavors are pure and fruity, but nicely complex, bringing in light nuances of vanilla, clove and cinnamon to top the cherry and berry freshness. Made from one of the state's oldest Cinsault plantings, this is supremely smooth and sophisticated.",Ancient Vine,Michael David
"This has a rather subdued nose that offers aromas of mature dark-skinned fruit, leather, tobacco, cooking spice and a balsamic note. The tightly woven, structured palate offers dried black cherry, ground pepper and intense licorice framed in a backbone of firm, refined tannins.",Rabaj_ Riserva,Giuseppe Cortese
"Using fruit mostly from the Bassi Ranch property he recently acquired, Mike Sinor delivers a bright, minerally wine, with aromas of scratched grapefruit skin, orange and peach juice, burned lemons, sea salt, ripe apples and nectarines and fresh-cut herbs. Flavors of salty, lime-juice nectarines emerge once sipped, with hints of butter and white flowers.",,Sinor-LaVallee
"A deep, dense concentration of black cherry and berry provides richness and juiciness to this wine, the fruit wrapped around velvety waves of full-bodied texture and a supporting wall of oak. Earthy licorice and black tea appear on the long finish.",Hellenthal,W.H. Smith
"Structured and elegant, this blend of 60% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Merlot and 10% Petit Verdot offers aromas of blackberry, red currant, blue flowers, clove and oak. The concentrate palate doles out black cherry, plum, sage, anise and tobacco alongside a backbone of fine-grained tannins. Drink 2016_2022.",Saffredi,Fattoria Le Pupille
"Ground pepper, tilled earth and black-skinned berry aromas all come together on this generous, full-bodied red. The fresh, delicious palate doles out ripe black cherry, black currant, licorice and clove alongside vibrant acidity and polished, fine-grained tannins.",Bricco dell'Uccellone,Braida di Giacomo Bologna
"Cabernet Franc and Cabernet Sauvignon each take up 38% of this blend, with the rest equal parts Merlot and Petit Verdot. It captivates with aromas of black licorice, purple flowers, earth and herbs. The style is reserved, more focused on acid and tannin structure, but it still shows layers of textured fruit flavors. It will be best 2020_2030.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Cadence
"This wine is predominantly Cabernet Sauvignon (85%) with the remainder Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Syrah. Reserved aromas of toast, high-toned herbs, coffee and blue and black fruit lead to dense, rich, structured dark fruit flavors that show depth along with vibrant acidity and a long finish. This wine is built for the long haul and will be best from 2021_2028.",,Col Solare
"The flint soil of the Fiou domaine has given a magnificent rich wine. Yellow fruits, ripe citrus and beautifully perfumed acidity all contribute to a wine that is packed with flavor. The fruit is still crisply fresh and the mineral texture from the soil shows how well it will age. Drink from 2017.",Le Grand Roc,Domaine Gérard Fiou
"Enticing aromas of violet, dark berry, leather and sweet baking spices lead the way on this vibrant, delicious red. The lively, polished palate doles out juicy wild cherry, black raspberry, cinnamon and clove framed in bright acidity and supple tannins. It boasts elegance and balance.",Bric dei Banditi,Franco M. Martinetti
"Alluring scents of perfumed berry, underbrush, pipe tobacco and leather come together on this firmly structured wine. The palate delivers mature black cherry, crushed raspberry, sage, rosemary, clove and a hint of cured meat. It's extremely well balanced thanks to assertive, fine-grained tannins and bright acidity.",Gramolere,Fratelli Alessandria
"Whiffs of wildflowers, fennel and slate combine in this deliciously blossomy, complex wine. While dry in style, it's a touch softer and riper than the HJW or Josef Vineyard bottlings, coating the palate in a supple silk of peach and grapefruit flavors. Powerful and concentrated, it lingers long on the finish. Delicious now, but sure to improve through at least 2023.",Magdalena Vineyard,Hermann J. Wiemer
"With the fruit coming from Pepper Bridge, Seven Hills and Yellow Jacket vineyards, this winery's inaugural Walla Walla Valley release displays complex aromas of coffee, smoked meat, mineral, blueberries, violets and licorice. The dark coffee flavors are concentrated and dense, coming in waves and leading to an extended finish.",Voyageur,Maison Bleue
"This wine displays a fascinating aroma profile of lees, lemon and custard. There's a real sense of vibrancy and energy in its creamy texture, with lively acidity drawing out the fruit tones. The balance is spot-on with outrageous length.",DuBrul Vineyard,Owen Roe
"Not yet fully open, this blend of Les Collines and Seven Hills vineyard fruit has high-toned aromas of violets, sage, toffee and black plums. The feel is supple, showing depth and detail to the dark fruit flavors along with exceptional length. It's all about subtlety and elegance.",Principia Reserve,Rasa
"Brawny in flavorful black cherry, this well-crafted wine from a prime vineyard is plush with cinnamon and structured tannins. Floral in aroma, it tastes of strawberry and black cherry, with a seasoning of black pepper on the finish. Drink now through 2023.",Gap's Crown Vineyard,Lutum
"This exceptional wine explodes in classic, characteristic aromas of rose water, dried rose petals and orange blossom, so floral and sublime. Edgy in taste, with a trace of salt, it exhibits no oak, celebrating instead an exuberance of fresh pear and grapefruit.",Dutton Ranch Green Valley Vineyard,Dutton-Goldfield
"This mountaintop winery puts much effort in single-vineyard expressions, but this blend rivals even those, with nose-tingling aromas of concentrated hibiscus and pomegranate, plus dried sour cherries and graphite. Prominent herbs like oregano, thyme and dried sage mix with eucalyptus and menthol on the palate, where soft cranberry fruit serves as backbone.",,Thomas Fogarty
"Despite a deep color, the aromas and flavors are surprisingly light, resembling red cherries and strawberries. Welcome, firm tannins and acidity keep this feeling fresh in the mouth rather than heavy. It tastes more like a classy dry red varietal than the usual red blend.",Yerba Buena,San Francisco Wine Press
"This charming red opens with aromas of woodland berry and violet. The savory, easy-drinking palate offers plum, black cherry, a hint of spice and a smoky note alongside soft, polished tannins. Enjoy soon.",,Val di Botte
"Aromas of coconut, toast, plum and vanilla shine in this hearty red. The aromas follow through to the ripe palate along with crushed black cherry, sage and chocolate. It's round and ready to drink, with modest acidity and chewy tannins. Enjoy through 2016.",Vigna 54 Riserva,Agricola Pugliano
"This opens with oak-driven aromas of toast, espresso, coffee and coconut. The concentrated palate offers oak, dried blackberry, ripe plum, roasted coffee bean, vanilla and a confectionary note alongside packed tannins. The fruit is starting to dry out so drink soon.",Castello di Montespertoli Riserva,Castello Sonnino
"Rooty berry and cherry aromas are brambly on the nose. This is mature and medium in body and extraction. Rooty flavors echo the bouquet, while the finish offers flavors of vanilla, root beer and light herbs. Drink now.",Reserva,Bodegas Medrano Irazu
"This unoaked wine smells like melons and pears, and tastes even more crisp and lively, like green apples and lemons. There's a touch of buttery richness in both the aroma and the flavor, and it's well balanced out by bright acidity.",Vista Luna Vineyard,En Garde
"Rose, violet, charred earth and plummy aromas emerge from the glass. The soft, straightforward palate offers dried black cherry, prune, mint and mocha alongside round tannins. Enjoy through 2016.",,Guidi 1929
"Aromas of menthol, pressed violet, espresso and a whiff of cellar floor lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, ripe plum, roasted coffee bean and vanilla. Assertive, drying tannins provide the framework. Drink soon before the fruit dries up further.",Emilio,Tenuta di Morzano
"Bright aromas of woodland berry, tilled earth and violet waft out of the glass. The vibrant palate offers crunchy red cherry, unripe strawberry and a hint of anise accompanied by racy acidity and firm tannins.",,Agricola Pugliano
"Pretty aromas of violet, iris and woodland berry waft out of the glass. The vibrant palate offers raw red cherry, orange zest and dried Mediterranean herb alongside racy acidity and sleek tannins.",,Castello Sonnino
"This very fresh wine from the Ducourt family is all crisp, crushed berry fruits and tight acidity. The 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is tangy, very dry and steely in character, with equal parts acidity and fruit. The aftertaste is lively, poised and refreshing.",,Château Larroque
"There is an unusually high (40%) proportion of Sémillon in the blend, which offers the possibility of aging. Although this wine is fresh, lemony and tightly herbaceous now, it will become more rich and the flavors will deepen. Drink from the end of 2016.",,Château les Pasquets
"Exuberantly floral, this perfumed, pale-pink wine offsets ripe peach and strawberry flavors with zesty, spine tingling acidity. Robust in body, it finishes briskly on a savory herb note.",Dry Rosé of,Atwater
"Aromas of toasted oak, coffee bean, anisette, dried plum and a whiff of coconut lead the nose of this blend of Sangiovese, 15% Merlot and 5% Cabernet Sauvignon. Reflecting the heat of the vintage, the palate is rather evolved and abrupt, offering dried black cherry, espresso and grilled sage but not much fruit richness. Aggressive, astringent tannins dry out the finish.",Brolio Riserva,Barone Ricasoli
"Subdued aromas of underbrush, toast, truffle and ripe black-skinned fruit emerge in the glass. The forward palate offers raisin, dried black cherry, espresso and oak-driven spice alongside dusty tannins that leave a drying, astringent finish. Drink sooner rather than later before the remaining fruit dries up.",Riserva,Castello di Querceto
"This wine offers aromas of leather, maraschino cherries, rose petal and medicine cabinet. It shows a bit of its age but still has time, with grainy tannins and soy flavors propping it up.",Maddelena,Cavatappi
"Aromas of tire rubber mix with herbs, red fruit, plum and allspice. Candied red fruit flavors are plump in feel, trailing on the finish.",Les Collines Vineyard,Angel Vine
"This unusual wine offers aromas of nori, dried flowers, bittersweet chocolate and cherry cola. It's full flavored with a lightly tacky feel.",Wallula Vineyard,Boudreaux Cellars
"Black cherry notes persist throughout this bluish-pink dry rosé. Ripe white peach, watermelon and plum flavors are punchy and fresh, marked by a razor-edged line of acidity.",,Bouké
"This opens with an attractive fragrance of ripe plum, violet, aromatic herb and baking spice. The straightforward palate offers dried black cherry, crushed raspberry, ground pepper and leather alongside polished tannins. Drink sooner rather than later to capture the remaining fruit freshness.",,Colognole
"This rich wine shows sweet, luscious cherry, green herbs, medicine cabinet and leather aromas and flavors. It doesn't bring a lot of complexity but yields plenty of enjoyment. Drink now.",,Revelry
"Aromas of hazelnut, mineral and pear lead to off-dry, full-feeling fruit flavors that are stitched up with citric acidity on the finish. It doesn't entirely come together but there's plenty to enjoy.",Celilo Vineyard,Ross Andrew
"Woodspice, herb and dark fruit aromas are out in front. The flavors show a lot of barrel influence, with the tannins providing some grit.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Aromas of black raspberry, blue flowers and a note of baking spice lead the nose of this fruity, savory wine. The round, ripe palate doles out black cherry, ripe plum and mocha alongside dusty tannins. Drink now.",Priore,Tenuta di Fraternita
"Drawn-down aromas of berry fruit and hard spices are narrow. This is hard on the palate, with pounding tannins and dark, almost burnt black-fruit flavors that finish peppery to the point of bitterness. This is a blend of Tempranillo, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah.",Cala N.1,Tinedo
"This opens with aromas of blue iris, plum and menthol. On the palate, subtle notes of sage, toast and coffee accent a core of fleshy black cherry. It still has tightly wound, drying tannins that need to unwind but it's rather shy on fresh acidity so best to enjoy soon.",Riserva,Uggiano
"Wild berry, savory herb and balsamic aromas take center stage in this medium-bodied red. The round palate offers ripe black cherry, crushed raspberry and a hint of orange zest. Modest acidity and soft tannins make it extremely accessible.",Celliere,Viticoltori Senesi Aretini
"Lighter in color, this blend of Pinot Noir, Cabernet Franc and Syrah has aromas and flavors of mesquite smoke, strawberry and cherry, with the Pinot seemingly in the lead. The smoky flavors are medium bodied, with a light grip of chalky tannins.",Cashmere,Voila!
"Plush, forward black cherry and plum flavors get a firm bristle of tannins in this rich but structured red. Hints of coffee grounds and rubber lend an earthy complexity to the mid palate. The finish is brisk but clean.",Grand Vin,Waters Crest
"Made from Syrah, this is a zesty, dry and medium-bodied wine, soft and thirst-quenching in waves of strawberry and raspberry. Undertones of dried herb and citrus mark the finish.",Dragonsleaf Dry,Wines Gone Wild
"This blend of Syrah, Grenache and Mourvèdre is extraordinarily rich and soft in cherry pie, chocolate, licorice, bacon and pepper spice flavors. The tannins are wonderfully velvety, and the finish is long and nicely dry. Unbalanced alcohol makes the wine taste hot all the way through.",Portolan,Sextant
"This pleasant Pinot Gris has melon fruit flavors with a hint of kiwi. Fresh, and ready for near-term enjoyment.",,Silvan Ridge
"This is a moderately aromatic, Cabernet Sauvignon-dominant, Bordeaux-style blend, with notes of cedar, char and cherry. It's lighter in style, with tart cranberry and cherry flavors.",Reserve Arena Valley Vineyard Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot-Malbec-Cabernet Franc,Snake River
"Traditionally, Prosecco sparkling wines were executed in a dry style, which means they have enough sweetness to change the aromatic profile and softness of the mouthfeel. Indeed, fresh peach and apricot emerge from the bouquet and the wine feels round and creamy overall.",Millesimato Dry,Terre di San Venanzio Fortunato
"A soft, fruity Cabernet, with good varietal character for the price. It's forward in blackberry jam, currant, chocolate and oak flavors, wrapped into Cab's firm tannins. A great party wine, and relatively easy to find, with 8,500 cases produced.",,Spellbound
"Sassy passion-fruit and feline aromas set up a crisp, clean-feeling palate with tangy, green, zesty flavors of scallion, lime and sour apple. A minerally, chalky finish is zingy and clean. This is nice for value-priced Sauvignon Blanc.",Urban Uco,O. Fournier
"This 100% Petite Sirah is very, very sweet. When the palate experiences this much concentrated brown sugar and caramel, it exults. The problem is that sweetness is pretty much all there is. You'll find blackberry jam and chocolate.",Royal Escort Paladini Vineyard,Prager
"A soft, gentle wine, this is clean and purely fruity. With ripe pear and apple flavors, it gets a tang of lemon acidity. It's already drinkable, but could age for several more months.",Arinto,Quinta de Chocapalha
Soave Classico is a wonderful wine to wash down grilled shrimp or spicy foods from Vietnam or Thailand. This expression shows bright aromas of lemon grass and lime with endnotes of melon and a white peach.,Vigneti di Monteforte,Santi
"Made from Cortese grapes from northern Italy, this bright and easy white wine offers drying mineral notes that frame a solid core of yellow fruit and citrus. The wine is light, lean and washes down beautifully.",Verga Collection,Natale Verga
"This medium-bodied Merlot boasts an abundance of ripe, juicy black-cherry and plum flavors, but with a shade of savory green herbs that persist on the palate. Bright acidity and soft tannins make it brisk and easy to drink.",Estate Grown,Pellegrini Vineyards
"With cassis and plum aromas, this mid-weight Cabernet Sauvignon from the Foothills has a taste of licorice and vanilla, particularly on the finish, testament to its 33 months in new American oak.",Estate,Martin Lane Winery
"Most of what this wine has to offer comes through its enchanting aromas of mint, cranberry, and toasty spice. The palate__ight, delicate, and tart__an't quite deliver on this promise. Still, a varietally correct Oregon Pinot Noir at this price? Yes, please!",,Windy Bay
"This is fairly typical, light, fruity lemon-driven Vinho Verde. It has a light spritz, and is exuberantly fresh with just a touch of ripeness and crisp, cool acidity. Perfect to drink this summer.",,Caves Aliança
"This is buttery to a fault, with the overpowering aroma of microwave popcorn. Once in the mouth, the simple fruit flavors are buried, and the finish leaves a lightly bitter impression.",Estate Reserve,David Hill
"Aged 24 months in French and American oak, the aromas are light with notes of vanilla, toffee, herbs and red fruit. The palate is simultaneously sweet and tart, with firm tannins and citrusy acidity.",,David Hill
"Delicate and light with a pale pink color and creamy white foam on the surface, this is a great little sparkling aperitivo wine to pair with spicy tapas or finger foods. Rose, raspberry and a touch of strawberry open the fragrant bouquet.",Rosè Brut de Noir,Cleto Chiarli
"Quite light and tart, this young Pinot brings bracing cranberry fruit flavors to the front of the palate. It feels a bit thin and one dimensional, likely a reflection of the cool vintage.",Oregon,Coeur de Terre
"Simple lines of citrus and white flower define the one dimensional bouquet of this fresh and friendly Italian sparkler. The wine shows sharp, lively appeal with balanced acidity that feels fresh and bright in the mouth.",Brut,Colesel
"Whispers of smoke and flint on the nose of this intensely minerally Sauvignon Blanc blow off to reveal a bright, elegantly balanced wine with hints of fresh green grass and stems. It's brisk and refreshing, with an easy drinking feel.",,Comtesse Thérèse
"One of the most popular Vinho Verdes, this is in a light, medium-sweet style. Very fresh and crisp, with some attractive citrus acidity, and ready to drink now. Screwcap.",Casal Garcia Branco,Aveleda
"From the Dom Martinho vineyard at Quinta do Carmo, this is a fresh wine, with an earthy, rustic character. Black fruits, juicy acidity and a leathery edge give it a mix of fruitiness and dryness. Age for a few more months before drinking.",Dom Martinho,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"There's a surprising amount of structure here that is rarely seen in Italian whites, especially Soave Classico. The wine also delivers ripe aromas of peach, melon and pineapple.",,Balestri Valda
"There's nothing at all French about this Cab. It could only come from California, with its jammy, soft black cherry and chocolate flavors.",Louis XIV,Frenchie Winery
"This is a light and fruity wine from J. Portugal Ramos. It's crisp, with lemon and citrus flavor, and bright with grapefruit acidity. Drink now and over the next year.",Loios Branco,J. Portugal Ramos
"Aragonez, aka Tempranillo, here produces a ripe, juicy, red-fruit laden wine. Hedgerow fruits add a more stalky character to the palate. The whole wine is generously suffused with fresh acidity. Screwcap.",Ciconia,Herdade de São Miguel
"No oak on this charming wine, so what you get is pure lemon, peach and mango fruit flavor. It's definitely on the rich side, and could use greater acidity to balance out the sugary finish.",,Justin
"Cool vintages make Hanna's Sauvignon Blanc a little green and minty, and 2012 was another cool vintage. The wine is dry and low in alcohol, with a grassy, gooseberry taste.",,Hanna
Here's a simple Prosecco by Italian tenor Andrea Bocelli and his family that offers fresh citrus and grapefruit with a touch of honey and peach on the close. It's a great choice for summer afternoon sipping.,Extra Dry,Bocelli
"Spicy red-plum aromas are dry and gritty, but fresh. This firm feeling Cab holds its own on the palate, which is tannic and a bit sandpapery. Tight, juicy flavors of spicy plum finish long, dry and mildly salty tasting.",Estate Bottled,Bodega Carmine Granata
"A powerful wine, this is only the fourth reserve Cabernet Sauvignon ever made by Abeja. Thick, black and redolent of new French oak, this is as close to a Napa Valley cult Cabernet as you will find this far north. The alcohol, which nears 16%, is beautifully handled and proportionate, but the wine's style is over the top and not suited to every palate. Best to drink this over the next 3_5 years.",Reserve,Abeja
"As excellent as this was was in 2009, the 2010 has reached an almost-ethereal level. The aromatics alone are transportive, with the concentrated essence of raspberries and blueberries at optimal ripeness. The flavors are deep and long, elegant and powerful, and they lead into a finish that's anchored in notes of mineral and dark chocolate.",Boushey Vineyard Le Midi,Maison Bleue
"The vineyards of the Marquis de Laguiche date back to before the French Revolution, and Drouhin is fully responsible for producing the wines since the 1940s. This ripe, opulent selection lives up to its illustrious pedigree. It is full bodied, and it offers vibrant acidity and minerality. It's a wine for aging over eight years and many more.",Marquis de Laguiche Morgeot Premier Cru_,Joseph Drouhin
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Teroldego, this delivers bold aromas of chocolate, spice, dark fruit, caramel and graham cracker. It feels linear and tight on the finish, and it offers firmly structured tannins that are surrounded by loads of ripe fruit and mocha flavors. Age this for 10 more years.",I Castagni,Michele Satta
"Sangiovese, Merlot and some Cabernet Sauvignon are blended to create a bold and determined wine. Huge aromas of espresso bean, black fruit, tobacco and dark chocolate make for a meaty and dense bouquet. There's enormous depth on the palate, where the wine feels rich and softly velvety. It's a Tuscan blend of the highest caliber, so hold it for 10 years or more.",Il Blu,Brancaia
"One of the jewels of Domaine Faively,  this wine is huge, rich and structured. It has power and concentrated tannins, and the hints of wood aging are apparent. The ripeness of the fruit and the serious texture promise long-term aging.",,Domaine Faiveley
"This wine's blackberry and currant flavors are concentrated and ripe, and the notes of toasty new oak and chocolate gently ride over the fruit rather than overwhelming it. The spiced and sweet-tasting finish lasts for a full minute. Made from 95% Cabernet Sauvignon, this is one of the best Bordeaux-style wines from Santa Ynez Valley. Drink now_2015.",El Desafio de Jonata,Jonata
"This wine is just starting out, which explains the toast factor that currently dominates the nose and palate. As it opens, the opulent, ripe fruit from this great vineyard shows through in the form of powerful, and intense pineapple and apricot flavors that mingle in the tight texture. It will age for many years__tart with at least six.",Chevalier-Montrachet Grand Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Soft, decadent and approachable, this Cabernet Sauvignon is blended with a little Malbec. It offers flavors of blackberry jam, black currant, dark chocolate and cedar that continue on the long, spicy finish. This is lovely to drink now and over the next five years.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Patland
"New wood aromas dominate this powerful wine, which shows how much time it needs to age. It also has concentrated, juicy black-cherry and plum flavors and lovely acidity. This wine is made from fruit sourced from a two-acre parcel in the Champeaux premier cru.",Champeaux Premier Cru,Roche de Bellene
"This Merlot opens with savory aromas of spice and cured meat, followed by notes of blackberry preserves and black currant. It shows some secondary aromas of leather and pipe tobacco, plus lingering tones of rum cake, licorice and tar. There's a fresh, almost menthol-like quality to the palate, which offers tight, polished tannins and long savory flavors.",Giorgio Bartholomäus,Tenuta Argentiera
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Merlot, this is dry, smooth, rich and delicious, and it offers waves of ripe blackberry, crème de cassis, dark chocolate and charred meat flavors, plus the spiciness of sweet licorice and pepper. It can be consumed now, but it will also develop for 3_4 years.",Galaxy,Terlato
"Corton-Charlemagne expresses the power of Chardonnay, rather than the subtlety. Given that, Olivier Leflaive's version is finely nuanced, and its weight comes as much from the rich white- and yellow-fruit flavors as the tight structure. Like most grand crus, this needs to age, so give it 5_6 years.",Corton-Charlemagne Grand Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"The folks at Rocca di Frassinello set out to make one of the greatest expressions of Merlot from coastal Tuscany. This shows enormous intensity and persistency on the palate, and the overall experience is driven forward by bold flavors of black fruit, cherry, black olive, chocolate and cinnamon. It has a rich, masculine structure, so drink it after 2018.",Baffonero,Rocca di Frassinello
"Made from fruit sourced from one of the finest premier crus in Gevrey-Chambertin, this is a closed wine initially. Then its rich black-fruit flavors explode, yet the wine still retains its serious, tannic character. The structure promises that this complex bottling will age well.",Clos Saint-Jacques Premier Cru,Domaine Bruno Clair
"Here's more proof that sometimes a winery's least expensive bottling can be its best. The wine is first class, from the translucent ruby color to the power and delicacy of the mouthfeel. There's something haunting and distinctly Fort Ross-ian in the wild cherry, mushroom and pine flavors that seem to echo the fog, sun and redwood forests of this remote region. Really delicious now and through 2018 or so.",Fort Ross Vineyard Sea Slopes,Fort Ross
"Terlato's focus on Bordeaux-style red wines has paid off in the last several vintages, and this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot continues the success streak. It has ripe, spicy flavors of blackberry jam, black currant and sweet, toasty oak, and the tannin-acid structure is balanced. Still, it's an astringent wine that needs time in the cellar, so give it at least eight years. It could age well beyond that.",Episode,Terlato
"The Donum Estate Vineyard has been producing some of Carneros's best Pinot Noirs of late. This is a complex bottling, with notes of raspberry jam and vanilla, and the mouthfeel is pleasingly tart. Production was only 55 cases, but it's worth a special search.",Donum Estate Vineyard,La Rochelle
"Cabernet Sauvignon doesn't get much more rich or ripe than this bottling. Made from grapes grown in Calistoga, this 100% varietal wine offers blackberry jam and crème de cassis flavors. Lots of new French oak influence adds sweet toast and caramel notes. Dramatically complex and powerful, this tannic selection will benefit from being cellared for a minimum of eight years, and it should continue to develop well beyond that time frame.",Bone Ash Vineyard,Venge
"With his family based in Puligny-Montrachet, Olivier Leflaive knows a thing or two about the grand crus of his village. This Bâtard-Montrachet is intensely textured, concentrated and ripe, and it exudes equal amounts of acids. Powerful yet elegant, the toast note is a subtle expression in this rich wine. This for long-term aging.",Bâtard-Montrachet Grand Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This wine bursts open with enormous aromatic intensity, and it features notes of red cherry, spice, chocolate, leather and tobacco. This Bordeaux-style blend offers richness, velvety tannins and a long finish. Hold for 10 years or more.",,Monteverro
"Made from grapes sourced from a biodynamically farmed vineyard, this wine puts on an almost-magical display of flower and citrus scents. Deep and concentrated, this has harmonious and potent flavors, and it is amazing how the delicate floral aspect cuts across the juicy, citrusy taste.",Wallula Vineyard Biodynamic,Pacific Rim
"The 2009 vintage was on the hot side in most parts of Tuscany, but vintner Tommaso Cavalli has done a wonderful job of creating balance and harmony in this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc. Plush black-fruit flavors are followed by tight, polished tannins. Hold this for 10 years or more.",,Cavalli Tenuta degli Dei
"So rich and concentrated, this blend of 97% Syrah and 3% Viognier is mind-blowing. It has massive flavors of blackberries, cherries, dark chocolate and spices. But it's not just the delicious factor that grabs you, it's how pure and balanced the tannins and acids are.",La Sangre de Jonata,Jonata
"This has rich, ripe fruit and signs of wood aging that are appropriate to a young wine, but they will certainly become integrated. What is so delicious about this selection is the fine balance between its generous fruit and its tight, minerally acidity. Keep this for at least six years.",Folatières Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"Smooth, balanced and lingering, this is sippable by itself after a big meal, and it can also pair well with strong cheeses, dark chocolates or stone-fruit-based desserts that are layered with crème Anglaise. This selection also comes in 375-ml bottles.",Cluster Select Late Harvest,Navarro
"With this wine, Venge has taken a giant leap into the front ranks of California Syrah producers. It's made from fruit that's sourced from the great Stagecoach Vineyard, which straddles Atlas Peak__ cool mountain region. The acidity is preserved, and the concentrated fruit easily handles the 60% new French oak. Dramatic and high in alcohol, this selection is gorgeous to drink now, and it will remain fresh over the next six years.",Stagecoach Vineyard Block I-4,Venge
"This has superb structure and massive flavors of sweet blackberry jam, black currants, dark chocolate and smoky oak. It shows the depth and concentration of the notable Stagecoach Vineyard, and it should easily hold and develop in the bottle over the next 10 years.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Patland
"Extracted and sophisticated, this biodynamic expression of Cabernet Franc opens with compelling aromas of ripe cherry, blackberry, rum cake, toasted nut, chocolate and tobacco. The rich, smooth mouthfeel is velvety and long lasting.",,Duemani
"This wine has tender tannins that add feeling to the swathes of ripe fruit. It's rounder than many Gevreys, but it has enough concentration and density to age for many years.",Clos de Fonteny Premier Cru,Domaine Bruno Clair
"At first this is bready, and that's all. With airing, things turn more complex. In the mouth, this feels racy and firmly acidic, while flavors of citrus turn yeasty and malty with time. A long, layered, yeasty finish shows a slow pulse and not much zest.",Brut Nature Gran Reserva,Maria Casanovas
"This Amarone boasts black cherry and plum flavors layered with notes of toasted oak, black pepper and chocolate. The alcohol is noticeable on the palate, with a warmth to the finish. It's not overly complex, but the fruit is delicious.",Campo Inferi Riserva,Brunelli
"The most forward and drinkable of Foxen's many new 2011 Pinot Noirs. It's soft and juicy with raspberries and cherry flavors, plus subtleties of cola, sautéed wild mushrooms and sweet, toasty sandalwood. A pretty wine that's perfect with lamb.",John Sebastiano Vineyard,Foxen
"Tightly wound now, with firm acids and tannins providing a good structure. There's a solid core of cherries and currants, but it's obscured. Needs time. Give it 4_5 years in a proper cellar.",Melville Vineyard,Foxen
"As rich as this Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend is, and it is extraordinarily rich, there's something standard about it. It's as though the ripeness of the fruit has obliterated any trace of terroir. Offers a fantastically sweet explosion of blackberries, cherries, plums and chocolate, alongside caramelized, butterscotchy oak, but beyond the sheer power, the wine isn't displaying much subtlety. Hard to tell where it's going, if anywhere.",Winston Hill,Frank Family
"This straightforward Amarone offers aromas of tobacco leaf and raisin. The palate presents prune and plum flavors accented by a hint of chocolate. It also shows the heat of the vintage and is evolving fast, so enjoy this soon.",,Delibori
"Medium-intense scents of ripe blackberry and raspberry unfold on the nose of this wine, with additional accents of garrigue and softly toasted oak in the background. Dark fruit flavors abound on the palate, with a solid sweet-spice flavor that stays through the lasting finish.",Vieilles Vignes,Domaine du Clos des Fées
"This is a straightforward Amarone, with red fruit and spice aromas. The palate delivers cherry and raspberry flavors and a hint of white pepper. It's not as rich as some Amarones, but the lithe tannins and fresh acidity make it very drinkable.",Ca' Bertoldi,Recchia
"A brightly aromatic wine with notes of candied fruit, raspberries, freshly ground herbs and cranberry. The palate has plump, ripe fruit flavors that glide on the finish.",Grenache,Robert Ramsay
"This rich Sauvignon Blanc shows classic aromas of crushed tomato vine, cantaloup and a hint of bell pepper. The palate shows succulent green melon and apple flavors, with a hint of smoke and a freshly acidic backbone. This will pair well with asparagus dishes or pasta topped with pesto.",Piere,Vie di Romans
"Shows the richness and full body that a young Fogarty Pinot often displays, the result of a warmer growing region. The wine is forward and jammy in red cherries and earthy fruits, such as pomegranates and persimmons, with a spicy finish. Fine now, and will hold for a couple years.",Razorback Vineyard Estate Grown,Thomas Fogarty
"The chilly vintage has yielded lean flavors of grapefruits and limes, but sur lie aging lends notes of cream, while oak brings a subtle touch of buttered toast. The result is elegant and complex.",,Spring Mountain Vineyard
"Soft and lightly buttery, this offers clean fruit flavors of apple and pear. Not quite as concentrated as previous efforts, perhaps a reflection of a cooler vintage in this northern location.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"While the nose shows cooked fruit and nail varnish, the palate is better, with ripe black fruit, plum, pepper, cinnamon and tobacco flavors. While it's brooding, it also has fresh acidity to balance the dense fruit.",,Pietro Zardini
"This has an earthy fragrance of moist soil and tobacco, with hints of raisin. The palate delivers plum, nutmeg and black pepper notes, but it's already quite evolved, so drink soon.",,San Rustico
"This Cinsault is a departure for Michael David in that it's hardly oaked, leaner and more subtle in flavor and aroma than many of its other signature wines, a testament to both the 130-year-old Bechthold Vineyard and fine farming. Floral, it delights in cranberry and raspberry with a hint of peppery spice.",Bechthold Vineyard Ancient Vine,Michael David
"Although this wine is dry, it's satisfyingly rich with honeysuckle, apricot, orange, mango and peach flavors. Made without malolactic fermentation, its citrusy acidity heightens and brightens the fruit, giving it a clean mouthfeel and finish. This is the winery's best Viognier in years.",Verna's Estate,Melville
"Showing some of the richness and structure of Vosne-Romanée, this is a concentrated wine, spiked with wood aging while also full of dark plum fruits. It is still integrating, bringing the spice from the wood more into balance. Drink from 2015.",Domaine des Perdrix,Domaines Devillard
"This Cabernet-dominated, Bordeaux-style blend is smooth and forward, with a mix of red and blue fruits. Buoyed by juicy acidity, it floats across the palate, light and approachable. There are some hints of stem and green olive in the tannins.",Pepper Bridge Vineyard Apogee,L'Ecole No. 41
"Fragrant and perfumed, this is a delicious wine. While the perfumes shine, it has a more subtle citrus fruit and honey character that gives the wine elegance as well as immediate attraction.",Réserve,Leon Beyer
"This is mostly Syrah, with 17% Mourvèdre and 5% co-fermented Viognier as well. Dark, sappy and substantial, it's a pleasing mix of black fruits, juicy in the mouth, and with a finishing streak of coffee liqueur.",L'Entente,Ott & Murphy
The Cor wines are always notable for their limited use of new French oak (this wine saw none) and a style best suited for the dinner table. This wine is no exception with distinctly fruity aromas of plum and cherry followed by notes of peat and violets. The seamless fruit flavors are accented by citrusy acidity with the tannins quite well integrated for the variety.,Milbrandt Vineyards,Cor Cellars
"Perfumed in cinnamon-flowery aromatics, this well-valued Zin is softly spiced, lush and smooth, drinkable with black cherry flavor and plenty of personality.",Ancient Vine,Cline
"Soft and rich, a wine that shows the warmth of the vintage in this southern Burgundy appellation. It's full of yellow fruits with just a hint of pineapple along with a good line in acidity. A sense of minerality and texture appears at the end.",,Domaine du Chalet Pouilly
"This is a satin-smooth Merlot, nicely blended with 11% Syrah and a splash of Cabernet Sauvignon. Forward flavors, seamless, supple and flat out tasty, it weaves in threads of vanilla, cola and licorice around taut red fruits.",,Hogue
"Hovey's Petite offers mountainous tannins that are still soft and structured, mellowed by the bright red raspberry and blackberry fruit encased in baking spice.",,Hovey
"Matchstick and cider scents are the key aromas on this fresh, citrusy, medium-bodied Cava. Punchy flavors of nectarine and orange finish mellow and fresh, with clarity and length.",Elyssia Gran Cuvée Brut,Freixenet
This single vineyard wine is powerful with its concentrated tannins and dark cherry fruits. Good acidity goes with the fruit and the dry core. A shame that a hint of banana spoils the aftertaste.,Domaine des Quatre Vents,Georges Duboeuf
"Tastes as ripe, bright and spicy as it smells, with intense, pure flavors of raspberry, strawberry and cherry essence dusted with crushed white pepper, cinnamon and vanilla. Drink this light-bodied, savory young Pinot now and over the next year or two.",Heritage Selection,Gundlach Bundschu
"Enticing and idiosyncratic on the nose, this Merlot offers notes of rose petal, smoke, blood orange and caraway seed. The palate is medium bodied and the 13% alcohol gives it a sense of finesse. Fine but firm tannins frame the cherry fruit, and it finishes with hints of maduro and rose.",Reserve,Jefferson Vineyards
"An oily, rich and full-figured white from the producer's estate vineyard, this wine offers elements of honey-baked apple and caramel. Well made in a big style, it's listed as 100% from the Dijon clone of Chardonnay.",Deux Chevaux Vineyard,Tamber Bey
"Luscious golden in color, this dessert wine shows aromas of honeyed and seared lemons, with hints of marigold and toasted sunflower seeds. The palate is rich and sweet, but balanced expertly with a great tartness.",Novitiate Late Harvest,Testarossa
"Toast, iodine, steel and kumquat-skin aromas show on this bottling from one of the region's older properties. The palate offers stone fruit ripeness but is driven by a sharp, citrusy acidity of Meyer lemon and Mexican lime.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,Testarossa
"Aromas of red berry, rose, toast and a whiff of oak emerge in the glass. The firm palate offers mature wild cherry, licorice, grilled sage and mineral alongside taut, fine-grained tannins.",Riserva,Travaglini
"White peaches and pink grapefruits lend perfume and brightness to this racy, lean-bodied Riesling. Dry in style with a zesty mineral-focused palate, it's endlessly refreshing and invigorating.",Schiefer Trocken,Villa Huesgen
"Honoring the 40th vintage for these vines, planted at Tualatin Estate in 1973, this elegant and subtle wine shows pinpoint varietal character. It charms immediately with scents of dusty baking spices and cherry pie. Flavors follow into a graceful and proportionate finish.",Vintage 40,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"A squirt of fresh lemon extends from nose to finish on this bright, vivacious Weissburgunder, or Pinot Blanc. Dry and medium bodied, it's concentrated in crisp red apple flavor. The finish is refreshing, marked by a touch of bitter tea tannins.",Lahrer Trocken,Wöhrle
"Raspberry, plum and cherry aromas are light, pure and fully inviting, with nothing off-putting. This tastes bright and balanced, with cherry and berry flavors that are impossible not to like. A dash of oaky cocoa blends with leftover red fruit flavors on a nice finish.",Crianza,Viña Cumbrero
"This is an unusual, exotic take on Malbec. The bouquet delivers cardamom, sandalwood and spiced black currant aromas. In the mouth, it's grabby with pinching tannins. Blueberry and cardamom flavors end ripe, with decent follow through. Drink now.",Altísimo,Ricominciare
"Complexity and varietal character come through in this concentrated, well-balanced and smoothly polished wine. It is full bodied and lightly tannic, but so oozing with flavors that it's still easy to sip. The array of black plum, light sage, and black olive flavors is accented with very light oak.",,Dark Horse
"Aromas of toasted oak, mocha and a whiff of coconut oak lead the nose while the firm palate offers dark cherry, espresso, dried sage and a hint of anise. The tightly wound tannins still pack youthful sharpness and need a few more years to soften up. Drink after 2021.",Via Nuova,Chiara Boschis - E. Pira e Figli
"This falls sbetween a rosé and an orange wine in its appearance, a pale salmon/copper shade that results from 36 hours of skin contact before pressing. Scents of hibiscus tea and rosewater put a delicate top note ahead of rich, ripe, round and spicy citrus fruit. A strong impression of cinnamon marks the finish.",Aurosa,Antiquum Farm
"Red rose, wild berry, toast, tobacco and a whiff of underbrush meld in the glass. On the firm palate, notes of clove, ground pepper, cinnamon, anise and mocha accent the red berry core. Firm, fine-grained tannins offer structure.",,Beni di Batasiolo
"Ripe borderline raisiny aromas include earth, cedar and graphite scents. This is concentrated, grabby and fully extracted. Flavors of jammy black fruits blend with spicy saucy notes prior to a finish with flavors of tomato, herbs, salt and gamy meat. Firm acidity guarantees this will last at least another five years before falling off.",Catena,Bodega Catena Zapata
"Aromas of perfumed berry, mint baking spice, toast and espresso waft out of the glass. The palate is tight and rather primary at the moment, showing raw black cherry, raspberry, clove and toasted notes. It's still young but balanced, with fresh acidity and firm, fine__rained tannins. Drink 2016_2022.",Brandini,Brandini
"A field blend of 85% Zinfandel, 11% Alicante Bouschet and 4% Petite Sirah, this juicy, spicy wine is robust and full bodied. Blackberry syrup and black cherry combine around cinnamon and black pepper, finishing in a wave of power.",Bastoni Vineyard Karma,Carol Shelton
"Fresh and refined, this delightful, easy-drinking wine opens with scents of rose, woodland berry and a whiff of dark cooking spice. The vibrant, savory palate offers juicy red cherry, raspberry and white pepper alongside bright acidity and polished tannins. Drink through 2018.",,Cascina delle Rose
"Monbazillac, with its impressive castle, is part of the Bergerac region that makes some beautiful dessert wines. This wine, with its refreshing balance between acidity and rich honeyed flavors, conveys Seville orange marmalade and lemon acidity, with a smooth, botrytis aftertaste. Drink now, or better age until 2017.",Blanche de Bosredon,Château Bélingard
"Named after the winemaker, Amélie Couillard, this soft, rounded wine is smooth with creamed apple flavors while also having a proper tangy of acidity. That tight and tangy edge makes the wine refreshing now while also allowing it to age for a few more months. Drink now or from late 2016.",Cuvée Amélie Sur Lie,Château de la Ragotiere
"This wine is very structured and firm. With some barrel aging, the tannins have been smoothed out although the wine remains with a dry core and fresh acidity. Black-currant flavors dominate, giving a wine that is bright and fruity at the end.",Cuvée Tsar Pierre le Grand,Château Eugénie
"An impressive blend of Merlot and Malbec, this is a solid, dark wine packed with both tannins and ripe berry fruits. It has a serious character with toast, acidity and complex spice flavors. Drink from 2018.",Comtesse de Ségur,Château Laulerie
"This ripe wine with open fruits has 40% Cabernet Franc in the blend, which lends an attractive perfumed character and gives the wine rich character and fruitiness. It will age for a few more years and be ready to drink from 2017.",,Château Peyros
"Roast beef, grape candy, cracked blueberry, beef char and grapy freshness come to the nose on this bottling. The candied grape and blueberry elements carry dark-fruit character to the palate, along with licorice that gives depth. Roasting herbs in the midpalate adds savory flair.",Lila's Cuvee,Clos La Chance
"At David Hill, the Winemakers Cuvée is a cut above the reserve. It's a muscular blend of scents and flavors of lavender, cherry and chocolate wrapped into a firm, focused finish.",Winemakers Cuvée,David Hill
"Wild berry, grilled herb, aniseed and a hint of vanilla are some of the aromas you'll find on this attractive red. The linear, elegantly structured palate offers ripe black cherry, raspberry, licorice and grilled sage while a tobacco note closes the firm finish.",Braja Riserva,Deltetto
"Waxy apple stars in this brisk, approachable white from a single estate-farmed block, the oak briny and salty in toast and honey. Textured and elegantly light bodied, it finishes with a satisfying note of lemon candy.",DCV Estate Block 10,Dry Creek Vineyard
Pristine white peaches seem suspended in a crystalline solution of river rocks and mineral water in this refreshing dry Pinot Blanc. It's delicate in stature but abounds in elegance. Drink now through 2020.,Schwarzer Adler,Franz Keller
"Raspberry, rose petal, baking spice, tilled soil and new leather aromas unfold on this structured red. The chewy, full-bodied palate doles out juicy wild cherry, menthol and dark cooking spice while assertive tannins and fresh acidity lend balance. Drink 2019_2029.",Pichemej,Gianpiero Marrone
"A blend of 85% Cabernet Sauvignon with 15% Merlot, this was built to be approachable young. Grapes are sourced from an estate, organically farmed vineyard as well as two neighboring properties, Pickberry and Murray Ranch. Tobacco forms around a juiciness of blackberry and raspberry, giving it a sultry edge, while maintaing soft tannins throughout.",Counterpoint,Laurel Glen
"Smooth, deep aromas of licorice and blackberry are composed. This Mencía feels full and lusty, with grip but nothing too hard or edgy. Earthy black fruit flavors are savory, toasty and meaty, while the finish is woody and plump. Drink through 2020.",Art,Luna Beberide
"A new, entry-level wine from Vasse Felix, the 2013 Filius offers a fine preview of the winery's other Chardonnay efforts. Hints of tropical fruit, a degree of custardy richness and a long, citrusy finish add up to a winning formula to be consumed over the next 18 months.",Filius,Vasse Felix
"This is another of the three bottlings from different soils. The Caillotte or limestone soil has produced a ripe and tensely textured wine. With intense acidity and a strongly herbaceous character, it's a complex wine that needs to age. Drink from 2016.",Terre de Caillotte,Vignobles Berthier
"Made with 63% Syrah and 37% Cabernet Sauvignon from Red Willow and Shaw vineyards, this appealing offering brings notes of plum, smoke and blue fruit. It's full bodied, plush and ripe in feel, with silky tannins supporting coffee and blue fruit flavors. A guaranteed crowd pleaser.",2 Spires,William Church
"This aromatic offering has notes of pear, peach and flowers. The apricot and other stone fruit flavors are medium bodied, simultaneously light and rich, giving the perception of sweetness leading to a lingering finish__n elegantly styled wine that walks the balance beam quite well.",,William Church
"This starts with cherry, iron oxide and faint notes of something akin to raw meat. Aromatic intrigue continues on the palate where fleshy cherry takes over. The fruit is dynamic and energetic, swishing amid a light but definite tannin structure. This will benefit from more time in bottle. Drink as of 2016.",,Zantho
"Despite this wine's modest alcohol level, it delivers ample richness and flavor. Hints of toast and roasted nuts frame vibrant citrus fruit and a touch of white peach. It's intense and invigorating, with a burst of fresh citrus echoing on the finish.",The Lucky Lizard,D'Arenberg
"This is a terrific introduction to the Rutherglen style, sweet, fortified, but with decent balancing acids. It offers bold aromas of bergamot, honey and fig, flavors of caramelized pineapple and flamed orange zest and a moderately long finish.",,Chambers Rosewood Vineyards
"Soft oak and sweet-spice aromas add interest to the rich berry core of this red blend. Notes of raspberry and strawberry fill the medium-weight mouth, framed by soft yet present tannins and spicy hints of licorice and black pepper that linger through the finish. Harmonious and attractive, this is ready to drink now.",The Left Bank,Neil Ellis
"Chalky, mineral tones infuse the clean apple, Asian pear, white peach and melon rind aromas on the nose of this wine. It's pure and focused, with ample acidity that cuts through the ripe fruit flavors on the palate. Hints of orange blossom and clove-spiked citrus unfold on the finish. Drink now_2017.",Five Soldiers,Rustenberg
"This is textbook Clare Valley dry Riesling, with lime sherbet aromas and flavors that come across as slightly one-dimensional at this young age. It's medium bodied, with a slightly dusty texture that's especially notable on the long finish. Drink now_2025.",St. Andrews Single Vineyard Release,Wakefield Estate
"This is a pretty lean, tightly focused wine. Grilled pineapple and citrus notes broaden slightly on the midpalate, then come together again on the crisp, lemony finish. Drink now through the end of 2015.",Tate,Franklin Tate
"Big, bulky, ripe aromas of cassis and blackberry come with a hint of cedar and spice. This Cab shows a clampy, tannic mouthfeel and loamy, ultraripe flavors of blackberry and cassis. Fudge, mocha and blackberry flavors drive the finish on this ripe wine from a hot vintage.",Cuvée Alexandre Apalta Vineyard,Lapostolle
"Blackberry and spice aromas are earthy, leathery and stalky. This is youthful and tannic at this point, while oaky flavors of clove and wood spice ride heavily atop blackberry and dark plum fruit. Oak notes and firm tannins indicate that this will be best from late 2015 through 2018.",Alpha,Montes
"Very seductive and flavorful, this smells like a bushel of ripe blackberries and raspberries, and tastes exotic, generous and full of dark fruit notes. Full bodied and velvety textured, it has enough firm acidity and tannin to make it mouthwatering.",Shake Ridge,Portalupi
"Tobacco, balsam wood and vanilla aromas accent soft cassis and blackberry tones. In the mouth, this warm-vintage Cabernet is chewy and full. Cassis, blackberry, fresh tomato and spice flavors settle on a rich, brusque finish that's powerful yet enjoyable. Enjoy the bold fruit expression of this wine now.",Ecos de Rulo Single Vineyard El Chequén Estate,Viña Bisquertt
"This is an attractive, nut and honey-flavored wine that is also shot through with acidity. It is crisp with the potential to broaden out as it ages. A touch of spice, apple and lemon juice and youthful acidity make a wine for aging. Drink now, but better from 2017.",,Château de Montguéret
"A smidgen of Petit Verdot finds its way into this Cab, a cellar-worthy bottling with massive bone structure, accented by savory cedar, herb and black fruit. A taste of espresso dusted in chocolate shavings shows on the finish. Age through 2020.",,Castello di Amorosa
"Black cherry fruit gets serious with elements of slate, eucalyptus, tar and wild mint on this wine from the Corralitos area at the southern coastal edge of the appellation. It's soft at first on the palate, then reveals a wash of acidity, with sour cherry fruit and black tea tannins.",Alfaro Family Vineyards,Big Basin
"Made by Aaron Pott, this blend of 58% Merlot, 32% Cabernet Franc and 10% Cabernet Sauvignon is minerally and herbaceous, aged almost two years in French oak, half of it new, the rest seasoned. Cassis, pomegranate and peppercorn dance to the fore, supported by weighty tannins. Enjoy through 2020_2022.",Arise Proprietary,Blackbird Vineyards
"A partnership between winemaker Chris Phelps, who makes the wines for Swanson, and his son, Josh, this Cab is silky in currant, cassis and black raspberry, the oak more sweet than overwhelming. With room to age through 2015_2017, let it open before enjoying.",Sleeping Lady Vineyard,Ad Vivum
"Mouthwatering aromas of dark berry, cooking spice and cured meat lead the nose on this bold wine. The savory palate doles out layers of mature black cherry, blackberry, ground black pepper and savory herb alongside firm acidity and velvety tannins. Drink through 2021.",,Brezza
"Made for Fleming's Prime Steakhouse and Wine Bar, this bottling is the winery's first release from this vineyard, set near the town of Petaluma. The barrel imprint is significant, rounded out by plum, earthy mushroom, fennel and ripe strawberry. Brooding, this wine offers a dark and dense underbelly of bittersweet chocolate.",Saltonstall Vineyard,Davies
"With a nose full of rich, ripe plum and tobacco, this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon spends 43 months in tight-grain barrel, melding together its burly layers of blackberry jam, clove and toasty oak. Leathery through the finish, the wine is soft and round, following through with easygoing tannins to the finish.",Plus Game Ranch,Goldschmidt
"There is an attractive yeasty character to this fresh wine. Apples and a touch of toast mingle easily on the wine that has some bottle age. It's both crisp and rich, a very satisfying combination.",Premium,H. Blin
"This is slightly bigger and bolder than the 2009 Art Series Cabernet, but remains a relatively streamlined and silky rendering of the variety. Potent cedar and vanilla notes frame dark fruit aromas and flavors, while the finish lingers, echoing with wood overtones. Drink now_2025.",Art Series,Leeuwin Estate
"Dark smokiness hovers above the fruit, slightly obscuring the view. Firm tannins, however, hold a core of bright, ripe but tart red berries. This is tightly framed and needs time to evolve. A slender but warm body is built on firm structure. Drink as of 2016.",Langenlois,Loimer
"This is a concentrated, lovely wine that offers a depth of red berry, forest floor and herbes de Provence. All of the wine's elements come together seamlessly on the palate. Approachable now, but should also age well.",La Cruz Vineyard,Keller Estate
"The style of this young wine is for ripe fruit as well as really crisp acidity. Bright lemon flavors are combined with yellow fruits and only the slightest hint of herbaceousness. This is already well balanced, although it will be even better from the end of 2015.",Thauvenay,Domaine Masson-Blondelet
"Produced from a parcel of old vines, this wood-aged wine has spice as well as white fruits and a touch of honey. It's a generous wine with its toast, almonds and rounded texture. The lightest touch of minerality gives structure and the potential to age. Drink now and until 2020.",Le Peu Morier,Domaine Vincent Carême
"One-third new French oak elevates this sappy, snappy wine. Crisp and lovely upon entry, it's balanced and interesting, with lightly spiced pear fruit highlighted with sliced oranges.",M Tribute Series Kelly Hrudey,Meyer Family Vineyards
"Aromas of tire rubber mix with herbs, red fruit, plum and allspice. Candied red fruit flavors are plump in feel, trailing on the finish.",Les Collines Vineyard,Angel Vine
"Exuberantly floral, this perfumed, pale-pink wine offsets ripe peach and strawberry flavors with zesty, spine tingling acidity. Robust in body, it finishes briskly on a savory herb note.",Dry Rosé of,Atwater
"Aromas of toasted oak, coffee bean, anisette, dried plum and a whiff of coconut lead the nose of this blend of Sangiovese, 15% Merlot and 5% Cabernet Sauvignon. Reflecting the heat of the vintage, the palate is rather evolved and abrupt, offering dried black cherry, espresso and grilled sage but not much fruit richness. Aggressive, astringent tannins dry out the finish.",Brolio Riserva,Barone Ricasoli
"This unusual wine offers aromas of nori, dried flowers, bittersweet chocolate and cherry cola. It's full flavored with a lightly tacky feel.",Wallula Vineyard,Boudreaux Cellars
"Black cherry notes persist throughout this bluish-pink dry rosé. Ripe white peach, watermelon and plum flavors are punchy and fresh, marked by a razor-edged line of acidity.",,Bouké
"Subdued aromas of underbrush, toast, truffle and ripe black-skinned fruit emerge in the glass. The forward palate offers raisin, dried black cherry, espresso and oak-driven spice alongside dusty tannins that leave a drying, astringent finish. Drink sooner rather than later before the remaining fruit dries up.",Riserva,Castello di Querceto
"This wine offers aromas of leather, maraschino cherries, rose petal and medicine cabinet. It shows a bit of its age but still has time, with grainy tannins and soy flavors propping it up.",Maddelena,Cavatappi
"This very fresh wine from the Ducourt family is all crisp, crushed berry fruits and tight acidity. The 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is tangy, very dry and steely in character, with equal parts acidity and fruit. The aftertaste is lively, poised and refreshing.",,Château Larroque
"There is an unusually high (40%) proportion of Sémillon in the blend, which offers the possibility of aging. Although this wine is fresh, lemony and tightly herbaceous now, it will become more rich and the flavors will deepen. Drink from the end of 2016.",,Château les Pasquets
"This opens with an attractive fragrance of ripe plum, violet, aromatic herb and baking spice. The straightforward palate offers dried black cherry, crushed raspberry, ground pepper and leather alongside polished tannins. Drink sooner rather than later to capture the remaining fruit freshness.",,Colognole
"This earthy wine opens with aromas of wild red berry, wet soil and a gamey note. The vibrant palate offers juicy red cherry while touches of cinnamon, dried herb and orange zest add interest.",,Fattoria Campigiana
"Made with Sangiovese and small amounts of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, this opens with aromas of blackberry, grilled herb, cedar and toasted oak. The palate offers raw cherry, vanilla, anise and a hint of espresso alongside dusty tannins that leave a drying finish. Drink sooner rather than later as the fruit is drying up.",Riserva,Farnetella
"Aromas of red berry, savory herb and a balsamic note lead the nose. The ripe palate delivers black cherry, crushed plum, sage and licorice. Soft acidity and fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Drink through 2016.",Meme Riserva,Fattoria di Petrognano
"Made with Sangiovese and 10% Merlot, this opens with aromas of vanilla, ripe plum and a whiff of coconut. The aromas carry over to the palate along with dried black cherry, licorice and roasted coffee bean. It's still tightly wound, with raspy tannins that leave an astringent finish. Drink soon as the fruit richness is starting to dry up.",Cedro Riserva,Fattoria Lavacchio
"A blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet aged in barriques, this opens with aromas that recall perfumed berry, wild violet and a balsamic note. The dense, ripe palate doles out ripe black plum, crushed wild cherry, toast and roasted coffee bean alongside soft acidity and chewy tannins. Drink through 2016.",Riserva,Fattoria Petriolo
"Red cherries, dark spices of clove and anise and gingerbread show on the nose of this wine from the Foley family portfolio. Darkness pervades the concentrated palate, with black fruits, dark chocolate, beef char and condensed purple flowers. It's so deep that it lacks noticeable flavor layers.",The Chairman Series,Firestone
"This wine is half Viognier with the rest Grenache Blanc and Roussanne. It offers aromas of almond, lees and peach. It's unctuous in feel but lighter in style with a touch of bitterness that distracts.",Estate Bottled GRV,Goose Ridge
"Blue fruit, herbs and brown spices vie for attention. The palate brings lighter-styled yet still generous-feeling fruit flavors that linger.",,Helix by Reininger
"A fresh, grapefruit and citrus flavored Champagne, this is intensely crisp. It is all fruit with just a hint of zesty texture to give some shape. It could age in bottle for a few more months, so drink from 2016.",Millésime Brut Blanc de Blancs,Jean Josselin
"Cherry, raspberry and vanilla combine for an inviting mix of ripeness and sweet bouquet. A fruity component also sits nicely atop this structured wine marked by soft, fine tannins. The finish is robust in black pepper and clove.",Signature Series,Kirkland Signature
"This nonvintage cuvée from Lombard is soft and fruity with a relatively high dosage that gives a rounded character. Red apple and a light touch of spice balance with the full acidity. The bottling tasted here is young, so it would be worth keeping until the end of 2015.",Brut Réference,Lombard et Cie
"This selection from eight parcels of vines was made by one of the top Bordeaux consultants. The result is a ripe, warm wine that has great swathes of plum fruits alongside some firm, dry tannins. It is rich while retaining plenty of fresh acidity. Drink now.",Les Parcelles de Stéphane Derenoncourt,Maison Bouey
"Pear and spice aromas lead to rich pineapple and prickly pear flavors. There's much to love, with unmistakable varietal expression.",,Maryhill
"Honeysuckle and Good & Plenty combine on the entry of this fruity, floral wine, full-bodied and intriguing on the palate in ripe apple and vanilla. A funkiness on the finish gives it an earthy ending.",,Mazzocco
"This rare varietal bottling has lightly volatile aromas of Dimetap, raspberries, woodspice and herbs. Cranberry, raspberry and rose-hip flavors are full bodied and show purity. Drink now.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,McCrea
"This wine displays generous aromas of white pepper, woodspice, raspberry and cherry. The flavors are elegant with a peppery finish.",Verhey Vineyard,:Nota Bene
"This opens with aromas of ripe plum, coffee, Mediterranean brush and a whiff of exotic spice. The palate offers dried cherry, anise, oak and black pepper alongside drying, woody tannins, yet it lacks fruit richness.",Riserva,Podere Capaccia
"Toasted oak and vanilla give this wine substance and style. It's fuller bodied and robust on the palate, still young and holding on to some weight. A touch of grapefruit spruces up the proceedings, providing crispness just in time.",Reserve Selection,Raymond
"Birch Creek Vineyard provides the fruit for this stainless-steel-fermented and aged wine. It offers notes of custard, lees and herbs. The clover flavors show a richer feel but the concentration doesn't all seem to be there, trailing toward the finish.",Birch Creek Vineyard,Reininger
"This full-bodied red opens with aromas of sun-baked soil, iris, baking spice and plum. The warm palate offers black berry, dried black cherry, espresso and tobacco alongside raspy tannins that leave a drying finish.",Cellole Gran Selezione,San Fabiano Calcinaia
"Made from organic grapes, it offers aromas of pear, apple and citrus that carry over to the palate along with tropical fruit notes. The crisp flavors and quenching finish make this an ideal apéritif.",,Case Paolin
"It offers linear apple, pear and juicy white fruit flavors alongside a subtle smoky note. Crisp acidity leaves a refreshing finish.",Le Rosse,Tommasi
"Smoke and earth tones accent aromas of pressed apple on this brisk, intensely citrusy Riesling. Lemon-lime flavors are zippy and bright on the palate, but the finish falls a bit short.",Medium-Dry Spätlese,Villa Riesling
"This blend of Teroldego and Lagrein isn't very expressive but the the nose eventually reveals black fruit and smoke. The palate is also closed, but eventually opens enough to show cherry, blackberry and hints of oak-driven spice.",Marmoram,Maso Poli
"With some wood aging, this is an attractive, smooth and ripely fruity wine. The vanilla and spice wood flavor underlines the peach and apricot fruits that are still young and fresh. It could do with another few months in bottle, so wait until the end of 2014.",,Cortes de Cima
"This rich, good Chardonnay is easy to drink. The tropical fruit, apricot and peach flavors are accented with oak, and balanced with acidity.",Appellation Series,Cru
"This inky-black Bordeaux blend is based on Cabernet Sauvignon. It's bone dry, tremendously hard in tannins and also quite acidic, giving the overall impression of tough rusticity. However, there's a tremendous core of blackberries and cassis. Decant and drink now.",Claret,Donati
"Right out of the chute this is a fresh, lively with scented with fresh cut pears. It's balanced and crisp, with subtle hints of cinnamon spice. A good spring/summer quaffer.",,Duck Pond
"The acidity is strong and brisk on this Rhône-style blend, and the flavors are equally strong. It shows apricots, tangerines, peaches and mangoes, tasty but lacking subtlety. Drink up.",Saralee's Vineyard,Due Cani
"This wine opens with intense floral aromas that recall room freshener and cold cream. The dense palate offers exotic fruit and flavors that suggest canned peaches alongside a hint of clove. It has a bitter, nutty finish.",,Franz Haas
"Dry and intense in tannins, this blend of 50% Grenache, 25% Syrah and 25% Mourvèdre is dense and chewy. With hugely dark, savory fruit, it has acidity lurking on the finish. The wine otherwise offers big flavors of black licorice and coffee.",,Honor Winery
"Scents of lime and orange flower are pretty on this off-dry Riesling, accenting flavors of savory apple and preserved yellow peach. It's zingy in acidity, finishing moderately long on a dried herb note.",,Saint M
"Sweaty leather, stewed berry, green herb and earth aromas set up a fresh, tomato-like and raw palate. On the flavor profile, this deals equal parts earth, dry spice, green peppercorn and red-fruit notes. A simple finish is adequately dry and spicy.",Duette Premium,Indomita
"The tough, earthy taste of raw mushrooms makes this Pinot less than lush. That's despite some good Lifesaver candy raspberry flavors. The grapes are from the estate vineyard, in the Petaluma Gap. Cold vintage, cool growing area, slightly unripe wine.",El Coro,Keller
"At this price, and with wide availability, this is a great Cabernet for everyday consumption. It's dry, tannic and rich in black currants and oak, with a brisk edge of acidity to cut through oily beef and cheeses. Production was 43,200 cases.",,Kenwood
"From the slopes high on the hillside above Beaune, this is a soft and ripe wine. Fruity and smoky, it has some richer berry flavors to broaden it out. Good acidity makes the wine fresh, fruity and ready to drink in 2015.",,L. Tramier & Fils
"Made from the Turbiana grape, this easy-drinking wine opens with aromas of peach and pineapple. The lively palate offers tart green apple and citrus alongside bright acidity. Sip as an apéritif or pair with vegetable quiche.",Perla,Perla del Garda
"Delicate aromas of hazelnut, lemon zest and a whiff of subtle mineral carry over to the fresh palate. It's simple but well-made and would pair nicely with lightly seasoned vegetable risotto.",,Pisoni
"A green, herbaceous wine that has some concentration from the old vines in the blend. It has grapefruit, intense acidity and a fresh, crisp aftertaste. Drink now.",,Quinta de Porrais
"Aromas of grilled bell peppers and soy sauce accompany whiffs of tire rubber. The palate shows muddled flavors of caramelized onion, espresso, and ripe black currants and blackberry alongside fleeting tannins. It finishes on a sugary note.",Caccia al Palazzo,Tenuta di Vaira
"Aromas include white spring flowers, banana peel and tropical fruit. The bright palate offers juicy white peach, green apple and citrus alongside lively acidity. It's simple but well-made.",Le Fornaci,Tommasi
"Despite its special designation, this is a dilute wine with thin fruit flavors. The core of green apple is accented with a hint of barrel toast (17 months in French oak, 29% new). The acidity seems muted. Drink up.",Bernau Block,Willamette Valley Vineyards
"A fresh, fruity wine that also has some richness. With flavors of peach, canned pineapple, and a touch of greener herbaceousness, it's balanced and rounded. Wait until late 2014 before drinking.",Herdade de Catapereiro,Wines & Winemakers
"The wine is dark and tannic, and while it has a huge core of black cherries, the balance is off, suggesting that it won't age well. The alcohol feels hot and porty, with a chocolate-covered raisin finish. Drink up.",Garys' Vineyard,Bernardus
"Lots of ripe tropical fruit and peach flavors in this Chard, along with oak notes of buttered toast. You'll also find mouthwatering acidity and a creamy, leesy finish.",Soberanes Vineyard,Bernardus
"This Zin contains percentages of Petite Sirah, Sangiovese and Grenache, offering powerfully dusty tannins and layers of blackberry. Chewy, the finish is all leathery saddle.",,Bonterra
"With a little oak giving the wine a toasty, buttery mouthfeel, this Chard is brisk in acidity. It has ripe, flashy tropical fruit, tangerine, apricot and pear flavors.",,Cameron Hughes
"This wine opens with aromas of toasted oak, butterscotch and vanilla. The palate delivers toast, oak extract and mineral, but it lacks fruit richness to fully balance the dominant wood. It ends on a bitter coffee bean note.",Sanct Valentin,Cantina Produttori San Michele Appiano
"This copper-colored Pinot Grigio opens with aromas of green apples and whiffs of tropical fruit. The slightly sweet palate offers juicy pink grapefruit, ripe pear and peach alongside crisp acidity.",Rosé,Casata Monfort
"Very juicy and ripe, this is a fruity, blackberry flavored wine. The ripe feeling is cut through by acidity and solidified by tannins, making it a rich wine that will be ready to drink from 2016.",,Château Fongaban
"Full-bodied and structured, it has ripe tropical fruits, apricots and peaches as well as a more tangy, mineral texture. The acidity is already well integrated.",Sécret Mineral,Denis Jeandeau
"This rich, smoky wine has broad tannins and a soft texture. It's full in the mouth with sweet red fruits and gentle tannins. Already attractive, it's likely to develop quickly with its warm character. Drink from 2016.",,Albert Bichot
"A spray of violet perfumes ripe blueberries and blackberries on this deep, rich Cabernet Franc. Lusciously full in body, the palate is a concentrated crush of black fruit flavor accented with brisk acidity and soft, velveteen tannins on the finish.",North Block Six,Atwater
"Here's a savory wine that opens with aromas of black berry, earth, leather and spice. The brooding palate offers mature blackberry, black cherry, black licorice and cracked pepper alongside big, chewy tannins.",Teodosio,Basilisco
"A ripe, fruit-driven nose of blackberry pie and vanilla offers hints of herbs like thyme and oregano in this solid Syrah-Grenache-Petite Sirah blend from winemaker Ryan Deovlet. The medium color profile, presumably from the Grenache, lends to a leaner, medium body as well, with sour cherry emerging as a dominant flavor. Serve with thinly sliced pepper steak.",Escondrijo,Refugio Ranch
"Here is your go-to, all-purpose Chardonnay. It's got the crisp, vivid fruit flavors of Washington state grapes, a tangy blend of lemon and lime, with bracing botanical highlights. It's super fresh and drinking beautifully, with a wide assortment of seafood, poultry and salad dishes.",,Renegade
"A Cabernet with 12% Merlot, 4% Cabernet Franc and 1% Petit Verdot blended in, all from Sonoma Valley's Rancho Salina Vineyard, this wine is medium in weight and viscous. A nice mix of cedar and herbs play against savory cranberry and tobacco. The balanced acidity gives it a lift.",Heritage Reserve,Schug
"Almost blue-black in color with a red-violet rim, this Syrah presents aromas of blackberry, mocha and a hint of green pepper. Simultaneously refreshing and well-rounded, it has pleasant flavors of blackberry, orange rind and chocolate-covered espresso bean.",Denizli-Güney Plateau,Sevilen
"Ripe, rich peach, pineapple and mango aromas lend a plump, opulent feel to this dry-style Riesling. The palate balances mineral intensity with streaks of peach and honeydew flavor and bristling lime acidity. Finishes long with a kiss of white blossoms.",Dry,Silver Thread
"Almost clear in color and faintly aromatic, it offers nuanced layers of pineapple, guava and pear. A suggestion of barrel fermentation makes it mid-weight and fuller in body. The finish is creamy and swathed in herb, an ideal companion to shellfish.",Uboldi Vineyard,St. Francis
"Made with Nero d'Avola, this bright, pretty wine offers juicy red cherry, strawberry and blackberry sensations along with notes of black pepper and mineral. Fresh and savory, this is made to be enjoyed young.",Regaleali,Tasca d'Almerita
"This savory Fiano opens with aromas of jasmine, honeysuckle and exotic fruit. The ripe, round palate delivers succulent yellow peach, ripe apricot, Bartlett pear and juicy pineapple alongside fresh acidity.",,Terredora
"Fresh strawberry fruit and rocky minerality emerge on the nose from this wine, made by single-vineyard specialists Testarossa from vines dually owned by Santa Lucia Highlands pioneers Gary Pisoni and Gary Franscioni. On the palate, the round red fruit continues with a touch of black pepper, leather, burned rosemary and seared fat.",Soberanes Vineyard,Testarossa
"Violet florals lend a stylish flair to ripe blackberry and plum notes on this perfumed Bordeaux-style blend. It's velvety and rich on the palate with ripe, concentrated black-fruit flavor, but balanced with tart cranberry acidity and a lingering granite note. An elegantly composed cool-climate red.",,Thirsty Owl Wine Company
"Cherry, plum and smoke start this easy drinking Naoussa Xinomavro. Smoke, vanilla and smooth berry flavors are integrated and fresh. A great introduction to the variety.",Grande Réserve,Vaeni
"Aromas of underbrush, leather, black fruit, mocha and subtle oak lead the nose of this young Taurasi. The palate is still young and tightly woven, but offers black cherry, prune and black pepper alongside bracing tannins. Drink after 2018.",,Villa Raiano
"This all-stainless Dolcetto is anchored in pretty strawberry fruit and vivid acidity. It looks and tastes like a particularly deep rosé, or perhaps a lighter Beaujolais. Quite charming and delicious.",,Wind Rose
"This edition of the Indomitable is 78% Cabernet Sauvignon and 22% Malbec, a change from past vintages. Brambly berry fruit of moderate concentration is adorned with highlights of leaf and herb. Drink now through 2018.",Indomitable,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"This full-bodied wine gets attention right away with a deep, dark color. It follows up with assertive aromas and flavors of charred oak barrels and maple syrup, which gives an impression of sweetness. Blended with 12% Petite Sirah and 3% Cabernet Franc, it has ample fruit elements, but the lavish oak character dominates.",Estate Grown,Mettler Family Vineyards
"Flowery and balanced in crisp, dry flavors of lemon and pear, this wine takes its designation from the French word for fog, a nod to its cool-climate environs. Supple tannins and refined acidity round out the deal.",La Brume,Michel-Schlumberger
"This delightful wine opens with blue flower, red berry and spice aromas. The juicy palate delivers black cherry, red raspberry, white pepper and spice alongside silky tannins and bright acidity. Made to be drunk young, it's perfect for everyday fare and informal occasions.",,Mustilli
"Solidly built, with a thick, heavy mouthfeel, it offers juicy citrus, pineapple and red apple fruit flavors. A nice trace of minerality comes up in the finish.",,Nine Hats
"Buellton's custom-crush facility known as Terravant Wine Company also produces its own wines, including this good-value Red Pony brand. Aromas lean toward the savory, with sautéed brown and morel mushrooms. Brown spices, plum and cola emerge on the palate.",,Red Pony Ranch
"Kathie Lee Gifford is just the latest celebrity to enter the winemaking game, but she made a solid partner in Scheid, one of the biggest vineyard owners in Monterey County. Their Gifft smells fresh and lively, with tangerine and sour grass aromas, followed by a sipping experience full of smoke, oak, lanolin and tan flavors, approaching leather and sandalwood.",Estate Grown,Gifft
"Dark fruit, lemony oak and gutsy plum aromas sit in front of a textured, fairly full-bodied palate, with a couple of layers on offer. Dry, woody, spicy notes accent core dark-berry flavors, while the finish is fresh, snappy and oaky.",El Pájaro Rojo,Losada
"Red-berry aromas are earthy, herbal and tomatoey but not green. This feels fair and balanced, with tomato-like acids pushing flavors of red berries, plum and herbs. This finishes with traditional Rioja characteristics of herbs, spice and red fruits along with acidic scour.",Crianza,Dinastía Vivanco
"Colombo is based in Cornas, but now produces a range of wines from throughout the Rhône Valley. This is a very good wine, even if it lacks the flamboyant aromatics and graceful elegance of the best Côte Rôties. It's a chunky, berry-and-espresso-inflected Syrah (with 5% Viognier) that seems a bit warm on the finish. Ready to drink.",La Divine,Jean-Luc Colombo
"This large, well-known firm has put together a firm, medium-bodied Gigondas, aged in 600-liter demi-muids. Leather and garrigue mark the black cherry fruit, which picks up hints of mocha and black olive on the slightly dusty finish. Drink now_2018.",Oratorio,Ogier
"Buttonwood's accurately named Zingy boasts an exciting amount of verve on both the nose and palate. Fresh aromas of passionfruit juice and guava translate to zesty flavors of Granny Smith apple and brilliant acidity. Serve with freshly shucked oysters and jalapeno-topped, yuzu-splashed sushi.",Zingy Estate Grown,Buttonwood Farm
"Fermented and aged in stainless steel and blended with 25% Roussanne, it's aromatically pretty with notes of honeysuckle and ripe peach. It drinks full bodied and dry, with a tart finish.",Cave B Estate Vineyards,Cave B
"A remarkable wine from the appellation's westernmost property, this shows lemon, honeydew, pomelo pith, tangerine skin and a touch of hazelnut on the nose. Lots of steely notes power the palate, with flavors of honeysuckle, pears and tangelo racing across the tongue. It's a perfect Chard for shellfish.",,Solomon Hills
"Gravel, asphalt and iron drive the minerally nose of this bottling, which also shows cigar box, cherry leather, stewed strawberry and chocolate-caramel aromatics. There is plenty of both tannic grip and vibrant acidity once sipped, with cherries, cranberries and oregano elements making for a saucy palate. Drink 2017_2025.",Honea,Palmina
"Extremely seductive aromas of caramel, toasted oak, beach campfire, blackberry, black cherry and thin mint cookies welcome the nose to this bottling. The palate is equally complex and inviting, with milk chocolate, cherry pie, smoked pork and dried oregano flavors, tongue-tantalizing all around.",Jefferson Cuvee,Monticello Vineyards
"This boasts a classic nose of red berry, forest floor, spice rack and a balsamic note. The full-bodied palate delivers juicy red cherry, mature strawberry, clove, grilled herbs and anise alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. An earthy note of truffle closes the finish.",Bussia Vigna Campo dei Buoi,Costa di Bussia
"Hints of toast from wood aging give this wine its richness. It doesn't detract from the ripe apricot and peach fruit flavors while also keeping great freshness. All the elements have produced a ripe, full wine that could still age another year. Drink from 2017.",Grande Cuvée,Domaine Jean-Paul Balland
"This has an attractive Nebbiolo nose of rose, violet, perfumed red berry, baking spices and a whiff of pressed powder. The structured palate delivers red cherry, raspberry, grilled herbs, white pepper, anise and a balsamic note alongside firm, fine-grained tannins and brisk acidity. A hint of mint backs up the finish.",Brunate,Francesco Rinaldi
"A delightful spray of cherry blossoms meanders from nose to finish in this standout Pinot Noir sparkling. Elegantly mouthfilling, it showcases whisper-soft cherry and plum flavors against a dazzling backbone of acidity and minerality. Grace and power synchronize through a long, long finish.",Blanc de Noir,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Ripe apples and pears meet with daffodils, honeysuckle and dried peaches on the nose of this wine from the Corralitos area. Flavors of lemon-lime soda, chamomile tea and pressed white flowers show on the floral and uplifting palate, which is warmed by a touch of popcorn.",Regan Vineyards Reserve,Bargetto
"A brand-new offering from this producer that usually traffics in Anderson Valley Pinot Noir from its own estate, this initial attempt at a white wine is stunning, a well-honed marriage between site and winemaker. Thick and expansive on the palate, it's a complex study in succulent apple and ginger, with a mineral-laden finish.",Gap's Crown Vineyard,Black Kite
"The variety is unmistakable on this wine with its aromas of mortared fresh herbs, flowers, dry chocolate and cherry. The flavors show a mixture of lightness, intensity and richness, along with a captivating sense of texture and acidity.",Katherine Corkrum Estate Grown,Spring Valley Vineyard
"Ripe aromas of prune, cassis and blackberry come with notes of spice cake, minerals and lemon peel. This feels grabby and strong, with pronounced acidity and tannins. Baked blackberry, black currant and toasty flavors are supported by a beam of firm acidity that carries onto the finish. Drink this powerful Rioja now through 2022.",La Nieta,Viñedos de Paganos
"This wine is half Cabernet Sauvignon and 40% Syrah, finished off with Petit Verdot. The aromas and flavors of dried herbs, blackberry, tar and fresh flowers show multiple layers, with the palate displaying density and richness. It needs time to be at its best but will be worth the wait. Drink 2020_2027.",Callisto,Baer
"This is a fun discovery, a tantalizing mix of Pinot Noir and Chardonnay grown from estate vineyards in cool, acid-driven sites within the appellation ideal for sparkling. Light pink and gold in color, it celebrates the tangy flavors of pomegranate, strawberry and grapefruit against a mineral-laden backdrop and remarkable depth.",Methode Traditionelle Brut,Balletto
"This wine is 56% Cabernet Sauvignon, 25% Merlot and 19% Cabernet Franc. It's aromatically brooding, with notes of high-toned dried herbs and dark cherries. The flavors are textured and palate-coating, with firm tannins backing them up. Just a baby now, it has a long life in front of it. Enjoy after 2021.",Tapteil Vineyard,Cadence
This wine shows an almost-black core with a red rim. Jammy blackberry aromas lead to rich and mouth-coating fruit flavors that are ripe. The full body and firm tannins create a thick texture. This rich wine begs for aged cheese or a chocolate dessert for accompaniment. It's made with 50% Syrah and 25% each of Petite Sirah and Zinfandel.,,Renwood
"Cabernet Sauvignon (65%) takes the lead on this wine followed by Merlot (15%) and equal parts Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. Aromas of high-toned dried herbs, flowers, black currant, coffee and barrel spices lead to densely packed black fruit flavors that need time to strut their stuff. Drink after 2021.",Arctos,Baer
"Enticing aromas of wild berry, pine forest, aromatic herbs, iris and a hint of leather emerge on this full-bodied red. The bold, chewy palate delivers crunchy red berry, anise white pepper, clove and sage alongside youthfully assertive tannins and bright acidity. The ripe fruit seamlessly supports the hefty alcohol level.",Albe,G D Vajra
"This inky, concentrated bruiser opens with lemony oak, graphite, earth tones and deep black-fruit aromas. Like the nose, the palate is intense and ripe as Tinto Fino gets, with smooth, manageable tannins. Flavors of blackberry, prune, cassis, lemon rind and tobacco end with power, class and depth; drink from 2017_2027.",Noble,García Figuero
"Produced from flint soil (silex), this wine is intense, delicious and has a great future. Lemongrass and grapefruit flavors give a lift to the tight, strongly mineral texture. Spice and just a hint of wood bring out riper fruits as well as a refreshing, tangy texture. Drink from 2017.",Sancerre d'Antan Terroir de Silex,Henri Bourgeois
"This project aimed to show how well Washington wines can age and the proof is in the bottle. Aromas are complex, with notes of dried cranberry, cherry, leather, black tea, cocoa and mushroom. The palate is packed with rich fruit flavors that show no signs of slowing down. It flat-out impresses.",,Lawrelin
"This wine dazzles with detailed aromas of black currant, plum, herbs, cassis and earth along with barrel accents. The palate is wound up tightly at present but still accessible with layered, seamless fruit flavors along with a lengthy finish. It will be best enjoyed from 2022_2030.",,Leonetti Cellar
"Aromas of pressed violet, dark berry, baking spice, aromatic herbs and a whiff of leather lead the way. The firmly structured palate offers juicy black cherry, crushed raspberry, licorice, mocha and espresso alongside velvety, compact tannins that still need to unwind.",Castelletto,Mauro Veglio
"An inky-deep color with a dark red rim hints at the concentration. Enticing aromas from the spice rack, milk chocolate and vanilla lead to meltingly rich fruit and cocoa flavors that are deep and focused. At first sip it's almost sweet with ripe black cherry and black currant notes, but the vivid acidity and layer of fine tannins keep it dry and balanced. It will be best after 2020.",Blueline Vineyard,Hourglass
"Salty and savory, this unfiltered wine conveys a lot of wet stone and petrol character. The dark golden color reveals its time in oak. Concentrated and full-bodied, with rich layers of baked apple and pear, it shows a complexity on the palate and a depth of lingering fruit and ginger on the finish.",Estate Grown Cave Fermented Finch Hollow Unfiltered,Jarvis
"Red berry, rose, iris, aniseed and forest floor aromas lead the nose on this structured red. The full-bodied palate offers juicy wild cherry, crushed raspberry, coffee, white pepper and cinnamon framed in firm, fine-grained tannins that lend elegance and structure.",Sarmassa,Marchesi di Barolo
"This wine from the Palos Verdes coastline is redolent with sagebrush, crushed anise and alpine strawberries on the herbally aromatic nose. The sage also powers the palate, alongside juniper and pine, all set against a wild berry frame. This is a big Pinot, though it is relatively light in structure and happily reliant on savory herbs rather than overly ripe fruits.",,Villa Oneiro
"This gorgeous Albariño opens with elegant aromas of white flowers, peach and minerals. There's ample acidity, body and flow to the palate, while flavors of nectarine, tangerine and lemon are top-shelf. A long-lasting, clean-as-polished-glass finish confirms excellent overall quality.",Selección Especial,Adegas Gran Vinum
"Fragrant and structured, this opens with aromas of wild berry, menthol, leather, tilled soil and aromatic herbs. The palate doles out wild cherry, fleshy black raspberry, cinnamon, white pepper and anise. Bracing tannins and racy acidity give it an ageworthy structure, but don't attempt this until after 2020.",Sarmassa,Brezza
"Substantive in oak and weight, this concentrated, estate-grown wine is impressive in velvety texture and a savory conjuring of tobacco and black tea. Dark, brambly blackberry and dark cherry join in on the fun, providing vibrancy amid all the sophistication. Finishing with a dash of cardamom, this wine will cellar nicely through 2020.",West Slope,Donum
"Firmly structured, this opens with aromas of cedar, dried herbs, black currant and sweet pipe tobacco. The smooth, rich palate delivers mature wild cherry, blackberry, dark chocolate, ground black pepper and a graphite note alongside a backbone of velvety tannins.",,Duemani
"Talk about a ripped, structured wine that could use more rest. This pumps out minerally blackberry and coconut aromas along with raw, inky intensity. The wine's texture is defined by a strong tannic backbone, while flavors of burnt toast, bacon, licorice and black fruits finish with graphite and energy. Drink from 2015_2023.",Edición Limitada,Marqués de Elciego
"Here's a Pinot to enjoy over the years. Right now, it's all about primary fruit__aspberries, cherries and Dr. Pepper cola. But the balance is terrific, and there's a brooding quality that bodes well for the future as it develops more secondary characteristics. Drink from 2015_2019.",Hallberg Vineyard Dijon Clones,Gary Farrell
"Wood aging brings out a totally different side of Grüner. It adds tropical fruit flavors, a richer texture and a fuller, more Burgundian character. This is an exceptional wine that could well age. Drink now and until 2019.",Black Edition,Ebner-Ebenauer
"This is a delightful wine with an attractive character that belies that firm structure behind it. It has weight and concentration and firm tannins, while showing the fruity side of the vintage. A wine for pleasure as it ages. Drink from 2016.",,Château Langoa Barton
"A beautifully aromatic wine, this has both great fruitiness and a tight, ageworthy structure. It's rich and full bodied with quince, pear and currant flavors. There is a mineral, chalky texture that is still young and nervy. Age this impressive wine, and don't drink before 2015. Screwcap. Artisanal Cellars, Select Wines.",Steinertal Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"There is as much intense acidity in this wine as sweetness. Opulent yet fresh in character, the wine is developing into a full-bodied wine with powerful richness and promises long-term aging. Drink from 2017.",Beerenauslese Cuvée,Kracher
"Is this Pinot so delicious now you should drink it right away? Or is it deceptively ageable? Both. It's luscious, with ripe raspberry, cola, spice, mushroom and sandalwood flavors that will be gorgeous with steak. But the tannins and acid are so structured, the wine will gracefully age through the next dozen years, increasing in complexity.",Coastlands Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Just hinting at more mature flavors, this is an intense wine, its acidity almost overwhelming. Red currant, spice and concentrated juiciness are all elements in this dense wine. The acidity does suggest longer aging, so drink now and until 2022. Screwcap.",Sunogeln Reserve,Josef Schmid
"This is a wine that has wonderful spice and richness against a dry background. Flavors of honey and noble rot fill the mouth with a swathe of richness and opulence. The wine is still young and needs to age, so drink from 2017.",Novelle Vague Nummer 4 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"This is a classic Eiswein that is so finely poised between intense sweetness and an ethereal lemon freshness. The palate is a delicate fairy's dance of honey, orange zest and acidity. Age this wine and drink from 2017.",Eiswein Cuvée,Kracher
"One of the best values in high-end Oregon Chardonnay, this new release packs a wallop. ?Although just 15% of the French oak was new, the wine is loaded with toasty, buttery scents and flavors. Let it breathe and the ripe fruit flavors zoom into focus__andied citrus, apricot and a bit of lemon meringue pie.",Reserve,Ponzi
"This is an amazing Syrah. Few in the history of California have been this dramatically rich and ripe with flavors of blueberries, blackberries, chocolate, currants, cedar and baking spices. Yet the wine is thoroughly dry, and the alcohol feels balanced with a warm, soft mouthfeel. Delicious now and for the next 4_5 years.",Colson Canyon Vineyard Clone 7,Brander
"This elaborately named Pinot shows Farrell's 2011 signature of rich, brooding earthiness. Tasted now it's a bit clumsy, with raspberry, cherry, mushroom and oak flavors that are scattered and random. With time, it will collect itself seamlessly. Age it for 6_8 years.",Hallberg Vineyard Dijon Clone 777 7% Whole Cluster,Gary Farrell
"The wine shows the fine acidity of the vintage, but also intense flavors of green apples, Asian pears and oranges. Oak brings luscious, balanced notes of vanilla and toast. A gorgeous, sumptuous wine that should drink well for the next six years.",Allen Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"While this Pinot isn't in the same league as the winery's 2011 Precious Mountain or Allen vineyard wines, it's a gorgeous wine nonetheless. With moderate alcohol and vibrant acidity, it offers complex layers of cherries, raspberries, cola, sandalwood and exotic spices. You won't be disappointed if you hold it until 2019.",Williams Selyem Estate Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Good fruit sources__arabella, Hyland and Thistle__long with the craftsmanship of winemaker Robert Brittan, yield a lovely wine with mouth-tickling flavors of sweet-tart Meyer lemon, ripe orange, and candied pineapple. Lively acidity buoys the finish along with flavorful hints of caramel and cotton candy.",,Winderlea
"It's not often you find mature, ready-to-drink Shiraz like this newly released in the U.S. From extended time in oak, this has some mossy, vanilla shadings on the nose that ease gently into savory, meaty notes and dried plum flavors. Hints of brown sugar, chocolate and mint linger on the supple finish. Drink now and over the next few years.",Reserve,3 Rings
"While intensely mineral from the nose to the palate, this excellent auslese is also deeply concentrated, with ripe white grapefruit, peach and yellow cherry notes. It's ripe and juicy, yet honed with a steely lemon-lime acidity and a lingering lime-zest finish.",Erbacher Michelmark Auslese,Baron Knyphausen
"Ripe and rich, this irresistibly fruity spätlese is concentrated with peach marmalade, guava and grapefruit flavors, but braced by a streak of lemon-lime acidity and a delicate spritz that tickles the palate. Satisfying and juicy, it finishes long with a hint of grapefruit-pith astringency.",Graacher Himmelreich Spätlese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Enticing scents of grapefruit zest and bees wax are fitting openers to this creamy, rich TBA full of luscious orange-marmalade flavor. Bright, brisk tangerine acidity adds freshness and levity to the palate, leading to a long, honeyed finish.",Erbacher Marcobrunn Trockenbeerenauslese,Schloss Reinhartshausen
"This is a veritable bargain for the incredible quality it delivers. It's lavishly composed, with a flurry of floral, fruity attributes__herry blossoms, sweet peaches, and yellow plums__ll kissed with honey, and a shower of lemon-lime acidity. Enjoy now for its youthful exuberance, but put a few away to see its honeyed tones darken and mature over the next decade.",Auslese,Schloss Vollrads
"This is a bone dry, while rich wine that is now mature. It has weight, secondary almond and spice flavors, as well as tight acidity and a very mineral character. It has crispness rather than freshness, bringing a taut structure into play along with the concentration. Drink now.",Sunogeln Reserve,Josef Schmid
"This very fragrant wine has ripe quince and pear flavors, as well as a great mineral texture. Fresh and finely balanced, and with tight acidity, it's a wine for long-term aging. Drink from 2016. Screwcap.",Pfaffenberg Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
"This is a fruity wine that attractively layers apples, pears and quince. There is just a touch of pepper to give interest to this full-bodied and ripe wine. Acidity shows at the end to bring a crisp, tight aftertaste. Drink from 2015.",Dürnsteiner Kellerberg Smaragd,F X Pichler
"As good as this wine is tasting now, it will be better still with some time. It's bone dry and silky in the mouth with tart streaks of acidity. The palate is complex with flavors of wild red cherry, cola, raspberry, cranberry, balsam, spice and cedar that evolve with every sip as the wine warms in the glass. Give it 5_6 years to meld.",Hirsch Vineyard,Failla
"Minty, ultraripe blackberry aromas are alluring but ultimately familiar if you know the Cobos style. Ditto the palate, which is rich, thick, chewy and full of creamy oak and black-fruit flavors. This blend of 81% Cabernet Sauvignon and 19% Malbec finishes smooth and creamy, with good balance for what amounts to a very ripe wine. Drink through 2018.",Volturno,Viña Cobos
"This beautiful wine could be from Chablis. It's so dry and flinty, with complex layers of lemons, limes, toast and honey, along with mouthwateringly brisk acidity. As delicious as the wine is now, you might want to cellar it for a few years.",Hawk Hill Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Bright acidity brings a mouthwatering tanginess to flavors of ripe raspberry, cherry, cranberry and mushroom in this dry, low-production wine. It's so easy to drink now, you might not notice the complexities, but they're there. This is a wine to age. Give it 5_7 years at least, although it's likely to be sailing along beautifully in 2021.",Pisoni Vineyard,Bernardus
"From vines planted in 1893, this is an inky, concentrated Shiraz. The aromas hint at cracked pepper, vanilla and blueberries, while on the palate, this is superripe and full bodied. Although close to being fat and overdone, yet it's held back from the edge by its long, licorice-and-spice finish. Drink now_2020.",Old Bastard,Kaesler
"There is a wonderful balance to this wine. It has ripe tropical fruit flavors that are spiced with ginger and lemon zest. At the same time, there is a fine structure with a botrytis core and freshness from pineapple acidity. Drink from 2017.",,Château Guiraud
"After nothing but busts in the past, this Sémillon is in good shape but won't stay fresh for long. Aromas of hay and stalky fruits are a bit strained. In the mouth, it's got good feel and flavors of nectarine and grapefruit. Bitter almond skin flavors control the finish on this textured, warm wine.",Estate Bottled,Bodega Carmine Granata
"A little on the sweet side, but nicely crisp in acidity. The flavors offer generous notes of strawberries, orange zest, sugared tea,  vanilla and cinnamon.",Estate Rosé of Pinot Noir,Balletto
Here's a ripe and plump Lambrusco with bright aromas of black cherry and raspberry jam. The wine feels generous and soft in the mouth with foamy cream on the close.,Otello Nero di,Cantina Ceci
"Black-fruit aromas are ripe and a little earthy. This is a thick yet jumpy wine with some aggression to the palate. Flavors of sweet, ripe berry fruits are basic and finish hot and toasty, with a coffee note.",,Alamos
"On this Pinot's plus side is a clean savoriness, with bright acidity highlighting raspberry, cocoa and spice flavors. On the debit side is its soft, fleshy ripeness. Drink up.",Vintner's Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"Simple tones of citrus and cut grass open the bouquet of this fresh sparkling Prosecco. Talc powder and a very bright, almost steely quality of perlage characterizes the mouthfeel.",Poggio dei Vigneti Extra Dry,Natale Verga
"From the larger Antinori group in Tuscany, this opens with a pretty pink color and bright aromas of raspberry, wild cherry and white almond. Pair it with summer appetizers.",,Santa Cristina
"This modest Pinot offers light strawberry fruit, a dash of cola, and a component of earth and stem that overtakes the finish. It hints at green tannins, with a bit of brown sugar sweetness, perhaps from aging in 30% new oak.",Lazy River Vineyard Reserve,Silvan Ridge
"A value-priced Sauvignon Blanc from Sobon, which also makes Shenandoah Vineyards wines in the Shenandoah Valley of California, within the greater Sierra Foothills. This white opens with floral aromatics followed by wet stone, apple and lemon, all in a subtle, lightly rendered way.",,Sobon Estate
"This Rosé sparkling wine offers a pretty pink color and easy aromas of citrus, pink grapefruit, peach and honey. Soft, creamy foam is backed by peachy sweetness.",Brut Rosé,Trevisiol
"Dark and heavy for a rosé, with extracted strawberry, red apple and spice flavors that finish a little sweet. Yet there's something deliciously  sippable about it.",Rosé of Pinot Noir,River Road
"This Extra Dry Prosecco opens with fresh citrus and peach at the forefront of white flower and crushed mineral. The wine is light, easy and crisp with a subtle touch of soft sweetness.",Blu Giovello,Piera Martellozzo
"White-fruit aromas, brine and clam shell notes get this Albariño going. The mouthfeel is full and lemony. Flavors of pickled, briny citrus and nectarine carry onto the finish. This is at its best now; in 2014 it will not be so good.",Valiñas,Ramón Bilbao
"Narrow aromas of red currant, raspberry and red plum carry a minty green accent. In the mouth, this blend of Tempranillo, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon is tight, with scratchy tannins and no shortage of acidity. Flavors of red berry and plum offer dry spice and herbal shadings.",Reserva,Príncipe de Viana
"Part of Italy's Vino Naturale movement, this organically-farmed Arneis opens with a pretty hay color and subtle aromas of peach, pear and Golden Delicious apple.",,Punset
"Minty green aromas blend with leathery red-fruit scents on what amounts to a gritty bouquet. The mouthfeel on this single-vineyard Malbec is rubbery, rugged and tannic, with a beam of tangy acidity keeping it moving. Flavors of rubber, salty berry and spice are sharp, and the finish is tannic.",Viña Cabra Corral Single Vineyard,Quara
"Initially hard, rooty aromas of leather and horsehide transition to cassis, raspberry and plum if given time. The palate on this is a bit rough and tannic, but there's also solid berry fruit and a moderately baked finish with a rubbery feel to give it character.",,Vinos Magbel
"There's a kick of dry tannin behind this otherwise ripe wine. Raspberry flavors, red plum skins and a some bitterness add fruit and structure. It needs a year to soften out.",,Domaine Poulleau Père et Fils
Light tones of citrus and peach color an easy Brut Prosecco Superiore that would work nicely with barbecue shrimp in sesame sauce. The acidity in this light sparkler keeps the palate clean.,Costa dei Peschi Brut,C_ Vittoria
"Packaged in an elegant bottle with a squarish-squat shape, this pretty Rosé sparkler opens with aromas of Granny Smith apple, citrus and a touch of sweet peach. The perlage is tonic and steely and would pair with spicy Indian samosas.",Otello Rosè Extra Dry,Cantine Ceci
"Ripe and creamy, with flavors of pineapple candy, honey, brown sugar, buttered toast and cinnamon. It's just what millions of Chardonnay lovers want.",,F.J. Serra
"A bright pink colored rosé, this blend of Touriga Nacional and Syrah, has strawberry flavors and a touch of sweetness from the ripe fruits that is balanced with an attractive acidity. Enjoy with food rather than as an aperitif.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Selecionada,Falua
Creamy purple foam fills the glass and once the wine relaxes it offers raw grape juice aromas with cherry soda and blackberry preserves. The sparkling Lambrusco boasts simple lines with a soft touch in the mouth.,Monovitigno,Fattoria Moretto
"Sulfur and match stick are the early aromas on this standard Chardonnay. After that blows off, apple and peach scents are pitted against overt oak. The palate feels good, while flavors of pineapple, mango, apple and cinnamon are oaky and not elevated.",Piedra Negra Reserve,François Lurton
"Exotic aromas of dusty blueberry, latex and campfire set up a jammy, somewhat clumsy feeling palate with big, candied flavors of baked berry blended with sweet oak and licorice. The finish tastes minty, chocolaty and oaky, with heat.",,Finca Agostino
"Bical produces delicious pear and apple flavored wines. This bright, fruity wine is a fine example of this creamy freshness. It is a wine for drinking now, while fresh and crisp at the end.",Galeria,Caves Aliança
"Aged in acacia and French oak barrels, this shows notes of lemon, smoke, and slightly burnt toast. It's creamy in feel but doesn't entirely come together.",Colter's Creek Vineyard Reserve,Colter's Creek
"This frizzante expression of Pinot Nero (made as a white wine) opens with a transparent color and thick white foam. It delivers aromas of white flower, citrus and peach and shows balanced acidity against those soft bubbles.",Magót,Castello di Luzzano
"While this wine is unoaked, it still carries a strong whiff of sulfur and popcorn that doesn't really dissipate. The palate offers good feel and is balanced between weight and acidity. Flavors of melon and applesauce are round and end in a swirl of sweet pear.",Piedra del Sol,Casa de Piedra
"Blending Castelão and Arinto from the high elevation Quinta dos Loridos, this is a tight, bright wine, with an edge of almond bitterness, as well as citrus fruits. It's a crisp, bone-dry wine with no dosage.",Loridos Vintage Extra-Bruto,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Powerful and complex, this shows the density that comes from Chardonnay sourced on the hill of Corton. The rich tropical-fruit flavors are structured, which gives this wine strong aging potential. Keep it for at least six years.",Domaine du Pavillon,Albert Bichot
"Clos de la Chapelle surrounds an old chapel in the Morgeot Premier Cru. This 2010 is full, ripe and intense, with yellow fruit and toast flavors that combine with tight acidity to create richness and structure. Complex, concentrated and age worthy.",Domaine Duc de Magenta Clos de la Chapelle Morgeot Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Tannic and tightly wound, this has an astringent resistance, but because the flavors are so powerful, it's already delicious. Intense notes of raspberry jam, cherry pie, anisette, Dr. Pepper are all present, and a rich, sweet jacket of smoky sandalwood adds further complexity. Give it 5_6 years in the cellar, but it could last for 15 years if you enjoy mature wines.",Trenton Estate Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"Bursting with flower and tropical fruit aromas, the nose on this Tokaj is intoxicating. Luxurious and creamy on the palate, it offers penetrating honey and stone fruit flavors, intensified by prickles of sea salt, mineral and tea leaf astringency.",Cuvée Ilona,Királyudvar
"This vineyard-designated Merlot includes 11% Cabernet Sauvignon, also sourced from Klipsun. Classy from the get-go, this is limned with notes of graphite, mineral and cinnamon, with dense black-cherry and cassis flavors that anchor the core. Its excellent texture, depth, length and structure suggest that this can be cellared for a decade, at least.",Klipsun Vineyard,Januik
"This shows a dryness and an elegant silkiness that make it lovely to drink now. It's deep and long on the palate, with flavors of raspberry-cherry tart, date, cola and spicy sandalwood. Brisk acidity adds a tart bite that would pair well with steak, lamb, salmon and tuna. It will pick up bottle complexity over the next 10 years.",Three Sisters Vineyard Sea Ridge Meadow,Martinelli
"This is as soft and luscious as velvet, and it offers smooth, rich tannins that frame the oak-tinged blackberry, black currant, anise and dark chocolate flavors. Its richness comes with high alcohol, which gives it a slight warmth on the finish.",Aurelio's Selection,Napa Angel by Montes
"A Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc blend, this shows immense density and richness, and it exudes bright tones of cherry, blackberry, chocolate, tar, clove and licorice. The bouquet is elegant and complex, but the smoothness of the mouthfeel is what sets this wine apart.",Sondraia,Poggio al Tesoro
"Made from fruit grown in several notable Napa vineyards, this 100% Cabernet Sauvignon has impressive weight and depth. Its black currant, dark chocolate, anise, pepper and toasted cedar flavors sink deep into the mouth with sweet insistence. The tannins are considerable and will enable this wine to age over the next 10 years. Pair this with rich meats and cheeses.",Silencieux,Venge
"This is one of the best Bordeaux-style blends Wellington has ever produced. Although it still has plenty of life ahead, perhaps as much as 10 more years, its soft tannins and sweet black-currant flavor make it drinkable now. Only 471 cases were produced, but it's worth the hunt.",Victory Reserve,Wellington
"This bursts open with bright, intense notes of blackberry, black cherry, moist pipe tobacco, tar, rum cake and licorice. The solid, decadent yet chewy mouthfeel as well as the impressive length make this a bottling to talk about.",Orma,Tenuta Sette Ponti
"This Syrah is chracterized by its huge intensity and clean, ever-evolving bouquet that is comprised of ripe dark-fruit, roasted nut and white peppercorn notes. The palate delivers a long succession of sweet spice and savory tobacco flavors.",Marchesale,Terre del Marchesato
"Supple and structured, with ripe tannins, this wine offers a seamless mix of red and black fruit flavors, along with fragrant tobacco, fig jam and dark chocolate notes.",Sagemoor Vineyard,Walla Walla Vintners
"This is a new venture by Nicolas Potel, whose family formerly owned Domaine de la Pousse d'Or in Volnay. Made from fruit sourced from 50-year-old vines, this wine is beautifully structured, and it has firm tannins that pair with the fine swaths of juicy flavors of red and black cherries. This is meant for long-term aging.",Vieilles Vignes,Roche de Bellene
"A blend of Syrah and Grenache, this delivers Rhône Valley-like characteristics of ripe fruit, black pepper, smoked bacon and exotic spice. But it has an Italian personality in the form of fresh acidity and Mediterranean spice and blue flower notes. The finish is soft, velvety and chocolaty.",Tinata,Monteverro
"With vines that are located next to La Tâche, this vineyard is great. Powerful and complex, this has the right depth of flavor. It is finely endowed with brooding tannins and black fruit flavors. The texture and acidity on the finish promise this has considerable aging potential.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Les Malconsorts Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"This Pinot Noir's raspberry and cherry fruit is joined by earthier notes of mushroom and mulch, plus a touch of spicy bacon. It's dry and full bodied, with a rich vein of acidity and a coating of furry tannins. Clearly a cellar candidate, this will benefit from 6_8 years of aging.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Chanin
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this shows a dark, masculine personality, and it offers bitter chocolate, dark cherry, blackberry, rum cake, leather and black licorice notes. Dark fruit on the palate is backed by well-structured tannins, which suggest impressive longevity.",Arnione,Campo alla Sughera
"Rich, dry and complex, this Syrah has flavors of blackberry, currant, licorice, grilled prosciutto, black pepper and sandalwood that are wrapped in fine tannins. The wine is a barrel selection of the various vineyards from which Donelan sources its fruit. Production was exceedingly small, but it's worth a special search.",Cuvee Keltie,Donelan
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this opens with spicy aromas of dried ginger, licorice and herb. It shows power and determination in terms of its bold fruit and concentration. Drink now, or hold it for 10 years.",Millepassi,Donna Olimpia 1898
"Clos Saint-Jacques is located in the north of Gevrey-Chambertin. This is a structured, powerful wine, with plenty of firm tannins in its youth. It's full of ripe red fruit, and it needs to age for many years.",Clos Saint-Jacques Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Always a splendid wine, this 2010 does not disappoint. Complex, intense and fruity, it has tangy fruit; a tight, minerally texture; and an intense, steely character. As the wine develops over many years, it will deepen and round out.",Les Folatières Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This rich, powerful and juicy wine is just bursting out of its wood aging bounds. It has opulent red-berry flavors, a core of firm tannins and intense acidity. Ripe and fruity, this is full of aging potential.",Clos des Mouches Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"Tight and structured, this wine is made from fruit sourced from some of the poorest soil in Les Cazetiers. Dense and tight, this has intense minerality and firm tannins allied to red berry flavors. This has great aging potential.",Les Cazetiers Premier Cru,Domaine Bruno Clair
"Structured, concentrated and minerally, this wine's tannins are strong, and they accompany the juicy red-berry flavors. It has a dry core and a dense texture, and it's meant to age for at least six years.",Pertuisots Premier Cru,Domaine de Bellene
"This Chardonnay includes a small amount of Maria Gomes__n obscure white grape from Portugal__n the mix. The addition of Maria Gomes works magic. It fleshes out the palate, and it brings lush flavors of melon, banana, apple and lemon. This needs to breathe, but once it opens, it will thrill you until the last drop.",Stainless,Foundry Vineyards
"A concentrated blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, this opens with dark spice and chocolate notes, followed by luscious blackberry, prune and plum tones. Smooth and extracted, this offers velvety tannins and generous fruit flavors. It is packed with all kinds of opulent pleasure.",Sapaio,Podere Sapaio
"Dark chocolate and espresso notes open the bouquet of this concentrated Cabernet Franc. Round and soft, with power and personality, this penetrating wine sits long on the palate, and it imparts bright fruit and spice notes with time. The tannins are tight, firm and polished. Drink after 2016.",Dedicato a Walter,Poggio al Tesoro
"Powerful and decadent, this 100% Syrah has a lush palate that comes with impressive streaks of gamy meat and earth, plus a note of bright blackberry jam. The long, concentrated finish bears a touch of tar. Let this relax a few years, and it will get even better.",The Instigator,Prospect 772
"This Viognier is easily Maison Bleue's best yet, and it sets a high standard for every Viognier in the state. It's superrich and concentrated without being fat, jammy, bitter or hot. The explosion of citrus, stone fruit and light tropical fruit flavors seems to extend indefinitely on the finish. Details of mineral, baking spice and honeysuckle add interest.",Notre Vie Arthur's Vineyard,Maison Bleue
"Intensely concentrated in black currants, cassis liqueur and oak aromas and flavors, this Cabernet is so strong, it's practically undrinkable now. It's not just the potent tannins and bright acidity, it's the raw, jammy quality of the fruit. All these elements could begin to come together after 2017.",No. 77,Foyt Family
"This is an oaky Chardonnay with buttered toast and butterscotch flavors that overlay rich apricot, tangerine and tropical fruits. The opulence is balanced with crisp acidity. It's all a bit forward and obvious, but in a good way.",Lot 364,Cameron Hughes
"This has aromas of ripe plum and new oak, with a hint of raisin. The palate delivers prune and black cherry notes, with a hint of cocoa. It's simply styled, but delicious.",Cadis,Cantina di Soave
"Earthy aromas of leather, tobacco and raisin lead the nose of this wine. The palate shows a tight core of blackberry, layered with oak, vanilla and chocolate and supported by lively acidity. It finishes on a drying note of wood tannins.",Croce del Gal,Cantine Benedetti
"A blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, giving a classic mineral driven wine, very fresh and crisp with some weight as well. Citrus fruits dominate with hints of apple skin and pear. A sophisticated wine to accompany food.",Perle de Vigne Grande Réserve Brut,Louis Bouillot
"Fresh in zingy, ripe blackberry flavor, this well-made Zin has firm tannins and a dollop of peppery spice on the finish.",Vintner's Reserve,Kendall-Jackson
"This 100% Cabernet shows a ripeness level that few Cabs in the world are able to achieve. It's awesomely rich in blackberry, blueberry and cherry jam, cassis liqueur and mocha flavors, with new oak influences. Drink it over the next four years.",El Coyote,Kuleto Estate
"Here's a bright and delicious ripasso, loaded with notes of black cherry, exotic spice, white pepper and a hint of bitter almond. It has both freshness and structure, making this perfect to pair with savory stews, salami or grilled steaks.",Le Morete,Manara
"A fine Merlot, showing the softness and elegant drinkability of the variety. It's ripe and forward in cherries, cola and sweet oak. The addition of some Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah gives it extra tannic depth and body. Drink now.",Summers Ranch Reserve,Summers
"This is a solid Cabernet that shows the promise of the appellation in the central part of Monterey's Salinas Valley. It's dry and medium-bodied, with savory red-cherry candy, cranberry and currant flavors.",,Muirwood
"Fresh, clean apple and white-peach aromas are good but not overly expressive or complex. This feels fresh and lifted, with minerally, stony flavors of apple and lime. A clean, pointed finish feels nice and tastes like lettuce and bitter greens.",Reserva Heredad,Segura Viudas
"There's a lot of appeal with notes of apricot, mango, butter and toasty spices. It's creamy in feel with the oak_70% American, half new__peckling the fruit flavors and the finish.",,Seven Falls
"Pencil eraser, iodine, latex and blueberry aromas settle better than they start. In the mouth, this is saturated and chunky in feel, with toasty flavors of blackberry, licorice and mint that finish long, herbal and loamy.",Famiglia Bianchi,Valentin Bianchi
"The largest appellation in the Côte Chalonnaise produces here a foursquare, solid wine. It has red fruits, although the structure is what is dominant at this stage. There is a dry, smoky, meaty flavor that marches with the final acidity.",Buissonnier,Vignerons de Buxy
"This Amarone has a rich fragrance of black cherry, prune and cocoa, with hints of almond and toasted wood. The palates shows notes of toasted oak, along with vanilla and espresso accents that muffle the black fruit undertones.",,Villa Monteleone
"A soft, moderately jammy old-vine Zinfandel__he vines at Mohr-Fry Ranch go back to 1901 and 1944__hat's heady in spicy ripe blackberry with an impressive backbone of structure and mouthwatering texture.",Mohr-Fry Ranch,St. Amant Winery
"Tight, crisp, peppery aromas offset fruitier scents of cassis and plum. This feels focused and not too big or beefy. Flavors of toasty, rooty berry fruits and spice finish with oak, spice and ultimately a dosage of heat.",,Melipal
"There's lots of rich Chardonnay character in this affordable wine. It's rich with vanilla, buttered toast, honey, orange and pineapple-jam flavors, with brisk acidity providing balance. Great price for a Chard this good.",Annabella Special Selection,Michael Pozzan
"This is a fresh and vibrant wine, with upfront aromas of ripe peach, melon and Anjou pear all accented by hints of white florals and orange blossom. Lightweight, with an approachable, fruit-forward palate and a crisp, clean finish. Drink now.",,Penya
"This Amarone has somewhat rustic aromas that recall animal and meat juices. You'll also detect whiffs of burned rubber. The palate is better, showing ripe fruit and smooth tannins. While the fruit is delicious and immediate, this also reflects the heat of the vintage and is shy on fresh acidity.",,Monte Zovo
"This wine offers blackberry, raisin and spice aromas upfront, with a whiff of vanilla. The palate shows a dense black-cherry flavor, with accents of white pepper and Asian spice, all wrapped up in a velvety mouthfeel. Bright acidity gives this energy and keeps it lively.",Gaso,San Rustico
"Earthy plum and raspberry aromas come with notes of animal fur and tree bark. This blend of Tempranillo, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon feels crisp due to lip-smacking acidity, while woody flavors of vanilla and dry spice form an accent to core red-fruit notes. A long, dry, stylish and tangy finish is squarely old school in character.",Reserva,Príncipe de Viana
"With luscious raspberry, cherry and vanilla flavors, this silky Pinot is ready to drink now. It has a good structure of tannins and acids, as well as lots of new oak, which it handles well.",Rita's Crown,Walt
"Gold in color, this is a mature wine interesting for its roasted almond and spice flavors, very ripe and rich. Drink this full-bodied wine now.",Cuvée des Comtes d'Eguisheim,Leon Beyer
"The richness of the vintage is very apparent in this full-bodied wine. With weight, structure and dark black fruits, it is textured and showing some vanilla and spice. Smooth, developing well and ready to drink in 2014.",,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"This is modeled after a Rioja crianza, showing young, mixed fruits from a blend of 62% Tempranillo, 12% Graciano, 11% Merlot, 9% Cabernet Sauvignon and 6% Grenache. Showing generous acidity, hints of apple, peach, cranberry and herb, it's a fresh and fruit-driven young wine, perfect for warm weather enjoyment.",Corrida,Brian Carter Cellars
"Impressive for its power, a wine of considerable interest and complexity. It's rich in black cherries, red currants, cola, bacon and spice flavors, but the texture really stands up, a combination of firm tannins and brilliant acidity. Oak provides complicating notes of sweet toast. Drink soon.",Exuberance,Canihan
"This is a Petite Sirah that's easy to love, ripe in sweet blackberry and smoky leather, juicy and balanced with enough meat to pair with a lamb roast or rack of ribs.",,Graziano
"From one of Amarone's most esteemed producers, this shows lots of oak on the nose, along with ripe blackberry aromas. The palate is dominated by oak and vanilla, but it also has black cherry notes and ample acidity. It finishes on a note of drying wood tannins.",,Dal Forno Romano
"The opulence of this Chard comes at least as much from the buttered toast and caramel notes of oak, as it does from the underlying pineapple and tropical fruit flavors. It's a crowd pleaser. Drink now.",Estate Vineyard Olivet Bench,De Loach
"Despite its richness, this is a stylish wine that exudes freshness as much as dense fruit and structure. A blend of Touriga Nacional, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon, all structured varieties, it still yields a generous full-bodied and rounded wine. It does need to age, so drink from 2018.",Maria Mora Enamorada,Magnum Vinhos
"Sourced from the southeastern section of the Rutherford appellation and 100% varietal, this is a seamlessly made wine, luxurious in cherry pie and leather saddle. Tangy acidity meets the dusty tannins head-on, finishing with a burst of orange zest.",,Mathew Bruno
"While barrel-influenced and full-bodied, this unctuous wine remains crisp in edgy acidity, with lean flavors of lemon and grapefruit amidst a deeper, richer background of oak and caramel.",,Merryvale
"Dark in color and offering opulent aromas of crème brûlée and marshmallow, this vineyard-designate is marked by its wealth of orange blossom aromas, an inviting, floral entry. While it exudes richness on the nose, it remains much more restrained and dry on the palate, finishing with leanness and length.",Searby Vineyard,Migration
"Estate-grown Viognier makes up the majority of this blend, followed by 25% Roussanne and 22% Marsanne. Delicate, the aromas lean floral and tart, a combination of peaches and honey that build into an oaky, powerful finish.",3 Divas,Montemaggiore
"This wine has a bouquet of cassis, violet and black pepper. Well-integrated flavors of cassis, strawberry preserves, anise, fennel bulb and lavender are set amid silky tannins that feel as if they may go on forever but are surpassed at the finish when fruit flavors pull out all the stops.",Namura Single Vineyard Special Reserve,Or Haganuz
"This spent 18 months in 50% new French oak, which underscores its pretty berry/cherry fruit with a vein of dark chocolate. Dr Pepper and spicy herbs decorate a solid midpalate that flows into a lengthy finish with confectionary highlights.",Carter Vineyard,Panther Creek
"Full bodied, buttery and spicy in aroma and oaky in flavor, this wine has a big, bold personality from the first whiff through the lingering finish. Complexity and body are its strong suits rather than fruitiness.",Altitude 2401,Perry Creek
"This is a producer always to consider for Rhône-styled wines. A mix of strawberry pie and Nilla wafer, this 100% varietal wine is robust and full bodied. Structured with plenty of tangy acidity, it'll stand up to cellaring or a decant. Drink now through 2021.",Wine Creek Ranch,Quivira
"Succulent in red cherry and cassis, this wine has a surprising level of depth and grip. It finds its way with integrated tannins, soft layers of caramelized oak and a brightness of fruit and acidity.",Reserve Selection,Raymond
"A twist of clove, fig and chocolate figure into this powerful, concentrated wine, with baked plum, tobacco and maple taking on secondary roles. It's full bodied and thick, so pair appropriately. It finishes in black pepper.",Westphall Ridge Vineyard,Rock Wall
"A red-violet color, this wine has a bouquet of blackberry, lilac and pencil lead with a whiff of iodine. A network of velvety tannins and a vein of bold acidity are equally weighted, wrapped around flavors of blackberry, blueberry, black pepper, rose petal and Mediterranean herbs, with bright fruit persisting into the pleasing finish.",Secret Reserve,Shiloh Winery
"Deep garnet to the eye, this wine has a nose of strawberry and tart cherry with a hint of resin. Flavors of cherry, pomegranate, eucalyptus, anise and a soft touch of leather are suspended in a web of well-moderated tannins. Expect a lasting sense of coolness with a burst of brightness on the finish.",Adama,Tabor
"Inky violet-red in the glass, this wine has a fruit-forward nose of black cherry and strawberry. There is a good balance of acidity and tannins amidst flavors of black cherry, raspberry, caramel and orange zest. The perception of light spice remains on the tongue after the gentle finish.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"This low-alcohol rosé spent five months in neutral oak, yielding additional complexity and an appealing creaminess to the finish. Strawberry and cherry flavors are accompanied by lighter hints of peaches and sweet spices. It's a thoroughly modern, delicious rosé.",Rosé,Trinity Vineyards
"Aromas of toast, grilled herb and red berry lead the nose along with a whiff of fresh mint. The palate is still primary; offering bright Morello cherry, white pepper, anise, clove and hint of tobacco while a dried sage note closes the finish. Bracing tannins and brisk acidity provide the framework. Drink after 2020.",Sarmassa,Virna Borgogno
"This is definitely a light vintage for this vineyard-designate. It deftly mixes cranberry and raspberry fruit with hints of wet stone. Proportionate, drying tannins line the finish.",Shea Vineyard,Winderlea
"Long extended veins of bramble and dried herb lend depth to this intensely concentrated Spätburgunder. Youthful and primary, the palate bursts of rich black cherry and berry, but soft tannins and brisk acidity invigorate the finish. It's luscious and forward yet refined. Drink now through 2020.",Rotwein Trocken,Wittmann
"Sanguine in red plum, clove and dark chocolate, this bottle-aged, full-bodied wine is impressive and still quite ripe and robust. The tannins are prominent and supported by a girth of oak, with a dense, concentrated finish.",,Gallo Estate
"Woodland berry, pressed violet, dark cooking spice, truffle and new leather aromas unfold on this brawny wine. The full-bodied palate doles out ripe black cherry, ground pepper, licorice and tobacco accompanied by velvety tannins. It closes on notes of menthol and the warmth of alcohol. Drink 2018_2028.",Sotto Castello di Novello,Giacomo Grimaldi
"Enticing notes of brioche and baker's yeast waft from this brut-style Riesling Sekt. It's perfumed and floral, yet elegantly composed, drenching the palate in waves of fresh grapefruit and lime. Piercing and pristine, it finishes with crystalline precision.",Cremant Brut,HPSepicurean
"A few swirls of the glass release engaging aromas of baking spice, red berry, rose and a whiff of tar. The linear, elegantly structured palate boasts bright wild cherry, white pepper, cinnamon and a mineral note alongside vibrant acidity and assertive but refined tannins. It's still rather austere but should blossom into a beauty after a few more years in the cellar. Enjoy after 2019.",Muntacc,La Prevostura
"Compact aromas of red berries get a boost from oak-based coconut, cedar and graphite notes. This is a blend of three Malbec vineyards of varying elevations; it's bursting with acidity, while high-toned plum and currant flavors are a touch salty. A lively, fiery finish is fueled by latent acidity. Drink through 2020.",Terroir Blend,Nieto Senetiner
"Aromas of toast, espresso, ripe berry and menthol lead the nose. The round, savory palate doles out juicy black cherry, blackberry, clove, chopped herb and game alongside chewy tannins. A coffee note closes the finish.",Bricco delle Olive,Palladino
"Lifted honeysuckle and jasmine perfume abound throughout this textbook Mosel Kabinett. Sun-kissed apricots and peaches burst on the palate, yet maintain a graphite edge of minerality and acidity. It's a crystalline fruity wine that's irresistible now for its youthful exuberance.",Ockfener Bockstein Kabinett Erste Lage,St. Urbans-Hof
"Red berry, dried rose, truffle and a hint of scorched earth aromas come together on this solid, no-frills Barolo. The straightforward palate delivers wild cherry, ripe strawberry and a hint of cake spice alongside firm, ripe tannins and fresh acidity. Drink 2016_2021.",,Villadoria
"Enticing aromas of red rose, wild red berry and aromatic herb lead the way. The palate offers dried berry, grilled herb, mocha and toast alongside assertive tannins and nervous acidity. Give this a few years for the tannins to unfold. Drink after 2020.",Neirane,Agostino Bosco
"Showing the heat of the vintage, this offers earthy sensations of leather, scorched soil, truffle, stewed prune and ripe cherry. Bracing tannins provide the backdrop.",Cannubi,Borgogno F.lli Serio e Battista
"Leafy underbrush, truffle, woodland berry and toast aromas lead the nose. The chewy, solid palate offers ripe black cherry, crushed raspberry, grilled sage and ground aniseed alongside bracing tannins and assertive acidity. Drink 2018_2028.",Cannubi Boschis,Cantina del Nebbiolo
"Aromas of mature berry, menthol, coffee bean, toast and dark cooking spice emerge on this bracing wine. The firmly structured palate delivers dried black cherry, espresso, French oak, licorice, chopped herb and tobacco set against bracing, close-grained tannins and the warmth of alcohol. The tannins will need years to unwind.",Prapò,Ceretto
"A blend of Syrah, Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this wine shows intriguing notes of orange peel, plummy fruit, smoke and a barrel top note. It's plush and richly flavored, with a soft, luxurious feel.",NxNW,North by Northwest
"This bottling comes from the winery's two best barrels. The delicious nose is dominated by cigar box, with a grape candy fruit and a slight mint sense. The flavors are charred blueberry with judicious amount of tar, and the sipping proves nicely light.",DeVine,Peachy Canyon
"The winery ventures up north to extreme conditions along the Sonoma Coast and a vineyard named for being as far as __ell and back._ The wine is balanced between oak and fruit, with mellow blue and red berry tones as well as a touch of wild herb.",Ellenbach Vineyard,Etude
"Big, but nicely proportioned and balanced, this dark, spicy, rich, dry wine makes the mouth water for a slab of grilled meat. It has ripe blackberry, espresso and mild smoky flavors, surprisingly smooth tannins and a lingering finish.",High Elevation,Shannon Ridge
"Aromatically brooding, this has notes of dark cherries, blackberries, mineral and herbs with abundant barrel accents. It's full bodied, rich and high octane, at times seeming a bit overwrought but still delivering plenty of enjoyment.",Kingpin,Sparkman
"This has an almost steely spine running through it, with concentrated raspberry fruit bedecked by streaks of herb, thistle, pepper and green leaf. The barrel-aging brings in nougat and a lick of coconut cream pie.",Stewart Family Reserve,Quails' Gate
"Barrel-fermented, this is dripping in honey and caramel surrounded by ripe golden apple and passionfruit. Accentuating the richness is a balance of acidity and texture, making for a beautifully complex wine.",Estate,Rock Wall
"A blend of Viognier (60%), Roussanne (25%) and Marsanne, this wine is moderately aromatic with notes of pear, melon, apricot and flowers. It's medium bodied with abundant stone fruit flavors, quite reserved considering the warmth of the vintage.",Southern,Rôtie Cellars
"Melon, yellow apple, yeast and celery swirl on nose and palate, creating a savory, spicy vortex. Nuances of watercress and something even more savory, like lovage, lurk in fruity ripeness. Take time over this lovely, original wine and it will reveal almost all its secrets. The length is wonderful and apple-scented.",Bisamberg,Wieninger
"Intended as an accessible start to the Yao portfolio, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Petit Verdot and Merlot packs a mouthful of juicy cassis and blackberry layered with tobacco and tightly woven tannin.",Napa Crest,Yao Ming
"Full bodied but smooth textured, this is ripe and enticing. The color is like garnet, while the aromas resemble black cherry, black currants and rosemary. Flavors are complex, autumnal and inviting, making this a great discovery.",,Victor Vineyards
"This wine displays peppery, spicy, briery fruit sweetness without discernible berry character. It's silky and plump on the palate, making it easy to drink in the near term.",Bistro,Epicurean
"Subtle scents of buttered toast and candied citrus peel add interest to the fresh tropical-fruit core of peach, guava, fig and mango. Medium acidity gives the palate good lift, while the lime-zest finish is clean and mouthwatering. Enjoy now.",,Neil Ellis
"This is a forceful, hot and heavy Carmenère with strong black-fruit, spice and licorice aromas. The palate is ripe, jammy and a touch pulpy, but deep digging reveals core acidity and structure. Flavors of herbal black fruits come with toasty oak, while the finish is minty and herbal.",Single Vineyard,Errazuriz
"Subtle aromas of grilled bread, citrus curd and peach set the stage for a plump, medium-bodied wine that boasts restrained flavors of white peach, pineapple and lime. Drink now_2016.",Flint Rock,Howard Park
"From a remote vineyard, this generous, well-made wine offers subtle black-cherry aromas, a velvety texture and blackberry flavors. Just moderately tannic, it's softer than some, yet has enough grip in the texture to be great with an indulgent meal.",Alder Springs Vineyard,City Winery of New York
"Raspberry, currant and tomato aromas are deepened by a hint of prune and tree bark. This is full but choppy on the palate, with pointed acidity. Baked plum, maple and molasses flavors finish warm, with weight and balsamic notes. This tastes like it came from a hot year, which 2009 was.",Single Vineyard,Valdivieso
"Lime zest and green apple mark this wine's nose and palate, dominating the senses at this early stage of the wine's evolution. A bit of dustiness emerges on the long, dry finish.",,Wakefield Estate
"This offers the same scent as a bowl full of ripe, almost overripe red and black wild cherries. Juiciness and succulence reign. Freshness and medium body are well aligned and frame the opulent fruit. A beautiful introduction to Saint Laurent for those who don't yet know it.",Reserve,Forstreiter
"Blended with 20% Petit Verdot, this unusual offering brings notes of mushroom, herbs, smoke and dark cherries. It's tightly wound with a firm squeeze of tannins.",The Albatross,Gorman
"Ripe and still young, this crisp, mineral-textured wine is packed with citrus flavors that bring out acidity and a bright, fresh character. It needs time to fully integrate the dosage and the wine and bring out the full potential, so wait until 2017.",Millésimé Brut,Gremillet
This aromatic wine conveys notes of Mounds Bar and dark cherries along with a whiff of volatility. It's full bodied with semisweet fruit flavors along with abundant vanilla accents.,,Henry Earl
"This meaty, fully toasted Pinot is dark in color and smoky smelling. A lively, powerful palate boasts a sense of elegance while offering up spicy, oaky black raspberry and currant flavors. A long, spicy finish stays strong while guarding the wine's honest varietal character.",20 Barrels Limited Edition El Triángulo Estate,Cono Sur
"This proffers a very clean-cut nose with a hauntingly precise notion of Williams pear. The lovely, slender palate features some midpalate texture and delicate lemon and pear notes finishing with a warm aftertaste of alcoholic power.",Tatschler,Esterházy
"A blend of Cabernet Franc (47%), Merlot (39%) and Cabernet Sauvignon, this cool-vintage wine ventures toward the green and leafy with abundant herb and savory notes. It's elegant in style, with a supple feel and fine-grained tannins.",Red Willow Vineyard,Fall Line
"Rose, violet, game and tilled earth aromas waft from the glass. The savory, accessible palate offers black cherry, crushed raspberry and cinnamon alongside firm but polished tannins. Enjoy through 2016. Polaner Selections, Rare Wine Co.",,Cantina Bartolo Mascarello
"This is lively, lean, and agile in style, from the fresh raspberry and cranberry aromas to the tangy raspberry flavors to the insistent tannins and firm acidity that frame it. Light to medium in body, this should soften and broaden in texture with time. Best after 2016.",Fog-Eater,Drew
"Lemon, green pear and aloe vera meld into a balanced, streamlined white with focus, elegance and depth. Citrus flavors play with peppery spice and combine for a lasting finish.",L&T Cool Climate,Dürnberg
"Fermenting in oak and using the rare Petit Meslier grape, Duval-Leroy has created a wine in its single-varietal Authentis range that is, to say the least, unusual. The wood element is noticeable but what's more fascinating is the intense acidity of the grape. There may be only 40 acres left in Champagne of this tight crisp apple and citrus flavored grape.",Authentis Brut,Duval-Leroy
"Alert but a bit yeasty on the nose, with notes of citrus, tropical fruits and green herbs filling things out, this is weighty and mature, with acidity to spare but also some creaminess to the palate. Briny, salty flavors of orange, tangerine and lime finish long and reflective of the Pacific Ocean, which isn't far from the vineyard that yielded this new-to-the-market SB.",Kuda,Kalfu
"This blend of 75% Grenache and 25% Syrah is a well-made rosé at a realistic price. Scents of crushed stone and bubble gum emerge from the glass, followed by medium-bodied strawberry and cherry flavors and a faintly chalky finish.",,Saveurs du Temps
"The nose presents a mélange of pear, yeast and peppery herbs. On the palate, the fruit is almost completely subdued and dominated by strident yeastiness. This unusual wine would work well with soft, washed-rind cheeses or miso-flavored dishes.",Bergweingarten,Sommer
"Sweet aromas of jasmine jump from the glass in this vineyard-designate, followed by palpable acidity that makes the wine fresh and refreshingly dry. A finish of grapefruit pith provides for a citrus-tinged end.",Dollarhide Estate,St. Supéry
"From a variety of coastal vineyard locations, this wine, an inaugural offering from the producer, opens in zesty lemon and tangerine, before developing into a fuller-bodied, unctuous experience on the palate. It offers tamped-down acidity and briny back note on the finish.",,The Forager
"Sanguine in black olive tapenade, this is a soft, smooth, 100% varietal wine that's full-bodied and expressive in black cherry and dark plum. It finishes in tight, chewy tannins.",Caton Vineyard Upper Bench,Ty Caton
"Subdued aromas of wild berry and forest floor lead the nose of this easygoing red. The vibrant palate delivers crunchy red cherry, tart red currant and a hint of mint alongside zesty acidity and fine-grained tannins.",1265,Uggiano
"Cool, calm black cherry, raspberry and leather aromas come in front of a pure, juicy palate. Blackberry and blackcurrant flavors are bold but basic, while this Tempranillo holds its fruit and form on a slightly hot finish.",,Viña Galana
"Aromas of coffee, cocoa, green wood and fresh herbs lead to pleasing cherry, cola and chocolate flavors with abundant vanilla and wood accents, with tannins lending some grip.",Reserve,Waterbrook
"A taut, clean Riesling that seems a little subdued in its flavors. The palate is clean and fresh and offers the refreshment one expects from dry, Austrian Riesling.",,Weingut Groiss
"This has particularly ripe and concentrated fruit flavors and a feeling of alcoholic strength in the body and on the finish. Aromas and flavors resemble very ripe plums, dried cherries and blackberries. It's styled for fans of power and ripeness.",Mariah Vineyard,Woodenhead
"This lands on the sweet side of the corral, and has a good texture of tannins and acidity as well as oodles of grapy, blackberry jam flavors to complete the package. It's full bodied, rich in mouthfeel, and the ripe fruit character stays on the finish.",Whiplash,Jamieson Ranch
"Aromas of toast, coconut and ripe black-skinned fruit lead the nose. The soft, one-dimensional palate doles out fleshy black cherry, vanilla and mocha alongside round but rather drying tannins.",La Torretta,La Querce
"This opens with aromas of red berry and black-skinned fruit. On the fresh, easy-drinking palate, savory notes of black pepper accent ripe plum and juicy strawberry. Bright acidity and soft tannins balance the juicy fruit. Enjoy through 2015.",Da Vinci,Cantine Leonardo Da Vinci
"This blend of 80% Sangiovese, 10% Canaiolo and 10% Ciliegiolo opens with bright aromas of red berry, violet and a whiff of Mediterranean scrub. The vibrant, easygoing palate brings juicy black cherry, raspberry and a note of clove alongside bright acidity and supple tannins. Enjoy through 2016.",,Cantine Ravazzi
"The nose on this brut tilts toward yeast and bread. The palate is round and weighty, but healthy due to its firm acidity. Flavors of citrus fruits, green herbs, lettuce and sea brine end with seltzer-like punch and crispness.",Cuvée 21 Brut,Parxet
"Made with organically farmed fruit, this opens with aromas of brown spices, tilled earth and black-skinned fruit. The vibrant, medium-bodied palate offers blackberry, dried cherry, licorice and orange zest alongside zesty acidity and round tannins.",,Sangervasio
"Fruity aromas of red berry and a whiff of forest floor lead the nose of this medium-bodied red. The lively palate doles out tart red cherry, crushed strawberry and orange zest alongside racy acidity and polished tannins.",Poggio Stella,Vecchia Cantina di Montepulciano
"A wine of contradictions, this attempts to merge ripe elements, like fig, nectarine and melon, with taut notes of citrus and hints of garden peas. It's medium bodied, with a crisp, pleasant finish.",Aware Valley Single Vineyard Estate,Yealands
"This has a candied cherry color, vivid strawberry and cotton candy aromas, and on first sip a freshness that's almost startling. On second sip it's more like a light red wine, delicate, medium-bodied, very fruity but easy on the palate.",Organic Grapes,Chacewater
"Truffle, forest floor, wild berry and scorched soil aromas lead the nose of this easygoing, earthy red. The lively palate offers juicy wild cherry and a hint of cake spice alongside pliant tannins. It would pair nicely with hearty Tuscan soups.",,Cantine Bellini
"This opens with pretty floral aromas that recall violet and iris together with a whiff of dark berry. The bright palate delivers juicy black cherry, crushed cranberry, clove and dried anise. Smooth tannins and zesty acidity give it an easy-drinking quality so enjoy soon.",,Barone Ricasoli
"Softly layered in crisp red fruit, from currant to strawberry, this is a medium-bodied wine with a medium finish, seasoned in compelling jolts of cinnamon spice. From the relatively cool climes of its appellation, it's juicy without ever becoming overwhelming in tannin.",Mitsuko's Vineyard,Clos Pegase
"Orange-pink in color, this soft and ripe-feeling Champagne is made from Pinot Noir. It is packed with ripe red fruits with a full mouthful of mousse. Round and generous, it is ready to drink.",Cuvée Céleste Brut Rosé,Demarjory
"Ripe and fruity, this wine brings out apricot and pear flavors. It is rounded, full of fruit as well as balanced acidity. It is ready to drink but will be better from late 2015. The vineyard, about two-thirds old-vine Sémillon and one-third Sauvignon Blanc, tends to be harvested during cool mornings.",,Chateau Haut Rian
"This perfumed wine discloses hints of apricots and white peaches as well as ripe lime juice. It is balanced, fruity with a good touch of minerality to give texture. The aftertaste is all about fresh fruits that will soften over the next few months. Produced by the Ducourt family, first in Bordeaux in 1858 and now one of the largest independent producers in the region. Philippe Ducourt handles the vineyards and Jérémy Ducourt makes this wine.",,Château Larroque
"Ebullient blossom and berry notes waft from this unique carbonated Pinot Noir (blended with proportions of Cabernet Franc and Cayuga grapes). Plump strawberry and cherry flavors are dry on the palate, but concentrated, accented by brisk acidity and sharp, piercing bubbles.",Bubble Pinot Noir Rosé,Atwater
"Underbrush, raisin, charred earth, mocha and toast aromas lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, prune, chocolate, toasted oak, vanilla and a green note of dried sage alongside astringent tannins. It lacks fruit richness to stand up to the oak.",Calidonia,Bindi Sergardi
"Lightly sweet blue fruit aromas and flavors mix with coffee, mocha, toast and herbs. It doesn't seem entirely like Cabernet but it's hard to ignore its appeal.",,14 Hands
Light raspberry and plum aromas offer a touch of floral violet. This everyday Mencía shows grip and expansive flavors of earthy plum and raspberry. Moderate oak and a medicinal note rise up on a fresh finish.,,Armas de Guerra
"Aromas of exotic spices, licorice gumdrop, leather and raspberry announce a full-bodied palate. Saucy plum, oak and mustard-like flavors finish with a dash of cumin and a solid, grabby texture.",Particular Old Vine,Bodegas San Valero
"On the distinctly fruity side, this is a ripe, full-bodied and generous wine. It may not have the tannin density for long aging, but it offers ripe black fruits and a fresh cut of acidity. Drink from 2017.",,Château les Ormes Sorbet
"This wine is light, with touches of honey and dried fruit. Oranges, marmalade and dried sultanas are balanced by the acidity of this already attractive Sauternes. Drink now, but better from 2016.",Lafleur Mallet,Cheval Quancard
"Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine is a blend of all five classic Bordeaux varieties. It's dry and tannic and rather austere, with herb-infused black currant, tea and oak flavors. Drink it soon.",Mercury Rising,Cinnabar
"Made from Garganega grapes, this wine has intense aromas of stone fruit, crushed tomato vine and cantaloupe reminiscent of a Sauvignon bianco. The straightforward palate offers pineapple, peach and mint alongside fresh acidity. Peter/Warren Selections, Haw River Wine Man.",,Coffele
"A fruity, very young wine, it has red berry fruits balanced by a dry texture. While it is full of fruits, it does need to broaden out and bring in some balanced structure. Give it until 2015.",Déese Méditrina,Domaine du Théron
"The winery specializes in Zinfandel. While the Maboroshi Vineyard has produced great Pinots for other wineries, this one is tough in tannins. Give it a good, long decant and drink up.",Maborishi Reserve,Dutcher Crossing
"Young and fresh with an attractive prickle on the tongue, this medium-sweet Vinho Verde is well cut with acidity. Accented with apple and citrus, it is bright and ready to drink. Screwcap.",,FVine
"Pleasantly crisp raspberry, cola and oak flavors mark this easy to drink Pinot Noir. It has a good burst of acidity for balance, and feels silky in the mouth. Drink up.",Black Dog Series,Hill Wine Company
"Jammy in orange, apricot and pineapple fruits, this Chard has an overlay of oak that brings notes of sweet buttered toast and vanilla. It's a simple wine, but has fine acidity.",,Kessler-Haak
"A fresh and fruity wine, it's full of light and attractive peach and apple flavors. The wine has fresh acidity and a soft texture that is opening well. Drink now.",Tiserny,L. Tramier & Fils
"It's rich in blackberry jam, with heady notes of cassis liqueur and sweet oak. At this price, it's a great everyday wine.",,Leese-Fitch
"This coastal Chardonnay is ripe and forward in apricots, orange and mangoes, bright in acidity and strong in oaky flavors of buttered toast.",,Bernardus
"Chocolate milk, with a squeeze of cassis liqueur and the sweet vanillins of toasted oak, are the flavors. With the high alcohol, it's almost a dessert wine. Give it credit for a heady opulence.",La Teresa Bloc Reserve,Cerro Prieto
"Dry and tannic, this totally structured wine has weight. However the fruit element has vanished leaving a dense wine, very firm and just given brightness by acidity. Drink now.",Tradition,Château Thuron
"It starts with aromas of yellow flower and a hint of exotic fruit. The fruity palate offers sweet peach, banana and a hint of bitter almond. Pair this with light first courses like pasta topped with vegetables.",Corte Giacobbe,Dal Cero Tenuta di Corte Giacobbe
"This estate-grown Pinot is still pretty rough and chewy, with earthy tannins that are chalky and drying. The fruit leans toward cranberry, with some vanilla flavors threaded in.",,Sweet Cheeks
"A ripe and fruity wine, it is full of bright red fruits, very soft tannins and juicy acidity. It's just the wine for drinking young, so drink this summer through 2015.",Tinto,Moura Basto
"A piercingly crisp wine, full of acidity, apple flavors and a mineral texture. It is light, aromatic and bursting with fruit. The aftertaste brings out a strong citrus character.",,Quinta do Casal Branco
"Pretty fragrances include white flowers and green apple. The fresh, linear palate offers pear and Granny Smith apple with a hint of lemon zest. Pair with light pasta dishes or sip as an apéritif.",Torrediluna,Lechthaler
"With crisp acidity and a delicacy in the mouth, this Pinot has pleasant raspberry, cherry and oak flavors, and is ready to drink now.",Sonoma Signature,Don & Sons
"Extraordinarily high alcohol is the defining reality of this wine. It gives it a burn in the mouth, like cognac, only without the richness. The currant and spice flavors are nicely dry, but that high alcohol accentuates the tannins.",Bismark Mountain Vineyard,Hanna
"Because Cahors is an appellation only for red wine, this rosé from the Clos Triguedina vineyard is a more lowly Vin de Pays. It's fruity, showing Malbec acidity rather than tannins and some attractive berry fruits. Drink now.",Clos Triguedina Le Rosé du Clos,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Gold straw in color, this is a ripe and very soft wine. It revolves around red apple flavors that kept it warm and light. The wine should be drunk now.",,L. Tramier & Fils
A rich and fruity blend with swathes of ripe red berry fruits that are smoothed out by the soft wood and tannin flavors. Acidity freshens the ripeness. Drink now.,Quinta dos Bons Ventos,Casa Santos Lima
"An aromatic and fruity wine with bright lemon and apple flavors. Light and fresh, it needs to let its fruitiness calm down. Wait until the end of 2014.",,Casal da Coelheira
"This is the freshest apple and citrus-driven wine. It has great fruitiness allied to acidity and a soft, creamy structure. Drink in 2014.",Les Charmes,Cave de Lugny
"A bold and ripe wine, it's full of black currant fruits accompanied by wood and acidity. It's obviously young and will soften and calm into a smooth and rich wine. The finish brings out a dry character. Drink from 2017.",,Château Cayla
"In 2012, Pizay made two whites: one labeled Burgundy and this one labeled Beaujolais. This is more in the apéritif style, fresh and fruity, full of apple flavors and with a touch of citrus at the end. It's ready to drink now.",,Château de Pizay
"Simple and fruity, it has attractive red fruits, soft tannins and just the right amount of acidity. It will develop relatively quickly, so drink from 2015.",,Château Lamothe-Vincent
"Aged in large casks, this opens with aromas of toast, oak, and espresso. The palate offers fleeting Golden Delicous apple and citrus along with more persistent toasted oak sensations. Overall it lacks the fruit richness needed to support the evident wood influence.",Vigneto Runcata,Dal Cero Tenuta di Corte Giacobbe
"White blossom and honey notes perfume this intensely aromatic dry Riesling. The medium-bodied palate is concentrated, with flavors of zesty white grapefruit, nectarine and just a shade of wet-stone minerality on the finish. An elegant quaffer.",Dry,Chateau Lafayette Reneau
"A lot is going on in this wine from the Santa Cruz Mountains winery founded in 1981 by the late Tom Mudd. Today his work is continued by his kids, Karina and Jack Mudd, and winemaker George Troquato. The nose offers oregano and pomegranate-reduction sauce and flavors of black cherry, uplifting sage and licorice. Lingering acidity and a solid tannic profile make for a well-rounded, full appellation wine.",,Cinnabar
"While the wood aromas are strong, so is the rich fruitiness. Ripe yellow fruit flavors give a generous, rounded feel. At the end, fresh acidity gives welcome contrast. Drink now, but better from 2015.",En Chatone,Clos des Rocs
"Here's a straightforward, savory wine that has aromas of black berries, toast, spice and bell peppers. The palate offers dense black cherry, black currants, black pepper and licorice, alongside polished tannins.",Barbazzale Rosso,Cottanera
"A blend of Nero d'Avola and Merlot, this straightforward, friendly wine opens with a fragrance of blue flower, tilled earth and black fruit. The juicy palate is presented in an easy, enjoyable style, delivering ripe blackberry accented by clove and nutmeg.",Ikano,Curto
"Blackberry, tart cherry, cranberry and carob take center stage on this fresh Nero d'Avola. Notes of black pepper and clove add depth to this easy-drinking style, while soft, supple tannins give it a round texture.",,Curto
"Soft and fruity, it offers delicious yellow fruits cut by acidity. Lively and fruity, it shows a warm tropical character, and is ready to drink now.",,Denis Jeandeau
"Solid and tannic, this is a full-bodied wine with potential. Ripe fruits are dense and juicy.  With both structure and fruit, this wine will develop well. Drink from 2017.",En Combe Roy,Domaine Alain Jeanniard
"While there is a strongly wooded aroma, the yellow fruits shine through on the palate. Attractively rounded and soft, the wine has bright acidity, a good citrus touch and a feeling of lightness. Drink from 2016.",Hauts Marconnets Premier Cru,Domaine Chanson
"Acidity combines with ripe red berry flavors. The tannins are still developing, giving potential structure to this fruity wine. Wait until 2017.",,Domaine Daniel Largeot
"Crisp and mineral in character, the wine is fresh and fruity. A light texture adds extra interest and the citrus tang is attractive. Drink from the end of 2014.",Le Ronté,Domaine La Soufrandise
"Chock full of fresh apple, zesty lemon and grapefruit flavors, this juicy, full-bodied Chardonnay shines with youthful, fruity energy. It's texturally rich with lingering notes of white peach and melon that seem to lend sweetness to the finish.",,Hosmer
"Lemony oak and solid but generic berry aromas flow onto a chunky, full palate with loamy berry, red plum, raisin, tomato and herbal flavors. For a basic Rioja, this is minty, herbal and entirely authentic on the finish.",II Crianza,Covila
"A pretty, pale salmon hue, this fresh and quaffable rosé brings watermelon and strawberry flavors, lifted with clean acidity and a lick of minerality. A burst of cherry fruit comes out in the finish.",,Renegade
"The oak influence (20% American, 80% French) predominates on this 100% varietal wine with notes of mocha and spice. The fruit flavors are lighter in style, with a grainy feel to the tannins. Coffee flavors linger on the finish.",,Seven Falls
"Ripe, rich fruit penetrates through this lush, velvety blend of Cab, Merlot and Syrah. Flavors of black cherry and cassis are opulently layered in honey and vanilla, but cut with a balancing strike of tart cranberry acidity. Bold and decadent, yet quite simply tasty.",Synergy,Shalestone
"This features an appealingly toasty aroma, substantial cherry and cassis fruit and a concentrated core. Elements of stem wood, black olive and clean earth filter through the finish, along with perfectly ripe tannins.",Estate Grown,StoneCap
"Notes of dried sage and thyme persist, lending a nuanced complexity to this crisp, medium-bodied Merlot. It's elegant in style with concentrated blackberry and cherry flavors wrapped in layers of soft, velveteen tannins that linger on the finish.",Estate Reserve,Stony Lonesome
"This pure Tempranillo, from young vines, sports juicy acidity around its black cherry core. Barrel-induced streaks of nutmeg, caramel and mocha bring further detail to the flavors.",Sugarloaf Vineyard,Stottle
"Made by blending 60% Corinto, 20% Nero d'Avola and 20% other varieties, this opens with aromas of underbrush, game, leather, spice and mature black fruit. The warm palate delivers smooth tannins and flavors of blackberry, prune and black pepper. This isn't an ager, so drink soon.",Nero Ossidiana,Tenuta di Castellaro
"This brawny Nero d'Avola, aged in both barriques and casks, opens with aromas of ripe blackberry, plum, coffee and vanilla. The dense, one-dimensional palate offers mature blackberry layered with milk chocolate.",Alto,Tenuta Rapital_
"This structured Nero d'Avola opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, vanilla and hints of toasted oak. The juicy palate delivers blackberry, raspberry, black pepper, licorice and espresso alongside bracing tannins. You'll also notice the warmth of alcohol on the finish.",Kuntari,Terre di Giurfo
"This is stalky and leathery smelling at first, then black-fruit scents take over. The palate is racy and a touch tomatoey in terms of acidity, while flavors of herbal fruits and acid-driven tomato finish racy in feel but stewed and herbal in flavor.",Crianza,Pagos de Quintana
"Still settling into the bottle with spritzy, glass-coating bubbles, it's aromatic with notes of cantaloupe, pear and lime. The palate drinks dry and is fruit-filled and richly flavorful, narrowing toward the finish with a zip of acidity. Give it some time open to see it at its best.",,Palencia
"With its gold color and waxy aromas of baked apple and butterscotch, this small-production (190 cases) Xarel-lo is a breed unto its own. The palate is creamy and leesy, but balanced for the most part. Lightly oxidized flavors of caramel, baked pear and apple cider finish mellow and buttery. Drink this odd but unique wine now.",Electio Microcuvée,Parés Balt_
"Toasty smelling at first, then this gets more gritty, stalky and sulfuric on the nose. On the palate, this is bubbly, foamy and heady, with yeasty flavors of bread, apple, nectarine and citrus. The finish is round and fluffy.",Tresor Reserva Brut,Pere Ventura
"This is quite dry and astringent, with aromatics and flavors of toasted grain. The lightly ripened fruit flavors include sweet tomato, strawberry and blackberry.",Two Blondes Vineyard,Adams Bench
"Rich red fruits combine with good acidity, raspberry flavors and soft tannins. Ripe and juicy, it shows great fruitiness at the end.",Cuvée des Deux Papis,Alex Gambal
"Cut grass, green apple and crisp stone fruit comprise the aromas on this wine from a rocky block of the Margarita Vineyard, a cool spot just 14 miles from the ocean. The flavors balance between the perceived sweetness of baked apple and cherimoya and the bitter tannic tension of a grape leaf.",,Ancient Peaks
"This internationally-styled, full-bodied Sicilian Chardonnay opens with oak-driven aromas of toast, butterscotch and vanilla that carry through to the palate alongside flavors of golden apple and lemon zest.",Laùdari,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"An inky-deep color with a dark red rim hints at the concentration. Enticing aromas from the spice rack, milk chocolate and vanilla lead to meltingly rich fruit and cocoa flavors that are deep and focused. At first sip it's almost sweet with ripe black cherry and black currant notes, but the vivid acidity and layer of fine tannins keep it dry and balanced. It will be best after 2020.",Blueline Vineyard,Hourglass
"Red berry, rose, iris, aniseed and forest floor aromas lead the nose on this structured red. The full-bodied palate offers juicy wild cherry, crushed raspberry, coffee, white pepper and cinnamon framed in firm, fine-grained tannins that lend elegance and structure.",Sarmassa,Marchesi di Barolo
"Dark gold in color, this decadent wine is robust in toasted chestnut and hazelnut layers which are rich and powerful on the seamless palate. The oak shows prominently on the nose and palate but finds its balance on the finish, allowing the wine to end with polish and reserve.",Estate Grown Cave Fermented Finch Hollow,Jarvis
"Dark fruit, leather, tobacco and spice aromas lead the way on this elegantly structured red. On the palate, notes of cocoa, vanilla, anise and espresso accent a core of fleshy black cherry, while firm, fine-grained tannins provide support. A licorice note signals the close.",,Josetta Saffirio
"Clear and light in color, this complex vineyard-designate sings in tea and nutmeg spice, allowing for richer, riper flavors of baked cherry. Velvety in texture, it builds to a full-figured finish, echoing that initial savory intrigue of black tea.",Dutton Ranch Widdoes Vineyard,Lucie
"Baked apple and pear laced in caramel come to mind first, evoked from the aromatics of this wine. A richness of honey beckons, too. Golden in color and creamy in texture, it's balanced by streamlined acidity that keeps it elegant and refined, moving slowly toward a lengthy, drawn-out finish.",Don Miguel Vineyard Bonita's Hill Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"This wine is so compelling it's difficult to put the glass down. It smells buttery and lush and offers flavors of ripe pear, vanilla and a bit of caramel. It is full bodied and plush in texture; that rich viscosity carries the ripe but not over-the-top flavors to a lingering finish.",Durell Vineyard,Saxon Brown
"An incredibly dark wine by veteran winemaker Eric Laumann, this rarely tapped varietal offers lush and deep aromas of blackberry pie, black currant syrup, licorice soda and mint-chip ice cream. Velvety, tongue-tingling and extremely lengthy on the palate, it shows almost port-like flavors of milk chocolate, blueberry juice, peppery mint, cherry liqueur-filled chocolate and ripe raspberry-cranberry juice.",,Cambiata
"Fruit-forward and luxurious, this is an estate-grown wine. Savory and soft, it traffics in dried cranberry and cherry besides a taste of truffle and black tea. Fresh and vibrant on the palate, it ends in a flush of caramel.",East Slope,Donum
"Still in its shell, this wine has aromas of cocoa, vanilla, spice and dark cherries, showing a mixture of fruit and barrel. The flavors are dense, concentrated and opulent, revealing multiple layers and a hedonistic styling.",Estate Riverbend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"Underbrush, cooking spices, dark berry and scorched earth aromas waft out of the glass. On the firm, full-bodied palate, licorice, tobacco and clove accent the core of ripe black cherry. Firm, well-integrated tannins give it a structured but polished feel. Drink 2018_2028.",Arione,Gigi Rosso
"The aromas draw you in with notes of kiwi, pineapple and mango. Brown sugar and tropical fruit flavors are intensely sweet and rich, with an unctuous feel.",Estate Bottled Ice Wine,Kiona
"Merlot and Cabernet Franc make up the majority of this wine, along with pinches of Petit Verdot and Malbec. It commands attention with aromas of flowers, herbs, freshly tilled soil, cherry, coffee and bittersweet chocolate. The palate is outrageously textured with a hypnotic mouthfeel and a finish that sails into the distance. Far from a blockbuster style, it's all about elegance and detail.",Uriah,Spring Valley Vineyard
"This is yet another dense, powerful single-vineyard wine from Artadi. The palate is pure silk and very ripe. Saturated blackberry, boysenberry, toast, chocolate and herbal flavors finish plump and smooth. This delicious, unctuous heavyweight from a hot year is made for early consumption; drink through 2019.",La Poza de Ballesteros,Artadi
"This wine smells like moist earth after a rainfall. Aromas of earth, smoke, peat, olive tapenade and tobacco lead to abundant savory flavors with a lightly chalky feel. It captivates the senses.",Impulsivo,Cayuse
"Firmly structured, this opens with aromas of white truffle, forest floor, baking spice and red berry aromas accented with a whiff of sage and rosemary. On the palate, notes of white pepper, grilled herbs and tobacco accent the black cherry core while a backbone of assertive but refined tannins provide the framework.",Rocche di Castelletto,Cascina Chicco
"This is a finely made mix of Chardonnay, Pinot Noir and Pinot Meunier grapes, light golden in color and dripping in marzipan, hazelnuts and baked bread. Complex and layered, it's got a depth of soul around zesty acidity, staying fleshy and full on the tongue.",_toile Brut,Chandon
"This lightly cloudy wine displays aromas of orange marmalade, candied pear and citrus peel. Honeyed dried apple and pear flavors display exquisite balance and length.",Lewis Estate Vineyard Late Harvest,Dunham
"Named after the steep slopes that back the Bourgeois winery, this powerful, concentrated wine shows both wonderful white and yellow fruits and a mineral character that gives a superb tension. Packed with fruit and impressively textured, it can still age. Drink from 2017.",La Côte des Monts Damnés,Henri Bourgeois
"The first vintage to see Aglianico (8%) blended in, this wine brings aromas and flavors of leather, sour cherry, earth and flowers. Seeing only neutral puncheons and oval botti, it's fresh and focused, coating the palate with textured fruit flavors brightened by tart acids and backed by firm tannins. It's both appealing and serious.",,Leonetti Cellar
"This full-bodied red opens with aromas of ripe dark fruit, licorice, grilled porcini mushroom, menthol and a balsamic note. The structured palate offers mature black cherry, red berry, mocha, mint and grilled herbs alongside assertive but refined tannins.",San Giuseppe,Pecchenino
"Aromas of sage, espresso and green, savory herbs are at the fore on this lightly colored blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with the fruit notes in the background. The coffee and cherry flavors are elegant yet rich, with an outrageously long, expressive finish. It's all about subtlety, refinement and detail with plenty of each but needing some time for them all to meld together.",Creative Impulse DuBrul Vineyard,Rasa
"This rare single-vineyard, single-varietal offering of Petit Verdot has brooding aromas of high-toned flowers, fresh herbs, cherry and coffee. It's full bodied but doesn't overwhelm with its brawny, well-integrated tannins, reserved fruit flavors, bright acid and long finish.",Living in the Limelight Dionysus Vineyard,Rasa
"A blend of 40% Grenache, 35% Syrah and 25% Mourvèdre, all aged in neutral oak, this wine impresses with alluring aromas of ripe strawberry, clove, blueberry, coffee and spice. Flavors are rich and palate-coating while displaying balance and finesse, with a finish that lingers.",,Tenet
"Jammy, concentrated aromas of boysenberry, violet petal and oak spice are about as rich and lusty as Rioja gets. This wine from a warm vintage is lush and lusty but less structured than other vintages. Jammy blackberry and blueberry flavors end in a jammy fashion. Drink through 2020.",El Carretil,Artadi
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, this structured wine opens with aromas of plum, dark-skinned berry and a whiff of clove. The smooth, savory palate doles out black cherry, licorice and tobacco alongside firm, polished tannins.",Rosso,Le Macchiole
"Enticing aromas of woodland berry, menthol, baking spices, tobacco and a balsamic note float from the glass. The savory, classically structured palate delivers wild cherry, crushed strawberry, white pepper, clove and licorice alongside a backbone of firm but refined tannins and bright acidity. Drink 2019_2031.",Bussia Dardi Le Rose,Poderi Colla
"A distinctive personality shines through in the almost floral and lightly spicy aromas, the vivid and generous cherry-tart flavors and the ever-so-supple texture of this full-bodied wine. While it has firm acidity and tannins, this is a posh, luxurious beverage in which to indulge.",Nash Mill Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"From the producer's estate vineyard, adjacent to a successful dairy farm it also runs, this tiny offering comes from four specific blocks across the property, and is a seductive, juicy, well-composed wine. Lush and oaky, it conveys a density of forest floor, complemented by raspberry and strawberry, before finishing robustly in spice and mushroom.",Three Sixty Bucher Vineyard,Bucher
"Cigar-box spice, sandalwood, hibiscus, cinnamon, wild strawberries and black olive converge on the nose of this wine by Josh Jensen, who created the appellation single-handedly. A lovely sense of airy and fresh pomegranate-raspberry juice pervades the snappy palate, with just enough anise to keep it interesting.",Reed Vineyard,Calera
"This is as serious as Grüner gets. It's a very rich wine, fully structured, packed with ripe apricot flavors with a touch of lime. The texture is dense, mineral still very young. With concentration and young acidity, it needs to age. Drink from 2017.",Alte Reben Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Rarely does one come across a new-release Argentinean red with this much age (it was bottled in 2008). Aromas of turned earth, sautéed mushroom, tomato and herbs are like a fine spaghetti sauce. In the mouth, this is firm and tannic, with lasting balance. Flavors of coffee, cinnamon, dry raspberry and spiced plum finish with persistence. Drink now through 2019.",Gran Assemblage,Carmelo Patti
"There is just a touch of wood in this rich and concentrated wine. It brings out the smoothness of the Chardonnay in the blend and adds notes of spice. It's a full, ripe that's still elegant and fresh from crisp acidity on the finish. Age this wine, and drink after 2015. Screwcap.",Ortolan Cuvée Prestige,Dürnberg
"This bottling is often Talley's best Pinot each vintage, and so it is in 2011. It's full bodied in style with a dark color hinting at the superripe cherries, raspberries and cola flavors. Yet it never loses Pinot's essential silkiness. Structured and nuanced, it's a natural cellar candidate to drink from 2017_2021.",Rosemary's Vineyard,Talley
"Very mineral in character, this wine is named after a former priest of Dürnstein who renovated the village church. It is certainly ripe, while very textured and chalky in character, with its acidity whirling around the glass. There's great concentration as well, beautifully smoothed out by the spice and crisp apple balance. Screwcap. Artisanal Cellars, Select Wines.",Bergdistel Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"What distinguishes the Stony Block from the winery's other selections is its minerality, but also a fluidity in the wine__s if the rocks were melted into the fruit. The raspberry, pomegranate and cola flavors are classic. This surely is a wine to age. Drink from 2016 and beyond.",Stony Block Don Miguel Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"This is a full, aromatic and rich wine that is packed with ripe tropical and white fruits. It has crispness as well, giving a more mineral and zesty texture. There's a characteristic touch of pepper along with a dry aftertaste that offers a strong contrast. This is a fine wine, full of character and ready to drink now. Screwcap.",Grande Reserve,Forstreiter
"A venture into the deep end of pricing perhaps, but the proof is in the bottle. From vines planted in 1964, this is a rich, full-bodied and creamy-textured wine, with complex notes of smoke, vanilla, plum and roasted meat. Approachable now because of its lushness, it should drink well for at least the next several years.",Warboys Vineyard,Angove
"Because St. Henri is aged exclusively in large, mostly neutral oak vessels, it often requires more time to come around than Shiraz aged in barrel. The 2009 is tight and reticent on the nose, while showing hints of boysenberry, black olive and roasted meat on the palate. Full bodied, rich and firm in structure, with a long, amply textured finish, it needs a few years in the cellar, and should last at least through 2030.",St. Henri,Penfolds
"This wine is still very closed, and not yet showing its rich potential. That doesn't detract from its fine, botrytis texture, core of acidity and dried apricot flavors. It's a wine that needs to come out of its shell, so don't drink before 2018.",,Château la Tour Blanche
"Full in the mouth, this is a soft and juicy wine at the outset. There is a cushioned, plump feel to the wine, with tannins that are firm, but rounded in nature. The wine seems ready to drink, but with its tannic structure, it will also age well. Drink from 2017.",,Château Lagrange
"A fine balance between sweetness, acidity and astringency drives this wine forward. Acidity lifts the palate and adds freshness, and botrytis adds a drying astringency. Pineapples, prunes and apricots all add their fruity notes to this rich wine. Drink from 2018.",,Château Nairac
"This serious estate has made a fine 2011 wine. While deep and ripe with blackberry flavor and acidity, it also has dense structure. It shows both power and style, with notes of wood aging likely to fade. Drink this fine wine from 2017.",,Château Brane-Cantenac
"This is an immediately attractive wine that's fruity and fresh with acidity. It hasn't lost the firm character or structure of this chateau, but boasts fruitiness and a ripe feel. Drink from 2018.",,Château Durfort-Vivens
"This is principally Cabernet, with just small amounts of Merlot and Petit Verdot in the blend. Still remarkably young and tightly-wound, it's showing tart cherries, violets and blueberries, along with bracing acidity and minerality. The finish is both elegant and intense, lingering long after the last sip.",Seven Hills Vineyard Reserve,Tamarack Cellars
"This is a big, spicy wine that has exotic flavors of mangoes and kumquats, as well as a firm texture. It's a serious, concentrated wine with its natural exuberance tamed by a tight texture and the promise of acidity. Don't drink yet, wait until 2015. Screwcap. Artisanal Cellars, Select Wines.",Höhereck Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"A gorgeous wine that has ripe, full perfume and wonderful fruitiness. White currants are touched with spice, intense acidity, and a bright, crisp aftertaste. This is a wine for long-term aging, drink from 2017.",Terrassen Reserve,Loimer
"This is dry and tart with acidity, yet rich in fruit. It's a deliciously drinkable wine now, but capable of improving with extended cellaring. With cherry, pomegranate, cola and sweet oak flavors, it finishes with superb balance and charm. Drink now_2020.",Mas Cavalls Doña Margarita Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"Much like its companion Chardonnay from the same vineyard, this offers tart yellow fruits, a splash of lime and a lick of toasted coconut. What separates the two is this wine's distinctive minerality underpinning the mouthfeel. The wine spent 11 months in 25% new oak.",Seven Springs Vineyard La Source,Evening Land
"This vintage will be the last Resonance bottling under the Sineann label, as the vineyard has been sold to Burgundy's Louis Jadot. This delicious, ripe, detailed wine bursts with mixed red fruits. It's a lovely way to say goodbye, good luck and bon chance with the new owners. The perfectly ripened fruit is accented with toast, sandalwood and mocha as it heads into a deep, concentrated and lingering finish.",Resonance Vineyard,Sineann
"A 60-40 blend, this full-bodied, creamy textured, lush wine captures the sun of McLaren Vale without taking it too far. Vanilla, licorice and plum notes mark the nose, while the plummy flavors pick up mocha shadings before turning a bit fudge-like on the long, velvety finish. Drink now_2018.",Warboys Vineyard,Angove
"This aromatic Riesling is gorgeously floral, but not cloying or perfumy, with enticing hints of honey and candle wax. It's lush and ripe on the palate, with concentrated flavors of tangerine and yellow cherry, along with a streak of lemony acidity that extends the finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Spätlese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Blended from Clare Valley, Mount Benson and Adelaide Plains fruit, this is a full-bodied, richly textured Shiraz that's complex and structured. Tar, black olive, dark chocolate and mint notes mark the nose, while the flavors call to mind mint-chocolate graham crackers with plum jelly before turning meaty and savory on the finish. Drink 2016_2025.",Eminent Selected Harvest,Kingston Estate
"This starts off tarry and tight, but gradually opens up to reveal mint-tinged blueberries. It's medium to full in body and reasonably firm on the palate, but the tannins are silky enough to make it approachable now, imparting a softly dusty touch to the warm, spicy finish.",Blackwell,St Hallett
"After spending 20 months in a mix of French and American oak, this full-bodied Shiraz is imbued with seductive notes of vanilla and baking spices. But there are also plenty of plummy fruit and savory undertones of espresso and roasted meat. It's supple enough to drink now, although it should last through at least 2025.",RSW,Wirra Wirra
"Fresh and ripe on the nose and palate, with apple and yellow-­peach notes, this is rich, almost tropical, in sweetness, but delightfully delicate, with soft tangerine acidity. A streak of minerality cuts through fruit to reveal a long, focused finish. Enjoy its bright, fruity essence now through 2018.",Westhofen Morstein Auslese,Wittmann
"The winery has held this 100% Cabernet back for more than four years to let it mellow, but it's still a burly wine. Hard tannins mark the blackberry, currant and dark chocolate flavors. There's an elegance that persists, however, giving strong indications of ageability. Hold until at least 2016, but it could be still be rocking in 2025.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Conn Creek
"Deep, lush aromas of black fruits, graphite and coconut are welcoming and friendly. The mouthfeel is pure and smooth, with elegance and power. Flavors of cassis, blackberry, hard spices and licorice filter into a long, mellow, classy finish. This is a pushy, full-bodied wine that doesn't throw punches; drink through 2020.",Synthesis,Finca Sophenia
"This outstanding Chardonnay shows the brilliant structural purity of both the cold vintage and the terroir of the far Sonoma Coast. While the wine isn't in the same league as Flowers's spectacular Moon Select Chardonnay, it's not as expensive and still deeply satisfying. It's acid-driven with flavors of Meyer lemon, but balanced with notes of tropical fruit, butter and honey.",,Flowers
"A strongly spicy, rich wine, this has great concentration and an intense, dense texture.There is weight with plenty of ripe tropical fruits to contrast pronounced black pepper and bitter almond character. It's still young, so don't drink before 2015. Screwcap.",Schiefer Reserve,Forstreiter
"Mild scents of cassis, coffee grounds and worn saddle leather mark the nose of this Petit Verdot. The palate is medium bodied and pliant, and though the alcohol only clocks in at12.5%, it feels warm. Faint tannins add a dust-like traction to the flavors of dried strawberry and spiced mocha.",,Ingleside
"This is a base Prosecco sparkling wine with bright citrus and melon aromas followed by fresh sage and crushed mineral. There's a dry, flinty sensation to the finish.",Sylvoz Brut,Le Colture
"Soft, peach fruits abound in this simple and attractive wine. It's fragrant and fruity, with a light texture and fresh acidity at the end.",Domaine Saint-Martin,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"Forward cherry and plum aromas are fresh and lively. A blocky, full-bodied palate offers tasty plum and berry flavors in front of a firm finish with chocolaty notes and length. This is basic but done well.",Edicion Limitada,Maximo
"This is a fresh and easy Moscato d'Asti that opens with floral aromas and honey, backed by peach, dried sage and honeydew melon. Like the name of the grape suggests, there is a musky quality to this Moscato with more honey and dried herb on the close.",,Viberti Giovanni
"There's a ripe, waxy quality to this wine that recalls apricot and honey. The fruit flavors are ripe and soft, with a smooth feel to the palate that is enhanced by the wine's natural acidity and its bright effervescence.",Animae Brut Millesimato,Perlage
"Thin, simple and bright, this easy sparkling Prosecco Superiore opens with citrus, peach and white flower. Although the bottle does not specify the style, it feels like a Brut expression with very little residual sugar.",Bade,Valdellövo
Cantolibero opens with a dark inky appearance and tart aromas of dark forest berry and blackberry. The mouthfeel is simple and compact and the bubbly nature of the wine adds plush softness to the finish.,Cantolibero,Tenuta Pederzana
"This simple Extra Dry Prosecco Superiore opens with peach, nectarine, simple lines and a watery mouthfeel. The sparkler's momentum is achieved mostly by the creaminess of its bubbles.",Extra Dry,Terra Serena
"A simple Pinot Noir, lacking much structure. But it has a delicate mouthfeel and offers pleasant raspberry, cola, brown sugar and toasty oak flavors. Drink now.",Rio Russo,Vino Vargas
"A good, if fairly standard wine, showing all the popular Chardonnay elements. It's dry, crisp and creamy, with fruit and buttered toast flavors.",,Nitty Gritty
"Sparkling wine is all about texture, and the mouthfeel on this Chardonnay-based bubbly lacks refinement. The bubbles are scoury and the finish is rough. Still, it has rich citrus, yeast, honey and pear flavors.",Brut,River Road
"Blended with 25% Grenache, this is an enjoyable wine with notes of peppery spice and plum. It's all about mouthfeel, light fruit flavors and citrusy acidity.",,Season
"Cherry, dark berry and plum aromas are perfectly solid. This feels big and rubbery on the palate, with firm tannins and grip. The flavor profile consists of dark fruit, coffee and mint. A hard finish is the conclusion.",Reserva,Ruca Malen
Juicy dark berry fruit and ripe blackberry open the bouquet of this Frizzante red wine. There's a tangy raw quality to the wine that would pair next to cheesy lasagna.,,Monte delle Vigne
"A light, perfumed wine with soft tannins and bitter cherry fruits. There is an earthy edge here, and while the wine has brisk acidity, there's an easy texture. It's ready to drink.",Le Clé Saint-Pierre,Mommessin
"Sharp scents of saddle leather lead into a tannic, earthy wine that remains stubbornly closed even after some hours.",Flight Club Select,Raptor Ridge
"Pungent with strong aromas of stem and herb, the fruit suggests green banana and other minimally-ripe flavors. The wine is a bit disjointed, with stiff tannins and a green edge to the finish.",Winemaker's Selection,Anne Amie
"Here's a fresh and simple Prosecco with sharp and clean perlage followed by citrus, peach, honey and even a touch of white peppercorn. This is a perfect aperitivo sparkler.",Brut,Bacio della Luna
"Very tropical and aromatic, this is a powerfully rich white. It is tangy with sweet oranges, layered with pineapple and apricot. There is a spicy, peppery character that comes from the alcohol.",Serras de Azeitão Selecção do Enólogo,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A green, grassy quality that recalls lime and garden herb first opens the nose of this bright Soave. The wine is easy and thin with a drying touch of talc powder on the close.",,Corte Adami
This Lambrusco shows an extra touch of sophistication that sets it apart from most of the industrial stuff on the market. Dark berry and raspberries offer a linear and bright mouthfeel.,Vigneto Enrico Cialdini,Cleto Chiarli
"Oily orange and vanilla cookie aromas lead to a juicy, tangy palate with citrusy flavors suggestive of white grapefruit, lime and gooseberry. This finishes lean, tangy, scouring and lasting.",,Coiron
"A lightly perfumed wine, this is soft with warm strawberry flavors. The acidity and texture play a supporting role in this ripe, light-bodied wine.",,Manuel Olivier
"Fresh, bright and aromatic, this easygoing Moscato opens with tones of white flower, jasmine, honey and dried hay. The wine is pleasantly sweet with creamy mousse and foam.",,Gionelli
"The alcohol is refreshingly low on this wine, making it delicate in the mouth. It's also full of lemon, peach and vanilla flavors. Easy to drink with hors d'oeuvres.",Timber Crest Vineyard,Kokomo
"High-pitched, medium-intense notes of toasted wheat, black cherry, maduro and sweaty leather define the nose and palate. This is a medium-bodied wine, and it offers powdery tannins and juicy acids that support the flavors. Cherry and cocoa notes linger on the finish.",,Jefferson Vineyards
"Made with organically-farmed Glera grapes, this sparkling Prosecco Superiore opens with subtle tones of lemon or almond blossom with slightly more sweetness than you usually get with a Brut sparkler.",Canah Brut,Perlage
This is a simple and straightforward expression of Prosecco with tight perlage and medium aromas of white flower and citrus. That subtle but soft sweetness you taste would pair nicely next to vegetable tempura.,Extra Dry,Ornella Molon
"Light notes of peach and dusty mineral open the bouquet of this food-friendly Soave. You could pair the wine with seafood, summer pasta dishes or salad. It ends with notes of white flower and almond blossom.",Famiglia Pasqua,Pasqua
"The fruit used to make this Bordeaux-style blend of 41% Cabernet Sauvignon, 36% Merlot, 23% Cabernet Franc was sourced from the DuBrul, Kiona, Dionysus and Weinbau vineyards. Dense and deeply flavorful, this wine has intense notes of black fruits, brown spices, licorice and coffee.",In Order to Form a More Perfect Union,Rasa
"Soft and velvety, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot releases intense notes of blackberry, cherry, chocolate, spice and leather. It shows plush layers of dark fruit and tangy tobacco that build the palate's momentum.",Sorugo,Aia Vecchia
"A powerful wine that's made from fruit sourced from the southern neighbor of the great Chambertin grand cru, this is rich, deep and complex. A smoky note is followed by black fruits, dark tannins and a sense of richness and structure. It has great weight, and it will need many years of aging.",,Albert Bichot
"A great wine for drinking now, this is just beginning to show the evolution of its primary blackberry, blueberry and currant fruits. Hints of anise, dark chocolate, dried herb, spices and cedar add interest. This is a blend of the classic Bordeaux varieties, but the Cabernet Sauvignon component stands front and center with its firm tannins, depth and concentration.",Reserve Alexandre,Geyser Peak
"Malbec has been a shining star at this winery, but this bottling is the best yet. Estate grown, big and fruity, this wine is generously soaked in barrel flavors of spice and toast, cocoa and Bourbon. Lush and juicy, the fruit more than holds its own, and it's nearly irresistible.",Amparo,_Maurice
"This wine's concentrated tannins mingle with its raspberry, blueberry and rich plum flavors. While it is powerful and structured, it also has a fine sense of elegance, a combination that will allow this wine to age for decades.",,Albert Bichot
"This is toasty, dense and inviting from the first sniff to the last swallow. It's an authoritative, tightly woven and complex wine that offers a core of plum and cassis flavors, annotated by streaks of coffee, licorice and iron. The tannins are textural and gripping. Delicious now, this can also be cellared for a decade.",,Abeja
"A delicate, silky mouthfeel makes this wine feel light and vibrant, yet there's nothing light about the flavors. Notes of wild cherries, cranberries, Dr. Pepper, anise, pine and savory spices explode on the palate, and they lead to a long, dry finish. Give it 5_6 years in the cellar.",East Ridge Estate Vineyard,Hirsch
"Round and soft initially, this rich, intense Chardonnay then shows its firm side. In addition to the ripe yellow-fruit flavors, there is a minerally, tight structure that promises that this wine will age. Keep it for at least five years.",Clos des Mouches Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"It's easy to create ripe, oaky wines, but attaining true complexity is something else. This Chardonnay, which was made from fruit sourced from a highly regarded vineyard in the cool mid-southern part of the Russian River Valley, is elaborate, dry and rich in green apple, mango and orange flavors. The acidity is just about perfect, giving the palate a tart zinginess. Drink this with lobster and crab, and don't forget the buttered bread.",Saralee's Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"Having spent two years in oak barrel, this Merlot has a generous, yet elegant shape, and it delivers intensity and elegance. The bouquet offers tones of black cherry, spice, chocolate and rum cake, with delicate accents of licorice and dried herb. The mouthfeel is smooth and rich.",Girolamo,Castello di Bossi
"This is fresh, tannic and full bodied, and it offers deep flavors of blackberries and cassis. Worth cellaring, this should begin to resolve by 2017.",Clift Vineyard,Tudal
"Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc are blended together to create this plump, superrich wine. There are hints of cured meat, Christmas spice and dark berry fruit. The palate reveals ripe fruit flavors and velvety tannins. Hold this for 7_10 years.",Argentiera,Tenuta Argentiera
"Opulent, smooth and ageable, this Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend is rich in blackberries, currants and milk chocolate, and it exudes a green olive tanginess that increases the pleasure. The tannins are thick but supple. This is a wine that pleases right away, and it changes from sip to sip as it breathes. As excellent as it is now, it will develop bottle complexity for at least 10 more years.",Lexington,Thomas Fogarty
"One of the best-known Puligny premier crus, Folatières has produced a rich, opulent wine as it often does. In 2010, it feels more structured and more minerally than previous vintages. It is ripe and full bodied, and it is well suited to age for 4_5 years or more.",Les Folatières Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This is only the sixth vintage that the Vineyard Select has been produced. Spicy and tightly built, this dense effort is made from Cabernet Sauvignon that was sourced from three Walla Walla vineyards. Notes of fig, cassis, chocolate, coffee and fresh earth are enlivened by a hint of citrus rind. All in all, it's a complex, well-appointed showcase of fabulous flavors.",Vineyard Select,Walla Walla Vintners
"Wet earth and leaf notes are the overriding aromas at this stage. Yet it is also very fruity, with a jammy quality that balances the firm tannins. It hints at the richness and style of Chambolle, but it shows the powerful structure of neighboring Morey-Saint-Denis. This needs several years of aging.",La Combe d'Orveau Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"The vines from this vineyard help to create big, concentrated wines that are tannic and dense. It is dark and firm, and the damson skin flavor adds to the sense of power. Age this for 6_8 years.",En la rue de Vergy,Domaine Bruno Clair
"The fruit used to make this wine was sourced from low-yielding vines, some of which are 100 years old. Concentrated, structured and dense, this offers a blackberry flavor that is allied to the exquisite acidity. Age this for eight years or more.",La Dominode Premier Cru,Domaine Bruno Clair
"Along with the natural power of Corton-Charlemagne, this wine shows fragrant yellow-fruit and pineapple flavors, rich texture and a steely edge. The taut character and the orange zest and wood-derived flavors lend this selection crispness and aging potential. Keep it for at least seven years.",,Domaine Champy
"This dry, lush wine has deep flavors and dramatic layers of blackberry and cherry tart flavors that have a liqueur-like density and sweetness, accented by a toasty, buttery oak note. The tannins are pure, thick and refined. This needs time for all of its parts to come together, so hold it until 2015, but it could last for a decade or more.",Diamond Mountain Vineyard MF Claret,Constant
"A Meritage blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon, 15% Merlot, 10% Cabernet Franc, 4% Malbec and 1% Petit Verdot, this is deep, rich and chewy, without having excessive alcohol. The concentrated flavor of cassis is married to layers of clean earth, graphite and coffee grounds. The tannins are slightly grainy, fully ripe and wreathed in a smoke note, and the length is superb.",Dionysus,Arbor Crest
"Perbruno opens with spicy notes of black pepper, clove and Christmas spice that make a bold and delicious first impression. After a few minutes, it delivers notes of black fruit, cherry, pipe tobacco and leather. Oak shadings give the wine a dense and rich finish.",Perbruno,I Giusti e Zanza
"Unusual for New Zealand Pinot Noir, this full-bodied bottling is structured firmly enough to warrant 2_3 years of cellaring. Earthy, savory notes that include roasted meat and coffee intertwine with black cherry and beetroot, while the tannins turn dusty on the finish.",Calvert,Felton Road
"This vintage of Trésor is the winery's best in years. A Bordeaux-style blend that's based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this is softly tannic and rich, and it offers layers of cherry pie, mocha and smoky cedar. Best to enjoy now for its sheer drinkability.",Trésor,Ferrari-Carano
"This pure expression of Cabernet Franc opens with beautiful aromas of black fruit and spice, followed by bright accents of eucalyptus and dried ginger. The bold fruit component will definitely appeal to those who appreciate a generous and full style of wine. Drink after 2016.",Foglio 38,Fornacelle
"You can smell and taste the damp, cool, forest countryside of the Russian River Valley in this wine. Flavors of earth, mushroom, decaying tree bark and pine needle are all present, and the notes of cherry, cola and pomegranate are intense. It's fairly tannic, with a crisp edge of acidity. Drink now_2015.",Great Oak Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"An 85-15 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this shows incredible intensity and gorgeous aromas of cherry, blackberry, oak-driven spice, chocolate and coffee. The round, velvety texture makes the palate feel supersupple and long, and the bright berry flavors demonstrate impressive endurance. Drink after 2015.",Maronea,Casa di Terra
"Toasty, fruity and opulent, this wine also reveals a tight edge of grapefruit-like acidity and some steeliness. Pineapple and apricot flavors are finished with a touch of wood-derived vanilla. It's a wine for aging.",Domaine du Pavillon Les Charmes Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"This a Bordeaux-style blend of 64% Cabernet Sauvignon, 27% Petit Verdot and 9% Cabernet Franc that's made from estate-grown fruit. Perhaps it's the altitude of the vineyard (1,400 feet) that helps to keep the alcohol from overwhelming the palate. Nothing seems overwrought in this wine, and the berry flavors show peach and cherry hints, with length to match the concentration.",Night Owl,_Maurice
"This big and brooding wine offers intense aromas of black fruits, raisins, vanilla and toast. The palate presents ripe blackberry, white pepper, prune and licorice flavors. Pair it with seasoned cheeses or mushroom risotto.",Le Bessole,Accordini Igino
"A great, all-purpose white blend, this is half Pinot gris, a third Viognier and the rest, a mix of Sémillon and Marsanne. Piercing flavors of pineapple, grapefruit and lemon peel shoot through the firm mid-palate. The skin flavors add a pleasantly light frame of bitter citrus around the finish.",Flygirl,Airfield Estates
"Coming from three different blocks of the winery's estate vineyard, it brings notes of cherry cola, peppery spices and medicine cabinet. The fruit flavors are quite ripe and lush, with the use of one year-old French oak putting the fruit front and center.",Jet Black Destiny Ridge Vineyard,Alexandria Nicole
"This wine does a good job of transforming ripe Pinot grapes, with all their raspberry and cherry fruit, into a rosé that's ethereal and delicate. The wine is dry and the alcohol level is moderate, making it delicate and crisp in the mouth.",Rosé of,Cartograph
"This is a solid wine, full-bodied and dry, and while it's a little rustic on its own, barbecue will elevate it. Blended from the two Cabernets, Sauvignon and Franc, as well as 10% Syrah, its blackberry and cherry fruit is complexed with smoked meat and tamari, set off with crisp acidity. Drink now_2015.",Bouchet,Brander
"Lots of rich, savory Pinot flavors in this silky wine. It's kind of generic, and not showing much sense of terroir, but it is a properly grown coastal wine whose brisk acidity highlights cola, pomegranate and persimmon flavors. Drink up.",,MacMurray Ranch
"A pert, savory Sauvignon Blanc, this is brisk with acidity. A tart gooseberry touch shines against a backdrop of pink grapefruits, peaches and limes. A bit of ripeness on the finish will pair well with Vietnamese fare.",,Malk
"A pleasure to taste a Cabernet this rich in fruit, yet one that finishes so dry. It's delicious in blackberries, currants and mocha, wrapped into sweetly smooth tannins. It's a little high in alcohol and soft in acidity. Drink now.",Reserve,Justin
"Pure, sappy wine juice is the impression this wine leaves. Although it's a 2010, it is so fresh and tangy it might have come straight from the tank. Pomegranate and raspberry are the fruit highlights, with hints of pepper and herb.",Cabernet Frank,J Bell Cellars
"Shows green mint and cherry jam flavors, together with zippy acidity, suggesting the chilly vintage. The wine is delicate and light in the mouth, and quite nice to drink now. Perfect with tuna tartare.",Estate Grown,J Vineyards & Winery
"The core aromas of blackberry and dark cherry are detailed with touches of catnip, black tea and mocha. Medium in body, this wine has bright acidity and fine, chalky tannins that add grip to the succulent dark-berry flavor. The elegant 12.6% alcohol makes this wine extra food friendly.",,Zephaniah
"A delicate, crisp, very pure wine. It has perfumes of white flowers, which continue with the addition of ripe pear and lime. Crisp at the end, for drinking now, but also keep until 2017.",Tradition,Kuentz-Bas
"This is the winery's Left-Bank-Bordeaux-style blend, three quarters Cabernet Sauvignon. It has a pleasing mix of red and black fruits, licorice, toast and smoke, and spent two and a half years in French oak, 60% new. The wine is quite tasty and drinking well, though the blend lacks focus.",The Main Event,Scarborough
"The blend includes Grenache and Syrah, suggesting a wine that is part Ribera del Duero, part Priorat. Firm and dark, with black fruits and a strong streak of licorice, with some lighter highlights of blueberry and coffee.",,Ott & Murphy
"Full-bodied wine with ripe pear and red apple flavors, laced with delicate acidity. It's an elegant wine, a fine balance with a more mineral, tight texture as a counterpoint. Drink from 2014.",Château de Chamirey,Domaines Devillard
"Tight acidity with a strong minerality, apple and apricot flavors just touched by vanilla. This is fruity, while also textured and structured. Worth aging, so drink from 2015.",Broc de Biques,Damien et Romain Bouchard
"A rich wine, full of black fruits, ripe tannins and juicy acidity. It's powerful and structured, showing a mineral texture, bold acidity and ample fruitiness.",Domaine de la Croix Rouge,Signé Vigneron
"This opens with funky but not unpleasant aromas that soon burn off to reveal earthy notes and mature black fruit. The palate shows a very ripe__lmost overripe__lackberry flavor, with mushroom and tobacco leaf accents. While the ripe fruit still has immediate appeal, this is getting tired, so drink soon.",,Trabucchi d'Illasi
"Pedro Vargas has made a nice Merlot in this strongly herbal, plum and cassis concoction inviting in its layers of oak and tobacco. Soft, it finishes lean and is all in all integrated and well-made.",Miserere,Vino Vargas
"Exceptionally fruity in raspberries and cherries, this Pinot shows finely-ground tannins that give it a distinguished texture. It's so forward in flavor that it may not be an ager, so drink up over the next three years.",Gap's Crown,Walt
"Fruity and dark, this is an excellent chugging wine. It's substantial without being tiring; the fruit is lively and has a somewhat earthy, wild edge to it. Immediately tasty, this is one to enjoy in its youth.",Wilderness,Sparkman
"Tightly wound and dry, this is an elegant, fruity Pinot marked by tart flavors of cranberries and pomegranates and relieved by richer notes of cherry pie and sweet oak. Turns sharp on the finish, with a cut of acidity. Drink up.",,Reata
"With the pale color and flavor of a peach just turning orange-pink and a delicate mouthfeel, this is a great example of blush bubbly made from Pinot Noir and Chardonnay. It shows a great deal of class for the price.",Mirabelle Brut Rosé,Schramsberg
The American oak aging (80%) plays a significant role here but not in a bad way. There are notes of toast and Mounds bar with ripe flavors and a cranberry-filled finish.,,Roza Ridge
"Made from Friulano, Pinot Grigio, Sauvignon, Malvasia and Ribolla Gialla, this blend represents the major white varieties in Friuli. It offers aromas of Spanish broom and lemon drop, with apricot and mineral flavors that finish long and clean.",Blanc des Rosis,Mario Schiopetto
"This young, stainless steel-fermented Chardonnay has a beery hoppiness to the aromas, leading into a tart, juicy and crisp palate of lime and grapefruit. The acids taste of wet stone, and that vivid minerality brings dimension and lift to the finish.",Unoaked,Airfield Estates
"This is a refined wine, with a layered fragrance of black cherry, raspberry, black pepper and bell pepper. The palate reveals ripe blackberry, plum and baking-spice flavors that are supported by refreshing acidity. Enjoy now or hold for a couple more years.",,Albino Armani
"Aged 20 months in French and American oak (40% new), it has light aromas of high toned dried herbs, black currant and olive. It's airy in feel with the tannins providing some gruffness to an otherwise soft, silky wine.",,Alder Ridge
"This offers aromas of raisin, mature black fruit and spice. The palate is very lush and ripe, with plum and black cherry flavors layered with oak, chocolate, vanilla and espresso accents. It might not have much personality or complexity, but the flavors are defined and alluring.",,Ca' Rugate
"This is a dry Gewurz that's delightful to drink now. The lychee, Asian pear and citrus flavors feel elegant and refined. Chinese, Thai, Vietnamese and Burmese fare are all natural companions.",Floodgate Vineyard,Cartograph
"This dense and dark wine offers spice and toast flavors. It has a big, generous feel, leaving room both for the dry, still-young tannins and for aromatic blackberry fruits. It does need to age, so drink from 2017.",Tradition,Château Eugénie
"Winemaker Nick Goldschmidt does wonders with this consistent vineyard source, coaxing out mocha-chocolate, black cherry and blackberry, never overpowering an earthy back note of tobacco. Medium-bodied and soft, it finishes in a swirl of smoke and is juicy and enjoyable now.",Lone Tree Vineyard,Forefathers
"The 91-acre Grézels vineyard surrounds a 12th-century castle. This revived historic vineyard has produced a well-structured wine that is rich, despite its modest alcohol. It is dense with tannins and black fruits that are developing into a smoother texture. The wine needs to age further, so drink from 2017.",Château de Grézels Prestige,Château Saint-Didier-Parnac
"This is a beautifully balanced, medium-bodied wine that's not too deep in color. It smells like ripe blackberries and has a whiff of wood smoke in the bright berry flavors. In the blend, Zinfandel is supplemented with Syrah, Petite Sirah and Carignane.",Coro Mendocino,Clos du Bois
"Cabernet Sauvignon is blessed with 9% Merlot, coming together in a seamlessly rich wine intense in dark chocolate, coconut and vanilla. Soft, the tannins are integrated and the juiciness of the fruit concentrated, finishing with more of that rich taste of chocolate.",Michael's Cuvée,Cornerstone
"Black as night in the glass, this wine shows black cherries, lava rocks and espresso beans on the dense nose. It's thick and chewy once sipped, with zesty acidity that sizzles across the palate, showing blackberry and coffee flavors. It's all power, with very little finesse. Sales of the wine benefit multiple sclerosis research.",,Counter Punch
"Made in a relatively restrained style, this is a dark, juicy and smoky wine from Dry Creek and Alexander Valley area vineyard sites. Lengthy and smooth, it takes a decidedly medium-bodied route, with traces of leather pouch on the nose and a soft layering of milk chocolate on the finish.",,Decoy
"This wine offers aromas of raspberry and toffee. There is a nice interplay of fruit, floral, and minty flavors, notably raspberry, cherry, toffee, rose petal and eucalyptus. Mildly gripping tannins make themselves evident, and fruit flavors remain prominent through the smooth finish.",Petit Castel,Domaine du Castel
"Bramble and dried herbs, pressed apple and peach notes blend elements of savory and sweet in this complex Spätlese. Shimmering lemon-lime acidity refreshes the midpalate, leaving lingering tones of finely crushed mineral.",Bernkasteler alte Badstube am Doctorberg Spätlese,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"While racy and spry, this delicately framed wine packs a punch of honeyed peach and nectarine flavors. It's effusively fresh, floral and fruity, yet accentuated by a crystalline sheen of minerality. Drink now.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"A hint of bramble wafts amidst crisp Asian pear and green apple notes on this invigorating spry Spätlese. Searing lemon-lime acidity is softened by a plump kiss of honeyed apricot on the midpalate. It's elegant, yet accessible, and drinks well now.",Bernkasteler Badstube Spätlese,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"While dry in style and crisply balanced, plump white peaches and apricots shine brightly in this silky Pinot Blanc. It's rich and round with a slightly clingy mouthfeel but not at all cloying or dense. Enjoy now through 2020.",Wachenheim Trocken,Fitz-Ritter
"A bit tight and dainty on the nose, with reserved apple custard and white-flower aromas, this top-level bottling shows lots of nerve and verve once sipped. It offers salt, lime juice and honeysuckle on the palate, with lots of tension that lasts long after the bottle has been opened. It's a well-structured white.",Limited Selection,Gainey
"The natural richness of a Pouilly-Fumé is revealed well here. Plenty of mineral, herbaceous flavors contrast with the ripe yellow and pear fruit flavors. It is generous and full in the mouth, still young and needing to age. Drink from 2017.",En Travertin,Henri Bourgeois
"This bottling offers plum and plump blackberry on the nose along with milk chocolate, leather and cedar. It's quite tight and tannic on the palate at first, but all the expected and delicious components are in place: tart blueberry, tobacco, coffee and hints of licorice and chocolate that will emerge emerge more with time.",,Jamie Slone Wines
"This is a wine that reveals the younger side of Moscatel in Setúbal. It shows honey, spice and perfumed fruitiness that contrast with the richness of the texture and its fresh peach and apricot flavors. Drink now for immediate enjoyment.",Alambre,José Maria da Fonseca
"This opens with aromas of mature dark fruit, toast and a slight whiff of cellar floor. The palate is still tight and rather closed, but offers fleshy black cherry, toasted oak, clove and mocha alongside polished tannins. It's fast approaching its ideal drinking window so enjoy sooner rather than later.",Sorano,Le Cecche
"This offers aromas of violet, rose, Marasca cherry and a whiff of cake spice that carry over to the warm palate along with a whiff of toast. Tightly packed tannins give it a firm finish.",Bergeisa,Le Strette
"Engaging aromas of fresh rose, iris, perfumed berry and hint of menthol meld together in the glass. On the taut palate, notes of white pepper, clove and anise add some depth to the sour cherry core. Assertive tannins and nervous acidity offer focused support while a hint of juicy raspberry backs up the finish. Drink 2018_2026.",Pallaretta,Le Strette
"While honey and white peach flavors ring pure and sweet, there's a slatey, mineral tone that penetrates deeply in this off-dry Kabinett. It's nervy and brisk, finishing long with zesty lime pith bitterness.",Studert Prüm Maximinhof Wehlener Sonnenuhr Kabinett,Leonard Kreusch
"Full in the mouth, this rich wine is dominated by yellow fruits and ripe apricots lifted by a touch of toast. Great acidity conveys a fresh and tangy character. The wine is still developing as the full fruitiness comes forward. Drink from 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Louis Max
"The nose is initially rather closed but eventually reveals baked earth, leather, game and ripe black fruit. The taut, tense palate offers dried black cherry, toasted oak, mocha and vanilla alongside grainy tannins.",Marenca,Luigi Pira
"Fragrant and bright, this offers aromas of rose, iris, perfumed berry and a balsamic note. The palate is still rather closed, offering raw red cherry, star anise and chopped sage alongside tightly knit tannins and brisk acidity. It still needs time to come together. Drink 2018_2024.",Gattera,Mauro Veglio
"From vines planted in 1958 in an appellation that straddles both Sonoma and Mendocino counties, this is an intriguing, interesting wine, mostly varietal, with 8% each of Mourvèdre and Syrah. Floral, it veers into leather and game, with a juicy backbone of red cherry and berry and earthy, textured tannins.",Rebotarro Vineyard Old Vine,Mounts
"A velvety, sinewy blend of 40% Syrah, 40% Grenache and 20% Mourvèdre from estate-grown and nearby vineyards, this wine offers a lot to like, from textured tannins to succulent blueberry and plum. Intense and floral, it finishes with an explosion of white pepper.",Verah,Mounts
"Rose, red berry, mint and anise aromas unfold in the glass. The firm palate offers wild cherry, crushed raspberry, clove, anisette and a mocha note framed in bracing tannins and fresh acidity. Drink 2020_2031.",,Oddero
"Brioche and vanilla-cherry are the stars in this full-bodied yet savory, herbal wine sourced mostly from the Oak Knoll District. Complex in flavor, it spikes in clove and cinnamon, finishing with a taste of gunpowder and tobacco.",,Padis
"This offers aromas of toast, espresso, scorched earth, red berry, clove and a whiff of leather. The lean, tense palate offers dried cherry, grilled herb, anise, coffee and tobacco but not much fruit richness. Tightly wound, bracing tannins and nervous acidity provide the framework.",Cannubi,Poderi Luigi Einaudi
"From a fourth-generation farming family, this wine is sourced from the Niebaum-Tonella and Morisoli-Borges vineyards along the Rutherford Bench. It opens with a bouquet of sweetly ripened mango, peach and pear, which continue on the palate. Fierce acidity and a drop of anise form the backdrop of the wine, which finishes somewhat tropical.",,S.R. Tonella
"Wild berries, from elderberry to salmonberry to mountain strawberries, are in play in this wine. The underpinning scents suggest earth and wet cement, while in the finish a strong flavor of breakfast tea lingers. This is an interesting addition to the Sineann lineup.",Russell-Grooters Vineyard,Sineann
"This wine has a pale orange color, apricot aromas, and jazzy peach and citrus flavors that are lively and fresh. It's nearly dry (1.5% dosage), and done in a sophisticated style, with fine-textured bubbles and a clean finish.",Blanc de Noirs,Korbel
"Hailing from the coolest section of Colchagua's coastline, this is almost neutral on the nose except for some citrus and sweaty notes. The palate is full, chunky and noticeably more creamy than past vintages. Grapefruit, passion fruit and briny flavors finish full and citrusy. Drink now.",Costa,Koyle
"Ripe green pear and a leafy, savory edge of watercress with a phenolic dimension on the mouthfeel create a rich and concentrated wine. The rounded palate demands food.",Kremser Tor Alte Reben Reserve,Salomon-Undhof
"Meaty, earthy aromas of mixed berry fruits show a fair amount of wood. The palate is ripe and blocky, with black-fruit flavors, primarily blackberry and plum, accented by a noticeable herbal element. Toasty and spicy on the finish, this is a commendable value-priced Carmenère.",Reserva,Santa Carolina
"Violet, scorched soil, spice and mature berry aromas lead the nose. The medium-bodied, elegant palate delivers mature black cherry, crushed raspberry, freshly ground clove and black pepper. Firm but fine-grained tannins provide support.",Vigna del Melograno,Santa Lucia
"This 100% varietal aged 22 months in French oak (22% new) needs time to open up. Once it does, it brings notes of dried herbs, dark coffee, cherry, plum and pencil eraser. It's elegant in style while showing good concentration to the chocolate and cherry flavors, supported by lightly chalky tannins.",Sagemoor Vineyards,Tempus Cellars
"This robust wine opens with aromas of spiced plum, clove and a balsamic note. The spicy palate offers prune, dried blackberry, red currant and ground pepper alongside hearty tannins. A marked licorice note signals the close.",Ghenos,Torrevento
"Floral lavender sets the mood on the entry into this wine, followed by soft layers of red cherry and herb. The big oak imprint in this wine gives it weight, concentration and a bittersweet tone, especially on the finish.",Semper Gold Ridge Vineyard,Tuck Beckstoffer
"A sleek, elegant expression of Negroamaro, this opens with aromas of perfumed berry and exotic spice. The bright, juicy palate doles out ripe red cherry, crushed raspberry, clove and white pepper alongside a backbone of polished tannins and fresh acidity.",,Ognissole
"This vibrant, delicious rosato delivers fruity aromas of woodland berry and cooking spice. On the spicy palate, notes of white pepper and clove accent a juicy core of crushed raspberry. Crisp acidity gives it a clean, lingering finish.",Arcangelo Negroamaro,Palam_
"Easy-drinking and intensely structured, this is marked by streaks of red raspberry fruit that also reveal cedar and herb. Slightly floral on the nose, the wine has a softness despite its size.",Wolff Vineyard,Piña
"This white blend is subtle, not overtly fruity, but has a complexity in the aroma that leads to an intriguing white peach and almond flavor, a rich mouthfeel and lingering finish. It's made from 62% Viognier, plus Muscat Canelli, Marsanne and Roussanne.",White Oleander,Naggiar
"Despite freshness and slenderness, there is something sumptuous about this red that recalls dark red velvet. The palate is crunchy, fresh, full-fruited and made for lighter fare: charcuterie as much as more delicate meat dishes.",Edles Tal,Netzl
"From the vineyard considered the first Pinot Noir planting on the Central Coast, this wine conveys aromas of cranberry popovers sprinkled with cinnamon. The palate delivers a bit of salinity with more cranberry fruit as well as graphite, with a sour, grippy finish.",HMR Estate Vineyard,Adelaida
"Spicy, and medium bodied, this has a smoky, spicy nose that recalls charred earth, graphite, black currant and cedar. The smoky quality carries to the palate, along with mature blackberry, allspice, licorice and clove. Firm but fine-grained tannins and fresh acidity provide an uplifting framework.",,Alberto Longo
"Made with organically grown grapes, this bright wine unfolds with mouthwatering aromas of bright red berry, blue flower and cooking spice. The vibrant palate doles out crunchy sour cherry, crushed rasberry and ground black pepper, with firm but fine-grained tannins.",Poderi d'Agostino Serra al Trono,Botromagno
"A very light, almost rustic red that calls for hearty meals. A sonorous note of vanilla-oak amid the cherryish red fruit accompanies the streamlined acidity from start to finish.",Reserve,Bründlmayer
"Aromas of floral rose waft from this well-composed wine, brimming in just-ripe blackberry, strawberry and cherry. An herbal accent marks the finish.",Kaufman Sunnyslope Vineyard,WillowBrook Cellars
"This is a rare, single-vineyard, 100% varietal wine from Red Mountain where Bordeaux varieties reign. It brings appealing accents of tart cherries and assorted barrel spices, including clove and vanilla. Flavors are medium bodied with a pleasing blast of tart acidity. Vanilla flavors speckle the finish.",Red Heaven Vineyard,Wind Rose
"Nicely balanced and smooth, this starts with red cherry and raspberry aromas with hints of spice. It continues to fresh, tangy fruit flavors with a lively, bright texture. A nice touch of tannin firms up the finish.",Dowser's Cuvee,Witching Stick
"This opens with aromas of blackberry, cassis and leather. The palate is full and fairly lush, with firm, rubbery tannins. Ripe, leathery blackberry and chocolate flavors finish long and with modest tannin-driven clamp.",Reserva,Calcu
"Complex fruit, herb and subtle oak aromas lead to an appetizingly dry feel and mellow, woodsy, autumnal flavors. It's medium bodied, smooth-textured and just savory enough to complement the tasty fruit flavors.",,Bogle
"Mellow balsamic-like aromas of herbal berry fruits, tobacco and vanilla lead to a juicy, easy-flowing palate. Flavors of licorice and anise accent blackberry and currant, with tobacco and vanilla notes providing support. A lightly spiced finish is fresh and medium in length.",Gran Reserva,Rios de Chile
"Ripe aromas, complex flavors and rich tannins add up to a bold and full-bodied wine. It smells like dried plums, tastes almost like blackberry syrup (but not sweet) and has intriguing black pepper and floral accents. Very deep in color, it is tannic but smooth. The generous fruit lingers on the finish.",,Rosa d'Oro
"Richly aromatic, this offers notes of honeysuckle, nectarine and vanilla (18% new oak). It's full bodied with abundant stone fruit flavors and light oak accents with a touch of bitterness on the finish.",Love-Struck,Bergevin Lane
"Brown-leaning aromas of decomposing wood and sour cranberry mix with black pepper and kalamata olives on this appellation blend. The mouthfeel is quite full, soft and lush, with cherries and tomatoes, but there is also tartness and Indian spice as well.",,Big Basin
"This wine offers notes of woodspice, butterscotch, coffee and blackberry. The fruit flavors are lighter in style with mouthwatering acids and firm, grippy tannins that need some time or perhaps a big, juicy steak to tame them.",Reserve,Henry Earl
"This co-mingling holds 80% Cabernet Sauvignon and 20% Petit Verdot. Juicy blackberry and cassis make up the wine's fruit component, accompanied by solid structure and tannins, and an unusual sprinkling of coconut macaroon.",Carol's Vineyard,J. Lohr
"This fortified dessert red, its grape varietal makeup unknown, rests at about 6.6% residual sugar. Its profile suggests Zinfandel, dark black in color with plummy, blackberry fruit, a smoky finish and hint of black pepper.",Los Niños Perdidos,J. Rickards
"Jammy aromas of blueberry and cassis also smell a bit like wet dog. The palate is wide in feel, with loamy, baked flavors of blackberry, pepper and baking spices. Toasty notes accent spice flavors on a hot, heavy-feeling finish that is reflective of a warm year. Drink now through 2018.",Le Dix de Los Vascos,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"With green plum and crisp citrus, this is a deliciously fruity wine. A touch of spice accompanies attractive acidity and a fragrant, perfumed aftertaste. Drink from early 2016. This family estate of oenologue, consultant and Bordeaux university wine professor Denis Dubourdieu produces white wines from 87% Sauvignon Blanc and 13% Sémillon vineyards. He is in the process of abandoning chemicals in the vineyards.",,Château Reynon
"Produced by the same team as Château Cambon la Pelouse, this wine is already drinkable. With attractive black currant fruits and acidity, it is gently tannic with a dry core. The aftertaste is juicy and full of fruit.",,Château Trois Moulins
"Attractively juicy fruit is fresh and full of black currant flavors. This wine still has firm tannins although they are beginning to fill out with fresh fruitiness and smoky acidity. It should still age, so drink from 2018.",,Château Vieux Ligat
"This totally refreshing wine is crisp, lively and packed with acidity as well as red currant fruits. It's a delicious wine and a fine apéritif from the Doublet family in Entre-deux-Mers.",,Château Vignol
"Attractively pink in color, this has a touch of caramel as well as ripe strawberry fruit flavors. It has a rich side, but is bright and fruity with lively acidity at the end. It will be great as an apéritif.",,Château Vircoulon
"This opens with aromas of baked plum, violet, coconut and espresso. The palate offers fleshy black cherry, vanilla, toasted oak, anise and a confectionary note alongside assertive tannins that leave a rather astringent finish.",,Candialle
"This opens with aromas of underbrush, tilled soil, grilled porcini, espresso and ripe black berry. The palate offers dried black cherry, roasted coffee bean and coconut alongside drying, astringent tannins and soft acidity. Drink through 2015.",,Castelvecchio
"An attractive orange-pink wine, this offers ripe red berry and currant fruits. It is full in the mouth with a touch of tannin and bitterness from the recent bottling. It is tight at the end, crisp and needing some bottle age. Drink after 2015.",Brut Rosé,Charles Ellner
"Tropical fruit, melon and apple aromas are lightly briny and solid. The palate on this everyday white is lively and fresh, with jumpy acidity. Flavors of nectarine, mango, apple and lime stay fruity and clean across the finish.",,Dominios de Castilla
"Crisp green apple and lime zest aromas form the entry of this unidentified blend, which tends toward richer, creamier layers of vanilla in flavor and texture. The finish is both full-figured and floral.",Proprietary,Eponymous
"This blend of 85% Sangiovese, 10% Can aiolo and 5% other red grapes opens with aromas of ripe dark-skinned fruit, crushed blue flowers and a whiff of clove. The easygoing palate offers dried black cherry, espresso and a hint of anise alongside dusty tannins.",,Fattoria di Grignano
"Rich in plum, black cherry and blackberry, this wine is subtle in cinnamon and dried herb, with additional embellishments of leather and earth. Soft and subdued, it's approachable and versatile.",Reserve,Frei Brothers
"This medium-bodied wine smells a bit like a bouquet of pineapple, sage and lemony thyme. On the palate, the wine is restrained and citrusy, with a clean, refreshing finish.",,Frenzy
"Cinnamon and clove adorn a medium-sized body that's soft and relatively silky, with ample plum and black cherry. More fruity than savory, the wine is enjoyable now, with a mid-length finish.",Carneros Estate,Peter Cellars
"Aromas of stalky blackberry and earthy, mulched leaves are a bit strained. This feels tight and narrow, with saucy black plum, black cherry and raspberry flavors. This shows modest depth but is overall appealing.",Torrepingón Selección,Pingón
"All five Bordeaux varieties are represented in this wine that leads with light aromas of raspberry, cola and medicine cabinet. The blue fruit flavors are quite sweet, with chalky tannins providing support.",The Reveler,Revelry
"Made with organic grapes, this charming young red has a delightful fragrance of blue flowers and woodland berries. The zesty palate doles out crunchy red berry and a hint of white pepper accompanied by lively acidity.",,Salcheto
"Leather, dried cherries, plums, dark chocolate and sagebrush aromas are woven into a decent if not entirely lively nose. Lots of chopped fresh and dried herbs arise once sipped, along with gravel, black fruit and sticky tannins.",Estate,Sculpterra
"This full-bodied red opens with aromas of ripe plum, vanilla, coconut and a whiff of exotic spice. The palate delivers oak extract, anise, dried blackberry and oak-driven spice alongside rather raspy tannins that leave an astringent finish.",Riserva,Setriolo
"A very neutral nose leads to a textured palate on a slender body with crisp, fresh acidity and pleasing notes of lemon. This is neutral, fresh and versatile. Drink soon while fresh.",Steirische Klassik,Tement
"Generous flavors with a full body add up to a very likable, mouthfilling wine that will love a juicy steak or grilled lamb chop. Almost-sweet spices like vanilla and nutmeg come out in the aroma and persist through the fresh black cherry flavors and finish.",Cherokee Lane,Tortoise Creek
"Aromas of dark berry, toast and a whiff of brown spice lead the nose of this easygoing blend of Sangiovese and 5% Merlot. The bright, fresh palate offers juicy black cherry, clove and a hint of ground pepper alongside sleek tannins.",,Viticcio
"Intensely fruity, this has great acidity, fresh red fruits and delicious orange-zest tang. Pale in color, it is poised and elegant, leaving a crisp, refreshing aftertaste.",Les Folies par Marquis de Chasse,Ginestet
"Aromas of woodspice, char, pickling spices and herbs are out in front of red and black fruit. The flavors are light and appealing, but ultimately the oak provides distraction.",Estate Grown,Gordon Estate
"Moderately aromatic for the variety, this wine shows aromas of flowers, pear and mandarin orange. It drinks medium sweet with lightly spritzy flavors that need a bit more acid to hold them all together.",Bacchus Vineyard,Januik
"Aromas of blackberry jam, dried fruit and woodspice lead to full-bodied black fruit and vanilla flavors. Despite its youth, this wine seems advanced. Drink now.",Reserve Artz Vineyard,Kennedy Shah
"Oaky on the nose, this is a lean, crisp wine on the palate, straightforward and balanced in its combination of green apple, pear and Meyer lemon characteristics. Medium bodied, it'll work wonders with midweek meals.",,Kenwood
"The sourcing for this wine has shifted from Martinborough to Marlborough, but the wine is still well made. It's pale in color, with aromas of strawberry and tomato leaf, and light in weight. The flavors are crisp, clean and inviting, albeit with some herbal overtones. Drink it over the next year or two.",,Lagoon Hill
"Aromas of wet stone, citrus and honeysuckle are light and elusive while the palate brings a full, rounded feel that trails toward the finish. There's enjoyment to be had but it's more about texture and feel than fruit flavor.",,Lauren Ashton Cellars
"This salmon pink wine is crisp and fresh on the palate, with some bitterness in the background. Acidity and red currant fruits dominate, suggesting the wine could do with more time in bottle. Drink after 2015.",Rosé Brut Premier Cru,Lombard et Cie
"This is a light, fruity, fresh and clean wine. With lemon and crisp apple flavors, it is bright, simple, attractive and ready to drink.",Cabriz Colheita Seleccionada Branco,Dão Sul
"This is a very fresh, very herbaceous wine. It's crisp with its pink grapefruit and lively acidity. Good with fish, but just as good as an apéritif.",,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Oaky flavors of caramel, honey and butterscotch dominate. It's dry and crisp in acidity, with suggestions of limes and mangoes.",Reserve,Balverne
"The wine has a stalky character, with bitter cherry fruits and light, lean acidity. Very textured, its tannins give a dry feeling to the finish. Drink from 2014.",Vieilles Vignes,Roche de Bellene
"This Chard did not go through malolactic fermentation, allowing the acidity to stand up to what otherwise would be an overripe wine. It's strong in tropical fruits, peaches, brown sugar, vanilla bean and buttered toast flavors that are soft, direct and one-dimensional.",,Saddleback
"This is largely neutral on the nose except for lazy flowery, tropical aromas. Fairly bold in size and mouthfeel, it has honeyed flavors of nectarine and peach. On the finish, it's more bitter than fresh as the fruit character breaks down.",Sibaris Reserva Especial,Undurraga
Beet root and cherry flavors mixed with some barnyard scents lead into a modestly ripe wine with strong herbal components. The finish takes a turn into bitterness.,Cellar Select,Wetzel Estate
"Aromas include toasted wood, smoky mineral and yellow apples. The palate offers oak, a hint of lemon zest and a medicinal sensation alongside racy acidity. There's not enough fruit richness to support the oak or the acidity. It ends on a bitter note.",Madonna della Scoperta,Perla del Garda
"Dry, tannic and severe, this Merlot has modest blackberry and cherry flavors. It's tough to appreciate right out of the bottle, and won't age, so give it an hour or two in a decanter.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"This blend from northern Italy opens with aromas of currants, black berries and bell pepper. It offers restrained black fruit flavors layered with oak and espresso sensations. But overall, it is rather flat with an abrupt, astringent finish.",S. Carlo,Case Paolin
"Dusty berry aromas come with an herbal streak. This medium-bodied, everyday wine offers reasonably good mouthfeel and balance along with short plum and berry flavors that finish quick and woody.",La Mision Reserva,William Fèvre
"Simple but well made, it discloses pretty aromas of yellow flowers. The bright palate delivers zesty citrus, pear and melon alongside crisp acidity. Pair with seafood salad or sip as an apéritif.",Re Midas,Cantina di Soave
"Surprisingly tannic, this juicy wine shows intense structure and a smoky character from wood aging. It feels as though the tannins and extract have smothered the natural fruitiness of the wine. It will need time to come round, so wait until 2017.",Terras do Vale Colheita Seleccionada,Casal do Conde
"Still very young, this wine is potentially crisp while also ripe. Citrus and yellow fruits present a fruit salad of flavors that are balanced by a more steely character. Drink from the end of 2014.",La Côte Blanche,Cave de Lugny
"This is a lightly creamy, fruity wine. With touches of citrus, bitter orange and a good burst of acidity, it is balanced, ripe and ready to drink.",,Château de Janicon
"Obviously wood aged, with spice and toast flavors, this is a soft, black currant and berry flavored wine. It has light tannins that are already integrating with the fruit. Drink now and until 2018.",,Château Loyasson
"Bold and juicy, this is a ripe, forward wine. With red berry fruits prominent, it conveys attractive fruitiness. Tannins in the background suggest medium-term aging. Drink from 2016.",,Château Mazails
"Produced close to Fronsac, this Merlot-based wine has rich fruits and a warm, rounded character. A touch of bitterness and dark chocolate from extraction mar this otherwise ripe and fruity wine. Drink from 2016.",,Château Saint-Michel
"Very Merlot dominated, this is a ripe and soft wine. It has some dryness that forms the core, but the rich fruit with its balanced acidity dominates. Smooth now, it will age quickly and easily and should be drunk from 2015.",Chai de Bordes,Cheval Quancard
"Vanilla is the lead flavor on this generic, oaky Chardonnay. Creamy and a tad soft in the mouth, it has flavors of resiny oak that blend with pear, melon and vanilla on the palate. Popcorn notes come up on a woody finish.",Reserva de Familia,Santa Carolina
"A moderately aromatic wine with notes of red apple, grape skins and lees. It's full bodied with a creamy feel but a bitter note throughout distracts.",,Schmidt
"Flowery and sweet through and through, this lighthearted dessert wine could also serve as apéritif as it's perfectly sippable, or as a pairing with something packed with spice, like enchiladas or red curry.",The Heritage Collection,Peirano
"A light and elegant Malbec, soft and fruity with berry fruits and gentle tannins. It has a rounded, polished feel with light acidity at the end. Drink this year.",Gariottin Sélection,Pelvillain Frères
"Excessive tartness is the chief fault of this wine. The tannins are faultlessly beautiful, and the flavors, of crushed summer blackberries, teriaki beef, green tea and black pepper, are complex. But that cut of acidity is severe.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"An intense fragrance of fresh roses carries over to the palate. It's rather sweet and sugary, with muddled flavors that recall ripe pink grapefruit, rock candy and a hint of flint together with a note of black licorice. You'll also detect the warmth of alcohol.",Aimé,Girlan
"As always, Loios is a bright and fruity wine that is ready to drink young. With peach, grapefruit and red apple flavors, it's a soft wine with a crisp streak. It is ready to drink now and will be better at the end of 2014.",Loios Branco,J. Portugal Ramos
"This well-priced wine shows Cabernet's lighter side. It offers bright sensations of red currant, hints of cedar wood and baking spices along fresh acidity and supple tannins. It's is made to be drunk young so enjoy soon.",Torrediluna,Lechthaler
"Sharp aromas of prickly red fruits and barrel scents are lively, while a dry palate comes with a resiny coating of oak. Flavors of earthy berry, pepper and herbs finish minty in flavor, with unresolved tomato-like acidity.",Ona Special Reserve,Anakena
"While the aromas have rustic overtones, the wine itself goes down the red fruit path. It shows juicy cherry flavors, soft but present tannins and a good touch of spice and wood. There is an attractive smoky aftertaste. Drink in 2015.",La Minée,L. Tramier & Fils
"This fruity, soft wine is ready to drink. With apple and pear flavors, just the right amount of crisp acidity and a bright aftertaste, it's made for this summer.",,Moura Basto
"While honey and white peach flavors ring pure and sweet, there's a slatey, mineral tone that penetrates deeply in this off-dry Kabinett. It's nervy and brisk, finishing long with zesty lime pith bitterness.",Studert Prüm Maximinhof Wehlener Sonnenuhr Kabinett,Leonard Kreusch
"Full in the mouth, this rich wine is dominated by yellow fruits and ripe apricots lifted by a touch of toast. Great acidity conveys a fresh and tangy character. The wine is still developing as the full fruitiness comes forward. Drink from 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Louis Max
"The nose is initially rather closed but eventually reveals baked earth, leather, game and ripe black fruit. The taut, tense palate offers dried black cherry, toasted oak, mocha and vanilla alongside grainy tannins.",Marenca,Luigi Pira
"Fragrant and bright, this offers aromas of rose, iris, perfumed berry and a balsamic note. The palate is still rather closed, offering raw red cherry, star anise and chopped sage alongside tightly knit tannins and brisk acidity. It still needs time to come together. Drink 2018_2024.",Gattera,Mauro Veglio
"From vines planted in 1958 in an appellation that straddles both Sonoma and Mendocino counties, this is an intriguing, interesting wine, mostly varietal, with 8% each of Mourvèdre and Syrah. Floral, it veers into leather and game, with a juicy backbone of red cherry and berry and earthy, textured tannins.",Rebotarro Vineyard Old Vine,Mounts
"A velvety, sinewy blend of 40% Syrah, 40% Grenache and 20% Mourvèdre from estate-grown and nearby vineyards, this wine offers a lot to like, from textured tannins to succulent blueberry and plum. Intense and floral, it finishes with an explosion of white pepper.",Verah,Mounts
"Rose, red berry, mint and anise aromas unfold in the glass. The firm palate offers wild cherry, crushed raspberry, clove, anisette and a mocha note framed in bracing tannins and fresh acidity. Drink 2020_2031.",,Oddero
"Brioche and vanilla-cherry are the stars in this full-bodied yet savory, herbal wine sourced mostly from the Oak Knoll District. Complex in flavor, it spikes in clove and cinnamon, finishing with a taste of gunpowder and tobacco.",,Padis
"This offers aromas of toast, espresso, scorched earth, red berry, clove and a whiff of leather. The lean, tense palate offers dried cherry, grilled herb, anise, coffee and tobacco but not much fruit richness. Tightly wound, bracing tannins and nervous acidity provide the framework.",Cannubi,Poderi Luigi Einaudi
"From a fourth-generation farming family, this wine is sourced from the Niebaum-Tonella and Morisoli-Borges vineyards along the Rutherford Bench. It opens with a bouquet of sweetly ripened mango, peach and pear, which continue on the palate. Fierce acidity and a drop of anise form the backdrop of the wine, which finishes somewhat tropical.",,S.R. Tonella
"This dense and dark wine offers spice and toast flavors. It has a big, generous feel, leaving room both for the dry, still-young tannins and for aromatic blackberry fruits. It does need to age, so drink from 2017.",Tradition,Château Eugénie
"Enticing aromas of red rose, wild red berry and aromatic herb lead the way. The palate offers dried berry, grilled herb, mocha and toast alongside assertive tannins and nervous acidity. Give this a few years for the tannins to unfold. Drink after 2020.",Neirane,Agostino Bosco
"Leafy underbrush, truffle, woodland berry and toast aromas lead the nose. The chewy, solid palate offers ripe black cherry, crushed raspberry, grilled sage and ground aniseed alongside bracing tannins and assertive acidity. Drink 2018_2028.",Cannubi Boschis,Cantina del Nebbiolo
"Aromas of mature berry, menthol, coffee bean, toast and dark cooking spice emerge on this bracing wine. The firmly structured palate delivers dried black cherry, espresso, French oak, licorice, chopped herb and tobacco set against bracing, close-grained tannins and the warmth of alcohol. The tannins will need years to unwind.",Prapò,Ceretto
"Showing the heat of the vintage, this offers earthy sensations of leather, scorched soil, truffle, stewed prune and ripe cherry. Bracing tannins provide the backdrop.",Cannubi,Borgogno F.lli Serio e Battista
"Based in Clare Valley, Wakefield sources this fruit from the cooler Adelaide Hills. Attractive rose-petal and dry earth aromas lead the way, followed by notes of black cherries and licorice on the palate. It's a bit full-bodied and muscular, a Pinot more for steak than salmon.",,Wakefield Estate
"In keeping with the style of dessert wine in this region, this wine is beautifully balanced between acidity and intense sweetness. Together they give a wine that is so fresh, packed with a crisp texture as well as ripe apricot and white peach flavors that are just touched by honey. Drink now for its freshness, although it will be even better if aged until 2018.",Gouttes de Soleil,Château de Gayon
"Although red cherry and raspberry make an appearance, this vineyard-designate is otherwise all about forested pine and earthy pungency, accented by a pretty floral tease of rose petal. High in acidity and tannin, it takes time in the glass to settle down and find its balance, with a lengthy finish of black licorice and clove.",Terra de Promissio,Della
"This wine offers a bouquet of baking bread with a touch of lemon curd. It presents a sophisticated palate of lemon, lime, orange blossom, piecrust, and eucalyptus. It has pleasing acidity that overcomes cooling herb flavors on the finish, and while it is light in the mouth, soft tannins persist on the gum line for a short while after swallowing.",C,Domaine du Castel
"Silky succulent raspberry and cherry flavors are a luscious counterpoint to the razor's edge of acidity that frames this impeccably balanced wine. It's ripe, fruity and forward, yet offers surprising elegance and length. Drink now through 2017.",Estate Bottled Trocken,Dr. Nägler
"Layers of pollen, dusty mineral and spice lend complexity to this concentrated wine full of yellow peach and fresh apple flavors. It's delicate and lithe in texture, yet punchy and penetrating.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Inky, rich and dense, this wine has an abundance of red and black berry pie going on that makes it decadently inviting. Thick on the palate, it's ready to pair with saucy cuts of meat, its background note of smoke the ideal way to bring out charred flavors in a food.",Estate,Eleven Eleven
"Aromas of mature berry, espresso, exotic spice and a whiff of menthol emerge on this full-bodied red. The palate shows dried black cherry, coconut, licorice and roasted coffee bean alongside fine-grained tannins. This isn't a classic Nebbiolo but it's polished, balanced and will appeal to those who enjoy oak-driven sensations.",Runcot Riserva,Elio Grasso
"Aromas of black currant, orange zest and lemon thyme set the scene for a three-way balancing act of fruit, savory and cool flavors. On the palate, notes of black cherry, lingonberry, eucalyptus, mint and thyme stand out, and gentle tannins ride on through a cherry and mint finish.",Reserve,Flam
"Winemaker Rob Folin scores again, crafting a silky and sleek Pinot from the Ribbon Ridge AVA. Fig, plum and chocolate flavors are wrapped into a smooth and supple wine that is already heading towards maturity. It's delicious now, so there is no reason to wait on this one.",Utopia Vineyard,Hayward by Folin Cellars
"As with Clos de Vougeot in red, every producer needs a Corton-Charlemagne white. Aegerter's contribution is soft, honeyed and warm. It has hints of the concentration proper to this Grand Cru vineyard, allowing for a perfumed, ripe fruit character. It will develop quickly and will be ready to drink from 2017.",,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"This is a finely integrated, rich wine that shows impeccable balance between dusty tannins and juicy dark berry tones. The wood aging shows through in a smooth texture that gives a sense of richness to the ripe fruit. This is an elegant wine that can be drunk now although it will benefit from some aging. Drink from 2017.",Periquita Reserva,José Maria da Fonseca
"This wine is dense, ripe and full of rich apricot and peach flavors, with a line of crisp lemon and a background of toast. Full in the mouth, this generous wine will be ready to drink from 2017. It comes Louis Max domaine vineyards in and around Mercurey.",Les Rochelles,Louis Max
"This is a rich wine with smooth tannins that are integrated into the ripe black fruits. It's packed with juicy fruitiness. It also has a dry core and acidity, both of which will allow the wine to age. Concentrated, it is ready to drink now, although it will be better from 2017.",Flor de Maio Tinto,Magnum Vinhos
"Ripe berry, menthol, truffle, leather, cured meat and tobacco aromas come together in the glass. The palate offers mature black cherry, licorice, clove and black pepper alongside fine-grained tannins.",Riserva,Marchesi di Barolo
"Mature plum, cake spices, baked earth, leather and a balsamic note all come together on this full-bodied, single-vineyard offering. The forward, savory palate delivers mature black cherry, clove and licorice alongside ripe, assertive tannins.",Ravera,G D Vajra
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, this structured wine opens with aromas of plum, dark-skinned berry and a whiff of clove. The smooth, savory palate doles out black cherry, licorice and tobacco alongside firm, polished tannins.",Rosso,Le Macchiole
"This is an impressive, well-endowed wine, bursting with superripe cherries, cinnamon and vanilla notes. It's full-bodied, velvety textured and warm, picking up dark chocolate notes on the long, dry finish. It's drinkable now, but worth holding through 2018 for a more savory experience.",Grand Vin,Dauvergne & Ranvier
"Toasty, resiny blackberry aromas open this full-bodied, tannic, grabby Tinto Fino that piles on the lushness. Loamy blackberry, earth and mocha flavors are backed by a smooth, chocolaty, heady finish that's hot but not vicious. Drink through 2022.",C21,Cepa 21
"Aromas of spiced blueberry, blue flowers, cedar, tobacco and grilled herbs come together on this blend of 50% Merlot, 40% Cabernet Sauvignon and 10% Cabernet Franc. The palate delivers juicy blackberry, mature plum, white pepper, clove and grilled rosemary. It's young but well balanced, with velvety tannins. Drink 2016_2021.",Greppicaia,I Greppi
"Aromas of rooty berry, loamy dark plum and minerally crispness create a fine nose that offers notes of coffee and char as it unfolds. The palate on this Monastrell is widespread and grabby, with baked blackberry, raspberry and plum flavors. Chocolate and spice notes ride high on a comfortable finish. Drink through 2018.",Basado en Hechos Reales,Crápula
"Aromas of dark berry, violet, mint and menthol lead the nose and carry over to the palate together with juicy cherry and a note of baking spice. This is still tightly wound with densely packed but refined tannins and brisk acidity. Give it time to open up and blossom over the next few years. Drink 2018_2026.",Bricco delle Viole,G D Vajra
"A blend of almost equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with smaller handfuls of Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, this estate-grown wine is sanguine in smoky leather and tobacco. Rich, with a touch of cinnamon and nutmeg, it has a lengthy finish that is balanced and elegant on the palate.",Lake William,Jarvis
"A bright and sour combination strikes the nose on this wine, with aromas of lime sorbet, kumquat and salted green apple rinds. The lean, focused and racy palate is led by crushed limestone grip, with the slight warmth of tart crab apples, proving quite palate cleansing. It's perfect for halibut or other delicate fish.",Rita's Crown Vineyard,Longoria
"Red berry, baking spice, mint, leather and rose petal aromas emerge on this beautiful, balanced Barolo. It shows remarkable freshness for the vintage, offering juicy wild cherry, raspberry, licorice and a balsamic note alongside polished tannins and bright acidity.",,Luigi Oddero & Figli
"A wonderful spicy, toasted oak character runs through the aroma, flavor and finish of this full-bodied and eminently smooth wine. It smells full of grilled baguette and baking spices like vanilla and nutmeg, tastes almost like cherry pie topped with cream and has a luscious, lingering finish. While technically dry, it seems almost sweet with all those bakery impressions.",Glass House Vineyard,Saxon Brown
"Subtlety and reserve drive this full-bodied, round-textured white Rhône-style blend. The velvety mouthfeel is almost more notable than the subdued pear, melon and butter flavors. It's a wine for lingering over, because it reveals its best stuff after time in the glass. It leads with 49% Marsanne, plus Viognier, Roussanne and Grenache Blanc.",Enigma,Terre Rouge
"Earthy, juicy and leathery, this wine was made from three clones of Pinot Noir. Each was fermented separately with a percentage of whole cluster, then blended together for this age-worthy concoction that's complex and compelling. Pomegranate and fig combine on the palate, along with more savory elements of allspice and coconut, finishing with a crispness of orange. Cellar through 2023.",,Reuling Vineyard
"San Vicente is part of the Casa Donoso group, and this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Carmenère, Malbec and Cabernet Franc smells tarry and blackened, with notes of olive, char, cassis and minerals. The full, layered palate is meaty and integrated, while flavors of spiced blackberry, cassis and pepper end in toasty, dark and lightly herbal fashion. Drink through 2022.",Lukai,Viña San Vicente
"Sublime leather and a shake of black peppercorn provide a touch of intrigue to this wine that gets better in the glass as it goes. Elegant, balanced and displaying cool-vintage sparks of pencil shavings and cranberry, it is effortlessly spicy in clove, particularly on the finish.",Reserve,Whitehall Lane
"Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc make up equal parts of this wine, with pinches of Petit Verdot and Malbec blended in. Vanilla, cocoa, coffee, herb and cherry aromas are followed by generous fruit and barrel flavors supported by tightly wound tannins. The wood is primary right now. It will be best after 2021.",Envoy Estate Grown,Ambassador Vineyard
"Aromas of underbrush, tobacco, baked earth and a whiff of pressed rose float from the glass. The round, full-bodied palate delivers dried berry, licorice and clove alongside ripe tannins. It's balanced but it also shows the heat of the vintage and is already almost accessible. Drink 2017_2021.",Garblèt Suè,Brovia
"This second wine of Château Durfort-Vivens is ripe, firm and well structured. Beautiful ripe black currant and berry fruits are cut with intense acidity. From the great 2010 vintage, it is solid, dense and full of fruitiness as well as tannins. It still does need to age, so drink from 2017.",Vivens,Château Durfort-Vivens
"At the eastern end of Saint-Emilion, this vineyard is close to Castillon. The wine has structure and density, with powerful tannins that are still filling out. Delicious, juicy black plum and damson flavors are going to be full and generous, while remaining fruity. Drink from 2018.",,Château la Chapelle aux Moines
"Attractive aromas of perfumed berry, baking spices, pipe tobacco and a whiff of balsam float out of the glass. The structured palate delivers juicy black cherry, cinnamon, clove, white pepper and herbs alongside assertive but ripe tannins. Drink 2019_2026.",Ginestra,Diego Conterno
"Mourvèdre (81%) makes up the majority of this blend with Grenache (12%) and Syrah filling it out. It leans into savory notes, with aromas of sage, dried herbs, white pepper and mineral. The flavors are plush and palate-coating, bringing a slightly tacky feel that softens over time. It will be best after 2019.",Emmy,Efeste
"This opens with notes of wild berry, scorched earth, dried spice and a balsamic note. On the firm palate, grilled herbs, graphite and licorice accent the black cherry core. Youthfully assertive but ripe tannins and fresh acidity provide the framework.",Villero,Giacomo Fenocchio
"Bright, citrusy yellow, this wine conveys a nutty, creamy custard and marshmallow component to the nose. Fuller-bodied in substance and style, it nonetheless remains stony and steely on the palate, finishing with a twist of ginger and dried herb. It will be a fine fit with food.",Reserve Cuvée Late Disgorged Extra Brut,Gloria Ferrer
"Chalk and flint soil contribute to this tight, tangy, amazingly crisp wine. Behind this still-young texture await ripe apples, green plums and orange peel. Packed with acidity and still developing, this wine needs some more time. Drink from 2017.",La Chapelle des Augustins,Henri Bourgeois
"Deep aromas of baked black fruits are bolstered by oaky notes of lemon peel and barrel spice. This is intense and hard driving, with flavors of coffee, lemon, blackberry, chocolate and tar. The smoky finish is accompanied by roasted berry notes and shearing acidity. Drink through 2020.",Colección Privada,Sierra Cantabria
"With some wood aging, this is a toasty, perfumed wine. It has a stony, structured character with plenty of acidity as well as ripe apricot and sweet apple flavors. The crispness has been tamed by the wood aging to give a ripe, full in the mouth wine. Drink from 2017.",Clos de la Rue,Château de Brézé
"Coming from a vineyard first planted by Mondavi in the late 1990s, this well-priced and widely available wine shows blackberry, violets, black pepper and just snapped dark chocolate on the nose. Fresh, lively black cherries and blueberries meld with fennel, tarragon and lots of herbal spice, all held together by smooth tannins.",,Ancient Peaks
"This wine manages to capture the essence of the southern Rhône in its fine scents of garrigue and sun-baked cherries. Despite a certain warmth, it remains fresh, supple and detailed, offering intricate nuances of licorice, sage and thyme on the long finish.",Oratorio,Ogier
"The inaugural vintage from the owners of Atlas Vineyard Management in Napa, which also farms vineyards in Oregon and California's Central Coast, this is exquisite in candied popcorn aromas, with a seasoning of fennel. Soft and juicy, it remains fresh on the palate, finishing crisp and clean.",Sun Chase Vineyard,Agnitio
"Earthy elements of beet juice, wild raspberry, anise and graphite mark the nose of this single-vineyard wine by Central Coast Pinot pioneer Josh Jensen. It's tense on the palate, but not exactly sour or bitter, showing tart raspberry, woody juniper and lots of chaparral influence. It's smooth but the tannins are noticeable.",Mills Vineyard,Calera
"This blend of Syrah with 10% Cabernet Sauvignon and 5% Cabernet Franc falls on the gamy, funky side of the Syrah spectrum. Scents of chicken yard, compost, soy and balsamic mingle with a tight vein of black cherry fruit. Sufficient acidity suggests giving it a little more bottle age, which should help to pull it together.",Bacchus Vineyard,Barrister
"This Taurasi opens with earthy aromas of leather, mature black fruit and a whiff of barnyard. The palate offers bracing tannins and dense flavors of blackberry, black cherry and sugar plum that are layered with sugary-sweet vanilla, oak, toast and coffee.",,Donnachiara
"Made from the native grape Nerello Mascalese, this elegant wine opens with aromas of red berry, vanilla and a whiff of leather. The palate offers polished tannins and a creamy red-cherry flavor that's lightly accented by subtle oak and baking spice.",L_vico,Duca di Salaparuta
"Full and softly fruity, it has a rich feel, heightened by ripe apricot flavors. It's generous, but needs to develop to give greater definition. Drink from 2015.",,Ferraud et Fils
"This vibrant expression of Falanghina opens with floral notes of white spring flowers and whiffs of tropical fruit. The bright palate delivers green apple, citrus, pineapple and banana alongside crisp acidity and steely mineral.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Made from organically-grown grapes, this savory, light-bodied wine opens with fruity aromas of crushed red berries. The bright palate doles out juicy strawberry and sour cherry, lightly accented by notes of white pepper and mineral. Chill it for 20 minutes before serving for a refreshing summer red.",,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"Aged in 70% new French oak, the wine shows a lot of barrel toast, coffee and chocolate flavors. The tannins are stiff and the fruit lean, with tart flavors of red berry. More bottle age may help to soften the oak flavors.",Artisan,Foundry Vineyards
"This has everything in the right place. It tastes polished and flavorful, has firm but smooth tannins, and bright, fresh cherry and black plum flavors, all accented by smoky oak. It shows the benefits of extra aging before it was released.",Made With Organic Grapes,Girasole
"Tasty from start to finish, this medium- to full-bodied Zinfandel offers a velvety texture, finely integrated tannins that give grip but not bitterness, and ripe cherry and strawberry flavors. A moderate dose of maple and cinnamon flavor come from aging with oak.",,Helwig
"This smooth, creamy and soft wine is ready to drink. It has touches of wood, although the main thrust comes from the ripe yellow fruits, juicy acidity and round rich character. The end brings out a toasty character that adds to the pleasure.",Sous le Château,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"Spice aromas partner with yellow fruit flavors. It's warm and rich, well balanced between the wood aging and the ripe fruits. At the end, acidity cuts the richness.",Château du Clos Léonard Chandon,Joseph Burrier
"Pale salmon in color, it brings notes of melon and apple. The palate drinks close to bone dry with a rich feel to the generous fruit flavors, showing a bit of the warmth of the vintage on the finish.",,Julia's Dazzle
"The blend is 75% Cabernet Sauvignon, and the rest split down the middle between Cabernet Franc and Merlot. Still tight and peppery, it has hints of sweet tomato along with light red berry flavors. The details of herb and barrel are proportionate, and the brightness of Washington grapes pushes this wine forward and makes it more accessible for near-term drinking.",,Kaella
"Grippy and dense in black fruit, licorice, soy and black tea this intense 100% Cabernet needs further time to come entirely into its own. Decant or open an hour or so before enjoying. Its savory undertones will pair well with grilled steak, ribs or burgers.",,Laird
"On the palate, the wood is an important element in this otherwise fruity wine that also conveys lemon and bright acidity. Crisp and clean, it's ready to drink now.",Le Clou d'Orge,Louis Jadot
"This is a tight wine, full of acidity and a dry core of tannin. It does have weight and will certainly bring out its red fruits as it matures. It's full in the mouth and likely to be delicious from 2017.",,Maison Champy
"This Aglianico opens with aromas of blue flower, red berries, coffee and earth. The palate offers assertive tannins and dense black cherry and raspberry flavors that are accented by notes of black spice.",Redimore,Mastroberardino
"This blend of six grapes is crafted from the left-over barrels in the multi-wine Long Shadows lineup. The 2011 version is one third Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Sangiovese, and the rest a mix of Merlot, Petit Verdot, Syrah and Malbec. It's a pleasant red, ready to drink, a bit amorphous but with nice details of black olive, strawberry and sweet tomato.",,Nine Hats
"This is a ripe, tropical-fruit-laden Condrieu, one that's full bodied yet not particularly rich in texture. Banana, melon and apricot preserves abound, making it a mouthfilling but not overly complex wine. It finishes with a touch of alcoholic warmth, so drink it over the next few months.",Invitare,M. Chapoutier
"Smoke and dark granite lend a mineral tone to aromas of red cherry and currant on this juicy, concentrated Cabernet Franc. The palate is ripe with blackberry flavors marked by zippy acidity and a bold, tannic finish. Drink now with a quick decant, or enjoy over the next 3-5 years.",,Hosmer
"Smooth and sweet, it's ripe with flavors of strawberry preserves. Liberal accents of chocolate and coffee speak to substantial barrel time, and there is more than a hint of sweetness across the palate. But for those who like a big, blocky, ripe style, it's quite tasty.",,Jacob Williams
"Concentrated in bright red fruit, it has a straight line of peppery spice that's intriguing. The structure is big-boned and powerful, yet the finish refreshing and balanced. At 1,000-feet in elevation, the vineyard has rocky soils, and there's a hint of rockiness in the taste.",Grist Vineyard,Joseph Jewell
"Plush on the nose and palate, it offers soft, round characteristics of candied fruit and tobacco, more savory than sweet. Still grippy in tannins and weight, the finish is sealed in black tea and mushrooms. Good acidity brings out the wine with food.",,Joseph Jewell
"Off dry, this lists the residual sugar at 12 g/L and tastes even sweeter. Candy strawberry flavors are somewhat offset by Red Mountain minerality. If you like your rosés with some sweetness, this hits the spot.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Kaella
"This distinctive wine has aromas of black cherry, vanilla and plum. Friendly but ageable, the palate offers a mix of spicy oak, bright cherry, fig and cedar flavors. Good acidity keeps it aloft.",Diaporos Block 5,Kir-Yianni
"Plum and raspberry are the lead aromas, and there are hints of leather and aged cheese in the mix. This offers a lively, appropriate mouthfeel and flavors of berry and plum that run long, loamy and earthy on the finish.",Crianza,Larchago
"In this cooler vintage, Syrah reveals more of its herbal, leafy side. Along with wild blueberry fruit come streaks of herb, green tomato and wet stems.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"A well-structured wine, it offers ripe, creamy fruits and attractive acidity. With mouth-watering citrus flavors, yellow fruits and smooth aftertaste, it represents great value from a lesser-known appellation.",La Grande Roche Premier Cru,Louis Latour
"Broad and rounded, it is full of sweet fruits and soft tannins while still retaining a good sense of structure. Red fruits come through strongly to give richness. It's for short-term aging.",Aux Fourches,Maison Champy
"Blue flower, tilled soil and mature black berry aromas pour from the glass of this young Aglianico. The warm, forward palate doles out ripe black cherry, black pepper, espresso, licorice and toast alongside velvety tannins.",,Mastroberardino
"This perfumed reserve wine has considerable concentration, richness and a full, flowery character. Acidity cuts through the ripe fruit and brings out the spice in the texture. Screwcap.",Schiefer Reserve,Forstreiter
"Here's a stunning expression that opens with earthy aromas of blue flower, underbrush and leather, as well as black fruit and spice. The palate offers creamy cherry, black berry, white pepper and tobacco, with a hint of clove. The fresh acidity__urprising for the hot vintage__alances out the firm but ripe tannins. Best 2017_2027.",,Goretti
"Just about every Dyer Cabernet requires aging. The 2009 bottling is tough with tannins, despite intense blackberry, cherry and oak flavors. The winemaker held it back from release even longer than the 2010, but it's still juvenile, with unintegrated oak, fruit and mineral notes. The window of drinkability is 2015_2025.",Dyer Vineyard,Dyer
"Alto is 75% Malbec and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon. The nose is cool and full of cassis, blackberry, cola and cedar aromas. This is ripe as they come without losing freshness; flavors of loamy berry and cassis finish with density along with prune and spicy, peppery flavors. Drink through 2020.",Alto,Alta Vista
"Here's an exciting dessert wine that opens with an intense fragrance of mint, thyme and berry. The concentrated palate offers ripe cherry, berry, mint and thyme flavors, with a hint of tangerine peel. The rich flavors are brightened by fresh acidity that leaves a clean rather than cloying finish.",,Barberani
"Smooth and supple, this wine is full of ripe, generous fruit and acidity. It's framed with firm tannins, however, that lend structure to a palate that has weight and a luscious feel. Drink from 2018.",,Château du Tertre
"This is a wine that has great potential__ou can tell from the firm tannins, tight acidity and closed texture. Initially, black currant flavors are touched with dark, dusty notes, but they finish with more juicy character on the afterntaste. Drink from 2017.",,Château Lafon-Rochet
"Big, ripe and fruity, this is a concentrated, juicy wine. It highlights richness, intense green plum and tangy orange flavors, as well as a feeling of opulence. Concentrated and dense in texture, it needs a year to age.",Intense,Château Lamothe-Vincent
"Smooth and rounded, this is a fine wood-aged wine. It has weight, layers of ripe green and white fruits, and an opulent texture. Spice shows strongly along with the fruit to yield a concentrated and dense wine. Drink from 2015.",,Château Penin
"This is a very fine, distinctive Chardonnay that's tight and streamlined. It's tangy with lemony acidity and a brisk minerality, but there's also plenty of tropical fruit, apricot and honey flavors as well. Creamy notes of buttered toast and lees add richness to the palate.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Bernardus
"Seghesio's Home Ranch Zin is dependably ripe and blended with a little Petite Sirah for structure. The palate is soft and rather sweet with flavors of black cherry and raspberry, along with hints of mocha, bacon and toasty oak. It should hold for many years but is unlikely to gain complexity so drink now_2014.",Home Ranch,Seghesio
"This is an intensely mineral wine that's wonderfully crisp as well as rich. It is strongly textured and tight with acidity, structure, along with powerful pepper and ripe pear flavors. This is a wine for aging, don't drink before 2016. Screwcap.",Steinportz Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"The Dobles Lías has more lees contact than Marimar's other Chardonnays, giving it a rich, yeasty creaminess. There's also plenty of new French oak influence. Made from estate-grown fruit, it's rich with papayas, tangerines and guavas. It's delicious now, but has all the structure a Chardonnay needs to negotiate the next eight years.",Dobles Lías Don Miguel Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"There is a great balance between sweetness and acidity in this fine wine. Lemon, lime zest and a twist of orange give an intense freshness, while the honey and marmalade add richness and sweetness. It's a great wine for aging. Drink from 2017.",Zwischen den Seen Nummer 3 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"The Legacy bottling is sourced from 20-year old vines from the estate vineyard. Elegant and tart, this complex wine brings bright flavors of raspberry into focus with hints of biscuit, vanilla and milk chocolate. After being open a full 24 hours, it gained further complexity and fleshed out nicely.",Winderlea Legacy,Winderlea
"This is the stud in the Acústic stable. A blend of 70% Carignan and 30% Garnacha, Braó is lively and bright on the nose, with ripe blackberry and cassis aromas. The palate is concentrated and juicy, with fine balance and bold flavors of blueberry, blackberry and coffee. A toasty, dark finish features chocolate, toast and minerality. Drink through 2019.",Braó Vinyes Velles,Acústic
"How to virtually guarantee a luxury wine will be undervalued? Put it out under mass-market branding. If a wine this quality were marketed as boutique, it would likely sell for much more, as it's a terrific example of old-vine Barossa Valley Shiraz. It's strongly marked by toasty oak, but the underlying fruit is bold and ripe without being overdone or jammy and the wine is modern without being devoid of structure or savoriness. Drink now_2025.",Centenary Hill,Jacob's Creek
"Crushed stone and smoke mingle with luscious stonefruit and crisp, green herb on this multifaceted auslese. Each sip reveals a different dimension of fruit, earth or flora, all against a backdrop of honey and acid. A lovely wine to sip and contemplate through a long, meandering finish.",Graacher Himmelreich Auslese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Whiffs of saffron and honey lend a sweet, spicy tone to this off-dry Riesling. It's lusciously ripe on the palate, with juicy white peach and honeydew flavors accented by layers of candle wax and crushed slate. Brisk and bright with acidity, it's effortlessly quaffable, but with refinement and depth.",Haus Klosterberg,Markus Molitor
"Stony, earthy aromas lend a mineral tone to lavish rose and yellow-­cherry notes on this concentrated, yet delicately structured, Riesling. It's intensely sweet and honeyed, with luscious, tropical fruit flavors, yet brisk on the palate, with a streak of citrus acidity.",Abstberg Auslese,Maximin Grünhäuser
"This is a fine Chardonnay marked by rich, ripe pear, peach and tropical fruit flavors, but also a bright acidity that highlights all the fruit. Notes of buttered toast add richness. It's delicious on its own, but would also be an ideal accompaniment for tapas.",Soberanes Vineyard,Bernardus
"This impressive wine follows a straight line of structure, acidity, firm tannins and dark black fruits. The combination is a wine with depth, ripeness and an edge of austerity that demands aging. Drink from 2018.",,Château Beychevelle
"A selection of fruit from different vineyards allows Franz-Josef Gritsch an overview of the Spitz style. It's rich and intense, but also deliciously fresh and fragrant. There is a strong mineral content as well. Very crisp on the finish and still young. Drink from 2016.",Vision Wachau Reserve,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"This is a full, opulent wine that is delicious with acidity and spice. Fragrant grapefruit and citrus notes complement rich apple flavors on the palate. The wine has many years to age and achieve balance between its structure and fruitiness. Drink from 2015.",,Loimer
"This is a serious wine showing textured fruit and vanilla flavors. There's concentration and richness, but it also retains freshness. There is a strong mineral edge to this full-bodied, dense wine. Drink from 2016.",Sirius,Maison Sichel
"The wine has a warm, rich feel to it while remaining fresh. It has a sense of gravitas with concentrated pear and peach fruit flavors over a mineral texture. The wine is still young, showing too much exuberant acidity. Drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Loiser Berg,Bründlmayer
"Oaky, inky, modern and full of power, this Montsant blend of Carignan, Syrah and Garnacha is toasty and dark as night on the bouquet. The palate feels ripe and intense, with creamy oak and controlled tannins. Flavors of baked black fruits, cocoa and vanilla finish soft and supple, with just enough tannic grip and acidity to maintain focus. Drink from 2014_2020.",Mas de Can Blau,Can Blau
"This 100% Cabernet is so ripe with blackberries, cherries and new French oak, it's delicious to drink now. The tannins are strong, however, leading to a hard finish. Give it eight years to soften and smooth out.",Crowley Vineyard,Conn Creek
"This powerful Sagrantino opens with aromas of meat juice, truffle and black fruit. The palate offers blackberry, black cherry, cinnamon and black pepper, along with tobacco notes. It also has Sagrantino's trademark tannic backbone, but the tannins are ripe and are balanced by bright acidity.",,Dionigi
"Chunky black-fruit aromas are ripe but familiar, meaning the nose is pumped full of richness and oak. Racy acidity on the palate gives this modern Cab spine, while in the mouthfeel stays on the fast track due to zesty acidity. Flavors of cassis and blackberry register as fresh and ripe, and the finish is crisp and not the least bit flabby. Drink through 2016.",Bramare Marchiori Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"Elegant black-cherry and cassis flavors are accented with savory tones of ripe stem and leaf in this slightly understated Cab Franc. Overall, the palate is lean in profile, but it's a brisk, straightforward wine offering plenty of varietal character.",,Raphael
"This is a soft, lusciously fruity wine for drinking now. With its silky texture, it's full of jammy cherry and raisin flavors that finish hot in alcohol.",,Sextant
"Not a bad price for a rich, creamy Chardonnay. It's sweet in brown sugar, orange and pineapple jam and vanilla flavors that appeal to the popular style.",,River Road
"A Cabernet Sauvignon that includes 8% Merlot, Silver Palm is dense and oaky, with round tannins and a big taste of cherry followed by a strong herbal and menthol component. Fairly priced, it's ready to be paired with rib roast.",,Silver Palm
"This is a dark, brooding and earthy Zin, that's high in alcohol, intensely oaky, and with a huge black pepper character that dives head first towards the finish into slightly pruny land.",ReZerve,Sobon Estate
"On first sniff, the scent of sulfur shrouds this wine, but it fades with air to reveal tinges of grapefruit, white pepper, honeysuckle and a legume-like quality. The flavors seem restrained from the start, but they gain intensity with time. Zesty acidity gives the palate cut.",,Rosemont
"This is a creamy and lush expression, with soft sweetness in the form of peach nectar and almond. The effervescence is soft and foamy.",Millesimato Extra Dry,Salatin
"This fresh Prosecco offers citrus and peach aromas with dried hay and crushed mineral. The wine is simple and crisp overall with sharp, steely perlage.",Extra Dry,Salatin
A savory note of spice and leather opens the bouquet of this ruby colored sparkling wine from central Italy. Dark fruit flavors are backed by a bitter finish.,Il Grasparossa della Tradizione,Tenuta Pederzana
Talc powder and white pepper appear at first and the bouquet opens to include additional layers of citrus and stone fruit. The perlage is sharp and toned.,Brut,Terre di San Venanzio Fortunato
"Laureato (__he graduate_) is a blend of 80% Chardonnay and 20% Fiano that opens with a bright golden color and slightly oxidized aromas of honey and caramel. At the back, you'll get exotic fruit and candied apricot. The mouthfeel is bold and soft.",Laureato,Vetrère
"This organic Cava opens with round, yeasty aromas of dusty spice and baked apple. It's juicy in feel, while flavors of mature, pithy orange and grapefruit end short, both in length and level of finesse. For something bright and fresh, this fits the bill.",Hoya de Cadenas Brut Organic,Vicente Gandia
"Based in Nuits-Saint-Georges, Manuel Olivier has made a specialty of the wines from the Hautes Côtes in the hills behind the city. This is a light and fruity wine with freshness and some firm, dry tannins, although it's ready to drink now.",,Manuel Olivier
"Here's the quintessential Italian white wine to pair with fried calamari or mini pizzas. It offers fresh green notes of lime and garden herb, backed by peach and cantaloupe accents.",Costa di Nugola,Marchesi de' Frescobaldi
"The nose on this choppy Cabernet deals red-fruit, tomato and pepperoni-like aromas. The palate is full of life and tight acidity, while the flavor profile is gritty and includes baked plum and saltiness. A BBQ'd, oaky finish carries plenty of the wine's racy acidity, leaving mild tartness.",Single Vineyard,Lamadrid
"This young Tempranillo shows light, pretty strawberry and tart cranberry fruit flavors. It's sharp and herbal, young and tight; a pleasant red that does not show any particularly strong varietal character.",,Raptor Ridge
"You can't beat the price versus quality ratio on offer here. Yes, this is an easy and thin wine, but it also delivers just enough fruit freshness and personality to pair with easy vegetable dishes or salads. Great for pool side parties or barbecues.",Re Midas,Cantina di Soave
This simple and fresh Prosecco Superiore opens with subtle tones of lime and honeydew melon backed by zesty freshness and creamy mousse. It shows nice peach tones on the close.,Millesimato Brut,Cantina Produttori di Valdobbiadene
La Perla Extra Dry is a soft and luscious sparkling wine with simple lines and fresh aromas of peach blossom and almond paste. Soft sweetness is backed by fresh acidity.,La Perla Extra Dry,Cantina Produttori di Valdobbiadene
"Light in texture and color, this smoky Pinot Noir has a hugely woody quality to it. Dark tones overpower and overtake fruit on the palate.",,Courtney Benham
"This gets going with rubbery aromas of burnt leaves and earth but not much fruit. The palate is medium bodied, with resiny oak notes and jammy berry flavors. Heat and herbal notes rise up on the tail. For $12, this is a good Cabernet.",Reserve,Cruz Alta
Here's a Lambrusco executed in a frizzante secco style (bubbly but dry) that represents the kind of wine locals regularly drink with creamy pasta dishes. It opens with a dark purple color and shows chewy grape flavors.,,Fattoria Moretto
"This is an offbeat Spumante Rosato (made from a blend of Montepulciano, Sagrantino, Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon) packaged in a beautifully rimmed keepsake bottle. The contents offers tart flavors of almond, wild berry and cranberry.",Roös Brut,Foss Marai
"Moondrops opens with aromas of cut grass and citrus followed by background tones of peach and melon. Sweet fruit and soft, creamy effervescence appear on the finish.",Gocce di Luna Moondrops Extra Dry,Anna Spinato
"This is a light, simple wine, mixing tart cranberry fruit with streaks of leaf and stem. The rather low alcohol and overall lightness makes it a good summer quaffing red.",Cuvée A,Anne Amie
"Bitter cherry, ripe berry fruits and some firm tannins are nicely blended in this forward, fruity wine. It has fresh acidity alongside black-currant fruit, ending on a spicy accent.",JP Azeitão Tinto,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Golden yellow, with notes of fig, apricot and mint. At 23% residual sugar, it's rich and sweet, but the concentration drops off on the back half.",Ice Wine,Koenig Vineyards
"Produced entirely from Petite Sirah, this wine is dark in color, with notes of cherry, melon and strawberry. It's a bit ponderous but still offers enjoyment.",Dry Rosé of,Koenig Vineyards
"Ripe and jammy, this is bright Beaujolais. It's full of sweet fruits, soft tannins and lively acidity. At the end, the wine shows delicious cherries and just a touch of structure.",Domaine Pignard,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"A note of graham cracker hits the nose first, followed by touches of apple, lemon and granite. The palate is mineral driven, yet despite the bright acidity, the flavors taste a little dull.",,Jefferson Vineyards
"With its firm tannins and powerful fruit, the style of Clos de Vougeot is well expressed. It has weight, and it is loaded with juicy black fruits and acidity. With its dense texture, it's a wine for the long haul.",Collection,L. Tramier & Fils
"This vintage rivals MacRostie's 2006 and 2007 bottlings. It's already delicious thanks to the raspberry, cherry and persimmon flavors that gain complexity from baking spice and sweet, toasty oak notes. The brisk acidity is just about perfect, and the finish is long and rich.",Wildcat Mountain Vineyard,MacRostie
"Champy only makes two barrels of this wine. It's finely concentrated, and it has solid tannins and rich, powerful black-plum and cherry flavors. Keep it for at least 8_9 years.",,Maison Champy
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet and Syrah, this shows outstanding intensity and length. It has long-lasting flavors of chocolate, bright cherry, spice and leather.",,Le Macchiole
"Full of vitality from start to finish, this wine has bright flavors of pear and melon. Well balanced and refreshing, pair it with Asian fare and spicy seafood, or enjoy it on its own.",Cuvee 128,Navarro
"Rich and ripe, this Cabernet Sauvignon-dominant wine is filled out with Merlot and Cabernet Franc. It has enormous flavors of cherry tart, cassis, mocha and toast, and they seem to change with every sip. The tannin structure is smooth, with a dusty astringency that provides grip. Already excellent, this should develop bottle complexity over the next 6_8 years.",,Terlato
"Bordeaux consultant Denis  Dubourdieu and winemaker Stefano Ferrante crafted this blend of Merlot, Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot. It's a bottle that raises the bar for the dozens of wines created by the Zonin family, the owners of this relatively new estate in Maremma. The result is rich and enticing, and it offers intense flavors of dark berry, leather, tobacco and bright cherry.",,Rocca di Montemassi
"Aux Chaignots is a vineyard to the north of the town of Nuits-St-Georges, which is not far from Vosne-Romanée. Its location imparts firm, dominating tannins. It is dense, with a determined structure. The acidity and fruit are there, and they're likely to show through over the next 4_5 years.",Aux Chaignots Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"Ripe, full bodied and jammy, this wine is already a delight to the senses. It is rich, round and full of strawberry jelly flavor, layered with new-wood-derived spice. The wood element needs to become integrated, so keep this powerful bottling for at least five years.",Clos du Roi Premier Cru,Domaine de Bellene
"This Chardonnay is dry and offers brilliant acidity. At first, it's austere, but then the core of citrus and tropical fruits becomes apparent and intense. The nervy acidity leads to a tight, zesty finish.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Chanin
"This 100% Cabernet Sauvignon has rich, flashy flavors of spice and crème de cassis, and it will reward some time in the cellar. The tannins are strong, but the wine is drinkable now after decanting and especially when paired with steak. It will soften and mellow in 7_8 years, and it should last at least 15 years while gradually losing fruit.",Reserve,Corley
"Focused and tight in style, this wine has linear and elegant aromas of bright cherry, spice, dark chocolate and licorice. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Sangiovese, and it shows firm, dry and dusty tannins on the finish.",Podere Grattamacco,Collemassari
"Bichot owns part of this small grand cru portion of Maréchaudes as well as the walled section of the premier cru section. This is dense, solid and powerful, and it demonstrates the dark character of the clay soil. A concentrated black-plum flavor is supported by firm, dry tannins, which makes this a serious, age-worthy wine.",Clos des Maréchaudes,Albert Bichot
"An elegant wine, this has dark tannins and a sumptuous texture, which is smoothed by generous fruit and acidity. On the finish, a spice note and a dry structure promise that this will age well.",Domaine du Château Gris Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Big and structured, this wine is currently dominated by tannins, but it shows a hint of its intense fruit and potential. The red and black fruits are rich and ripe, and they promise future balance. Age this for at least 7_8 years.",Domaine du Clos Frantin,Albert Bichot
"Made from 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, this bottling really struts its stuff in the elegant 2006 vintage. It opens with intense and finely polished aromas of berry, lead pencil, brimstone, leather and black currant. It feels tight, crisp and firm on the finish. Give it another 5_10 years of cellar aging.",Farnito,Carpineto
"This wine is solid and tannic, with a foursquare structure. Under the dry tannins, there are dense flavors of damson and plum. Give this wine at least five years of aging.",Les Boudots Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Powerful and structured, this wine is made from fruit sourced from a vineyard that is almost completely surrounded by some of Burgundy's greatest grand crus. The wine is juicy, and its ripe fruits pour through the dense tannins, making this feel balanced already, but this is a wine for long-term aging.",Les Suchots Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This opulent, rich Clos de Vougeot could perhaps use firmer tannins, but it has ripe berry and cherry flavors. It has a solid core that is enveloped by the generous fruit. Age this for six years and more.",,Maison Jessiaume
"The fruit is sourced from a site that straddles Atlas Peak, but the vineyard is not exclusively located there, which is why this wine is labeled with the broad Napa Valley appellation. This 100% Syrah is extraordinarily rich, and it floods the mouth with flavors of blackberries and black currants, plus hints of crisp bacon and black pepper. Dry and tannic, it shows elegance and balance, and it will develop over the next six years.",Stagecoach Vineyard,Patland
"Made from fruit sourced from vines close to Puligny's grand crus, this has some of the same structure and dense minerality as many of the village's best wines. It's vivid, upfront and rich with boisterous fruitiness. The structure will take many years to round out.",Les Pucelles Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This wine shares some of the same opulence and velvety texture as wines made from the adjacent Le Musigny grand cru. It is dense, with a fine, ripe character that penetrates deep into the heart of the tannins. The juicy red- and dark-berry flavors give a hint of the richness to come.",Les Chabiots Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Dusty notes of brimstone and granite lift the bouquet of this concentrated blend of 85% Syrah and 15% Cabernet Sauvignon. Solid notes of dark cherry, blackberry, leather and tobacco bring up the rear. The complexity is outstanding, and this bottling will undoubtedly enjoy a long cellar life. Drink after 2016.",Poggio Querciolo,Casa di Terra
"This is an impressive 100% Cabernet that will reward some time in the cellar. It shows the dryness, hard tannins, full body and classic black currant and cedar flavors characteristic of the varietal. There is no doubt about its ageability, so hold until 2017, at least.",State Lane Vineyard,Corley
"This is a delicate, elegant wine, with flavors of red berries and currants. Notes of spice and undergrowth are followed by mouth-watering acidity. Drink this after 5_6 years.",Les Vergelesses Premier Cru,Domaine Pavelot
"This is fairly tannic for Pinot  Noir, and it tastes bone dry and tart in acidity. The wild cherry flavor comes with hints of balsam, dusty brown spice, mineral and sandalwood. It shows all of the hallmarks of ageability, so cellar it until 2016, at the very least.",The Bohan-Dillon,Hirsch
"This bears a ripe, fruity character as well as enormous structure and power. It offers a black plum flavor, a dense texture and concentration. The firm, dry tannins and the hint of wood aging promise that this has a  long future.",,Maison Jessiaume
"Complex and nuanced, this Chardonnay is beginning to lose its primary fruit flavors of pears and tropical fruits, and it's becoming dry and mushroomy. The sweet oak tones are also an integral part of the profile. A subtle wine that is compatible with food, it should last for another 3_4 years.",Three Sisters Vineyard Sea Ridge Meadow,Martinelli
"Rich and ripe, this wine has flavors of tangerines, nectarines and limes, which are brightened by crisp acidity. The oak influence shows in the form of buttered toast and honey notes. It should develop in the bottle over the next six years.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Kenneth Volk
"Originally better known for its red wines, this vineyard to the south of Chassagne-Montrachet now produces mainly white wines. This bottling is structured, firm and tight, and it promises a future that will always be serious and austere. Keep it for 4_5 years.",Abbaye de Morgeot Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Blueberry and blackberry aromas fold in earthy notes, herbal spice and a pinch of Cabernet-related green. This feels full but crisp, with level acidity and minty, oaky flavors of carob and herbal raspberry. A short finish is fresh and lively.",,Casa L'Angel
"The fruity characteristics are the star of this wine, with heady notes of forest berry, red plum and cherry that flood the nose and mouth. Accents of chocolate, menthol and sweet smoke add depth, but play a delicate supporting role to the fleshy fruit core. Medium weight, with fine tannins and a fairly easygoing structure.",Les Sorcières,Domaine du Clos des Fées
"This blend of 50% Carignan, 30% Syrah and 20% Grenache opens with juicy scents of red cherry, blueberry and a touch of bramble. Those notes continue through to the palate, alongside a soft, spicy accent that adds depth. Medium tannins provide a solid structure and carry on through the medium-length close.",Les Falaises,Domaine Gardiés
"This Amarone is loaded with big fruit sensations of ripe cherry and plum, along with raisin, chocolate and oak accents. It's rather one dimensional, but has delicious fruit and is perfect for immediate enjoyment.",Grotta del Ninfeo,Domenico Fraccaroli
"Just delicious, showing the pure, laser-like lime, tangerine and ripe peach flavors of the Edna Valley, as well as the vibrant acidity that makes the wine so mouthwatering. Serve it cold and then pay attention to how it changes as it warms up.",Heritage Winemaker Series,Edna Valley Vineyard
"Don't let the label mislead you; this is not a dessert wine. It's off-dry, with a pretty suite of lemon, orange and citrus peel flavors. A whiff of tea runs through the aromas, and a bit of lemon oil in the finish.",Late Harvest,Hogue
"The top cuvée from Mercer Estates, this reserve is a Bordeaux-style blend based upon 64% Merlot, the rest a mix of Cabernet Sauvignon, Malbec and Petit Verdot. A firm entry introduces a solid mid-palate with a mix of black fruits, coffee and toast. The finish is clean and gentle, with moderate persistence.",Cavalie Reserve,Mercer
"This offers aromas of mature black fruit and raisin. The palate delivers a vibrant black-cherry core, layered with accents of black pepper and Asian spice. It also has fresh acidity for the vintage, and will pair well with buttery dishes or cured meats.",,Montecariano
"Very spicy in character, the wine has a rich feel to it, offering a rounded palate with a touch of mango alongside the more complex almond and spiced pear flavors.",,Giefing
"This Amarone has aromas of rich black fruit and vanilla. The palate shows almost overripe plum and berry flavors, along with oak sensations and toasted notes. You'll also detect a warm midpalate.",,Giuseppe Lonardi
"This oaky, fruity Chardonnay is lush and opulent. It has flavors of buttered toast, sweet cream, pineapples, tangerines, tropical-fruit jam, sautéed bananas and limes, accented with brisk acidity.",,Freemark Abbey
"A rich, thick, inky purple Petite Sirah with a small amount of Syrah blended in, offering aromas of baked plum, boysenberry and leathery spice. Elegant for the variety, the wine is concentrated and structured with a long finish of dark coffee.",Estate Grown,Di Arie
"Aged for two years in Hungarian Tokaj barrels, this wine is fresh and appealing with notes of dark plum, spice and green herbs. The fruit flavors are sweet and succulent and backed by more tannic structure than usually seen for the variety.",,Lantz
"This Grenache Noir-based rosé is light and bright, with medium-intense aromas of red cherry and strawberry upfront, followed by hints of stone fruit and peach pit. Light weight, with brisk acidity and a crisp, clean finish. Drink now.",,Penya
"Strength characterizes this 100% Cabernet, at the expense of finesse. It's eruptive in blackberries, currants, cola and sweet oak, and the flavors intensify in the mid-palate to the point of jam. As rich as it is, it feels overworked. Drink now_2016.",Firehouse Vineyard,Piña
"This savory selection offers a spicy bouquet of black pepper, nutmeg and clove, along with blackberry and cherry notes. It has a refined and vibrant palate, with black cherry, pepper and spice notes framed by silky tannins and refreshing acidity.",Vigneto I Cantoni,Novaia
"A ripe and fruity wine, showing touches of wood as well as a more rustic character. It is packed with acidity and black currant flavors, at the core firmly tannic.",Vintage,Quinta do Infantado
"With savory black currant, blackberry jam and toast flavors wrapped into firm, complex tannins, this is a lovely Cabernet to drink now. Shows many of the qualities of far more expensive Napa Cabs, with a bit less depth.",Estate,Round Pond
"This wine is as lush as apricots, pineapples and peach juice, but with refreshing acidity. Ample honey and buttered-toast notes from oak give it warmth. It's a very good Chard for drinking now with rich shellfish dishes, or a buttery wild mushroom risotto.",Sarmento Vineyard,Windstream
"This opens with aromas of nearly overripe black fruit and hints of nail varnish. The palate delivers blackberry, chocolate, oak and vanilla flavors, along with spirit-soaked cherries. The alcohol is very evident, and although the fruit is delicious, it's one dimensional. Imported bz Panebianco, Vinity Wine Company.",Campomasua,Venturini Massimino
"Warm, fragrant and juicy, this is an off-dry, just peppery wine, full of ripe peach and pear flavors. Very fruity and delicious.",Trois Châteaux,Kuentz-Bas
"This delightful wine exhibits crisp acidity and Riesling's characteristic petrol, citrus, lychee and honeysuckle flavors. It's slightly off dry with a clean edge of minerality.",,State of Art
"Austrians seem challenged to produce exotic blends. This wine with Riesling, Furmint and Sauvignon Blanc together, is an intriguing example. It is as rich, powerful and full-bodied. It is opulent in texture, and now mature.",Ruster Ausbruch,Schandl
"Very dark, structured wine, with coffee as well as fruit flavors. The wood comes through firmly producing a solid, very dry character. The more juicy black currant fruits are still to show well. So wait to drink until 2015.",Domaine de la Ferté Premier Cru Servoisine,Domaines Devillard
"A fresh, fruity and delicious Crémant from one of the most familiar names in Alsace sparkling wine. It shows lively acidity, bright apples and citrus and a lightly mineral aftertaste.",Brut,Dopff & Irion
"The acidity here is certainly the Chenin Blanc, but with the richness of Chardonnay in the mix, the wine has a full character, softly ripe, apples and pears dominant. It has a crisper feel at the end, bright and lively and ready to drink. Screwcap.",,Domaine du Tariquet
"The nose is dominated by spices and herbs, a whiff of violets, fennel and white chocolate. Complex and intriguing, it leads into fruit flavors of plum and cherry, with a hint of alcoholic heat. The wine improved substantially after being open for several hours.",,Ott & Murphy
"The small enclave of Buzet makes wines in a Bordeaux style, with black currant fruitiness and some firm tannins. This wine, now aging well, shows ripe juicy fruits, a solid dry core and refreshing, crisp acidity at the end.",Château Tournelles,Georges Vigouroux
"An unusual blend of Chardonnay, Pinot Noir, Pinot Grigio and Pinot Meunier, this bubbly is, in a word, delicious. It's ripe with oranges, pineapples, honey and vanilla, with crisp acidity and a Champagne-like sourdough leesiness.",Cuvée M,Mumm Napa
"Full, ripe wine, layered with fruits and a dry, more mineral core. The wine has good depth of flavor, strawberries, red currants and a citrus cut that keeps the wine fresh at the end.",Rosé Perle d'Aurore,Louis Bouillot
"Attractively pink in color, this has a touch of caramel as well as ripe strawberry fruit flavors. It has a rich side, but is bright and fruity with lively acidity at the end. It will be great as an apéritif.",,Château Vircoulon
"Tropical fruit, melon and apple aromas are lightly briny and solid. The palate on this everyday white is lively and fresh, with jumpy acidity. Flavors of nectarine, mango, apple and lime stay fruity and clean across the finish.",,Dominios de Castilla
"Crisp green apple and lime zest aromas form the entry of this unidentified blend, which tends toward richer, creamier layers of vanilla in flavor and texture. The finish is both full-figured and floral.",Proprietary,Eponymous
"This blend of 85% Sangiovese, 10% Can aiolo and 5% other red grapes opens with aromas of ripe dark-skinned fruit, crushed blue flowers and a whiff of clove. The easygoing palate offers dried black cherry, espresso and a hint of anise alongside dusty tannins.",,Fattoria di Grignano
"Rich in plum, black cherry and blackberry, this wine is subtle in cinnamon and dried herb, with additional embellishments of leather and earth. Soft and subdued, it's approachable and versatile.",Reserve,Frei Brothers
"This medium-bodied wine smells a bit like a bouquet of pineapple, sage and lemony thyme. On the palate, the wine is restrained and citrusy, with a clean, refreshing finish.",,Frenzy
"Intensely fruity, this has great acidity, fresh red fruits and delicious orange-zest tang. Pale in color, it is poised and elegant, leaving a crisp, refreshing aftertaste.",Les Folies par Marquis de Chasse,Ginestet
"Thick, like blueberry syrup, this is a soft, layered wine with notions of vanilla, toasted oak and spearmint that confound on the palate. A substantial, concentrated wine, it finishes in mocha chocolate.",Pestoni Family Estate Reserve,Rutherford Grove
"This Navarran blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Tempranillo opens with mulchy aromas of compost, tomato and herbs as well as currant and plum. The palate is thick and syrupy in feel, with a mix of baked, stewy berry flavors offset by green notes. Herbal berry and chocolaty flavors control a rooty, sweet-tasting finish.",Premium Cuvée Señorío de Otazu,Otazu
"The Sauvignon Blanc here never seems to hit the highs of the Burgundian varieties, but the 2013 is a solid effort. Aromas of struck flint give a faintly Old World character to this medium-bodied wine, followed by hints of stone fruit and pineapple and an abbreviated finish.",,Ata Rangi
"This is a gigantic expression of the variety, from high-elevation sites, an explosion of coffee, black licorice and red fruit. With a powerful backbone of bittersweet tannins and weight, the finish is reminiscent of cigar smoke.",,Delectus
"Hailing from Conner Lee Vineyard, this barrel-fermented wine was aged in two-thirds new French oak. It has aromas of toast, char, nut oil and lemon. The flavors seem faint by comparison, with the concentration not all there.",Entrapment,Guardian
"This crisp, fruity wine has delicious acidity. Gray-pink in color, it is ripe with red berries that also impart attractive freshness. The wine is crisp, tangy and textured at the end.",Le Rosé Gourmand de Lestruelle,Maison Bouey
Muddled notes of ripe berry on the nose come into sharper view on the citrus-focused palate. There is a vestige of tannin and pleasant dryness. Drink soon.,Jerry & Barry Für Fruchtige,Markus Altenburger
"Somewhat lighter in color, this wine has aromas of dried tobacco, coffee, vanilla and purple flowers. The orange peel and cranberry flavors are elegant, backed by soft tannins and citrusy acids.",,Kennedy Shah
"Aromas of nail varnish, overripe black-skinned fruit and prune lead the nose. The evolved palate offers dried black cherry, raisin, clove and a confectionary note alongside fleeting tannins. Drink now.",Riserva,Dreolino
"The oak is far out front, with this wine's aromas of Mounds Bar and green wood followed by raisinated fruit. Dark chocolate and cherry flavors are lighter in style with the concentration a bit wanting.",,Dussek Family Cellars
"The nose here is not quite as clean-cut as it could be, while the palate shows a little more focus. Crisp and zesty, if a little short.",,Nadler
"Not a simple refreshment, this has a deep pink color tinged with copper. In aroma and flavor it's almost as substantive as a red wine. It has plummy, rich and slightly earthy aromas, a smooth mouthfeel, and soft cherry and spice flavors.",Conoscenti,Galatea Effect
"This wine is 63% Cabernet Sauvignon and 37% Cabernet Franc. It shows aromas of green herbs, raisinated red fruit and raspberry. The cherry cola flavors are lighter in style, with a firm squeeze of tannins.",Dineen Vineyard,:Nota Bene
"Clear and light in color, this dusty smelling Cava offers aromas of briny peach and citrus fruits. The palate is solid, with a round texture and flavors of sulfur, lemon-lime, tangerine and nectarine. A tight, lean finish feels minerally but tastes a bit gaseous.",Hoya de Cadenas Brut,Vicente Gandia
"Flavors of berry, vanilla and tar form around thick, rich tannins, giving this wine a puckering quality that may benefit from opening before enjoying. The finish is sturdy and robust in leathery black pepper.",Winemaker Selection,Rosenblum
"A blend of Sangiovese and 20% Canaiolo, this opens with aromas of baked plum, dark berry, mocha and vanilla. The palate offers dried black cherry, sweet baking spice and a confectionary note alongside smooth but rather fleeting tannins.",Riserva,Sensi
"This lighter-style wine provides a break from your average California red and offers fruit flavors reminiscent of cranberries and dried cherries and a lean, lively texture with moderate tannins. It's medium bodied, not too ripe, and very well balanced to match with Italian food.",Organic Grapes,Girasole
"The nose on this structured red offers oak-driven aromas of toast, coconut and vanilla. The warm palate doles out ripe plum, coffee, a confectionary note and oak spices alongside the warmth of evident alcohol. Wood tannins leave an astringent, mouth-drying finish.",Puro Riserva,Fattoria Lavacchio
"This blend of Sangiovese and 10% Merlot opens with aromas of forest floor, ripe blackberry, cedar and menthol. The warm, evolved palate offers dried black cherry, licorice, mint, ground pepper and a gamy note alongside assertive, almost gritty tannins that leave an astringent finish.",Ceppeto Riserva,Mannucci Droandi
"Rough, animal-like aromas wrestle with piercing, fairly hot plum and berry scents. Rubbery, blackened, peppery plum and raspberry flavors finish oaky, mildly bitter and tannic.",El Picaro,Matsu
"Aromas of underbrush, toast and dark-skinned fruit lead the nose of this easy-drinking red. The bright, informal palate offers red cherry, pomegranate and a hint of white pepper alongside zesty acidity.",Al Canapo,Bindi Sergardi
"Made with Sangiovese and a small percentage of Cabernet Sauvignon, this opens with aromas of coconut, toast and oak-driven spice. The evolved palate offers coconut, clove and ground black pepper but the fruit richness has almost dried up entirely, leaving an astringent finish.",O'Leandro Riserva,Cennatoio
"A property owned by Château Bel Air, Ouvrard has produced a lightly fruity wine that has fresh red berry fruits and just the right amount of acidity. Light tannins act as a backbone to the general fruitiness of this wine.",Château Ouvrard,Château Bel Air
"More than four years after this wine was bottled, it is mildly oxidized and waxy on the nose, with apricot and baked apple aromas. The mouthfeel is soft and resiny, while flavors of nutty white fruits finish creamy. This smells and tastes past its prime.",Sol de Sol,Viña Aquitania
"This tasty but ultimately simple Pinot is soft and sweetly forward in raspberry jam, cola, brown sugar and oak flavors. Drink up.",,Santa Barbara Winery
"A soft and gently fruity wine that has simple apple flavors and an attractive level of acidity. The wine, with its warm fruit, is ready to drink.",,Trenel Fils
"Full and round, this is a ripe blackberry-flavored wine. It has a touch of licorice, followed by juicy fruitiness and some acidity. The aftertaste, with its flavors of wood aging, suggests it could mature through 2015.",Samora Tinto,Wines & Winemakers
"A ripe wine dominated by tropical pineapple and fresh peach. This warm, lively and fruity wine can be drunk in 2014.",Samora Branco,Wines & Winemakers
"Ripe red berries, a light structure and plenty of fresh acidity make for a wine that best drunk young.",Cortello Tinto,Dão Sul
"This Gaillac-like blend of Braucol, Duras and Syrah gives rich fruitiness and soft tannins. The wine is juicy, full of red berry and spice and an attractive light touch. It's ready to drink.",Le Rouge,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Cabernet and Syrah are an unusual blend for a rosé, but this fresh and crisp wine works well. It has a vivid pink color followed by equally vivid red fruits and refreshing final acidity. Drink now.",Le,Domaine D'en Ségur
"This wine, even at the age of four-plus years, remains dry, tannic and acidic. It has modest raspberry and cherry jam fruit, but isn't going anywhere.",La Encantada Vineyard,Due Cani
"The winery's single-vineyard 2011 Pinots varied widely in this erratic vintage. Dry and tart, the wine is marked by a vegetal streak that cuts through the raspberries and cherries.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"This wine veers between satisfyingly rich mango flavors and underripe green pea notes. Gooseberries hang in the balance, and they dominate, making the wine feel raw and green. But it is nicely dry and vital in acidity.",Black Dog Series,Hill Wine Company
Burned wood aromas reveal the smoky nature of this wine. Wood aging and a bitter chocolate character dominate. There is a question as to whether it can soften. Wait until 2017 at least.,Reserva,Casal do Conde
This simple Pinot Grigio has aromas of pears and yellow spring flowers. The palate offers tart green apple and a hint of unripened yellow peach along with fresh acidity. Pair this with light pasta dishes or pizzas.,Pulvernai,Castel Sallegg
"A typically light Brouilly that is fresh, full of cherry acidity and soft tannins. It has a juicy element, lightly herbal and with stalky, tight fruit at the end. Drink now.",Château de Saint Lager,Château de Pizay
"With black currant fruits dominant, this is an inherently fruity wine. The juicy feel makes the wine seem light, not yet quite connecting between fruit and a very dry tannic texture. Give it until 2016.",,Château des Lattes
"A soft, lightly tropical wine with attractive acidity and grapefruit as well as pineapple flavors. It is crisp, very fruity and ready to drink.",,Château Lamothe-Vincent
"A bit rustic in style, it's got black currant, raisin and tobacco flavors and lots of peppery spiciness, and the finish is thoroughly dry. But there's a brusqueness to the tannins that makes it feel rough and edgy in the mouth.",Hillside Estate,Collier Falls
"This young Pinot opens hard and tight and remains so, even after many hours. The raspberry fruit is somewhat hidden, and some off scents creep into a finish that has a bitter edge.",,A Blooming Hill Vineyard
"Jammy blackberry and plum aromas come with hints of Band-Aid and iodine. This is big and broad on the tongue, but also a little flabby. Flavors of prune, oak, blackberry and licorice finish without much drive.",Reserva,Chilcas
"The wine feels overworked, with oak used to make it richer. The result is dry, tart and thin, except for all that buttered toast.",Estate,D.R. Stephens
"This is a typically light, fruity and off dry Vinho Verde. It has an attractive, refreshing prickle on the tongue followed by crisp apples and citrus flavors. Clean, fresh and ready to drink.",Xadrez,Dão Sul
"Light tannins accompany crisp red fruits. What it lacks in weight and complexity, it makes up for with a smooth texture, good acidity and a structure that will allow it age for another year.",Vieilles Vignes,Derey Frères
"Along with ultra-ripe blackberry jam, brown sugar, and toasty wood flavors, it has high, glyceriny alcohol. Big and thick in tannins, it will pair well with richly sauced barbecue.",Cedolino Vineyard Dryfarmed Old Vine,DeRose
"This steely white offers up very little aromas. The palate delivers lip-pursing sour lemon alongside vibrant acidity, giving this a hard, lean quality.",Atagis,Loacker
"A smooth, ripe, juicy wine, with vanilla flavors from wood aging and fresh berry fruits as companions. The wine is soft, gently tannic and ready to drink.",Vale de Lobos,Quinta da Ribeirinha
"A fresh, juicy wine that does everything a Beaujolais should. With its cherry fruit and bright acidity, it would be great with turkey. Enjoy it now.",Cuvée Rochebonne,Trenel Fils
"Soft, smooth and fruity, this polished wine is full of red berry fruits and a touch of licorice. The juicy, ripe, immediately attractive aftertaste comes from the local Castelão grapes in the blend. Drink now.",Monte da Baía,Wines & Winemakers
"This is a fine, simple wine for this summer. With acidity, fresh apple and pear flavors, it's attractive and aromatic.",Dona Helena Colheita,Wines & Winemakers
"An herbaceous, youthful wine that can be drunk immediately for its fresh, crisp fruits. It's light and bright.",Vinha Padre Pedro Branco,Casa Cadaval
"Light and fruity, it's fresh and crisp with citrus and toast flavors. Already balanced and with good final acidity, it can be drunk easily now.",Bourgogne,Chartron et Trébuchet
"While dry in style, this late-harvest Riesling seems drizzled in honey and nectar. It's delicately framed, dancing spry across the palate and finishing crisp and bright. It's an elegant invigorating wine that drinks well now but should continue to meld nicely till at least 2024.",Niederhäuser Hermannshöhle Spätlese Dry Gutsabfüllung,Mathern
"Rose, violet, baking spice and red berry aromas come together on this graceful wine. The bright, subtle palate offers crushed raspberry, red cherry and white pepper alongside fine-grained tannins. A star anise note signals the close.",Pora,Musso
"Fermented with roughly one-third whole clusters, this wine brings a juicy mix of blackberry and black-cherry fruit front and center, with the AVA's wet-stone minerality underneath. This young wine seems built for the wine cellar. If you plan to drink it sooner, give it an hour in the decanter. Drink 2020_2030.",Bass Hill Vineyard,Omero
"Muted on the nose, this offers shy notes of anise and fennel that arises out of the glass over time, buoyed by a generous proportion of golden apple and honey. It veers briny around the full-bodied finish.",Josephine Hill Vineyard,Parmeson
"This inviting wine smells sweet and jammy. It tastes spicy, lightly oaky and like ripe raspberries. Full bodied and high in alcohol, it's also smooth in texture, mouthfilling and rich. Flavors like chocolate and blackberry mark the finish.",Altitude 2401 Fair Play Farms,Perry Creek
"While 2013 was not a great Port year, it produced some attractive Vintage wines such as this one. It is likely to develop quickly, already showing ripe fruit and generous dried prune flavors along with the firmer tannins. Drink this from 2020.",Vintage,Poças
"This is a smooth and fruity wine that is named after the matriarch of the family. It has some structure and a dry core, although it is the rich red and black fruits that create its main character. It is developing well, with a fine juicy streak. Drink from 2017.",Nana Reserva,Quinta da Lapa
"A solid blend of aromatic floral notes and spicy fruit, this opens with scents of rose petals and moves into a midpalate featuring red plum. There are hints of dried pine needles and overall a palate-pleasing texture.",Roserock Vineyard,Roco
"Plump blueberries, slate, gravel, turned earth and a light fennel character show on this wine, which comes in a custom bottle exclusive to the appellation's estate-grown Syrahs. The palate shows a lively acidity that briskly expresses the black pepper, black currant and espresso flavors.",Estate,Rusack
"Mouthcoating, this is a full-bodied wine with small amounts of Merlot and Cabernet Franc. Tar, leather, cedar and black cherry stand out as characteristics, with added weight from the heavier, darker elements of chocolate and oak. Drink now through 2022.",Salvestrin Estate Vineyard,Salvestrin
"One of three new wines for the producer in this vintage, this one is a blend from the Russian River Valley and Carneros estate ranches, Winside and Lawler. Pleasurable from start to finish, it's rich and brooding in black fruit and a touch of graphite, with a balance of lush earthiness.",,Stemmler
"A blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon, 26% Merlot and 4% Petit Verdot, this wine offers a bouquet that is equal parts black plum and green pepper. Fruit holds sway over chalky tannins, with flavors of black cherry and raspberry that are joined by chocolate covered espresso bean and green pepper notes.",,The Cave
"More mineral, perhaps even crystalline, in style compared to Thörle's Saulheimer Probstey Silvaner, this elegant bottling showcases pristine grapefruit and tangerine flavors. It's full bodied yet silky, uplifted by a swathe of freshly cut grass and mint that lingers long on the finish.",Saulheimer Kalkstein Trocken,Thörle
"Old-vine fruit delivers an elegant Pinot that combines low alcohol with graceful details of pretty spices and red fruits. Young, tangy cherry flavors are precisely defined, with a delicate tension. This might very well improve dramatically with a decade or more of cellaring. Drink 2020_2030.",Maresh Vineyard,Winderlea
"This wood-aged, fortified Moscatel has retained its fruitiness while also showing older, wood and toast flavors. Perfumed and fragrant, with integrated acidity, enjoy this offering soon.",Colheita,Adega de Favaios
"Firm and polished, this barrel-fermented wine is just rounded off enough, without damping the bright, almost crunchy fruit. There's a light touch of toast and the structure for further bottle age to improve it. Drink 2017_2025.",Estate,Bethel Heights
"Dark ruby in the glass, this wine has a nose of lingonberry and pomegranate with a hint of pine needles. It offers well-integrated fruit and cooling herb flavors, notably blueberry, cherry, mint, tarragon, and fennel. Ultimately fruit reigns over coolness on the velvety finish.",Yogev,Binyamina
"Perfumed berry, iris and baking spice aromas float out of the glass. The firm palate offers mature wild cherry, ripe raspberry, licorice, menthol and chopped herb while assertive but refined tannins provide support.",,Brovia
"Full bodied, this estate-made, 100% varietal wine is sinewy and dense, a combination of ripe, luscious blackberry and blueberry, akin to a compote, seasoned in lavender and black licorice. Weighty, it'll pair well with wintertime meals, finishing with a suggestion of vanilla bean.",Estate Vineyards,Burgess
"This 50-50 blend of Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon shows dried strawberries, violets, lilacs, chocolate sauce and cappuccino on the nose. The palate offers dark chocolate, strawberry and cherry flavors, along with a leveling effect from pencil lead and graphite. Watch for a future in this sort of blend from the Central Coast.",Companion,Caliza
"This bold wine has a very dark color and fresh, concentrated blackberry aromas. Generous berry and black pepper flavors seem to saturate the taste buds, leading to a lingering fruit and spice finish. The texture is almost viscous, as lots of fine tannins add grip. It's the rare wine with no added sulfites.",Estate Grown Biodynamic,Frey
"Targeted aromas of citrus, apple, grass and minerals precede a lemony laser-sharp palate that sweats the insides of one's cheeks with battery level acidity. Chiseled flavors of lemon and green apple finish long, pure and persistent.",,K5 Argiñano
"Red fruit aromas are a bit rough and scalped in front of a chunky palate. Charred, burnt, oaky flavors of raspberry and cassis stress ripeness and weight before finishing with buttery oak, a slightly greasy feel and roasted berry flavors. Drink through 2020.",Reserva,Lecco
"This extroverted and very yummy wine is dark and deep in color. It smells like it's drenched in blackberry jam and tastes almost as thick. Gobs of boysenberry and blackberry flavors carry hints of chocolate and cherry. It's not too full bodied, just full flavored.",Winemaker's Blend Reserve,Red Rock
"Forest floor and fresh-dug earth form a core around this wine's crisp, clear hit of red cherry. Buoyant acidity keeps it light and bright, with unfettered oak and tannin.",,Renteria
"Delicately perfumed with red berry, violet and a whisper of chopped mint, this is a young, elegant expression of Nebbiolo. The bright, linear palate doles out crushed cherry, juicy strawberry, white pepper and cinnamon framed in lively acidity and polished tannins. Enjoy through 2017.",Valmaggiore,Sandrone
"This opens with aromas of ripe berry, aromatic herb, pressed rose petal and a balsamic note. The rather lean palate offers sour cherry, crushed strawberry, sage and star anise alongside nervous acidity and tightly wound, astringent tannins that leave a rather raspy finish. Give this a few more years to unclench. Drink after 2019.",Cannubi Muscatel,Cascina Bruciata
"Rose, strawberry and forest floor aromas meld in the glass on this charming expression of Nebbiolo. The bright, savory palate doles out crushed strawberry, black raspberry, clove and star anise alongside silky tannins. Like a little black dress, this would be perfect for any occasion.",Carlin,Gilberto Boniperti
"This ripe Malbec offers jammy blueberry aromas that hint at raisin but pull back in the nick of time. A round pulpy palate is home to black cherry, berry and plum flavors supported by loamy earthy notes. A fleshy finish isn't exact but it's friendly. Drink through 2019.",La Madras Vineyard,Ricardo Santos
"Earthy notes of porcini mushroom and black olive blend with balsamic plum and cherry aromas. This is a touch heavy and syrupy in feel, and thus creamy flavors of chocolate, plum and berry are not surprising. On the finish, this remains creamy and ripe.",Crianza,Aspaldi
"Tender notes of Cape gooseberry are all that this wine gives away for now. The balanced palate offers a creamy, rich core with plenty of freshness, but this will be better with a bit of cellaring.",Falkenstein Reserve,Dürnberg
"This grape's traditional petrol aromas arise on this dry bottling, backed up with sweeter lemon curd and tangerine peel. The palate is quite soft and full, but there is a vibrant acidity, powered by flavors of lime rind and Bosc pear, with a long lingering finish.",,Coquelicot
"From the Touraine cru area of Chenonceaux, this is Loire Sauvignon Blanc at its ripest. It has a rich texture and and round apple and lime flavors. Coming from selected parcels, it conveys concentration as well as final freshness. Drink now.",Inphini,Domaine du Vieil Orme
"Firm and savory, this opens with aromas of ripe berry, clove and graphite. On the palate, notes of clove and black pepper add depth to ripe Morello cherry and crushed raspberry flavors.  Supple tannins offer support.",Riserva,Cantele
"A soft and ripe wine, full of apricot and apple fruitiness. An intense background of acidity shines through the rich flavors and brings out a more tangy character. It's not for long-term aging; drink now for its fruit and freshness.",Domaine des Côtes Blanches,François Millet
"A subtle nose of citrus suggests a restrained wine. Indeed, the palate is slender, citrus-fresh and light, but enlivened by the peppery varietal edge that invariably adds interest. Clean, crunchy finish.",Schlossberg,Fritsch
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (50%), Syrah (32%) and Petit Verdot offers notes of blueberries and high-toned herbs that don't entirely seem to marry. Flavors are rich and concentrated with a supple feel.",Zachary's Ladder,Gorman
"Enticing oak aromas lead to rich fruit flavors, layered tannins and a supple texture on the palate. Yes, the oak element is a bit heavy but it is delicious. Ripe cherry and plum flavors catch up, filling the mouth and lingering on the finish.",,Castello di Amorosa
"Ripe red cherry and smoke aromas eminate from the nose of this wine. In the palate the alcoholic heat sticks out a little, but there is a good streak of acidity and a silky texture. Good to drink now but will also keep and evolve 2018_2019.",,Judith Beck
"Tobacco, mature plum, espresso and toast aromas lead the nose. The round, full-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, mature blackberry, licorice, black pepper and toasted oak alongside velvety tannins.",Matanè,Matané
"Raspberries and cherry blossoms mingle on the nose of this pretty, perfumed wine. The palate is buoyant with fresh berry and cherry flavors, yet touches of forest floor and spice add complexity and depth. It's brisk in acidity and layered with fine, firm tannins.",Proprietor's Special Reserve,Millbrook
"Made with 70% Nero di Troia plus other varieties, this features aromas of ripe dark berry, bell pepper, game and tobacco. All of these carry over to the palate along with clove and ground black pepper. Assertive but drying tannins provide support. Drink through 2019.",Il Falcone Riserva,Rivera
"Like most Margaret River Cabernets, this is not a big, bombastic wine. Instead, it's medium bodied and supple in style, with notes of black cherry and cassis balanced by vanilla and baking spice. Drink now_2015.",Finisterre,Robert Oatley
"This is a well-made, widely likable Merlot made in larger quantities for a reasonable price, savory in refined tannins and vibrant red plum and blueberry. Soft and rich enough to be enjoyed at the table, it finishes with a hint of vanilla and oak.",,Rodney Strong
"A first-release from this winery founded by Napa Valley's Dennis Cakebread, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc from Seven Hills Vineyard shows notes of tomato leaf, chocolate, cherry and vanilla. The oak (44% new French and American) initially takes the lead. Fruit flavors are focused and soft, with the oak giving the tannins a slightly astringent feel.",,Mullan Road
"An aromatic nose suggests cherries in Kirsch with vanilla, derived from the exuberant Zweigelt cherry fruit paired with the mellow spice-notes of new oak. This is rounded but remains spicy and slender at its core. A red that can be enjoyed perfectly well without food.",Haidacker,Netzl
"Tannic and astringent at first taste, this wine opens up into a more complex and interesting play of dark fruits and darker flavors. Smoke, earth, char and espresso components are set against tight blueberry fruit, with lead pencil tannins. Those tannins might need a juicy steak to put them back in their cage.",Qwam Qwmt,Nk'Mip Cellars
"Plump, slightly stewy aromas of blackberry and cassis are just shy of fresh. This hot-vintage, beefy Cab is bulky and low on acidity, but friendly and easygoing. Flavors of jammy, baked blackberry fold in chocolaty richness in front of a slightly syrupy finish. Drink through 2017.",Raíces Nobles,Ochagavia
"Firm and juicy, this opens with intense aromas of violet, ripe berry and baking spice. The vibrant, delicious palate doles out crushed black cherry, succulent raspberry and black pepper alongside bright acidity and smooth tannins. Enjoy it soon with everyday fare or for informal occasions.",,Paolo Scavino
"Quite light in color, this wine packs a floral nose, with pungent tuberose along with lemon zest. It's refreshing once sipped, and the white flower character grows into a restrained tropicality, with guava most noticeable.",,Pomar Junction
"Peppery, spicy red apple notes mingle with yeasty overtones in this rounded yet streamlined Grüner. Spice and minerality hold the foreground. There is citrus verve at the core and one can almost taste wet stones. Lovely now but this will age gracefully.",,Preisinger
"Rich, almost sweet in its ripe fruit, this Madiran has been made to drink early. It is full of generous black fruits, full-bodied with tannins that are rounded and warm. A streak of acidity keeps it fresh. Drink this fruity wine now.",Maestria,Producteurs Plaimont
"Rather smoky, almost burnt oakiness obscures the fruit on the nose: That black cherry has to struggle to be heard. The palate, however, is smooth and tinges the cherry fruit with lots of cinnamon spice. Best to wait until 2016_2017 for more integration.",Altenberg Reserve,R&A; Pfaffl
"Blended from Syrah, Zinfandel, Petite Sirah and Merlot, this tastes almost like a Port. Rich, concentrated, figgy fruit aromas and flavors are compressed into this very ripe and effusive-tasting wine. The color is deep and dark, the aroma has a hint of smoke and then loads of dense fruit. The mouthfeel is rich but not too tannic.",Winemakers Blend,Schmitz 24 Brix
"Winemaker Scot Covington trained with Merry Edwards and his prowess with Pinot shows through in this spicy, structured release, adorned in plum and dark cherry fruit. The finish is grippy and marked by a pronounced and inviting nuance of earthy forest floor.",River Road Ranch,Trione
"With half of the fruit coming from Kelly Vineyard in The Rocks region of the Walla Walla Valley, this leafy offering of the variety has notes of green herbs, cherry and vanilla. It's dazzling in feel, coating the palate from end to end with velvety soft cherry flavors that linger on the finish. Some may find the aromas too green on this cool-vintage wine but the flavors and feel will make others swoon.",,Trust
"Very crisp and very fresh, this thrives on its bright sliced apple flavors. A tight texture gives a lemon tang. It's still young and should be given until late 2015.",Grande Cuvée Brut,Veuve Doussot
"Ripe apple flavors are pervaded by yeasty richness. The palate is more slender than the nose at first suggests and is made more lively by tight, spritzy acidity. Yeasty notes give an added earthiness and beautifully long finish.",Nussberg,Weingut Mayer am Pfarrplatz
"Nicely perfumed on the nose, this Merlot has 10% Cabernet Sauvignon and 10% Syrah blended in, giving it a well-rounded composition and bright black cherry around firm, still prominent tannins. It could use some time in the cellar, through 2018, or a decant.",,Whitehall Lane
"A blend of 55% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Merlot, 15% Malbec and 10% Petit Verdot, this reflects a pleasing mixture of each, with notes of blackberry, raspberry, plum and fresh herbs. Fruit flavors are plush and up front backed by chewy tannins.",Bishop's Blend,William Church
"This wine backs up the price tag with a fruit-forward nose showing blackberry, black cherry, dried mint and tarragon. The palate is more tart, with dried sour cherries, espresso-bean bitterness, lava rocks and graphite. It's surprisingly both dark and lean, offering solid complexity.",OPR,Callaway
"Doug Margerum makes this traditional Chianti-like blend for a couple who owns the vineyard, and they must delight in the raspberry extract and graphite notes that show on the nose. Better still is the palate, with light and tight strawberry, a touch of cedar and an intriguing mix of light density yet grippy tannins that will shine even brighter in years to come. Drink 2018_2025.",Riserva,Cent'Anni
"This is winemaker Ross Cobb's own family project, from extremely cool sites along the Sonoma Coast, including the family's own Coastlands vineyard. Here, with Rice-Spivak, he skirts the edge of ripeness, producing a light, bright wine that's at first hard to penetrate. Faint notes of tart cherry and pomegranate weave through like a fog, a seasoning of allspice on the finish.",Rice-Spivak Vineyard,Cobb
"An enticing, spicy, cedary, toasty aroma leads to generous flavors of black cherry, wood smoke and dried plum. The body is full, the texture is bold, firmly tannic and buoyed by acidity that provides grip on the palate and makes it a great match for rich proteins. Best after 2019.",Estate,Easton
"From the folks at Merryvale, this is a blend of Petit Verdot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Malbec, Syrah and Petite Sirah. Big, dense and juicy, with a dusty tannic underbite, it's bold, brambly and exuberantly delicious.",,Forward Kidd
"This tastes complex, mellow and delicious, showing diverse aroma nuances like bay leaf and forest floor in addition to more fruity, black cherry, cinnamon and clove notes. It is full bodied, very ripe and juicy, and feels smooth in texture thanks to subdued acidity and tannins.",Two Barrel,Masút
"Nearly opaque in darkness, this extremely rare wine grape, originally from Italy's Alto Adige, delivers aromas of charred and juicy roasted game, blackberry-mint syrup and balsamic figs. It's not quite so showy on the palate at first, but then a violety, blueberry and rose petal character emerges, along with Earl Grey tea elements and a decently grippy tannic structure. It's quite intriguing.",Joughlin Vineyard,Santa Barbara Winery
"Intriguing, complex aromas of mocha, beef broth and dried flowers lead into a wine that's medium to full in body but nicely elegant, with fruit wrapped around a core of sinewy tannins. Marinated beef notes linger on the silky finish.",,Sélection Laurence Féraud
"A bold but well-behaved wine, this is spicy and meaty in aroma, generously layered with flavors of black plums, blackberries and incredibly velvety tannins. The way that the core of delicious fruit is shrouded in thick but soft tannins and threaded with acidity is a marvel. It's tempting to drink now but lay it down until 2018 if possible.",Les Côtes De L'Ouest,Terre Rouge
"The flagship bottling for this winery, this brings aromas of dried herbs, dark chocolate, espresso bean, black currant and cherry. The dark fruit flavors are rich and concentrated, possessing a layered mouthfeel that captures the attention.",,Barrister
"This offers pretty aromas of perfumed dark berry, cake spice, leather, toast and a balsamic note. The full-bodied palate offers young red cherry, mint, oak, espresso and sage. Firm but velvety tannins and bright acidity provide the framework while a mocha note closes the finish.",Sorì Ginestra,Conterno Fantino
"Still in its shell, this wine reveals aromas of violets, black licorice, tar, crushed granite and dark fruit with a bit of coaxing in the glass. It's full bodied, with tart, tangy fruit flavors that need time to stretch their legs. Drink after 2020.",Eléni,Efeste
"This wine is a joy to drink with its aromas and flavors of coffee, dark chocolate, herbs and cherry. The opulently styled flavors are rich but well balanced, with chewy tannins backing it all up. It's irresistible.",WWBDX,Full Pull & Friends
"Golden yellow in color, this aged, vintage cuvée is light and floral, with tastes of guava and fennel around a full, creamy texture and buoyant acidity. Disgorged in July 2014, it stays fresh and vibrant throughout the lengthy finish.",Carneros Cuvée,Gloria Ferrer
"This wine captivates with its exotic aroma profile of citrus peel, mango, leather, cranberries and pepper. The acid is bright and it possesses a textured, palate-coating mouthfeel and a long finish that demands attention.",Reserva Upland Vineyard,Idilico
"A blend of fruit from Boushey, Ciel du Cheval and Seven Hills vineyards, this wine opens with aromas of plum, Asian spices, licorice, dark fruit and light barrel spices. The palate is rich, full bodied and velvety, with abundant coffee flavors and a mesmerizing sense of texture.",Bourgeois,Maison Bleue
"A line up of McGregor's 2010 and 2011 Pinot Noirs make a bold statement for Finger Lakes Pinot, but the regular label 2011 is drinking particularly well now. Lifted violet and berry notes are intoxicating on this spicy, deftly balanced wine. Rich, ripe black-cherry and raspberry flavors blend into a liquid silk on the palate, but are framed squarely by fine-grained tannins and a spray of cranberry acidity. The finish goes on and on. Likely to drink beautifully from now through at least 2020.",,McGregor
"Bellwether's single-vineyard Pinot stands out for its gorgeously lifted, blossomy perfume. The palate is a cherry bomb of flavor, yet elegantly framed by a razor's edge of acidity and soft, feathery tannins. Drinks beautifully now, but will be a joy to mature from 2020_2025.",Sawmill Creek Vineyard,Bellwether
"Acidic on the nose, like a cider, this late-harvest wine made from 100% Sauvignon Blanc retains 130 g/L residual sugar, and is rounded and plush. Appropriately sweet, it is completely balanced, tasting purely of baked pear, finding a hint of nutmeg on the lengthy finish.",Late Harvest,Bodkin
"Lusty aromas of baked blackberry, cinnamon and violet are full and welcoming. This blend of Monastrell, Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot is intense and demanding on the palate. Spicy, lightly herbal flavors of blackberry and cassis finish solid and round, with loamy depth. Drink through 2019.",Soul Limited Edition,Crápula
"From one of the best vineyard sites in the Barbaresco-making village of Neive, this offers aromas of raspberry, tilled soil, tobacco and chopped herbs. The chewy, delicious palate doles out juicy black cherry, crushed blackberry and baking spice alongside enveloping, velvety tannins and fresh acidity. It's a superb Barbera.",Vigna Santo Stefano,Castello di Neive
"Holding 65% Cabernet Sauvignon, 25% Cabernet Franc and 10% Merlot, this wine offers brooding aromas of fresh herbs, cherry, mocha and vanilla. The palate displays pleasing density and weight to the cranberry and cherry flavors that are accented by bright, zippy acidity.",Monte Regalo,Chandler Reach
"Coming from a site across from Cold Creek, this wine offers notes of toast, sautéed herbs, blackberry and spice. It's rich, power packed and layered with dark fruit flavors and firm tannins__n excellent mixture of power and elegance.",Reserve Wautoma Springs Vineyard,Columbia Crest
"This rich, structured wine is packed with both firm tannins and rich red fruits. Still young, it has all the makings of a dense, balanced wine that will reflect the great fruit of the vintage. Age this smoky, full-bodied wine and drink from 2017.",Cuvée les Rochettes,Domaine les Pins
"This wine is rich with apricot and pineapple fruits that give ripeness and a smooth, while always tangy texture. It is beautifully structured with its creamy fruits, cut with intense acidity and delicious depth of flavor. This opulent wine is ready to drink.",La Bourgeoise,Henri Bourgeois
"Made from a blend of grapes from the estate's top vineyards, this vivacious dry Riesling balances crisp mineral tones against ripe, tropical notes of mango, pineapple and melon. It's lusciously mouthcoating yet cut with strikes of tangerine and lime. Delightful now, but structured enough to improve through at least 2023.",Reserve Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"Light aromas of basil and thyme mix with coffee, cherry and vanilla. The palate is all about elegance and detail with drawn-out fruit flavors, chewy tannins and tart acids. Just a baby now, this wine has a long life in front of it. It will be best from 2020_2025.",Plus One,Rasa
"A light golden color, this wine offers aromas of honeycomb, white peach and prickly pear. The tropical flavors are ripe yet elegant, with a creamy, rich feel that leads to an extended finish.",Dream Deferred,Rasa
"This wine resonates earth, apple, chalk and oatmeal with purity and poise, yet is less about fruit and more about structure and elegance. The balance here is astounding: autolysis subsumes acidity and turns it into a luminous, resonant, cool glow. Restrained elegance and subtle balance are central themes__he finish is long, subtle and creamy.",Blanc de Noirs,Ridgeview Estate
"Two-thirds Cabernet Sauvignon with the balance Petit Verdot, Merlot, Malbec and Carménère, this brooding wine brings aromas of moist soil, herb, black tea, eucalyptus, fig and spice. It's full in feel, tart and tightly wound with bright acids and chewy tannins__ wine intended for the long haul. Enjoy after 2020.",Pentad,Seven Hills
"Here is a generous, full-throttle, high-octane Zin, with lots of rich oak accents and a touch of sweetness. Aromas of strawberry jam, maple syrup and hickory-smoked bacon are followed by rich fruit flavors, full body, light tannins and a jammy finish.",Epicenter Old Vines,Mettler Family Vineyards
Here's a straightforward and fruity Nero d'Avola that offers delicious blackberry and black cherry flavors that are accented by a hint of Mediterranean herbs. The ripe palate is brightened by just enough fresh acidity.,,Morgante
"The companion to the Merlot-dominated Abbinare, Miscela has a bit more Cabernet Sauvignon, and adds a splash of Syrah to the otherwise Bordeaux blend. Some leathery aromas and distinct notes of black olive, earth and iodine keep this in the herbal rather than fruit-driven camp; the finish is drying out. Drink soon.",Miscela,:Nota Bene
"Bristling in acidity and steely in wet stone, this SB is crisp and layered in lemon, with more lemon on the finish. It yearns for shellfish.",Redwood Ranch,Ousterhout
"This rounded white starts with aromas of lemon peel, orange jam, spice and flowers, followed by appealing flavors of citrus and white fruit. It has body and structure, and will temper spicy food well: think Indian, Szechuan.",Dry White,My Big Fat Greek Wine
"In its flight, this medium-bodied wine was relatively restrained. While it delivers honeyed tropical and citrus fruits on the nose, the flavors are of melon and citrus, which fade quickly on the finish.",Invitare,M. Chapoutier
"This dark ruby-colored wine has aromas of menthol, black cherry and lavender. Flavors of blackberry, Dr. Pepper, ground clove and mace form a united front on the palate among heavy, mouth-coating tannins. The lasting finish wraps up with a surprisingly zesty note of fresh ginger.",Nero D'Avola-Urla Karasi,Urla
"Licorice, cigar box and a touch of mint highlight the ripe plum-driven aromas on this wine from New Orleans-hailing, Santa Ynez-residing Iris Rideau. A plush mouthfeel comes alongside blueberry notes and apparent tannins that aren't overly grippy. It's a little hot, but also retains an refreshing acidity.",La Presa,Rideau
"Spicy ginger and smoke tones meld with ripe grapefruit on this unusually refreshing Gewürztraminer. The palate is juicy with characteristic lychee and rose-petal flavors, but brisk and bright, with a shower of lemony acidity.",Estate,Rooster Hill
"The blend is 76% Cabernet Sauvignon, 21% Merlot and 3% Petiit Verdot. It's all about the barrels right now, having spent 20 months in 50% new French oak. Toast, clove, cocoa and dark roast coffee flavors abound, but underneath the tart fruit carries some green notes. Decant for some time prior to consuming.",RP Reserve,Ryan Patrick
"This stainless-steel fermented and aged wine is loaded with ripe fruit flavors of apple, melon, pineapple and apricot. Great acidity underscores the clean and fresh midpalate. Excellent concentration and refreshing minerality makes this one to buy by the case.",Naked,Ryan Patrick
"This opens with aromas of toast, plum and chocolate that are accented by whiffs of blue flower, tilled soil and leather. The palate offers black cherry, plum, nutmeg and clove alongside racy acidity and astringent wood tannins that dry out the finish.",Hero,Selvanova
"Fairly soft, smoky and toasty, it layers raspberry and blueberry fruit with veins of espresso and dark chocolate. Young and tart, it brings a little heat and finishes with some chalky tannins.",,Sequel
"Dark plum, cracked clove, tart berry and a bit of rockiness kick off this wine from tour operator-turned-winemaker Art Sevtap. Tart and tannic, flavors range from cranberry to raspberry. The wine would go well alongside pasta with red sauce or chicken enchiladas.",Wish You Were Here,Sevtap
"A delicate study in Golden Delicious apple and ginger undertones, this wine is also hearty in toast and oak, concentrated and rich with a clean finish of vanilla and hazelnut. A good call with buttery seafood like fresh-caught lobster.",Wild Oak Vineyard,St. Francis
"Made from a blend of Inzolia, Grecanico, Catarratto and Chardonnay, this bright, refreshing wine is great for summer sipping. It offers juicy white peach, tart green apple, lemon zest and grapefruit sensations that slide easily across the palate.",Regaleali Bianco,Tasca d'Almerita
"Lifting aromas of orange blossom, night jasmine and pear lead the way. On the palate, there is a salty character along with freshly cut kiwi, exotic spice and a tad of bitter greens on the finish.",,Testarossa
"This off-dry Riesling brings in its residual sugar at 23 g/L, offset with juicy acidity. Peach and papaya fruit rule the day in this forward, fruit-driven, enjoyable quaffer.",,Three Rivers
"Minerality and fruit take turns hogging the spotlight in this elegant off-dry Riesling. While brisk and breezy on the palate, it calibrates concentrated white grapefruit and peach flavors with deep tones of wax, wet stone and steel. Finishes long with an airy wisp of blossom.",Semi-Dry,Treleaven
"Fermented and aged in barriques, this structured Chardonnay opens with aromas of subtle oak, citrus and lemon drop. The palate delivers fresh acidity and flavors of toast, apple, butterscotch and nut.",Bidis,Valle dell'Acate
"Here's a structured blend of 80% Aglianico and 20% Piedirosso that offers sensations of licorice, blackberry, graphite, spice, espresso, mineral and oak. The dense fruit is supported by bracing tannins.",,Villa Matilde
"This straightforward wine offers palate-pleasing purple berry and plum fruit, lightly dusted with baking spices. The balance and flavors are all in good proportion, though considerably lighter than the previous vintage.",Gamache Vineyards,William Church
"This warm and friendly Sicilian Syrah opens with aromas of tilled soil, leather, game, black fruit and spice. The dense, soft palate offers ripe blackberry, prune, black currant and cracked black pepper alongside velvety tannins. Rich fruit makes up for the lack of complexity.",Krio,Curto
"Whiffs of lychee and pink grapefruit accent fresh florals on this slightly off-dry Gewürztraminer. It's plush on the palate with juicy stone-fruit flavors, but also bright with lemony acidity. Finishes elegantly with a murmur of tea-leaf tannins.",Sunrise Hill Vineyard,Damiani
"Wet slate, raspberry and rose water aromas reveal the Grenache base to this Rhône blend. On the palate, dried cherries and goji berries mix it up with persistent florals, dill and wispy tobacco flavors. Though lighter in color and body, this would pair will with hearty fare, such as beef stew.",Cuvee Constantine,Demetria
"Showing some wood-aging aromas, this is a rich, tropical fruit-flavored wine balanced by acidity that goes with its peach and mango flavors. Ready to drink, it will be even better in 2015.",Cuvée Spéciale,Domaine André Bonhomme
"The fuller bodied, layered Assyrtiko from northern Greece starts with aromas of grapefruit, lemon and pineapple, followed by exotic fruit and sea salt on the palate. Vibrant but offering softer fruit flavors, the wine finishes fresh and clean.",Château Julia,Domaine Costa Lazaridi
"Fresh and fruity, it offers a touch of citrus as well as acidity with pear and red apple flavors. The lightest hint of wood rounds the wine out. Drink now.",Les Villeranges,Domaine Faiveley
La Roche Vineuse is a commune in the Mâcon region. This ripe and lemon-scented wine presents peach and citrus flavors. Fresh and fruity acidity turns rich and smooth at the end. Drink now.,Vieilles Vignes,Domaine Olivier Merlin
"A single-vineyard wine, it's beautifully perfumed, stylish and discloses lively acidity alongside bright, fresh fruits. Red berries and tight tannins give a fragrant feel. Drink from 2016.",Longeroies,Domaine René Bouvier
"This huge Malbec defines jammy and concentrated. The bouquet is ripe, soft and minty, while the palate echoes the nose with thickness and density. Flavors of prune, raisin, tea and blackberry are borderline syrupy, while the finish is smooth and pure but doesn't offer much spine or foundation. Drink this modern Malbec sooner rather than later.",Marchiori Vineyard Block C2,Viña Cobos
"It's not just the succulent blueberry, black cherry, mocha, currant, bacon and new oak flavors that make this wine so impressive__t's the structure. The tannins are as gorgeous as Napa is capable of producing, while the acidity is delicate and finessed. The blend is 96% Syrah and 4% Petite Sirah. Drink now after decanting or through 2016.",Relentless,Shafer
"Sourced from The Pines vineyard on the Oregon side of the Columbia Valley, this is a wonderful anomaly for Zin lovers. Loaded with ripe, sweet fruits and accented with a wash of bourbon barrel, this is a riot of blackberry, boysenberry, black cherry and cassis flavors. Just a dash of milk chocolate seeps into the finish. It's too yummy not to drink this up while it's in the first flush of youth.",Old Vine,Sineann
"There is such pure fruit in this crisp, clean wine. Apples and green plums lend a sharp line of freshness and acidity. At the finish, the wine is richer with hints of peppery spice. Screwcap.",Weissenkirchner Steinriegel Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"Turkey Flat's Shiraz is a Barossa classic, and the 2008 shows no ill effects of the heatwave that struck during vintage. It's intensely concentrated and richly textured, with fresh black currant notes accented by hints of mocha and mint. Finishing firm and crisp without being edgy, this has just the right structure to carry it through at least 2025.",,Turkey Flat
"Deeply mineral from nose to finish, this off-dry kabinett balances lush peach, apricot and grapefruit flavors with striking earth tones of wet slate and granite. It's textured on the palate with a long, lingering tangerine-flavored finish.",Kabinett,Robert Weil
"Sweet and savory interplay through this exotic TBA, balancing waves of candied orange rind and caramelized sugar with umami-rich notes of sea breeze and dried herb. It's delicate on the palate, but lingers long with bright tangerine acidity. Delicious now, but would be fascinating to try in 10 years.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Trockenbeerenauslese,Robert Weil
"This is a standout wine for the vintage, but it's too immature to fully appreciate now. The palate is ripe and rich with cherry and raspberry flavors touched with a briary, sappy aroma. Mushroom and cola notes are dark and brooding, giving the wine the backbone to negotiate the next 7_8 years in the cellar.",Karmen Isabella Dutton Ranch,Dutton Estate
"Fresh herbs and florals brighten the nose of this exceptionally balanced Riesling. It's dry in style, yet intensely fruity, with bursts of pink grapefruit and guava that extend through a lush, creamy palate. Drink now through 2014 for its bright, floral exuberance.",Hattenheim Ortslage Kabinett,Baron Knyphausen
"For an Australian Grenache, this has an invitingly cool, herbal bouquet, hinting at dried flowers and black tea. But it's unapologetically full-bodied and rich on the palate, adding black cherries and dark chocolate to the mix. It's warm, velvety and almost fudge-like on the finish yet not raisiny at all. Drink it over ?the next few years.",Bush Vine,Chapel Hill
"A terrific value for the price, this is a full-bodied, richly textured Shiraz that looks capable of aging through at least 2025. Blueberry and baking-spice notes show the way, leading into a long, dusty finish that would go well with steak or roast beef.",Gold Label,Wolf Blass
"This is an interesting experiment of sorts from the folks at Yalumba__he finished alcohol level is unusually low at just 12.9%. Tart cherry and raspberry flavors are underscored by dark chocolate shadings. Despite the moderate alcohol level, the wine gives the impression of ample weight and displays fine, elegantly silky tannins.",Paradox,Yalumba
"There's quite a bit of new French oak used in this blend, adding complexity in the form of buttered toast notes. But the wine is really all about fruit__assive flavors of limes, Meyer lemons, apricots, oranges, pineapples, peaches and honey. While that sounds like a laundry list, if you pay attention you'll find each strand of the tapestry. At the same time, it's bone dry and balanced with acidity. Don't drink it too cold.",Don Miguel Vineyard Estate Grown and Bottled,Marimar Estate
"The Block 23 vineyard consists of Pommard-clone Pinot Noir. The resultant wine keeps a tight focus on lovely raspberry and cherry flavors. Ample acidity supports the fruit, giving it a crisp, clean and fresh mouthfeel. It's racy, lightly spicy, and beautifully balanced.",Block 23,Shea
"While delicious now with flavors of raspberries, cherries, cola and oak, all showered with tart, citrusy acidity, this wine also has a great future. Give it 6_8 years to evolve in the bottle for further complexity.",Rincon Vineyard,Talley
"This is a fine, ageable Pinot Noir that's dry and crisp with acidity. It exhibits a mushroomy earthiness that frames strawberry, cranberry and cola flavors. The window of drinkability begins in 2015.",Camp Meeting Ridge Block 11,Flowers
"This is always one of Mendoza's classiest blends. There's big fruit, dry wood, bacon and balsamic notes on the alluring bouquet. Full, elastic tannins support cassis and berry flavors as well as more than enough oak. This is dry, lightly herbal, powerful and saucy tasting on the finish. 60% Malbec, 30% Bonarda and 10% Cabernet Sauvignon.",Corte A,Vistalba
"Rich and floral, this top-notch Pinot Blanc hits the palate with verve and ripe, complex fruit flavors. There's a streak of delicious vanilla under the honeydew and Meyer lemon richness, and the length and power are especially impressive for a Pinot Blanc.",Estate Grown,WillaKenzie Estate
"Reflecting the fruity, forward style of the vintage, this wine is packed with ripe black currants. There is a strong Cabernet character__t's dry initially, then followed by juiciness. It's a concentrated wine, although not for long-term aging. Drink from 2017.",,Château Grand-Puy-Lacoste
"This is a wine that is already delicious, with juicy black currant flavors and open acidity. There is structure and aging potential as well, however, giving this wine the best of both worlds. It finishes with a fine, fresh feel and a dry edge. Drink from 2017.",,Château Kirwan
"This Riesling is exotic, with whiffs of rose petal and evergreen against a backdrop of white peach and yellow-cherry flavors. It's delicately structured, with soft, pink-grapefruit acidity that draws out honey and tea notes on the finish. It's gorgeous now, but should gain earthy complexity as it ages over the next 10 years.",Hattenheimer Wisselbrunnen Spätlese Gold Cap,Baron Knyphausen
"Apricots and smooth honey come through strongly in this beautiful wine. It has a rich, mellifluous texture, and accents of sweet spice are lifted by a shot of lemon zest. Drink from 2017.",,Château Filhot
"Rich almonds, ripe peaches and a smoky, oxidized character all come together in this ripe, complex, fascinating wine. There is a great tang of apple acidity on the finish. Drink now.",Vin Jaune,Domaine Daniel Dugois
"As soon as this Chardonnay hits the mouth, it explodes with ripe, heady flavors of pineapples, mangoes and limes. There's a complexity to the palate that makes it hard to believe its unoaked.",Unoaked,Alpha Omega
"This is a really good Pinot Noir that will gain traction in the cellar. The cool vintage conditions show in the acidity and lean framework, but the California sun triumphs with flavors of ripe sour cherries with suggestions of mushrooms and minerals. Dry and complex, it should be better after 2016.",Rosella's Vineyard,Bernardus
"Bella Vida replaces the Abbey Ridge bottling and does so with pizzazz. The best of the 2011 releases, this is a beautiful expression of grapes grown on red clay soils, with refined, deeply penetrating flavors of ripe raspberries. Smooth, supple and long, with uncommon purity, it finishes with a kiss of chocolate from 18 months in one-quarter new oak barrels.",Bella Vida Vineyard Unfiltered,J. Christopher
"This particular cuvée is fermented in a large acacia barrel which helps to round out the fruity flavors without sacrificing focus or precision. It's pleasantly grassy, with a strong pineapple flavor at the core. With excellent length, structure and mouthfeel, this wine could be cellared for another five or six years.",Croft Vineyard _ber-Sauvignon,J. Christopher
"Good, crisp flavors of melon and pineapple are the focus here. The acidity keeps the wine fresh and lively, and a light touch of caramel runs through the palate pleasing finish.",Seven Springs Vineyard,Evening Land
"Homer is the estate reserve, and it's a complete, elegant and stylish wine, that is still in its infancy. Pretty baking spices wrap around tart cherry flavors. There's superb balance among components of fruit, herb, acid and tannin, and it's got excellent length, proportion and detail.",Homer,Shea
"Winemakers fight to get fruit from this coveted vineyard, which famously produces ageworthy Pinots. Siduri's 2012 vintage is surprisingly versatile with lovely raspberry, cherry and cocoa flavors, accented with sweet oak. The balance is impeccable, with fine acidity and soft, refined tannins. You can certainly enjoy it now, but it should also develop well through 2018.",Keefer Ranch Vineyard,Siduri
"Here is an easy and fresh Moscato d'Asti that offers a balanced dose of sweetness backed by honey, peach, exotic fruit and white flower. The mouthfeel is creamy and soft with plush, foamy cream.",,Vino dei Fratelli
"This is the kind of Cabernet Sonoma County produces so effortlessly. It's full-bodied, dry and smooth, with a touch of smoky oak. The cherry and blackberry fruit is ripe and luscious. An easy wine to drink now.",Got Away,Storyteller
"A power trio of beeswax, toasted baguette and apple aromas are at the fore, with a button-mushroom accent adding interest. The palate tastes of wax and spiced toast. Although the wine's acidity starts slightly flat, it picks up some steam on the midpalate.",Reserve,Sunset Hills
"The aromas are light and elusive, with the palate bringing broad, medium-bodied, fresh cranberry flavors. It's cleanly made, if a bit innocuous.",,Williamson Vineyard
"Falls somewhere between everyday and fancy, with an unripe, green edge and sharp acidity marring the silky texture and raspberry and cherry fruit.",Robert's Vineyard,Sebastiani
"This smells stalky and leathery, while the mouthfeel is tannic, raw and racy. Flavors of baked black fruits turn herbal upon closer consideration, while the finish feels drawing and tastes leathery and peppery, without much fruit.",Celeste Crianza,Torres
This is a simple and fresh Italian sparkler that offers white flower and peach backed by citrus and almond. A touch of soft sweetness adds a chewy spot that is followed by creamy mousse.,Extra Dry,Terre di San Venanzio Fortunato
"A rich, somewhat one-dimensional wine. It has ripe orange, peach, lemon and lime flavors, brightened with plenty of zesty acidity.",,Barlow
"This is a very perfumed wine, with the addition of Moscatel in the blend, adding the lychee flavor. It's textured with a crisp edge that allows the wine to retain its fresh character. This is a wine to be drunk young.",JP Azeitão Branco,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"This is a bright, fruity wine, full of acidity and generous red fruit flavors with a soft texture. This will be ready to drink in a year.",Chão das Rolas,Herdade da Comporta
"This is a moderately aromatic Viognier, with notes of white peach, yellow apple, and flowers. It's medium bodied and clean, with a textured feel but doesn't quite have the fruit concentration to match.",Williamson Vineyard,Koenig Vineyards
"Lots of delicious orange flavor in this pretty wine. It's overtly sweet, but a too soft for comfort.",Timber Crest Vineyard,Kokomo
This is a fresh and light Prosecco that puts great emphasis on citrus and grapefruit aromas. Beyond those layers are touches of white flower and peach. Try this wine with a bowl of warm popcorn.,Heritage Extra Dry,Canti
"Mocha, coffee, leather, brandied red fruit and a grassy aroma define the bouquet on this sweet, ripe-tasting Cabernet that's full of cherry and candied berry flavors. A sweet, jammy finish has a little burn to offer.",,Emevé
"A jolly, fruity wine__ery Beaujolais__ith a touch of bananas to go with cherry flavors and soft tannins. Ready to drink, and best served slightly chilled.",Sélection,Georges Duboeuf
"This is a Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend aged for almost two years in about half new French oak. It's a structured, tannic wine, true to its Cabernet Sauvignon roots, and the herbal tendencies of Cab Franc.",The Beat,GrapeHeart Vineyards
"This fiery Grenache delivers heat, bold fruit and cured meat aromas on what amounts to a flaming bouquet. Red fruit flavors dominate this forceful wine, while the finish turns meaty and salty tasting.",Pagano,Hacienda La Lomita
"For a basic Chardonnay, this fits the bill. Citrus and peach aromas are standard and clean. The palate is tight and juicy, with no overt oak feel. Flavors of melon and pear have light spice and vanilla accents, while the finish is crisp.",Reserva,Finca El Origen
"A simple Chardonnay, full in the mouth, spoiled by touches of sulphur. The wine should develop and bring out the ripe peach flavors that are lying beneath the surface.",,Domaine Corine Perchaud
"A half dozen unrelated red grapes are tossed into the mix here, making a serviceable blend with no distinctive flavor or focus. It's a stewpot red, fine for everyday enjoyment.",Farmhouse,David Hill
Le Grillaie offers easy fruit tones of cherry and blackberry with touches of cola and licorice at the back. This simple red white would pair well with a heaping plate of pasta and meat sauce.,Le Grillaie,Celli
"Pure blackberry aromas are friendly, however the palate is scratchy and sharp, with acidity that creates angularity and tartness. That's offset by generic black-fruit flavors and a touch of mocha. This is good Monastrell although the acidity is piercing.",Viña Honda,Bodegas Silvano Garcia
"Tastes surprisingly ripe__ven overripe__ith dark chocolate, prune and caramelized oak flavors. Yet the tannin-acid structure is pure Napa__ine and elegant.",Bambino,Chiarello Family Vineyards
"There is a roasted, slightly burnt scent to this wine, leading into smoky flavors of ground coffee and tar, wrapped around light red fruit.",,Clearwater Canyon
"Thick purple foam tops this bubbly Lambrusco as it sits in the glass. In the mouth, the wine is semisecco, or slightly sweet, and it delivers plump aromas of black fruit and raspberry jam.",Contrada Borgoleto,Cantina di Puianello
"Briny fruit and distant toast aromas get this Cava started. The palate feels foamy, while pithy flavors of mildly bitter, heavy white fruits finish with a touch of burn and generic citrus.",Brut,Conde de Subirats
"This is a sweet and ripe expression of Sangiovese that shows tones of cherry liqueur followed by a touch of wild strawberry. This easy-drinking wine shows loads of easy, fresh fruit.",Sassetto,Villa Bagnolo
This is a fresh sparkling rosé wine that opens with thin aromas of cranberry and wild berry alongside subtle tones of bitter almond and apricot. The wine is very easy and informal overall.,Oltrenero Cruasé Brut,Tenuta Il Bosco
"This Syrah, Merlot and Malbec blend is full bodied and tannic. It has rich, ripe blackberry and chocolate flavors. An everyday wine for drinking with barbecue or tacos.",Ranchero,Silver Buckle
There's a sweet touch of ripe peach and pineapple here followed by fragrant citrus and tangerine skin. This is an easy expression of Pinot Grigio that shows soft peach notes on the close.,,Pizzolato
"Deep gold in color, this is a finely perfumed, toffee-rich wine, with a tannic edge, wood flavor, intense acidity and great concentration. It's a great example of aged tawny, and it's ready to drink now.",RP30 Tawny 30 Years,Ramos-Pinto
"Yummy is the word that best describes this wine, but there's much more than just ripe berry flavors. Juicy, fresh and focused, this is akin to drinking liquid raspberries that are drizzled over clean rocks. It is a deep, intense wine that should dazzle you for up to a decade or more.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Syncline
"As this wine constantly changes in the glass, it is one to linger over to enjoy all of its subtleties. It offers rich, complex cherry and currant flavors, and the oak influence brings mocha and toast notes. The tannins and acids shape the balanced mouthfeel. It can be consumed now, but it should develop additional nuances over the next eight years.",,Solomon Hills
"As usual, the 2009 Bello Rosso is a 50-50 blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon. Almost magisterial, this wine is forceful and balanced, and it is packed with black fruits that are matched to the perfectly ripe tannins.",Bello Rosso,Walla Walla Vintners
"Formerly Tenuta di Biserno, Tenuta dei Pianali produces Coronato specifically for the U.S. market. This blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc opens with bold and fleshy cherry fruit backed by savory tones of pipe tobacco, leather, chocolate and exotic spice. The wine is full, soft and generous on the palate. Drink now or hold five more years.",Coronato,Tenuta dei Pianali
"This Tuscan blend opens with inky dark concentration and soft aromas of ripe cherry and chocolate fudge. You can taste the plump, ripe and opulent flavors that will carry this age-worthy wine far into the future. The tannins are smooth and soft: Drink after 2016.",Le Serre Nuove,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"The power of Corton-Charlemagne is apparent in this dense, ripe wine. Rich and generous, this selection has tropical fruit flavors that are balanced by citrus notes, and the wood influence acts as subtle support.",,Maison Jessiaume
"Champ Gain is on the upper slope of Puligny-Montrachet. This is a rich, toasty and ripe-fruited selection, full of yellow fruit, mango and clementine flavors. It also reveals the minerality found in most wines from this village.",Champ Gain Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Santenots, like most premier crus, is located halfway down the slope. This is structured, yet it remains ripe and fruity, and it shows off the voluptuous texture that's characteristic of Volnay. There is fine balance between the acidity and fruit, and the dry core promises aging potential.",Santenots Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This Petit Verdot delivers blackberry, cherry and cassis flavors, followed by rum cake, leather and tobacco shadings. Firm tannins and bright acids give this wine aging potential. Peter Warren Selections & Planet Wine.",,Podere San Cristoforo
"Power and depth mark this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Malbec and Syrah. Midnight black in color, this has thick tannins, and sweet and savory flavors of blackberry jam, chocolate, bacon, black pepper and vanilla. It should continue to develop over the next six years, at least.",Terra Del Cuore,Patland
"Clos des Varoilles is completely owned by Domaine des Varoilles. This wine is rich and full in the mouth, and it combines opulence with a big, solid structure. Certainly requiring age, this is packed with ripe red-berry and black cherry flavors, layered with dark, smoky tannins.",Clos des Varoilles Vieilles Vignes Premier Cru,Domaine des Varoilles
"This wine has great structure, with tart acidity and firm minerality that bolsters the flavors of pear and orange. It feels racy and elegant all the way through.",Cinghiale Vineyard Reserve,Del Dotto
"This firm, structured wine has ripe, restrained tannins that lend the palate a sense of elegance. It's a fruity selection, packed with acidity and red berry flavors, and it has a firm finish. Keep this for at least eight years.",,Domaine Champy
"Classic Fort Ross Pinot Noir, this is rich and textural. The flavors of raspberry parfait and cherry pie are spicy, honeyed and brightened by acidity. Drink now, but it will slowly evolve in the bottle over the next eight years.",Fort Ross Vineyard Reserve,Fort Ross
"This estate-grown Syrah is racy, spicy and contoured, with well-polished structural facets. Raspberry, citrus and lavender scents abound, and the freshness on the palate marks this as a wine so delicious that it will be difficult to cellar. Drink it now or in five years__ither way you'll be happy.",Fred,_Maurice
"Nuanced, expressive and floral, this demonstrates balance between the tannins and mushroom-kissed Bing-cherry flavor. The palate feels soft, silky and round, and the layer of dark chocolate is the perfect finishing touch. Age it for 5_7 years, but it is also enjoyable now.",Ferrington Vineyard,Arista
"A 70-30 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this opens with oak-driven aromas of spice and toast, which give it a bold personality. Loads of bright cherry, blackberry, plum and licorice flavors appear on the palate to balance out the spice. Smooth but firm tannins give the wine structure and longevity.",Impronte,Giorgio Meletti Cavallari
"Dry and tart in acidity, this Pinot Noir offers cherry-skin-like tannins that give the palate a brittle sensation. Give it 5_6 years to let the raspberry and cherry flavors meld with the notes of oak and mineral. It should last the next 15 years, gradually losing its fruit and gaining earthy, mushroomy complexities.",San Andreas Estate Vineyard,Hirsch
"One wishes that Mike Januik made more Rieslings, as the few he's made from Bacchus Vineyard fruit have been excellent. This is made in a bright, spicy, palate-pleasing style, and it offers lively flavors of citrus, orange and pear. A hint of mint, a splash of jasmine tea, and an engaging, long, refreshing finish all add to the pleasure.",Bacchus Vineyard,Januik
"One of the last 2007s to be released, and it's still nowhere near ready to drink. It's astringent and bone dry, but it's also elegant. Complex flavors of blackberries, black currants, green olives, anise and cedar abound. It demonstrates the balance of the 2007 vintage and the ageability of Spring Mountain wines. Cellar this for 8_10 years, and it won't be surprising if this still shows well at the age of 20.",Estate Bottled,Smith-Madrone
"Mike Januik's Cabernet Sauvignons are intellectual wines. They don't rush out to greet you with jammy, gooey flavors; instead, they are hard and compact like coiled steel. They offer potential rather than immediate pleasure. This selection is powerful and muscular, and it offers notes of metal, gravel and cassis.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Januik
"Made from grapes sourced from the old Addamo property in the cool Solomon Hills region, this wine shows an impressive core of cherry, cranberry and currant flavors. It's racy and complex, and the mouth-watering acidity makes you crave lamb, tuna, steak and soft cheeses. It can be enjoyed now, and it should age for up to 10 years.",Presqu'ile Vineyard,La Fenêtre
"This blend of seven grapes (Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Sangiovese are present in the largest quantities) presents brawny, masculine aromas of leather, tobacco, cured meat and dark fruit. It feels on the ripe side, with chewy prune and plum flavors that are backed by a textured, velvety finish.",,Caiarossa
"Situated up high on the slope behind the Vosne-Romanée grand crus, Les Champs Perdrix has produced a wine that blends structure with velvety fruit. Old vines have given this a dense character and ripe, juicy flavors. Age this for 8_9 years.",Les Champs Perdrix,Domaine Bruno Clair
"A rich, red-fruited wine, this is packed with acidity and dry tannins, and it promises to age. Keep this complex selection for five years or more.",Les Perrières Premier Cru,Domaine de Bellene
"This is the first Col Solare release to bear the Red Mountain appellation. It's a limited-production wine made from Klipsun, Kiona and estate-grown grapes. It feels tight, and it shows great depth of fruit, along with pencil lead, oreo cookie and smoke notes.",Component Collection,Col Solare
"This is a historic wine that consistently delivers an elegant interpretation of Tuscan Sangiovese (blended with 15% Malvasia Nera). It opens with bright pulses of cherry and raspberry, plus a dark tone of leather. The palate is silky, fresh and long-lasting.",I Sodi di San Niccolò,Castellare di Castellina
"This wine offers complex flavors of sour cherry candy, persimmon, mushroom, spice and dried herb, brightened by crisp acidity. The oak influence provides smoky sweetness and wood tannins. This should continue to develop for six years or so.",Inocencio,Toretti's
"An oak-aged blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine shows bold nuances of blackberry and cherry, backed by tangy freshness and integrated oak spice. The wine is tangy and fresh, and it delivers silky tannins, plus drying notes of tobacco and crushed granite.",Perlato del Bosco,Tua Rita
"This wine feels light, fruity and very open. Acidity and a light tannic structure provide a bright feel. The flavors are of black currants, while the aromas are of geranium, floral in character.",Vintage,Quevedo
"This Merlot smells ripe and intense, with scents suggestive of spiced jammy blackberry, smoked wood, leather and dill. It is a ripe, full-bodied wine, yet it manages to remain finessed. Bright acids and muscular tannins keep this wine grounded, where it finishes with tang and astringency.",,Rappahannock Cellars
"This Syrah-Petite Sirah is starting to show some bottle age. It's still high in tannins, but the primary red and black stone fruits and berries are mellowing into dried fruits, with funkier notes of bacon, leather and tamari-splashed sautéed wild mushrooms. An interesting wine to drink now, and should continue to evolve for another 5_6 years.",Megandina Vineyard Vintner's Cuvée,Brady Family
"A mid-weight Zin, with a tannic backbone and a soft mouthfeel plus, rich and interesting blackberry and coffee. Encrust some ribs, chops or tenderloin in coffee grounds to pair with this wine for explosive results.",Hopland Ranches,Brutocao
"With new wood aromas, this is as much table wine as Port. It does have great fruitiness__ powerful berry character__ull in the mouth. It's ripe, with some dryness at the back, and is powered by its finishing acidity.",Vintage,Burmester
"Here's a rich, smooth wine for drinking now. It's softly luscious, packed with blackberry, cherry, anise and cedar flavors that finish with quite a bit of complexity.",Lot 357,Cameron Hughes
"This has fresh acidity, making it very enjoyable. It has prune, raisin, tobacco leaf and graphite aromas, with a whiff of leather. The palate delivers flavors of blackberry, clove, orange peel and spirit-soaked cherries. It's not overly complex, but it's delicious.",Torre d'Orti,Cavalchina
"This Cabernet-based blend is what the French call _ point: right on target. It's soft and generous in cherry, mocha, plum and cedar flavors, leading to a sweet, spicy finish. Drink now.",Mercury Rising,Cinnabar
"This is the ideal anti-Chardonnay white wine. There's no oak at all to interfere with the lemon, lime and mineral flavors, and the acidity is brisk and mouthwatering. A dry, crisply brilliant wine to drink now with everything from sushi to tuna tartare.",Rancho Arroyo Perdido,Collection 35
"A lovely Cabernet for drinking now with upscale fare, like steak. It's dry and smooth in the mouth, with velvety tannins, and the flavors are rich in black currants and mocha, with a touch of dried sage and cedar.",,Chateau St. Jean
"This is a structured, fruity wine, with red cherry flavors that go well with the drier edge of tannin. It has a layer of acidity that cuts through the ripe fruit showing a more ageworthy character. Keep this wine for 2_3 years, although with its fruitiness it can be drunk now.",Les Gandelins,Château des Jean-Loron
"Everything about this lighter-framed Navarran blend is an echo of when European red wines were racy and crisp as opposed to big, extracted, dark and woody. With fresh raspberry aromas, zesty acidity and earthy flavors of red berry and spice offset by cocoa and vanilla, this is akin to Bordeaux and it should go nicely with most kinds of food.",Crianza,Finca Albret
"Although this is grassy and wiry smelling, there's enough ripe raspberry and red plum aromas to make the grade. A zesty, choppy feeling palate features plum, pie cherry and leafy berry flavors in front of a racy finish with decent follow through. This is 60% Malbec and 40% CS.",Expresiones Reserve,Finca Flichman
"Hints of earthy spice and bark add interest to the somewhat muted blackberry and black plum aromas. The wine opens up more on the palate, revealing a lush and creamy texture, with dense blackberry flavors and a sweet oak and vanilla spice that lingers through the finish.",,Domaine Cabirau
"This Pinot starts out tight, but after some time in the glass opens up to reveal black raspberry, mushroom, cola and exotic spice notes. It's dry, yet silky, in the mouth. A pretty wine, and for the price, a comparative bargain.",Forty-Seven Friends,Ancient Oak Cellars
"This is an unfettered but very enjoyable Amarone, with upfront aromas of black fruit. The palate shows ripe but not exuberant plum and prune flavors, with a hint of chocolate. Pair with seasoned cheeses or braised meat dishes.",,Antica Corte
"This Syrah-dominant blend, with 25% Carignan and 5% Grenache, leads with oak-driven aromas of charred cedar, sweet smoke and vanilla bean that envelop the ripe blackberry and cherry fruit tones. The palate is lush and full, with a creamy roundness that's partially lifted by generous spicy notes of garrigue, licorice root and black pepper on the close.",Passion d'une Vie,Bernard Magrez
"A very good Merlot rich in baked plum and rhubarb with a back note of olive. Slightly spicy and medium-bodied, the finish offers smoke and spice.",Hawks Butte Vineyard,Bink
"A good, classy wine, showing refined Napa tannins and acidity, and flavors of blackberries and cassis. There's a hole in the middle that shows the challenges of making Petit Verdot, traditionally a blending wine, on its own.",,Frazier
"A wine with some structure, firm tannins and attractive black cherry and spice flavors. The wine has good weight and a dense texture that promises medium-term aging.",Domaine de Lafayette,Georges Duboeuf
"This is a thickly tannic wine, cloaking its mix of mulberry, plum and cassis fruit in a robe of dark chocolate. The tannins are textured and grainy, but ripe enough, with plenty of supporting acidity that cuts through.",,J Bell Cellars
"This shows nice elegance and restraint. It has earthy aromas, along with black berry and tobacco notes. The palate delivers a core of tight black berry, plum, raisin pepper and cinnamon. While this doesn't have the longest finish, it's enjoyable.",,La Collina dei Ciliegi
"Reedy, tarry, black-fruit aromas come in front of a medium-sized palate. Blackberry, dark plum, chocolate and roasted, toasty flavors set up an earthy finish with a controlled but noticeable tannic grip. This is true to the textbook in terms of what is Ribera del Duero.",Crianza,Vecordia
"This offers aromas of oak, chocolate and raisin. On the palate, black cherry and prune flavors are accompanied by bittersweet chocolate, vanilla and evident oak sensations. This is already evolved, so drink over the next year or two.",Corpus,Villa Rinaldi
"Made in a restrained style, this has savory black-fruit sensations. The palate delivers plum and raspberry flavors, with hints of bitter almond and tobacco that are supported by fresh acidity. Tellitalia Imports, Tradizione Imports.",Jago,Villa Spinosa
"Big, ripe, tannic and structured wine. It has rich black plum and chocolate flavors, very berry in its fruit. The dry core and wood flavors give smoothness to the texture. It would be worth aging this wine, so drink from 2015.",La Muguette,Domaine les Hauts de Riquets
"Lusty and ripe, with very high alcohol, this wine nonetheless wears the heat well, showing jammy black cherry pie, licorice, crisp bacon, sandalwood and pepper flavors that go on into a long, spicy finish. The interesting blend is Tempranillo, Merlot, Grenache and Mourvèdre, with each variety playing an essential role.",Toro de Paso,Bodega de Edgar
"A light and fruity wine, gently tannic while showing firmness at the edges. Red berry fruits dominate to give good acidity and an attractive fresh aftertaste.",Château Labrande,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Fresh and very crisp, this is a distinctive, fragrant wine. It has concentration, tight acidity, with apples and minerality. At the end, the wine is more floral, open and ripe. Drink after 2016.",Vieilles Vignes,Jean-Marc Bernhard
"The vineyards of the 13th century abbey of La Ferté produces some of the best Givry. This wine has great structure with firm tannins, and also rich, juicy fruitiness that offers delicious acidity and a more solid base for aging. Drink from 2016.",Clos du Cellier aux Moines Premier Cru,Domaines Devillard
"Made with Sangiovese and a small percentage of Cabernet Sauvignon, this opens with aromas of coconut, toast and oak-driven spice. The evolved palate offers coconut, clove and ground black pepper but the fruit richness has almost dried up entirely, leaving an astringent finish.",O'Leandro Riserva,Cennatoio
"A property owned by Château Bel Air, Ouvrard has produced a lightly fruity wine that has fresh red berry fruits and just the right amount of acidity. Light tannins act as a backbone to the general fruitiness of this wine.",Château Ouvrard,Château Bel Air
"This wine is still young, crisp and needs time to bring out its fruit. It has lively acidity, to be sure, with hints of the citrus and white currant flavors that are to come. Give this wine until 2016.",,Château de l'Enclos
"This fruity white Rhône-style blend has aromas and flavors of banana and honeydew melon, fresh acidity and a clean, tangy finish. It is medium bodied and refreshing, and will make a charming lunch or pre-dinner drink.",,Helwig
"A different take on rosé from Pégau, this is a relatively austere wine, with aromas of struck flint, earth and modest cherry flavors and a crisp, citrusy finish. Drink up.",Pink Pégau,Laurence Féraud
"Dusty, leesy aromas are powdery, with little fruit character. This feels stony on the surface but not deep. Nectarine and tangerine flavors finish cidery and slightly bitter.",,Attis
"This wine is fruity and crisp, with attractive balanced acidity. It's all about raspberry and red currants. A refreshing character gives citrus tang to the aftertaste.",Le Rosé de Mouton Cadet,Baron Philippe de Rothschild
"Bright, cheery plum and cherries abound on this juicy, primary Cabernet Franc. Forward and fruity, it's plump and rich in texture with a soft fringe of tannins. Hints of menthol and cherry blossom perfume add lift.",,Bouquet
"There's an intensity of spicy cardamom and dried herb in this wine, otherwise layered in soft, refreshingly dry elements of cranberry and rhubarb. Darker hued than many of its counterparts, it retains a tannic grip to the finish.",Rosé of,Bruliam
"Intense with acidity and young fruitiness, this wine needs some time. The potential of the white and citrus fruit is there, with an herbaceous character that needs to soften. Drink from late 2015.",,Château Buisson-Redon
"This structured wine is firm with tannins and a solid structure. It does have fruit behind this dry facade, allowing the potential for aging and balancing out. Drink from 2017.",,Château Garreau
"Very crisp and fruity, this is a light, bright and refreshing wine, with a tangy edge that gives texture. Apples and a strong citrus character promise a wine that will round out over the next few months. Drink from late 2015.",,Château Guichot
"Still toasty, this is a fruity, spicy wine. Firm tannins form the backdrop to the red berry fruits and fresh acidity. It will develop attractively over the next few years, so drink from 2017.",,Château Maison Noble
"Smoky tar and plum highlight this approachable wine that's straightforward in focus and intent. Meant for enjoying now, it stays firm and flavorful in the glass, finishing without a fuss.",,Decoy
"Tight and herbaceous, this nervy, crisp wine is full of lemon and lime juice cut with an orange zest. Floral and full of acidity, it leaves a mineral, steely aftertaste.",La Grande Cuvée,Dourthe
"Simple but solid apple and nectarine aromas are straight forward. This feels round and easy, without much acid-based cut. Flavors of melon, mango and nectarine finish short, with a note of apple.",Estate Grown & Bottled,Esperanza
"Made with organically farmed grapes, this opens with earthy aromas of ripe black fruit and whiffs of barnyard. The rustic palate offers fleshy black cherry, crushed raspberry and gamey notes alongside rather fleeting tannins.",,Fattoria di Sammontana
"A nose of pear, honeydew melon and freshly-starched linens sets the stage for soft pear and melon flavors that are overpowered by intense minty notes. There is a burst of fresh citrus on the finish, but there is a lingering sense of cotton on the palate throughout each sip.",Hermon,Golan Heights Winery
"A stamp of smoke and toasted oak mark the entry into this wine, followed by chewy tannins that wrap themselves around dark layers of chocolate and tobacco leaf, the structure at first impenetrable. The finish is relaxed and somewhat short.",,Hill Family Estate
"This lightly colored wine blends Grenache (43%), Syrah (32%) and Mourvèdre. It brings aromas of red raspberries, currant and flowers. The palate is fresh and lighter in style, with the emphasis on fruit.",Untamed Cuvée,James Wyatt
"Grown in the southern section of the valley in the foothills of the Blue Mountains, this rare varietal bottling from this appellation shows aromas of cranberry, raspberry and citrus, along with some hints of oxidation. It's tart and full in feel, not seeming entirely varietally correct.",Breezy Slope Vineyard,Lagana
"This is a substantial wine, concentrated in dark red berry color and flavor, from cherry to wild strawberry to more savory rhubarb compote. Muted on the nose, it has an underlying woody, herbal character that balances the vibrancy of the fruit.",Rosé of,MacPhail
"This medium-bodied blend features aromas and flavors reminiscent of bubble gum and cantaloupe. It's mainly Grenache and Cinsault, which impart ample weight, balanced by some slightly bitter, pithy notes on the finish.",French,My Essential
"Made with Sangiovese and 10% Merlot, this opens with aromas of red currant and a whiff of exotic spice. The straightforward palate offers dried black cherry, clove and a hint of grilled herb alongside smooth tannins. Simple but well made, it's is made to be enjoyed young so drink soon.",,Piccini
"A blend of Sangiovese and 20% Canaiolo, this fruity, friendly red opens with aromas of wild berry, ripe plum and fragrant blue flowers. The simple, easygoing palate offers dried black cherry and a hint of white pepper accompanied by soft and rather fleeting tannins.",Forziere,Sensi
"Toasted oak and vanilla are noticeably present on the palate and nose of this wine, which evolves in the glass to take on a more tropical feel and tastes of ripe pineapple and guava. Medium to light in texture, it finishes smoothly and flat.",,Sonoma-Cutrer
"This wine made from Muscat Canelli grapes is slightly spritzy and sweet, pungent in apricot fuzz and grass, a mélange of tropical goodness from there on out. Mango, kiwi and pineapple fill the medium-weight waves of viscous texture, concluding in a vanilla-tinged, light, fresh finish.",Estate Grown,St. Supéry
"Aromas of wood shop, espresso and licorice lead the nose. The firm palate delivers oak extract, licorice, clove, dried black cherry and sage alongside tightly-knit, drying tannins. It has structure but not much fruit richness remains.",Riserva,Tenuta Pierazzuoli
"This tastes bright and lively, just a bit sweet and brimming with fruit flavor. It smells like green apples and grapefruit, tastes like honeydew melon and adds a bit of acidity to balance out the ripeness.",,Vigilance
"Aromas of toast, milk chocolate and black-skinned fruit lead the way. The soft, low-acid palate doles out crushed plum, fleshy cherry and mocha alongside drying, angular tannins that create an abrupt finish.",Riserva,Viticoltori Senesi Aretini
"This smells a touch stalky and leathery, although there's ample black fruit character to the bouquet. A tannic somewhat rough palate holds stalky flavors of roasted black fruits, charred wood and creosote. A jagged finish with peppery spice and heat closes this out. Drink through 2020.",Prestigio Crianza,Emina
"While bright cherry and berry aromatics take a bit of aeration and coaxing to flourish, this four-square wine calibrates juicy primary red fruit with cool touches of menthol and cranberry acidity. It's approachably fruity and framed in soft delicate tannins. Drink now.",Trocken,Gaul
"This opens with attractive aromas of pressed rose, woodland berry, dried herb and a whiff of baking spice. The robust palate shows sour, almost unripe cherry, clove, mocha and anisette. The warmth of evident alcohol closes the finish.",Bricco Ambrogio,Negretti
"The 2012 and 2013 vintages were both strong in southern Australia, so some of the realistically priced Pinots from South Australia and Victoria are worth stocking up on. This is a good example, showing hints of acacia blossoms, red berries, cola and brown sugar wrapped in supple tannins. Drink now through 2018.",,Sidewood
"Forest floor, woodland berry and spice aromas emerge in the glass. The tight palate offers sour cherry, white pepper, grilled herb and a whiff of tobacco alongside close-grained tannins and racy acidity. An anisette note closes the finish.",del Comune di Barolo Essenze,Vite Colte
"Cherry and plum aromas are dry, earthy and direct. This is a straightforward aged Rioja with grabby tannins but enough body and fruit to absorb them. Baked cherry and plum flavors are a touch rustic and stalky, while a roasted aftertaste sends this on its way. Drink through 2019.",Reserva,Ysios
"Primary aromas of black cherry and cassis come with minerally notes, herbal hints and a drop of iodine. This feels good but narrow, while saucy, lightly herbal berry flavors end with tolerable saltiness. Drink through 2019.",Grand Reserve Limited Production,Piattelli
"Aromas of scorched earth, underbrush, red berry and a whiff of cellar floor lead the nose. On the firm palate, ground pepper, tobacco and sage accent sour cherry while brooding tannins offer firm support.",,Prunotto
"Warm and robust, this full-bodied Barolo offers aromas of underbrush, scorched earth, tar and kirsch. The palate is bold and hearty but also shows the heat of the vintage, doling out cherry-marinated-in-spirits, licorice and clove alongside almost scorching alcohol. Drink sooner rather than later.",Brunate,Beni di Batasiolo
"This fruit-forward, elegant wine offers gentle flavors of strawberry and cherry, with a lightly candied aspect. It's like a cherry lollipop, with a lingering, slightly earthy finish.",,Big Table Farm
"A chalky slightly saline minerality extends through this lemony fresh wine, accenting plush fruity flavors of apple, peach and pear. It's silky on the palate and refreshing in composure, ideal for elegant and casual entertaining.",Nackenheimer Kabinett Trocken,Binz
"Woody blackberries meet with freshly plucked violets and lilacs on the snappy nose of this wine. The palate shows very tart berry fruit, but is driven more so by the asphalt and peppercorn elements.",Estate Limited,Brave & Maiden
"This full-bodied wine smells ripe and buttery, like a pear tart, and has similar tasty flavors like ripe apple, vanilla and cream. Though it's not technically sweet, the personality is generous and the texture soft and rich.",Damiano Vineyard,Carol Shelton
"Aromas of baked plum, cherry under spirits, oak and coconut lead the nose while the polished palate offers ripe black cherry, vanilla, grilled herb and a hint of licorice. Firm, fine-grained tannins support the savory flavors.",Valmaggiore Riserva,Cascina Chicco
"Considerable noble rot both in its aromas and in its palate give this wine richness and a textured, sweet and dry character. Honeyed with bitter marmalade and dried apricot flavors , it is still young. Drink from 2017.",Réserve,Château Bélingard
"White peach and apple blossoms perfume this dancingly brisk Silvaner. Crisp nectarine and lime penetrate the palate, along with a refreshing sheen of minerality that extends the finish.",Alte Reben Trocken,Dr. Heyden
"Racy and tight, this exuberant Riesling sekt juxtaposes fresh lemon and blossom notes against a piercing backbone of acidity. Tiny, persistent bubbles and delicate foam wrap up briskly on the finish.",Sekt Extra Trocken,Dr. Nägler
"The color of oxblood, this meaty, tannic wine pours espresso, black licorice and composted earth around tart blackberry fruit. It's aromatic, spicy and nicely balanced.",Estate,Folin Cellars
"This deep-colored, rich-tasting and thick-textured blend does a fine imitation of a more expensive red. Made with a majority of Merlot, its dark cherry and dark chocolate flavors blend well in a texture of fine-grained tannins and firm acidity.",Proprietary,Foundry
"This tight and steely wine is fresh with crisp fruits and a strongly herbaceous character. It offers gooseberry, grapefruit and intense, youthful acidity that needs to calm down. Give this very young wine until the end of 2016.",Empreinte Blanc,François Millet
"Aromas that recall stewed prune, cherry steeped in spirits, baking spice, toast and a whiff of menthol lead the nose and carry through to the firm palate along with notes of coffee, grilled sage and clove. Bracing tannins provide the framework. Give this a few more years to unwind then drink up. Best after 2020.",Vigna Ruè,Germano Angelo
"The red juiced Alicante Bouschet has produced a powerful and generous wine that's rich and full of southern sun as well as dark black fruits. It is concentrated and impressive with its ripe flavors. Foot-trodden in open fermenters, it is full and generous needing to age until 2017.",,Herdade do Rocim
"It's difficult to find $20 Pinot Noir this good from anywhere in the world. Floral notes on the nose yield to ripe black-cherry fruit on the palate, which finish finishes with crisp acids and soft, dusty tannins. Drink now_2020.",,Innocent Bystander
"Bright floralilty greets the nose on this bottling, which shows lime and grapefruit blossom as well as a lighter nectarine flesh. The palate is restrained and grippy, a tart take on the varietal, with lime sorbet, lemon peel and yellow-grapefruit flavors.",,Lucas & Lewellen
"Classic Nebbiolo aromas of violet, wild berry and a whiff of baking spice float out of the glass on this attractive red. The elegantly structured palate offers mature wild cherry, cinnamon, white pepper and clove alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. Drink 2017_2022.",,Marchesi di Barolo
"Dark and dense, this opens with aromas of ripe plum, vanilla and exotic spice. The round, chewy palate offers ripe black cherry, blackberry, roasted coffee bean, licorice and clove alongside close-grained tannins.",Marun,Matteo Correggia
"Nicely textural, this propels its black-cherry fruit into a tasty finish. The wine spent 16 months in French oak, yielding grace notes of coffee grounds, cola and a dash of mocha.",Omero Vineyard,Omero
"Charcoal aromas shadow standard black fruit scents. This is forward in its approach, with a sturdy mouthfeel. Black plum and blackberry flavors feature a lot of vanilla and cream, while the finish is mild, straightforward and tastes mostly like oak and associated vanilla. Drink now through 2020.",,Oráculo
"This single-vineyard cuvée brings bold red fruit backed with steely minerality. After 14 months in 50% new French oak, the barrel flavors remain unintrusive, allowing pretty aromas of roses, raspberries, cherries and chocolate to emerge. It's drinking well already, and should continue to shine through 2026.",De Ponte Vineyard,Panther Creek
"Alluring aromas of rose, iris, menthol and woodland berry waft out of the glass. The straightforward, polished palate offers ripe cherry, black raspberry, white pepper and star anise alongside fine-grained tannins.",,Paolo Scavino
"From the light 2012 vintage, this is a bright and fruity wine with red cherries and soft tannins. Intense acidity gives the wine a fresh, crisp character. Drink now.",,Château de Pizay
"An attractively fruity wine, it has apple flavors cut with lime juice. Bright, crisp and laced with acidity, it could age but is already delicious to drink.",Clos Philippe-le-Hardi,Château Philippe-le-Hardi
"This wine opens with aromas of lemon zest, grapefruit and an unusual sensation of Band-Aids that carries over to the palate, along with ripe apples and tropical fruit. It closes on a medicinal note.",Sorgente,Citari
"A big, lusty Zin, it shows the tendency to overripeness that can mar the variety. While it's dry, it's rich in raisins and prunes, with a good tannin-acid structure that wants barbecued meat to play with.",Hillside Estate,Collier Falls
"The closed nose gives away very little, just the barest whiffs of yellow flowers. The one-dimensional palate offers fleeting sensations of tart apple and hints of green melon and lemon zest.",Roncathe,Corte Moschina
"Plush and perfumed in smoky leather, this Zin offers more savory flavors and aromas than sweet. A bit of cedar with just the suggestion of crushed blackberry plays most prominently. Given the robust nature of the wine, the finish is surprisingly quick.",Old Vine,Assembly
"This Zin, sourced from a blend of old and new vines, has inviting aromas of plum and blackberry that expand into a meaty, smoky, full-figured and slightly sanguine melting pot of flavor. With a soft texture and long finish, it's good value, too.",,LangeTwins
"A wine that veers between thin and acid and firmer tannins. It lacks the fruit weight to cope with its structure, so the wine will always be lean.",,Château Haut Pasquet
"You can tell the age from the color and the faded mushroom flavors on the palate. It does merit some passing interest as a wine from the very hot 2003 vintage, but that's about all.",,Château Moulin de Bel-Air
"Jammy apricot, orange, mango and vanilla bean flavors mark this simple but tasty Chardonnay. It has enough acidity to keep it from collapsing.",,Chocolate Box
"Rich in strawberry, raspberry, vanilla and brown sugar flavors, this 100% Pinot Noir is delicate in texture, with brisk acidity. It's a good bubbly for drinking now.",Brut Rosé,Collection 35
"Jammy, candied raspberry and cherry fruit marks this simple but pleasurable wine. With a soft mouthfeel and an oaky finish, it's ready to drink now.",,Plungerhead
"Largely neutral aromas touch on melon, peach and toast. This is smooth and melony on the palate, with flavors of bitter nut skins, melon, banana and papaya. A touch of bitterness rises up on the finish.",Reserva,Chilcas
"Tannins mark this big, dry Syrah. It shows Spring Mountain's intensity of fruit, in this case blackberries, but that tannic bitterness dominates, making the wine difficult to appreciate. It's hard to imagine it aging.",Bella's Collection,Due Cani
"Soft, ripe and fruity, this is a smooth and clean wine. It has yellow fruit, pineapple and white currant flavors that give a perfumed edge. It's not a wine for aging, so drink now.",Bojador Branco,Herdade do Rocim
A soft and light Pinot Noir with attractive strawberry acidity and cherry fruit flavors. An earthier backdrop balances the hint of tannin.,,Jaboulet-Vercherre
"Kingston's first-ever Chardonnay is neutral but inoffensive. The palate is melony but low on acid, while flavors of honeydew, vanilla and cream are soft and reflect the hot 2012 Chilean vintage.",Sabino,Kingston Family
"It conveys tastes of buttered toast, honey and vanilla. The underlying fruit flavors are of oranges and mangoes.",SRH,Lafond
"Aromas of bell pepper and jalapeño come with dusty, melony trappings. This is alive but starting to fade; flavors of fleshy peach and papaya have a lime cut. On the finish, a briny, saltiness rises up.",Reserva,Chilcas
"The simple structure frames cherry, red currant and sandalwood flavors. At this price, though, it's a useful everyday wine.",,Cannonball
"A smooth and fruity wine, it has plenty of attractive red berry fruits, some firm tannins and youthful juicy character. It is obviously still new. Although it can be drunk now, it will be better from 2015.",,Château Fondarzac
"Blended from Pinot Noir and Chardonnay, this sparkler is a little rough in texture, with candied orange, lemon and lime flavors. But it has good bubbles and a clean, elegant finish.",Brut,Collection 35
"This new Zin from Livermore Valley-based Dante Robere is from two vineyards, one in Livermore and the other in Brentwood. The fruit is mostly plum, with a trace of wintergreen on the mid-palate but even for Zin the fruit flavors are masked somewhat by the high alcohol; it's for those who like a heavy-hitting wine.",,Dante Robere
"The wine is a little tough in texture, with chewy tannins and lots of mouthwatering acidity. Otherwise, this bone-dry Syrah has yummy blackberry jam and licorice flavors. It's ready to drink now.",,Russian Ridge
"It's ripe and jammy in oranges and mangoes, honey, buttered toast, vanilla and zesty lime acidity. Overall, it's easy to drink.",,Sea Mist
"This basic SB blends aromas of coastal snap with tropical sweetness. In the mouth, it shows basic flavors of grapefruit and spiced citrus. On the finish, peppery bitterness comes up.",Cefiro Reserva,Viña Casablanca
"A sweet Vinho Verde, it is light, fruity and perfect for the summer. With crisp acidity, a lively, frothy texture and a clean apple aftertaste, it can be drunk now.",Arca Nova,Quinta das Arcas
Heavy oak notes with a slight chemical/turpentine scent crowds the nose on this basic Chardonnay. A resiny quality carries over onto the palate along with citrus and cinnamon spice flavors.,Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"A warm, soft wine, it has peach and pear flavors. It is gently fruity with attractive acidity that gives a light lift. Just right as an apéritif, the wine should be drunk now.",,Chantebelle
"Milk chocolate and raspberry jam flavors mark this soft, easy-drinking red wine, which manages to finish dry. The winemaker suggests pairing with a chocolate soufflé.",,Cocobon
"Firm and savory, this opens with aromas of ripe berry, clove and graphite. On the palate, notes of clove and black pepper add depth to ripe Morello cherry and crushed raspberry flavors.  Supple tannins offer support.",Riserva,Cantele
"Straightforward and already accessible, this opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, allspice and grilled herb. On the palate, closely-knit, fine-grained tannins support juicy sour cherry and red raspberry while notes of clove and white pepper add interest. Drink through 2019.",,CarlindePaolo
"More concentrated-tasting and intense than some of d'Arenberg's other 2011 single-vineyard Shirazes, this is still somewhat restrained. Some tobacco notes add nuance to the Ribena-like fruit, picking up hints of vanilla and earth on the finish.",The Blind Tiger Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"This is complex and compelling. A spicy, minty, thyme-like character comes out in the aroma and continues in the flavor, most likely from some new barrels used in aging the wine. It's an attractive characteristic, and complements the bright cherry flavors, medium body and quite firm tannins.",The Classic Four,Spann Vineyards
"Lavish floral notes perfume this lusciously sweet ice-style Riesling. Honeyed apples and fresh figs burst on the palate, their flavors intensified on the finish with a hit of zesty lemon acidity.",Ice,Standing Stone
"This wine is big, very full bodied and very lush in texture. Super-ripe in flavor, it rides at the place where plum notes segue to prune, and black cherry to cherry syrup, which is a very tasty place to be. Plenty of fine tannins frame all that concentration, yet the mouthfeel stays soft.",Altitude 2401 Reserve Fair Play Farms,Perry Creek
"Fresh aromas of raspberry and cherry are slightly earthy. This shows purity and balance on the palate, while flavors of strawberry, raspberry and red plum come with chocolaty oak and mild spice. A dry finish tastes of oak-driven chocolate and crushed black pepper.",Alazan,Kingston Family
"Yeasty, rounded and almost earthy notes are conjured up on the nose. That almost soy-like yeastiness remains on the palate, where citrus zest cuts through the richness. Texturally this is creamy and buffered, but not without tone.",Loam,Kurt Angerer
"Fresh and clean aromas of raspberry and a wild array of red fruit flavors characterize this wine from regional pioneer Pierre Lafond and winemaker Bruce McGuire. A minerally, slate-driven palate that's steel-like in its sharpness contributes backbone. This wine will age well.",SRH,Lafond
"Coming from seven different vineyards spread across the Columbia Valley, this wine__hich includes 13% Sauvignon Blanc__rings notes of fig, browned butter and candy corn. It's full bodied with a creamy texture and a warm finish.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Aromas of dark plum, blue flower and dark cooking spice lead the nose and follow through to the robust, spicy palate along with notes of licorice, tobacco and mocha. Mouth-puckering tannins support the juicy fruit. There's noticeable warmth of alcohol.",Villa Santera,Leone de Castris
"Cherry, strawberry and boysenberry fruit tones dance on the nose and mouth of this ripe, attractive wine. Shadings of bramble and sweet spice add depth to the fresh and lively palate, ending clean and mouthwatering. Drink now_2016.",,Lothian Vineyards
"Inviting hints of crushed blueberry and blackberry show the slightest overtones of smoke. The palate is smooth, with still slightly crunchy but ripe tannins that provide a pleasant framework for the refreshing berry fruit. A ripe, appetizing medium-bodied red with a welcome streak of freshness.",Rosenberg,Markowitsch
"This wine is a light gold color, with appetizing pear and crisp apple aromas. Firm acidity, a lively texture and absolutely fresh flavors make it a pleasure to drink.",Cuvée Brut Made With Organically Grown Grapes,McFadden
"This 100% varietal wine conveys notes of mortared green herbs, plum, cherry, medicine cabinet and vanilla. It's medium bodied with a supple, enticing feel. Baking spice, cherry and coffee flavors linger on the (very, very) long, coffee-filled finish. The aromas don't all come together but this wine is worth exploring for the remarkable finish, which is about as good as it gets.",Eagle & Plow Block 93,Mercer
"With almost a third of the fruit from the hallowed Three Palms Vineyard, this Merlot benefits from skillful blending. It offers a thick, dense expression of vibrant red and black plum, tobacco and tea, the oak present yet integrated.",,Duckhorn
"This smells typical of coastal Chilean SB, meaning it's citrusy and green, but the nose seems a touch flat. Not so the palate, which is snappy and juicy. Flavors of grapefruit and passion fruit lead the way, with a backing of green bean and mild bell pepper controlling a crisp, fresh finish.",Max Reserva,Errazuriz
"Blistered blueberries and black earth mix with graphite and sweet tobacco on the nose of this wine from the husband-and-wife team who have worked up and down the state. It's a very even take on the grape, with pretty purple fruits dominating the palate.",Estate,Falcone
"Aromas of spicy plum and black cherry lead the nose. On the fresh, savory palate, accents of white pepper and clove add depth to layers of ripe, red berry. Supple tannins support the juicy fruit flavors.",,Giuseppe Cortese
"Aromas of exotic spice, incense, coconut and mature black fruit lead the nose on this full-bodied wine. The palate delivers dried blackberry, chocolate, roasted coffee bean and vanilla alongside assertive tannins.",Trentangeli,Tormaresca
"Bright and fragrant, this opens with aromas of violet, strawberry and raspberry that carry over to the palate. Silky tannins provide elegant support. It's a lovely wine to enjoy soon.",,Travaglini
The slightly oxidized nose of this wine by Michael Gill recalls dried yet tart apricot skins with a bit of white peach freshness. The palate is framed by acidity while offering apple and lime flavors.,,Tuxedo Cellars
"Ultrafresh Conference pear just sliced and dripping with juice__hat is the pure expression of this sleek, slender and very refreshing, clean white. This is neither heavy nor very concentrated, but nonetheless compelling for its pure fruit.",Messwein,Stift Göttweig
"This Cab follows a similar protocol to previous vintages, with 22 months in French oak. It comes from a single vineyard planted entirely to Clone 7 and is dry and generous in tannin, though nicely juicy in currant and pomegranate.",Estate,Tara Bella
"A light golden color, this richly aromatic wine brings notes of papaya, pineapple and brown sugar. It coats the palate with honeyed, ripe pear, apricot and pineapple flavors. Drink up.",Late Harvest,Vortex
"Aromas of ripe blackberry, brown spice and fragrant blue flower waft from the glass. A blend of 50% Negroamaro, 25% Primitivo and 25% Malvasia Nera, the savory, approachable palate delivers black cherry, cranberry, nutmeg and mineral alongside firm tannins.",Metiusco,Palam_
"__pen and drink_ the instructions should read, as this smooth and luscious wine is best enjoyed young. Half was barrel-fermented, yielding flavors of caramel, almond paste and buttered nuts. Pair with leek, bacon and potato soup, says the winery, which sounds just about perfect.",,Quails' Gate
"From the winery's signature vineyard and old Sauvignon Blanc vines, originally planted in 1959, this wine offers complexity and intrigue. Flavors range from crisp lemon to savory fennel and herb, a long, lingering finish sealing the deal.",To Kalon Vineyard,Robert Mondavi
"A seldom-seen near 100% offering of this variety (6% Syrah is blended in), this wine shows notes of herbs, sugared plum, thistle and chocolate. It coats the palate from end to end with silky soft, almost pillowy fruit and savory flavors that keep the interest high.",McKinley Springs,Robert Ramsay
"Apple and fig are layered throughout this elegant, medium-bodied wine that offers the ripeness of a warm vintage without veering into sweetness. The barrel impact is managed well, adding to the impact of honey and dried nuts on the finish.",Route 121,RouteStock
"Still quite tight, this wine needs a few months to develop. It has apple and quince fruits, a citrus tang, and bright, fruity acidity. The aftertaste is fresh.",,Dominique Cornin
"Oak, crushed berry and vanilla aromas take center stage on this Sicilian Pinot Nero. The palate offers ripe red cherry, prune, toasted oak, sweet baking spice and chocolate alongside drying tannins.",Nawari,Duca di Salaparuta
"The blend includes eight different Syrah clones and a splash of Grenache. The wine is bright and spicy, peppery with pretty cherry fruit. A chocolate streak amps up the finish.",Red Willow Vineyard 8 Clones,Eight Bells
"Here's a polished Falanghina that offers aromas of fragrant white flowers, mango and papaya. The succulent but sophisticated palate delivers grapefruit, banana and white peach flavors that are accented by aromatic herbs and a hint of mineral. Refreshing acidity gives it a clean, bright finish.",Taburno,Fontanavecchia
"Dragonfly is sourced from Washington's Columbia Gorge, though labeled simply as a Washington wine. Rich and off dry, it's both floral and fleshy. Big fruit flavors of peach and apricot dominate.",Dragonfly,Francis Tannahill
"This medium-bodied Zinfandel has a lighter color than many, but plenty of aroma and flavor. It smells like a wild blackberry patch in summer, tastes like strawberry jam and goes down smooth due to its light tannins and a touch of sweetness.",Made With Organic Grapes,Girasole
"There's an unusually fresh, green tone accenting more characteristic floral and fruit tones on this Gewürztraminer. It's dry in style, but intensely concentrated with flavors of ripe grapefruit streaked with wax and honey. Rich, round and luscious, it finishes elegantly with a hint of tea-leaf astringency.",,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"A straightforward Syrah, it's solidly based on berry and black cherry fruit flavors, with clean earth and a vein of licorice running through. Drink now_2019.",,Cave B
"Freshly sliced yellow fruits are balanced by acidity. Bright as well as rich, it needs time to bring out the ripe fruits and wood-aging flavors. Drink from 2015.",Domaine des Deux Roches,Collovray et Terrier
"This Bordeaux-style blend is almost 75% Merlot, with Malbec, Petit Verdot and Cab Franc filling out the rest. Young and a bit stiff, it's well-structured and layered, with mixed red fruits and light veins of mocha and caramel.",Dauntless,Airfield Estates
"Half Pinot Gris, 38% Viognier, and with a bit of Roussanne, it rocks with well-ripened cucumber, melon and pear fruit flavors. There's nothing heavy-handed, but it shows good concentration.",Flygirl,Airfield Estates
"This is the first Tempranillo from Animale, and it's a soft, supple wine with a pleasing mix of red berries and light tanned leather. It's well made, balanced and interesting, with hints of rose petals and dried leaves.",,Animale
"Salmon-colored, this subtle, nuanced and dry rosé comes from a reputable producer of Pinot Noir. It's structured in wild strawberry exuberance and plenty of minerality. The finish repeats the burst of strawberry with a cherry chaser and squeeze of lime.",Rosé of,Balletto
"Tart tangerine and fresh herbal tones lend freshness to juicy lychee, jasmine and grapefruit flavors in this Gewürztraminer. Just a shade off dry, it's deeply concentrated on the palate and finishes with an exotic sizzle of ginger spice.",,Bellangelo
"Hints of toasted rye and cedar accentuate red cherry and blackberry flavors in this lush but strikingly brisk Bordeaux-blend. Aged four years in barrel, it's shaded with tones of savory dried herbs and earth, but still muscular in profile with bold, mouthfilling tannins.",Keuka Hill Reserve Red Table Wine,Shaw
"Zest and floral notes abound on this refreshingly dry Chardonnay. Satisfyingly juicy and tart, it's penetrating on the palate with flavors of white grapefruit and fresh green apple. Finishes briskly but with a lingering lime-skin astringency.",Barrel Fermented,Glenora
"There's a sense of familiarity in the scent of lemon candy that wafts from this slightly off-dry Riesling. Medium-bodied in style, it's juicy on the palate with ripe melon and peach flavors accented with tangerine acidity. Delicate hints of tea leaf and lemon zest add nuance. Drink now for it's youthful exuberance.",Dry,Glenora
"A blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato, this opens with aromas of blue and red flower along with a whiff of red berries. The juicy palate delivers flavors of red cherry, strawberry and ripe raspberry that are lightly accented by white pepper. There's not much complexity, but it is delicious.",Irmana,Corvo
"All coming from a sub-vineyard within The Benches, it's moderately aromatic with notes of ripe peach, light tropical notes and spice. The palate is medium bodied, narrowing toward the finish.",,Dance
"This is already a delicious wine. With its soft tannins, generous red fruits and rounded texture, it is showing a warm and ripe character. The tannic texture and touch of smokiness will allow it to age for the medium-term. Drink from 2016.",Clos des Hâtes,Domaine Bachey-Legros
"Fruity and jammy, this ripe wine has structure and acidity, along with a good depth of flavor. It will certainly age and shouldn't be drunk before 2017.",,Domaine Chandon de Briailles
"This is a very perfumed, aromatic wine. Red berries and tight acidity give a wine that is bright, fruity and at the end soft. It comes from a vineyard bought by Chanson in 2006. Drink from 2017.",Beauregard Premier Cru,Domaine Chanson
"Importer Bobby Kacher has a knack for finding great value rosés from the south of France, and this is a top example. Among Rhône Valley vignerons, the Gard, which lies on the western side of France's Rhône River, is known for its Syrah, so it's no surprise this is 100% Syrah, produced by the saignée method of __leeding_ a portion of the juice off the skins after a short maceration. The result is a medium- to full-bodied rosé with plenty of ripe red fruit, a hint of crushed stone and enough citrusy zip to impart freshness and length.",Syrah,Domaine de Saint-Antoine
"Full of red fruits, it also has a strong structure and firm tannins. For now, the wine is textured and dense. It needs to age and broaden out to give a softer feeling. Drink from 2018.",Moutier Amet,Domaine du Prieuré
"Coming from a cool-climate appellation in a cool vintage and aged in neutral French oak, this wine has a vivid, precise fruit focus. Notes of black currant and blackberry are framed by tart, lively acidity and firm, dry tannins.",McDuffee Vineyards,Domaine Pouillon
"Warm, ripe and rounded, this is a soft and attractive wine. It has touches of wood as well as some firm tannins that are embedded in the soft texture. It's a wine that will develop quickly and well. Drink from 2016.",,Domaine Roger Belland
"This go-to red blend is a mix of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah, Cab Franc and Petite Sirah, yielding a big, chewy, rather tannic but quite appealing wine. It's got plenty of ripe cherry and cassis fruit, black licorice, and hints of herb.",Cow Catcher,Dumas Station
"Here's an informal and delicious wine that opens with aromas of blue flower, ripe berry, tilled earth and leather. The palate offers fleshy dark cherry restrained by nervous acidity and mineral notes. Pair with pizza or hearty pasta dishes.",,Fattoria La Rivolta
"Dry, crisp aromas of dusty red berries and spice announce a medium-bodied wine with fresh acidity and good balance. Earthy plum and berry flavors show a tobacco note and some overt oak, while the finish is dry.",Ayrum Reserva,Felix Solis
"This easy-drinking Aglianico offers succulent black cherry, plum and raspberry flavors accented by notes of cinnamon and clove. It's round, fresh and friendly. Drink soon to capture the juicy fruit.",Dal Re,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Splashes of Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot make their way into this vineyard-designate, a well-made offering of cola and blackberry with supple tannins. Layered and complex, it's medium in weight and length, with a density of oak on the finish. Drink now through 2020.",Andolsen Vineyard,Sbragia
"Dark in color, this is a big, juicy, tantalizing wine from a beautifully farmed vineyard on the edge of the Sonoma Coast, a cool region where grapes ripen slowly. The wine, too, takes its time to come around, gradually revealing layers of golden apple tart and honey, with a lurking floral element and gentle ginger spice.",Heintz Family Vineyard,Von Holt
"A taste of sarsaparilla and fresh strawberry hulls combine in this soft, velvety and well-structured wine, the bouquet floral in rose petals and earthy dew. Medium to light bodied, it's a lovely sipping wine that will also pair well with food.",Oehlman Vineyard,WesMar
"Delicate sea salt and caramel brittle aromas meld with lemon blossoms, honey on brie rind, sweet alkalinity and a subtle white peach ripeness on Rick Longoria's annual ode to his wife. The texturally intriguing palate is racy with acidity and chalky in minerality, showing lean flavors of lemon and lime peels and a touch of vanilla on the deep finish. Drink 2018_2025.",Cuvee Diana,Longoria
"Nectarine, apricot, jasmine blossoms and lots of fresh squeezed Meyer lemon juice makes a delicious nose on this refreshing treat of a wine. It conveys lively, citrusy acidity and apple-rind tartness, offering flavors that last throughout the sip and deep into the finish.",,Longoria
"The large Brotte firm is capable of turning out some excellent juice, exemplified by this full-bodied, velvety-textured wine. Intriguing aromas of cola, black olive, cinnamon and clove give way to dark-fruited, earthy flavors tinged with espresso. Drink now_2025.",Domaine Barville Optimum,Brotte
"A candied caramel aroma subtly lifts from the bouquet of this wine, nearly overtaken by fresh-cut rose. Earthy and full of forested characteristics, it's smooth and lush, with a spicy cinnamon finish and restrained oak. It's ready to enjoy, the use of more than 50% whole-cluster in the fermentation adding an exotic, tangy element.",Olivet Grange Vineyard Estate,Inman Family
"This lovely vineyard-designate opens in cherry-berry cobbler, becoming luxurious and weighty on the palate while remaining juicy and expansive, too. Dusty tannins provide a structure and backbone before Tahitian vanilla marks the long finish. This wine is entirely enjoyable now but should thrive in the cellar through 2025.",Ruth's Vineyard,Kokomo
"Light in color this wine features gorgeous acidity and a lining of fresh, vibrant red cherry, adorned completely by a pretty rose-petal bouquet. Though gentle in color and body, the texture moves along, providing plenty of body to keep the wine freshly alive.",Peters Vineyard Gopher Hill Block,Kokomo
"In this polished and composed wine, subtle aromas of minerals, plums and spices are followed by a firm, slightly tannic texture that seems to relax with each sip. The flavors resemble plums and black cherries, plus hints of cinnamon, dill and dark chocolate. Save this for an elegant occasion after 2018.",,Lineage
"With an exotic, tropical edge, this wine takes time to develop, like a flower closed up overnight. Medium in body and length, it teases in honeysuckle, white peach and fresh pineapple, before delivering a tartness of lemon zest and well-defined minerality on the finish.",Gap's Crown Vineyard,Lutum
"A terrific value, the 2013 Cuvée Tradition shows the sort of concentration and ripeness you'd only expect to find in much pricier bottlings. Black olive, cassis and cured meat notes deliver ample complexity, and the wine finishes long, with supple tannins.",Cuvée Tradition,Mas des Bressades
"Strong impressions of bold fruit flavors partner with enchanting new oak nuances. Aromas offer cedar, tobacco and clove, while flavors resemble black cherry, currant and dark chocolate. This is robust, packed with opulent fruit and framed by a layer of fine tannins that needs time to soften. It will be best after 2020.",Jewel Collection Estate,Ruby Hill Winery
"An impressive mouthfeel is the standout characteristic of this full-bodied, balanced and elegant wine. It smells and tastes subtly delicious, with restrained rather than overripe cherry and plum flavors, but the way the velvety texture of tannins and acidity surround the fruit and carry it through to the finish is remarkable. The blend holds Grenache, Mourvèdre and Syrah.",L'Autre,Terre Rouge
"Golden roasted nuts, shredded pineapple and white peach converge on the nose of this wine, which remains tight and even thanks to a wet-slate minerality. The palate is nicely textured with a bit of grip, showing golden apples, orange cream, lemon pith and vanilla dust on the finish.",Defina's Vineyard,Blair
"Pure, clean, polished aromas of cherry, plum and berry are fit and fruity. This has a lot of life and spunky tannins, while flavors of raspberry, plum and wild herbs finish with a hint of brine and easy length. This is a fine Mencía made in a crowd-pleasing style. Drink through 2020.",Lalama,Dominio Do Bibei
"This wine is Cabernet Franc and Merlot with just a smidgeon (4%) of Cabernet Sauvignon blended in. It provides aromas of earth, high-toned dried herbs, licorice, black cherry and crushed granite. The dark fruit flavors are densely packed, surrounded by firms tannins. Drink after 2020.",Artz Vineyard,Fall Line
"After an early blast of gaseous sulfur, this heavyweight Tempranillo smells of toasted oak, graphite, latex and alcohol. The palate is lush, meaty, jammy and borderline syrupy, while flavors of blackberry, fig and chocolate finish with depth and extreme richness. Drink through 2025.",Milagros de Figuero,García Figuero
"While dry and impeccably elegant, this buoyantly perfumed Riesling balances subtle notes of honeysuckle and bees wax against a backdrop of luscious, mango, pineapple and peach flavors. The palate is satisfying and supple yet balanced by a sheen of lemon-lime acidity. Finishes long with a savory flick of pollen.",Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"A blend of fruit from Loess, Mill Creek Upland and Leonetti Old Block, this standout wine opens with alluring aromas of dark chocolate, raspberries, blueberries, sandalwood and assorted spices. The palate is plush and fruit-filled but with well-balanced acidity and impressive length.",,Leonetti Cellar
"Classic aromas of wild berry, leather, game and forest floor unfold in the glass. The bright, savory palate delivers mature black cherry, ripe raspberry, clove, star anise and grilled herbs alongside bracing tannins and brisk acidity. Drink 2017_2022.",del Comune di Barolo,Marchesi di Barolo
"Aromas of herbs, dates and licorice lead to reserved, silky-feeling flavors that show multiple layers and detail on this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (59%), Merlot (26%) and Cabernet Franc. It's only ramps up with additional time in the glass.",DuBrul Vineyard,Owen Roe
"The oak (70% new puncheons) is primary at present on this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot. Aromas of vanilla, café au lait and woodspice are out in front of cherry and herbs. The palate shows nuance, detail and length. It needs time in the cellar to come together. Best after 2020.",In Order to Form a More Perfect Union,Rasa
"Aromas of dried herbs and leaves, tree bark and espresso lead to soft, polished cherry and chocolate flavors and a lengthy finish. The refinement and detail are captivating.",QED Axiom of Choice,Rasa
"Aromas of flowers, orange peel, earth and plum lead to a richly flavorful, layered, silky palate with abundant fruit, savory flavors and a long finish. The flavors and texture command attention.",Northern Blend,Rôtie Cellars
"Coffee, herb, cherry, cocoa and barrel-spice aromas draw you into the glass. The palate brings down a velvet hammer with dense, brooding dark cherry flavors backed by tightly wound tannins. It has the stuffing to go the distance. Wait until 2021 or give it a day-long decant.",Klipsun Vineyard,Seven Hills
"Aromas of earth, black cherry, cedar and blackberry precede full-bodied, layered fruit flavors with a long finish. It's a delicious, no-holds-barred offering of the variety.",Nina Lee,Spring Valley Vineyard
"Equal parts Merlot and Cabernet Franc (40% each) with the balance Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, this Stillwater Creek Vineyard wine has aromas of graphite, fresh herbs, dark coffee and cherry. It has palate-coating, layered chocolate and cherry flavors plus abundant vanilla accents, coalescing on the finish and lingering.",Ursa,Baer
"Aromas of perfumed berry, scorched earth, rose and cake spices lead the nose. The structured palate offers wild cherry, crushed strawberry, white pepper, clove and aromatic herbs alongside firm, fine-grained tannins and lively acidity. It's almost accessible but will be even better in a year or two. Drink after 2018.",Cerequio,Beni di Batasiolo
"Firmly structured, this opens with scents of dark cherry marinated in spirits, baking spices, forest floor and a balsamic accent. The focused palate offers red berry, dried black cherry, clove, licorice and dried herbs alongside bracing but refined tannins and nervous acidity. Give this time to unwind and blossom. Drink 2018_2026.",Rocche di Castiglione,Brovia
"This 100% Cabernet Sauvignon is so rich and decadent, with milk chocolate, blackberry and new French oak flavors. Made by celebrity winemaker Philippe Melka, it's soft and approacheable on the palate and widely appealing. Your best bet is to drink up now.",Fortune Teller,Parallel
"The organically-farmed Stermer vineyard really shines in this wine from a difficult vintage. Savory notes surround pretty cherry flavors, creating an elegant, complex and refined Pinot with additional highlights of licorice and black tea. A pat of butter resonates through the lingering finish. This could prove wonderfully ageworthy given its balance, depth and structure.",Stermer Vineyard,Lemelson
"The most floral of Ponzi's single-vineyard Pinots, this is a delicate and yet powerful wine, scented with lavender and roses, and displaying bright, clean raspberry fruit. Stiff acids and grippy tannins support a wine that is locked down tightly and needs decanting and/or aerating to open up.",Abetina 2,Ponzi
"This is a very aromatic wine that's rich, spicy and with just a touch of ripeness. It has spiced pear, lychee and honey notes all balanced by a wonderful fresh acidity. Drink now and until 2020. Screwcap.",Steiner Kögl Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
"This wine is quite opulent, and brimming with flavors of new oak, black currants, blueberries and dark chocolate. While the tannins are thick, they're soft enough to drink now.",Heritage Single Vineyard,Guarachi Family
"Tart cranberry acidity marks this dry, delicately structured young wine. Dusty with tannins, the mouthfeel is tight and nervous. At the core are complex layers of forest berries, cola, mushrooms, exotic baking spices and sweet cedar. Give the wine at least six years in a cellar to mature__t should be flying high by 2029.",Rochioli Riverblock Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This delicious blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot opens with an intense, brooding fragrance of dark fruit, spice and leather. The palate delivers a concentrated black-cherry flavor that's framed by big, chewy tannins and  punctuated by spicy accents of white and black pepper, licorice and pipe. Drink 2015_2024.",Dulcamara,I Giusti e Zanza
"This wine displays ample concentration in its inky color and potent aromas of dark berry fruit. There's a hint of raisining as well. In the mouth, it's mouthfilling but lacks a bit of texture; the flavors include dark plums, vanilla and hints of dried fruits, like figs and dates. With a finish that calls to mind chocolate fudge (minus the sugar), opt for drinking this wine over the relatively near term, now to 2020.",Green's Vineyard,Kilikanoon
"If not the oldest, the vineyard is home to some of the oldest Shiraz vines in the world (planted in 1843). Bright raspberry and cherry fruit is underscored by notes of smoke and mocha in this full-bodied Shiraz. The tannins are soft and turn dusty on the finish, making the wine approachable now, but it should still be going strong in 2025, and possibly beyond.",The Freedom 1843,Langmeil
"This supple, savory Shiraz is approachable now. Hints of vanilla and black olive accent mixed berry fruit, while the texture is rich and creamy. Meat and mocha take over on the long finish. Drink now_2020.",Old Vine,Kaesler
"How can one not applaud a winery that holds back some of its top Riesling for a museum release at such a reasonable price? Developed honey and cinnamon notes accent citrus fruit, adding weight and richness to the midpalate while still finishing crisp and completely dry. It's drinking well now, but should easily hold another 10 years under its screw cap.",The Contours Museum Reserve,Pewsey Vale
"Savory aromas of lemon and crushed mineral transition into gorgeously ?floral, fruity flavors that dominate the palate of this intensely concentrated auslese. Citrusy acidity cuts through layers of sweet yellow cherry and quince paste, accenting a soft, floral finish.",Herrenberg Auslese,Maximin Grünhäuser
"This wine is concentrated ripe, full fruits, as well as intense acidity. It shows a forward style but doesn't losing sight of its tight, dark structure. Drink this balanced wine from 2017.",,Château Prieuré-Lichine
"This impressive Syrah dazzles with richness. The alcohol is high, but that's the price you pay for fruit this ripe. The heat is balanced by the wine's overall acid-tannin balance and remarkable flavors of chocolate, summer berries, mooshu plum sauce and new ?oak. Drink soon for its exuberant fruitiness.",Old 900 Estate,Alta Colina
"Fermentation and aging in French oak barrels with battonage have given this extraordinarily ripe Chardonnay a creamy, leesy mouthfeel. It's the perfect accompaniment to lush tropical fruit, citrus, apricot and baking spice flavors.",Rosella's Vineyard,Bernardus
"This is another fine Pinot from Cambria, showing the winery's great price-quality ratio. Words like opulent and elegant come to mind to describe intense flavors of black cherries, licorice, cola, herb tea and Indian spices. It's bone dry, and also quite tannic, but you can enjoy it now with big, rich lamb and beef dishes, or a wild mushroom risotto. Otherwise, it will continue to improve for at least eight years.",Bench Break Vineyard,Cambria
"Rich yet finely balanced, this wine has both ripe blackberry flavor as well as freshness. With such good structure and solid concentration, there is obviously ageing potential in this impressive wine. Drink from 2016.",,Château Ampélia
"Fermented with only wild yeasts and aged in large Slavonian casks, this is a bold and delicious wine, delivering earthy aromas of tilled soil, spice and berry. The palate delivers layers of blackberry, dark cherry, cinnamon, white pepper and licorice alongside bracing but ripe tannins. This will age well and develop complexity. Drink 2019_2029.",,Tenuta Bellafonte
"This is a really rich wine that has great concentration and richness. It reflects the natural pepper and spice character of Grüner along with tight minerality, a firm texture and considerable aging potential. Drink from 2016.",Purus,Weszeli
"Raspberries, cherries, cola, exotic spices and sweet cedar mark the flavors of this Pinot Noir. It's elegant in the mouth, with brisk acidity, but also a distinct earthiness. The combination gives the wine a yin-yang of weight and weightlessness. It's too young to properly enjoy now, so drink from 2019 and beyond.",Bucher Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"A blend of the best barrels of wine sourced from the Don Miguel Vineyard, Cristina is named for Marimar Torres's daughter. This exceptionally rich wine will reward at least 6_8 years in the cellar. It's concentrated, with notes of raspberries, cherries, pomegranates and rhubarb, all framed by significant tannins. The overall mouthfeel is elegant and weighty.",Cristina Don Miguel Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"While it feels rich and round, this is also a wine with a crisp side to it. Acidity cuts through ripe pear, apricot and lychee flavors, giving a decidedly crisp balance. It's a wine that is already ready to drink. Screwcap.",Kremser Gebling Erste Lage,Josef Schmid
"Sourced from a young vineyard in the region known as the Rocks, this has a distinct umami character along with brambly berry flavors and a dash of pepper. Give it time to breathe and it gains flesh and depth.",Old Stones,K Vintners
"Chestnut Hill is the winery's highest-elevation vineyard, and in a fine vintage such as this, it merits reserve-level treatment. It would be wonderful if more Oregon wineries made Pinot Gris of this caliber, and could sell it at an approachable price, but it's a tough category. Latch onto this rich and concentrated gem if you can; it's a gorgeous mix of apple, pear, chalk and lightly toasted almonds.",Chestnut Hill,Lemelson
"Two characteristics make this wine outstanding. One is the sheer richness of flavor__aves of raspberries, cherries, chocolate, bacon and sandalwood that flood the palate. The other factor is the texture, which is soft and velvety. It's an accomplished blend of Petite Sirah, Grenache, Syrah and Zinfandel from Paso Robles.",Jack Barrett,Proulx
"This reflects the big, modern style of Mendoza Malbec. The bouquet is ripe and hefty, with coconut, mint, blackberry and almond cookie aromas. Expect thick, rugged tannins along with toasty flavors of black coffee, chocolate and mint. A dark, fruity finish is more subtle and harmonious than specific. Drink through 2018.",Obra Prima Coleccion Gran Reserva,Familia Cassone
"A single-vineyard wine from Spitz in the Wachau, this is both crisp and roundly rich. Its weight comes from the superripe fruits that are underpinned by strong pepper and peach flavors. There is a mineral edge to keep everything in order. Drink from 2015.",Obere Steilterrassen Smaragd,Gritsch Mauritiushof
"Dry farmed, Dijon clone Chardonnay shines at this estate. It's stylish, sharp, concentrated and deep, matching tart tree-fruit flavors to a broad streak of buttery oak. It's tightly focused and holds through a long finish. This could certainly be cellared for at least a half decade.",,Shea
"For the price, this offers an exciting array of spice and herb notes layered over blueberry fruit. Cracked pepper and licorice mark the nose, while the midpalate is supple, making it go down deceptively easily. If it falls off a bit on the finish, that's a mere quibble. Drink it over the next several years.",,Earthworks
"A terrific value, this 50-50 blend displays gentle oaking and a hint of warm asphalt, just enough to highlight the wine's plum and black cherry fruit. It's full bodied and features a long finish, outlined by wonderfully fine, dusty tannins. Drink now_2018.",d'Arry's Original,D'Arenberg
"This is a huge Pinot Noir__ig-boned all around__asting of warm climate fruit, with bulky tannins and a heavy oak presence. Let it open a bit to let out the dark plum and earthy spice flavors.",Filigreen,Paul Dolan
This is an easy Pinot Grigio that can be employed during informal drinking occasions. Bright citrus and melon ride an easy and somewhat short finish. Try it with Chinese take-out.,,San Giuseppe
"There's a thick cloak of tar and darkly toasted oak that dissipates with aeration to reveal ripe, roasted black-fruit flavors in this medium-bodied Merlot. Dense with fruit and hints of dark spice, the palate gets a hit of freshness from vibrant acidity.",,Waters Crest
"Broad scents of honeydew, candied lemon and orchard fruit mark the nose, with an underpinning of toasted nut. The palate is medium bodied, with balanced acidity and apple flavor.",,White Hall
"This is an aromatically reticent wine with notes of cherry, herbs, and bell pepper. The palate has sweet fruit flavors, soft, chalky tannins and a smoke-filled finish.",Windmill Red,Williamson Vineyard
"Zeta Dry, with a Zorro-style ___ etched across the label, offers an easy-drinking sparkling wine experience with light shades of citrus, mineral and stone fruit.",Millesimato Dry Zeta,Zardetto
"Here's a fun and easy-drinking Pinot Grigio (in a screw cap bottle) that delivers bright citrus, melon and dried hay. The mouthfeel is very simple with a smooth, waxy feel and a slightly sweet endnote.",Classic Line,Domenico Cavazza
"This has intriguing aromas of marzipan and white cherry, plus touches of apple and mineral. A medium-bodied wine, it offers acidity that becomes mouth-puckering on the finish. Pair this with some goat cheese to help tame the tartness.",,Doukénie
"Rosé should be dry, delicate and crisp in acidity. This Grenache, Mourvèdre and Syrah blend succeeds on two of those levels, but not dryness. The raspberry fruit has a simple jamminess that's almost dessert-style.",,Dragonette
"An easy Pinot Grigio to like for its smoothness and slightly sweet orange peel, white pepper, vanilla and honey flavors. Good everyday price, and in wide distribution.",Willow Springs,CK Mondavi
"Merlot leads the pack in this blend of six Bordeaux varieties with a dash of Syrah (5%). The fruit is taken from five different vineyards across Washington and Idaho. It has notes of candied cherry, licorice and ash, with tart flavors and dry, astringent tannins.",Renaissance,Clearwater Canyon
"Chardonnay offers the roundness while Fernão Pires offers perfume in this attractive, ready-to-drink wine. It has bright, crisp lemon and green-apple acidity that is immediately appealing. Screwcap.",Tagus Creek Chardonnay and Fernão Pires,Falua
"This wine has a restrained nose, featuring wooly aromas of leather, wild berry and cherry. The light- to medium-bodied palate has supple, fine-grained tannins, with light flavors of savory spice and grilled herb. A note of macerated strawberry lingers on the finish.",,Chateau Morrisette
"Easy to drink for its ripe, jammy blackberry and cherry flavors. It's a simple wine, with brisk acidity for balance. The price is right for what you get.",The Brakeman,Dixie Flyer Vineyards
"Aged in stainless steel, this is lightly aromatic, with notes of nectarine and overripe apple. Labeled at 14.5% alcohol, it surprisingly never shows it. Rather the fruit concentration comes off as a bit wanting.",,Fujishin
"This is a simple and clean Prosecco with medium intensity, little depth and bright fruit layers of peach and tangerine. It's a good choice for very informal drinking occasions.",Extra Dry,Foss Marai
"This is a juicy, ripe style of Vinho Verde that's soft, clean and refreshing. It's a summer-evening wine, light and bright. Screwcap.",,Calamares
"A tart mouthfeel with layers of cherry and cranberry fruit is enhanced by this bubbly Lambrusco's dark ruby color. This is a dry expression with plump, fruity density in the mouth.",Granarossa,Bertolani
"Generous and creamy perlage opens the stage for deeply fragrant tones of tangerine skin, white flower and peach. The wine is soft and soapy with load of bubbling in the mouth.",,Bera
"This sparkling red Lambrusco boasts a simple, but attractive quality of fruit, with bursting notes of raspberry and wild strawberry. Creamy, bubbly foam and balanced acidity characterize the mouthfeel. In terms of Lambrusco, this wine is very pleasurable with a sweet, plush close.",Primabolla,Cantina di Puianello
"Ripe stem and leaf notes lend a distinctly green tone to bright black-cherry and cassis flavors in this Cabernet Franc. It's a slightly austere wine, but brisk acidity and delicate structure make it an excellent food companion.",,Castello di Borghese
"Bright, simple and clean, here is a bubbly Lambrusco that opens with tones of forest berry and wild strawberry followed by a touch of bitter almond skin.",,La Battagliola
"Pignoletto is a little-known grape variety that is rarely produced as a mono-varietal expression. It's even rarer to see it in a sparkling, or frizzante, version like this: Sweet floral aromas are backed by bright peach nectar.",,La Mancina
Ravaldo is sour and bitter wine that needs to be paired with cheesy lasagna with thick Béchamel sauce to find balance. You'll sense bright berry and cranberry with a sharp and edgy mouthfeel.,Ravaldo,Stefano Berti
"From a mediocre vintage, it seems as though the winery poured on the fully toasted oak to cover up marginal fruit. This smells like burnt meat and rubber, tastes charred and baked, and finishes blackened and overly toasty, with a choppy feel and hard tannins.",Altos Lanzaga Gran Viñedo,Telmo Rodríguez
"Here's a Kosher, sweet white wine from Puglia that opens with playful aromas of spring flower, honeysuckle, almond blossom and lemon mousse. The wine feels and tastes similar to Moscato d'Asti, but is a hair sweeter.",Sara Bee,Santero
"This is a very lean and dry expression of Prosecco Superiore that does a great job of refreshing a thirsty mouth on a hot summer day, but adds little else. Lemon and white flower aromas are backed by sharp bubbles.",Zero Nove Brut,Valdellövo
"Tart flavors of sour cherry and cranberry add dimension to a mouthfeel that is characterized by balanced acidity, soft texture and creamy foam. The wine would make a great companion to buttery foods.",Roncolo,Venturini Baldini
"Thin and dry, this wine has Pinot's silky mouthfeel, but little else. The mushroom, cola and spearmint flavors are relieved by some cherry fruit. Not going anywhere, so drink up.",Single Vineyard,Rocking K
"This blend of Tempranillo, Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Garnacha is gamy on the nose, with aromas of tomato leaf, compost and cherry-pie filling. The palate is decidedly acidic, while flavors of zesty red fruits like red currant and sour plum come across herbal and a touch weedy.",Raso de Larrainzar,Pago de Larrainzar
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this is packed with Tuscan sunshine and intensity. Notes of blackberry, leather, tobacco and dark chocolate are recognizeable. It's dense and thick, yet it delivers soft, velvety sensations on the finish.",Alfeo,Ceralti
"Made from fruit sourced from a small premier cru that's located next to the famous Clos des Mouches, this is juicy, round and ripe, with a great swathe of soft, fleshy tannins.",Pertuisots Premier Cru,Domaine des Croix
"This wine is structured, but it has ripe red fruit that cushions the firm tannins. It is dense, and it offers a fine harmony of flavors as well as a burst of acidity on the finish. With its tannins, this should age for many years.",Les Porêts-Saint-Georges Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"Rich and smooth, this wine's structured tannins are fully integrated into its juicy fruit. It's a ripe bottling, and it shows a hint of wood aging in the form of a smoky character. The acidity is intense, which perks up the berry fruit. This promises to age.",Cent Vignes Premier Cru,Domaine Jessiaume
"Let this Pinot Noir age for at least 5_6 more years, because right now it's tannic and closed. The acidity gives the palate a citrus-like quality, and the concentrated core of cherries and currants is sweet, spicy, succulent and balanced.",Clone 115,Fess Parker
"An opulent blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, this delivers soft tones of cherry and mild chocolate, followed by subtle notes of leather and spice. It demonstrates overall balance, and its intensity is elegantly understated. The palate delivers firm but velvety tannins.",L'Alberello,Grattamacco
"This expression of Merlot is soft and plush, and it offers layers of cherry, raspberry and soft spice. Oak-derived aromas of toasted almond and clove are delicate and well integrated.",I'Rennero,Gualdo del Re
"A bold blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah, this opens with soft and luscious fruit tones of cherry and blackberry jam. Leather and tobacco add a savory, masculine quality, and there's a tart red-fruit flavor that adds a touch of refreshing acidity.",Levia Gravia,Caccia al Piano 1868
"This wine shows the structured side of Gevrey-Chambertin. The vineyard is situated at the opening of a small side valley, a location that allows the grapes to ripen slowly. This is elegant and structured, and it's full of solid tannins as well as cherry and red berry flavors. Age this for 7_8 years.",Lavaux Saint-Jacques Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Zippy, zesty acidity balances the ripe pear, lime and tropical fruit flavors. There are also rich streaks of buttered toast and vanilla bean from having matured in oak, as well as a yeastiness from having aged on its lees. Dry and complex, this wine is meant to be consumed with crab and buttered bread.",Boon's Fly Hill,Kazmer & Blaise
"Made from fruit from what many consider to be the finest site for growing Syrah in the state, this wine opens gracefully to reveal scents of plump berry, vanilla and tobacco. Briefly aged in a mix of one- and two-year-old French oak barrels, it offers concentrated berry and black cherry flavors that never turn syrupy. The crisp acidity suggests cellaring for up to a decade.",Boushey Vineyard Liberté,Maison Bleue
"The vines from which the fruit for this wine were sourced are, on average, 15 years old. Aged primarily in French oak, this concentrated wine shows fine depth, with an emphasis on black cherry and cassis flavors. Full and ripe, this well-structured effort has the balance and polished tannins to be cellared for a decade, at least.",,Northstar
"This is a rich, rounded wine, yet it also expresses a tight texture and nervy acidity. The toast influence is still dominating, although the fruitiness of this ripe selection is also showing. With its weight and structure, this is a prime candidate to age for several years.",Charmes Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Tropical fruit aromas lead to a peach- and apricot-flavored palate. It shows old-vine concentration, spice from having aged in wood and a generous, velvet-like texture that is balanced by a fine shot of lemony acidity. Age this for 4_5 years.",Vieilles Vignes,Roche de Bellene
"A blend of Bordeaux-based grapes, Terra di Monteverro shows youthful aromas of cherry, blackberry and cassis, backed by savory layers of spice, leather and tobacco. This is rich, smooth and powerful, and it will age for 10 years or more.",Terra di Monteverro,Monteverro
"This gorgeous expression of Syrah doles out rich, generous and ripe fruit flavors and a deeply textured, plush mouthfeel. Elegant notes of licorice and white pepper appear on the finish.",Regina di Renieri,Renieri
"From the beguiling aromatics to the thrilling palate that's saturated with flavors of citrus flesh and rind, tangerine and green apple, this Viognier offers superb focus. The length and detail are noteworthy, but the taste is simply delicious.",,Watermill
"This blend of 80% Cabernet Sauvignon and 20% Cabernet Franc shows intensity, extraction and tight, polished tannins. Between the wine's strength and structure are soft layers of dark fruit, spice, leather and tobacco that evolve over time.",Riverbero,Campo al Noce
"Roughly half of the blend is made from fruit that comes from 30-year-old vines. An addition of 6% Muscat adds a scent of tree fruit, and the lovely citrus and stone fruit flavors are enhanced by a fresh-baked bread note. It has excellent concentration and impeccable balance, plus a long, satisfying finish.",,Forgeron
"Tobacco, leather and graham cracker notes open the nose of this bold and chewy Merlot. There are flavors of dark cherry, plum and cassis, followed by touches of tangy spices. The tannins are round and soft, and the palate has a dense, chewy quality that would pair with succulent meat dishes.",Sonoro,Ceralti
"Too young to drink now, this blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon shows all the requisites to be an age-worthy wine. The quality of the fruit is rich, the acidity is bright, and the tannins will carry the wine forward during its slow evolution.",Corbaia,Castello di Bossi
"This is a blend of Bordeaux grapes sourced from the Riparbella Vineyard, which is located at 1,500 feet above sea level in Maremma. The property belongs to the Ferragamo fashion family. The tannins are velvety, firm and do a great job of supporting the bright flavors of black fruit and spice.",Prima Pietra,Castiglion del Bosco
"An outstanding Reserve, this opens with potent aromas of spice and cacao, which lead onto a muscular, sleek and stylish palate that shows terrific depth of black fruits. The wine has exceptional structure, and it remains nuanced, with details of earth and stem.",Reserve,Columbia Crest
"From it's musky, perfumed to nose to it's intensely honeyed, dried-peach- and apricot-flavored palate, everything about this wine is mysterious and ethereal. Crafted by monks in an ancient Georgian monastery, this amber-hued wine is made from white grapes that were fermented and aged in clay vessels (qvevri) and that underwent extended skin contact, which resulted in a wine with puckering tannins and a richly textural mouthfeel.",Qvevri Traditional Kakhuri Dry Unfiltered Amber Wine,Alaverdi Monastery Cellar
"Close to the white grand crus of Chassagne-Montrachet, this wine is structured and weighty, and it offers juicy apricot and pear flavors. A citrus element cuts through the wood influence and the steely texture, which brings freshness to the ripe, rich mouthfeel.",Vide Bourse Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"This dry, complex Cabernet Sauvignon bears classic Napa tannins, plus layers of blackberry, black currant, violet, mineral and cedar flavors. The grapes were grown in the Coombsville area. Drink now, after decanting, and continue to drink it through 2016.",Eminence,Bougetz
"This is a dry wine, yet the flavors of raspberries and cherries are sweet tasting. It has a delicate, silky mouthfeel, and the tart acids add plenty of cut. Pair this with grilled, broiled or pan-fried steak, served with mushrooms.",,La Rochelle
"Intense, generous aromas of white flower, passion fruit, citrus blossom and crushed stone comprise the nose. This blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay offers impressive intensity and a long, spicy finish.",Paleo,Le Macchiole
"This opulent wine opens with a blast of buttered toast and tropical fruit aromas. The flavors are complex, with swirls of pineapple, pear, yeast, toast and cinnamon. Drink now_2015.",Charles Ranch,Martinelli
"Forest, Yatir's top-of-the-line offering, is always a dense and powerful wine that can age. Right now, the wine smells young and a bit closed, hiding some of its beauty and nuance behind the upfront black plum, cassis and cherry fruit aromas. Hints of fruitcake spice, bramble, cigar box and leather occasionally flicker in the background, revealing what time has in store for this dark beauty of a wine. Big and rich right now, with a full structure and gripping tannins. Drink 2016_2022.",Forest,Yatir
"This is a soft and fruity wine, showing bright currant fruits in a perfumed context. Tangy, nervy, showing plenty of minerality to boost the acidity and fruitiness.",,Leon Beyer
"Smooth and soft, this is a warm wine, showing richness as well as a lightly rustic character that will disappear as the wine ages. It has fine tannins, layered with crisp acidity and a stalky, spicy texture. Drink now or keep until 2016.",,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"Created by Vigouroux as a hommage to Malbec in Cahors and Argentina, this has the structure of Cahors and the rich smoothness of Mendoza. Complex, powerful, full of ripe fruit, it's impressively juicy, textured and full of acidity at the end.",Antisto Tradition,Georges Vigouroux
"A softly polished wine that's ready to enjoy soon, this shows classic aromas of black fruit, spice, tobacco leaf and underbrush. It has a delicious black-cherry flavor, punctuated with black pepper, clove and a hint of bitter almond.",Monti Garbi,Tenuta Sant'Antonio
"Rich, structured and full-bodied, this is an open take on Pouilly Fuissé. It's shows ripe white fruits like pear and quince, along with fine acidity and a fresh citrus streak. Age for a year or drink now.",Marie Antoinette,Vincent
"Earthy aromas of tilled soil, meat juices and blackberry are accompanied by flavors of black cherry and nutmeg. The palate is already evolved and shows tertiary aromas, with a slight warmth throughout, so drink over the next few years.",,Scriani
"Licorice and leather aromas give character to smoky yet generic plum and raspberry scents. This feels tight and fresh given its age, with earthy, slightly muddled flavors of raspberry and plum infused with oak and vanilla. On the finish, things seem caught between racy and tired, so drink now.",Reserva,Siglo
"Ripe and sweet in black cherry jam, cassis, chocolate, anise and cedar flavors that are delicious, but heavy, trading elegance and finesse in favor of opulent power. It's the poster child for Napa Cabernet made in the modern cult style.",,Ankh
"Just what you want a California Merlot to be. It's soft in the mouth, with silky tannins framing easy flavors of cherries, red currants, mocha and cinnamon spice. Great with cheeseburgers, lamb curry, beef tartare.",,Ancient Peaks
"Tomato, red bell pepper, plum and currant aromas have a slightly sharp, varietal-related minty, green angle. This feels round and creamy on the tongue, with good acidity propping up flavors of baked berries, spice, chocolate, raw oak and vanilla. A medium-length finish with baking spice flavors confirms the wine's power.",Pasionado,Andeluna
"This Cabernet Sauvignon-centric blend includes all six Bordeaux varieties. It has sweet, ripe notes of fresh dark cherries, herbs and chocolate drizzled with butter backed by slightly dry tannins.",Destiny Estate Grown Destiny Ridge Vineyards,Alexandria Nicole
"Celebrating the founding in 1875 of Antonin Rodet, this ripe, perfumed wine has red fruits that are opulent, gloriously drinkable already. It's ripe, softly textured, layered with delicate acidity.",Héritage Rodet,Antonin Rodet
"Grenache, which accounts for 31% of the blend, dominates the flavor, giving it the pure essence of red cherries. There's also a lot of Syrah, which brings darker tones as well as tannic weight and depth. It's quite a good wine, and shows mastery of the blend, with grapes coming from all over Central and Northern California. Drink now.",Hope,Aver Family Vineyards
"The blend of Pinot Noir and Gamay gives a wine with weight and richness as well as a tight, mineral character. The wine is full in the mouth with its creamy mousse and fine pear and citrus fruits. A wine for food rather than apéritif.",Perle de Nuit Blanc de Noirs Brut,Louis Bouillot
"At first a stiff, unyielding wine, this shows promising__hough compact__ark fruits with a strong herbal streak. Fresh greens and other herbs move into a finish with barrel flavors of tar and espresso.",Reserve,Hogue
"Medium-intense scents of dark berries and black plum unfold in the bouquet of this wine, with soft hints of vanilla, toast and garrigue in the background. The mouthfeel is robust and gripping, with skin-driven fruit flavors and solid tannins that stay through the finish.",Rouge,Le Cirque
"This wine's aromas are muted at first but open delicately into strawberry and cherry most predominantly, representing the 55% Mourvèdre and 35% Grenache in the blend. On the finish, the 10% Petite Sirah speaks up in the form of chocolatey tannins.",Tailrace,Legendre
"Made with the Friulano grape__ormerly known as Tocai Friulano__his white offers lemon peel and mineral aromas that carry over to the palate. It's long and linear, with a crisp finish.",,Mario Schiopetto
"This Chard is ripe with tropical fruit, lime, buttered toast and caramel flavors, but saved from flaccid simplicity by firm acidity and a stony minerality. The source of the grapes is the Dutton Ranch, one of the most superbly managed vineyards in Sonoma County.",Dutton Ranch,Frazier
"Rich and ripe, with soft tannins and a dense texture. The wine has finely integrated weight and spice. It is soft and on the sweet side, with black currant fruit and a dense finish.",Vintage,Delaforce
"Strident apple and lime aromas are pure and pretty in this wine. This isn't a complex or complicated white, but rather friendly and easy to like. Flavors of peach, apple and apricot finish minerally and clean. This is a textbook quaffing wine.",,Beronia
"This is Blue Plate's first red wine after a couple successful vintages of Clarksburg Chenin Blanc. It's an impressive wine and one hell of a deal. Light in color with a pretty nose of flowery raspberry and strawberry, it's softly textured and delicious with a long finish, a wine to savor but not take too seriously, simply drink and enjoy.",,Blue Plate
"Coming from one of Washington's premier Riesling sites, it's redolent with peach, mineral and floral notes. It drinks almost completely dry with bright, crisp acids.",Evergreen Vineyard,Tempus Cellars
"Sourced entirely from the Bacchus vineyard, this was whole-cluster pressed and 20% was fermented in neutral oak. Just a hint of sweetness remains, but what comes across strongly is a mineral-driven, wet stone base, under snappy fruit flavors of citrus, apple and orange peel.",Birdie,Sparkman
"Decadent in coffee, toffee and caramel tones, the leathery mouthfeel of this wine is met head-to-head by a juiciness of ripe, dense blackberry fruit. An approachable Petite Sirah that will also please lovers of the variety's chewiness and concentration.",Seven Sinners,Nine North Wine Company
"Spicy red currant fruit comes up quickly, backed with the grape's signature accents of stem and earth. There's a residual flavor of slightly bitter tomato leaf.",Stillwater Creek Vineyard,Novelty Hill
"A soft and rounded wine, full of ripe fruits that command all the attention. Red fruits dominate, just supported by tannins and a firm dryness. This is a rich wine that will age quickly, worth drinking in the next two years.",,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"A chunky, solid wine, its tannins as important as its fruitiness. It shows black fruits, ripe bitter cherry flavors, along with dense tannins. Offering a powerful blast of Pinot Noir, and worth aging for three years.",,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"This Amarone has nearly overripe aromas, with hints of nail varnish and raisin. The palate is better, offering spirit-soaked black cherry, black pepper and licorice notes. You'll also notice the warmth of alcohol on the midpalate.",,Rubinelli Vajol
"This forward Amarone reflects the heat of the vintage. It has somewhat evolved aromas of leather and prune, accompanied by rich black fruit flavors and soft acidity. The tannins are starting to fade, so enjoy now and over the next few years.",Famiglia Pasqua,Pasqua
"This is a crisp, clean and zesty wine, built on a simple but tasty base of white grapefruit. It's light to medium in body, with a refreshing finish.",Stich,Jackson Estate
"Subtle berry and wildflower aromas lead the nose of this bright, friendly red. The informal palate offers crushed wild cherry, raspberry and a hint of clove alongside soft, rather fleeting tannins.",,Fattoria Uccelliera
"This wine hits all the standard Marlborough Sauvignon Blanc notes: ripe notes of fig and melon joined by cut grass and citrus. It's not overly concentrated, but it's easy to drink and comes together harmoniously on the finish.",,Framingham
"Here's a simple but savory red that delivers fruity aromas and flavors of wild cherry, crushed strawberry and juicy raspberry. Vibrant acidity and soft tannins lend an immediate, easy-drinking quality.",Bozzetto,Bartali
"Made entirely with Sangiovese, this opens with aromas of wet leaves, underbrush, leather and prune. The palate offers dried red and black cherry, grilled sage and a confectionary note alongside lithe tannins. Drink soon to capture the remaining fruit.",Poggio ai Grilli,Tenuta San Jacopo
"Leathery, roasted plum and berry aromas come with a noticeable charred, smoky side. This is full and edgy on the palate, with rubbery tannins. Flavors of charred oak steer leafy berry flavors toward a dry, herbal, spicy finish.",,Viña Los Valles
"Unusual aromas of cardamom and cinnamon accent blueberry and plum scents. In the mouth, this is robust and voluminous but mild in terms of tannins and structure. Earthy, stewy plum and blackberry flavors finish charred, with herbal notes and heat.",Vendimia Seleccionada,Bodegas Riolanc
"This wine is smooth while keeping all of its fresh wits about it. Citrus, red apple and quince flavors give both spice and ripe fruits. With its lively, tangy aftertaste, it does need to broaden out, so drink from 2016.",,Château de l'Aubrade
"Intense youthful Sauvignon, this is all about lemon, pink grapefruit and acidity. A textured quality gives an orange-zest character while still letting the bright fruit speak freshly and easily. Drink from late 2015. The estate, near Cadillac on Bordeaux's Right Bank, is managed by Jean-Louis Sanfourche, fourth-generation producer at the estate.",,Château Haut Maurin
"This blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Muscadelle and Sémillon is round, full and softly textured. White fruits, spice and fresh acidity are already well integrated. The end is tangy with lemon zest flavors. Drink now. The estate has been in the Forcato family since 1950.",,Château Lary
"A 100% varietal wine, this opens in floral violet perfume, delicate notions that are soon overpowered by the chock-a-block blackberry and plum. The tannins are robust and still integrating, giving the wine a somewhat harsh feel.",Unfiltered,Barlow
"A blend of six different varieties with Syrah (72%) in the lead, this pale cherry-color wine pops with aromas of bubble gum, wild strawberry and orange peel. The concentration is a bit light with the tart finish that pulls it together.",,Charles & Charles
"This steely, tangy wine has a strongly mineral character__ight, taut and crisp. Green fruits, citrus and a grassy character dominate. It is ready to drink. This is an unusual 75% Sémillion and 25% Sauvignon Blanc blend that tends to round out the taste.",,Château Anniche
"This is Provence pink in color__ight and just slightly shaded with copper. It smells floral and fruity, like watermelon, canteloupe and cucumber. The balance is on the sweet side, lending a softness in texture.",Belle en,Andis
"A light orange-pink colored wine, this is poised, bright and fruity. Raspberries dominate, giving fresh character as well as bringing in great fruitiness.",,Domaine du Claouset
"Substantially tannic and robust in tar and tobacco, this wine smells and tastes big and broad, a good choice for generous cuts of meat, preferably grilled. Black cherry and blackberry expand in waves around the oak and tobacco.",,Chateau St. Jean
"Here's a fruity blend of Sangiovese, 10% Canaiolo and 10% Colorino that doles out plum, black cherry, coffee and a hint of spice. It's simple and easy drinking, with soft, round tannins.",,Coli
"Forceful flavors of leather pouch, black pepper and blackberry throw their weight around an extracted, jammy core that's intensely powerful on the palate. The sizable tannins give the wine a chewiness, but become softer through the cinnamon conclusion.",Rockpile Road Vineyard,Rosenblum
"Aromas of baking spices, green pepper and cherry lead to lighter-styled fruit flavors that seem a bit diluted.",,Telaya
"Golden in color, this wine has a light presence on the palate, offering both floral and herbal highlights of jasmine and cinnamon. A faint squeeze of citrus is perceptible throughout, before the wine finishes in a flash.",,The Federalist
"With fruit coming from the Ancient Lakes appellation, this pungent wine has aromas of flowers, tire rubber, berries and herbs. The floral and plum flavors are sweet with a plush feel.",,Voila!
"Lighter in color, this Syrah (83%)-dominated blend shows aromas of dehydrated blueberries, milk chocolate, black olive and plum. The blue fruit flavors are lightly sweet, with some residual sugar holding it together.",Red Beauty,Wild Meadows
"This blend of Sangiovese and 10% Merlot opens with aromas of baked plum, spice, menthol and a whiff of cellar floor. The palate offers sawdust, licorice and blackberry extract alongside assertive wood tannins that dry out the mouth.",Poggio Gualtieri Riserva,Fattoria di Grignano
"This is an aromatically brooding wine with notes of herbs, pepper and brown spices. It drinks quite sweet with a lightly chalky feel.",Minnick Hills Vineyard,Lagana
"While bright and tropical on the nose, the intense ripeness of this dry Cabernet Franc rosé lends a caramelized, almost ruddy richness to the palate. Brisk acidity lends balance and structure.",Dry,Lamoreaux Landing
"This 100% Merlot offers a lot of heat around its otherwise approachable lift of soft, smooth tannins and reasonable oak. Sage, cedar and tobacco provide a weedy aspect to the wine, offset by plenty of ripe blackberry and cherry.",,Hanaiali'i
"This has lively red fruits, fresh acidity and a line of crisp red currants. A spicy character is fragrant, while the fruitiness keep the wine refreshing.",,Mademoiselle Comédie
"This forcefully oaked Garnacha offers rustic berry fruit aromas over clove. The high acidity is offset by resiny oak, while flavors of clove and char vie with generic red-berry flavors over a slightly hot finish.",Selección Especial,Marqués de Montañana
"Smoky barbecue and big oak and tannin combine for power and density in this wine, which has a handful of Malbec blended in. Hard to penetrate at first, it over time reveals notes of blackberry, savory leather and cedar.",,Peju
"Rounded, soft and smoothly creamy, this is a ripe wine dominated by Pinot Meunier. It's an open wine, fruity and ready to drink.",Tradition Brut,Piot-Sévillano
"Straightforward and already accessible, this opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, allspice and grilled herb. On the palate, closely-knit, fine-grained tannins support juicy sour cherry and red raspberry while notes of clove and white pepper add interest. Drink through 2019.",,CarlindePaolo
"More concentrated-tasting and intense than some of d'Arenberg's other 2011 single-vineyard Shirazes, this is still somewhat restrained. Some tobacco notes add nuance to the Ribena-like fruit, picking up hints of vanilla and earth on the finish.",The Blind Tiger Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"This is complex and compelling. A spicy, minty, thyme-like character comes out in the aroma and continues in the flavor, most likely from some new barrels used in aging the wine. It's an attractive characteristic, and complements the bright cherry flavors, medium body and quite firm tannins.",The Classic Four,Spann Vineyards
"Lavish floral notes perfume this lusciously sweet ice-style Riesling. Honeyed apples and fresh figs burst on the palate, their flavors intensified on the finish with a hit of zesty lemon acidity.",Ice,Standing Stone
"This wine is big, very full bodied and very lush in texture. Super-ripe in flavor, it rides at the place where plum notes segue to prune, and black cherry to cherry syrup, which is a very tasty place to be. Plenty of fine tannins frame all that concentration, yet the mouthfeel stays soft.",Altitude 2401 Reserve Fair Play Farms,Perry Creek
The slightly oxidized nose of this wine by Michael Gill recalls dried yet tart apricot skins with a bit of white peach freshness. The palate is framed by acidity while offering apple and lime flavors.,,Tuxedo Cellars
"A light golden color, this richly aromatic wine brings notes of papaya, pineapple and brown sugar. It coats the palate with honeyed, ripe pear, apricot and pineapple flavors. Drink up.",Late Harvest,Vortex
"This opens with tropical fruit aromas of pineapple, mango and melon that are framed by hints of honeysuckle and sweet spice. The medium-weight palate boasts similar tropical fruit tones, but with an assertive mineral and lime-zest lift on the close, ending fresh and lively. Drink up.",Wild Yeast,Springfield Estate
"Herbal, green-leaning aromas of fennel, olive and basil accent meaty berry and sweet oak scents. Chunky and well balanced, this is a ripe Syrah with black plum, cocoa, cured meat and woody flavors. On the finish, chocolaty notes and plenty of oak are the bedding for ripe berry flavors.",First Edition,Valle Secreto
"A subtle smokiness lends an intriguing streak to the nose of this wine, partnering harmoniously with scents of crisp red apple, melon rind, green fig and orange zest. Well balanced and approachable, the medium-weight palate offers clean flavors of apple, lime and softly toasted brioche. Enjoy now.",,Radford Dale
"This is a very dry and crisp Champagne. With fresh acidity and sliced apple, lemon and green plum-skin fruitiness, it's still in its young and steely stage. There is plenty of fruit and texture to allow it to age.",Finesse Absolue Premier Cru Brut,Duval-Leroy
"Aromas of cheesy oak, jammy berry and cassis are ripe and a touch raisiny. A wide, full-bodied palate shows scratchy tannins, while core flavors of blackberry and cassis feature mild but present oak in front of a tannic finish. Drink through 2020.",Family Reserva,Echeverria
"Globe-trotting Laely Heron's take on roughly 16-year-old vines in Monterey reveals aromas of Coca Cola, black cherry, ripe plum, sweet beet juice and a bit of tree bark. The palate is powered by anise-spiced cherries and pomegranate, fairly straightforward but quite quaffable.",,Heron
"Wood-aged and ripe, this is a solid, tannic wine. With mint over black fruits and firm new wood flavors, it will need to age. It is powerful on the palate from all the wood tannins and dense structure. Drink from 2017.",Vendémia,Lo Domeni
"This is a very dark wine from the Kama Sutra-inspired winery, with aromas of creosote and blueberry. The flavors are quite thick with blackberry juice, balanced with pangs of acidity yet finishing on the soft side.",Secret Craving,LXV
"Aromas of blue flower, ripe berry and allspice jump out of the glass of this full-bodied but elegant red. The fresh, juicy palate offers blueberry, blackberry, graphite and a hint of mocha. Firm, fine-grained tannins offer support and give it a smooth texture.",Altemura,Masseria Altemura
"Grapes come from an estate vineyard overlapping from Alexander Valley to the Russian River Valley and Chalk Hill. This wine reflects that relatively warm territory, offering hay and herbal notes on the nose, followed by a bright entry of lemon that evolves into richer, fatter tropical fruit, vanilla and crème brûlée.",Bell Mountain Estate,Medlock Ames
"Spicy, dry and showing cassis and berry aromas, this is a textbook Chilean Cabernet. A tight, tannic palate stops short of grating, while spicy berry and toast flavors offer a touch of oaky mocha. The finish is mild and echoes with the flavors that came before it.",Reserva,Echeverria
"Bright and elegant, this opens with aromas of violet and wild berry. The linear palate offers wild red cherry, crushed strawberry, white pepper and a mineral note alongside fresh acidity and supple tannins. Delicious and refreshing, this is made for pure drinking pleasure. Enjoy soon.",,Cantina del Pino
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this wine suggests smoke, cocoa, dry chocolate, dark fruit and barrel spices. The flavors are chocolaty and candy-bar sweet backed by a firm grip of tannins.",Calico,Bergevin Lane
This wine comes a portion of the Château Bouscassé vineyard that makes more forward wines. It's not exactly light with its 14.5% alcohol but it does have a bounce and lift from the red berry fruits and fresh acidity. The wood aging has left a toast and tannin taste that will allow it to age until 2017 before being ready.,Tour Bouscassé,Alain Brumont
"Soft, light, fresh and zippy. This quintessential and very refreshing light white wine hints at citrus, arugula and pepper notes and presents a light-footed, invigorating mouthful.",,Broadbent
"Coming from Stillwater Creek, Alder Ridge and McKinley Springs vineyards, this wine offers much to love, with notes of blueberry pie, toffee, vanilla and barrel spices. Flavors are rich and hedonistic, accented by quite tart acids and tannins that provide a somewhat surprising squeeze.",,Coeur d'Alene
"Half Syrah, a quarter Cabernet Sauvignon and the balance a mixture of other varieties, this wine offers fresh and dried black fruit accented by cocoa and vanilla. It's plush in feel with red and black fruit flavors that bring plenty of appeal.",Tried and True Liberty,T.A.T.T
"In this 100% varietal, grapes from Art Den Hoed Vineyard were aged in neutral French oak. Front notes suggest black raspberry, grape Jolly Rancher and kirsch. It's flavorful and supple in feel, with plummy fruit flavors leading to a meat-filled finish. Still drinking young, it should improve with additional time in the bottle.",,Tempus Cellars
"Packaged in an extremely heavy bottle, this conveys aromas of underbrush, black berry and cake spice. The sleek palate offers mature black cherry, crushed raspberry, licorice and black pepper alongside polished tannins. Drink through 2018.",Ottagono Riserva,Torrevento
"Lactic notes of curd and buttermilk appear before yeasty, rounded citrus hints take over. This is a Pinot Blanc for those who love rich and rounded Chardonnays. Its creamy palate texture calls out for food.",Bärnreiser,Netzl
"An elegant expression of this grape, this smooth, full-bodied wine delivers layers of spicy plum, juicy blackberry, graphite, clove and licorice. Firm but velvety tannins provide ample texture and support.",,Ognissole
This aromatic sparkler has appealing notes of kiwi and pineapple. It drinks dry with abundant fruit and spice flavors.,Flowers Brut Méthode Champenoise,Pacific Rim
"Earthy and tarry at first, this is a firmly structured Shiraz. Peppery notes accent blueberry and blackberry fruit along the way to a slightly abbreviated finish. Try in 2016.",Amery Vineyard Basket Pressed,Kay Brothers
"Open and fruity, this is a fresh citrus and green fruit flavored wine. It is light and crisp with only a hint of texture, more in the way of enjoyable fruitiness. Drink now.",Porrais,Quinta de Porrais
"Ripe red cherry and raspberry penetrate deeply throughout this sunny, yet briskly composed Pinot Noir. It's approachable and uncomplicated in style, but pristine juicy flavors make it quite quaffable. Drink now.",Mettenheimer,Schäfer
"Raspberry flavors are front and center in this young, light wine. It keeps the tart acids in proportion, and the palate is focused and well defined. The finish turns hard and tannic, but further bottle age should soften it up a bit.",,Swick
"Scorched soil, leather, overripe berry and espresso aromas lead the nose. The palate is still primary, offering raw sour cherry, grilled herb, tobacco and licorice alongside tightly packed tannins and nervous acidity. Drink after 2020.",Bussia,Sylla Sebaste
"Proudly boasting that there were no added sulphites in the winemaking process, this is a structured wine, firm with tannins that are backed with some juicy berry fruits. It is made to be drunk young although, in fact, it will be better with another six months of bottle aging, so wait until mid- 2016.",Terra d'Alter Zero SO2,Terras de Alter
"A silky texture without much tannin, and vivid fruit flavors combine for a smooth and satisfying wine. It smells like fresh berries and cherries, and tastes on the light side as the fruit nuances mingle. Medium bodied, this is a pleasure to drink now. This blend was made from 49% Zinfandel, 20% Charbono, 20% Carignane and 11% Petite Sirah.",Coro Mendocino,Testa Vineyards
"Fresh apples and pears seem dusted in a fine mineral powder in this brisk, semisweet Riesling. It's featherlight in texture, darting and dancing alongside a lemon-lime vein of acidity that pierces through the finish.",Scharzhofberger Spätlese Grosse Lage,Vereinigte Hospitien
"Cutting and crisp, this wine is a showcase for the complexities that exist beneath its austere mineral style. On the palate, fresh apple and pear notes are glazed by a crush of wet mineral stones. It's a refreshingly, mouth quenching wine that finishes taut and pristine.",Trabener Würzgarten Kabinett Trocken,Villa Huesgen
"Fairly deep berry aromas register as dark and ripe. Following the nose, this feels chunky and round, while toasty blackberry flavors remain heavy and dark on a full generous finish. Drink through 2018.",El Primavera,Agrícola Labastida
"With plenty of solid tannins to keep the structure firm, this is also based around fresh black fruits. The two elements have produced a wine that, as it matures, will become balanced and poised. It's not dense, but presents elegant structure that has enough richness. Drink this wine from 2018.",Classic,Château Famaey
"Mature berry, toast, espresso, fennel and a balsamic note lead the nose. The firm palate doles out Morello cherry, raspberry jam, powdered sage and white pepper framed in assertive, fine-grained tannins.",Prachiosso,Negro Angelo e Figli
"Apricot aromas are singular and firmly in control of the bouquet of this Galician blend of 70% Albariño, 15% Loureira and 15% Caiño Blanco. This is juicy and fresh, but low on cushion and leesy framework. Apple and pineapple flavors run quick and finish with minerality and zest.",O Rosal,Terras Gauda
"Aromas of children's vitamins, corn stalk and white peach set up a lemony stony zesty palate with lemon and nectarine flavors. A stony crisp cleansing finish does the job while not faltering.",,Zudugarai
"A bouquet of raspberry, Mediterranean herbs and black pepper pave the way for flavors of blackberry, dark plum, anise and tarragon. Lasting tannins impart a light sense of chalkiness on the tongue that dissipates in a burst of fruit on the bright cherry finish.",Second Generation,1848 Winery
"This offers a classic Nebbiolo nose of rose petal, dark berry, tilled earth and a balsamic note. The lean palate shows sour red berry, grilled herb, clove and a hint of mocha on the finish. Tightly compacted tannins and brisk acidity need time to unwind. Drink after 2019.",Bricco delle Viole,460 Casina Bric
"This is a rich and juicy wine, balancing the firm tannins of the Baga with richer fruitiness of Touriga Nacional and Tinta Roriz. It is still young, still showing layers of firm tannins although with plenty of development potential. Drink from 2017.",Marquês de Marialva Reserva,Adega de Cantanhede
"This wine offers a tight nose of cherry cola and petrol. It opens on the palate by featuring flavors of smoked meat, eucalyptus, cherry, and ripe peach. Lush tannins contribute a fatty umami sensation to the palate.",Reserve,Barkan
"Aromas of mature berry, aromatic herb and fragrant iris lead the nose while the ripe palate offers mature black cherry, licorice and pipe tobacco. Firm, velvety tannins provide the framework. Showing the heat of the vintage, the fruit is already evolved so drink this sooner rather than later.",Cannubi Riserva,Borgogno F.lli Serio e Battista
"A few swirls of the glass release subtle aromas of tilled soil, underbrush, violet, leather and a whiff of menthol. The firm palate offers mature black cherry, licorice and a hint of cinnamon alongside firm, fine-grained tannins.",Narin,Carlo Giacosa
"Aromas that recall red berry, chopped herb, baked earth and a whiff of leather lead the way on this polished wine. The linear palate delivers dried cherry, raspberry wild mint and a touch of white pepper that carry through to the firm finish.",Montespinato,Cascina Chicco
"Sandalwood, hibiscus and grapeseed aromas converge on the nose of this wine that comes from a vineyard just west of the Sta. Rita Hills. The palate shows barely ripe raspberry fruit, a touch of grassiness and a spicing of anise seed, proving quite light and vibrant even at four years old.",,Cebada
"Delicate aromas of crisp green apples, pear and white peach abound on this lean but concentrated Pinot Gris. Dry and spry, the palate is honed on minerality and refreshment. Enjoy now for its vitality and youth.",Schwarzer Adler,Franz Keller
"Impressively dry, medium bodied, very firmly tannic and showing complex fruit flavors, this Zinfandel-based wine needs time to mellow. It smells like fresh raspberries and blackberries, and tastes concentrated and mouthcoating, while the astringent tannins hold everything back just a bit. It contains 34% Syrah and 21% Petite Sirah, and will be best after 2018.",Coro Mendocino,Golden
"Varietal in its celebration of lychees and roses, this wine also exudes richness and oak, while remaining relatively low in alcohol. From a fantastic site in the heart of the Russian River, it finishes in a tropical flourish.",Saralee's Vineyard Dry,Halleck
"Soft and round, this ripe wine offers both fruit and acidity. It is young and full of green plum and pear flavors, still textured with a young, crisp character. It needs to fill out for a few years, and will be best from 2017.",,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"Friendly familiar aromas of lees, seashell, lemon, melon and apple set up a shearing pointed palate. Flavors of lemon-lime, green apple and gooseberry are propelled by minerally acidity, while the finish is fresh and well cut.",,La Caña
"This Malbec-led blend opens with inky, hard-packed aromas of black fruits and grilled meats. The palate is on the rough and tough side, while flavors of ripe black fruits are intertwined with strong oak and spice. Overall, this is ripe, bold and heavy.",Petite Fleur,Monteviejo
"Pressed berries, plum flesh, toasted cherry pits and a charred cedar scent carry the nose of this bottling by a producer in Paso's Adelaida region. It's quite easy going down, with flavors of cracked pepper, blackberry fruit and a vanilla-licorice combo toward the finish.",Quixotic,Oso Libre
"You'll find aromas of mature black cherry, dark cooking spice, mint, leather and a whiff of espresso on this full-bodied red. The firm palate shows dried black cherry, roasted coffee bean, oak and a licorice note supported by bracing, grainy tannins that leave an astringent finish. Drink after 2020.",Monserra,Raineri Gianmatteo
"Aromas of red berry marinated in spirits, sun baked earth, game and a hint of cured meat come together on this. The tightly wound palate offers raw red berry, grilled sage, mint, clove and anise alongside bracing tannins. Give it a few more years for the tannins to unwind, then drink sooner rather later.",Castagni,Reverdito
"Gewürz is practically an endangered species in California, and this wine does nothing to advance the cause. It's soft, simple and watery, with off-dry flavors of gingerbread, spices, oranges and vanilla.",,Thomas Fogarty
"This one-dimensional wine has muted aromas that recall tropical fruit. The palate doesn't give much away either, revealing subtle citrus and pear notes alongside racy acidity.",Ca' de' Rocchi,Tinazzi
"A soft, fruity wine, it comes straight from tank without any wood aging. It's a fine barbecue wine with its black currant fruitiness and light, dry tannins. Drink 2014.",Dona Helena Colheita,Wines & Winemakers
"A soft, unoaked and juicy Malbec, it has black berry fruits, light tannins and good acidity. A touch of smokiness adds complexity. Drink now.",Albatros,Pelvillain Frères
"Strong wood-aging flavors give a spice and bitter chocolate character. The result, though, is that the wood softens the potentially stalky fruit and helps accent the underlying red berry flavors with attractive acidity. Drink now.",,Petite Sirène
"This is an old-school Chilean Merlot in the sense that the nose is rustic and leathery, but not unappealing. The wine is on the light side in terms of weight and extraction, while leafy flavors of roasted plum and berry finish with hints of toast and bitterness.",Reserva,Echeverria
"This wine seems to be a casualty of the cold vintage, with thin fruit and overall earthy flavors. A whiff of barnyard is evident as well.",Zenith Vineyard,Grochau
"Earthy and dusty, this 16.2% Zin tastes every bit of that heat, marked by a vanilla-cola sweetness and ripe blackberry jam.",Estate,Jason-Stephens
"This wine offers rich red fruit, oak and smoke around a soft texture and fading finish. A pronounced sweetness hits mid-palate after the smoky oak that makes it seem higher in alcohol than is stated.",,Mad Duck
"A sweet Vinho Verde, it has character as well as freshness. Apples and crisp acidity combine to give a bright, breezy wine that should be drunk this summer.",,Mapreco
"Tasted in February, 2014, this Pinot was showing a slight effervescence, not unpleasant, but considered a flaw. The spritziness might calm down with a few more months in the bottle. The wine itself is dry, silky and solid in cola, raspberry jam, orange peel and sandalwood flavors.",,Masterpiece
"The grapes taste too ripe, showing shriveled fruit notes of raisins and prunes, with dry, bitter tannins that will never age away. A heavy dose of new French oak does nothing except to add oaky sweetness.",Beatty Ranch,Michael James Wines
"One of the fruitier Sauv Blancs out there, it's rich and jammy in apricots, oranges and mangoes, with good acidity. The richness suggests pairing with sweeter Chinese, Thai and Vietnamese fare.",Parcel 41,Nine North Wine Company
This very earthy wine with a barnyard character has lost its fruit. It does have structure but it is not likely to lose its animal edge.,,L. Tramier & Fils
"Because of way too much oak, all you get are tastes of buttered toast, butterscotch and vanilla honey. Somewhere underneath is a perfectly good wine, with fine acidity and mango, pineapple and lime flavors.",Cold Creek,Laird
"Soft and gently fruity, it's fairly basic but does provide a Pinot Noir character. The wine has red cherries, light acidity and a jammy aftertaste. Drink now.",,Louis Chavy
"It's explosive in jammy, pie-filling raspberries and cherries, with a hit of caramelized oak. Drink it now with simple fare.",Rouge du Tusque,Sanglier Cellars
"Orange, pineapple and mango fruit flavors characterize this simple wine. It's candied on the finish, with plenty of acidity for balance.",,The Full
"This big-flavored Zin is wrapped in layers of brick and tar, smoke and oak, amidst its wild blackberry aromas. It's simple and priced accordingly.",The Chelonian,Tortoise Creek
"Muddled aromas of yellow flower and beeswax come along with sensations that recall Band-Aids and antiseptic. The bitter medicinal notes carry over to the palate along with minerality and a hint of rock candy, and the wine lacks fruit richness.",Ca' del Lago,Vigneti Villabella
"Not much going on beyond lots of oak and crisp, Central Coast acidity. You'll find watered down orange and tropical fruits.",Vineyard Montage,Cru
"Overripe, with blackberry jam fruit veering into raisins, prunes and brown sugar, like sweetened oatmeal. The tannins are strong.",Dryfarmed Old Vine,DeRose
"Oak sticks out, giving a caramelized richness that dominates the underlying fruit. While it's dry and moderate in alcohol, it tastes and feels overly-manipulated.",The Bombadier,Ernest
"A soft, perfumed wine, it shows attractive light black currant flavors as well as some tannins, acidity and a young fruity character. It is ready to drink now.",Ilixens,Fleury
"The addition of some Zinfandel to the Syrah, Grenache and Petite Sirah gives the wine firm tannins and a Zinny pepperiness. Otherwise, it's a fairly standard, warm climate red wine ripe in blackberries, prunes and chocolate.",Laity,Guyomar
"Dry and tart in acidity, this Pinot shows the variety's silky texture and gentle tannins. The flavors veer toward cranberries and sour cherry candy.",,Heron
"The wine feels light and very soft. There are some attractive red berry fruits, along with acidity and wood flavors, but the tannic structure is hardly there. It's an enjoyable, lightweight wine to drink now through 2016.",Réserve,Cheval Quancard
"This is a good, sound Cabernet. The blackberry and cherry fruit is candy-jammy, with an oaky overlay.",,B Side
"This Malbec is so dry, tannic and acidic that it's impossible to enjoy it on its own. There's a core of blackberries, but wow, what a tough wine. Decant it for a few hours and try it with barbecue.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"The wine tastes full of ripe fruits as well as acidity. A touch of bitter almond gives a hard edge to the otherwise fruity, apple and pear flavored wine. Drink from 2015 to give the wine some bottle age.",Encontro Special Cuvée Brut,Dão Sul
"This young, fresh Aglianico opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, forest floor and cooking spices. The linear palate offers ripe black cherry layered with notes of earth, licorice and cooking spice, all balanced by firm tannins.",Rubrato,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Here's a well-balanced and refreshing rosato made from 60% Alicante, 30% Nocera and 10% Calabrese. It's loaded with crushed red cherry, ripe strawberry and mineral sensations supported by crisp acidity. It closes on a note of pistachio.",Hier_ Rosé,Hauner
"Showing its wood-aging strongly, this is a smooth, toasty wine. Good acidity and yellow fruits are developing, while an underlying mineral character gives firm texture. Drink from 2015.",Grumes d'Or,Henri de Villamont
"This medium-bodied wine climbs several notches up the quality scale from a typical California AVA Chardonnay. It blends ripe pear and butter aromas, pleasing peach and pear flavors, a texture that is soft and easy, and a slightly buttery finish.",,Ironstone
"A fragrant wine, it offers truffle and red fruit aromas. The palate is ripe although it does have intense acidity, more bright red fruits than firmer structure. It feels almost ready to drink, fruity and fresh.",Les Vaucrains Premier Cru,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"Notes of cream and toast accent bright, crisp green apples and lemons on this impeccably balanced Chardonnay. It's rich and round on the palate but fresh with acidity and a lip-smacking touch of citrus that lingers on the finish.",,Keuka Spring
"Despite its high price tag, this Pinot Noir-based blanc de noirs is straightforward on the nose, with hints of apple and wild flower. The palate is smooth, while flavors of citrus, apple and mango come with green-herb notes that carry onto the finish in the form of tarragon and thyme.",Blanc de Noirs Brut Reserva,Juvé y Camps
"Don't let anyone say that unoaked Chardonnays have to be lacking in flavors, as this bottling from varietal experimenter Kenneth Volk reveals, perhaps because it was whole-cluster pressed, cold fermented and aged on the lees. The nose offers a great curvature of aromas, with apricot and fig leading the experience, followed by flavors of apple butter, poached pear and lime.",,Kenneth Volk
"Cherry, blackberry and exotic spice aromas start this fresh, mineral-driven red. Plum, cherry and fennel flavors are balanced and unique. Pair this with lamb or sausage.",,Kouros
"Longtime Santa Lucia Highlands winemaker Steve McIntrye celebrates his 25th year of his own vineyard with this 2012, which starts with buttercream and lime aromas. Once sipped, flavors of marcona almond, roasted pear, coconut and roasted chicken take hold, making for a savory but nicely restrained experience.",McIntrye Estate Vineyard 25th Anniversary Edition,McIntyre Vineyards
"A nose of tart cherry, tomato leaf and Mediterranean herbs primes the palate for flavors of cherry, cranberry, green olive and thyme with a trace of eucalyptus. Although at first the tannins can be a bit gum-numbing, as the chewy quality recedes there is a nice play between brightness and rich texture.",,Montefiore
"This structured wine with good weight is full of smoky tannins, behind which lie rich red fruits. It has good potential, offering a future full of fruit as well as a more solid structure. Drink from 2018.",,Pierre Cornu Camus
"Only the faint smell of grass emerges from this wine, but the palate is another story, with fresh squeezed lime and brisk nectarine flavors. The mouthfeel starts rich and then zips up tight with nice acidity. This vibrant wine needs food that's both rich and exotic, so try Chinese or Indonesian.",Reserve Estate,Rideau
"An early look at the Chardonnay potential of 2013, the nose on this bottling takes off like a perfumed jet plane. Sweet scents of white flowers make for a very beautiful, lifting and refreshing bouquet. You expect cloying flavors, but the wine delivers with a powerful zing of acidity, bolstered by slight flavors of Gala apple peel and sour banana gum, ending with a pear finish.",Bedrock,Riverbench
"Sweet spice and cedar notes waft warmly amidst ripe blackberry and bramble aromas on this revitalizing Cabernet Sauvignon. The palate is tart and concentrated with cranberry and sour cherry flavors. Finishes long with fine-grained yet penetrating tannins. Drink now with a decant, or allow another 2-3 years to let the wine soften and meld.",,Shaw
"Exuberant on the nose with aromas of ripe red cherries, peppery spices, herbs and just a touch of funky earth tones, there's a pleasurable rusticity to this Cabernet Franc. It's boldly structured with rich body and dense, drying tannins that hug the finish. It's lovely now, but should continue to evolve well over the next 3-5 years.",,Swedish Hill
"Here's a unique blend of two of Campania's little known grapes, Casavecchia and Pallagrello Nero. It opens with a pretty fragrance of blue flower, ripe berries and spice. The soft, round palate offers red berry and fleshy blackberry accented by cinnamon-toast notes. Drink soon.",Castello delle Femmine,Terre del Principe
"At first this muscular wine feels tight, even stiff, with crisply defined plum and cassis fruit. The only knock on it is the drying tannins, which leave a chalky aftertaste. Pair with a juicy cut of pork or salmon.",,Three Rivers
"This Aglianico offers a mélange of aromas, including vanilla, toast, ripe plum, prune, tobacco and a whiff of leather. The palate opens with juicy black fruit accented by notes of vanilla, mint, tobacco and espresso, but excruciatingly aggressive tannins dominate the finish and give it an abrupt, drying finish. Give this time to unwind.",Rapicano,Trabucco
"Despite its relative youth, it seems somewhat dried out with notes of Craisins, dried currant, fruit leather and spice. Still, there's plenty of enjoyment to be had on this unapologetically luscious, full-bodied wine.",Stonetree Vineyard,Two Vintners
"Aromas of butterscotch, smoked almonds and oak take the lead. On the palate, it's crisper than expected, with lightly toasted hazelnut, emergent apples on the midpalate and a lingering finish.",Del Sol,Vino Vargas
"Ripe red-cherry aromas are accented with hints of menthol and bramble on this bright, invigorating Cabernet Franc. The palate is brisk with a shock of tart red-cherry and cranberry flavors wrapped in a coat of fine, elegant tannins. Elegant yet powerfully concentrated.",,Billsboro
"Here's a delicious Falanghina that opens with fragrances of orange blossom, honeysuckle and pear. The round, savory palate delivers juicy green apple, white peach and citrus alongside mineral and crisp acidity.",,Cantine Farro
"With clean aromas of wet stone and grapefruit blossom, this bright, slightly pulpy Godello delivers round grapefruit and nectarine flavors in front of a powerful, peachy, melony finish with kick. This is no wallflower white. Match with grilled fish.",,Castelo do Papa
"Fermented and aged in stainless steel, it delivers notes of herbs, mineral, white grapefruit and an assortment of tropical fruit. Dry and tart, it discloses grapefruit rind flavors on the finish.",,Cave B
"Cola, black cherry and pepper aromas start this refined bottling from Cavino. Blackberry, plum and cinnamon are nicely integrated, and the finish is clean and fresh. Structured and elegant, this wine will  age for years to come.",Dry,Cavino
"From vines in the south of Nuits-Saint-Georges, this presents a softer view of the appellation. It is solid, but it has warmth and rich fruits as well. Drink this juicy, fruity and balnaced wine from 2016.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"The Santa Cruz Mountains-based winery Cinnabar turns to two vineyards (PMR and Twin Oaks) for this intriguing take on Merlot. It begins with a lifting herbal nose of sagebrush and tobacco. Next it carries into soft black cherry fruit on the palate, with vanilla flavors on the finish. It's got some tannic grip, so could be one to put away until 2016.",El Pomar District,Cinnabar
"Earthy and stemmy, the famed Bacigalupi is the source of grapes, a Wente field selection clone. Lush and soft, the flavors are faint strawberry and tart cherry, a touch of brown sugar and vanilla darting through the midpalate and into the oak-tinged finish.",Bacigalupi Vineyard,Armida
"Ripe and jammy, it's full of red fruit jelly flavors. It has just enough tannic structure to support the fruit, giving balance with a dry core and fragrant acidity. It's rich, full in the mouth and needs time. Drink from 2017.",Les Pimentiers,Arnoux & Fils
"Made from 84% Cabernet Sauvignon and 16% Syrah, this up-front wine offers aromas of herbs, dried cherry and woodspice. The dark fruit flavors are rich, layered and focused, with the tannins tightly wound, seeming to need more time in the cellar to come into their own.",Columbia Rediviva Phinny Hill Vineyard,Buty
"This is a full-bodied, richly textured blend of 80% Roussanne, 10% Grenache Blanc and 10% Clairette. Toasted marshmallow, pineapple and peach flavors finish long and mouthwatering.",Les Cailloux,André Brunel
"Domaine des Berthiers produces rich Sauvignon Blanc, packed with spice, acidity, concentrated citrus and herbal flavors. This 2014, still very young, has a strong bite of acidity and tight mineral texture that gives an almost shocking crispness at this stage. The wine obviously needs to age; drink from 2018.",Saint-Andelain,Domaine des Berthiers
"This mesmerizing offering has aromas of lemon curd, mineral, almond, flowers, nectarine and apple. The palate is rounded, with a lightly creamy feel while retaining a sense of vibrancy and lightness.",Le Pacte Jewett Creek Vineyard,Domaine J. Meuret
"Blended with 4% Viognier and 1% Grenache, this fragrant offering displays aromas of fresh flowers, herbs, green olive, huckleberry and smoked meat. The palate is ripe and fruit-forward, a bit balled up in the middle right now but showing a pleasing sense of purity with length to match. Give it time to come into its own.",8 Clones Red Willow Vineyard,Eight Bells
"A pleasant rose-petal pink in color, this wine by regional sparkling veteran Norm Yost shows red-grapefruit pulp and skin, lime spritz and a shred of bubble gum on the nose, playing both on hedonism and restraint. It's extremely refreshing once sipped, with more lime and pink grapefruit zest.",Solomon Hills Vineyard Sparkling,Goat Bubbles
"This single-vineyard, 100% varietal wine explodes with aromas of freshly ground black pepper, thyme, violets and black cherries. The flavors are supremely pure and transparent, with little apparent new-oak influence and a captivating sense of texture.",Art Den Hoed Vineyard,Kerloo
"Lightly smoked, minerally berry aromas are leathery and ripe, but perfectly healthy. The palate feels entirely in sync, with fine tannins and lasting acidity. Layered, earthy plum and berry flavors are spicy and show notes of vanilla and tobacco prior to a smooth finish. Drink through 2022.",Izarbe Gran Reserva,Larchago
"A blend of Syrah (70%), Grenache (25%) and Mourvèdre, this tantalizing wine offers a near endless list of aromatic descriptors, from white pepper to smoked meat, currant, mineral, licorice, coffee and dried herbs, seeming to evolve with each swirl. The palate is layered and rich with plum, pomegranate and lingering dark fruit flavors. It drinks best at a cool 62 degrees.",Métis,Maison Bleue
"This wine is 45% Cabernet Franc, 22% Cabernet Sauvignon, 22% Merlot and 11% Malbec. It charms with alluring aromas of herbs, black licorice, cassis and coffee. The palate has a creamy, rich feel with abundant black fruit flavors and exceptional tannin integration.",Union Gap,Owen Roe
"Creamy notes of Golden Pearmain apple, shortcrust pastry and juicy green apple meld into a golden, elegant unity. The palate is creamy and gives glimpses of baked apple and shortbread, all the while holding itself with complete poise. This is grown-up, serious stuff with quite a lot of beautiful, echoing resonance, even grace.",Bloomsbury,Ridgeview Estate
"This really elegant Pinot Noir has good color as well as a perfumed, aromatic character. The fruit is ripe cherries, supported by a light tannic layer. Acidity gives this wine freshness as well as suggesting that it could age. Drink from 2017.",,Roger et Didier Raimbault
"Made from 56% Syrah, 25% Grenache and 19% Mourvèdre, this wine currently has locked-up aromas, with notes of dark cherry, blue fruit, herbs and vanilla bean. The jammy red and black fruit flavors are considerably more expressive, with a palate-coating feel and plenty of intensity.",Windthrow,Cadaretta
"Dark berry, cinnamon, clove, leather, oak and a balsamic note are some of the aromas and flavors you'll find on this structured red. Firm, fine-grained tannins provide the framework but it still needs time to unwind.",,Cascina Adelaide
"The pithy yet subtle focus on this wine's nose ranges from lime peel to squeezed lemon reduction to sour apple flesh. There's a hint of ripe nectarine to the palate and lots of Key lime juice, opening towards apple custard and a citrus peel bitterness, proving to be a steadily evolving and complex wine.",Fe Ciega Vineyard,Longoria
"This concentrated Sangiovese opens with aromas of underbrush, toasted oak, vanilla, mature plum and ripe berry. The firm palate offers fleshy blackberry extract, clove, licorice and oak-driven spice alongside a backbone of bracing tannins. Drink 2017_2022.",Il Carbonaione,Poggio Scalette
"A small-production wine from a new producer, this impresses in plush red- and black-cherry, tangy minerality and a refreshing cloud of citrus that gives it buoyancy on the palate. This medium-bodied wine is fresh and alive from start to finish and will be delightful at the table.",,RMH
"Lemon juice, toasted oak, browned butter and vanilla entertain the nose on this proprietary white blend by stylish urban winemaker Matthias Pippig. Flavors are well rounded, with pan-fried apples, roasted peanuts and almonds accented by cinnamon.",Floral Study No. 2,Sanguis
"The initial entry to this wine is reminiscent of cheesecake, with a decadence to the bouquet. From there, ripe pear and toasted oak combine around a tropical edge of guava and papaya, giving complexity and lushness on the palate, before a zesty, slightly tart finish confounds and invites one in for more. Cellar through 2018.",Proprietress Reserve,Vine Cliff
"Compelling aromas of rose and lavender mark this fairly full-bodied wine, giving it a lift on the nose and palate. Raspberry and black licorice take over the taste, concentrating flavor and intensity toward the lengthy, earthy finish.",Maritime,W.H. Smith
"Pure minerals, peach and melon aromas come with a hint of leesy dust. This wine is elegant, chiseled and minerally on the palate. Flavors of dusty apple and citrus end long and stony, with class. Laxas is a top-flight Albariño producer and this vintage is one of its best. Drink now.",,As Laxas
"Beautifully shaped and full bodied, this offers opulent ripe fruit aromas and rich, luxurious texture. Substantial concentrated flavors suggest dark cherry, clove and blackberry. There are no sharp edges yet the wine has firm tannins and a sense of good balance despite its weight.",Angel Hawk,Black Kite
"This is a heavy-duty wine, layered with power and richness. The nose shows black cherries, prunes and gingerbread, inviting like a hot dessert. The palate is soft, deep and mouth-massaging with the blackest of cherries and bluest of berries, though lifted with licorice, espresso and fudge elements. Serve with hearty roasts.",Devil's Canyon,Calcareous
"Powerful blackberry aromas are matched by creamy oak. This Monastrell-Syrah blend is a driller, with strong tannins and more than enough body weight. Oaky flavors of dark-berry fruits and black plums finish with vanilla and lactic notes. This is rock solid from head to toe; drink through 2021.",Gold 5,Crápula
"This wine offers scents of peppered meat and ripe blackberries, then adds hints of black olive and licorice to the mix on the palate. It's concentrated and full bodied, with a richly textured, lingering finish. Drink now_2025.",Cuveé Gaby,Domaine du Colombier
"Smoky aromas of burnt hickory accent prune and spice cake scents. This is yet another lush, ripe, deep Ribera del Duero from the excellent 2010 vintage. Flavors of mocha, wood spice, char, blackberry and spicy BBQ notes finish chocolaty, with herb and spice accents that add to the wine's complexity. Drink through 2020.",Reserva,Emina
"Round and already surprisingly accessible, this full-bodied red offers aromas and flavors of ripe black cherry, leather, licorice, cake spices, orange zest and a balsamic note. Polished tannins provide the framework and give it a smooth texture. Drink through 2021.",,Massolino
"Aromas of black cherry, cassis and alfalfa are ripe and appealing. This is 95% Monastrell with 5% Garnacha; the palate feels ripe, fresh and free-flowing, while flavors of blackberry and chocolate are moderate but appealing. A long, toasty, blackened finish is in excellent shape; drink through 2020.",X Alphabet Wines,La Purísima
"Gritty, leathery aromas of campfire smoke and shoe polish set the stage for a lush, soft-bodied, extremely ripe palate housing modest tannins and tons of weight. Short, ultraripe flavors of blackberry and black currant come with a chocolaty note that's backed by a peppery, toasty finish. This is the definition of an opulent, heady, high-alcohol Syrah. Drink now.",La Viña de Corteo,El Nido
"You'll find blue flowers, blackberry, ground pepper and aromatic herb aromas on this smooth, poised red. The savory palate doles out blackberry, crushed plum, ground pepper and cocoa balanced by supple, fine-grained tannins.",Il Bosco,Tenimenti Luigi D'Alessandro
"Talk about a consistent wine. The past four vintages of 4 Varietales have all scored 91 points. This version opens with dense, jammy blackberry and raspberry aromas. The mouthfeel is healthy and full of tannic grip, while flavors of blackberry, prune, mocha and tobacco set up a chewy finish with rubbery tannins and length. Drink through 2023.",Colección Vivanco 4 Varietales Tempranillo-Graciano-­Garnacha-Mazuelo,Dinastía Vivanco
"Intriguing thyme florals mark the nose of this full-bodied yet supple Shiraz. Huge dark fruit flavors are balanced by exaggerated, perfumed herb and flower notes, making it flashy and appealing. Tannins are either minimal or masked by the ample fruit, so drink this over the next several years for its youthful exuberance.",,Groom
"Immediately this presents itself in a positive light. The color is bright and lucid, the nose is solid and smells clean and lush, and the body is full, stout and smacks firmly with proper tannin-acid balance. Flavors of peppery, chocolaty black fruits finish toasty, peppery and thorough.",Carchelo,Bodegas Carchelo
"With fine acidity and firm tannins, this is a solidly structured, rich and ripe wine. It is full, fruity and has a smooth texture that already offers pleasure. On the finish there is delicious juicy fruit.",,Château Rauzan-Gassies
"A structured wine, rich in both tannins and fruit, this wine gives a solid performance. Its black and red berry fruits are already balanced with the tannins, while the acidity lends a delicious lift. Delicious now, but best to wait until 2015.",,Château Tertre de Belvès
"This is a beautiful, ripe wine, flavored with quince, pear and apricots. It is above all the zesty texture that gives this wine its character and attraction. Fruity, structured and likely to age well, the wine should be drunk from 2015.",,Domaine Daniel Dugois
"This is a blend of Weissburgunder and Pinot Blanc that is aged in large barrels on the lees. It has a rich, creamy character with a delicate texture and generous acidity. The palate is apricot flavored but lightly peppery. Full in the mouth, it is ready to drink, but will improve over the next two years.",Burg Falkenstein,Dürnberg
"This wine is a poster child for all those who complain that California Pinot Noir is too alcoholic, rich and oaky. This bottling is quite balanced, with a light, silky texture and complex waves of raspberries, red currants, red licorice and sandalwood. The fruit is a bit fresh and tart, so give it 5_6 years in a cellar to evolve.",Michaud Vineyard,Bailiwick
"Ripe with cherries, mocha, currants and oak, you'll be tempted to drink this now. Don't. While it's not a long-term ager, it will benefit from 4_5 years in a good cellar.",Signaterra Three Blocks,Benziger
"Generous and opulent, this is a wood-aged wine in which the fruit plays a delicious part. Blackberry juice and acidity play counterpoint to toasty wood flavors and dark tannins. There is a fine, toasty aftertaste that promises good aging. Drink from 2015.",Cuvée Pierre de Cartier,Chateau Couronneau
This Chard competes well with others that are considerably more expensive. The palate exhibits the cool growing conditions of the vintage with tart acidity that brightens flavors of tropical fruit and orange. Notes of oak and lees lend complexity to this delicious wine.,Bench Break Vineyard,Cambria
"This big, powerful wine is full of rich white and citrus fruits that are laced with spice and pepper. The wine is full bodied and intensely ripe, with the roundness contrasting with a tangy, mineral edge. Drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Lindberg Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
"The old Hop Kiln estate vineyard is located in the heart of the Russian River Valley's Middle Reach. This promising Pinot exhibits the depth and complexity of its terroir with raspberry, rhubarb and pomegranate fruit flavors that have a brooding quality. Give it 5_6 years in the cellar.",Twin Corners,HKG
"From Jack's Vineyard (formerly Lefore), this was planted in 1997, with cuttings from Leonetti. It has some of the leafy, crunchy character of Brunello, along with high acidity and a pretty mix of strawberry and red plum flavors.",Guido,K Vintners
"An Eastside Lodi Zin classic with its retention of high acidity and tight tannins, this is a complex wine with spicy leather, black tea and bright raspberry flavors. Elegant, soft and extremely drinkable, it has a smooth mid-palate that lingers to the finish__ parting gift of cherry and vanilla that'll keep you coming back for more.",Equity,McCay Cellars
"Notes of honeycomb and sugar cookie add a caramelized warmth to ripe tangerine and peach aromas on this aromatic Riesling sparkler. It's intensely floral and fruity on the palate, but with hints of maturity and a laser-sharp acidity that cuts through rich, foamy mousse.",Brut,Peter Lauer
"The 2011 Aurora Vineyard Chardonnay comes across as super rich, without being superripe__ neat trick. It's lush and toasty from the moment the cork is pulled, showing mixed tropical-fruit flavors buoyed with moderate acidity. The perfumed nose carries through in the mouth, almost like a Gewürztraminer.",Aurora Vineyard,Ponzi
"Smoky, roasted aromas of black fruits, bacon and herbs are the kickoff. The mouthfeel is plump and full but offers vital acidity at its core. Flavors of black plum, hoisin sauce and savory spices finish smoky and ripe, with a lasting note of bacon. Drink through 2018.",Bramare Rebon Vineyard,Viña Cobos
"So refreshing and fruity, this is so drinkable now. It's bright with crisp white fruits, floral perfume and lively acidity. There is also a more serious, structured side which suggests it could age so drink a few now, but save a few bottles to enjoy through 2019. Glass stopper",Loiserberg,Weszeli
"A delicate floral perfume mingles with apple and lemon aromas that carry through to the palate. Lusciously ripe, with flavors of white peach and yellow cherry, it's brightened by soft pink-grapefruit acidity. Drink now.",Kiedricher Sandrug Spätlese,Baron Knyphausen
"Lush with fruit and bright with acidity, this tasty Pinot Noir features upfront flavors of raspberries, cola, red currants accented with cedar and exotic spices. It's dry and mouth-filling, and should gradually shed fruit for earthiness as it matures over the next six years.",Silver Pines Vineyard,Bailiwick
"This is quintessential Napa Petite Sirah. It's the color of a moonless midnight, showing only some purple at the glass's rim. The tannins are huge and mouth-numbing, while the flavors are extravagantly rich with black cherries and dark chocolate. This is a wine you surely want to cellar. Drink from 2016 and beyond.",Fig Tree Vineyard,Ballentine
"Brisk acidity, like a squeeze of lime juice, highlights the intense cherry, cola and spicy oak notes in this single-vineyard Pinot Noir. Widely likeable yet complex, it's a beautiful steak wine now, and should evolve positively for at least six years.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Bernardus
"Fresh lemon and gooseberry flavors lend an herbaceous edge to this fruity but tightly textured wine. It has richness and density, but it's a wine that is both refreshing and serious. Keep for a year before drinking.",,Château Argadens
"This wine is closed at this stage, offering just hints to its potential. At the core, there are ripe stone fruits, dark plums as well as blackberries. Fine and stylish tannins add balance. This is a fine wine with a future. Drink from 2016.",,Château Cagnas
"There is an austere, serious edge to this wine, with its dark tannins and fine black-currant acidity. It is very structured and likely to age well. Drink from 2017.",,Chateau Dauzac
"Dense and textured, this is a powerful, complex wine. It's layered with honey and botrytis, and a concentrated fruitiness with flavors of apricots and creamed pears. There is a great sense of freshness on the finish.",,Château de Myrat
"There is a strong showing of wood in this wine. Along with the ripe berry fruits and acidity, it shows good aging potential. Drink from 2016.",,Château Goubau
"Soft and fruity, this is a wine that already shows attractive, ripe fruitiness. Black currants and a mineral texture add bite, allowing the tannins to fill out the core. This is a wine for medium-term aging.",,Château Lynch-Moussas
"Citrus and herb characteristics show strongly in this full-bodied wine. They are enhanced by light wood flavors that smooth out the acidity. The result is a full, rich wine that could age. Drink from 2015.",,Château Maison Noble
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, this has aromas of yeasty bread dough, dark cherry and strawberry preserves. It is a medium-bodied wine, with soft acidity and malleable tannins. On the short finish, the tannins gain force and become chewy.",,Miracle Valley
"Made in a rich, ripe style, this Chenin Blanc-based blend has enough acidity for balance. It offers rich golden mango, orange and honey flavors.",White Elephant,Vinum
"Intense and perfumed, this has high-pitched aromas of rose oil, smoked meat and blackberry. Light, open-knit tannins and juicy acids make for a palate that is accessible and succulent. The acidity becomes more pickled in taste as the wine sits in the glass.",Zeus,Doukénie
"Hot, syrupy aromas are rooty and intense. This Nebbiolo offers plum, raspberry and red currant flavors offset by tomato and noticeable oak. The finish is propelled by acidity and carries tangy flavors of roasted tomato and plum.",,Dubacano
This simple sparkler opens with fresh citrus and peach followed by bright acidity and smooth effervescence. Those easy-drinking and refreshing qualities make this Prosecco the perfect summer sipper.,Extra Dry,Enza
"Sweet and simple, this easy blush wine has strawberry, brown sugar and vanilla flavors.",,Fuchsia
"A distinctive wine, with notes reminiscent of freshly made apple sauce. Harvested at 28° Brix, it's medium-plus sweet, but the flavor concentration doesn't quite carry all the way through.",Late Harvest,Fujishin
Here is a simple and one-dimensional Prosecco that doles out citrus and honey. Try it with salted finger foods.,Brut,Foss Marai
This bright pink rosato offers juicy notes of ripe raspberry and forest berry. The quality of the fruit is sticky and slightly sweet.,Rosato,Grati
"On the lean side, this is a dry, tannic wine with more structure than flesh. It's firm, with a strong sense of wood aging followed by some acidity. It could soften in 3_4 years.",Topázio,Caves Velhas
SeraRosa is a full and generous rosato with ripe berry and raspberry flavors followed by medium density and a noticeable touch of alcoholic heat.,SeraRosa,Cesani
"Tramontana refers to northern winds that wash across Italy. With those winds as inspiration, this easy Pinot Grigio opens with a lean, watery mouthfeel and crisp endnotes of melon and lemon.",Tramontana,Conselve
"This is a big, jammy, over-the-top Cab with mulchy aromas of coffee grinds and ripe berry fruits. The palate has a sticky, cloying feel to it along with flavors of herbal berry, mocha, cocoa and brown sugar. On the finish, it's creamy feeling and overtly rich.",Año Cero,Altocedro
Vecchia Modena is a landmark label in the world of Lambrusco and is often seen as one of the easiest and most straightforward expressions of the ruby-red sparkling wine. It shows a light cherry color with bright raspberry and blueberry flavors capped by white foam.,Premium Vecchia Modena,Cleto Chiarli
"The aromas seem a bit muddled, with notes of jasmine and pear occasionally poking through and the alcohol showing itself. It's medium sweet (2.7% residual sugar) finishing a touch bitter.",Colter's Creek Estate,Colter's Creek
"Medium-intense scents of dusty wax and vanilla buttercream compose the nose. Flat acids make the medium-bodied palate feel wide open, but the finish picks up a spark of acidity, which keeps the wine from feeling lethargic.",,Bluestone
"Chewing gum dust, red plum and cherry aromas define the bouquet on this racy, slightly abrasive feeling Malbec. Things taste short and snappy, with red fruit flavors backed by peppery dryness.",Estate Bottled,Bodega Carmine Granata
"Ripe, lightly spiced black cherry and berry aromas announce a good but basic wine. The palate is a bit tough in feel but it's solidly built. Candied, generic black-fruit flavors end simply, with modest syrupy sweetness.",Rojo Granrojo,Bodegas Navarro López
"Off dry, crisp, and with a strong citrus element that gives a lemon-candy character to the wine. It's a light, bright wine that's great for drinking this summer. Screwcap.",Grinalda,Aveleda
This is a thin and informal Prosecco with a no-fuss personality and a simple mandate to refresh the palate on a hot summer day. Citrus and honey are followed by dried sage and hay.,Extra Dry,Pasqua
This is a grassy and lemony expression of Pinot Grigio with easy lines and a touch of bright acidity on the close. Pair the wine with Thai mango salad.,,Natale Verga
This Prosecco Brut from Tenuta C_ Bolani is symbolic of the sparkling wine efforts now underway in the newly enlarged Prosecco appellation. The wine is simple and bright with a lean mouthfeel and lively citrus endnotes.,Brut,Tenuta C_ Bolani
"With zesty acidity, ripe raspberry and cherry flavors and just a touch of overripe raisins, this Cabernet-based blend is very oaky. It's not likely to age so drink up.",,Trinitas
"This easy-drinking Grigio from the deep south of Italy opens with bright lemon and peach followed by a thick, waxy feel in the mouth. It could use a tad more acidity to keep it fresh.",,Villa Pozzi
"This is a blend of Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc and Moscato that's yeasty and oaky on the nose. The mouth is creamy and home to apple, vanilla and oxidized afterflavors. There's enough solid pear and melon involved to make it worthwhile, but you can't miss the mature nature of the wine.",Nuva,Vinicola Fraternidad
"A soft, fruity and lightweight wine. It has red fruits, light acidity and a simple attractive touch of tannin. Drink now.",Caiado,Adega Mayor
"A sub-brand of Riunite, Albinea Canali's Ottocentonero shows simple, easy lines with raw fruit, cherry and almond paste. It's a dry Lambrusco without some of the bitterness you sometimes encounter with these wines.",Ottocentonero,Albinea Canali
"Easy, simple and thin, this refreshing rosé sparkling wine offers aromas of pink grapefruit and raspberry. The mouthfeel is creamy and soft but the firm perlage keeps the palate clean.",Rosè,Bertolani
"This very crisp, cool-climate sparkling rosé is a blend of Castelão and Merlot. It has acidity, a touch of raspberry fruit and a just off-dry ripeness.",Loridos Rosé Bruto,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"This fruity, perfumed wine (the Moscatel Roxo in the blend sees to that), is ripe and full bodied, with some light sweetness giving a soft, gentle aftertaste. Screwcap.",JP Azeitão,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"A blend of Syrah and 7% Viognier, this has a tremendous perfume on the nose. Mouth-filling and savory, it is adorned with flavors of mushroom, earth and black raspberry. Cellar this for a while, or enjoy it now with roasted game served in a mushroom ragout.",The Brawler,Prospect 772
"This blend showcases Grenache and Mourvèdre, with small amounts of Syrah, Counoise and Carignan. Raspberry, cherry and chocolate flavors combine with and are enlivened by a dash of white pepper. Excellent focus and length suggest that this can be cellared for at least five years.",Cuvée Elena,Syncline
"Crisp and elegant in feel, this has apricot and peach flavors that are balanced by the tight structure and the green-fruit-like acidity. The layers of toast have integrated with the ebullient fruit character and the taut, minerally finish. For aging 3_4 years.",Dents du Chien Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"At 20 years, aged tawnies bear fruit and concentrated wood flavors, plus dry acidity. This is rich and poised, and it has a fine, full finish.",RP20 Quinta do Bom Retiro Tawny 20 Years,Ramos-Pinto
"This blend opens with ripe aromas that recall blueberry and strawberry jam, followed by notes of spice, chocolate and moist tobacco. The finish is soft and velvety, and it comes with a touch of plush richness. This is complex and balanced.",Camartina,Agricola Querciabella
"This wine has a tight structure that's laced with wood. The complex fruit is still settling into the structure, promising richness. Age this for at least five years.",Château de Rully La Pucelle Cuvée Comte R. de Ternay Premier Cru,Antonin Rodet
"This riserva opens with intense tones of ripe cherry, chocolate, leather and light spice. The palate feels firm and smooth, with mild tannins and a rich, velvety texture.",Riserva di Famiglia,Cecchi
"Here you'll find a supple melding of red fruit flavors that are accented by a mocha note. The Red Mountain minerality is found in the muscular frame, which resolves into astringent, delicately chalky tannins.",Ciel du Cheval,Cadence
"This Bordeaux-style blend is made from 57% Cabernet Sauvignon, 31% Petit Verdot, 5% Merlot, 5% Malbec and 2% Cabernet Franc, and promises great longevity despite its already somewhat advanced age. It's dense and thick, with concentrated notes of cassis, blackberry, tanned leather, licorice root and peppery spice. The medium tannins are fine, but with good grip on the palate, leading into a long finish laced with hints of heady herbs and black tea. Drink 2015_2020.",Limited Edition,Carmel
"This bright Brunello shows elegance and finesse, and it offers pretty aromas of cherry, blackberry, cassis, leather, spice and tobacco. The palate is firm and compact, with a long finish that bears sweet-tasting fruit flavors and silky tannins.",,Casisano Colombaio
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Petit Verdot, this is generous in terms of its aromatic intensity and persistence. The wine opens with tones of espresso, dark berry, sweet spice and chocolate. The mouthfeel is smooth, rich and opulent.",Varv_ra,Castello di Bolgheri
"More perfumed and floral than the other 2010 Pinot Noirs from Felton Road, the Cornish Point is a pretty, slightly delicate wine that nevertheless doesn't lack for intensity. It's medium in weight, with creamy tannins that finish like silk.",Cornish Point,Felton Road
"This has ebullient aromas of cherry blossom, grapefruit and yuzu peel. Structurally complex, this has concentrated flavors of sour plum and pink grapefruit. It's brisk with acidity, and there's a lavish minerality that lingers long on the finish.",Veliko,Movia
"Upfront citrus, tropical fruit, peach and apple flavors mark this rich Chardonnay, plus notes of buttered toast and caramel. The opulence is balanced by crisp acidity and stony minerality.",Dutton Ranch Morelli Lane,La Rochelle
"Currently dominated by tannins, this wine is rich and structured, and it demonstrates the potential of its huge fruit and weight. The final note of this age-worthy wine is smokiness from wood aging.",,Domaine Champy
"Quite closed at this stage, this is a full wine with tight acidity and a crisp minerally texture. White flower and spice notes set off the lively character of this lemon- and pineapple-flavored selection. This is worth keeping for 4_5 years.",En Caradeux Premier Cru,Domaine Champy
"Round, opulent and generous, this wine has yellow-fruit flavors that are paired with lime-like acidity, creating a balanced feel. The toast note is still showing strongly, and it needs a few years to settle.",Referts Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Made from Pepper Bridge Vineyard fruit, this rich, deep Malbec is similar to pricey Argentine versions. It matches concentrated black fruits to generous new barrel-derived flavors of vanilla, cinnamon and Kahlua. The acidity keeps the palate propped up through the long finish.",,Reininger
"You'll love the way this wine builds in intensity on the nose and on the palate. The blend is Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, and together the varieties deliver bright berry flavors and firm structure.",,Rocca di Frassinello
"A rich, spicy wine, this shows flavors of new wood and ripe yellow fruit. The concentrated palate reveals juicy pear and peach juice flavors and a tight, minerally structure. Dense vineyard planting and 35-year-old vines bring out extra intensity and complexity.",Les Chenevottes Premier Cru,Roche de Bellene
"This is one of the most successful Syrah-Cabernet Franc blends in California. The Syrah brings blueberry and bacon flavors, and the Cabernet provides the black currant note and the tannic backbone. It's already delicious to drink, but allow it to breathe in a decanter for one or two hours.",Wavelength Sugarloaf Mountain Vineyard,World's End
"Aged for two years in oak barrels, this Petit Verdot is rich and concentrated, and it offers pretty aromas of blackberry, plum and bitter chocolate. Mild spice tones appear on the palate, but they don't overshadow the fruit.",Per Cecco,Terre di Talamo
"On the palate, this wine is rich and complex, with flavors of dried cherry, cola, licorice, red currant and sandalwood that finish bone dry. It has lots of acidity and some sandpaper-like tannins. This should begin to develop bottle-age notes after 2016.",Garey Ranch Vineyard,Nagy
"This is a wood-aged style of Chablis, but the toast has been applied discreetly. Rich, full bodied and structured, this wine is full of ripe yellow-fruit, spice and red apple flavors. Its acidity makes this a juicy expression.",Vaudésir Grand Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"A sweet cherry aroma sets the scene for this fruity, firmly structured wine. The juicy red-berry fruit is balanced by a smoky tannic character. This will be a pleasure to drink in a year, and it can also age longer.",Vieilles Vignes,Roche de Bellene
"This has delicious red-fruit nuances that are backed by espresso, spice and leather tones. There's a meaty, savory quality that would pair well with breaded veal or lasagna. This is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot.",Le Corti Marsiliana,Principe Corsini Fattoria Le Corti
"Concentrated and bright, this blend of 63% Grenache and 37% Syrah has deep flavors of strawberry and licorice. Ready to age for several years, it has a mountain's worth of tannins, and yet it is incredibly light on its feet.",The Brat,Prospect 772
"A real flatterer, this is instantly appealing for its upfront raspberry, cherry and currant flavors. There's subtlety to the acid-tannin structure, and it finishes with notes of dried herbs and tobacco. This needs a few years to come together.",Wolff Vineyard,Phantom Rivers
"Although this is currently aggressively oaky, this full, fleshy Merlot is on the path to excellence. Bright berry and plum flavors are kissed with notes of vanilla, cinnamon and toast, plus a hint of herb.",,Reininger
Brancaia definitely makes the short list of Tuscany's most admired wine estates. This riserva is tightly packed with delicate aromas ranging from berry fruit to cigar box to blue flower. The whole ensemble shows beautiful restraint and balance.,Riserva,Brancaia
"The Gros Manseng, one of Gascony's two star white grapes (along with Petit Manseng), gives richness and delicious apricot flavors to this full and rounded wine. The acidity comes with the crisp, fruity Sauvignon Blanc. To drink now and until 2014.",Terres Blanches,Domaine Chiroulet
"A smooth and rounded wine, its ripe plum and blueberry flavors well integrated into the soft tannins and sweet acidity. Drinkable now, but worth waiting for two more years.",Château de Chamirey,Domaines Devillard
"This charming sparkler is made exclusively with Chardonnay grapes, and offers delicate aromas of walnut, Golden Delicous apples and a hint of baked bread, all of which carry over to the palate. It's crisp and frothy, with a clean, nutty finish.",Brut,Ferrari
"Ripe, creamy wood aged wine, this is rich and smoothly textured. It has weight, apple and pear flavors. Full in the mouth, it may be missing out on the freshness in favor of power.",Haute-Serre Albesco,Georges Vigouroux
"New French oak, to the tune of 50%, dominates this Chard, giving it buttered toast, vanilla and honey flavors that dominate the underlying pineapples, lemons and limes. The acidity is brisk and vital.",Durell Vineyard,Pali
"This blend of 45% Syrah, 30% Mourvèdre, 15% Carignan and 10% Grenache opens with notes of brambly berry and cherry, followed by hints of garrigue and menthol. The palate is light and juicy, with lively red-fruit flavors that finish clean and accessible. Drink now.",,Château de Jau
"This straightforward selection has fragrances of ripe plum and underbrush. On the palate, it shows dark cherry and mature plum flavors, with notes of chocolate-covered raisins and licorice. It's soft with a nutty finish; drink soon.",Bure Alto,Corte Aleardi
"This Amarone has aromas of plum and evident oak. The palate delivers dark cherry, raisin and spice flavors, with chocolate and espresso accents. The dense fruit has easy appeal but the wine doesn't have much personality.",,Corte San Benedetto
"Dry and earthy, with tobacco, mushroom and raspberry flavors, accented with smoky oak. Feels a bit hollow in the middle palate and short on the finish, but is an elegant, silky wine. Drink now.",Estate Vineyard Olivet Bench,De Loach
"A full-bodied wine, with some vanilla from light wood aging, rounded white fruits and a smooth texture. Touches of spice give extra interest to this fruity, open wine that is ready to drink.",Blanc,Evening Land
"This ripasso shows typical aromas of plum and prune, with earthy notes of turned soil. The palate offers ripe yet retrained raspberry and strawberry sensations, along with bitter almond and baking spice accents. It's straightforward, fresh and enjoyable.",,Delibori
"Earthy, ripe aromas of raisin, blackberry and graphite announce a warm-vintage wine. With grabby tannins, there's bite and abrasiveness to the mouthfeel. Flavors of earthy blackberry and plum finish raisiny, short and heavy.",,Condado de Haza
"The 2010 Jammin' Red is an ambitious blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Malbec, Cab Franc and a bit of Tempranillo. Sweet cherry fruit is the focus, leaving a trail of pretty, hard candy flavor as it rolls across the tongue. The tannins are astringent, a bit chalky, and the finish does a quick fade.",Jammin',Elevation Cellars
"Medium-bodied and lightly peppery, this wine brings cassis fruit and tongue-scraping acidity into play. The finishing tannins are also astringent and suggest that pairing this with a fat-laden steak would be optimal.",Reserve,Hogue
"A fruity, forward wine with a touch of smokiness to go with the red cherry fruits and clear acidity. It's a full wine, structured with its background of tannins. The aftertaste brings out bright fruits.",Domaine de Javernière,Georges Duboeuf
"Mostly Pinot Noir, with a few drops of Chardonnay and Muscat, this slightly sweet bubbly is a little scoury, with hard-edged bubbles. It has orange, lime and strawberry flavors, with the toasty yeastiness of Champagne.",VA de VI Ultra Cuvée,Gloria Ferrer
"With high acidity, touches of new wood and dense tannins, this is a very wine-like vintage, Port. It has weight, formidable berry fruit and a slightly rustic finish.",Vintage,Gran Cruz
"Defines a ripe, slightly alcoholic style of Napa Cab for drinking over the next few years. It's dry and stylishly smooth in tannins, with a nice array of blackberries, currants, cola and sweet cedar wood.",,Hall
"Very ripe and rich in cherries, cola and sweet red currants, with a jacket of toasty oak. Although this wine is silky in texture, there's a heaviness that makes it Grenache-like. Drink now_2015.",,Canihan
"This blend of Syrah, Grenache, Mourvèdre, Petit Syrah and Carignane begins with a tartness of earthiness and firmly built tannins, followed by layers of strawberry, licorice and black pepper. Not overpowering, it'll pair nicely with cassoulet or duck breast over risotto.",Arrastre,Legendre
"This Syrah-Cabernet Sauvignon blend, in roughly equal proportions, is soft and sweet in black currants, dark chocolate, beef jerky and new oak flavors, wrapped into strong but pliable tannins. Drink now.",India Ink,Kuleto Estate
"This opens with earthy aromas of tilled earth and a hint of farmyard that eventually blow off to reveal dark, ripe fruit scents. The palate is more polished, showing ripe black-cherry, espresso  and cinnamon flavors framed by chewy tannins.",,Latium di Morini
"This Amarone shows nearly overripe black fruit aromas, with just a hint of nail polish remover. The palate is better, delivering mature black cherry flavors accented by fennel, hay and raisin notes. Best to drink this soon.",Postera,Manara
"This charming Pinot Grigio has a pretty nose of pear and white peach that carries through to the palate alongside lively citrus notes. This is simple but delicious, with crisp acidity that leaves a clean, dry finish. A perfect partner for pastas or grilled fish dishes.",Drago,Lechthaler
"A cool wine, full of citrus as well as green apple flavors. The wine is bright, crisp and refreshing in its acidity. Almonds and white fruits add to the attractive mix.",,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"Here's a golden-colored wine, with floral and fruit aromas of Spanish broom, peach blossom and whiffs of apricot. The palate offers ripe white peach and lemon zest flavors, with a hint of mineral supported by crisp acidity. The finish is dry and clean.",,Sansonina
"Nice, softly lush texture on this Cab Franc, with ripe red cherry pie filling, red currant, licorice and cola flavors, accented with smoky oak. It's a little candy-sweet and simple. Drink soon.",,Sequoia Grove
"This has aromas of black cherry and spice. The palate shows ripe blackberry and spice flavors, along with evolved tannins. This has instant appeal, so drink soon.",,Vigneti Villabella
"This wine offers berries, black currants and just a hint of greenness. It has fruitiness and a dry structure, just not the weight of the vintage.",Vintage,Smith Woodhouse
"This single-vineyard Soave Classico offers lovely citrus, white peach and pear sensations punctuated by a hint of mineral. The crisp acidity leaves the palate cleansed and refreshed. It's a perfect companion for pasta or seafood.",Le Volpare,Tommasi
"This blend of Sangiovese and 10% Merlot opens with aromas of baked plum, spice, menthol and a whiff of cellar floor. The palate offers sawdust, licorice and blackberry extract alongside assertive wood tannins that dry out the mouth.",Poggio Gualtieri Riserva,Fattoria di Grignano
"Leathery, roasted plum and berry aromas come with a noticeable charred, smoky side. This is full and edgy on the palate, with rubbery tannins. Flavors of charred oak steer leafy berry flavors toward a dry, herbal, spicy finish.",,Viña Los Valles
"Bright and earthy, this informal red offers aromas of dark-skinned berry, leafy underbrush, tilled soil and a whiff of clove that carry over to the easy-drinking palate. Racy acidity and mild, fleeting tannins provide the easygoing framework.",,Fattoria di Basciano
"This warm, ripe wine is full of forward black fruits and just the right amount of firm tannins to balance. A smoky character comes from wood aging. Lightly structured, it is ready to drink.",Mascaron,Ginestet
"The aromas of pear, chrysanthemum and star fruit are followed by lighter-styled flavors that display a sense of elegance.",,Gravel Bar
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc, this offers aromas of raisinated cherries, herbs, bittersweet chocolate and a whiff of barnyard. Medicinal flavors are backed by chalky tannins.",Ciel du Cheval,:Nota Bene
"Tropical fruit, apple and citrus aromas are chunky. A plump, mellow palate with modest acidity is home to peach, mango and papaya flavors. A soft finish is easygoing but suggests that this should be drunk as soon as possible.",,Pazo Torrado
"Well-crafted and fruity, this has a fresh character that allows room for red berry flavors. It's a ripe wine, keeping freshness while bringing in a warmer, caramel character.",,Quai de la Lune
"Vanilla and green wood aromas are at the fore, followed by cherry and herbs. The fruit flavors are sweet and elegant, with the oak nearly completely overriding them.",D11 Dionysus Vineyard,Revelry
"It's difficult to find the aromas of apple, pear and jasmine. This drinks off dry with nicely balanced acids.",,Revelry
"Here's a bright, informal red that offers sour cherry, red berry and a light note of cooking spice. Lively acidity and soft, rather fleeting tannins give it an easy-drinking quality.",,Travignoli
"Syrupy and dense, this is a burly wine, soft but powerful, that keeps coming back to the theme of blackberry syrup. Velvety tannins buoy the midpoint, before it finishes in a burst of intense ripeness.",Rattler Rock Old Vine,Truett Hurst
"This smells sugary, floral and herbaceous, then the flavors become more crisp and zesty like lemon and green apple. While the wine seems to start sweet, it finishes very dry and tangy, and should stand up well to rich salads, cheeses and seafood.",,Two Angels
"Delicate red berry aromas intensify on the palate of this juicy, full-bodied rosé made from Lemberger (also known as Blaufränkisch). The palate is unabashedly fruit forward, but finishes briskly on a sweet-tart watermelon note.",,Ventosa
"This tradition-bucking blend of 61% Chenin Blanc, 31% Viognier and 8% Roussanne offers soft aromas of sweet apple blossoms and peach, with a hint of barrel smoke. The palate offers a similar blend of peaches, pears and apples, warmed up with some oak influence.",White Elephant,Vinum
"Ever get served a grapefruit half topped with a maraschino cherry? That's kind of what this wine smells like. So it's a bit confected, but pleasant, with hints of currant and citrus, with a slightly sweet-and-sour finish.",,Fire Road
"Aromas of toast, oak, espresso and a whiff of smoke lead the nose. The palate offers oak extract, coconut, coffee and vanilla but there's not enough fruit richness to support the oak. It's already reached its ideal drinking window so enjoy sooner rather than later.",Da Vinci Riserva,Cantine Leonardo Da Vinci
"Cutting aromas of rubbery red-berry fruits and wild herbs filter into a juicy, uncomplicated palate. Rubbery and medicinal tasting at first, this shows herbal raspberry and bitterness on the back end of the flavor profile and on the finish.",,Peique
"Aromas of underbrush, plum, toast, sage and menthol emerge in the glass. The palate offers dried black cherry, vanilla, coffee and a confectionary note alongside raspy tannins.",Il Quarto Riserva,Tenuta di Morzano
"Made entirely with Sangiovese, this easygoing, friendly red opens with aromas of fresh plum and crushed blue flowers. The juicy palate offers up fleshy black cherry, raspberry and a hint of Mediterranean herb alongside round, soft tannins. Enjoy soon.",,Tenuta di Trecciano
"At this scale (170,000 cases imported), the quality is remarkable. Leafy notes accent pink grapefruit aromas and flavors, coming together in a harmonious, easy-drinking finish.",,Oyster Bay
"Bright and very crisp, this bone-dry wine is full of acidity as well as red currant fruits. It has fine fruitiness, very tight, with a hint of tannin making it a great food rosé.",,Château de Marsan
"With some good concentration and hints of the wood aging, this ripe, full wine has both fruit and tannins. A stalky, black currant element adds texture as well as a fresh aftertaste. Drink from 2016.",Cuvée Prestige,Château de Piote
This Clairet wine smells like a smoky red Bordeaux. It is woody in character with spice as well as red plum flavors. Think of this as a pale red wine and it makes sense. Drink from early 2016.,,Château Guichot
"This wine is soft and fruity. A core of drier tannins is surrounded by attractive, fleshy, smoky black plums that are lifted with acidity. Red fruit at the end adds a fresh aftertaste.",,Château les Pasquets
"This herbaceous wine has fresh acidity and crisp, lively texture. Citrus and green apples are given a warmer character by spice and vanilla flavors. The wine is ripe and full in the mouth.",,Château Mezain
"A gentle wine, this has warm, fruity aromas, ripe red cherry and raspberry flavors, a soft texture and fine-grained tannins. Medium to full bodied and almost sweet in balance, it's easy to enjoy.",,401K
"Aromas of strawberry, plum, wild flower and a whiff of spice waft out of the glass. The simple, lively palate offers fleshy black cherry, ripe raspberry and a hint of baking spice alongside soft tannins. Drink soon.",,Castello di Querceto
"Aromas of blue flower, dark-skinned fruit, brown spice and grilled bell pepper come together in the glass. The palate offers dried black cherry, prune, espresso, coconut and a toasted note alongside tightly knit tannins. It's starting to dry up so drink soon.",Vigna La Quercia Riserva,Castelvecchio
"An exceptional value for a Bordeaux, this is ripe, full and fruity. Smoky tannins and juicy black currant flavors are bright and generous. It will be ready to drink from 2016.",Murets de Mez,Cave du Marmandais
"Despite healthy alcohol levels, this wine shows considerable herb and spice nuances. Tobacco, black olive and cherry tomato elements add complexity to cassis fruit, finishing on a charred, campfire note.",The Garden of Extraordinary Delights Single Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"This single vineyard wine is full bodied but crisp, with savory notes of roasted meat and campfire more in evidence than bold fruit. It finishes long and a bit tart.",The Vociferate Dipsomaniac Singe Vineyard,D'Arenberg
"This supple, easy-drinking Cabernet features appealing ripe cassis and vanilla shadings. Hints of black cherry and graham cracker add nuance, while the texture is a bit creamy on the midpalate, turning dusty on the finish. Drink now_2020.",Miamup,Howard Park
"This Riesling shows a bit of honeyed development already, hinting at orange or tangerine marmalade on the slightly abbreviated finish. Enjoy it over the next few years.",Jaraman,Wakefield Estate
"Spicy plum and cherry aromas are oaky and smell a bit like freshly laid cement. This is more tight and racy than fat or heavy, evidence of a cool vintage. Lightly herbal flavors of currant and plum are spicy and finish with oak-driven notes of toast as well as green olive and pointed acidity. Drink through 2017.",1865 Single Vineyard,San Pedro
"Prominent mushroom and forest floor notes take center stage on the nose of this wine, with supporting notes of ripe muddled berries, cherry and licorice. Tightly wound tannins and flavors of small red berries develop on the palate, while notes of game, mocha and black pepper appear on the finish. Drink now_2016.",Reserve,Winery of Good Hope
"Full-bodied and firmly structured, this smells a bit peppery and roasted, then gives up dried cherry and blackberry flavors that fill the mouth and taste generous and soothing. It has benefited from the extra age since bottling, and is ready to enjoy.",Reserve,Brutocao
"Jammy, earthy and baked on the nose, this ripe Merlot is dishing plenty of black plum and blackberry characteristics from front to back. The palate is concentrated and borderline syrupy in feel, while ripe, baked blackberry flavors come with chocolaty oak and vanilla on the finish.",Nimbus Single Vineyard,Viña Casablanca
"Waiting to release this wine greatly benefits the experience, with inviting aromas of blueberry pie and perfectly roasted meat emerging. There still are strong tannins, but they're more digestible, with flavors of red and light purple fruits, violet, mocha, and plum skin.",Huerhuero,Vina Robles
"This cherry-scented Pinot is straightforward, supple and easy to drink. Complexity comes from hints of cedar and menthol, while the finish is lined with fine, dusty tannins that elegantly linger.",,Yeringberg
"Wow is an unusual wine name, but it does describe the effect of this hugely rich and alcoholic wine. Wood aging, dark tannins and sumptuous black fruits are part of the overwhelming package.",Château de Mercuès Icône Wow,Georges Vigouroux
"One of the properties managed by Georges Vigouroux, this is located on the plateau, close to eastern edge of Cahors. The wine is rich, smooth and broad. A strong tannic structure is masked by the big, rounded black fruits and acidity. That makes for a wine that can be drunk soon, although it will be better from 2017.",Château Pech de Jammes,Georges Vigouroux
"Concentrated and dense, this has aromas of spicy black plum, game and a whiff of clove. The massive, monolithic palate delivers prune, dried black cherry, coffee, licorice and hints of grilled herb alongside velvety tannins. Searing alcohol dominates the finish.",ES,Gianfranco Fino
"Yeasty pepperiness and savory spice pervade the lemony core of this zippy Grüner. The body is light but offers interest and refreshment. A very moreish, spicy little number.",Kirchlissen,H. & M. Hofer
Hints of wet earth marry lemony flavors with ripe and generous overtones of peach. The lemony center lends structure to the entire wine and makes for a bracing but ripe and earthy mouthful.,Gaisberg Reserve,Hirsch
"Grapefruit peel, ripe apricot and zingy lemon spell freshness, while the palate is focused and precise, exhibiting some of the expected peppery notes. Very tangy with a clean, almost lip-smacking finish.",Kies,Kurt Angerer
"This yellow-tinted Chard from a hot vintage is heavily oaked and heavy in general. Throw in some toast and popcorn on the finish and it's definitively a warm-climate white. Flavors of banana, toffee, vanilla and creamy melon finish oaky and lush. Drink now.",Cuvée Alexandre Atalayas Vineyard,Lapostolle
"Focused and sprightly flavors of savory leaves are shot through with lemony freshness and zing, but the freshness is beautifully cushioned by a yeasty midpalate spice. Concentrated yet light.",Scheiben,Leth
"This is a dry, richly flavored and well-structured wine. A complex, spicy, earthy, cherrylike bouquet accompanies saturated flavors of currant, black cherry and pomegranate spiced with hints of cinnamon and nutmeg. It's not too full bodied and has good balance that comes from firm acidity and tannins.",Ghielmetti Vineyard,Occasio
"The intriguing nose suggests blue flower, scorched earth, smoke, spice and ripe dark fruit. The palate is subtle and reserved, revealing mature black cherry, ground black pepper and allspice alongside tightly knit, velvety tannins, with a decadent licorice note on the finish.",Magnus,Ognissole
"When Zweigelt is vinified as a simple country wine, this is the joyous, easy-drinking thing you get. There is no heaviness; instead you have a slight grip of tannin and fresh, lively acidity along with peppery spice. This calls for platters of charcuterie.",Bodenschatz,Dürnberg
"Sharp upon entry, this has a concentration of citrus rind amid penetrating flavors of grapefruit, pineapple, orange and nectarine. The buoyant acidity keeps everything in proportion, with just a hint of bitterness at the edge of the finish.",,Black Hills
"Peardrops on the nose currently hide the more peppery, savory side of this slender Grüner, which nonetheless convinces with its light but spicy and fresh body.",Grande Reserve,Anton Bauer
"Intensely herbaceous, this is grassy, crisp, catty__ll the flavors that come from young, cool-climate Sauvignon Blanc are here in bucketsful. It is delicious, refreshing and aromatic. Drink from 2015.",La Rambarde,Domaine Landrat-Guyollot
"Immediately appealing, this draws you into the glass with dark plums and blackberries accented by barrel spices. It's medium bodied with a silky feel, plush fruit flavors, and a lingering, fruit-filled, almost irresistible open finish.",Plunder,Ded.Reckoning
"Here's a structured Dolcetto that opens with a spicy aroma of white pepper, clove, smoke and ripe berry. On the smooth palate, graphite, black pepper and clove add depth to a core of juicy black cherry.",474,Clavesana
"A cool-vintage red that clocks in at a low (for Washington) alcohol, this wine is aromatically reticent with notes of green herbs, cherry, tomato paste and barrel spices. It's tart with puckering acid and firm tannins, but good fruit intensity throughout. Drinking quite young now, it will be best after 2017 and should have a long life ahead of it.",,Coach House
"Despite 22 months on the lees, this blend of 60% Pinot Noir and 40% Chardonnay remains a fruit-driven sparkler. Berry and citrus flavors show just traces of biscuity character, ending dry and fine.",Isabella Rosé,Sidewood
"An aromatically subtle wine with notes of mortared herbs, flowers and cherry. The fruit flavors are elegantly styled, broadening with time, with a slightly gritty feel to the tannins but with a long finish.",Katherine Corkrum Estate Grown,Spring Valley Vineyard
"A rather closed nose and tightly-wound aromatics suggest that this will take time to reach its peak. The concentration is there, as is the midpalate weight, hints of smokiness and a tropical aftertaste of pineapple. Try this as of 2016.",,Steindorfer
"Aromatically spicy, with a blast of citrus, this follows through with tart cranberry fruit. It's accented with pine needles and more of that tangy citrusy acidity.",Marsh Estate Vineyard,Roco
"This bottling is sourced from the Wit' End estate vineyard. The palate boasts broad cherry flavors, showing medium concentration and definiton. It's clean, clear and one-dimensional.",Private Stash #11,Roco
"This wine has a nose of pineapple and roasted fennel bulb. There is a nice balance of fruit and cool herb flavors, in particular guava, lemon, roasted fennel and a touch of mint. It is slightly waxy in the mouth and cooling herbs remain on the palate until the bright finish.",Special Reserve,Segal's
"Initially, this blend of Malbec, Cabernet Sauvignon and Tannat smells murky, leathery and nutty, but with airing it settles and cleans up. Chunky and close to being oversaturated, this full-bodied red tastes of loamy berry and raisin, while the finish is weighty.",Gran Reserva,Septima
"Fresh pineapple, peach and blossom notes contrast spicy dashes of saffron, fennel and pollen throughout this Grauburgunder, or Pinot Gris. Cutting lemon-lime notes lend a razor's edge to palate that's supple and rich. It's an elegantly composed wine with a curious, yet intriguing personality.",Trocken,Thörle
"Dusty crushed mineral and smoke tones extend from start to finish in this sprightly off-dry Riesling. The palate balances savory and sweet well, highlighting its sweet red apple, honey and peach tones. The finish is moderately long.",Piesport Goldtröpfchen Kabinett Grosse Lage,Vereinigte Hospitien
"Vibrant yellow peach, apricot and blossom notes permeate deeply through this light-footed dry Riesling. It's exuberantly primary, yet not at all cloying. Enjoy now for it's youthful vitality.",1735,Villa Huesgen
"Invigorating white grapefruit and lemons are cast against a deep mineral backdrop in this dry, thirst quenching wine. It's delicate and filigreed on the palate with a brisk, tight finish. Drink now.",Niersteiner Hipping Vom Rotliegenden red soil Trocken,Weingut Georg Albrecht Schneider
"Loamy berry, cheesy oak, balsamic hints and vanilla notes make for an interesting bouquet. This feels a bit wiry and acidic at its core, while overall it's chunky in stature. Deep warming flavors of kirsch and blackberry finish with heat and jammy weight. Drink through 2017.",,Firestarter
"Layered aromas of blackberry, cassis, leather and dried cheese are inviting. In the mouth, this Garnacha from vines more than 100-years-old is jammy and friendly. Candied almost syrupy flavors of blackberry and black cherry finish dense and chocolaty, with modest acidity. Drink through 2017.",Particular Viñas Centenarias,Bodegas San Valero
"Snappy citric aromas of grapefruit and lime are pungent and not too different from Verdejo or Sauvignon Blanc. Accordingly, the palate is fresh and focused, with flavors of stone fruits that are leesy and have a honeyed sweetness. A controlled, mild finish tastes mostly of orange. Drink now.",,Abad Dom Bueno
"Aromas of baked plum, mocha, toast and sweet pipe tobacco drive the nose while the palate offers palate offers dried black cherry marinated in spirits, vanilla, nutmeg and leather. A note of dried sage closes the finish while austere tannins provide bracing support. Drink 2019_2029.",Coste di Rose Riserva,Bric Cenciurio
"A tight nose of blackberry and mint smooths the way for flavors of blackberry and pencil lead with a light dose of mint. There is a nice balance of acidity and tannins, with fruit lingering on the palate after the soft finish.",Special Reserve,1848 Winery
"Tropical with notes of gingerbread and vanilla, this wine tastes full bodied despite its medium level of alcohol. It offers a reduced note on the finish, anchored otherwise in sweet toffee.",Winery Lake Vineyard,Acacia
"Crisp minerally aromas of cherry and blackberry come with toasty spicy accents. This is a tightly built full-bodied Cab with lightly herbal, moderately oaky and saucy flavors of berry and plum. A dry, spicy finish provides for a strong ending.",Estate,Alta Vista
"Aromas of black cherry, smoked meat and thyme prepare the taste buds for flavors of black cherry, smoked meat, oregano, and lemon zest with notes of dark chocolate. Soft yet persistent tannins coat the palate, culminating in a delightfully bright finish.",Classic,Barkan
"Enticing spicy, toasty aromas and robust, dry fruit flavors are matched by very firm, fine-grained tannins in this full-bodied wine. Based on 65% Zinfandel, it has lots to offer, but at this stage an oaky sensation and the astringent mouthfeel indicate that it needs to mellow. Best to drink after 2018.",Coro Mendocino,Barra of Mendocino
"Earthy and full-bodied, this offers aromas of truffle, scorched earth, leather, game and mature black-skinned fruit. The warm palate offers black cherry marinated in spirits, star anise and clove alongside brooding tannins. It shows the heat of the vintage so drink sooner rather than later.",Boscareto,Beni di Batasiolo
"Funky but not unpleasant aromas of game, scorched earth and cured meat are joined by whiffs of wild berry and leather. The palate shows dried cherry, aniseed, and grilled sage alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. Drink sooner rather than later to enjoy the remaining fruit.",Riserva,Borgogno
"This offers aromas of pressed rose, cherry marinated in spirits, aromatic herb and menthol. The bracing palate shows raw red cherry, clove, white pepper and a hint of mocha while assertive tannins and racy acidity provide the framework. It's still young and aggressively tannic so don't attempt before 2019.",Fossati,Borgogno
"This solid Barolo opens with aromas of mature dark berry, licorice, clove, chewing tobacco and a whiff of crushed flower. The palate reveals red cherry, strawberry, white pepper and thyme alongside bracing tannins. Drink after 2019.",Vigna Case Nere,Casetta
"While the texture is light, the fruit and the wood flavors give this wine richness and a ripe, toast and apricot character. It has balanced acidity that allows a fresher edge to develop. The aftertaste, hinting at a steely edge, suggests the wine will age. Drink from 2017.",Les Vaudevey Premier Cru,Domaine Laroche
"The spicy aromas resemble black pepper and anise. Fruit flavors are ripe and delicious, and the creamy texture seems to melt in the mouth. This wine offers lots of personality and very good balance.",Votre Santé,Francis Ford Coppola
"Dark in color, this Mencía smells of turned earth, roots, herbs, dried cheese, tobacco and baked black fruits. It's round and chunky on the palate, but cobbled together at its foundation. Ripe blackberry and raspberry flavors come with vanilla and creamy notes in front of an ephemeral finish. Drink through 2017.",Finca la Cuesta,Luna Beberide
"Aromas of resin, nail polish, overripe plum steeped in spirits, oak and a confectionary note lead the way. The warm palate displays ripe black cherry, cocoa, anise and a whisper of licorice framed in velvety tannins. Drink through 2026.",Tre Utin,Mario Gagliasso
"While the nose is a touch earthy and savory, the core of this vivacious Riesling boasts spicy dried orange peels, tangerine and honey. Lemonade acidity leads a moderately long finish. It's a thirst quenching fresh wine to drink young.",Piesporter Goldtröpfchen Kabinett,Matheus
"This firm red offers aromas of underbrush, French oak, exotic spice, dried rose and a balsamic whiff of menthol. On the full-bodied palate, a bracing tannic backbone supports dried black cherry, coconut, licorice, roasted coffee bean and oak-driven spice. Drink 2019_2026.",Prapò,Mauro Sebaste
"Dark berry, tilled earth and gamey aromas lift out of the glass. The firm palate offers black cherry, chocolate, peppermint and oak alongside tightly packed tannins that leave an astringent finish. Drink after 2018.",Bricco Rocca,Olivero
"Simple and delicious, this vibrant, mouthwatering red doles out fleshy black cherry, crushed blueberry, ground pepper and clove alongside polished tannins. An almond note graces the finish. This makes a fantastic everyday wine.",,Paolo Scavino
"A lacy spray of sweetness extends from start to finish on this fruity, fresh Kabinett. Fresh apple, pear and tangerine are honeyed and lip smacking, energized by a streak of lemonade acidity on the finish.",Graacher Himmelreich Kabinett,Peter Nicolay
"This is a typically light and fruity wine from Gascony. It has light, fresh apple flavors, a green crisp streak and just a touch of spice. Drink now.",Les Quatre Cépages,Domaine de Pajot
"A ripe, very fruity wine with enough softness to suggest sweetness. Smooth with red fruits and a touch of acidity, it's ready to drink now.",Tinto Reserva,FVine
"It show the vintage's weakness, with a vegetal edge to the cherries and oak.",Russian River Selection,Gary Farrell
"Richly textured in cherries, blackberries and currants, it shows Cab's thick tannins, but they're ripe and soft. It's pretty nice for drinking now.",,Gunsight Rock
"The blend is Zinfandel, Petite Sirah, Grenache and Syrah. The wine is dry, hot in alcohol and overripe, with raisin, prune and chocolate flavors.",Oblate,Guyomar
"It's simple, but has enough varietal character to get by. Dry and tannic, the flavors are of black currants and oak.",,Heron
"A perfumed, light, fruity wine that comes from the hill vineyards behind the Côte de Nuits. It has red fruits, light tannins and a juicy, fresh aftertaste. Drink now.",Dames Huguettes,Jean-Claude Boisset
"Saucy berry, sweaty leather and soupy aromas control the bouquet on this wine that's not holding up well. In the mouth, it searches for balance, while flavors of rubber, stewed plum and mealy berry finish with jolt of lingering acidity.",Herú,Ventisquero
"This is a dark, tannic Pinot Noir from a big vintage, hefty in dark berry fruit and a taste of leather. Affordable and widely distributed, it's a good choice for midweek meals.",Small Lot Blend,Parducci
"An herbaceous, catty wine, packed with gooseberry and grapefruit flavors. It is all crisp, fresh fruit and tight texture. It needs a few months to lose its shocking acidity.",,Petite Sirène
"Ripe lemon and lime flavors cut right through this crisp, fruity wine. Acidity and hints of pineapple and peach are part of the mix. It is still young and should be held until late 2014.",Quartilho,Quinta do Casal Branco
"This crisp and fresh wine suggests citrus and green apple fruits. It is light, fragrant and ready to drink with its bright final acidity.",Terra de Lobos Branco,Quinta do Casal Branco
"High alcohol, with its burn and glyceriney sweetness, mars this otherwise good Syrah. The tannins are polished and smooth, the acidity brisk and clean, but the wine's raisiny, port-like finish detracts.",,Santa Barbara Winery
This smoky Zinfandel is aromatically closed off and still tight in tannic formation. Give it time to open and it'll share meaty black-fruit and tar.,Old Vine,Stama
"The Fusion in question is the blend__n unusual combination of 61% Pinot Noir, 21% Syrah and 18% Merlot. Some tasters will find it works well as an everyday, all-purpose red. The jumble of red fruits is matched to a strong streak of vanilla, with some stemmy flavors coming up in the tannins.",Pinot Fusion,Sweet Cheeks
"Not much going on beyond simple jam, currant and chocolate-covered raisin flavors. It's dry and tannic.",,The Full
"Narrow, feline aromas and gritty citrus scents define the nose on this lean wine. Orange, lime and lettuce flavors finish mild, with angularity and a lasting twang.",U Estate Grown,Undurraga
"A light and easy Soave, it offers delicate sensations of stone fruit and citrus alongside bright acidity. It would work well with spaghetti topped with mussels or vegetables.",,Bolla
"This bone dry wine has some good apricot and orange flavors, but also lots of dried herb notes that veer into bell peppers. It lacks richness.",,Brick & Mortar
"A vegetal note drags down the enjoyment. On the plus side, the wine is nice and silky, with good acidity and raspberry, cherry and fig flavors. But that tug of asparagus is a problem.",Reserve,Cerro Prieto
"The wine has some of the typical freshness of 2011 but it seems on the thin side. Black currant flavors run alongside high acidity, and the tannins show strongly. The aftertaste brings out more tight, mineral acidity.",,Château la Petite Roque
Offers a glimpse of a fully mature wine from Bergerac. It has retained strong and dense tannins that are showing signs of drying the wine. The tough core is not likely to go away. Drink now.,L'Excellence,Château le Castellot
"The 2004 vintage is certainly mature, but with a light touch it is still attractive to drink. Mushroom and spice are lifted by juicy acidity. The dryness at the end shows it is ready to drink.",Tradition,Château Thuron
"The blend is Petite Sirah, Zinfandel, Syrah and Grenache. The wine is not very interesting, with dry, hard tannins, tart acidity and thin flavors of cherries and oak.",Monsignor,Guyomar
"Raspberry jam, red currant and liqueur flavors mark this strong Pinot Noir. It's all about fruit and oak, with little subtlety, and the hard tannins will never go away.",Estate Reserve Principal's Choice,Burrell School Vineyards
"An herbal wine, rather green in character and missing fruitiness. Structure and cherry fruits are there but lost in this green stalky character.",Vinha Padre Pedro,Casa Cadaval
"Planky and a bit tart, this Zin hails from 45-year-old vines and is soft and suggestively herbal.",Old Vine,Rock Lobster
"This is like a photocopy of a photocopy of a good Pinor Noir. All the parts are identifiable, from the raspberries and persimmons to the toasty oak and vanilla. It's just all a little thinned down and blurry. Drink now with salmon cakes, burgers, brown rice and tofu.",Soul Sister,Save Me San Francisco
"Tough tannins, acidity and extreme dryness mark this Merlot. While it has some nice, complex black cherry and licorice flavors, it's just too astringent to enjoy, and will not age.",,Varda
"A blend of 90% Barbera and 10% Viognier made into a white wine, this bottling is mired in candy apple and white grapy flavors. It's round and otherwise simple.",White Barbera,Villa Toscano
"Based on 84% Cabernet Sauvignon, with all four major red Bordeaux varieties represented, this expansive wine is big, dense and dusty in tannins and oak, but offers a soft side, too. Cherry, strawberry and a lift of citrus peel ease the power and intensity, before a chewy, dark chocolate finish. Cellar through 2021.",Synchrony Stagecoach Vineyard,Krupp Brothers
"From an estate-farmed property in the Russian River, this otherwise Carneros-based producer shows it can handle different conditions with aplomb, taking its foot off the pedal a touch in terms of power and concentration in this wine. Floral, soft and silky, it remains complex in red and black berry, with handfuls of truffled earth.",Ten Oaks,Donum
"Made entirely with Syrah, this opens with aromas of cedar, mature plum, toasted oak and grilled herbs. On the palate, notes of espresso, mocha and black pepper accent the core blackberry and raisin flavors. Firm but velvety tannins provide the framework. Drink 2016_2021.",Suisassi,Duemani
"A 100% varietal wine, this Cab is subtle and elegant in crisp red fruit, bordering on a richness that remains at the cusp of the palate. Leather and tobacco leaf figure into the mix as well, along a well-integrated foundation of oak and tannin, finishing with a hint of brick.",Fluffy Billows,Meyer Family Cellars
"Pencil lead and leather pouch partner with ripe, concentrated blackberry. Well-integrated tannins offer smoothness, making the wine both complex and very drinkable.",Katz Family Vineyard,Midsummer Cellars
"From high-elevation vineyards, this is a lean, dusty wine driven by dried herb, blueberry and savory tobacco, with a floral flirtation on the bouquet. Integrated tannins are still sizable and structured, the midpalate touched by a gamy, meaty suggestion akin to charcuterie.",,Mt. Brave
"Tropical fruit, white flower-flavored candies, aromatic heirloom apples and a touch of honey come into crystalline focus on this wine by Joey Tensley and Alex Guarachi. Lime blossoms, Key lime crème fraîche and a touch of yogurt consume the energetic palate.",,Tenshen
"Gritty, leathery aromas of campfire smoke and shoe polish set the stage for a lush, soft-bodied, extremely ripe palate housing modest tannins and tons of weight. Short, ultraripe flavors of blackberry and black currant come with a chocolaty note that's backed by a peppery, toasty finish. This is the definition of an opulent, heady, high-alcohol Syrah. Drink now.",La Viña de Corteo,El Nido
"Aromas of black cherry, cassis and alfalfa are ripe and appealing. This is 95% Monastrell with 5% Garnacha; the palate feels ripe, fresh and free-flowing, while flavors of blackberry and chocolate are moderate but appealing. A long, toasty, blackened finish is in excellent shape; drink through 2020.",X Alphabet Wines,La Purísima
"You'll find blue flowers, blackberry, ground pepper and aromatic herb aromas on this smooth, poised red. The savory palate doles out blackberry, crushed plum, ground pepper and cocoa balanced by supple, fine-grained tannins.",Il Bosco,Tenimenti Luigi D'Alessandro
"This is just a gorgeous wine, so easy to enjoy, juicy in watermelon, grapefruit and dark, baked strawberry tart, a taste of summer evoked from every sip. Textured and complex, it gives a squeeze of blood orange that lingers and remains fresh through the finish. It's from the owner's estate vineyard, sought after by many other producers and made by Siduri's Adam Lee.",Rosé of,Bucher
"Structured and savory, this polished wine doles out aromas and flavors of mature plum, crushed black cherry, violet, black pepper and clove. Firm but fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Drink 2016_2021.",,Amantis
"Luminous is an apt word to describe this sun-kissed, blossomy wine chock full of plump yellow peach, mango and pineapple flavors. There's so much more beyond fruit here though. A strike of lemon-lime acidity cuts through the palate, lending balance and vibe. The finish is long, accompanied by a delightfully astringent kick of lime zest. Drinks well now but should mature well through 2020.",Luminous,Anthony Nappa
"Leesy aromas of pear, apple and vanilla are pure and generous, with intensity. Layered and elegant on the palate, this was made entirely from free-run juice and tastes of dry apricot, citrus and apple. A note of spicy white pepper rises up on a minerally finish. Drink this winning Albariño now.",Lágrima,Bágoa do Miño
"Punchy black-cherry and plum aromas are dry, earthy and toasty, with stony minerality and crispness. This is a full, lively, generous Monastrell offering blackberry, spiced cake and chocolate flavors over a dark, coffee-laden finish that goes the distance. Drink through 2018.",Tarima Hill Estate Bottled Old Vines,Volver
"Red berry, rose and anise aromas mingle in the glass. The firm palate is still closed, but offers raw red berry, menthol, sage and anisette. It's still rather primary but has the structure to evolve and develop complexity. Drink after 2019.",Le Coste di Monforte,Amalia
"This magenta-hued Monastrell opens with concentrated aromas of jammy wild berries, herbs and rubber. The palate feels fleshy and chunky, while herbal, earthy blackberry and plum flavors precede a full-force finish of herbal, briny and salty accents. Drink through 2022.",El Sequé,Artadi
"This wine brings aromas of pineapple, lemon drop, chamomile tea and custard to the bouquet. The flavors are ripe and full, showing a sense of texture and weight followed by a persistent finish.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Buty
"At a full 91% of the blend, this could be labeled as Cabernet Sauvignon, with Cabernet Franc rounding it out. It's shut down aromatically at present with assorted dried herbs poking through. The palate brings highly structured fruit flavors, with vibrant acidity tying it all together. Decant for a day if drinking in the near term; it will be best after 2022.",Camerata Cara Mia Vineyard,Cadence
"Leather, forest floor and balsamic scents come together in the glass. The palate is still rather closed but offers dried black cherry, mocha, vanilla and a hint of espresso framed in bracing, tightly wound tannins. Drink 2018_2026.",Pernanno,Cascina Bongiovanni
"Reddish-orange in color, this nonvintage reserve sparkler combines 76% Pinot Noir and 24% Chardonnay expertly into exuberant flavors of raspberry and grenadine. Ripe, it's full of life and decadent, finishing in balance.",Reserve Pinot Noir Rosé,Chandon
"This 100% varietal from one of the state's oldest vineyards brims with aromas of dark roasted coffee, char, bittersweet chocolate and black cherry. Flavors show plenty of concentration and depth with a lingering, cocoa and vanilla-filled finish.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Coming largely from Canoe Ridge and Cold Creek vineyards, this wine leads with barrel aromas of toast and char out in front of peach. It's rich and full bodied, showing a sense of texture and gravitas. The oak is not shy the but the fruit stands up to it.",Ethos Reserve,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"The inaugural release from this winery, this wine was barrel fermented and aged sur lie for 17 months. Unfiltered and lightly cloudy, it offers appealing aromas of peach, butter and spice that lead to textured but deft flavors and a persistent finish.",Roskamp Vineyard,Co Dinn
"Aromas of vanilla, cocoa and dark berries lead to full-bodied and velvety coffee, cherry and dark fruit flavors. The oak plays prominently but this wine is still pretty hard to resist.",Reserve,Columbia Crest
"This is an impressively rich wine, full of ripe red cherry and red plum fruits. A juicy character is sustained by the core of dark tannins. It is ready to drink, although with the tannic background, it will be better from 2017.",,Domaine Gérard Fiou
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Syrah has aromas of cocoa, baking spice, green wood, plum and black cherry. It's concentrated and richly flavored, with layers of dark fruit, coffee and mesquite. Firm tannins lead to a warm finish.",Tribute,Fielding Hills
"With aromas reminiscent of moist soil after a summer rain, this wine also offers notes of dark coffee, cola cherry, black licorice and herbs. It's tightly wound, with dark fruit and coffee flavors and a hyperextended finish. Its best days are still in front of it.",,Full Pull & Friends
"Cabernet Sauvignon makes up half of this blend from Gamache and Champoux vineyards, with the balance Merlot, Malbec and Cabernet Franc. Coffee, vanilla, herb and cherry aromas lead to dark-fruit and barrel-spice flavors that linger. The wood is up front but plenty of good things are going on.",Nicolas,Gamache
"Chalky minerality meshes with soft, clean and crisp pink grapefruit flesh and blossom on the nose of this wine by Norm Yost, one of the first to make sparklers annually in Santa Barbara. More grapefruit flavors consume the palate alongside cut pears, sliced apples and wet cement, offering a texture that's both crisp and rich.",Brut Cuvée,Goat Bubbles
"Light in color but fairly ripe on the nose, with dusty, earthy notes, this is edgy and drawing in the mouth, with raisiny weight. Baked berry and prune flavors finish similar, with a hint of heat. This is Grenache, Carignan and Syrah.",,Flors
"Fresh red cherry and bramble notes are touched with mint, spice and vanilla on this concentrated, textured Merlot. While it's rich body and ripe berry flavors make it pleasing to a wide audience, zippy cranberry acidity and a dark mineral tone on the finish lends complexity and balance.",,Belhurst
"Vanilla, cinnamon and cigar box on the nose lead into balanced, easy drinking flavors of red berry, cherry and smoke. Good acidity buoys the bright fruit. Pair with grilled meats.",,Ktima Voyatzi
"This is medium-bodied, linearly constructed Saint-Joseph, with some vegetable-ash notes layered over blackberries and cracked pepper. It's crisp and mouthwatering on the finish. Try it as a bright contrast to rich meat dishes over the next couple of years.",,Vidal-Fleury
"Initially closed, this wine is currently only hinting at its weight and richness. It does feel full in the mouth, offering a fine texture and layers of toast. But it does need time, so wait until 2015.",,Domaine Carrette
"A fresh wine, it offers delicate acidity as well as citrus, ripe peach flavors and a touch of minerality. Bright and fruity, it is ready to drink now.",Le Clos des Topes Bizot,Domaine Chantal Lescure
"Fruity and citrusy, with a steely, mineral edge, this wine is mainly sourced from Meursault. It's crisp, lemony and very bright on the end.",,Domaine Jean-Philippe Fichet
"Here's a dry version of the Zibibo grape that opens with intense aromas of white rose, stone fruit and candied citrus. The palate delivers ripe yellow peach, apricot and honeydew alongside a touch of rosemary on the close.",Lighea,Donnafugata
"Made from the native Sicilian grape Insolia, this enjoyable wine opens with aromas that recall exotic fruit and yellow fragrant flowers. The fresh palate offers white peach, pineapple and citrus alongside bright acidity.",Colomba Platino,Duca di Salaparuta
"Here's a bright and spicy light-bodied red made with the native Sicilian grape Frappato. This is loaded with strawberry, red cherry and raspberry sensations, and is lightly accented by white pepper. Chill it down for a refreshing summer red.",,Fi_Nobile
"This wine begins well, with bright, focused aromas of cassis, cracker and mocha. In the mouth it feels somewhat dilute and chalky, with light raspberry fruit, lemony acidity and chewy tannins. An herbal character comes forward as well.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Fidelitas
"Mocha and spice notes add to the warm, plush feel of this deeply fruity, cherry-pie preserve Merlot. The palate is ruddy and rich with ripe red fruit brightened by a soft sheen of sour-cherry acidity. Finishes silky smooth with just a touch of tannins.",,Glenora
"Fresh, zesty lime notes mingle with aromas of ripe peach and honeysuckle on this lean, revitalizing dry Riesling. Steely, rather than overtly fruity, the palate has a honed minerality accentuated by streaks of lemon-lime acidity.",Dry,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"This ripe Taurasi opens with aromas of nail varnish, overripe black fruit and hints of tar and tire rubber. The dense, extracted palate is loaded with mature black plum, stewed prunes marinated in spirits, chocolate and balsamic notes. It has bracing tannins but is shy on freshness.",Nero Né,Il Cancelliere
"This is a soft and fruity wine with excellent acidity to balance. With its jammy red berry fruit flavors and attractive gentle tannins, it is ready to drink.",,Joseph Faiveley
"Plums and black cherries are the principal fruit flavors, underscored with ample acidity and a vein of gun metal. The tannins turn quite astringent, shortening the finish.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Kaella
"Like a liquid lemon meringue pie, this Chardonnay has bright fruit flavors, lemony acidity and a creamy finish. It smells like ripe apple and pineapple, and tastes crisp but but not lean. Altogether delicious and mouthwatering, and not nearly as sweet as the pie.",Side View,Karma
"Fragrant, floral and mouthfilling, this easy-to-love wine is a crowd pleaser. Notes of sweet peach, citrus and vanilla are not overly done in any way. It offers juicy minerality and generous fruit.",,Kenwood
"Clove, menthol, herb and spice give this fresh and distinctive red blend an indigenous edge. Toast, pepper, cinnamon spice and red cherry flavors are appealing and ageable. The Cabernet and Merlot add dimension.",Dry,Ktima Voyatzi
"Saline, seashell and generic white-fruit aromas are good. This feels full, with a plump texture. Flavors of nectarine and peach are salty but true to the region and variety, while the finish is round in feel, with modest citric acidity.",,Lagar de Indra
"Complicated scents of bacon, wet leather, organ meats and damp dirt open this funky wine from Santa Barbara County pioneer Richard Longoria. On the palate, the forest floor and gaminess persist alongside heavy herbal notes, a unique muskiness and smooth but present tannins.",,Longoria
"Lime and grapefruit aromas are tight and come with a touch of edgy harshness. The palate shows bright acidity and is clean as a whole. Mixed citrus flavors are straightforward, and so is the finish.",,Bohigas
"The nose on this wine is exotic, offering smoke, vanilla, lemon curd and spice. On the palate, it's a fat wine with lots of peach, lemon, vanilla and wood, but the acidity keeps it balanced. A distinctive wine that speaks to its origin.",Kallisti Reserve,Boutari
"This wine opens with aromas of prune, plum, blackberry and graphite. The palate offers raw red cherry, raspberry and a light touch of mineral alongside fresh acidity and drying tannins.",Colle Rotondella,Cantine Astroni
"This enjoyable wine opens with aromas of red berry, blackberry, blueberry and hints of white pepper that carry on to the palate. It has an easy-drinking style thanks to fresh acidity and smooth, soft tannins.",,Cantine Federiciane
"Wrapped in layers of red berries and licorice, it's thick and rich, offering mouthfuls of accessible fruitiness amid an interior core of leather and high heat. Pull it out for grilled meats slathered in sweet barbecue sauce.",Rocky Reserve Florence Vineyard,Carol Shelton
"Here's a dense but easygoing Nero d'Avola with sensations of blue flower, sweet black cherry, blueberry extract, clove and cinnamon. The soft, round palate offers juicy fruit, with a succulent blackberry finish.",Scurati,Ceuso
"Delicate mineral inflections lend elegance to flavors of pink grapefruit and peach on this sprightly semi-dry Riesling. Sunny with soft, Meyer-lemon acidity, it's a bit dainty on the palate but has enough power to drive a moderately long finish.",Semidry,Chateau Lafayette Reneau
"This dense and extracted Aglianico has toasted oak, chocolate, mocha, black cherry, espresso, vanilla and eucalyptus sensations. The palate is accompanied by teeth-coating, mouth-drying tannins.",Candriano,Colli di Castelfranci
"This fruity and full-bodied wine offers much to like. The opposite of crisp and lively, it was made in an unabashedly ripe and rich style. Pear and butter aromas lead to ripe peach and vanilla flavors. The texture is rich in the mouth and the finish is soft.",,Crushed
"This small bottle, enough for two glasses, reveals another great wine from Kracher. It is both superrich and beautifully balanced. The wine has opulent apricot, orange marmalade and honey flavors already finely integrated. Drink now. Screwcap.",Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"As with all of Lemelson's 2011 Pinots, this Jerome Reserve shows the strengths, rather than the limitations, of the cool vintage. It's light in color and mouthfeel, but not lacking in detail or length. Citrus and cherry, Asian spices and light herbs are all in play, with a delicacy not always found in Oregon wines. Give it a good decanting.",Jerome Reserve,Lemelson
"This is a joy to drink. It's dry and silky, with savory raspberry, cherry and cola flavors that are accented by earthy notes of sautéed wild mushrooms, balsamic and soy sauce. It should improve even more with a few years in the bottle.",Lone Oak Vineyard,Lucienne
"A pure, rich and fragrant wine, this is delicate in style yet full bodied in texture. Flavors of blossom, apples and currants are fresh and fruity, but deliciously integrated into the structure. A wine for aging over many years, it is best drunk after 2014. Glass stopper.",Undhof Kögl Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
"Creamy, yeasty lees, 100% new French oak and intense tropical fruit, apricot and pear flavors combine to make this barrel selection from the estate vineyard dramatic. It's dry, complex and delicious. The 2010 vintage was a successful one for Marimar Chardonnays, and while this is a delicious one to drink now, it will improve with an additional 5_6 years.",Bonita's Hill Don Miguel Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"Now mature, this is a deliberately oxidized wine that's very ripe with strong notes of almond and yeast. It may require an acquired taste, but it has a great character of richness and complex texture. Drink now.",,Domaine Daniel Dugois
"This is a medium-bodied wine, showing tangy flavors of rhubarb and red berries. There's a strong herbal streak, reminiscent of pine needles and lemon oil. But the balance and length are just right, and the wine is complex and interesting.",Seven Springs Vineyard,Evening Land
"You want to give this wine 5_6 years in the cellar, at the very least, to let its components come together. At the moment, it's quite dry, acidic and oaky. Primary fruit flavors of raspberries and cherries should begin to develop bottle complexity by 2017.",Occidental Ridge,Failla
"Tart with acidity but lush with fruit, this is a lovely Chardonnay to drink with shellfish dishes. Honeyed notes accompany flavors of tropical fruit, Meyer lemon and lime. Oak lends touches of vanilla and a creaminess that finishes clean.",,Failla
"This is a wine with density and concentration, cut through with steely acidity. Grapefruit and citrus flavors lead to a ripe apricot character. Age this wine and don't drink before 2016. Screwcap.",Steinmassel,Bründlmayer
"Cedar, tobacco, mossy notes, cola and blackberry aromas come with a touch of cheese and leather. This is Malbec, Cab Sauvignon and Merlot, and it's tannic and full of grab and astringent acids. Toast, coconut and fudge notes give character to plum and berry flavors, while the finish is choppy and rugged in feel. Drink through 2017.",Synthesis The Blend,Finca Sophenia
"Fragrant and delicately fruity, this is a lively, bright wine. It shows elegance, apple acidity and a stylish structure of zesty lemon and orange. It's delicious to drink now, but also keep a few bottles until 2019. Screwcap.",Kremser Kogl Bergwein Reserve,Forstreiter
"Sourced from a delineated section of this sloped, expansive vineyard, this Pinot has a fair amount of peppery herb, along with brambly berry flavor. It's tart, spicy and sharp, but beautifully balanced. Still quite young and tight, this one needs plenty of breathing time, or cellar it for a few more years.",West Hill,Shea
"A terrific value, this blend of 60% Grenache, 20% Mataro and 20% Shiraz features a forward bouquet of slightly jammy mixed berries. The palate showcases vibrant red fruit on a supple bed of tannins, capped off by a savory, tapanade-laden finish that makes it more than a simple fruit bomb. Very silky and drinkable, it's the ultimate wine-bar wine, as the name suggests.",Cuvée Juveniles,Torbreck
"Smoke and char reign supreme on the bouquet, which is a powder keg of sawdust, coconut and blackberry aromas. Saturated on the palate, this is rubbery, toasty, dark and pumping out black-fruit flavors. A firm, rugged, savory tasting finish brings a hint of salt and cured meat. Drink through 2017.",Gran Medalla,Trapiche
"When a producer renowned for its red wines can turn out an elegant, understated white of this quality, you know Australian Chardonnay has firmly arrived. Subtle accents of toasted nuts frame citrusy fruit, and while the wine is full-bodied and round in the mouth, it remains focused and long and on the finish. If you're fortunate enough to get some of the 600 bottles imported, drink the wine over the next couple of years.",White Label,Wolf Blass
"A terrific value, the 2012 Mount Crawford offer sup a big hit of lime on the nose, but also intriguing brine and talc notes that add extra dimension and complexity. It's a medium-bodied wine with ample texture and a long, layered finish. It may not age as long as some other Eden Valley Rieslings, but it's delicious now, so why wait?",Mount Crawford Single Vineyard,Thorn Clarke
"This is one full-bodied, hefty wine. The nose is toasty, minty and a touch herbal. In the mouth, solid tannins support what would otherwise be a syrupy, soft Cabernet. Flavors of baked blackberry and cassis finish with brown-sugar sweetness and length. This is a wine for folks who like their Cabs rich and plush.",Bramare,Viña Cobos
"A hint of lemon balm lends a fresh, herbaceous character to concentrated pineapple, honey and preserved peach flavors. It's sweet with fruit, but balanced with bright citrus acidity and a sprightly mouthfeel.",_rziger Würzgarten Spätlese,Dr. Loosen
"Redolent with sweet peach and nectarine, this penetrating off-dry Riesling is chock full of juicy, fruity nectar, but honed by a streak of acidity that keeps the palate bright and fresh. Finishes long, with a murmur of orange-pith astringency.",Scharzhof,Egon Müller
"Made exclusively from Sangiovese, this bold wine opens with intense aromas of underbrush, blue flower, oak and leather. The palate offers black cherry, vanilla, espresso and black pepper notes. Soft and ready to drink, with round tannins, it ends on a licorice note.",Polissena,Il Borro
"Blackberry, cassis and dusty aromas get this full-bodied Syrah-Monastrell off to a great start. This is staunch and well built, with firm tannins and dark, masculine flavors of blackberry, black currant, pepper and a hint of salt. A gutsy finish is powerful but balanced. This is impressive for the price.",Selección,Monterebro
"This is a lush, ripe Chardonnay from a cool subregion of the Adelaide Hills. Grilled peaches and toasted coconut elements lend an exotic edge to this full-bodied wine. Drink it over the next few years.",,Petaluma
"Fragrant, with notes of orange blossom, honey and wax, this delicate beerenauslese balances intensely sweet flavors of marmalade and peach nectar with savory tones of herb and earth. It's sprightly and bright on the palate, with a long honey-kissed finish.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Beerenauslese,Robert Weil
"The Olivet Grange vineyard is in the foggy southern part of the valley, where Pinot Noir is seldom opulent in youth. With this cool 2010 vintage, the wine is tightly wound with acidity and tannins masking inherent cherry, cranberry, rhubarb and pomegranate flavors. The official alcohol is a remarkably low 12.5% abv. It's a very fine wine, but you want to give it 5_6 years to come around",OGV Estate,Inman Family
"If aiming for a Loire-style Sauv Blanc, this wine hits it right on target. Saline, crisp and steely, it's got great concentration, length and purity. Sappy citrus, orange peel and grapefruit combine in a bracing, thoroughly delicious and refreshing wine.",,J. Christopher
"Rose gold in color, this is the first in the series of 12 TBAs from Kracher. It is light and fresh, and spicy as well as sweet. There is a perfumed character along with a touch of tannin framing the rich, honeyed texture. It needs some aging__lthough not much__o drink from 2015.",Nouvelle Vague Nummer 1 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"This is a rich, smoothly textured wine that has great fruitiness, as well as a fine amount of spice and acidity. The combination makes for a well-balanced wine that's fresh while ripe and concentrated. Drink from 2014. Screwcap.",Loibenberg Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"Still young and tight, this terroir-driven Chardonnay needs further cellaring to show its best. Woody scents top off crisp, persistent tree fruits, with lemony acids propping up flavors. It's dense, compact and unyielding, but clearly the raw materials for ageworthiness are there.",Rose Rock West Vineyards,Roco
"A juicy, fruity wine, this also has a rich, textured structure that promises aging. Peach and pear flavors are nicely combined with chalky notes, integrated acidity and a zesty, crisp aftertaste. Drink now, but better to wait until 2015. Glass stopper.",Wachtberg Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
This is a fresh and easy Moscato that shows sweet tones of honey and peach nectar with background tones of white almond and melon. The wine is softly fizzy and creamy on the close.,,Canti
"Fresh, light and clean, this pretty Lambrusco offers aromas of wild berries and a touch of chopped herb. In the mouth, the wine is thin and pristine with balanced acidity.",Villa Badia,Cantina di Sorbara
"This standard Chardonnay opens with blowsy melon and papaya aromas. The palate holds onto that melony feel while dealing honeydew, papaya and fleshy apple flavors. The finish tastes sweet and kind of flat.",505,Casarena
"Made in the sweet, crisp and fruity style that made Moscato catch on with so many consumers, this could double as a dessert sipper. It has flavors of orange meringue pie and vanilla honey.",Willow Springs,CK Mondavi
"Gritty aromas of grilled meat, rubber and baked plum lead to a candied tasting, syrupy feeling palate that's sweet in flavor and mildly oaky. This results in a rich finish that's sticky, a bit hot and ripe.",Vilata Old Vines,Lo Nuevo
This dry sparkling red wine opens with an inky dark color and offers pulpy tones of raw fruit and blackberry jam with tart cherry and cranberry on the finish.,Concerto,Medici Ermete
"This wine's aromas are one-dimensional, with a note of pithy white-grapefruit zest at the fore. Light to medium bodied, the palate is marked by tame acidity, and it finishes with a flavor reminiscent of raspberry-infused lemonade.",,Gray Ghost
"Aged 18 months in French oak, this wine is moderately aromatic, with notes of blueberry and mushroom. It's syrupy in feel yet has dry tannins.",Williamson Vineyard,Koenig Vineyards
"The Beaujolais appellation is the source of most Nouveau. But it also produces attractively fruity wines, full of cherries, that can be drunk over the two years following the harvest. Enjoy this wine this year.",,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"This is a firmly structured wine with a distinct tannic character to go with austere, mineral fruits. The wine is on the sour side, making it hard to love, although some juiciness does show through at the end.",Domaine des Nazins,Jean-Claude Debeaune
"Here's a very correct and clean Sangiovese with bright cherry nuances and blueberry followed by a touch of bitter almond. The mouthfeel is thin, easy and watery.",Prugneto,Poderi dal Nespoli 1929
"This rosé is almost as rich as a red wine, the difference being a fresher, red-fruit character. It has vanilla flavors, a dry texture and a touch of pepper.",Colheita,Quinta do Portal
"As its name suggests, this is a racy little Prosecco with simple fruit layers of peach and citrus followed by perky effervescence.",Brut,Rapido
"Very easy and fresh, this is the kind of Prosecco to drink at a summer poolside party. Citrus, talc powder and peach appear on the bouquet and this sparkler is lean and fresh on the finish.",Extra Dry,Stella Mia
"Dry, leafy, herbal aromas open this wine. The palate is full and ripe in feel, with amplified extraction and herbal, leafy flavors of spiced plum and mild acidity. Things wane on the finish, which is heavy in feel but mostly just ripe and rich.",Una Selección de Ricardo Santos,Ricardo Santos
"True to its name, this Moscato delivers musky aromas of soapy flower, honey, acacia flower and stone fruit. It shows sweet, smooth creaminess as well.",,Risata
"Hailing from the winery's Arena Valley Vineyard, this wine has notes of dried cranberry and currant. Cranberry juice-like flavors are accented by oaky spice.",Arena Valley Vineyard,Snake River
"This Cab doesn't pretend to be anything but what it is: dry, full-bodied and characteristically Cabernet. Grab a burger or beef taco and enjoy.",,Round Hill
This is a tight and firm style of Prosecco with lively perlage and aromatic characteristics that veer towards talc powder and white flower more than they do peachy fruit or honey. It's an Extra Dry Prosecco but the sweetness is not immediately obvious.,Extra Dry,Natale Verga
"A touch of leather adds intrigue to bright cherry and fresh herb aromas in this Long Island Bordeaux-style blend, but hints of unripe stems lend a slightly green tone to the palate. Medium bodied in style with a refreshing spray of acidity.",Campania Rosso,Waters Crest
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, this Cabernet Sauvignon offers a hint of spice and natural rubber at the outset that is followed by black fruit, red cherry and cola. There's a raw or sharp feel in the mouth.",Il Balòss,Tenuta Villa Tavernago
This is a bright and fragrant Sauvignon from the deep south of Italy that shows citrus and melon with back notes of almond and dried sage. The wine does not offer the aromatic intensity of the variety but it does offer good structure on the close.,Marangi,Tenute Mater Domini
"Flat early aromas seem smoky at first and then more like apple and papaya. This is a plump Sauvignon Blanc with mouthfilling weight; it's a touch mealy in flavor, and no particular fruits stick out. It's fine, but short on character.",Estacion el Porvenir,Unión de Productores del Valle (UPVG)
Light aromas of tropical fruits and white flowers are basic and open. An average feeling palate carries sweet flavors of tropical fruits like pineapple and mango accented by vanilla. Throw in a sprinkle of powdered sugar and you get the picture.,Elsa Bianchi,Valentin Bianchi
"Almost as sweet as a dessert wine, this Viognier has flavors of white sugar and a fruit juice blend of oranges, mangoes and peaches.",Huerhuero,Vina Robles
"Here's a light pink sparkling wine (made with Pinot Nero) that opens with a touch of matchstick that needs a few minutes to blow off. Otherwise, the bouquet is redolent of pink rose, raspberry and cranberry with a touch of baked bread.",On attend les Invites,Luretta
"With its notes of button mushroom and mineral, this bottling has earthy appeal. Browned apple and toasted baguette scents complete the bouquet. Medium bodied and broad in feel, the palate offers a note of toasted almond that adds a touch of bitter tension. The acidity is mild on the attack, but it gains some vigor as the wine progresses across the palate.",,Miracle Valley
"Tastes manipulated, with oak, honey and buttercream flavors dominating the underlying apples and peaches.",Mills Family Vineyard,River Road
"This is a decent Zin for drinking now. It's dry and tannic, with briary flavors of wild forest fruits and spices. Some unripe green notes compromise the score.",Old Vine,Rutherford Ranch
"This wine is hard, piercing and pushy on the nose, with a chemical note. A rubbery, soft palate carries little to no edge, while flavors of cooked berry and carob finish with notes of raisin and rubber. This bullish wine has its good points but it's tough and challenging.",Barrancos de Pizarra,Pegaso
"From producers Ambrogio & Giovanni Folonari, Baia al Vento (90% Merlot with small percentages of Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot) shows ripe fruit, plum, blackberry preserves and cherry backed by cured meat, tobacco and dried rosemary. The wine is round and soft with bright points of acidity that keeps it balanced.",Baia al Vento,Campo al Mare
"Winemaker Blair Walter has dialed up the intensity in this powerfully concentrated bottling, which packs ample black-cherry fruit and sturdy notes of hickory smoke, cured meat and dark coffee. Despite the wine's considerable weight, the tannins are supple enough to make it approachable now.",Block 3,Felton Road
"Already complex, this luscious blend of fruity and savory nuances features black cherries and smoked meat notes that are wrapped in a silky glove of dusty tannins. It's approachable now, but it should age easily for another 5_7 years.",Block 5,Felton Road
"This blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc boasts a spicy personality, with overtones of cardamom, clove, curry and rosemary. There are bold notes of ripe blackberry and prune, backed by drying sensations of tar and licorice. The oak-driven exotic-spice nuances are almost over the top.",Guarda Boschi,Fornacelle
"This is made from fruit that was sourced from the same vineyard and picked at the same brix level as Foundry's Stainless Chardonnay bottling. But here the toast of new oak adds a lovely flavor to the smooth butterscotch and apple notes. It opens gracefully and quickly, but the Stainless bottling has more grip and complexity.",Oak,Foundry Vineyards
"There is a ton of black pepper flavor in this stylish blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Sangiovese, Merlot and Syrah. It also bears notes of licorice, sweet red currants, grilled prosciutto and sandalwood. This tastes so rich that it almost seems sweet, but it's actually dry and balanced.",Phenomenon,Benessere
"Made from fruit that was sourced entirely from the 1.5-acre estate vineyard, this limited-production, Dijon-clone-based Chardonnay captures the essence of the Abeja style. Complex, stylish and buttery, it's a striking, fruit-laden wine. The long, clean finish mixes a flavor of citrus rind with a streak of butterscotch.",,Abeja
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Merlot, this wine's fruit is sourced entirely from the Conner Lee Vineyard. The superjuicy black-cherry flavor is balanced by generous acidity. Vibrant and full, long and fresh, this could age gracefully for a decade or more.",,Kaella
"The ripe, dramatic flavors of blackberry and cherry seem like they're right out of the jam jar, and they meld with toasty oak and crisp, coastal-inspired acidity. This needs some time in the bottle to knit together, so give it 5_6 years.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Kenneth Volk
"Big, bold and cuddly, this wine's tannins are cushioned by the red berry fruit and attractive acidity. It has weight and a rich feeling, and the dry edge offers the possibility of aging. This small clos is exclusive to Jaffelin.",Sur les Grèves Clos Saint-Anne Premier Cru,Jaffelin
"Stiff and tannic, this wine's bold black-cherry flavor, which is characteristic of the Champoux Vineyard, is veined with iron and gravel notes, plus a clover hint. It's complex and riveting, and the tannins finish with a peppery bite.",Champoux Vineyard,Januik
"With its firmness and juicy red-fruit flavor, this wine is delicious to drink now, but it will also age for at least six years. This bottling demonstrates the structure and generosity of one of Beaune's most famous premier crus.",Beaune Grèves Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"This bone-dry-tasting wine is made from grapes that were sourced from the Alayt Vineyard. It marries light hints of flowers to notes of citrus, apples and pears, which taste more like the fruits' textural skin than its sweet flesh. The impressive minerality, depth and length elevate this bottling to the A-list of Washington Rieslings.",Argus Bone Dry,Tapteil Vineyard
"This shows bold oak tones of toast and spice that will unwind with 3_5 more years of bottle age. Beyond the notes of cinnamon and tobacco, this blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc shows austerity and complexity, with touches of dark plum and tangy barbecue sauce. Give it a few more years.",Greppicaia,Tenuta I Greppi
"Made from three-quarters Cabernet Sauvignon, this Bordeaux-style blend is beautifully built, and it reveals fascinating threads of flavor. Notes of plum, fig, rum-soaked pound cake and a pat of butter are delicate and perfectly balanced.",,Walla Walla Vintners
"Although this is silky and elegant, it is one of Siduri's higher alcohol Pinot Noirs. Ripe and impressive, the raspberry and cherry pie flavors are accented by sweet, smoky oak notes. Drink it over the next 2_3 years for sheer pleasure.",Parsons' Vineyard,Siduri
"The master of Savigny-lès-Beaune, Bize has produced a powerful, expressive wine from this small single vineyard. It has serious structure, although the sumptuous black-fruit flavors are already showing. Concentrated, rich and fruity, this will age for at least five years.",Aux Grands Liards,Simon Bize
"This blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon shows remarkable richness and smoothness. It delivers bright, fresh tones of black cherry and blackberry that are backed by touches of leather and tobacco. It's velvety and taut, not too heavy or extracted.",Francesca Romana,Terenzi
"Bendigo is a warm subregion of Central Otago, and this wine shows the plush, creamy texture of superripe fruit. The wine is smoky and briary, marrying black cherry and mocha notes in harmonious complexity, and ending lush and long. Drink it now and over the next few years.",Bendigo Terrace,The Crater Rim
"The Clos de la Croix de Pierre forms part of the En Caradeux premier cru, and it creates poised wines. This is the red partner to a white also produced by Louis Jadot, and it displays juicy red fruit, layered with firm tannins. Drinkable now, but also capable of aging for five years.",Clos de la Croix de Pierre Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This is a round, rich and soft style of Chardonnay. It feels generous, and its yellow fruit flavor pushes through the acidity. It slowly opens to reveal complex tropical-fruit notes, and it will develop further, so give it another four years.",Le Clos Blanc Grèves Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"In 2008, Januik made a single-vineyard Syrah from Lewis Vineyard fruit; now the winery has sourced fruit from Ciel du Cheval Vineyard, one of the superstar spots on Red Mountain. A compact wine that snaps right into focus, this offers varietal flavors of fig, berry and plum. A streak of smooth chocolate weaves through the finish, along with a hint of red licorice and underlying slate-like minerality.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Januik
"This is a closed, smoke-filled wine, and its tannins and toasty wood character currently dominate, which gives it a bitter edge. It has richness, with hints of juicy fruit that sit under the structure. Give it at least six years.",Collection,L. Tramier & Fils
"Made from mostly Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon, this is a compelling wine to drink now. It exudes concentrated flavors of raspberry and cherry that taste like they have been baked in pie crust and sprinkled with baking spice. Notes of bacon, licorice and sandalwood add further complexity. The structure is superb, with citrusy acids and supple tannins. All profits from the sale of this wine go to Jonata's vineyard crew.",Todos,Jonata
"This Pinot Noir is softer and more approachable than many of Swan's other new releases, so it's probably not as age worthy. But it feels smooth on the palate, and the flavors of raspberry cream, cherry pie and buttered toast are luscious.",Saralee's Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"Focus and elegance are the hallmarks of this wine, and it offers the fruit purity that characterizes virtually all of Maison Bleue's white wines. From the first sniff to the last, resonating swallow, this smells and tastes like a bowl full of peaches, pineapples and mixed stone fruits. It's tight and defined, and it doesn't have new oak influence.",Au Contraire French Creek Vineyard,Maison Bleue
"This pure Marsanne was whole-cluster pressed and fermented in French oak barrels_30% of which were new. It's full and flavorful, and it has a lemony richness that's streaked with veins of butterscotch and marzipan. As with all of this winery's 2011 white wines, the aromatics are excellent and the length is exceptional.",Boushey Vineyard Petite Joie,Maison Bleue
"Bright and fruity, this Chardonnay has citrus and peach flavors, with notes of almond, vanilla and spice that reflect the wood aging and make this a wine that's crisp and rich. It has a strong texture, and it needs 4_5 years for its complexities to fully evolve.",Les Chênevottes Premier Cru,Maison Champy
"This powerful, intense Bordeaux-style blend includes (in decreasing amounts) Cabernet Franc, Merlot, Malbec, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Sauvignon. The wine is richly textured, and it offers ripe boysenberry and cassis fruit, layered with supple tannins and smoky oak. Approachable now, but it will probably be better in five years, and it could still be going strong in 10 years.",Ironclad,Man O' War
"A blend of five grapes, this is a firm, tannic and age-worthy wine. Even the high alcohol doesn't show on the rich, well-balanced palate. It's full of plum and black currant flavors, and wood-derived flavors show on the finish.",Rol de Coisas Antigas,Campolargo
"Cassis and cherry aromas are raw and scratchy, but they are also pure and racy. This blend of Merlot and Cab Franc is choppy and fresh in feel, with jumpy acids propping up red currant, plum and raspberry flavors that come with oak-based vanilla. An earthy tasting, rough feeling finish is the closing act.",Plus ++,Trapezio
"This fresh and enjoyable wine has a bright bouquet of red berry and spice. The palate shows ripe black-cherry, nutmeg and chocolate flavors. This would pair well with pasta in meat sauce.",Famiglia Pasqua,Pasqua
"This is a big blush wine with bold orange and strawberry fruit flavors. There's a honeyed edge to the palate, but it's vital with acidity. Great with Mediterranean fish stew or paella, or on the beach with cold cuts.",Estate Pinot Noir,Melville
"This opens with earthy aromas of turned soil, under brush and black cherry. The palate delivers dense black-fruit and almond notes, but it's already somewhat evolved so drink soon.",Le Muraie,Recchia
"Here's a structured ripasso that seems more like an Amarone. It has earthy underbrush aromas, with notes of tobacco leaf and spirit-soaked cherry. The palate shows ripe black fruit, chili pepper and red-hot cinnamon. It also closes with the heat of alcohol.",,Rubinelli Vajol
"This is the winery's best Nebula in years. While it's still a little on the soft, sweet side, the cool vintage has resonated in the wine's flavor, giving it a good structure housing cherry, currant and sandalwood flavors. Drink now.",Nebula,Midnight
"With some Pinot Blanc blended in for richness, this wine has a honeyed edge to the lemon, pineapple and pear fruit flavors. It's crisp with Monterey acidity.",,Pinot Patch
"A fine Zin, rich and sweet in raspberries and cherries, with spicy notes of cinnamon, pepper and Chinese Five-spice. It's a lusty, delicious wine for drinking now with beef, pork, chicken or even a veggie lasagna.",Old Vine,XYZin
"Here's a spicy selection, with aromas of black pepper and cherry accompanied by smoky tones. The palate delivers ripe black-cherry and white pepper flavors in a fresh and enjoyable style that's meant to be drunk young.",,Zenato
"The nose of this wine isn't very expressive, but reveals plum and prune aromas, with faint hints of graphite. The palate offers mature black fruit and chocolate flavors, but also very evident alcohol sensations. While it lacks complexity and vitality, it has more immediate charm.",,Begali
"Smooth, soft wine with light tannins well integrated into the blackberry fruits. A full-bodied, rich wine that has weight, a dense texture and a juicy, very fruity aftertaste. Drink now.",Carlat,Château de Chambert
"Black is certainly the color of this concentrated wine. It has big spice, big berry fruits and big, ripe character. Dark in texture while showing solid fruits and a tight acidity, drink it from 2014.",Black Time,Jean-Luc Baldès
"This offers fruity and spicy fragrances of blackberry and clove. On the palate, it has a tight core of black cherry and spice, with firm, chewy tannins that are tightly wound. Give this a few more years to come around.",Arusnatico,Valentina Cubi
"Two thirds Chardonnay, and one third a Viognier/Roussanne blend, this young wine has a definitely spritzy mouthfeel and a yeasty finish. The fruit flavors are fresh and lively, suggesting lemon and pineapple, with finishing hints of honeycomb.",Mélange Blanc,Patterson
"Combine two herbaceous grapes in a cool climate and you get this crisply fresh, and certainly herbaceous wine. It is bright and fruity with an undertow of lemon and orange zest giving a more textured character.",,Villa Dria
"Attractive, wood and yellow fruit laden wine. It's soft, rounded with bright acidity and a spicy character. It's wood probably needs to soften over the next few months.",La Grande Châtelaine,Domaine Poulleau Père et Fils
"The oak__ll French__s out front with notes of toast, crème brûlée and spice along with peach and lemon. It's light in style with a warm finish.",,Browne Family Vineyards
"A leathery 60%-Zin-based blend with 15% Barbera, 15% Sangiovese and 10% Primitivo, part of Mendocino's unique Coro line-up of Zin-based wines, that is rich and succulent in mouthfeel. On the finish is a trace of licorice.",Coro Mendocino,Brutocao
"Here's a big, tannic Cabernet, stuffed with black currants, olives and cassis, with a lot of sweet oak. It's bone dry and elegant, and while it's not a cellar candidate, it does show fine character for drinking now.",Lot 399,Cameron Hughes
"With its light color, minerally nectarine aromas and Provence leanings, this is a good facsimile of Old World rosé with peach and raspberry flavors, a smooth finish and integrated acidic cut.",Piedra Negra Alta Colección Rosado,François Lurton
"This ripe Pinot is as sweetly sappy as raspberry syrup. The oak brings additional sweetness, this time of caramel and buttered toast. A little clumsy now, but might gain traction in the cellar.",Lewis Vineyard Reserve,Frank Family
"Compost aromas blend with thicker, richer raisiny notes. This feels deep and almost heavy on the palate, where the acidity is modest and stewed, with hints of herbal flavor. Black currant and blackberry come across fully ripe. Notes of coffee, herbs and salt dictate the finishing flavors on this huge Malbec.",Reserve,Filus
"This fruity, off-dry Riesling is sourced from the Lawrence Vineyards on the Royal Slope. Despite the relatively cool climate site, it has a ton of very ripe fruit, peaches and apricots. There is a slight bitterness, perhaps from skin contact, in the finish.",The Gnome,Finn Hill
"Lots of rich, spicy blackberry, chocolate and bacon flavors in this Syrah. It's smooth in the mouth, with some scoury tannins. Good for drinking over the next 2_3 years, especially with lamb.",Clone 174,Firestone
"A squeeze of lime acidity gives balance to honeyed orange, pear, Meyer lemon and vanilla-custard flavors in this wine. Nothing complicated here, just plenty of Chardonnay appeal.",Reserve,Firestone
"Coming from the warm 2012 vintage, the notes vary from stone fruit, such as apricot, into tropical with dried pineapple. Aged in a mixture of stainless steel and older French oak barrels, it's fresh and appealing while also displaying some weight and density, drinking quite dry with a tart finish.",Horse Heaven Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This offers aromas of bell pepper and raisin, with a whiff of toast. The warm, round palate shows ripe black-fruit flavors, layered with red-bell-pepper and coffee accents. You'll also notice an alcoholic warmth to the close.",,Corte San Benedetto
"While there's some brine and haystack on the nose of this Viura, the palate feels healthy, plump and properly acidic, while peach, melon and yeasty flavors hold firm on a medium-length finish.",Monopole,CVNE
"Acidity cuts through the tomato, beet and cherry cola flavors of this dry, earthy wine. Unusual for a coastal Pinot Noir, but interesting in its own eccentric way. Drink soon.",Drum Canyon Vineyard,Dierberg
"Roasted, burnt, savory aromas of black fruits, char and campfire announce that this Merlot spent time in toasty oak. In the mouth, this is fresh but full bodied, with staunch tannins. Flavors of foresty blackberry, plum, vanilla and fall leaves finish dry and tannic.",Deyo,Castillo de Monjardin
"Aromas of charred earth, overripe plum, game and a confectionary note lead the nose of this blend of 90% Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo-Mammolo. The simple, rather rustic palate offers dried black cherry, leather and a hint of clove alongside dusty tannins.",,Astorre Noti
"Chalky, intensely mineral aromas stand out in contrast to the plush, intensely fruity palate of this Cabernet Franc rosé. Slightly off dry in style, its black plum and cherry flavors are voluptuously rich and ripe, accented by fresh cranberry acidity.",Dry Rosé of,Atwater
"A mix of Sauvignon Blanc (77%) and Sémillon, this wine comes from three separate vineyards in the Columbia Valley. It shows plenty of Sauvignon's herbal character while also displaying the ripeness of the vintage, with lightly spritzy tropical fruit and fig flavors that possess a fleshy feel.",Fumé Blanc Dry,Barnard Griffin
"A tight, steely and fresh wine, this is dominated by grapefruit, citrus and nervy acidity. A strongly herbaceous character gives a fruity, crisp aftertaste. The blend is Sauvignon Blanc, Sémillion and Muscadelle.",Mouton Cadet,Baron Philippe de Rothschild
"Earthy notes of saline and cheesy leather accent plum aromas on this tight number with rubbery tannins. Plum, cherry and herbal flavors carry some bitterness onto a finish with medicinal plum notes.",Viñadrian,Bodegas Berceo
"Light in color and medium bodied, this unusual wine presents a weightiness, a throwback to California's earlier days of more widespread plantings of Gamay. This one offers a thick, syrupy overtone of blueberry and cherry, soft on the midpalate with nominal structure.",The Count's Selection,Buena Vista
"The second wine of Château Ramage la Batisse, this is a soft blend of half-and-half Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon. It has mild tannins encased by juicy black currant fruits and acidity. It is for drinking soon, from 2016.",R de Ramage,Château Ramage la Batisse
"This blend of Sangiovese, 10% Canaiolo and 10% Merlot offers aromas of violet, black plum and a whiff of baking spice. The simple but fleeting palate offers black cherry, raspberry and a hint of clove alongside mild tannins and fresh acidity.",Pratale,Coli
"Savory herbs and yeast dominate the green pear flavors on nose and palate. The palate offers citrus freshness, a toned body and a clean-cut finish.",Schlossberg,Direder
"Briny, leathery, horsey berry aromas are alarming at first but settle in due time. A chunky mouthfeel struggles before finding its timing, while oaky flavors of hickory, bitter char and black fruits finish baked and herbal. This is good but raw, raspy and green.",,El Molet
"Aromas of blue flowers and dark berry lead the nose of this informal blend of Sangiovese and Canaiolo Rosso. The easygoing palate delivers tart red cherry, crushed strawberry and a hint of orange peel alongside bright acidity.",,Vecchia Cantina di Montepulciano
"Berry and plum aromas are rustic and stalky. Snappy and a bit sharp in feel, this shows leathery, roasted cherry and berry flavors in front of a short finish with black cherry notes.",,Venta Morales
"Here's a bright, fruity red that delivers blue flower, wild cherry, black raspberry and tart red currant sensations. Vibrant acidity and round tannins give this a delightful, easy-drinking quality.",,Fattoria Bini
"This has a deep, dense red-black color and quite smoky aromas. Herbal, almost thick flavors resemble plum juice, black pepper and roasted mild chipotle chilies. Plenty of tannin adds grip to the texture. Despite the bold flavors, this is light in body.",Estate Grown Biodynamic,Frey
"This earthy expression of Sangiovese and 10% Colorino opens with funky aromas of scorched soil, truffle and game. The palate offers dried black cherry, toast, clove and a truffle note. Round but somewhat fleeting tannins provide the easy-drinking framework. Drink through 2015.",,Le Fonti a San Giorgio
"Earthy, rooty aromas of cola, tobacco and baked black plum give way to a drawing, drying palate with rubbery, clampy tannins. Roasted plum, prune and herbal flavors finish loamy in feel but salty in flavor.",Zinio Tempranillo-Graciano,Patrocinio
"This is a distinctive offering of Cabernet with aromas of vanilla, sugared plum, herb and baking spice. The sweet fruit flavors have a plush feel along with light, plump tannins.",,Gravel Bar
"This blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Petit Verdot and Syrah shows a somewhat uneasy mix of woodspice, green herb and cherry aromas. Flavors are pleasant, lighter in style and easy drinking, with a refreshing finish.",La Vie en Rouge,Kennedy Shah
"This flamingo-pink wine comes across as a bit confected, with bubble-gum aromas and flavors of cherry and melon. It's a simple but clean fruit-driven rosé to casually quaff during warm weather.",Prieurs de St-Julien,Laudun Chusclan
"There are flavors of peanuts as well as the more usual white fruits in this wine that is rounded and soft, with gentle acidity. The wine, fresh at the end, is ready to drink.",Brut,Liebart-Régnier
"This is box wine taken seriously, even featuring a picture of winemaker Denise Wordenon. Fresh-squeezed blueberry fruit mixes with black rocks, milk chocolate and cedar on the nose, followed by an easy-to-quaff juiciness on the lightly bodied palate. It's not very complex, but perfect for summer barbecues or car camping.",,Loft
"This wine is ripe and balanced, showing full red fruits alongside a core of dry tannins. Considerable acidity gives a refreshing lift. Wait some more to drink, at least until 2017.",Pavillon de Lestruelle,Maison Bouey
"If only this wine wasn't extracted so much (which gives bitterness), it would be ripe and fruity. As it is, it's hard to get past the tight, dry tannins. There are hints of juiciness and black currant fruits. It might soften by 2016.",Château Lestruelle,Maison Bouey
"Fleshier fruit flavors or ripe cherry characterize this soft, pliable rosé. The finish loses focus, but this is refreshing when well-chilled. Drink soon.",Zweigelt,Nadler
"Punchy, raw cranberry and red-plum aromas turn more candied with airing. This has an easy flowing feel as well as simple, fresh cherry and raspberry flavors. Dry spice, cocoa and residual cherry flavors drive the finish.",Palacio de Canedo Maceración Ecológico,Prada A Tope
"Aromatic for the variety, this wine shows notes of apple and pear. It's lightly spritzy with an almost unctuous feel.",,Tamarack Cellars
"Seven different varieties make up this blend with Riesling (34%), Chardonnay (18%), Gewürztraminer (16%) and Viognier (13%) taking the lead. Aromas of flowers, mandarin orange and citrus are followed by moderately sweet stone-fruit flavors that providing easy drinking pleasure.",Mélange White Varietal Blend,Waterbrook
"Pineapple, pear and straw aromas lead to sweet, medium-bodied fruit flavors. It's a straightforward, varietally correct quaffer that goes down easy.",,Wild Meadows
"A strong oak influence dampens the varietal character in this full-bodied, spicy wine. It smells like cinnamon and cedar, tastes slightly sweet and smoky, is full bodied and rich in texture. Nice and smooth, it shows only mild varietal character.",Estate Grown,Wise Villa
The plum and blue fruit aromas and flavors don't seem entirely varietal but this still offers plenty of appeal. It's lightly sweet with a squeeze of tannins.,,Acre Twenty-one
"Aromas of black cherry and a hint of height-of-summer farmstead prep the palate for flavors of blackberry, black cherry, roasted meat, sage, and bell pepper. There is a nice combination of fruit and savory flavors, and the persistent finish offers lingering notes of fruits of the wood and roasted meat. Mevushal.",M-Series,Psagot
"This is a balanced wine that has attractive citrus flavors, riper peach and pineapple and a light apricot perfume from the Viognier in the blend. It is rich while having plenty of freshness. Drink from late 2016.",Estate Collection Branco,Quinta do Pinto
"Mature dark-skinned fruit, aniseed and aromatic herb aromas play in the glass. On the firm palate, fine-grained tannins support bright red cherry, mint, rosemary and toast. Drink after 2019.",,Rabino
"Aromas of woodland berry, toast, clove and chopped herb emerge in the glass. The palate is still rather closed, eventually giving up raw red berry, coconut, espresso, oak and grilled sage alongside tightly wound, astringent tannins. Give this a few more years to open up. Drink 2018_2024.",Bricco San Biagio,San Biagio
"Scents of pressed violet, mature dark-skinned fruit and a balsamic note of camphor slowly take shape. The forward palate offers dried black cherry, licorice and clove alongside brooding, fine-grained tannins. Drink 2018_2028.",Rocchettevino,San Biagio
"A light mauve in color, this Pinot Noir-based wine shows boisterous plum fruit, macerated strawberries and a hint of clove on the ripe nose, making it more entrée-ready than apéritif-aimed. The palate offers strawberry and bubble-gum notes deftly hidden behind a veil of sour cherry and plum-skin tartness.",Rosé,Scratch
"This is a classic style of Cabernet that should improve with age. It smells like pencil shavings, tobacco and cedar, and tastes like dark chocolate and black cherry, while feeling very firm on the palate. It has fine-grained tannins, and a lingering dark chocolate and cherry finish. It will be best after 2018.",,The Winery SF
"Black olive, boysenberry, graphite and cracked pepper season up a slightly gamy nose on this bottling from a popular Los Alamos vineyard. The flavors are a study of blackness, with peppercorns, asphalt and deep purple fruits that are both dark and tart, all framed by a boisterous acidity.",White Hawk Vineyard,Vie Winery
"Shocks of ripe rich yellow peach and pineapple revitalize the palate of this animated off-dry Riesling. Simultaneously bracing and sun-drenched, it's a straightforward yet delectably juicy treat. Enjoy now while young.",Brauneberger Juffer Kabinett Grosse Lage,Willi Haag
"A tight nose of blackberry and mint smooths the way for flavors of blackberry and pencil lead with a light dose of mint. There is a nice balance of acidity and tannins, with fruit lingering on the palate after the soft finish.",Special Reserve,1848 Winery
"Tropical with notes of gingerbread and vanilla, this wine tastes full bodied despite its medium level of alcohol. It offers a reduced note on the finish, anchored otherwise in sweet toffee.",Winery Lake Vineyard,Acacia
"Crisp minerally aromas of cherry and blackberry come with toasty spicy accents. This is a tightly built full-bodied Cab with lightly herbal, moderately oaky and saucy flavors of berry and plum. A dry, spicy finish provides for a strong ending.",Estate,Alta Vista
"Strong blackberry aromas come with hints of wood smoke, graphite and minerality. On the palate, it is high in acidity and a touch scouring, but also fresh and lively. Common blackberry and toasty oak flavors end fresh and crisp, but short.",La Mascota,Mascota
"Forward and full-bodied, this opens with aromas of mature dark fruit, grilled herb, toast, spirits and a balsamic note. On the warm palate, oak and licorice provide the backdrop to black cherry marinated in spirits alongside firm tannins. The heat of alcohol closes the finish.",Meriame,Paolo Manzone
"Fresh scents of rose petal, iris, aromatic herb and woodland berry float out of the glass. The palate offers raw red cherry, anise and dried sage alongside bracing tannins and nervous acidity. Drink 2018_2028.",,Pelassa
"Slightly muted aromatically and on the palate, this sports clean and fresh cherry fruit, with a pleasing suggestion of minerality. The midpalate feels a bit hollow.",Zenith Vineyard,Sineann
"Baking spice, dried flower, dark-skinned berry and a whiff of coconut lead the nose on this straightforward Barolo. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, toast and vanilla alongside firm, tightly knit tannins.",,Tenuta Rocca
"Rather reserved in aromas for a dessert wine, this allows blackberry, black pepper and mineral notes to emerge with time. The palate is lightly sweet, with ripe blackberry and blueberry-jam flavors, made interesting with a pencil-lead minerality throughout.",Novitiate Late Harvest,Testarossa
"Sun-ripened mango and pineapple flavors lend a lavish, tropical feel to this off-dry Riesling. At the same time, there's a resolute core of acidity that gives it balance and grace. It's concentrated and fruity but maintains vitality and length.",Bernkastel-Kueser Weisenstein Kabinett,Thanisch
"Brisk and bright, this delicately framed Pinot Noir offers both elegance and thirst-quenching quaffability. It's fresh and primary, bursting of raspberry and blossom, but finishes suprisingly long with a murmur of feathery tannin. Drink now.",Private Collection,Thomas Schmitt
"Papaya and stone-fruit aromas are fleshy and a touch green and grassy, giving way to dustiness upon airing. This feels spritzy and good, with a full complement of golden apple, white grape and green plum flavors. Solid, stony and minerally on the finish, with a hint of tropical fruit flavor.",,Txomín Etxaníz
"There's a lot of slate minerality on the nose of this bottling, alongside bright and fresh boysenberry fruit and a pine-needle character. The palate is tart with plum skin and grippy tannins, well balanced and also showing just the right amount of barnyard funk.",Thompson Vineyard,Vie Winery
"Fresh cherry and plum aromas are a bit scratchy but alert. This feels firm, with bright acidity creating a raw sense on the palate. Plum, berry and a pinch of saltiness make for an authentic flavor profile, while this finishes long and steady. Drink through 2018.",Crianza,Viña Otano
"This linear red offers savory fruit flavors of ripe wild cherry, juicy strawberry, toast, white pepper and a hint of grilled herb. Fine-grained, drying tannins provide support. Drink after 2018.",,Alberto Oggero
"Smoked beef, tart and tangy boysenberry jelly, black rocks and a cigar-box scent power the nose of this wine from an award-winning vineyard. The palate offers ample juicy tang along with chewy tannins, with dark chocolate, black cherry, and black olive enlivening the mouth.",Ascendance Cass Vineyard,Ascension Cellars
"This offer aromas of plum jam, Oriental spice, underbrush and a whiff of blue flower. The lively, approachable palate doles out juicy black cherry, blackberry, white pepper and clove alongside vibrant acidity.",Fontanelle,Ascheri
"Named after a trail in the Grand Canyon, this Napa-made bottling shows Japanese pear and cracked vanilla candy on a complex nose. It offers ample amounts of minerality, from slate to chalk, on the palate, followed by smoked stone fruit in the middle and pencil-lead elements toward the finish.",Courtney's Vineyard,Bright Angel WInes
"Rubbery, earthy aromas of berry fruits, plum and mushroom are solid but nondescript. This feels grabby and pinchy, with herbal, leafy, salty flavors that end with loamy plum and prune notes. Overall, this is big and forceful. Drink through 2019.",Giné Giné,Buil & Giné
"Rose, violet, wild berry and menthol aromas unfold in the glass. The bracing palate offers dried black cherry, licorice and clove alongside assertive, close-grained tannins that leave a mouth-puckering finish. Drink after 2020.",Luca Riserva,Carlo Giacosa
"The old vines here do give some concentration. More importantly, they give a great swathe of ripe fruit that is so crisp and refreshing. Lemon and the lightest texture are lifted by intense acidity and a lively, fresh aftertaste. This wine is ready to drink.",Sélection Vieilles Vignes Sur Lie,Château de la Ragotiere
"This older-vine vineyard a few miles from the ocean delivers a layered nose of steely minerality, chopped herbs (oregano, basil, thyme, even rosemary) and a poached apple background. The slightly watery palate seems to be hiding a bit, but patient searching reveals some of the herbals as well as light touches of toasted almond and lemon rind. This could emerge into a classic wine, but it's hard to tell now.",Wolff Vineyard,Summerland
"Robust and round, this opens with aromas of dark berry, espresso and ground black pepper. The ripe palate offers mature blackberry, spicy plum and mocha alongside firm, velvety tannins. A note of bitter prune signals the close. It's not very complex but it's savory and calls out for food. Drink through 2016.",Papale Linea Oro,Varvaglione Vigne & Vini
"Tasmania, with its cool climate, has become Australia's best region for sparkling wine. This cuvée features hints of biscuit and ginger on the nose, while the flavors lean toward ripe, tropical fruit. It's light to medium in body, with a dry, clean finish.",Cuvée du Val Pipers River Brut,Clos du Val
"This medium-bodied, softly tannic wine is ready to drink. Scents of vanilla, cedar and black cherry surge from the glass, while the flavors follow in a similar vein, just adding a pleasant touch of leather before finishing crisp and mouthwatering.",Art Series,Leeuwin Estate
"This leafy, green-leaning, cool-climate wine from the Casablanca Valley is fresh and tight on the palate, with hard tannins. It shows flavors of green herbs and currants, with ample spice notes. Oak rises up on a  drawing, hard-textured finish.",Coastal Cool Climate,Lomas del Valle
"At 6+ years post-vintage, this wine seems pretty mature. The tannins are supple, while the fruit is starting to take on some dried character. Other notes include molasses, caramel, dried leaves and tomato. The blend is 88% Cabernet Sauvignon and 12% Sangiovese.",Melba Lucia,De Bortoli
"Exotic on the nose, this offers floral blueberry and shoe polish aromas. The palate has a dense, concentrated feel that's based on chewy, soft tannins. Flavors of blue fruits like blueberry and cassis are ripe and come with a hint of black spice, while a moderate finish is on the jammy and flat side. Drink now.",,Merino
"Vibrant, tart gooseberry, plum and lime aromas are upfront on the bouquet, with additional hints of sweet grass and honeysuckle dancing in the background. The palate offers bright acidity and crisp citrus flavors. Drink now.",,Protea
"Oak-aged Sauvignon Blanc and Muscadelle give a full, rounded wine that may have lost some of its herbaceous character while gaining richness and full fruitiness. A hint of toast is just an adjunct to this mineral and fruit flavored wine. Drink now or until 2018.",,Château K
"This wine offers notes of vanilla, coconut, chocolate and cherry candy. It's richly flavored with a core of dark fruit backed by lightly grippy tannins.",Even Keel,Genoa
"Very fresh, crisp and apply, this 100% Chardonnay Champagne also has a soft side from the relatively high dosage. That gives the wine some richness and adds touches of yellow fruits. This bottling could do with some more aging to add complexity, although it's delicious now.",Blanc de Blancs Brut,H. Blin
"Warm, earthy, dusty aromas of red plum and smoky oak turn toastier the longer this sits. A fresh but balanced palate offers equal amounts of snappy acidity and creamy weight, while tart plum and spice flavors finish toasty and charred, with crisp acidity generating length.",Marques de Casa Concha,Concha y Toro
"This 100% varietal wine offers notes of plum, coffee, herbs and woodspice. Coffee and cherry flavors are surrounded by lightly chalky tannins that will benefit from time in the cellar.",Upright Merlot Klipsun Vineyard,Efeste
"A 100% Tempranillo that is unfined, unfiltered and aged in 100% French oak, this wine is softly layered and ripe in black cherry, blackberry and dusty leather. Medium bodied, with a taste of tobacco on the finish, it's lush without being jammy.",Estate Grown Cave Fermented,Jarvis
"Aromas of underbrush, tobacco leaf and spiced plum come together in the glass. The hearty palate delivers dried blackberry, crushed raspberry, coffee, tobacco and licorice alongside robust but velvety tannins.",Soltema,Jorche
"From estate-grown grapes, this opens with sizable, grippy tannins and strong barrel-heavy aromas. It then settles down into layers of blackberry and blueberry, sprinkled with a hint of cinnamon. This wine will benefit from a decant or a few more years in bottle.",35th Anniversary Reserve Mailbox Vineyard,Keenan
"Dusty, oaky aromas of papaya, corn and green banana precede a full, buttery palate with matching flavors of buttery oak, papaya, creamy vanilla and green banana. Brine and popcorn notes protrude from an otherwise mild finish.",Sabino,Kingston Family
"The wine smells rich and opulent, like rose petals and bay leaves in a flood of blackberry jam, but tastes balanced and dry. It's an unusual table wine and a fun journey to take.",Rio Tinto Silvaspoon Vineyard,Lee Family Farm
"This young wine shows notes of vanilla, herbs, cherry, barnyard, and cinnamon accented by brooding barrel spices. The fruit flavors are medium bodied and quite tart with the tannins tightly wound. Oak notes carry through on the warm finish. Best from 2016 on.",Cutlass,Ded.Reckoning
"This aromatic wine brings a potpourri of freshly rubbed sage, Dimetapp, bay leaf and sweet tobacco. It's broad yet light in feel with a pretty sense of elegance and restraint.",Upland Vineyards,Robert Ramsay
"Made by a winery outside of Gilroy, this bottling from eastern Salinas Valley fruit brings very nice aromas of blackberry extract, baking spices, gingerbread and a hint of root beer. The flavors are full and rich as the nose predicts, with juicy cherry-chocolate, a touch of tobacco and lingering cinnamon spice.",,Sarah's Vineyard
"Enticing flavors of juicy ripe pear with creamy, yeasty elements play about nose and palate. A yeasty mouthfeel also characterizes the rounded midpalate.",Ried Sätzen Reserve,Schwarzböck
"Light, lemony and crisp, this refreshing wine has some layers of complex herb midpalate and remains bright in acidity through the finish. From both the Miller Ranch in Yountville and Soda Creek Vineyard.",Miller Ranch,Silverado
"Supple and fresh, this informal but savory wine has aromas of dark berry and allspice. Crafted to be paired with fish, the silky, easy-drinking palate offers juicy red cherry, ripe raspberry and clove alongside smooth tannins and fresh acidity. Serve chilled for a perfect summer red.",Otre Fish,Teanum
"Aromas of underbrush, toast, black plum and cooking spice lead the nose. The dense, extracted palate offers blackberry, prune, licorice, mocha and grilled sage alongside velvety but rather fleeting tannins.",Visellio,Tenute Rubino
"This Bordeaux-style blend of 35% Merlot, 38% Cabernet Franc, 25% Cabernet Sauvignon and 2% Petit Verdot is sharp-edged, with high-toned aromas of raspberry, strawberry and cherry. The underlying acidity brings a streak of citrus, and there are also light suggestions of barnyard and toast. It's a balanced and interesting wine, best consumed over the next few years.",Oldfield Series 2Bench,Tinhorn Creek
"Aromas of spiced prune, tilled earth, leather and clove lead the nose. The palate delivers black currant, dried blackberry, raw cranberry, nutmeg and grilled herb along with bracing tannins and brisk acidity.",Vigna Pedale Riserva,Torrevento
"A blend of Negroamaro and Malvasia Nera, this savory wine offers aromas of blue flower, spiced plum, nutmeg and a whiff of game. The fresh, easy palate delivers juicy blackberry, crushed raspberry and cranberry alongside ground pepper and a licorice note. Velvety tannins give it a smooth texture.",Faneros,Torrevento
"Aromas of underbrush, grilled mushroom, blue flower and menthol lead the nose. The linear palate offers dried plum, mature blackberry, espresso and licorice, while firm tannins provide support. It finishes on a note of graphite.",,Masseria Altemura
"This has an edge, a frame of herb and skin flavors that tightens the mouthfeel. Green pineapple, cilantro, cucumber and lemon verbena are in play, with a penetrating attack and a pleasantly soft finish. The wine has a density that somehow recalls extra-virgin olive oil.",Meyer,Meyer Family Vineyards
"This wine is at the fringes in Washington, exploring dry farming where irrigation is the norm. Fresh herb, blackberry and raspberry aromas lead off. Packed with rich, elegant fruit flavors, it also has an herbal streak running from head to tail.",Dry Land,Tulpen
"This wine is a blend of top sites Stoney Vine, Discovery, Olsen, StoneTree and Klipsun vineyards. Perfumed aromas of wet stone, earth, black olive and coffee lead to plush-feeling fruit and earth flavors that show persistence.",,Two Vintners
"This is just a gorgeous wine, so easy to enjoy, juicy in watermelon, grapefruit and dark, baked strawberry tart, a taste of summer evoked from every sip. Textured and complex, it gives a squeeze of blood orange that lingers and remains fresh through the finish. It's from the owner's estate vineyard, sought after by many other producers and made by Siduri's Adam Lee.",Rosé of,Bucher
"Structured and savory, this polished wine doles out aromas and flavors of mature plum, crushed black cherry, violet, black pepper and clove. Firm but fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Drink 2016_2021.",,Amantis
"Luminous is an apt word to describe this sun-kissed, blossomy wine chock full of plump yellow peach, mango and pineapple flavors. There's so much more beyond fruit here though. A strike of lemon-lime acidity cuts through the palate, lending balance and vibe. The finish is long, accompanied by a delightfully astringent kick of lime zest. Drinks well now but should mature well through 2020.",Luminous,Anthony Nappa
"Leesy aromas of pear, apple and vanilla are pure and generous, with intensity. Layered and elegant on the palate, this was made entirely from free-run juice and tastes of dry apricot, citrus and apple. A note of spicy white pepper rises up on a minerally finish. Drink this winning Albariño now.",Lágrima,Bágoa do Miño
"Punchy black-cherry and plum aromas are dry, earthy and toasty, with stony minerality and crispness. This is a full, lively, generous Monastrell offering blackberry, spiced cake and chocolate flavors over a dark, coffee-laden finish that goes the distance. Drink through 2018.",Tarima Hill Estate Bottled Old Vines,Volver
"This wine offers caramelized apple, seared pear, honeysuckle, a touch of buttercream and vanilla ice cream on the even, well-measured nose. The flavors lean more green but not underripe, with lime juice, green apple and green mango, offering some bitterness and an alkaline/iodine character.",Katherine's Vineyard,Cambria
"Black and inky, with a tease of rustic, leathery earth, this is a smooth, easygoing version of the variety, rich in baked red fruit and plum. The finish combines for a developed, complex notion of both powerful tannin and high-toned elegance, finding a balance within itself that begs for further aging. Drink now through 2020.",Palisades Vineyard,Carlisle
"Done in a more oxidized style, this wine shows marzipan, dried apricot, browned butter, dried pineapple and a gunmetal flint character on the nose. The palate is very focused, with flavors of preserved lemon, lime rind, sage-roasted chicken and a faint minty element.",,Chalone Vineyard
"A ripe and honeyed wine, this is dry and with acidity along with fresh fruitiness. It's crisply textured, refreshingly perfumed and with delicious, pure apple flavors and acidity. It's a wine to drink now, although better to age until 2017.",Clos du Midi,Château de Brézé
"Another terrific value from the Costières de Nîmes, this features exquisite scents of grilled herbs__hink thyme, rosemary, lavender__ith ripe blueberries and roasted meat. It's open-knit and velvety on the palate already, so drink it now through 2018.",Les Cimels,Château d'Or et de Gueules
"This wine offers a complex, intoxicating bouquet: espresso, charred meat and black olive notes meld seamlessly together, adding notes of blueberries and pastry crust on the palate. It's not overly weighty, remaining fresh through the long, silky finish.",,Domaine de la Petite Cassagne
"Grilled yellow plum and anise aromas set the stage for this blend of 47% Roussanne, 40% Grenache Blanc and 13% Clairette. It's full and plump on the palate, with smoky notes that accent the plum and melon flavors on the lengthy finish.",Eicelènci,Domaine de Nalys
"This is mouthfilling but not overly weighty, with a wonderful blend of herbs and spices rounded out by cherries and plums. Intense garrigue notes pick up hints of anise on the long, softly dusty finish. Drink now_2020.",Confidences,Fontaine du Clos
"Classically structured, this still needs to open up but already offers aromas of dark berry, menthol, toast, dried herbs and a whiff of cocoa. The firm palate delivers red cherry, raspberry, mocha, tobacco and licorice accompanied by bracing tannins and fresh acidity.",Scarrone Vigna Mandorlo,Giacosa Fratelli
"This 100% varietal wine, fermented and aged in stainless steel, is silky and creamy, with a medium body and texture that retains a sizzle of freshness on the palate. Well balanced, it offers melon, green apple and lemon, with a tease of fresh-cut peach, ending crisp and clean.",Hendry Vineyard,Hendry
"This is an impressive wine at the price and production level, a great go-to for multiple occasions. It delivers earthy, candied strawberry around a light, bright core, remaining soft and smooth in texture and intensity, finishing with a tease of milk chocolate.",,La Crema
"Concentrated aromas of blackberry marmalade, wood grain, pepper and turned earth are rich and smooth. This is a dense, chewy, maximum-ripeness Monastrell, with flavors of baked blackberry, baking spices and chocolate. Toast and additional chocolate flavors drive the finish. Drink through 2019.",Selección,Nacido del Quórum
"Oak aging has added layers of vanilla and cinnamon, clove and menthol to this wine's ample black cherry fruit. There's a velvety plushness unusual for Crozes-Hermitage, but it adds welcome dimension to the finish.",Oratorio,Ogier
"Made from 62% Grenache, 15% Syrah, 15% Mourvèdre and 8% Counoise, this perennial delight is Demeter-certified Biodynamic and tastes as fresh as a summer day. Orange, grapefruit and lemon give it a sizzling refreshment and high level of acidity, while the texture of the wine stays smooth and luxurious.",,Quivira
"From a fourth-generation winemaking and grape-growing family, this Cab with 5% Merlot conveys peppercorn, cedar and dried herb, a slice of pencil lead on the periphery. Cranberry, cherry and rhubarb dance around its smooth, substantial edges, with dense tannins and vanilla surging on the lengthy, spicy finish.",,S.R. Tonella
"This elegant wine smells subtly like blackberries, lilac and plum skin. It tastes very firm with tannins and acidity, well balanced and medium to full bodied. Built to age, the rather subdued but complex fruit and spice flavors will come out more fully with time, and will be best after 2018.",Monarch Mine Vineyard,Terre Rouge
"This vineyard-designate opens with intoxicating aromas of violet and rose before expanding on the palate into seamless, sturdy waves of juicy pomegranate and red cherry. Earthy and somewhat feral, it ends with a note of black tea.",Balletto Vineyard,WesMar
"Aromas of mature black fruit, tobacco, allspice and mocha unfold in the glass along with a note of tilled earth. The opulent palate offers blackberry extract, dried plum, licorice and chocolate while velvety tannins provide support and give it a smooth texture. Drink through 2019.",Bramasole,La Braccesca
"The aromas of woodspice, vanilla and cedar are primary at present on this wine that seems initially closed on the nose. The palate is more vibrant, with cranberry and cherry flavors framed by a tart lick of acidity. Its best days in front of it. Drink after 2021.",Plenipotentiary Estate Grown,Ambassador Vineyard
"Fleshy, sun-kissed black plums and cherries abound in this supple, velvet-textured Merlot. It's mouthfilling and rich, but brisk cranberry acidity lends firm structure. The palate is subtly nuanced, marked by soft tannins and layers of brambly wood, cedar and baking spice. Aged 19 months with a large proportion of new French oak, it drinks well now but should meld beautifully from 2020_2028.",Reserve,Anthony Nappa
"This wine is mostly Cabernet Sauvignon with the balance Merlot and Syrah. Coming from a who's who list of vineyards that includes Seven Hills, Kiona and Bacchus, it opens with aromas of baking spices, herbs and cherries. It's full bodied and rich with dried-cherry flavors and velvety tannins.",Barrister's Block III,Barrister
"This huge, rich wine has weight and density. What make it still recognizably Bordeaux are the black currant fruits, acidity and the stylish tannins. Everything else is larger than life, with power and concentration. Drink from 2018. Owners Mallet Frères use parcel selection for this 80% Merlot and 20% Cabernet Sauvignon blend.",Cuvée Jean Bernard,Château Haut-Macô
"Ripe and smoky, this offers great fruit that bursts through the tannic structure. The 70% Merlot and 30% Cabernet Sauvignon blend is packed with red plum and blackberry fruits that are based upon a solid structure. This will be a fine wine; just wait until 2017. Producer Arnaud Pomme works with co-operative Alliance Bourg.",,Château Métairie Neuve
"Sweet, frothy and very pink, this is a strawberry-jelly rosé, light and fruity. The touch of acidity at the end is very welcome.",Conde Villar,Quinta das Arcas
"A fruity wine, it has fresh citrus and pear flavors. It is very light with just hints of texture. Drink now.",,Domaine L. Chatelain
"This Cab is starting to turn raisiny and pruny, and hot in alcohol as well, with a porty taste and a finish that's bitter in tannins.",,Horned Toad
"Sugary flavors of orange and apricot jam mark this simple wine. It's oaky and creamy, with good acidity.",,Kessler-Haak
"This wine has spice and some firm tannins, with rather light fruitiness. It seems unbalanced, the cherry character turning into bitterness. Better drink it now.",Château de Bellevue,Loron et Fils
This frothy Chardonnay is rich in baked honey and oak with a sweetness at its core. Otherwise it feels a bit over the top.,Reserve,Rock View
"With apricot, orange, honey, butter cream and vanilla flavors, it's a simple wine at a fair price.",,Seven Daughters
"Dry, full-bodied and tannic, it will deal well with a cheeseburger or barbecued ribs. Flavors include blackberry jam and dark chocolate.",,Pennywise
"It's just an ordinary wine, but sometimes that's all you need, especially if the price is right. With blackberry and oak flavors, it gets the Cab job done.",,Cannonball
Get through the dirty nose and there is plenty of red fruit and acidity. The wine is dry and fruity but spoiled by that rustic edge at the beginning.,Vinha Padre Pedro,Casa Cadaval
"True to its name, this blend is tangy in acidity. Flavorwise, it's simple, with pleasant orange, peach, lemon and vanilla flavors that finish a little sweet.",Crisp,Seven Daughters
"Petrol aromas lead to a wine that has seen some wood aging and that seems to miss out on fruitiness. It has toast, a burned character and a taut texture. The rest of the wine is bland.",Dornas Branco,Herdade do Rocim
"The light color of this wine continues to the light palate, which just hints at strawberry fruits. Soft, finishing with fresh acidity, this lightweight wine should be drunk now.",,Domaine Chêne
"The texture is off, with hard and bitter tannins. The fruit also is quite ripe, with the black cherries veering into raisins. Oak sticks out in the form of sweet vanilla and toast. The result lacks harmony.",Estate Reserve Honor Roll,Burrell School Vineyards
"Melony aromas come with a gritty, oily accent. Although the wine is still zesty on the palate, it is limited in elegance. Flavors of pithy green fruits turn bitter on the finish. The wine is at peak/past peak.",Isidora,Cousiño-Macul
An oddly metallic character produces a literally steely wine without the fruit. Some citrus fruit lurks but it is seriously hidden.,,L. Tramier & Fils
"A bit heavy, soft and dull, it has dried herb, green pea, oak and tropical fruit flavors, without much complexity. It's all right for drinking now.",,Russian Ridge
"Barrel fermented and aged on the lees, this wine is dry, crisp and dull. The orange and peach flavors are watery, oaky and herbal.",White,Vellum
A faintly metallic flavor spoils this red fruited wine. It brings out tight acidity and red currant fruits while the structure is lost.,,Casal da Coelheira
"A juicy wine, it has soft tannins and gently stalky fruit textures. Black currant fruits accompany fresh, tangy acidity. Not for aging, so drink now.",,Château Belle-Garde
"Typically young and fruity, this wine is packed with fresh cherry fruits and plenty of acidity. It's almost crisp and should be drunk now.",,Château de Pizay
"On the plus side, it's bone dry and delicate in structure, with excellent acidity and sour red cherry candy fruit. But there's an unripeness that suggests raw white mushrooms and bell peppers. Drink up.",Bella Collina Vineyard,La Montagne
"Tannic and hard around the edges, it has a woody character. The black currant fruit is there but spoiled by the rest of the flavors.",,Château Darzac
"Soft, overripe and raisiny sweet, this Cab Franc isn't offering much beyond a common, full-bodied red, with oaky notes. Drink up.",Dryfarmed Old Vine,DeRose
"Sugary and simple in candied cherry and blackberry flavors, this wine will go down easily at a barbecue.",Winemaker's Blend,Seven Daughters
"The cold vintage took its price, making the wine lean and minty.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"Almost colourless, it tastes like sugar water with some acidity thrown in. Gently fruity, the sweetness comes along with flavors of green grapes.",,Vinhas Altas
"Although this rosé smells of wild strawberries, the aroma is better than the palate, which tastes chemical with a bitter almond aftertaste. Serve very cold.",Dona Helena Colheita,Wines & Winemakers
"This basic, inexpensive Pinot has Syrah and Viognier blended, but overall the wine is fairly generic, with a streak of smokiness in the background.",Hybrid,Peltier
"Bell pepper and cactus aromas announce greenness. It's also dilute in texture, with cucumber and arugula flavors. Not only is this high on pyrazines, it's past its prime.",Aylin,Polkura
"Rose gold in color, this is the first in the series of 12 TBAs from Kracher. It is light and fresh, and spicy as well as sweet. There is a perfumed character along with a touch of tannin framing the rich, honeyed texture. It needs some aging__lthough not much__o drink from 2015.",Nouvelle Vague Nummer 1 Trockenbeerenauslese,Kracher
"This is a rich, smoothly textured wine that has great fruitiness, as well as a fine amount of spice and acidity. The combination makes for a well-balanced wine that's fresh while ripe and concentrated. Drink from 2014. Screwcap.",Loibenberg Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"Still young and tight, this terroir-driven Chardonnay needs further cellaring to show its best. Woody scents top off crisp, persistent tree fruits, with lemony acids propping up flavors. It's dense, compact and unyielding, but clearly the raw materials for ageworthiness are there.",Rose Rock West Vineyards,Roco
"A juicy, fruity wine, this also has a rich, textured structure that promises aging. Peach and pear flavors are nicely combined with chalky notes, integrated acidity and a zesty, crisp aftertaste. Drink now, but better to wait until 2015. Glass stopper.",Wachtberg Erste Lage,Salomon-Undhof
"Sourced entirely from the Alloro vineyard, this bottling offers complex and detailed scents of cinnamon and cedar along with plummy fruit. It's tart and spicy with light touches of black tea, tobacco, clean earth and espresso. Drink now and over the next five or six years.",Vigneto,Ponzi
"Smoky, charred meat notes add complexity to flavors of blackberries, cocoa, cedar and spice in this St. Helena Syrah. Its tannic complexity lifts the palate to nobility. Dramatically dark in color and rich in profile, it's the winery's best bottling since 2008. It needs a few years to meld, so drink from 2015_2017.",,Four Cairn
"Truchard has produced a Roussanne for many years, but the quality seems to vary according to vintage. The 2012 is a very good wine. It's dry, yet honeyed, with orange, peach and white-flower flavors. The texture is creamy, but highlighted with brisk acidity. It would be a great accompaniment to rich, complex dishes, but a simple roasted chicken would be wonderful as well.",,Truchard
"Ripe, lush and full of juicy peach, apricot and tangerine flavors, this dry Riesling is unusually soft and round, with a full-bodied style that's densely textured on the palate. Delicate acidity lingers on the finish alongside hints of Meyer lemon and pink grapefruit. Drink now through 2016.",Saulheimer Schlossberg Trocken,Thörle
"A mature, mossy (in a good way) Shiraz, this seamlessly blends cedar and vanilla shadings with dark berry notes. It's medium to full in body, with solidly savory and earthy underpinnings that make it especially easy to match with food. Drink now_2018.",8 Songs,Peter Lehmann
"Exuberantly floral, with notes of honeysuckle and orange blossom, yet not at all cloying or perfumy, this sparkler showcases all the delicacy and verve you expect from a Mosel Riesling. Softly effervescent, it's dry and spry on the palate, with an exceptionally long, peach-tinged finish.",Brut Sekt,Hansen-Lauer
"Rich and structured, yet full and concentrated, this wine has both dark tannins and ripe plum and berry fruits. The acidity streaks through the wine, lending freshness and good aging potential. Drink from 2017.",,Château de Belcier
"This is a light, fresh and spicy wine that offers both a fine texture and a sense of freshness. Fragrant and fruity, the palate boasts pear flavors spiced with ginger. There is a fine touch of acidity and orange zest that gives the wine further complexity. Drink from 2016.",,Château Doisy-Daëne
"This is a powerfully woody wine that shows more wood than fruit at this stage. Structured, austere and powerful, it needs time to flesh out. Drink from 2018.",,Château Gruaud Larose
"Rich and smooth, this is a concentrated wine that has attractive fruitiness as well as firm tannins. The fruitiness is contagious and already enjoyable, surrounding the dense, dry core. It should age well over the medium term, so drink from 2016.",,Château Labégorce Margaux
"With attractive, juicy fruit, this wine has as much freshness as it does structure. The palate is warm and open with blackberry fruits that are rounded and soft. Spice and some tannins show through on the finish. Drink from 2017.",,Château Talbot
"More toasty than fruity at this stage, this is a finely made wine with vanilla flavors that dominate the ripe tropical fruits underneath. Give it a year and the wine will balance out richly and smoothly.",,Château Tour de Mirambeau
"This Syrah brings to mind that Sade song, Smooth Operator. It's all velvet in the mouth, with soft, caressing flavors of chocolate, blackberries and toast. As the wine airs in the glass, the complexities pile up, making it ever more interesting. It's so easy to drink now, there's no reason to age it further.",Mt. George Vineyard,Delectus
"This ambitious Cabernet keeps up with the best of the 2010 vintage. Made by Beaulieu's longtime chief winemaker, it's ripe and pure with mocha, blackberry jam and sweet oak flavors. Give it 5_6 years to integrate.",,Aiken
"Few Cabs in the world are this ripe and balanced. It floods the mouth with flavors of cherries, red plums, licorice and mocha, along with sumptuous oak notes. It's delicious enough to drink now, but the firm tannins suggest 6_8 years of aging.",Signaterra Sunny Slope,Benziger
"This wine, made from biodynamically-grown grapes, as good as any Sonoma Valley Bordeaux blend has ever been. It's exceptionally ripe and pure with blackberries, cherries, currants and mocha, while oak brings rich notes of toast. It's quite tannic now, so you'll want to cellar it for 5_6 years.",Tribute,Benziger
"There is a strong initial wood flavor in this structured wine. Solid and dense in character, it needs time to soften its toastiness and reveal its ripe blackberry fruitiness. Give this wine several years, and drink from 2016.",Goldberg Reserve,Johann Heinrich
"A new bottling from Kilikanoon, this may prove hard to find in the U.S. (25 cases imported), but perhaps greater quantities may be forthcoming in the future. It's a full-bodied version of Barossa Shiraz that shows more brawn than plushness, but that's backed by assertive blackberry, roasted meat, espresso and black olive flavors. Drink 2016_2025.",Kavel's Flock,Kilikanoon
"Mineral in character, this is a ripe wine with tight texture as well as a touch of oak aging. It's dense, spicy and full bodied but with bright acidity behind the rich fruit and toast, keeping the wine in balance. Keep this ageworthy wine and drink from 2016.",Rabenstein Reserve,Dürnberg
"Run, don't walk, to find this Sauvignon Blanc. It's delicious, and available for such a great price! The palate treads an exciting line between ripe peach, citrus, green apple and honey flavors, and a tangy, flinty minerality. The acidity is mouthwatering. Only 550 cases were produced, but it's worth a search.",Nelson Vineyards,El Roy
"Hailing from the northern Salta region, this blend of Malbec, Cabernet Sauvignon, Cab Franc and Tannat is a bit murky and herbal smelling, with notes of bacon and hickory. The palate is firmly tannic, with pinched, oaky blackberry and saline flavors. On the finish, the tannins are drying and abrasive. Drink from 2015_2021.",Altimus,Michel Torino
"This is Marimar's unoaked Chardonnay from the estate vineyard. In keeping with past vintages, it's so rich and savory, you won't even notice the absence of barrel influence. The wine is rich and complex in tangerine, apricot, lime, lemon and vanilla flavors, brightened by exquisite acidity.",Acero Don Miguel Vineyard Unoaked,Marimar Estate
"The Cabernet grapes, which account for 80% of the blend, bring intense, nervy black currant flavors, but Petit Verdot also expresses itself in the form of violets. New oak dominates everything, with layers of toast and caramel notes. Give the wine 6_8 years in the cellar to come together.",,Trinchero
"Burgundian in every way, this deceptively light (in color, alcohol and impact) wine rewards your attention with its finesse and complexity. Rhubarb, pomegranate, peppermint, earth and savory herbs are all highlights, and the length is equally impressive. It's low in alcohol, but high in aging potential.",Private Stash #9,Roco
"The east side of the Russian River is home to some of the winery's best vineyards, and this wine exhibits the excellent structure, nerve and ripeness of all of their 2011 Pinots. It's forward but nuanced. Drink now_2017.",Eastside Road Neighbors,Williams Selyem
"The Wohlmuth family has owned this vineyard since 1803, producing wines with impressive continuity. The Sauvignon Blanc is rich, and almost tropical, but without being heavy. Apples, pears and apricots combine beautifully. It could age for a year or two, but is thoroughly drinkable now.",Hochsteinriegl,Wohlmuth
"There are positives and negatives to this tinta de toro. The nose is outright stalky and roasted, with a shortage of purity. The palate is huge and grossly tannic, a monster if you will. Flavors of sweet black fruits are stalky in nature, while prune, blackberry and herbal flavors drive the finish.",Crianza,Cyan
"This solid if standard Pinot Noir proffers raspberry, earthiness, herbs and a touch of leather on the nose. The palate comes on silky but winds up fairly tannic by the finish. Wait until 2015 and this will be a much better wine.",Estate,Riverbench
"There's so much age present on the nose that this wine seems like it could be a couple years older: candied quince, pralines and cream ice cream, toffee and singed marshmallow. Once sipped, the age is not quite as present at first, with poached pear leading the way and the marshmallow elements in the background. On the finish, there is noticeable booze and wood. It is probably passing its peak.",Estate,Savannah-Chanelle
"This all-out Zin makes no bones about its sweetness, heavy oak spiciness and full body. Maple syrup, brown sugar and cherry jam are the dominant notes that crowd the aromas and flavors and linger on the finish. Very rich and full-bodied, it has prominent caramelized oak notes that keep the tannins from biting.",Old Vine,Seven Deadly Zins
"Light purple in hue, it presents appealing notes of huckleberry, plum and barrel spices. It's on the lighter side of medium-bodied, with tart fruit flavors and astringent tannins.",Elderding Six Prong Vineyard,Stottle
"This Merlot, which includes a small amount of Syrah, at first feels a little disjointed, though some breathing time helps pull it together. Raspberry fruit enters softly and lingers nicely, though without much depth or further development.",Elephant Mountain Vineyard,Stottle
"Punchy lemon and lime acidity lends a bristling tone to this dry, concentrated Riesling full of white grapefruit and stone fruit flavors. Medium-bodied on the palate, it's a zesty, refreshing wine with a minerally finish.",Dry,Swedish Hill
"This is sourced from the excellent Seven Hills vineyard, yet it lacks the heft and muscle of the winery's Columbia Valley Merlot, sourced from a mix of sites. Here the flavors suggest cherry candy, with a big streak of licorice. The tannins are chewy and astringent.",,Three Rivers
This informal wine opens with ripe red and black berry aromas. The palate offers crisp black cherry and black berry flavors that are accented by a note of graphite alongside nervous acidity. Pair this with pasta dishes topped with hearty sauces.,Per'e Palummo,Tommasone
"A fine dusting of granite and steel coats zesty lemons and limes on this steely, dry Riesling. Exceptionally light on its feet, it bristles with acidity and a stark, lean mineral tone. It's unusually mineral for the Finger Lakes, but satisfying.",Dry,Treleaven
"Here's a delightful red that offers fruity aromas of strawberry, wild red cherry and raspberry that carry through to the palate alongside notes of white pepper and mineral. It's easy drinking, with bright acidity and a smooth texture.",Tenuta Ibidini,Valle dell'Acate
"The nose promises so much that it's not surprising when the flavors overdeliver. The aromas include intoxicating rose, stargazer lily and apricot brandy. Next, the viscous palate combines buttered bread, hard orange candy and powerful vanilla. There's not a lot of acidity and the result is nearly cloying.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,William James
"There's a briny note to the nose on this Xarel-lo, and otherwise not a lot of fruit besides a hint of nectarine. The palate brings bright acidity, while lime, tangerine and nectarine flavors finish with minerality, hence the name, which is Catalan for limestone.",Calcari,Parés Balt_
"With yellow fruit flavors and soft acidity, it's rich and fragrant. The wood aging shows at the end, along with some ripe pear flavors. Drink now.",,Pierre André
"A blend of 50% Grillo and 50% Inzolia, this offers tropical fruit and floral aromas. The palate offers lively acidity and flavors of white peach, citrus zest and pineapple.",Adènzia,Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Made from a blend of Fiano, Traminer and Malvasia, this opens with aromas of white flower and stone fruit. The fresh palate offers yellow peach, apricot and citrus notes alongside fresh acidity.",Sophia,Basilisco
"Firm cherry and berry aromas offer grit and a whiff of asphalt on the side. A grabby palate is driven by a slightly astringent acid-tannin package, while flavors of roasted berry fruits are round, dark and toasty. This is a touch edgy but tasty and good.",La Tercia Bodega,Yemanueva
"Tarry, rubbery aromas of blackened berry fruits lead to a full, wide palate, with ripe blackberry, plum and chocolate flavors. This is full of oak spice on a long, satisfying finish.",,Viridiana
"Dried cherry and blackberry aromas abound on this robustly fruity, yet elegant Bordeaux-style wine. High proportions of Cabernet Franc and Merlot seem to accentuate flavors of ripe red-cherries touched with bramble and mint. Velvety tannins penetrate through the finish.",Eclipse,Heron Hill
"Deeply concentrated aromas of ripe blackberries and cherries intoxicate on the nose of this medium-bodied Lemberger. By contrast, the palate is more crisp and tart in fruit profile with delicate flavors of sour red cherries and plums. A refreshing style of red to pair with lighter meat and fowl dishes.",,Hosmer
"Cinnamon, pepper and cedar lead on this elegant red. Flavors of toasted nut, smoke, and cocoa follow in a pert, clean wave. Pair with lamb, smoked meat or robust cheese.",,Tsantali
"In keeping with the rest of the value-priced Runway series, this Syrah is pure varietal and just moderately ripe. Light blueberry fruit, good acidity and some pleasant persistence through the finish are the highlights.",Runway,Airfield Estates
"From vines in Meursault, Volnay and the Hautes Côtes de Beaune, this light, fruity wine is gently touched by wood. It has great acidity, with crisp lemon and pear skin flavors. Bright and ready to drink.",,Alex Gambal
"Tart cherry and pepper aromas are followed by an earthy, masculine combination of flavors in this wine. Toasted nut, aged leather and spice box flavors speak to its native terroir. An affordable wine with good Greek character.",Saint George,Papaioannou
"Dusty apple, spice and tropical fruit aromas feed into a mellow palate that isn't terribly acidic or cutting. Nectarine, passion fruit and mango flavors finish ripe and friendly, with residual sweetness and tropical fruit flavors.",Kila,Vins El Cep
"Roasted berry and plum aromas come with lifting floral notes. The palate is bright, racy and fueled by acidity, while flavors of black fruits, herbs and mint are more generic than unique, but finish clean.",Monte Castrillo,Finca Torremilanos
"Berry, mild prune, licorice, herb and rubbery aromas set up a wiry mouthfeel that's full of energy. Lemony oak rests on top of earthy berry fruit flavors and hard tannins, while oak and high acidity as well as plum and raspberry notes finish it off.",Selección Crianza,Bodegas Tobía
"Thyme, bay and lavender aromas provide strong regional character to this wine, a blend of 70% Grenache, 20% Syrah and 10% Carignan. Mixed berries form the core of this supple wine, which should be consumed over the next couple of years.",,La Coterie
"With oak aging providing a toasty top note, this dry, 100% varietal wine brings notes of apricot and spice. Despite the alcohol level, the concentration seems a bit wanting, and it doesn't all quite knit together.",Blanc du Moulin,Domaine Pouillon
"Bright and fruity, it has good acidity and a crisp exterior. Inside, lemon and pear fruit flavors are touched with pineapple. It will be ready soon, so drink 2014.",Les Amandiers,Domaine Sophie Cinier
"An intriguing wine, with aromas of white pepper, smoked meat, herbs and red fruit. The palate can't deliver all that these aromas have to offer though, seeming underripe and without the structure to hold them together. Interestingly, it's aged in 100% new oak__alf French and half American__ut the wood doesn't show.",Winemaker Reserve Prayer Rock Vineyards,Reustle
"A very soft, fruity wine, with a gentle, creamy texture and light acidity. It's fresh with vanilla and pear flavors, and ready to drink.",Florières,Cave de Lugny
"Young and fruity, this a crisp, lightly acid wine. Its raspberry fruits are already delicious.",Vista Rosé,Caves Aliança
"Yes, this wine treads deep on the side of informality with a lean, watery mouthfeel and subtle aromas of peach and pear. But there's also just enough territorial identity of Mediterranean herb and dried sage to make it interesting. The price is just right too.",Brognoligo,Cecilia Beretta
"Very simple and clean, this pretty Lambrusco offers fresh cherry and blueberry with a touch of bitter almond on the close. The wine would pair with pizza piled high with mozzarella cheese.",,Cantina di Puianello
"The bouquet on this is so neutral there's almost nothing to describe. This is zesty and tangy in the mouth, with pithy orange, lemon and green apple flavors. A crisp finish with citrus zest leaves a clean final impression.",,Casa de Campo
"Easy, fresh, and not particularly earth-shattering, this Extra Dry sparkler should be served at informal drinking occasions (like a gathering of friends on a warm Friday afternoon). Peach and citrus are the main aromatic elements.",Extra Dry,Albino Armani
"Pungent, feline aromas of sweat, nettle and grapefruit precede a lemony, dilute palate with lime, scallion and green-herb flavors of tarragon and thyme. It's tangy and light on the finish, with a chalky feel.",Finca la Florencia,Familia Cassone
"This warm-weather Viognier is fleshy and chunky on the bouquet, with generic white-fruit aromas that suggest gardenias. A plump palate is low on acid and heavy in weight; flavors of melon and green herbs finish soft and could turn flabby in a short time.",Reserva,Finca El Origen
"Lemon and apple aromas come with modest minerality. This is fairly full bodied, with a mix of briny citrus and salty, slightly oily tasting melon flavors. A chunky, round finish manages to hold its pose...for now.",Coleccion,Finca Los Maza
"Tastes like the wine equivalent of blackberry and cherry jam. It's extracted, ripe and fruity, with a hit of citrusy acidity. Oak adds the usual notes of sweet buttered toast. Lots of people will like it at this price.",,Firestone
"This is a muscular, concentrated wine with no shortage of horsepower. In the mouth, it's rather loud and acidic. But flavors of smoky black fruits, vanilla and toast are good and finish spicy. This is heavy and rough by global standards, but it has good fruit and isn't timid.",,Emevé
"You'll find tropical fruit flavors in this Chardonnay, but they're not strong enough to stand up to the weight of oak. It's a little too soft as well. Disappointing.",Reserve Speciale,Arrowood
"A distinctly sweet-smelling wine, with notes of stewed black cherry, oak spices, and citrus. The tannins are firm and the alcohol shows prominently.",,Fujishin
"This is a soft, ductile blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Touriga Nacional. It bears dusty tannins that add subtle texture, and a turmeric flavor adds an exotic edge to the palate.",Virginia Gold,Ingleside
"The alcohol is refreshingly moderate on this blush wine, which has appealing flavors of oranges, limes and tropical fruits, brightened with soft acidity. It's almost as sweet as a dessert wine, with a sugary finish.",Pauline's Vineyard Grenache,Kokomo
"Tart and slightly bitter, this Lambrusco has all the right qualities to pair with fettuccine in cream sauce. Bright berry flavors are followed by creamy foam and fresh acidity.",,Venturini Baldini
Fragrant Malvasia tones of honey and white jasmine open the bouquet of this easy-going sparkling wine. The bubbling is light and delicate and the wine ends on a sweet note of Golden Delicious apple.,,Venturini Baldini
"This is one of those fun, easygoing Italian Pinot Grigios that tastes great on a hot summer afternoon. The wine is crisp, light and lean with simple endnotes of citrus and melon.",Limited Selection,Villa Cornaro
"Packaged in a bright blue bottle, this fresh Moscato d'Asti delivers soft aromas of peach and white flower followed by a spicy touch of crisp acidity that you can really feel at the back of the tongue. Pair this easy wine with spongecake, fresh strawberries and whipped cream.",,Bella Bollè
"As soon as you unscrew the top on this 100% Syrah blush wine, the aromas of raspberries and strawberries release into the air, like incense. Those fruits follow through in the taste, turning jammy, heavy and sweet. The alcohol is a heady 14.9% by volume.",Roseum Huerhuero,Vina Robles
"This opens with hard-capped aromas of crusty mineral and reedy berry. The flavors are gamy and roasted, with brandied plum and cherry accents. The finish is bright in feel and runs long with an herbal raspberry flavor.",,Vinos Magbel
"Aged in 20% new French oak, the wood overwhelms the fruit with notes of char and toast. While the variety gets lost, this off-dry wine still offers enjoyment though the alcohol distracts on the finish.",,Silvan Ridge
"Mild hints of tropical fruit are less than convincing. The palate on this Sauvignon Blanc is round, weighty and offers quiet flavors of melon and spiced apple. The finish remains soft and a touch bitter.",Jalá Blanco,Tres Valles
"Pale in color, this wine brings notes of char, sawdust, red fruit and pencil eraser. Plump, juicy flavors play off a soft structure and abundant oak flavors.",,Snake River
"Made with organically-farmed fruit, this simple Pinot Grigio shows easy melon and citrus backed by yellow candy and a slightly waxy feel on the close.",,TerrAmore
"From the Predappio area of Romagna in central Italy, this Sangiovese offers rustic aromas of tar and licorice backed by black fruit and prune. There's a savory quality on the close with cured meat and tobacco.",Bartimeo,Stefano Berti
This simple and straightforward sparkler offers clean tones of citrus and stone fruit with talc powder and bitter almond. The wine would work perfectly on hot summer afternoons.,Brut,Salatin
"An aromatic blend of Viognier and Roussanne, with overripe pear, lavender and spice. Aged three months in French oak, the palate is full bodied and unctuous, with a bitter note on the finish.",Vivacious Reserve Viognier-Roussane,3 Horse Ranch Vineyards
"A note of caramelized oak hits the nose first, followed by touches of char, herb and mocha. This medium-bodied blend of 50% Sangiovese, 25% Cabernet Sauvignon and 25% Merlot has a soft, sweet-tasting core, though the tannins become more assertive as the wine progresses across the palate. Espresso bean and cherry-skin tones mark the hurried finish.",Festa di Bacco,Afton Mountain
"With its firm tannins and structure, this is a wine that's made in the traditional Nuits-St.-Georges style. But it's also packed with ripe red fruit, and it has a jammy character and an open feel. There is no doubt that this is a wine to age for at least five years.",Les Damodes Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"This Syrah feels jammy and tannic, but beyond the toughness exist intense flavors of blackberries and cherries that taste like they were baked in pie crust, with additional notes of dried currant, anise, grilled meat and cedar. It's dry and astringent, and all indications point to its ageability. Give this 6_7 years.",Obsidian Vineyard,Donelan
"Winemaker Elisabetta Geppetti is a beautiful and dynamic woman, with a firm grasp on Sangiovese and Scansano. Her riserva offers ripe fruit, wonderful softness and hints of wild brush and scrub oak in the background.",Poggio Valente Riserva,Fattoria Le Pupille
"The grapes to make this rich, ripe wine were sourced from vines that were planted in the 1980s. The vineyard, which is located next to Bonnes Mares, yields wines that have an open, generous style, plus elements of structure that lend aging potential. Ready to drink in two years, but it should age well for many more.",Les Véroilles,Domaine Bruno Clair
"As this is currently quite heavy in blackberry and blueberry jam, cola, orange zest and oaky flavors, it needs more time to knit together. The integrity of the acid-tannin structure should help the wine develop for at least the next six years. If you choose to open it before then, decant it for a couple of hours.",,Bien Nacido
"This wine offers a full, bright bouquet that is packed with notes of cherry, chocolate, exotic spice, leather, rum cake and a touch of cinnamon. The palate shows smooth, fine tannins and a long, fruit-driven finish.",,Caparzo
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this offers a beautiful bouquet that's redolent of sweet cherry, candied fruit, Christmas spice and potpourri. The palate shows a soft richness that's balanced and lively without being cloying or heavy.",Lupicaia,Castello del Terriccio
"Made from 100% Cabernet, this is a classic Napa Valley wine. It's dry, but the fruit is sweetly ripe, and it has firm, supple tannins and balancing acids. The rich flavors are of dark chocolate and black currants, with a heady note of summer blueberries. This will evolve over the years, but it's best enjoyed soon for its sheer deliciousness.",Tietjen Vineyard,Monticello Vineyards
"Duas Quintas Reserva is now established as one of the benchmark wines in the Douro. This dark-colored effort has ripe, concentrated dark berry and herb flavors and a fine sense of tannic structure from wood aging. There's a strong sense of minerality as well, giving this richness and aging potential.",Duas Quintas Reserva,Ramos-Pinto
"Firm and muscular, this has a supple core of blue and purple fruits, plus balancing acids, ripe tannins and no overt oak influence. It's long and seamless.",Principia Reserve,Rasa
"This Syrah is at the top of the lineup for Reininger. It's tightly wound, yet it opens gracefully to reveal deep flavors of blueberry and plum, with resonating notes of earth, iron, espresso and dark chocolate. This can age for up to a decade.",,Reininger
"A firm, structured wine, this is packed with dry tannins as well as rich blackberry and plum flavors. It's solid, chunky and full bodied, and it offers power and concentration. Age this for 4_5 years.",Outeiro,Terra d'Alter
"Although the 2010 vintage was cooler than the previous two years, this Chardonnay still offers rich and luscious notes of crème caramel and baked pear. The intoxicating bouquet picks up layers of lemon zest and mineral.","Merrillie, Landucci Block",Steven Kent
"Racy, clean and seemingly bone dry, this wine is elegant and almost shy in its approach. Food friendly and Chablis-like, it has plenty of citrus, cream, mineral and toast subtleties. The fruit was sourced from a vineyard located in the westernmost part of the valley, and hence one of the coolest. Drink now_2018.",,Solomon Hills
"Touriga Nacional and Cabernet Sauvignon merge seamlessly in this richly structured but fruity wine. It is densely concentrated, with a line of tannins cutting through the blackberry fruit flavors. Firm, textured and likely to age well, this is impressive.",Forma de Arte Reserva,Quinta do Casal Monteiro
"Balifico stands apart thanks to its dark, rich appearance and generous aromas. The blend is Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon, and together these grapes offer notes of cherry and cassis, plus touches of dried rosemary and toasted spice. In contrast to the boldness of the bouquet, the palate is fine, polished and long-lasting.",Balifico,Volpaia
"A powerful and concentrated wine, this shows the region's dark and tannic side. The black plum and juicy black-currant flavors shine, and wood aging has smoothed the palate, which makes it feel dense and fully mature.",Aguia Moura Em Vinhas Velhas Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"Part of a Limited Release series, this is an all-stainless Chardonnay. Ripe, tart and focused, it offers spicy bursts of yellow and green fruits, and it shows a sur lie-derived texture. The pinpoint details are gorgeous.",Unoaked,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"An 80-20 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, this shows a pristine, polished bouquet that's composed of black fruit, rum cake, licorice, tobacco and spice. The ripe fruit and cassis notes on the finish add softness and heft. This is elegant and complex, especially in the mouth.",Scopaio,Cipriana
"This has great viscosity and bracing minerality, plus a tongue-tickling texture. The refreshing palate offers gooseberry and melon notes, which combine to make this a go-to Sancerre substitute. One can only hope production increases from the miserly two barrels that were made in this vintage.",Reserve,Columbia Crest
"Made in a dry, light style, this Pinot  Noir has a silky mouthfeel and citrusy acidity that gets the tastebuds whistling. It has intense flavors of sour cherry candy and Dr. Pepper, and the oak influence lends an edge of sweet toast. Seems at its best now and over the next few years. It will pair well with tuna tartare.",,Huge Bear
"Fragrant and generous, this ripe wine shows its fruitiness as easily as it reveals its structure. Its ripe, full-bodied character remains tightly textured, which makes it an age-worthy selection.",Mont de Milieu Premier Cru,Garnier et Fils
"Former Cloudy Bay winemaker Kevin Judd has produced a moderately full-bodied, lush Pinot Noir under his own label. Intense cherry-berry fruit is framed by smoky, spicy oak that ends on notes of clove and hickory. Drink it over the next several years.",,Greywacke
"Made from 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, this is bright and intense, and it shows notes of dark fruit, spice, leather, prune, rum cake and tobacco, plus aged aromas of black licorice and cured meat. Fine, dusty tannins mark the close.",Farnito,Carpineto
This Bichot monopole has produced a round wine that's full of attractive plum flavor. It's backbone is buried in the sumptuous texture. Age this for at least four years.,Clos des Maréchaudes Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Clos des Mouches is one of the top Beaune premier crus for both red and white wines. This rich selection offers wood-derived flavors that show through the racy mineral and yellow fruit notes. The finish is both rich and crisp, with mouth-watering acidity.",Domaine du Pavillon Clos des Mouches Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Only a small portion of this vineyard is planted with Chardonnay, and it has produced a minerally wine that's both crisp and ripe. The acidity is dominant at this stage, which lends the palate a juicy, peach- and citrus-like character. This wood-aged selection needs time.",Clos de la Croix de Pierre,Louis Jadot
"Perfumed, rich yet soft, this is opulent Beaune at its best. It has acidity and a touch of tannin, but it's the broad, ripe red-fruit flavors that dominate, which gives juiciness and vitality to this wine that will age for several years.",Theurons Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"Hints of sweet pastry and rising bread entice on this refreshing, dry, yet honeyed sparkling wine made from Tokaj grape varieties. It's brisk on the palate, with a clean cut, but it has all of the waxy, floral qualities of a sweet Tokaj wine. Fantastic now, but it could be even more glorious with five more years in the cellar.",Pezsgo Henye Brut,Királyudvar
"Firm and powerful, this tannic wine has dense black-fruit flavors, with enough fruitiness to balance the structure. The finish shows a smoky character, a bitter cherry flavor and bright acidity.",Collection Premier Cru,L. Tramier & Fils
"This brawny wine has intense aromas of plum, tobacco and spirit-soaked black cherries, with a hint of oak and leather. The palate delivers ripe blackberry, tobacco leaf and licorice flavors, with a warm midpalate. It shows nice fruit but evident alcohol dominates the palate, cutting the flavors short.",Collina del Sole,Bottega
"This Amarone has aromas of ripe fruit and evident oak. On the palate, it's a bit lumbering, with mature plum, toasted oak, espresso and chocolate notes. Drink now and over the next few years.",G & G,Luigi Righetti
"This savory Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon blend offers aromas of bell pepper, red currant and plum that carry over to the palate, along with toasted sensations of espresso and oak. Its linear structure will pair well with grilled chicken seasoned with rosemary and grilled vegetables.",Brentino,Maculan
"This 100% Cab is a big, rich wine, and while its power is considerable, it lacks subtlety. There's no question about the intensity of blackberries, cherries and spicy persimmons, unrivaled anywhere in the world. Yet ripeness isn't everything. Hard to see this explosion of fruit going anywhere, so drink soon.",Villa Vista,Kuleto Estate
"This is a dark, full-bodied, fruity wine, rich in cherries and blackberries that finish in fruity essence. It shows bigtime tannins that need fare such as short ribs to tame. The blend is Petite Sirah, Zinfandel, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc.",CUTT Fearless,Hunnicutt
"Meaty aromas lead on the nose of this wine, with additional supporting notes of red cherry, black pepper and curing spice. It's easy on the palate, with medium yet fleeting tannins and balanced alcohol. The finish is fully loaded with spice, ending quite peppery.",Roc Gris,Les Vignerons de Tautavel Vingrau
"Buttered toast, vanilla cream, honey and jammy pineapple, lime and mango flavors give this Chardonnay incredible richness. Monterey acidity balances the palate briskly. Not particularly subtle, but a big, enjoyable wine.",Estate Block K1,McIntyre Vineyards
"This offers ripe plum and red-berry aromas, accented with a touch of bitter almond. It has a clean and refined palate, showing black cherry and white pepper flavors. Fresh and spicy, try this with pasta all'arrabbiata.",,Zonin
"Soft, fragrant wine, layering raspberry and red currant fruit with elegant tannins and acidity. The wood aging shows lightly, giving a wine that is fruity and ripe. Drink from 2014.",Côte de Rouffach,René Muré
"A small parcel of vines produces this crisp, fragrant and very fruity wine. With its apple fruits and lightly oaked character, it's a bright wine, it's more taut texture showing some aging potential. Drink from 2015.",Le Grand Bois,Romain Bouchard
"A very perfumed, fragrant and refreshing wine. It is full in the mouth, ripe, smelling of hedgerow blossoms and having a touch of spring in its fruits. Ready to drink, but also keep until 2016.",Cuvée Tradition,Pierre and Charles Sparr
"From a small, seven hectare domaine, this an attractive, if firmly structured wine. There is a touch of bitter chocolate as well as blackberry fruits and complex, smoky tannins. The fruit comes out at the end along with a streak of fresh acidity.",Domaine de la Ferté,Domaines Devillard
"A bone dry, tightly crisp wine, fragrant and floral. This is a classic Alsace Riesling with its tight acidity, white fruits and taut, nervy texture. Drink after 2015.",,Boeckel
"This straightforward selection has blackberry aromas and a whiff of bitter almond. On the palate, this delivers black cherry, fig and white pepper flavors, with a hint of mushroom. This would pair well with mushroom risotto or cured meats.",Marogne,Zeni
"Bright, fleshy dark-fruit flavors of plum, blackberry and boysenberry all unfold on the nose and in the mouth of this value-priced wine. Hints of mocha and pepper add interest to the palate, with approachable tannins and a balanced, easygoing structure.",Rouge,Penya
"On first take, this smells like prunes, with little vitality. In the mouth, however, there's more pulse than the nose indicates, as tomato-like acidity drives the palate toward a mix of cherry tomato, red plum and oak flavors. A fresh but mild tasting finish ensures that this blend can accompany food without a problem.",Edición Limitada,Príncipe de Viana
"A little rough and rustic around the edges, with red and black currant and oak flavors wrapped into firm, sticky tannins. The finish is sweet. Made from Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc, it's showing its best now and over the next two years.",RTW,VinRoc
"It's hard to find any Tannat in California_ let alone good Tannat__nd Sobon has done a nice job here, combining leather and boysenberry fruit to good effect. In the back layers is a trace of menthol.",ReZerve,Sobon Estate
"A fine Albariño, this is brisk in acidity, moderate in alcohol and clean on the finish. Shows flavors of citrus fruits and minerals, with rich notes of pears. Great to drink now.",,Rumpus
"This presents aromas of ripe black fruit__ust shy of overripe__nd bitter almond. The palate shows black cherry, baked plum and cinnamon flavors. While it's simply structured and a little shy on fresh acidity, it's still very enjoyable thanks to the generous fruit.",,Monte Zovo
"Rather delicate flavors of green melon, apple and fresh cut grass infuse this elegant Sauvignon Blanc. The precision and balance are impressive; the price and overall lightness make it an excellent, mealtime quaffer.",,Airfield Estates
"Lots of rich blueberry, cherry and blackberry fruit flavors in this Syrah. It's soft in the mouth, with a sweetness that's due to caramelized oak and the glycerine of high alcohol. Not an ager, but delicious now with charred beef.",Hope Family Vineyard,Austin Hope
"There a lot of complexity on the palate of this dryish brut, with flavors of limes, raspberries, yeast, toast and vanilla. It's a tad scoury in the mouth, with a sandpapery roughness. Not an ager, so drink up.",Vintage Brut,Chandon
"This is one of Chandon's sweeter bubblies. It has flavors of honey, limes, pineapples and oranges, with yeasty notes of vanilla and toast. The mousse is delicate, making it extra drinkable.",Brut Classic,Chandon
"This bone-dry blend of Syrah and Petite Sirah is picking up aged notes, with the primary fruit flavors drying out. In its place are dried currants, cured meats, funky mushrooms. The tannins and acids provide firm structure. Already throwing some sediment, it will appeal to fans of older wines.",Megandina Vineyard Vintner's Cuvée,Brady Family
"Virginia's 2010 harvest brought intense heat and little rain, making for many ripe, powerful wines, such as this Cabernet Franc. Aromas of blackberry cobbler, jammy blueberry, caramel and vanilla lead to a medium- to full-bodied palate that bears muscular tannins and lush acids. This is a big boy in terms of alcohol, clocking in at 15.8%, which makes for a warm finish.",Marquis de Lafayette,Breaux
"You'll find lots to like in this dry, stylish Cabernet. It's full-bodied and tannic, but you can drink it now for the wealth of blackberry, black currant, cola, mineral and oak flavors.",Lot 400,Cameron Hughes
"This blush is made from Pinot Noir. Full-bodied in style, it's ripe with raspberries, strawberries and pink grapefruits, and a rich finish. Great with charcuterie.",,Canihan
"Aromas of black cherry, tobacco and exotic spice lead the nose of this wine. The palate is soft and ripe, with black cherry, prune and white pepper accents. A bit simple, but delicious, and ready to drink now.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"Equal parts malbec and merlot with the balance (8%) petit verdot, it smells quite fruity with notes of plum and berry along with peat and bubblegum. There's no noticeable oak influence (all two year old and neutral barrels) to distract from the smooth fruit flavors and bright acidity.",Momentum,Cor Cellars
"Made from a high-elevation, steeply sloped vineyard, this has complex aromas resembling cherries, coffee and rosemary. Flavors are mouthfilling, the texture is lightly tannic and lively, and the body medium to full.",Reserve Alder Springs Vineyard,City Winery of New York
"Bright fruit flavors of mountain berries are bolstered with steely acidity. This firm, lightly herbal wine sneaks in a hint of clover as well. It may improve with another couple of years of bottle age.",Estate Reserve,David Hill
"Composed of 80% Syrah and 20% Viognier, this is rather light in color for Syrah, but flavors are full and penetrating. It's intensely aromatic, with a mix of smoke, sage and briary flavors.",Hock & Deuce Mae's Vineyard,Day
"This ripe, rounded wine has an attractive apple and ripe pear fruit character. Hints of vanilla give extra richness to the wine with its approachable fruitiness. It can be drunk now, although it will be better from late 2016.",,Domaine Céline et Frédéric Gueguen
"This blend of Chenin Blanc and Cabernet Franc is the most successful of the Baumard sparkling wines. It is fruity, very fresh and crisp while also having the potential for some bottle aging. Acidity and a tangy aftertaste contribute to its lively freshness.",Carte Turquoise Brut,Domaine des Baumard
"Dried rose, mature berry and dark cooking spice aromas lead the nose while the palate offers raisin, black tea, dried cherry, mocha and a hint of orange zest. Assertive, fine-grained tannins carry through to the firm finish. Drink sooner rather than later to capture remaining fruit.",Fossati Riserva,Dosio
"Saffron, fennel and spice are peppered throughout the nose and palate of this savory nuanced Riesling. Off-dry and zesty, it hits the palate with stacatto movements of acidity and sweetness.",Graacher Himmelreich Kabinett,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"A bouquet of blackberry, black plum, anise and white chocolate sets the scene for flavors of black plum, strawberry, cocoa powder and licorice with a burst of pomegranate. This wine is soft on entry, with a nice interplay of tannins and acidity that persists into the subdued finish.",Reserve,Flam
"Made with Moscato, this sparkling dessert wine opens with aromas of fragrant white flower, apricot and a note of chopped herb. The foaming palate offers dried apricot, yellow peach and candied nectarine zest while a lemon drop note signals the close.",Cuvéè 24 mesi Metodo Classico,Gancia
"The nose is still a bit closed but reveals woodland berry, toast, culinary spice, chopped herb and a hint of dried earth. The bracing palate offers raw red berry, powdered sage and star anise supported by astringent tannins and brisk acidity. Best after 2019.",,Gemma
"Light fleshy aromas of peach and apricot lead to a tight juicy direct palate with pure, unadulterated flavors of pineapple, tangerine and apple. A crisp stony finish is fresh and in fine shape. This is a textbook racy Albariño to drink right away.",Etiqueta Verde,Granbazán
"From a small vineyard in the hills of the Lisbon region, this is a deliciously fresh and fruity wine. It has great acidity from the local Arinto grapes that are blended with Antão Vaz and Viosinho. Grapefruit and a crisp, zesty texture are refreshing and lively. Drink now.",Vale da Mata Branco,Herdade do Rocim
"So easy to enjoy, this mild-tasting but full-bodied wine is fruity in flavor and soft in texture. It has an earthy, savory aroma, generous plum and berry flavors, a mineral influence, light tannins and a lingering finish.",Rous Vineyard Reserve Ancient Vines,Ironstone
"Subtle honeysuckle, orange and apricot aromas lead to nicely tangy fruit flavors, medium body and good crisp acidity. This is a well-balanced, vibrant and refreshing wine.",Proprietor Grown,Kendric Vineyards
"Woody in aroma, this is an exceptionally light-bodied, floral and herbal white, marked most by its high-pitched acidity that threatens to veer into extreme territory. Instead, beeswax and white peach figure into the mix, finishing in a refreshing twist of lemon.",Kobler Family Vineyards,Kobler
"This densely flavored and full-bodied wine has a very deep, dark color and aromas that suggest oak barrels, nutmeg and cardamom. The palate shows tension between firm tannins and acidity, and carries ripe blackberries, with spicy accents. Drink now through 2020.",Single Vineyard,Lake and Vine Cellars
"With a dominance of Pinot Meunier in the blend, this soft, attractive wine offers apples and crisp citrus, with a light, lively texture. The wine, with its fresh aftertaste, is refreshing and bright.",Brut 204,Lété-Vautrain
"This is certified organic, from one of Oregon's leading vineyards. Somewhat muted in this cool, wet vintage, it's nonetheless a sturdy effort with a potent herbal component. The stiff red fruits conjure up a tart cranberry and cherry mix.",Temperance Hill Vineyard,Lumos
"This wine offers a bouquet of raspberry and smoked meat with a touch of bell pepper. Flavors of black cherry, smoked meat, black pepper and eucalyptus mingle on the palate, with savory notes outweighing fruit. Soft tannins coat the mouth, and ultimately black cherry lingers on the back palate.",French Blend,Or Haganuz
"Deep ruby in the glass, this wine has a bouquet of black currant, flint and bell pepper. A restrained tannic structure supports flavors of blackberry, damson plum, elderberry, violet and espresso with an added touch of bramble. The finish is marked by a note of fresh summer plum.",Edom,Psagot
"Boysenberry and exotic notes of all-spice and cardamom set this Malbec apart from the field. In the mouth, this is typically angular, with sharp acidity and not much cushion. A one-note, linear flavor of rooty plum is neither fruity nor dry, while the finish fails to rise or fall; it just hums along on a singular beam of acid. Drink from 2018_2030.",Apartado Gran,Rutini
"At first, this smells gaseous and rubbery, but airing reveals ripe blackberry aromas, graphite and warmth. In the mouth, this Mencía is jammy and woody; flavors of resiny, salty black fruits are chunky, while barrel influences carry onto the finish, which tastes of hickory, mixed spices and cassis. Drink through 2017.",,Abad Dom Bueno
"Bright aromas of wild berry, blue flower, orange zest and a hint of exotic spice drive the nose. The firm palate offers juicy red cherry, strawberry, mint, oregano and hints of toast and espresso alongside drying tannins.",,Deltetto
"A crisp and dry Vouvray, this still has those telltale honey flavors of delicious Chenin. It is rich and dense while also having great acidity and a tight, taut texture that will soften as the wine ages. It can be drunk now for its freshness, but it will be better from 2017.",,Clos du Gaimont
"Mature berry, dark cooking spice and blue flower are some of the aromas that emerge on this firm red. On the palate, ground pepper, clove and licorice accent a black cherry core while brisk acidity provides the racy framework.",Aves,Comm. G. B. Burlotto
"Leather, pencil shavings and cedar provide an edge to this wine. It's otherwise soft and approachable in a mix of blackberry and black cherry, a seasoning of cinnamon and clove providing a pleasant hit of spice on the finish.",,Crossbarn Paul Hobbs
"Aromas of wild berry, menthol, baking spice and a balsamic note lead the nose. On the tightly wound palate, bracing tannins support raw cherry, anise, tobacco and a hint of coffee alongside firm acidity.",Fossati,Dosio
"Hints of bramble and earth lend savory nuances to sunny yellow peach and melon flavors in this bright vivaciously crisp Kabinett. Off-dry in style, it's balanced by a stream of focused tangerine acidity leading from midpalate through a moderately long finish. Start drinking now.",Bernkasteler alte Badstube am Doctorberg Kabinett,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"Concentrated rose petals, hibiscus and purple fruits meld with lava-rock aromas, all boosted by a touch of cola and smoke. Tart plum skins and Montgomery cherries play into the complex palate, which also shows turned earth and beef-jerky flavors.",,Feliz Noche
"This is 100% varietal, and sports interesting aromas of Provençal herbs. Peppery cranberry fruit is spicy and tart, fading through the midpalate into a lean, but lingering finish.",Estate,Folin Cellars
"Here's a fruity expression of Sangiovese that opens with aromas of blueberry extract, plum, resin and a confectionary note. The simple palate has fleshy blackberry, black cherry and a hint of clove accompanied by dusty, almost gritty tannins. Drink now.",Casalino,Bonacchi
"This wine doesn't seem to have fully ripened, with green, reedy aromas along with notes of cranberry and cherry Jolly Rancher. The full-bodied palate delivers more but seems disconnected with tart, tangy cranberry flavors.",Northridge Vineyard,Cana's Feast
"The second wine of Château de Belcier, this is still young, showing dense and dusty tannins over dark wood aging. It is dry, stalky with black currant acidity and a tight, firm aftertaste.",B de Belcier,Château de Belcier
"With its dark pink color, this is more red than rosé. It has a tannic edge, along with red plum acidity and fruits. It's clean, allowing space for freshness while also being structured.",,Château de Parenchère
"This is an attractive pale-pink wine, faintly coppery in hue. It's also a bit confected, with candied strawberry and watermelon flavors reminiscent of bubble gum, but backed by white chocolate and briny notes. It's plump on the palate, then falls off rapidly on the finish.",Les Cimels,Château d'Or et de Gueules
"Bright with fruit, this is a crisp and fresh wine. Acidity gives a strongly citrus character while allowing the potential of riper fruit and delicious pear juice flavors. It's a wine for apéritif, light and deliciously poised. It is a blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Sémillon and Sauvignon Gris from the Xavier Milhade family, now in its fourth and fifth generations on the estate.",,Château Recougne
"This aromatically appealing wine boasts aromas of melon, pear and spice. It drinks dry and is lightly spritzy, with a sleek feel and a tart finish that shows pleasing freshness. Try it with shellfish.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A unique blend of fermenting orange, aging white flowers, dried apples and a musky sandalwood show on the nose of this wine. The palate is simultaneously rich, sour and creamy, with tangerine and banana flavors.",Tondre Grapefield,Cima Collina
"Full body, ripe grapy fruit flavors and a healthy pinch of spicy oak join with a smooth texture that is just slightly tannic. The feeling is mouthfilling, and the wine is dense enough with cherry and berry flavors to be satisfying. It's a blend of mostly Zinfandel and Syrah.",,Dalliance
"This offers aromas of red berry and blue flowers. The vibrant palate delivers tart red cherry, unripe strawberry and a note of white pepper. Racy acidity and firm tannins make this a good match for pastas topped with ragù or hearty Tuscan soups.",Meme,Fattoria di Petrognano
"Chapoutier's flamingo-pink rosé is a blend of Grenache, Syrah and Cinsault that's features strawberry bubble-gum aromas and flavors, some melon fruit and a slightly chalky finish. Drink up.",Belleruche,M. Chapoutier
"The oak (85% new French) is at the fore on this wine. Aromas and flavors of coffee, butterscotch and woodspice head out in front of dark fruit that doesn't have the heft to match it.",Reserve,Kennedy Shah
"Aromas of mocha, tire rubber, herbs and blue fruit aren't entirely in sync. They lead to a palate with soft, fleshy fruit flavors and a light structure trying to hold it all together.",,Kirkland Signature
"Bright copper in color, this substantial wine offers light strawberry and plum aromas, ripe plum and pear flavors and a creamy texture. Fruit flavors come out and linger on the taste buds with the help of the soft texture and somewhat sweet finish.",Estate,Naggiar
"This is a straightforward easy-drinker with aromas of cantaloupe and kiwi leading to off-dry, lightly styled fruit flavors.",,Songbird
"Aromas of dark-skinned berry, iris and cellar floor lead the nose. On the one-dimensional palate, a note of bitter sage accents dried black cherry. Drink soon.",Riserva,Sorelli
"Briny citrus, feline notes and pithy scents send this Merseguera-led blend toward a pulpy, citrusy palate. Grapefruit and pithy, lightly bitter flavors finish citric, with little change from the wine's primary flavors.",Tarima Blanco,Volver
"This enjoyable, informal red delivers fruity flavors of juicy red cherry and crushed raspberry. Fresh and easy drinking, it would match nicely with pizza and pasta dishes topped with tomato sauce.",Orange,Piccini
"Tight and packed with acidity, this is a very fruity wine dominated by herbaceous Sauvignon flavors that need to soften. It seems one-dimensional, just herbaceous and citrus.",Mission Saint-Vincent,Producta Vignobles
"Cherry and berry aromas are earthy, leathery and a touch stalky, with a note of compost. A round, fairly full mouthfeel and lightly oaked, medicinal flavors of black plum and berry fruits finish short.",Vendimia Seleccionada,Bodegas Muriel
"This wine has some bitter extraction giving it a hard edge. The fruit is lost in the dry, tannic structure. That hard edge will be tough to shift. Try drinking from 2017.",,Château Garreau
"Situated two miles north of the castle of Blaye, this estate has produced an obviously wood-aged, heavily extracted wine. At this stage, this wine is all tannins, smoky acidity and structure. It will always be concentrated with wood, although this will soften.",,Château Haut-Canteloup
"While there are certainly tannins here, this wine is essentially about fruit. Stalky black currants and berries dominate this perfumed wine with its fresh acidity and crisp, clean aftertaste. Drink now.",,Château Haut-Sorillon
"Smoky and obviously wood-aged, this toasty, spicy wine has extracted black-coffee flavors that mask the black currant fruits. That leaves a wine that seems austere and with a bitter aftertaste. Drink from 2017.",,Château la Roque de By
"With its little seasoning of Muscadelle in the blend, this is an attractively perfumed wine. It has bright acidity, plenty of herbaceous flavors and a final pear and crisp apple aftertaste. Drink from the end of 2015.",,Château Maison Noble
"This stalky, firmly tannic wine is still developing. Dominated by Merlot, it has black currant fruits in the background with acidity and crispness. Give this structured wine another few years and drink from 2016.",,Château Andron
"This fragrant, spicy wine is soft and rounded. It is still developing to give a wine that will be warm and full. It misses something of the essential fruitiness.",,Château Au Grand Paris
"This bold, smoky wine has great fruitiness to match the dense, dry structure. It is firm with wood flavors still strongly present. The acidity and the black currant fruits give promise of a well-integrated future.",,Château Bel Air
"Mild peachy aromas are friendly but nothing serious or intense. This varietal Macabeo feels citrusy, while lightly bitter flavors of almond skins, citrus pith and green melon finish with simplicity and a note of nectarine.",Castillo de Alicante Gran Selección,Bocopa
"This full-bodied wine has an earthy, smoky aroma, an abundance of fresh grapy flavors and a soft but supportive texture. The aroma is pretty strong, and then the otherwise-generous fruit characteristics take over.",,Bota Box
"Coming from two of the state's finest vineyards__old Creek and Klipsun__his cool-vintage, 100% varietal wine shows an unusual Washington Cabernet profile of blueberry and plum along with herbs and a kiss of vanilla. It's soft and supple in feel with elegant coffee and blue fruit flavors.",,Northstar
"The white wine appellation of Pacherenc du Vic-Bilh covers the same area as the red Madiran. This dry wine, a blend of Petit Courbu and Petit Manseng is fat, full in the mouth with a smooth texture and rich acidity. It is ready to drink.",Les Jardins de Bouscassé,Alain Brumont
"Aromas of mature black berries, prune toast and tilled earth lead the nose on this savory wine. The succulent, easygoing palate doles out crushed blackberry, Morello cherry, dried plum and clove alongside supple tannins. It closes on a note of bitter almond.",,Amastuola
"Aromas of oak, espresso, steeped plum and cracked pepper lead the nose on this blend of 70% Negroamaro, 20% Montepulciano and 10% Malvasia Nera. The palate offers raspberry jam, clove, allspice and roasted coffee bean alongside assertive but fine-grained tannins. It ends on a note of bitter prune. Drink through 2017.",,Apollonio
"Elegant in subtle fruit and earthy spice, this medium-bodied wine aims for elegance despite a hearty imprint of oak. The winery has amped up its Pinot game with this vintage, reflecting its Sonoma Valley roots in this particular selection.",Geza's Selection,Buena Vista
"This attractive, ready-to-drink wine is both fruity and structured. With vines in Sainte-Gemme, to the north of the city of Sancerre, Berthier has produced a bright and crisp wine, full of grapefruit fruits and a strongly mineral, zesty texture.",Domaine des Clairneaux,Vignobles Berthier
"This intriguing blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (50%), Cabernet Franc (40%) and Merlot offers green herbs, dark plum, savory notes and chocolate. It's full and supple in feel with soft tannins and well-framed acidity.",Fast Eddy,Vortex
"This blend of Malbec (62%) and Cabernet Sauvignon was aged 30 months in French oak (one-quarter new). It shows notes of cherry lip balm, black licorice and woodspice, with a whiff of volatility providing some distraction. It's silky in feel with elegant styling and an extended finish.",El Prat,Wautoma
"Gianni Manucci delivers a traditional take on this Rhône varietal, with tar, charred game and deep purple fruit giving a very dark experience despite relatively low alcohol. The tannins are quite strong and define the sipping experience, along with flavors of blackberry and blueberry extract.",Black Elk,Wild Coyote
"Darker notes of espresso and dried herbs contrast with fragrant blossom and cherry aromas on this plump, full-bodied wine. Supple like silk, it's rich and ripe with cherry and plum flavors blanketed soft, chalky tannin.",,Wölffer
"The Xavier Flouret brand covers the world, but its Sancerre is always among its most consistent. It is balanced, fruity and only lightly herbaceous. Touches of white currants add to the fruitiness of this ready-to-drink wine.",Domaine la Gemière French Blonde,Xavier Flouret
"Fragrant and spicy, this savory wine delivers aromas of ripe black cherry, blackberry and white pepper that carry over to the palate. It's balanced with fresh acidity while soft, polished tannins give a smooth, easy-drinking texture.",Fossamara,Cascina del Pozzo
"Yalumba has been working hard at this style of rosé, and the 2012 is very successful. It's medium in weight, with pretty red-fruit aromas and flavors of watermelon and strawberry. An undercurrent of minerality rides through the palate and finishes slightly chalky. Drink up.",The Y Series Sangiovese,Yalumba
"Los Vascos's first entry into the realm of varietal Carmenère offers black-fruit and plum aromas that are spicy, herbal and a touch weighty and jammy. A full, chewy palate matches the nose, while peppery black-fruit flavors finish herbal, toasty and a touch bitter.",Los Vascos Reserve,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"Ripe, fruity and forward, this opens with attractive, jammy scents of blackberry, cherry and boysenberry preserves, with touches of cocoa nib and licorice root character. The palate is vibrant and juicy, while an earthy spice note adds depth to the medium-length finish. Drink now.",Paul de Villiers,Landskroon
"Straightforward and accessible, this offers aromas of rose, ripe berry and a balsamic note. The savory palate features crushed sour cherry, white pepper, clove and sage alongside buffed, rather evolved tannins.",Marvenga,Malgr_
"Dusty raspberry and plum aromas are spicy, dry and attractive, leading to a fresh palate with kick. Flavors of spiced plum, raspberry and red cherry are a touch briny, while the finish has length and a pleasing texture.",Reserva Estate Bottled,Chilcas
"A sturdy structure of acid and tannins, this blends 70% Sangiovese and 30% Cabernet Sauvignon. Offering solid cherry and raspberry flavors, it is not too full bodied, but carries enough richness and depth to last on the finish. It makes for a nice dinner wine with all kinds of Italian food.",Uber Tuscan,Brutocao
"Black cherry and plum aromas are covered in creamy oak that disguises the wine's gritty herbal and eucalyptus elements. A choppy palate with tomatoey acidity is a bit rough, while flavors of pepper and spice are as prominent as plum and wild berry. A raw, oaky finish is big but a touch hot in feel.",Tributo Single Vineyard,Caliterra
"Fresh, floral aromas lead the way on this wine, backed by flavors of berries and spice. The moderate alcohol level and balance of sweetness and acidity make this easy to drink.",Emeri Pink Moscato,De Bortoli
"Sweet oak and cocoa nib tones add depth to the red currant, cherry, strawberry and rhubarb fruit character of this blend. The palate boasts a crushed velvet texture, with firm yet fine tannins and rich black-fruit flavors of cherry, fig and plum. Hints of black pepper and chocolate fudge lend a decadent feel to the finish.",Mountain Red,Thelema
"This straightforward Barolo opens with aromas of rose, leather and menthol. The palate doles out sour cherry, crushed raspberry, cinnamon, clove and grilled sage alongside velvety tannins. There's not much complexity but it's savory and already enjoyable. Drink through 2019.",La Fenice,Tenimenti Famiglia Cavallero
"Minty around the edges, this is a sizable wine in terms of body and power. Structured and silky on the palate, it's closer to black fruit in profile than red.",Sangiacomo Vineyard,Acacia
"A slick of wax and lanolin lends a mineral tone to bright apple cider and honey notes in this sprightly semisweet Riesling. Spine-tingling with acidity, it's an elegant, classically styled wine with a pristine, fruit-focused finish.",Martini Reinhardt Selection,Anthony Road
"For the price, this Merlot packs a delicious punch, offering soft, persistent layers of chocolate, tar and leather, the tannins present yet well-managed. Red fruit and smoke intermingle on the palate, playing well together.",Sands Point,Avelina
"From the vineyards of the grand castle of Sancerre, this has rich red and black cherry fruits, a line of the purest acidity and just the right amount of tannic structure to allow it to age a little longer. It has weight and final ripeness.",,Château de Sancerre
"From a 15-acre property to the east end of Bergerac, this is a ripe, rounded and smooth wine. It has attractive signs of its wood aging, giving a polished feel to the ripe tannins and red berry fruits. It is ready to drink, but will age until 2020.",,Château K
"Fuzzy apricot skin and peach form the backbone of this white that's stainless-steel and neutral-oak fermented, giving just a suggestion of barrel age. Tingly in acidity it's a balanced wine with oomph.",,Jericho Canyon Vineyard
"Subtle pepper, pear and lemon hints segue from nose to palate, where spicy savoriness begins to dominate. Tight, refreshing and light-bodied with pleasing focus.",Alte Reben,Dürnberg
"Aromas of underbrush, tobacco leaf, leather, wild berry and a balsamic note take the lead. The palate offers juicy Morello cherry, black raspberry, licorice and sage alongside rather astringent tannins.",Liste,Borgogno
"Parcels of vines on the Phélan-Ségur estate are used for this second label. The wine, with its firm tannins, is developing well. It has structure and a dense texture along with ripe blackberry fruits and acidity. As it develops, it will be generous and ripe. Drink from 2018.",La Croix Bonis,Château Phélan-Ségur
"This brooding wine provides aromas of flowers, moist soil, raspberry and herbs. It's velvety in feel with abundant cherry and chocolate flavors that linger on the finish.",,Covington
"Intense mint, menthol, ripe berry and dark spice aromas lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry mature raspberry, mint, thyme and clove alongside bracing tannins. Give this a few more years to reach its full potential. Drink after 2018.",Bussia,Deltetto
"Granite and schist soil planted with old vines has produced this impressive wine. It is softer than it probably was when younger, although it has not lost one bit of its fresh crisp fruitiness and perfumes. The wine is concentrated, rich and is ready to drink.",Signature du Haut Bourg,Domaine du Haut Bourg
"This wine is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Malbec, Syrah and Petit Verdot. Intricate aromas of vanilla, cedar, powdered chocolate, pipe tobacco and black cherry lead to focused, layered fruit and barrel flavors that show persistence.",Trutina,Dunham
"Aromas of blackberry and raspberry liqueur meld with high-toned herbs and barrel spices on this blend of Artz, Boushey and Red Willow vineyards. The flavors are rich and pack a hefty punch, with grainy tannins backing it all up.",,Fall Line
"Baking spice, vanilla and abundant coffee aromas lead to rich but well-balanced red and black fruit flavors. It brings plenty of appeal along with lots of hang time on the finish.",Riverbend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"This wine charms with its aromas of freshly brewed coffee, high cacao chocolate, spice and blue and black fruit. It's restrained in style but with plenty of depth and length to the silky fruit and barrel flavors.",Estate Grown Block 10,French Creek
"All Cabernet Sauvignon coming from Hedges Estate and Magdelena vineyards, this is aromatically locked up on first pour, with notes of herbs, flowers, bittersweet chocolate and earth. The dark fruit flavors are tightly wound, needing hours of decanting or days open to show themselves but plenty of charms are revealed.",La Haute Cuvée,Hedges Family Estate
"A blend of Grenache from Angiolina Farm and Upland vineyards along with 22% StoneTree Mourvèdre, this wine offers aromas of violets, raspberry, plum and assorted herbs. The plum and dark raspberry flavors are pure, ripe and full while retaining a pleasing sense of balance. The complexity only increases with some additional time open.",Majestic,Kerloo
"There's a vibrant purity to this wine with its aromas and flavors of boysenberry, green olive, wet gravel and smoked meat, with the Viognier blended in (8%) only adding to its perfume. It coats the palate with a plush but still light and lively texture backed by a zing of tart acidity.",Upland Vineyard,Kerloo
"No, that vintage is not a typo. This winery holds back its wines for an extended time prior to release. It's in full bloom with aromas of coffee, dried cherry, flowers, leather and black tea. The black fruit flavors are still fresh and lively, showing concentration and detail. Drink now.",,Lawrelin
"This blend features Syrah, Grenache, Mourvèdre and Viognier. The oak (30 months in 20% new French) is primary right now, with aromas of vanilla bean and coffee along with dark berry and thistle. It's supple in feel with a long finish. Additional time in the bottle should serve it well.",QED Convergence,Rasa
"Produced from old vines in Verdigny, this is rich while still totally crisp. Ripe yellow and white fruits, apricots and apples are cut with acidity and a taut, mineral character. While this wine is ready to drink, it will improve for some time, and will be better in 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Roger et Didier Raimbault
"This 100% varietal wine comes from Conner Lee, Sagemoor and Klipsun vineyards. Already six years old, it's near full-bloom with aromas of dates, blackberry pie, dried herbs and spice. The black fruit flavors are full bodied and dense. Drink up.",,Syzygy
"Nano-produced, this wine offers aromas of herbs, crushed violets and coffee. Cherry flavors coat the palate with a full feel while displaying expertly integrated tannins. The finish lingers.",,Thurston Wolfe
"A rare single-vineyard bottling from this tiny site, this wine offers aromas of black licorice, herbs, cassis, dates and black cherry. The palate brings tart, vibrant acidity along with chewy tannins.",Tokar Vineyard,Tulpen
"Crisp green apple flavors are immediately apparent__actic inflections and floral notes appear too, alongside wood sorrel and moist brioche. The palate has electric English acidity and a very creamy, fine mousse that gives shapely curves to its slenderness.",Cuvée Brut,Wiston Estate Winery
"This Demeter-certified biodynamic wine is made in an immediately enjoyable, drink-now style. Brandied black cherries and sun-baked earth mark the nose, while the palate is full, creamy and plush. It's warm, ripe and welcoming from start to finish.",Boisrenard,Domaine de Beaurenard
"Give this wine some time in the glass after pouring (or decant in advance of serving), as it has an earthy edge to its aromas that only dissipates with airing. Once that clears, black cherry and tapenade notes take hold and persist through the warm, open-knit finish.",Cuvée Alex,Vignobles Mayard
"Dusty, earthy plum and cherry aromas are a bit scratchy but enjoyable and powerful. A smooth, plummy palate entertains flavors of toasty black fruits and peppery spice, while the finish is meaty and full, with easy tannins. Drink through 2017.",,Montgó
"Jammy aromas and concentrated grape and blackberry flavors pack a lot of fruitiness into this full-bodied and velvet-textured wine. The ripe and almost sweet berry and plum notes gush forth with gusto while the firm, grippy texture keeps the mouthfeel nicely dry and helps clear the palate for the next bite or sip.",Bechthold Vineyard,Onesta
"This is bold in flavor, full in body and quite firm in texture. Aromas are densely fruity, like blackberry and cranberry, while flavors are ripe and deep. A strong mixture of tannin and grape acidity holds everything in rather tightly, especially on the finish. Approachable now, it will mature nicely through at least 2020.",Obsidian Ridge Vineyard Reserve,City Winery Chicago
"Stunning aromas of rose, violet, licorice, Asian spices and mature dark-skinned fruit waft out of the glass. The juicy, savory palate offers wild cherry, crushed raspberry, orange zest, anise, clove and chopped herbs alongside bright acidity and soft, supple tannins. A fantastic Barbera.",Ciabot del Fì,Brovia
"This wine has immediate appeal with its aromas of coffee, mocha, vanilla and blueberry. The blue and black fruit flavors are concentrated, with a sumptuous feel.",Reserve Coyote Canyon Vineyards,Columbia Crest
"This structured wine opens with aromas of toasted oak, vanilla, ripe dark berry, thyme and a balsamic note. The vibrant, smooth palate offers dried cherry, mocha, espresso and baking spice alongside elegant, fine-grained tannins and still bright acidity. Drink 2016_2026.",Riserva di Famiglia,Coppo
"This is a tight, textured and fruity wine. With a great mineral texture and steely structure, it is a wine for some aging. Lemon and pink grapefruit flavors sheer through the texture, still waiting to balance. From 2017 it will be a fine wine.",,Domaine Jean-Paul Balland
"This wine pops with aromas of blue and black fruit, vanilla, orange peel and cocoa. The palate is full of restrained, supple-feeling cranberry and cherry flavors that draw out on the finish.",Lewis Estate Vineyard,Dunham
"Rooty aromas of baking spices and black fruits are restrained and delicate on the nose. This is full, round and mildly tannic, with baked plum, berry, spice and peppery flavors. Toast, nutmeg and bright acidity carry the finish on this blend of 71% Carmenère, with additions of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. Drink through 2017.",Gold,Estampa
"Cabernet Franc (36%) and Merlot (35%) make up the majority of this blend, with the rest Cabernet Sauvignon. It's locked-up at present with high-toned aromas of dried herbs and flowers along with cranberry and cherry. The dense, dark cherry flavors and firm, chalky tannins are tightly coiled, needing significant time to unwind. It will be best after 2019.",Red Willow Vineyard,Fall Line
"This Syrah-based blend is marked by bone-dry, unsweetened baker's chocolate and blackberry flavors. It's a simple, tannic wine to drink with simple fare, such as burgers.",,Chocolate Box
"Hard tannins, cutting acidity and a lack of richness conspire to make this bone dry Merlot austere. It has thinned-down flavors of cherries and red currants.",,Russian Ridge
"The fruit on this Syrah is so ripe that the blackberries venture into raisins and prunes. With the glycerine from high alcohol, the wine tastes like a minor Port.",Lafond Vineyard,Lafond
Watery pineapple and peach flavors have a heavy jacket of oak-like smokiness. Acidity provides a clean mouthfeel.,,Masterpiece
"This Zin tastes of smoke, oak and grilled meats, but has an odd acidity to it. It would be good paired with something off the barbecue.",Peltier Station,Peltier
"With hard, cutting tannins and watery fruit, this Cab is notable for astringency and acidity. There's very little going on, except it is dry.",,Russian Ridge
"There is not much in the way of fruit in this wine, which veers into questionable flavors of burnt mushrooms.",,Zagan's Fire
"High alcohol marks this Bordeaux-style blend, giving it heat that accentuates the tannins. The result is tough and dry.",Bella's Blend,Due Cani
"It's herbal, grassy and thin. There's a good food pairing out there somewhere, but don't look for much varietal character.",Commuter Cuvée,Grochau
"An earthy, ripe and fruity wine, it has a solid base of tannins and a rough-edged structure. The black fruits are submerged in the more rustic nature of the wine's aftertaste.",Bojador,Herdade do Rocim
"Earthy, foresty, green aromas precede a round palate with stemmy flavors matched by a burnt, lightly bitter aftertaste.",,Alta Delta
"With sugary blackberry and prune flavors, this tannic Zinfandel is pretty simple. It will pair well with burgers, tacos and barbecue.",,Masterpiece
"It's tannic, dry and severe. The palate struggles to find fruity richness, and while there are glimpses of blackberries and black currants, they're fleeting. There's also an ashtray aroma and taste that are really detracting.",Flood Family Vineyards,Rancho Sisquoc
"Brownish in color and texturally soft, this Zin starts with a thread of plum that slowly devolves to prune and perhaps spent too long in the bottle.",Zealous Girls Two Girl Zin,Cedar Mountain
"Green, vegetal flavors mar this wine. While it's nicely dry and crisp in acidity, and offers modest green apple and mango flavors, the unripeness is hard to like.",Limited Production,Caraccioli
"Full-bodied in apple and pineapple aromas at first, this Chardonnay with 5% Viognier blended in veers into marshmallow sweetness with a fatty finish.",Hybrid,Peltier
"A wine that lacks balance. Its strawberry fruits are shot through with shocking acidity and then sweetened, none of the elements hanging together. Drink seriously chilled.",,Casal da Coelheira
"This wine opens with a stemmy aromas and remains basic in the glass, with a sweet ending.",,Castle Rock
"While it's dry and acidic, it has a coarseness that's unforgiving.",,Little Rascal's
"This already tastes old and oxidized, almost like a fino sherry. It's not exactly undrinkable, but is not a good value.",,Little Rascal's
"An uninteresting wine despite good dryness and acidity. The blackberry and cherry flavors are thin, and have vegetal notes. The blend is Grenache Noir, Syrah and Zinfandel.",,Big House
"Vegetal white fruits and briny, pickled notes drive the nose. Flavors of pickled citrus convey little body or character.",Reserva,Santa Rita
"Tasted in early February, this Chardonnay had some secondary fermentation in the bottle, giving it a bubbly feeling. This major flaw may disappear in time.",Kruse Vineyards,Jack Creek
"Nearly undrinkable for its arch-acidity that's almost still fermenting. The flavors are thin, with barely ripe blackberries and oak-like smokiness.",,Masterpiece
"This low production, 100% Cab offers the most perfectly ripe black currant fruit, with complicating hints of pencil lead, violets, dark chocolate shavings and, of course, lots of toasty oak. The fact that it's now more than five years old has helped to mellow it, but the tannins are still quite hard. The beautiful estate vineyard sits high in the Vaca Mountains, which helps to account for the wine's intensity and concentration. This is truly a world-class Cabernet that will age through at least 2032.",Estate Grown Cave Fermented,Jarvis
"Already one of Italy's most iconic bottlings, this gorgeous 2010 is already a classic. Its complex and intense bouquet unfolds with ripe blackberries, violets, leather, thyme and balsamic herbs. The palate shows structure, poise and complexity, delivering rich black currants, black cherry, licorice, mint and menthol notes alongside assertive but polished tannins and vibrant energy. This wine will age and develop for decades. Drink 2018_2040.",Solaia,Marchesi Antinori
"The 2010 Ornellaia celebrates the wine's 25th anniversary, and it could not have been a more spectacular vintage. It opens with aromas of crushed blue flowers, black berries, pipe tobacco and thyme that give way to an elegant, structured and polished palate. It delivers intense blackberry flavors layered with white pepper, Mediterranean herbs, mineral and mocha brightened by fresh acidity alongside smooth, velvety tannins. This will age and develop for decades. Drink 2016_2040.",,Ornellaia
"The phenomenal 2010 vintage shows why this wine is considered Italy's top purebred Merlot. Revealing structure, finesse and mesmerizing depth, it delivers blackberries, currants, cedar, exotic spices and mocha alongside firm, polished tannins and fresh acidity. It's well balanced with fantastic length and while it's delicious now, hold for more complexity. Drink 2015_2030.",,Masseto
"This extraordinary wine put Cabernet Franc on the map in Bolgheri. The 2010 reveals an exquisite bouquet of black currants, crushed blue flower, leather and baking spices. The smooth palate delivers mouthwatering blackberries, black cherry, white pepper, thyme and licorice alongside an age-worthy structure boasting firm but elegant tannins and fresh acidity. It's already gorgeous with intriguing depth but it will age and develop beautifully. Drink 2015_2040.",Paleo Rosso,Le Macchiole
"This supremely elegant and age-worthy Sassicaia opens with an intense bouquet of black cherry, Mediterranean herbs, blue flower, cedar and leather aromas. Powerful but graceful, the palate delivers a vibrant core of black cherry accented with white pepper, mineral and balsamic notes alongside youthful but polished tannins and vibrant acidity. It's not as exuberant as some of its counterparts, but it may outlive all the other Bolgheri 2010s. Drink 2018_2040.",Sassicaia,Tenuta San Guido
"This is a dark, rich, modern Cabernet. The nose oozes sweet aromas of coconut and vanilla along with creamy oak and blackberry. The palate is full and chunky in feel, with dark-fruit flavors accented by molasses and pepper. A chewy finish shows grip and lasting acidity.",Alta Collection,Tapiz
"Exotic spice notes and zesty tangerine aromas are curious on this penetrating Riesling. It's sweet, with juicy peach and yellow-cherry flavors, but reverberates on the palate, with citrusy acidity and a hint of ginger on the finish.",Kabinett from Red Slate,Schmitges
"Dried orange peel and pollen notes add spice to peach preserves and marmalade on this rich, honeyed auslese. Creamy and sweet on the palate, it's brightened by soft tangerine acidity and a hint of savory green herb on the finish.",Rüdesheimer Berg Rottland Auslese,Johannishof
"This Mazuelo (Carignan) is strongly perfumed, with whiffs of juniper, funk and blueberry along the way. A full, lively, deep palate is home to black-fruit, chocolate and vanilla flavors, while the finish surfs on the edge of syrupy and fully ripe, ultimately falling on the right side of the fence.",Colección Vivanco Parcelas de,Dinastía Vivanco
"Made in a supple, immediately approachable style, this is a nicely supple, slightly creamy, almost gulpable red. Raspberry and cherry fruit is buttressed by ample spice, then ends on a lingering note of star anise. Drink now_2018.",,Turkey Flat
"White floral and yellow peach aromas waft delicately from this delicate off-dry kabinett. It's lusciously fruity on the palate, with ultraripe melon and peach flavors, but kept in check by bright lemony acidity and a swathe of fresh green herbs that linger on the finish. A great value for a remarkably well-made wine.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Markus Molitor
"There's a hint of fresh ramp that adds a curious dimension of umami to this otherwise bright, floral auslese. The palate is sweet and juicy, with flavors of apricot and peach and a striking tangerine acidity that penetrates through the finish.",Abstberg Auslese Nr. 84,Maximin Grünhäuser
"This is a lively, juicy wine. It shows the fruitiness of the vintage balanced with a sense of structure. There is a freshness to this wine that gives it great lift and makes it likely to be drinkable soon. Drink from 2016.",,Château Grand-Puy Ducasse
"Complex and rich, this is an impressive, concentrated wine. It has great acidity that balances flavors of ripe white fruits and apple skins, and lends a tight, taut texture. The wine should be aged for at least six months before drinking.",,Chateau Haut Rian
"This rounded, full wine is densely packed with fruit, but also tannins that add balance. Blackberry flavors come through the dry structure to give both richness and freshness. The aftertaste is ripe, juicy and delicious. Drink now, but best from 2015.",,Château le Doyenne
"This bottling from Arrowood is dependably rich, showing Viognier's exotic tropical fruit, peach, apricot, honeysuckle, vanilla cream and cinnamon flavors. The 2011 is dry and balanced, with crisp acidity. Drink it now.",Saralee's Vineyard,Arrowood
"While it is certainly rich, this wine has a drying core of botrytis that dominates at the moment. There's remarkable weight and concentration on the palate, but brisk lemon flavors add vibrancy and cut. It is obviously a wine to age, so don't drink before 2018.",,Château de Malle
"This is a serious wine structured with firm tannins. The texture is solid and somewhat austere, but very concentrated. Associated with Château Pichon Longueville Comtesse de Lalande in Pauillac, de Pez is now showing the solid and long-aging character of Saint-Estèphe. Drink from 2018.",,Château de Pez
"Intense minerality penetrates through the nose and palate of this dry, remarkably bold Riesling, highlighting notes of fresh pineapple and white grapefruit. The mouthfeel is creamy and viscous, but bitter lemon pith and herb notes lend balance and complexity. Drink now through 2016.",Saulheimer Probstey Trocken,Thörle
"This Riesling has just the right amount of minerality balanced against apple and peach flavors, and an underlying core of lime. Fermented in stainless steel, it is bright and joyful to drink, boasting a long finish. Pour alongside all the classic pairings from Asian takeout to a proper curry.",,V. Sattui
"Tart berry flavors, tangy acids, and subtle barrel flavors of caramel and clove bring complexity and detail to this well-balanced, ageworthy wine.",Winderlea Vineyard,Winderlea
"This is a ripe, smooth wine that has fine acidity and some intense peppery flavors. From the Wachtberg vineyard, it shows great mineral character as well as a dense texture that brings out rich fruits. Age this for another year.",Kremser Wachtberg Reserve,Winzer Krems
"This is an estate wine from Marimar's Green Valley vineyard. It's very good, with mouthwatering acidity and rich, complex tropical fruit, green apple and lime flavors. Oak brings rich notes of caramel and honey. The alcohol is nice and low.",La Masía Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"An exquisite Chardonnay, among the winery's best since 2007. It offers rich, complex flavors of tart green apples, limes and kiwis, with honeyed oak notes. It's all balanced with crisp acidity and a steely minerality.",,Martin Ray
"A specific block called Powell Hill is the source for this limited-availability bottling with textured, nuanced flavors that validate the selection. For lovers of subtle, cool-vintage Oregon Pinot, this is near perfect, showing flavors of tart pomegranate, clean earth, sandalwood and citrus. The tannins need a bit of softening up at this point, but this should easily age for a decade or longer.",Meyer Vineyard Powell Hill,Lemelson
"Here's a bold expression of Cabernet Franc that leads with intense aromas of blackberry, tobacco and balsamic herbs. The richly textured palate delivers a tight core of black cherry, spice and graphite, with bracing but ripe tannins that need a few more years to tame.",Dedicato a Walter,Poggio al Tesoro
"With a wealth of cherry, cassis, mocha and sandalwood flavors, this is one of the best Dry Creek Cabernets in recent memory. The rich flavors are wrapped into firm, dry tannins that give the mouthfeel a fine grippiness. There's no reason to age this beauty, but it will hold for a good six years.",,Draxton
"This wine is still young with a sharp edge that needs to soften out. An apple- and quince-flavored wine, it has fine potential for aging, to round out the corners and intensify in fruitiness. Drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Bürsting,Ebner-Ebenauer
"The new Leithaberg appellation on the west bank of the Neusiedlersee produces complex and firmly tannic reds. This is a fine example that's very spicy, juicy with blackberry, and shows some wood aging. The wine needs time, so drink from 2016.",,Esterházy
"This wine delivers everything you want in a California Chardonnay. While it's dry, it's incredibly rich in tropical fruit, green apple and pear flavors, with loads of honey and buttered toast from oak barrels. The acidity is just fine.",Keefer Ranch,Failla
"This blend of Blaufränkisch, Syrah and Merlot is Höpler's signature wine. It makes for a fascinating combination of ripe black-plum flavors highlighted by juicy acidity and wood notes. The wine will age well, so drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Cuvée K7,Höpler
"Mint notes accent blueberry and plum fruit, while hints of tar and black olive add a savory edge. This medium- to full-bodied Shiraz is creamy on the midpalate, but firms up enough on the finish to pair well with burgers or steaks. Drink now_2020.",Regional Vineyard Series,Gotham
"Savory apple and lemon scents open this delicately composed, but intensely minerally spätlese. The palate is ripe, with juicy yellow peach and orange flavors, anchored by earthy tones of crushed rock and slate that linger on the finish.",Erbacher Steinmorgen Spätlese,Baron Knyphausen
"Zesty on the nose, with whiffs of orange rind, lemon and pineapple, this bright, zippy beerenauslese counters laser-focused acidity with creamy honey and marmalade flavors. Pleasantly astringent, it finishes on a bracing pink-grapefruit note. It's delicious now, but its honeyed citrus palate should gain complexity and dimension over the next 5_10 years.",Hattenheimer Wisselbrunnen Beernauslese Gold Cap,Baron Knyphausen
"This blend is a solid introduction to the Kilikanoon range. Subtle toast and vanilla shadings accent dark chocolate and plum notes, and the wine is full bodied and sturdy without being tough. finally ending in a soft flurry of dusty tannins. Drink now_2018.",Killerman's Run,Kilikanoon
"A blend of Insolia and Chardonnay, this wine opens with subdued aromas of yellow spring flowers and pear. The round, straightforward palate offers golden apple, white peach and lemon zest alongside fresh acidity.",Calanica,Duca di Salaparuta
"After the shocking purple color catches your eye, minerally aromas of boysenberry, cherry and vitamin dust scream toward a vibrant, bouncy, high-acid palate. Flavors of bright berry fruits are shear and tart, with minimal complexity or richness. Overall this is intense, zesty and tart.",Vinyes Velles,Ferrer Bobet
"Grown in the upland vineyard of Pyrgos, this Assyrtiko offers citrus and spice aromas and a full-bodied flavor profile. Citrus, vanilla and minerals dominate the palate. Air with more robust vegetable or fish dishes.",Assyrtiko by Gaia Wild Ferment,Gaia Wines
"This 100% Cabernet conveys aromas of raw lumber. Nonetheless, the fruit is ripe and round, with full flavors of dark berry and cassis. Tannins are a bit rough and rustic, but pair this with a smoky, grilled beef and you'll be quite pleased.",Rattlesnake Road Vineyard,Jacob Williams
"Though labeled Syrah, this includes 25% Cabernet Sauvignon in the blend. The addition somewhat mutes the Syrah character, though it may bump up the concentration of cassis fruit flavor. Espresso-laden tannins put a frame around the finish.",,Kaella
"Intensely aromatic with notes of flowers and ripe tropical fruits, this is a lush, textured Gewurztraminer with massive power and brawn. Just off dry in style, it's surprisingly elegant for such a big-bodied wine, but with ample acidity. Nuances of tea leaves and potpourri linger on the finish.",,Lakewood
"Smooth and fruity, it's full of citrus and ripe pear fruit. Structured and quite tangy, it has potential to improve through late 2014.",Clos de la Crochette,Les Héritiers du Comte Lafon
"There are candied tangerine notes on the tight nose from this twist-off bottling from William Foley's first winery, Lincourt, named after his two daughters. On the palate, the slight minerality washes around lime freshness and a just-ripe green pear tang, an introductory example of leaner, acid-minded Chardonnay. Pair with shellfish appetizers or a halibut main course.",Steel,Lincourt
The wine is full of rich red fruits layered with light tannins. It has weight without power but is going to be delicious and open over the medium-term. Drink from 2015.,,Louis Latour
"Mango and peach aromas offer immediate attraction. With ripe fruits, light minerality and crisp acidity, it's almost ready to enjoy. Drink from the end of 2014.",Clos de la Maison,Manoir du Capucin
"Initial aromas are floral, candied and medicinal, but with time the nose rounds into form. The palate has a grabby, simple feel to it, while flavors of red plum and cherry have a lactic aftertaste. This is a generic Priorat, but it seems to get better the longer it sits in the glass. Drink now, but give it as much airing as possible.",,Nita
"Here's a young Aglianico that opens with aromas of blue flower, earth, plum and spice. The simple but savory palate delivers ripe blackberry, raspberry and black licorice alongside firm tannins.",Terra di Vulcano,Bisceglia
"This robust rosato, made from the native grape Nerello Mascalese on the slopes of Mount Etna, is loaded with dark cherry and crushed strawberry sensations. The bright, juicy palate is accented by notes of cinnamon and vanilla. Pair this with appetizers, quiche or summer salads.",Barbazzale Rosato,Cottanera
"Here's a pretty blend of 50% Inzolia and 50% Viognier that has aromas of honeysuckle, hay and aromatic herbs. The palate offers yellow peach and golden apple accented by hints of sage and thyme.",Barbazzale Bianco,Cottanera
"While the nose on this Cabernet Franc is fresh and bright with primary red-cherry and plum aromas, there's an earthy rusticity that extends through the palate. Zippy cranberry flavors are touched with shades of autumn leaves and savory herbs. The finish is marked by a crush of mouth-dampening tannins. Enjoy now with a decant.",,Damiani
"Scratchy, edgy aromas of boysenberry and blackberry are a touch minty and herbal. This feels big, loud and choppy, with plenty of kick and hard tannins. Flavors of ripe dark fruits are toasty and earthy, while the finish is blocky, bullish and a touch hot, with power in reserve.",Urban Ribera,O. Fournier
"Minty and bright, this is a well-distributed Pinot that's a fair value, soft and easy to drink. Amidst mellowed oak, expect dark cherry and buoyed acidity with a finish of darker, earthy tones.",,Sebastiani
"Tart and nervy, this cool-climate Cabernet Sauvignon bristles with fresh cranberry and sour-cherry flavors. Concentrated with red fruit yet touched with complexities of granite and steel, it's an elegant choice for lighter chicken or duck dishes.",Reserve,Sheldrake Point
"Intensely ripe aromas of blackberries and cherries are touched with granite and bramble wood on this plush, somewhat sultry Merlot. The palate balances ripeness with crisp sour-cherry acidity and swathes of fresh, green herbs. Medium-bodied in style, it wraps up tightly with a coating of chalky, soft tannins.",,Standing Stone
"This informal but pretty Pinot Nero opens with fragrances of red berry and spice. The bright palate offers fresh acidity and flavors of crushed cherry, strawberry and cinnamon spice.",,Stemmari
"Having seen no new French oak, it brings fruit notes of sour cherry and sage. The palate is light, tart and lively, with firm tannins providing the frame.",Elderding Six Prong Vineyard,Stottle
"This single-vineyard Cabernet, from a relatively cool site in an historically cool vintage, emphasizes the herbal side of the grape. Rhubarb and tart berry fruit flavors carry light hints of cedar and chocolate as well.",Elephant Mountain,Stottle
"Though just under four years old, this Syrah already seems fully developed with notes of fruit leather, dried cranberries and golden raisins backed by tart acidity. Drink now.",,Telaya
"This straightforward Nero d'Avola opens with aromas that recall violet, ripe black plum and tilled soil. The juicy palate offers ripe blackberry and Morello cherry, lightly accented by hints of white pepper. This isn't an ager so enjoy soon.",Campo Reale,Tenuta Rapital_
"This darker-salmon-colored rosé combines Sangiovese and Pinot Noir in equal proportion. It delivers faint aromatics of nectarine and rustic cherry, the color reflecting the burly properties of Napa Valley Sangiovese. Dry, with racy acidity, it has grip on the finish.",,Terra Valentine
"The Stillwater Creek vineyard fruit spent time in once-used French oak. From a cool site in a cool vintage, the flavors are subdued, with wild purple berry, herb, pepper and earth.",,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"This young Aglianico opens with aromas of ripe black and red berries, oak, espresso, leather and vanilla. The concentrated palate offers red cherry, raspberry and licorice alongside drying wood tannins.",Core,Montevetrano
"Lightly pickled, briny aromas are distant. In the mouth, this feels pinched and high in citric acid, but also refined. Flavors of grapefruit and passion fruit are tart, while lime and tangerine flavors are prominent on a briny, tart finish.",Cupatge d'Honor Brut,Pere Ventura
"This Pallagrello Nero-based wine opens with funky aromas of game, earth and overripe black fruit. The tight palate offers drying tannins and mature flavors of blackberry and prune layered with sweet oak, vanilla, mint and sweet and sour sauce.",Sabbie di Sopra il Bosco,Nanni Copè
"Red-fruit aromas come with a touch of stalky/stemmy rusticity. Tomato-like acidity blends into the wine's medium-bodied structure, while notes of herbal spice vie with modest berry fruit flavors. A long, earthy finish contains hints of carob and smoked meat.",Crianza,Carlos Serres
"Here's a simple and clean white wine with straightforward appeal and a frank, upfront nature. Cut grass, lemon and honeydew melon describe the bouquet.",,Bonotto delle Tezze
"With fermentation aromas in full view, this sparkling ruby red wine offers aromas and of raspberry, strawberry and sweet almond milk. Bright berry notes follow through to the palate.",Casa Rossa,Bosio
"Despite its alcohol and potential richness, this has as much green, herbal character as fruitiness. It's structured and juicy, and shows considerable acidity.",Má Partilha,Bacalhôa Wines of Portugal
"Wines at 15.5% alcohol suggest too much of everything. This wine is no exception, with its heavily extracted character, bitter chocolate and wood perfumes. It should soften in 2_3 years, but will always be overweight.",São Miguel,Herdade de São Miguel
"Half Sangiovese and one-quarter each Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot all coming from the cool 2011 vintage, this is lightly flavored with notes of dried cranberry and sour cherry, backed by firm tannins.",Super Tesscan,Hood Crest
"This Rosato sparkling blend is comprised of 70% Chardonnay and 30% Merlot to offer a pale pink color and creamy, white foam. The bouquet presents a pungent note followed by crisp citrus and cranberry.",Rosé Brut,Le Colture
"Very clean, compact and fresh, here is a Soave to pair with take-away Chinese food. The wine is acidic and light with subtle aromas of peach, citrus and white flower.",I Prandi,Marcato
"Bright red fruit, raspberry and blueberry open the bouquet of this pleasantly fragrant Lambrusco. There's a touch of sticky sweetness in the mouth followed by creamy foam.",Opera 02 Amabile,C_ Montanari
"This is one of those special Lambruscos that you know will pair with regional foods such as tortellini with melted butter and cheese. The wine's bright fruit tones, crisp acidity and delicate effervescence will keep the palate clean. There's a touch of sweetness on the thin finish.",Operapura,C_ Montanari
"Easy and fresh, you could pair this Italian white with freshwater fish or grilled shrimp. It delivers one-dimensional tones of citrus, peach and melon.",,Canti
"Price aside, this is a ponderous wine with rooty aromas of Dr. Pepper mixed with burnt toast, coffee and baked berry fruits. It's very rich and syrupy in the mouth, while caramel, chocolate and baked berry flavors bring this overripe wine to rest.",Reserva,Ernesto Camou y Camou
"Temecula Valley-based Brookside Winery makes this nonvintage blend, a combination of Cabernet Sauvignon, Zinfandel and Petite Sirah. Moderately light in alcohol, it nonetheless imparts deep, dark fruit and a leathery juiciness, with Zin taking over on the finish.",Road to Morocco,Generation 7
"A solid Chardonnay, made in the popular style. It delivers the expected flavors of tropical fruits and peaches, buttered toast, cream and smoky oak, in a one-dimensional way.",,Greg Norman Estates
"This has intense, precise aromas of brown sugar, toasted almonds, dark caramel and vanilla. On the palate, a blackberry flavor reigns, but the alcohol sears the midpalate, which gives the palate a fiery feel.",Madeira,Haak
"Another clean, brisk and slightly sweet Chardonnay from Cupcake, at a pretty good price. Its shows orange, peach, vanilla, buttered toast and white sugar flavors.",,Cupcake
"Here's an easy and fresh white wine to drink with bruschetta or informal finger foods. The wine is crisp and light with endnotes of white peach, citrus and pear.",Corte Giacobbe,Dal Cero Tenuta di Corte Giacobbe
"A solid Chardonnay, showing good varietal character at a fair price. It's a little lightweight, but the cream, peach and citrus flavors are just fine.",Willow Springs,CK Mondavi
"There's a fine line between ripe and overripe, and this awkwardly toes that line with syrupy aromas and a sticky mouthfeel. Along the path are flavors of maple, fudge and stewed blackberry. A jammy, soupy, candied finish is apropos for a heavy, superripe wine such as this.",Reserva,Casarena
"This is a sweet and thin dessert wine with aromas of peach, pear and honey that are muddled at times. The price is pretty good, however, for those who want to try a late harvest Fiano Minutolo.",Cré Vendemmia Tardiva,Vetrère
A low-priced white with a smoky quality and rounded textures of pear and coconut. Twist the cap off on this one for patio and pool parties or to enjoy with a platter of raw oysters.,,Shenandoah
"A rich, oaky style of Chardonnay that spent five months sur lie in neutral French oak. The wine has a soft, mildly sour taste and lurking wet stone notes.",Pamela's Vineyard,There Wines
"A simple sparkler (made according to the Metodo Charmat) with organically-farmed fruit, this Chardonnay-based wine opens with caramel, honey and apricot aromas.",Brut,Pizzolato
"This is a thin and fresh Prosecco that remains simple and easy to drink to the last drop. Citrus, peach, tangerine and talc powder best describe the aromas.",Brut,Zardetto
"Dark gold in color, this Viognier tastes of ripe apple compote and vanilla custard with a generous texture of tropical fruits.",Estate Grown,LangeTwins
"This Merlot defines the concept of party wine. It's clean, crisp and ripe, with cherries, cola and toast notes.",Wildcreek Canyon,CK Mondavi
"Boiled down to simplistic and rustic terms, this amabile (or sweet) Lambrusco opens with sweet cherry, blueberry and thick purple foam that rises high in the glass.",Amabile,Fattoria Moretto
"This sweet, sparkling Rosato opens with fresh tones of raspberry and blueberry followed by simple freshness in the mouth. There's not much here, but the wine is cheerful and fun overall.",Birbet,Demarie
"Stalky, medicinal, rubbery aromas announce an acidic Tempranillo-led blend that's downright astringent on the palate. Flavors of stalky fruit, buttery oak and sheer raspberry and plum end crisp and tight, with a salty flavor.",Barcolobo 12 Meses en Barrica,Finca la Rinconada
"An awkward Chardonnay. It's strong in apricot flavors, suggesting some overripeness, while the vanilla and butterscotch give it a candied, fruit juice sweetness. Drink up.",,Brochelle Vineyards
"The nose on this clunky Torrontés suggests apricot juice and talcum powder. The palate is flat in feel, with bitter, pithy citrus flavors of grapefruit and nectarine. Beyond that there's little to it.",Pietro Marini,Bodega El Transito
"Here is a lovely expression of Merlot from the up-and-coming Montescudaio zone, which is located on the Tuscan coast just north of Bolgheri. The wine shows immense softness, and it has a huge cherry flavor that has been shaped by spice and chocolate accents from 18 months in barrel.",Castello Ginori,Marchesi Ginori Lisci
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this opens with bold, opulent tones of black fruit, ripe cherry, espresso bean and plum. The wine's delicate acidity and ample extraction are followed by flavors of leather, spice and dark chocolate.",Villa Donoratico,Tenuta Argentiera
"This is high in alcohol, but the result is a rich Pinot Blanc, with citrus, tropical fruit, mineral, white flower and honey flavors. The bright, citrusy acidity keeps the mouthfeel keen and zingy.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Nagy
"Production has increased dramatically, but quality remains quite good for this estate-grown Cabernet Franc. Deep and plummy, it's a rich, round mouthful of blue and black fruits that are dressed up with plenty of spicy oak tones. The tannins are polished and bring some finishing flavors of black tea. This should age for a decade at least.",Katherine Corkrum,Spring Valley Vineyard
"The clean, polished bouquet gives this Cabernet Sauvignon an austere and masculine personality. Beyond the bold aromas of black fruit, leather and tobacco are delicate notes of pressed violet and rum cake. The tannins are solid and firm, and a dusting of mineral gives the palate extra dimension.",Il Tarabuso,Terre del Marchesato
"Notes of mint and thyme add savory tones to bright, pristine flavors of cassis and black cherry in this blend of Merlot, Pinot Noir and Cabernet Sauvignon. Structured and full bodied, this has warm oak tones and striking acidity. It's delicious now, but it should continue to develop over the next five years.",Veliko,Movia
"A blend of Syrah, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, this offers a powerful and rich opening that exudes enduring tones of black spice, dark fruit, leather and tobacco. The palate has a round, chewy consistency, with polished tannins and loads of concentrated fruit.",Mediterra,Poggio al Tesoro
"This wine boasts a riot of tart huckleberry, marionberry and purple fruit flavors that taste as if they have been lightly soaked in Bourbon. The dusty tannins set up a long ride onto the palate-pleasing finish.",Sagemoor Vineyard,Walla Walla Vintners
"Made from fruit that was sourced from a 2.4-acre plot on the steep slopes of Vergisson, this is an intense, ripe, wood-aged wine. The acidity is allied to the spice and yellow fruit flavors. A concentrated wine of great purity, this is worth aging for several years.",Tête de Cru Les Perrières,Domaine Ferret
"Aged for 30 months in wood, this Chablis has a distinctively ripe and rich character that puts it closer to Meursault in style. Only on the finish, through all of the toast and fruit flavors, does the steely acidity emerge.",Grains Dorées,Garnier et Fils
"Les Fourneaux is one of the smallest premier crus. Rich and balanced, this wine is full of pear and apricot flavors. It combines a minerally edge with a generous structure and fruitiness. Delicious now, but keep it for 3_4 years.",Les Fourneaux Premier Cru,Domaine Charly Nicolle
"Full bodied, rich and ripe, this wine has a minerally texture and is loaded with tropical fruit, citrus and apricot flavors. It's a serious selection that needs some aging. This is one of a series of single-vineyard wines from the Comte de Ternay estate.",Château de Rully La Bressande Cuvée Comte R. de Ternay Premier Cru,Antonin Rodet
"A pure-tasting wine, this has a mineral character, tight, balanced acidity and lemon and white-fruit flavors. One of the rare white wines from the Côte de Nuits, this has power and a toasty element.",En la rue de Vergy,Domaine Bruno Clair
"An elegant wine, this is full of ripe black-fruit flavors, and it has a rich, velvety texture. The acidity and minerality give this wine a sense of structure that promises good aging potential.",Les Taillepieds Premier Cru,Domaine Champy
"Castello di Bolgheri enjoys some of the most coveted vineyard sites that are located a stone's throw away from the Bolgheri castle tower. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot, and it delivers black fruit aromas, backed by wet earth, button mushroom and leather notes. It feels plush, yet structured.",,Castello di Bolgheri
"This tight and concentrated Cab shows power and intensity, with a lush, mouthfilling texture and firm tannins. It's brimming with black fruit notes of plum, berry and cassis, laced with accents of leather, cigar box, pepper and sweet spice. The finish is long and complex; drink now_2018.",The Great,Alexander
"This has firm tannins, and it demonstrates the potential of its juicy fruit flavors. With its powerful structure, this is a slowly developing selection that needs at least five years in a cellar.",Sur les Grèves Clos Saint-Anne Premier Cru,Jaffelin
"A sophisticated, oak-aged Viognier, this delivers smooth aromas of apricot, candied fruit, white peppercorn and almond skin. The palate is equally generous, dense and rich.",Giovin Re,Michele Satta
"For lovers of pure Petit Verdot, this jewel brings luscious boysenberry, blackberry, espresso, anise and milk chocolate flavors together on a smooth and generous palate. The wine demonstrates careful attention to ripeness and balance, and it can probably age for 15 years.",,Native Sun
"Lush and decadent, this wine has blackberry and blueberry jam, milk chocolate and toasty oak flavors. And even with all of the richness, the finish is dry and tannic. The gripping tannins suggest it can age for for 5_6 years.",Crossfire Beckstoffer Missouri Hopper Vineyard,World's End
"This blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot shows impressive intensity and carefully measured oak tones that add nuances of clove and nutmeg. At the base are notes of red fruit, cherry and blackberry, plus dried tones of prune and cassis.",Sasso al Poggio,Piccini
"This oak-aged blend of Riesling, Gewürztraminer and Chardonnay shows enormous intensity and personality, and it offers beaming aromas of sun-ripened peach, apricot, pear and exotic fruit. Smooth sensations of honey and vanilla cream drive the long, generous finish.",Lodano,Tua Rita
"Obsession delivers aromas of blackberry and plum, with pretty accents of spice and tobacco at the back. The palate is thick and dense, with tight tannins and loads of dark fruit intensity.",Obsession,Villa Vignamaggio
"The earthy aromas of Castelão show strongly. Complex, rich and juicy, this wine's tannins and black fruits vie amicably for dominance, and they promise good aging. It has a spice note and a firm structure, with a fleshy character.",Catapereiro Escolha,Wines & Winemakers
"Production of this Merlot was further dampened in 2009 by an early freeze. But the quality is as good as ever, which is apparent in the pretty core of strawberry, raspberry and red plum flavors. Aging in 55% new French oak gives the fruit a Bourbon-soaked appeal as it rolls onto the rich finish streaked with dark chocolate.",,Northstar
"This elaborate wine offers delicious cherry-pie, mocha, red currant and sandalwood flavors. The tannins are smooth and flashy, and it's easy to drink. But it shows the limits of Cabernet Franc, which simply doesn't have the depth of Cabernet Sauvignon.",Franc 'N Stern,Oakville East
"While this wine has the crispness of Chablis, it also has weight and concentration. The bright green-apple flavor is underpinned by a sense of minerality. Nervy, tense yet fruity, this can age for 2_3 years.",Fourchaume Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Mitans is one of the lesser-known premier crus in Volnay, and it has created a wine that shows the voluptuousness of Volnay. It has a smoky character, and it's laced with acidity and bright red fruit. It will benefit from 3_4 years of aging.",Mitans Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"It's impossible to resist mentioning the moniker as Sassabruna truly is one sassy wine. The blend is 80% Sangiovese, with Syrah and Merlot. Notes of black cherry, plum and soft chocolate peel away one layer after the next.",Sassabruna,Rocca di Montemassi
"Made from the little-known Ciliegiolo grape, this organic wine has notes of spice and tobacco that support the flavors of dark fruit, blackberry and prune. The palate is soft, velvety and extra smooth.",San Lorenzo,Sassotondo
"This cherry pink rosé is a mix of Merlot and Cabernet Franc, and offers plenty of pretty strawberry and cherry candied fruit. There's a sense of cotton candy also, as it wraps into the finish.",Blondie Dry,Finn Hill
"This wine just steps over the line to get its' varietal label with the rest Petit Verdot, Cabernet Sauvignon, and Tempranillo. It has notes of chocolate, pencil lead and dried herbs with plump, ripe tannins. An enjoyable easy drinker.",Zillah Gorilla,Hyatt
"This Yakima Valley Syrah definitely falls on the cool side of things. It's focused and pure-tasting, with strawberry compote as the dominant fruit. Some residual damp earth notes continue through the finish, with just a hint of bitterness.",,J Bell Cellars
"This is dark and brooding, with fragrances of blackberry, raisin and exotic spice. The palate delivers a ripe black-cherry flavor, with well-integrated notes of toast and espresso. Pair this with savory risotto dishes.",Campolieti,Luigi Righetti
"This Amarone has earthy fragrances of underbrush, mushroom and tobacco leaf. The palate delivers raisin, black pepper and vanilla flavors, along with evident oak and alcohol sensations. This shows the heat of the vintage and won't develop much complexity, so drink soon.",,Massimago
"This wine has lots to recommend, from its soft, slightly spicy introduction, to big berry and vanilla flavor follow through. But most memorable is its beautiful perfume, encompassing all those singular elements. Give it some time in bottle to show through.",,Mineral Wines
"This is a very good, everyday bubbly. It's dryish and crisp, with honey, orange, strawberry and leesy flavors. The mouthfeel is a little rough. Made from Chardonnay, Pinot Noir, Pinot Gris and Pinot Meunier.",Brut Prestige,Mumm Napa
"Here's a full-bodied blush sparkling wine that's rich with raspberries, strawberries, limes, toast and yeast. Mainly Pinot Noir, with 20% Chardonnay, it has a pale orange-pink color, and finishes slightly sweet.",Brut Rosé,Mumm Napa
"An enormously ripe wine, as sweet as a dessert pastry, with licorice, currant, chocolate, brown sugar and oak flavors. The tannins are soft, and the alcohol is very high.",Isoceles Reserve,Justin
"A forward and expressive wine, this blend of 60% Grenache, 30% Syrah and 10% Mourvèdre leads with attractively jammy black-fruit flavors and hints of vanilla and licorice root. The lush yet approachable structure and medium-length finish make this an easy choice for enjoying now.",Le Pas de la Mule Mas Janeil,François Lurton
"Though aged in just 40% new French oak, the barrel notes of mocha and roasted coffee bean take up much of the stage with dark fruit and herbs fighting for attention. The flavors are ripe and lush but seem a bit clipped.",Zephyr Ridge Estate Bottled,Swiftwater Cellars
"This is dark and brooding, showing earthy aromas of tilled earth, leather and farmyard. The palate is big and ripe, with black fruit, nutmeg and white pepper flavors.",,Scriani
"This has almost overripe black-fruit aromas accompanied by a whiff of toasted oak. The palate delivers mature but restrained plum and black-cherry flavors, layered with hints of chocolate, vanilla and espresso and supported by firm tannins.",,Secondo Marco
"Apple and peach aromas come with a hint of lime. This is clean and feels good on the palate, where apple, peach and nectarine flavors lead to a straight-ahead finish that feels right but doesn't even suggest complexity.",Aria Estate Brut,Segura Viudas
"Nearly all varietal with just a splash of Syrah (3%) added, it has notes of sweet spices, cocoa, and cherry backed by dry, chalky tannins. A pleasant easy drinker.",,Seven Falls
"Take Souverain's basic Chardonnay, released last year, oak it up, and you get this reserve. Buttered toast, butterscotch, apricot, tropical fruit and honey flavors are prominent. Ready to drink now.",Winemaker's Reserve,Souverain
"This opens with slightly rustic, but not unpleasant, earthy notes that quickly blow off and are replaced by prune, pepper and raisin aromas. The palate offers macerated prune, carob, fig and white pepper flavors. A simple and direct style, but enjoyable.",,Tommasi
"Here's a soft ripasso, with aromas of plum, raisin and menthol. The round palate offers plum, prune, black licorice and chocolate sensations. There's not much complexity here, but it's very enjoyable.",,Tezza
"With a dominance of Chardonnay in the blend, this is a ripe, clean, fragrant and fruity wine. It has an attractive tangy lemon character, a creamy texture and a lively final acidity.",B de Becker Extra Brut,Jean Becker
"In the foothills of the Massif Central, the small appellation of Marcillac produces wines that have a feel both of the Mediterranean and the Atlantic. Stalky on the one hand and ripe and warm on the other, this is a wine to drink easily and soon.",,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"Richly warm wine, spicy and very fruity. Seville orange and citrus combine with tropical fruits to give a wine that is full in the mouth and concentrated while ready to drink. Drink until 2018.",Cuvée Tradition,Pierre and Charles Sparr
"Blacker than night, this blend of 79% Petite Sirah and 21% Petit Verdot grown in the Clarksburg and Lodi appellations, is fragrant in blackberry and plum with just a hint of cassis. Juicy and measured in power, it's made to be enjoyed in its youth and will make a good companion to steak.",Petite Sirah-Petit Verdot,LangeTwins
"The nose on this brut is a touch grassy, with apple aromas. On first take, it feels foamy, but with time it settles down. Flavors of sulfur, apple and saline finish with pithy citrus notes and flavors of spiced apple, rhubarb and mild bitterness.",Extremarium Brut Reserva,Mont Marçal
"This shows notes of prune and chocolate, but not much complexity or finesse. It has delicious fruit and an approachable palate, but it's a bit one dimensional.",,Monte Tondo
"Spicy and fresh, this clean and fruity wine displays flavors of jicama, melon and pear. It's a simple, straightforward, well made, fruit-driven wine for every day enjoyment.",,Mercer
"Structured and fruity, this is a wine that shows the delicate perfumed character of the Hautes Côtes. The wine has bright raspberry fruits, balanced acidity and just the right amount of structure for aging for a year.",Les Dames Huguettes,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"100% Malbec, it's redolent with dark plums, wild blueberries and peppery spices. The soft, silky flavors are light but have good concentration with the oak (80% American) seeming quite dialed back.",,Roza Ridge
"Berry, asphalt, leather and jammy notes pour off the bouquet on this full-bodied but fairly basic Tempranillo. Baked blackberry flavors are touched up by peppery spice and carob notes, while the finish is toasty and bitter like espresso.",Roble,Legón
"This is a good wine for enjoying now with Mexican food or a barbecue. It's dry and briary, with black pepper-accented cola, blackberry and, currant flavors.",Mother Clone,Pedroncelli
"Brazin's old-vine Zin has bright, soft plum and blackberry flavors that will appeal widely. With broad swaths of coffee and leather weaving within the fruit, it's not overpowering or subtle, but just right and will pair broadly too.",Old Vine,Brazin
"Dark garnet in the glass, this wine features aromas of black cherry, candle wax and freshly picked oregano. Soft tannins offer a foundation for flavors of cherry, cassis, mint, espresso bean and Mediterranean herbs. Fruit and savory notes continually make way for one another on the palate, concluding in an herbal and lemon zest finish.",Superieur,Barkan
"Menthol, mature black currant, eucalyptus, espresso and clove aromas lead the nose. On the austere palate, ground pepper and licorice accent mature black cherry while assertive, close-grained tannins leave a firm finish. Drink after 2020.",,Battaglio
"Toasted nuts, seared marshmallows, roasted corn and dried apple play on the nose of this richly layered wine. The palate shows plenty of lively sea salt from front to back, along with concentrated citrus character and an apple-syrup ripeness.",Soberanes Vineyard,Bernardus
"A slight whiff of leathery funk in the nose carries into the palate, but it does not override the rich cherry fruit. Extra details of mineral and earth bring further interest, and more bottle age may serve to lengthen the finish.",Estate,Bethel Heights
"A crisp and dry Vouvray, this still has those telltale honey flavors of delicious Chenin. It is rich and dense while also having great acidity and a tight, taut texture that will soften as the wine ages. It can be drunk now for its freshness, but it will be better from 2017.",,Clos du Gaimont
"Mature berry, dark cooking spice and blue flower are some of the aromas that emerge on this firm red. On the palate, ground pepper, clove and licorice accent a black cherry core while brisk acidity provides the racy framework.",Aves,Comm. G. B. Burlotto
"Leather, pencil shavings and cedar provide an edge to this wine. It's otherwise soft and approachable in a mix of blackberry and black cherry, a seasoning of cinnamon and clove providing a pleasant hit of spice on the finish.",,Crossbarn Paul Hobbs
"Aromas of wild berry, menthol, baking spice and a balsamic note lead the nose. On the tightly wound palate, bracing tannins support raw cherry, anise, tobacco and a hint of coffee alongside firm acidity.",Fossati,Dosio
"Hints of bramble and earth lend savory nuances to sunny yellow peach and melon flavors in this bright vivaciously crisp Kabinett. Off-dry in style, it's balanced by a stream of focused tangerine acidity leading from midpalate through a moderately long finish. Start drinking now.",Bernkasteler alte Badstube am Doctorberg Kabinett,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"Concentrated rose petals, hibiscus and purple fruits meld with lava-rock aromas, all boosted by a touch of cola and smoke. Tart plum skins and Montgomery cherries play into the complex palate, which also shows turned earth and beef-jerky flavors.",,Feliz Noche
"This is 100% varietal, and sports interesting aromas of Provençal herbs. Peppery cranberry fruit is spicy and tart, fading through the midpalate into a lean, but lingering finish.",Estate,Folin Cellars
"Fresh apple, pear and lemon flavors have a crystalline edge in this just-off-dry example of Elbling, an unusual white variety grown in the Mosel. It's zesty and spry, finishing with a delicious murmur of lime-pith bitterness. Drink now.",Feinherb,Frieden-Berg
"Spicy, meaty flavors like black pepper and beef broth blend with substantial fruit flavors in this medium-bodied, dry and rather sophisticated wine. It's almost a meal in itself, and well-balanced.",Ungrafted,Ghostrider
"A dark-red color, aromas like dark chocolate, flavors recalling black cherry, and a dry rather than sweet taste make this a great wine for a special meal. It has layers of fruit, a bit of smoke, and lots of fine tannins that pile up for a rich mouthfeel and lingering finish.",Hybrid Red Organic Grapes,Girasole
"Lychee and honeysuckle notes are concentrated and pure in this bright off-dry Gewürztraminer. It's elegantly structured, lifted by zesty tangerine acidity and hints of dusty pollen and mineral that linger on the finish. Drink now.",Bechtheimer Spätlese,G&M; Machmer
"This blend holds 59% Syrah, 24% Grenache, 13% Petite Sirah and 4% Zinfandel. Slightly reserved at first, with some patience it begins to show violets, boysenberries and sandalwood on the nose. Aromatic purple flowers arise on the sip, along with dark chocolate and black currant. But the wine is rigidly structured, remaining quite wound-up even after many hours open.",Laity,Guyomar
"The nose isn't very expressive on this big, brawny wine but the chewy, full-bodied palate offers blackberry jam, raisin, licorice, chocolate and orange peel alongside smooth tannins. It still has enough fruit richness to carry off the hearty alcohol but drink sooner rather than later.",La Rossa,Il Falchetto
"This is a fine rich balanced wine. It has ripe fruits that suggest black currants, blackberries and a tight, stalky, mineral element. At the same time, it's generous, full of juicy acidity to contrast with the dusty tannin layer that keeps it all together. Drink now.",Vila Santa Reserva,J. Portugal Ramos
"This gutsy blend of two-thirds Zinfandel plus Syrah and Tempranillo has a deep color, fresh spicy oak aromas, vivid fruit flavors and a lip-smacking layer of fine tannin. It should be just the thing with a grilled steak or pulled pork.",,Lake and Vine Cellars
"Everything is in place in this medium-bodied, smooth-textured and generously flavored wine. It has a good blend of subtle cherry, blackberry and raspberry flavors, plus hints of spice from barrel aging. Well balanced for drinking now through 2018, it's made with 63% Zinfandel, 23% Petite Sirah and 14% Syrah.",Coro Mendocino,McFadden
"Lots of dark-fruit flavor, an ultrasmooth texture and a lingering finish raise this medium-bodied and value-priced wine well above average. Black cherry and blackcurrant flavors are sprinkled with spices recalling nutmeg and cardamom.",Omira Hills,Montevina
"Based on the premier cru Chardonnay vineyards of Cuis, this soft and fresh wine is beautifully balanced. It has apple freshness, a tangy texture from minerality, and a bright and fruity aftertaste.",Cuis Premier Cru Blanc de Blancs Brut,Pierre Gimonnet et Fils
"From a vineyard created by Antonia Ferreira, the grande dame of the Douro, this wine is produced by one of her descendants. It is fragrant, fresh and with great fruitiness. Initially soft and rounded it also has a fine bite of acidity and a tight, mineral aftertaste.",,Quinta de Porrais
"Dark berry, baking spice, herb, tobacco and a menthol note lead the nose along with a whiff of oak. The linear palate is still all wound up, showing more dark spice than fruit richness. Racy acidity and astringent tannins provide a firm backbone.",,Rattalino
"Here is an easy-drinking, off-dry and delightfully fragrant wine to enjoy as an apéritif or with lightly spiced Asian fare. Honeysuckle and orange blossom aromatics dovetail with pear and papaya fruit flavors. It's round and appealing, with a good lift to the finish.",,Sweet Cheeks
"Aromas of underbrush, scorched earth, eucalyptus, mature berry and dark spice lead the nose. There's not a lot of fruit richness but the spicy palate offers licorice, black pepper and sage alongside grippy tannins that leave a firm, drying finish.",Bussia,Tenuta Rocca
"Named Telhas (tiles) from the Roman tiles that are still found occasionally in this vineyard, this is a rich spicy wine that comes mainly from Viognier. That gives the wine a perfumed character with touches of ginger, along with ripe apricots and a fine fresh aftertaste. Drink this wine from 2017.",Telhas,Terras de Alter
"Polished and fragrant, this charming red offers alluring scents of freshly picked rose, red berry, tilled soil and a whiff of aromatic herb. Vibrant acidity and supple tannins balance the bright cherry, strawberry, white pepper and anise flavors. Enjoy through 2017.",,Travaglini
"While dry in style, sumptuous black cherry and cassis notes lend a plummy feel to this Lemberger. It's an uncomplicated welcoming wine that's a bit plush in mouthfeel but invigorated by bright cranberry acidity on the finish. Drink now.",Trocken,Grafen Neipperg
"It has been a while since we've reviewed Cuatro Pasos, but eight vintages later it's basically the same wine, which, for the price, means good value. This opens with earthy warm muddled berry aromas. The palate is flush and plump, reflective of a hot vintage, while blackberry and cassis flavors finish hefty. Drink now.",,Cuatro Pasos
"This blend of two-thirds Syrah and one-third Mourvèdre is fresh and aromatic, showing some peppery-gingery spice to go with watermelon and strawberry notes. It's medium in body, with an abbreviated finish.",Cape Bleue,Jean-Luc Colombo
"Aromatic for Cabernet, this wine possesses notes of black currant, green pepper, blackberry and herbs. It drinks slightly off dry, offering lighter flavors with a tangy feel and chalky tannins.",,Buried Cane
"Underbrush, menthol, dark berry and allspice aromas take shape in the glass. The simple palate, which has a slightly fizzy character, offers fleshy black cherry, overripe plum and soft acidity alongside buffed tannins.",Riserva,Cantine Bellini
"This is a heavily wood-aged wine with a bitter character redeemed by the ripe blackberry fruits from a blend of 65% Merlot, 30% Cabernet Sauvignon and 5% Cabernet Franc. It is structured, with firm tannins over the fresh and juicy fruitiness. Give the wine another year and the two will come into balance. Drink from 2016.",,Château de Bordes-Quancard
"Very fresh and crisp, this is a wine to drink soon. It has great acidity, bright and lively with green fruit flavors and some mandarin zest to give softness at the end.",,Château du Claouset
"Dark, raisiny aromas of kirsch and marzipan open this jammy Tempranillo. Dark berry, black plum, foresty accents and mulchiness define the flavors on this stewy, plump offering.",Roble,Finca El Encinal
"Pear, dried flower and ripe green apple aromas lead to lighter-styled, dry, mouthwatering stone-fruit flavors. This brings interest but the concentration doesn't seem all there.",Reserve,Kennedy Shah
"This crisp, lemon-flavored wine has a ripe, full character. It is rich with apples, apricots and delicious acidity at the end.",,Les Hauts de Lagarde
"Dust, black cherries and a hint of tarragon arise on the nose of this wine from a small appellation in Monterey County. Char and turned black soil power the very dark palate, which also shows a bit of sagebrush and prominent tannins.",,Lockwood
"The color is a deep copper, while aromas suggest chocolate and vanilla, and the flavors are buttery and rich. Together with a thick texture it makes for a full-bodied rosé that will be more of a dinner wine than something for a sunny outdoor lunch.",Estate Bottled,Matchbook
"Aromas are light for the variety, with notes of jasmine and poached pear. The medium-sweet flavors deliver notes of mandarin orange and Nestea ice tea, finishing dry.",,Moonbeam
This informal red opens with aromas of red berry and a whiff of cellar floor. The simple palate offers black cherry and orange peel alongside zesty acidity and dusty tannins. It's made to be drunk young so enjoy soon.,,Sorelli
"Aromas of ripe__early overripe__lack fruit, sweat and wet fur lead the nose. The palate offers fleshy black cherry, crushed plum, coconut and espresso alongside drying tannins.",Casalini,Fattoria Fibbiano
"This opens with aromas of toasted oak, coffee and butterscotch. The ripe, evolved palate doles out dried black cherry, vanilla, espresso and chocolate alongside abrasive tannins that leave the mouth feeling rough.",Riserva,Guidi 1929
"Smooth and fruity, soft and rich, this medium-bodied wine will be easy to enjoy at a casual meal or big party. The aromas are like black cherries, the flavors like candied cherries and the texture relaxed.",,60 North
"This wine seems a bit confected and simple, combining ripe stone fruit with lemon zest to achieve a sense of balance. Short on the finish.",,Smythe & Renfield
"This opens with aromas of dark berry, violet, toast, menthol and a whiff of cellar floor. The one-dimensional palate offers crushed plum, blackberry, vanilla and a confectionary note alongside drying, astringent tannins.",Riserva,Cantine Ravazzi
"This soft, ripe wine by the Blaye sister-brother team of Marie-Pierre et Pierre-Charles Dartier has caramel flavors integrated into the red fruits. A crisp side comes from red currant flavors, while a smooth aftertaste keeps it rich while not losing the acidity.",Villa Cailleteau Bergeron,Château Cailleteau Bergeron
"This is a crisp, intensely fruity wine. Full of red berries and fresh acidity, it is dry with a tangy orange-peel character, light minerality and a touch of caramel. It is ready to drink.",La Fleur d'Amélie,Château de Sours
"This is a curiously juicy wine that is not fully integrated with the dry tannins. It has a hard-edged texture, a dry character that sits uneasily with the crisp black currant fruitiness.",,Château Hannetot
"Pale orange-pink in color, this is fruity and light. It coveys a bright, fresh character that is both refreshing and very crisp. Drink now.",,Château la France
"With a sense of tannic structure and a dry background, this is a firm wine. It has some weight, although the texture and the black currant fruits are light and stylish rather than dense. Drink from 2016.",,Château les Ancres
"Bright, lightly-smoked red currant and berry fruits dominate this juicy, fresh wine. A plum-skin texture leads on to some firm tannins. The aftertaste is fruity and light.",Augey,Cave de Rauzan
"This wine is fresh without being too herbaceous. Sauvignon Blanc controls crispness with flavors of almonds, citrus and quince. The tangy, steely aftertaste will soften from the end of 2015.",,Château Taussin
"Although obviously still young, this fruity wine will develop fast. It benefits from the ripe fruit of the vintage, sweet black currants and berries that are given a crisp edge by the acidity. Already balanced, it will be drinkable from 2016.",Premium,Château Taussin
"A ripe wine that is almost off dry, this has a ripe cherry character, rich in the mouth and with a full texture. The aftertaste brings out spice and tannins. Bordeaux Clairet lies between rosé and red in color and in taste.",,Château Timberlay
"Light aromas of ripe pear and jasmine precede medium-sweet, somewhat oily-feeling flavors. It doesn't all come together but still provides enjoyment.",,San Juan Vineyards
"Racy, this stainless-steel fermented white is fuzzy in gooseberry and pineapple, not quite veering into fresh-cut grass, but staying more tropical and generous in ripe fruit. A dry, lemony finish provides refreshment.",Estate Grown,St. Supéry
"This easygoing wine opens with subtle aromas of dark-skinned fruit, toast and bell pepper. The simple, easy-drinking palate shows black cherry and a hint of coffee. Drink through 2015.",,Villa da Filicaja
"Tropical fruit, passion fruit and lime aromas are a bit sweaty and suggestive of pine resin. This is low on spine and verve, meaning it's a touch flat and flabby. Briny nectarine and tarragon flavors finish with green notes of scallion and lime.",,Emina
"This is a full-bodied and soft wine. Full of juicy red fruit flavors and rounded tannins, it's fruity and ready to drink, with delicious acidity at the end.",Antisto Tradition,Georges Vigouroux
"The wine is bone-dry with acidity as well as fragrant fruitiness. Because it comes from the south of Champagne, it has enough ripe fruit to sustain and balance this really dry character. It's ready to drink, although holding until late 2015 will help it even more.",Zero Dosage Brut Nature,Gremillet
"This 100% varietal wine seems to still be in its shell, with light notes of coffee, plum and licorice along with other barrel spices. The fruit flavors are supple with some heft to the tannins and a tart lick of acidity that spruces things up. A lot of good things are going on here but they don't quite all come together.",Phinny Hill,Robert Ramsay
"Intriguing with bites of melon, stone fruit and bristling acidity, this bright, fresh white wine maintains a level of tension and creaminess. It balances the two personalities against each other with aplomb, before losing some of its luster on the finish.",,Round Pond
"This wine brings a lot of appeal, with notes of mandarin orange, Bosc pear and jasmine. It leans toward medium-sweet with ripe peach flavors but without the acid to hold them entirely together.",Made from Organic Grapes,Pacific Rim
"A good grip of acidity and tannins shape the fruity, earthy aromas and crisp raspberry and cranberry flavors. It's a very lively, refreshing style that is not overripe, and will be great with all kinds of food.",,Paul Dolan
"A bouquet with aromas of tomato leaf and spicy berry is brought down a notch by burnt, macerated leafy notes. The palate is full but low on structure and grip. Round, earthy, candied flavors are rooty and suggest tree bark, while the finish is a bit syrupy. This is 52% Cabernet Sauvignon, 28% Syrah and 20% Carmenère.",Lone Rider Premium Selection Estate Bottled,Sierra Batuco
"Cool-climate flavors abound in this balanced and refreshing wine. Elements of cucumber, celery and salad greens are joined by core fruit flavors of citrus and pineapple. It's a lovely apéritif or accompaniment to salads and simple pasta dishes.",,St. Hubertus
"There's a slightly oxidized sense to this blend of 40% Grenache Blanc, 30% Viognier and 30% Roussanne, with aromas of dried peach, apricot, sourdough bread and lightly toasted marcona almonds. The flavors are very much powered by yellow flowers, with saffron and scorched lemon elements.",Live Blanc,Standing Sun
"Earthy aromas of scorched soil, graphite, violet and mature black plum lead the nose on this hearty wine. The juicy palate doles out crushed Morello cherry, blackberry and cinnamon alongside supple tannins. An almond note signals the close. Enjoy through 2016.",Otre Meat,Teanum
"Despite showing sulfur and matchstick on the nose, this smells crisp, oceanic and a touch green, like pole beans. The mouthfeel is crisp and stony, with minerality. Flavors of lime and green apple finish chalky and mildly bitter. This is quite typical for the coastal Leyda region.",Reserva Privada,Viña Casas Patronales
"Winemaker Gianni Manucci blends 50% Syrah with 34% Merlot and 16% Zinfandel from his vineyard off Adelaida Road. Aromas of ripe strawberry and boysenberry offer chopped Italian-herb butter in the background. Flavors include elderberry and black licorice, but the palate is dominated by fairly hard tannins throughout. Worth waiting until 2016_2017 to open.",House of Reds,Wild Coyote
"Minty around the edges, this is a sizable wine in terms of body and power. Structured and silky on the palate, it's closer to black fruit in profile than red.",Sangiacomo Vineyard,Acacia
"A slick of wax and lanolin lends a mineral tone to bright apple cider and honey notes in this sprightly semisweet Riesling. Spine-tingling with acidity, it's an elegant, classically styled wine with a pristine, fruit-focused finish.",Martini Reinhardt Selection,Anthony Road
"For the price, this Merlot packs a delicious punch, offering soft, persistent layers of chocolate, tar and leather, the tannins present yet well-managed. Red fruit and smoke intermingle on the palate, playing well together.",Sands Point,Avelina
"Aromas of ripe black fruit, spicy plum, graphite and a whiff of brine lead the nose of this robust wine. The round, savory palate doles out juicy blackberry, blueberry, licorice and ground black pepper alongside brawny tannins. It ends on a bitter prune note.",Quota 31,Cantine Menhir
"Made with Negroamaro and Malvasia Nera, this concentrated wine conveys aromas of perfumed berry and cake spice. The ripe, round palate offers crushed raspberry, wild cherry, clove and licorice alongside firm, velvety tannins.",Riserva,Cantine Paolo Leo
"This has a subdued nose for a Riesling, with elements of squeezed lime, orange cake and stone fruit. There is decent tension on the palate, hovering between ripe nectarine and bitter grapefruit peel.",Unoaked,Carmel Road
"This full-bodied red conveys aromas of tilled soil, underbrush, plum cake and pencil shaving. The ripe, dense palate offers prune, dried blackberry, clove, ground black pepper and graphite alongside velvety tannins.",Artas,Castello Monaci
"Marmandais is on the way to Cahors from Bordeaux, and the Malbec grape seems to have stopped off to produce this firmly tannic wine with its dark fruits and dense structure. A juicy, spicy character leaves a firm, solid aftertaste.",Château Terrebert,Cave du Marmandais
"Aromas of underbrush, tobacco leaf, leather, wild berry and a balsamic note take the lead. The palate offers juicy Morello cherry, black raspberry, licorice and sage alongside rather astringent tannins.",Liste,Borgogno
"This moderately aromatic wine features notes of black cherry, clove and abundant high-toned herbs. A supple mouthfeel with black fruit flavors accompanies firm, dry tannins.",,Cadaretta
"Aromatically appealing, this suggests black raspberries, tart cherries and herbs, with light citrus and barrel accents. It's tart and quite restrained for the variety with plumy fruit flavors and a slightly chalky feel to the tannins that may resolve with some additional time in the bottle.",Stone Tree Vineyard,Wind Rose
"This shows a ripe and earthy flavor component, silky texture and lingering finish. It has aromas like flowers, leather and currants, then it offers black cherry, clove and cinnamon flavors, a rich mouthfeel and moderate tannins. Full bodied but smooth at the same time.",Gianoli Vineyard,Witching Stick
"Wisps of smoke and char add nuance to tart red cherry and violet notes on this aromatic wine. It's juicy and fresh on the palate, yet amasses bitter, velvet tannins that blanket the finish. Enjoy now with a good decant, or better yet, hold back till at least 2016.",,Wölffer
"One of the first and most reliable of this style of sweet, sparkling rosé, this low-alcohol wine is a fruity finale to any meal. Spice and ripe berry notes dominate, although some dark, woodsy notes add intrigue. Like all wines of this ilk, buy and drink the youngest available vintage.",Moscato Rosé,Innocent Bystander
"The bouquet of this wine starts off subtle and dainty, needing time to become more expressive and reveal scents of cured meat, sweet smoke, violet and small red berries. Gamy notes are at the forefront of the medium-weight palate, with underlying flavors of red cherry and currant. A smoky, savory and spicy selection; drink now_2017.",Appellation Series,Boschendal
"This is a well-priced example of Barossa Cabernet, laden with characteristic notes of chocolate, mint and berry fruit, wrapped in a layer of toasty oak. It's full bodied, yet easy to drink because of the soft tannins and mouthwatering finish. Probably best between now and 2020.",Grand Barossa,Château Tanunda
"A majority of new French oak nestled this wine, contributing to its dark golden color and oak intensity on the nose and palate. Slightly sweet in ripe apple and vanilla, it will benefit greatly from the enjoyment of food alongside.",,Hill Family Estate
"This 100% varietal wine offers notes of coffee, vanilla and plum. It's medium bodied with espresso flavors and firm, slightly gritty tannins.",Les Collines Vineyard,J & J
"Big tannins and impressive fruits are the hallmarks of this impressive wine. It is also subtle, not showing all its flavors at once, hiding beneath tannins and structure. For this fruity vintage, it shows a strong sense of direct, solid structure, only allowing the strong black plum and berry flavors to come through slowly. It is for the long haul, so don't drink before 2022, even better later.",,Château Latour
"So smooth, this is a rich, grandiose wine. Although it is full of black currant fruits and spice flavors, the texture is most impressive. Dusty tannins are integrated with juicy fruits seamlessly. The purest fruit flavors are allied to linear tannins in a precise yet generous way. The wine is evolving beautifully, but do not drink before 2020.",,Château Pontet-Canet
"It opens with an enticing fragrance of black berries, toast, Mediterranean spices and a touch of vanilla. The vibrant, youthful palate delivers a core of black cherry accented with black pepper layered with mocha, mint and tobacco notes. The racy acidity and solid but brooding tannins demonstrate that this wine still needs time to develop to its extraordinary potential. Drink 2018_2035.",Cepparello,Isole e Olena
"The wine shows the power typical of a Lafite but within the context of the fruity 2011 vintage. The immensely dense tannic structure gives the wine a solid feel that is lifted by so much ripe black currant and berry fruits. At the back, the wine has a more brooding, dark character that suggests great aging potential. Drink this wine from 2019.",,Château Lafite Rothschild
"Huge structure, huge potential, a wine that will bring out all the fruit and density of the vintage while remaining very fresh. Black plums are already showing strongly along with the dry core that promises aging. It's serious while alive and bright. Drink this major wine from 2022.",,Château Léoville Las Cases
"Lifted ripeness and candied lemon peel send their aromas heavenwards. These rounded aromas with a fetching touch of bitter fir and honey also appear on the palate where acidity is present but cushioned. Like honey parfait spiked with lemon peel, this is lovely and lingers long.",Ried Klaus Smaragd,Josef Jamek
"This wine has so many of the structural elements of a Saint-Estèphe, but also is enveloped by ripe fruitiness. Black in color and dense in character, it has sweetness from the plum juice fruits and great acidity. But it is also firm, powerfully projecting a serious potential. Drink from 2022.",,Château Calon Ségur
"A serious and concentrated wine that is one of the stars of the vintage. With its tight tannins and a considerable sense of structure, it shows a dark and dense side. It's full in the mouth, black plum skins and intense acidity giving a lilt of freshness at the end. Drink from 2019.",,Château Palmer
"This iconic Brunello seamlessly combines power and finesse. It opens with earthy aromas of underbrush, tobacco, tilled soil and blackberries. The dense palate delivers juicy black cherry and raspberry alongside black pepper, licorice and a balsam note. It's impeccably balanced but still very young, and still showing racy acidity and assertive tannins. Give it time to soften and develop more complexity. Drink 2016_2031.",Poggio al Vento Riserva,Col d'Orcia
"The tightly closed nose only gives away a little ripe red apple. Even with the fruit locked underneath the stones, the sleek power, the impression of saltiness and lime-zest purity of this wine whisper promises. These will be kept, at least if you wait until 2017. This one will last and last.",Wösendorfer Kirchweg Smaragd,Rudi Pichler
"Black berry, plum, red currant and cedar aromas take center stage in this fantastic vintage of one of Italy's most iconic wines. The structured, poised palate delivers a great depth of flavors that include succulent black cherry, cracked black pepper and mocha that are energized by a flinty mineral note. Smooth and balanced with polished tannins and fresh acidity, this is already delicious but hold for complexity. Drink 2015_2030.",Tignanello,Marchesi Antinori
"There is a lightness about this vintage of Mouton Rothschild. It doesn't take away from its quality but does give the wine poise and an attractive lift. The wine is based on solid tannins, then the ripe fruit builds layers of fruitiness and freshness. It is not likely to be one of the longest-aging Moutons, but it will be delicious. Drink from 2020.",,Château Mouton Rothschild
"Rich aromas of late summer are here: the ripe peel of yellow pears, luscious peach and yellow Mirabelle plum plus some dried hayflower notes. There is power and depth, along with some alcoholic heat and balancing acidity__eautiful now but it will get even better. Drink until 2020.",Alte Reben Berglagen,Salomon-Undhof
"A solidly structured wine, it is both elegant and intensely powerful. It is disclosing its fruitiness slowly, at the moment dense and concentrated. A restrained edge provides complexity and balance. It will need aging, so don't drink before 2022.",,Château Margaux
"This is a focused, riveting expression of Red Mountain Syrah from a great vineyard. It's packed with juicy flavors of fresh raspberries, tinged with tangerine-flavored acids. Elegant and fascinating, it's a pure, fruit-driven expression of the grape, bolstered by the natural minerality of Ciel du Cheval fruit.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Syncline
"This barrel-fermented Chardonnay, from the oldest plantings (1972) in Washington State, displays exceptional concentration and palate weight. Apple pie, pear tart, baking spice, butter and caramel flavors abound. It's rich and packed with fruit, along with the seductive flavors that aging in new French oak can provide.",Kestrel Vineyard,Ashan
"From the grandson of the inventor of Brunello, this iconic bottling opens with a classic bouquet of rose, violet, berry and spice. The vibrant palate delivers bright wild cherry, white pepper and energizing mineral notes along with impeccable balance and finesse. It's very elegant, with firm but supple tannins and still-nervous acidity. Give it time to unwind and develop complexity. Drink 2016_2038.",,Biondi Santi
"Clos Fourtet is a continuing success. This 2011 is both rich and seriously structured. Ripe, with a mineral character, it starts firm and then shows generous blackberry fruits. Still young, it should not be drunk before 2018.",,Clos Fourtet
"Made entirely from Sangiovese, it opens with fragrances that recall spicy black berries and Mediterranean herbs. The velvety palate delivers power and finesse along with fleshy black cherry, licorice and a graphite note. Wine Warehouse, Polaner Selections.",Fontalloro,Felsina
"Demonstrating finesse and depth, it discloses a stunning fragrance of pressed rose, iris, berry, leather and truffle. The rich but elegant palate delivers creamy cherry, white pepper and licorice along with supple tannins. This wine already shows great depth but will continue to develop for years.",Rabaj_ Riserva,Giuseppe Cortese
"Powdery notions of white peony petals against a stony background suggest concealed aromas that need time to come to the fore. Right now the palate is tight, with buffered acidity at the core, long, lean and promising. Lime zest lurks amid suspicions of ripe peaches in a sherbety, lemony sharpness. The wine will blossom as of 2017.",Wösendorfer Hochrain Smaragd,Rudi Pichler
"Plump, ripe apricots play above a peppery, lemony core that bursts with juiciness and teases with salty minerality that keeps you wanting more. Delicious now, it promises lots of mileage. Drink until 2020.",Lamm Reserve,Eichinger
"A blend of 65% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Merlot and 15% Sangiovese, this opens with a beautiful fragrance of violet, iris, exotic incense, cedar and black currants. The plush palate delivers a core of juicy black cherry and red currant accented with black pepper, clove and graphite alongside smooth, velvety tannins. Drink 2015_2025.",,Grattamacco
"Still shy but invitingly soft, it has a charming peachiness that cushions both the lemony acidity and the streak of stony minerality. Edges of mandarin peel and flesh add to the allure, which will increase with age. Softly-spoken but very convincing and long.",Gaisberg Reserve,Hirsch
"This gorgeous Brunello proves that top producers can make outstanding wines even in challenging vintages like 2009. It opens with an elegant bouquet of violet, red berry, spice and a whiff of new leather. The delicious palate delivers fleshy black cherry layered with mint, licorice, balsamic herbs and cinnamon-spice. It's impeccably balanced with firm tannins and fresh acidity that give it an age-worthy structure. Drink 2016_2024.",Madonna delle Grazie,Il Marroneto
"There's a subtle difference between this Pinot and Loring's eight other vineyard-designated 2012 Pinots. But by a hair, this is the best and most compelling, delicious in blackberries, blueberries and cherries. It's hard not to drink the entire bottle now, with its tantalizing acidity and soft but intricate tannins. And yet this gorgeous wine will develop bottle complexity until 2020 or 2021. The vineyard is in the sweet spot of the Santa Rita Hills.",Clos Pepe Vineyard,Loring Wine Company
"A tiny-production Pinot by a new producer, it makes a stunning debut. Owners James Hahn and Mila Chanamé are childhood friends with longtime Anderson Valley vineyard manager Norman Kobler and the shared roots have clearly put them in sync. The wine is perfumey in lilac and violet with a lightly textured and seductive mouthfeel that's exotic in just-ripe cherry and raspberry.",,Chanamé
"Despite the huge weight of fruit and accompanying structure, this is a stylish wine. It's impressively dense, concentrated and solid. At the same time, the juicy black fruits give a generous, full-in-the-mouth character. Drink this very fine wine from 2022.",,Château Ducru Beaucaillou
"Rich and smooth, this is a ripe wine packed with blackberry fruits and sweet tannins that give a soft, while firm, structure. From the owner of Léoville Poyferré in Saint-Julien, it is sophisticated and elegant. Drink from 2017.",,Château Le Crock
"Tight but gently touched with ripe apple, lime and grapefruit, this wine is refreshing now, although it is still too closed to show its fuller fruits. This will flesh out with time but the wine will always be among the slender, invigorating Rieslings with a precise touch of minerality.",Steiner Kögl Reserve,Salomon-Undhof
"Lighter in color, this has aromas of char, coffee and vanilla that lead to varietal flavors of raspberry and chocolate, showing an interplay of fruit and barrel. It displays intensity and richness, still needing time to stretch its legs. Drink after 2018.",Estate Riverbend Vineyard,Fielding Hills
"Initial whiffs of pollen, earth and fennel contrast dramatically against a palate that's lusciously concentrated and full of fresh peach and cantaloupe flavors. It's earthy and complex, yet unctuously fruity and forward, all the while anchored by a revitalizing core of tangerine acidity.",Semi Dry,Hermann J. Wiemer
"An abundance of apple flavors__reen, golden and red-cheeked__lays on the nose. Their crisp, crunchy, sweet tartness is apparent everywhere and explodes afresh with every tiny bubble that bursts. Creamy autolysis provides a generous background to this fizzing, fun wine. This is light-footed, exuberant and finishes with a joyous concert of apple-delight.",Brut Cuvée,Jenkyn Place Vineyard
"Cabernet Sauvignon (70%) makes up the majority of this wine along with Merlot (23%), Malbec (5%) and Petit Verdot. It's aromatically brooding, with notes of black fruit, toffee, moist soil and a floral top note. The palate pulls few punches with its rich, high-octane flavors and firm tannins but manages to keep it all in balance.",Sentinel,Milbrandt
"The third vintage of this wine is 100% varietal, with the fruit coming from Stone Tree, Cold Creek and Beverly vineyards. Aromas of coffee, vanilla, clove, dark plum and spice lead to concentrated, layered but still elegant fruit flavors.",Premier,Northstar
"Coffee, black fruit and fresh and dried herbs take the lead on this blend of Cabernet Franc (38%), Cabernet Sauvignon (33%) and Merlot. The cherry and dark chocolate flavors are reserved in style, with lightly chalky tannins providing the frame.",Red Willow Vineyard,Owen Roe
"Crisp green apple, lime and vanilla wafer mingle on the palate of this 100% Chardonnay, méthode champenoise sparkler from the Bazzano Vineyard. It drips with minerality, lively and tangy with a medium to light body that picks up depth and breadth on the finish.",Blanc de Blanc,Paradise Ridge
Enticing aromas like baking spices and a vivid mix of fruit and spice flavors are carried along beautifully by lively acidity matched with luxurious body. This tastes subtly and attractively oaky and has considerable complexity and length.,True Grit Reserve,Parducci
"This full, ripe wine offers rich apple and pear flavors as well as considerable acidity. The wine is concentrated in citrus and green fruits which complement each other and add to the rich character. Drink from the end of 2017.",Anciennes Vignes,Patient Cottat
"Set in a colorful and whimsical bottle, this attention-grabber offers dense blackberries, blueberries and black licorice candy on the nose, along with bacon fat, smoke and black loam. The palate shows violets, boysenberry, blackberry and beef char. With grippy tannins, it's structured to last a few more years.",Fiore di Fano,Robert Renzoni
"Blackberry, boysenberry, smoke and grilled meat flavors fill this rich, well-balanced and medium to full-bodied wine. The aromas are charming and appetizing, making it seem ready to drink now. However, the mouthfeel is very firm with tannins and acidity, signaling that the wine should age well through at least 2020.",Mountain Selection,Scott Harvey
"Made in what the producer calls a Right-Bank Tradition, this red wine combines 69% Cabernet Franc with 27% Merlot and 4% Cabernet Sauvignon to classy, restrained effect. Perfumed in cedar and pencil shavings, it has fine, integrated tannins and an elegance to the lengthy, cassis-kissed finish.",,Virage
"Yves Gras is one of the appellation's standard bearers, and this mid-level bottling doesn't disappoint. He's toned down the use of oak in recent years, allowing more black cherry fruit to shine, matched by hints of grilled meat, mocha and black olive. It's full-bodied, mouthfilling and harmonious, with a long, supple finish.",Aux Lieux-Dits,Domaine Santa Duc
"All five Bordeaux varieties are blended into this wine that offers boysenberries, violets, black pepper and sweet tar on the nose. The palate is decorated with a complex mix of blackberry, purple florals, dark chocolate and espresso bean, proving meaty and well spiced.",,Donati
"A blend of bio-dynamically grown Merlot and Cabernet Franc, this opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, blue flowers, espresso, grilled herbs and baking spice. The bright palate delivers blackberry extract, spiced blueberry, tobacco, coffee, sage and licorice. Firm tannins provide the framework. Drink 2016_2022.",Altrovino,Duemani
"A whiff of smoky campfire opens this wine, followed by an unlikely counterpoint of lavender. Notes of black cherry and strawberry then unfurl, along with plenty of earthy mushroom and forest floor. The wine reveals a tension of weight and body as it evolves in the glass, with a bite of tannin on the finish. Let it open a bit.",Trenton 1880,E16
"This is an opulent, rich wine, still developing. It has concentration, intense acidity and a green, herbal background. As a contrast, it is full of apple and citrus fruits leavened with touches of apricot. It should be aged, and enjoyed from 2016.",Grande Cuvée la Chaudouillonne,Fournier Père et Fils
"The vineyard-designated Grenache grapes are given a whole-berry press before fermenting in stainless steel, encouraging the lithe strawberry and watermelon essence of this wine to sing unabashedly, adorned by supporting minerality and an overall lightness of being. This is a lovely sipper for all manner of moments.",Pauline's Vineyard Grenache,Kokomo
"Intensely aromatic, this is a spicy, sublime and soft wine, elegant and unexpected, bright and alive and fresh instead of overbearing. Its rustic roots endear rather than distract, with an exuberance of blueberry at its core.",,Madrigal
"Floral and accented in papaya, this is a crisp, balanced and easy-to-love wine, from a vineyard farmed organically and biodynamically planted to three different clones. Fig, pear and vanilla all make an appearance amidst a medium-bodied texture and crisp, appealing finish.",Don Miguel Vineyard La Masía,Marimar Estate
"Crushed bricks, rose petals, red currants and grape syrup are sprinkled with elegant black spices in this blend of 80% Sangiovese and 20% Merlot by Steve and Chrystal Clifton. The palate is silky, redolent with mulberry and tart plums skins, amped up by sagebrush and thyme. It's perfect for a variety of foods.",Alisos,Palmina
"Fragrant and fresh, this opens with aromas of yellow field flowers, peaches, pineapple and citrus zest. The vibrant palate offers pear, lemon drop and lime alongside lively acidity. The clean, lingering finish closes on a white almond note.",,Panizzi
"A heavier take on this often fresh and light grape, this shows blackberry fruit, roasted game and dark tobacco leaf on the slightly sour nose. Dense and rich with black cherry flavors, the palate is lifted by menthol and white pepper, with cooked beef flavors adding heft.",,Pianetta
"Warm, ripe, earthy aromas of plum and berry are welcoming. This is moderately tannic, with lasting acidity. Oaky aromas of coconut and vanilla blend nicely with loamy earth, black plum and prune flavors. A mellow, flavorful, smooth finish amounts to a fine ending; drink through 2020.",Gran Reserva,Marqués del Puerto
"There's an almost green tint to this wine and the nose shows honeyed peach, Key-lime pie, kiwi fruit and a touch of white pepper. The palate is tightly focused yet brings ample structure, with lime rinds, green-apple skin and red-apple flesh combining for a strongly complex sipper.",Paragon Vineyards,Mattina Fiore
"Exhibiting cooler-climate characteristics, the fruit sourced primarily from the Stag's Leap District, this wine shows dried herb and cedar on the nose, evolving deeper layers of red cherry and cranberry on the midpalate. It takes on weight and structure on the finish.",Founder's Art Reserve,Judd's Hill
"The color is about as deep as wine gets, virtually black except for a thin red-purple rim. The aromas resemble black cherries, even black olives and the flavors are as rich as blackberry jam, but without the sweetness. So this is a bold, full-bodied wine with lots of well-integrated tannins that make it astringent to drink at this young age. It will be best after 2020, when it will have softened and gained more diverse flavors.",Encomium,Keating
"Juicy mango and yellow peach flavors are intensified by a mineral slick in this gorgeously textured wine. A jolt of lime on the midpalate gives edge to silky layers of fruit, exposing a lingering honeycomb finish. Complex yet light bodied and quaffable, it's a new benchmark for Long Island Riesling.",Dry,Paumanok
"A creamy, unctuous white with a tease of waxy apple, cheese rind and tropical pear, this fuller-bodied expression of the grape takes on generous layers of caramel and ginger as it goes. It finishes in a long, lingering celebration of brioche and allspice.",Barrel Fermented,Saddleback
"This wine shows bacon fat, boysenberry and tarragon on the nose. It's full and ripe on the palate, bringing similar flavors, also showing blackberry, roasted pork and black pepper. It proves quite delicious and just what one expects from a warmer-climate Syrah.",Wild Horse Peak Mountain Vineyard Lone Boulder Ridge,South Coast
"This blend of Syrah, Zinfandel and other varieties shows the lush ripeness and softness of Paso Robles. Raspberries, cherries, pomegranates, red plums, mocha and sweet oak provide plenty of yummy flavor. It's a little hot with alcohol, but immediately gratifiying.",Dimples,Proulx
"Brick red in color, this wine is pungent with scents of blackberry, blueberry and leather. The palate is thick and concentrated with a Port-like finish. Layers of acidity streak through the midpalate, adding balance and making the wine quite enjoyable with food.",Merida,Renwood
"Here's a polished Petite Sirah that's soft and richly tannic. It's forward with classic blackberry, currant, grilled meat, black pepper and cedar flavors. Nice to drink now with rich stews, game and hard cheeses, and it will age well for at least eight years.",Lytton Estate,Ridge
"Smooth and creamy, this wine wears its wood aging easily. The toast is present, ready to complement flavors of ripe apricot and creamed pear. There's an attractive tang of bitter orange on the finish that adds both weight and aging potential. Drink from 2015.",,Château Turcaud
"This dense dessert wine opens with subtle aromas of black fruit, prune, leather ?and spice. The palate delivers concentrated notes of black­berry, dried cherry, cinnamon and chocolate alongside firm, drying tannins that need a few more years to soften. Sip it on its own as a mediation wine or pair with tarts made with dried fruit. Drink 2016_2028.",Passito,Còlpetrone
"Spicy and peppery from the start, this cool vintage Pinot is decidedly herbal with a pine needle sharpness. The tart, brambly red fruit flavors show medium concentration and fine balance overall.",,Evening Land
"Winemaker Ehren Jordan makes this wine with purchased single-vineyard fruit from old vines. The wine is concentrated with flavors of lemons, limes, tropical fruits and apricots, and liberally enhanced with oak. Drink it over the next few years.",Chuy,Failla
"There's a toughness to this Pinot that suggests time in the cellar. It's tannic and dry, but exhibits concentrated raspberry, cherry and pomegranate flavors, accented with sweet oak. The acidity is strong. Give it at least 5_6 years to come around.",Peay Vineyard,Failla
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc opens with aromas of oak, earth and ripe black fruit. The palate offers flavors of succulent black currant, plum, black cherry, espresso and roasted herbs, all layered with chocolate and vanilla. It boasts velvety tannins and a smooth texture.",Marciliano,Falesco
"This high octane offering opens with aromas of mature black fruit, spice and orange peel. The palate expresses lush black cherry, blackberry and clove uplifted by a note of thyme alongside a seriously tannic backbone. It's shy on fresh acidity and you can definitely detect the alcohol, but it's still delicious.",Etnico,Di Filippo
"Made from Sangiovese, Sagrantino and Merlot, this structured wine delivers notes of black cherry, raspberry, black pepper and spice, along with a licorice accent. It has bracing but ripe tannins that need a few more years to unwind. Drink 2015_2022.",Riserva,Antonelli
"This blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Sagrantino opens with a floral and fruit fragrance of violet, dark berries and spice, with a hint of pressed powder. The palate offers a bright, cherry Jolly Rancher flavor, accented by notes of spice and orange peel. Very elegant and ready to drink now.",,Arnaldo Caprai
"This red wine might just make you purr with satisfaction. It delivers everything you want in a Merlot. It's dry, but soft, with plush tannins and rich flavors ranging from red cherries and currants to cocoa, violets and cedar.",Pocai Vineyard,Ballentine
"Beringer reaches into the cool, southerly Oak Knoll district of Napa Valley for this dry Chardonnay, which shows tart flavors of lemons, apples, limes and minerals. It's an elegant Chard, light but complex, with beautiful acidity and just a touch of oak. Dungeness crab with buttered sourdough bread would be a perfect pairing.",Luminus,Beringer
"Swathes of botrytis reveal themselves seductively on this sweet wine. It is rich in flavors, but still vibrant with acidity. Fine balance and intense flavors of apricots, honey and spice give it potential to age well. Drink from 2015.",,Château du Seuil
"This is a perfumed wine with soft acidity and flavors of ripe apricot, nutmeg and spiced apple. It's full of character and the aftertaste retains the freshness of the vintage.",,Château la Croix de Roche
"The 2011 vintage was difficult for lots of producers, but Brander's Syrahs are some of their finest ever. This clone-specific bottling is opulent with flavors of blackberries, cherries, mocha and sandalwood, and accented with a peppery finish. If it was from Napa Valley, it would cost a lot more.",Colson Canyon Vineyard Clone 877,Brander
"This polished Pinot is brimming with acidity. It's bone dry and has a satiny, silky texture that frames delicate flavors of raspberries, cola and spices. A hint of mushrooms suggests pairing with a filet topped with sautéed portobellos.",,Santa Barbara Winery
"This is a multiple-clone bottling, drawn from numerous blocks of the 200-acre Shea vineyard. It opens with lush aromatics, then flavors of rhubarb, berry, citrus, pine needle and a sprinkling of dried Italian herbs that combine gracefully and carry through a long finish.",Estate,Shea
"Peter Rosback's Oregon bottling combines fruit from numerous sites, and stands in perfect contrast to his numerous single vineyard Pinots. Fruit forward and showing lovely grace notes of leaf and herb, this is drinking beautifully already. Although it needs no further aging, it will certainly keep nicely over the next five years.",,Sineann
"This single vineyard selection opens with tightly-focused raspberry- and cherry-candy flavors, wreathed in dried herbs, notably rosemary and thyme. Pepper and cinnamon spices appear as the wine opens, along with tasty highlights of nougat and chocolate.",Olenik Vineyard Unfiltered,J. Christopher
"One of three Sauvignon Blancs from J. Christopher, this limited-quantity, single-vineyard bottling mixes pretty citrus fruit with lightly grassy, herbaceous elements. Nothing is overblown, and everything combines into a seamless, fresh, delicious wine with oyster-shell minerality.",Croft Vineyard,J. Christopher
"This is a fine example of the Talley style. It's close in quality to the single-vineyard bottlings, at about half the price. Dry, crisp with acidity and silky, it offers a wealth of cherry, cola, persimmon and rhubarb flavors with a sweet, smoky oak finish. Drink now.",,Talley
"Exceptionally rich and sensual, this single-vineyard beauty has finely ground, dusty tannins. The fruit veers toward sour cherry candy, with a jacket of sweet, toasty oak. Drink now_2016.",Chicken Ranch Vineyard,Trinchero
"This Cab is so dramatically rich with fruit and oak it fills the mouth with waves of blackberry jam, blueberry muffins, chocolate and butterscotch. It's also quite high in alcohol. Your best bet is to give it 3_4 years in the cellar.",Mario's Vineyard,Trinchero
"Far from a fruit bomb, this is an elegant Cabernet with modest but complex currant, black cherry, cola and herb flavors. The tannins are considerable, and so is the acidity. Drink now after decanting for several hours, or allow it to develop over the next eight years.",,Truchard
"Made from grapes that have been exposed to muffa nobile or botrytis, this lovely dessert wine boasts sensations of candied fruit, dried apricot, almond and ripe yellow peach. The rich flavors are balanced with freshness, making it an ideal meditation wine to sip after dinner or pair it with seasoned cheeses.",Muffato della Sala,Marchesi Antinori
"Here's a hearty blend of Sangiovese, Sagrantino and Merlot that opens with earthy aromas of tilled soil, truffle, tobacco and meat juice. The lush palate delivers juicy black cherry, blackberry, spearmint and thyme alongside rippling but refined tannins.",Riserva,Milziade Antano
"This is a faultless Albariño that checks out up front, on the palate and late in the game. Tropical aromas are melony, fresh and minerally. The mouth is peachy and smooth in texture, with kicking acidity. Pithy citrus and nectarine flavors are textbook, and the citrusy finish is long and true.",,Nora
"Palo Alto's first high-end wine is a sucsess. A blend of Malbec, Cabernet and Merlot, Benito A shows baked, rustic aromas of sweet fruits and savory spices. The palate is full and flush, while flavors of earthy, baked fruits are woody and saucy, with tobacco, cocoa and raw oak flavors carrying onto the finish. Drink through 2018.",Benito A Gran Reserva,Palo Alto
"This blend of seven grapes is like a cup of dark-roast coffee blended with funk and green herbs on the nose. The palate is chunky, full and beefy, with roasted black-fruit flavors that are slightly herbal and green. Oak, carob and herbal leftovers dominate the finish.",7 Varietales,Dominio de Berzal
"A big, burly proprietary red blend, Voluptous combines Cabernet Sauvignon with smaller percentages of Syrah, Cabernet Franc, Petit Verdot and Zinfandel , creating a rich, darkly fruited wine with dusty tannins. Well-structured despite its girth, it delivers layers of licorice and leather on the finish. Drink now.",Voluptuous,Eagle Eye
"A zesty honeydew and tropical, nearly pineapple soda nose starts this wine. On the palate, there is apple pie and brisk, fleeting pineapple, but not much lasting acidity. A very easy-drinking deal, especially for the price, that will pair well with everything from seared scallops to roasted chicken.",Paragon,Edna Valley Vineyard
"With 18% Cabernet Franc in the blend, this has some stiff, muscular tannins under firm, compact cherry fruit. The cooler vintage brings herbal flavors and lemony acids, but the warmer site keeps the fruit up to par.",Barrel Select,Eight Bells
"Toasty and crisp, it showcases pretty cherry fruit as the main attraction. There's trace bitterness in the oak tannins, but ample breathing time will help to smooth it out.",Shellback,Eight Bells
"Classic Cabernet Sauvignon aromas of cherry, chalk and tobacco serve as the aromatic introduction to this reliable deal from Firestone, now one of the many wineries owned by William Foley. There's an Old World mustiness once sipped, along with a touch of vanilla and smooth tannins.",,Firestone
Lemon rind and fresh white fruits are the hallmark of this elegant white. The style is focused but with a touch of layered fruit. Great for food pairing; think grilled salmon or Thai cuisine.,,Greek Wine Cellars
"This round and easy-drinking wine, 95% Aglianico and 5% Sangiovese, is loaded with a juicy black-cherry flavor that's accented by hints of black pepper and mineral. It's soft, fresh and incredibly food friendly. Pair it with everything from hearty pasta dishes to barbecue.",Guaglione,I Capitani
"While scents of blueberry and blackberry preserves seem lush and ripe on the nose of this medium-bodied Lemberger, the palate is surprisingly bright and refreshing. Sour cherry acidity shines a spotlight on flavors of crisp raspberry and currant, finishing with a ruffle of soft, fine tannins.",,Keuka Spring
"Fresh apples and cream meld on the nose and palate of this creamy, richly textured Chardonnay. It's densely structured with bold alcohol and generous swathes of oak, but crisp acidity adds levity and elegance. Finishes moderately long.",,Lakewood
"Splash this around while pouring to help dissipate some reductive notes and reveal pleasant raspberry and herbal aromas. It's medium in body, with a welcoming suppleness to the texture and a silky feel on the finish, which folds in hints of mocha.",Château Noël Saint Laurent,Louis Bernard
"Good fruit, acidity and great freshness all come together in this delicious, accessible wine. Fruity and fragrant, it has a light touch of acidity at the end. Drink now.",,Louis Latour
"Toasty aromas go through to the palate, highlighting the wood aging. It is tense, mineral, packed with apple and lemon acidity. The aftertaste is equally crisp and bright.",Les Deux Moulins,Louis Latour
"At this young stage, this wine is shockingly tart. It will calm down and broaden out, but the acidity is likely to dominate for several years. Wait until 2017 for the fruit to turn riper and more jammy.",,Louis Latour
"Full of tropical fruit aromas, this is a rounded and rich wine. Full in the mouth, it delivers ripe peach, apricot and mango fruits. The texture is smooth, generous and ready to drink.",Délice,Manoir du Capucin
"There's a grippy quality to this Cab, which has flavors of bright red cranberry, licorice and soy, along with ample structure and a soft finish.",,Mazzocco
"There's a haunting floral perfume that persists amidst notes of intensely ripe berries and cherries on this unusual, somewhat rustic Cabernet Sauvignon. Relatively dainty in body and alcohol, it's accented with delicate sour-cherry acidity and dark mineral tones. Finishing long with a flurry of velvety tannins.",Vintner's Select Unfined & Unfiltered,Bloomer Creek
"Made from organically-farmed Nerello Mascalese grapes, one of Sicily's most noble red varieties, this linear rosato is loaded with McIntosh apple, cherry and pink grapefruit. A hint of clove adds interest while crisp acidity keeps it fresh.",Gerbino Rosato di Nerello Mascalese,Di Giovanna
"The wine is soft, rounded and very accessible. Ripe pear and apple flavors come along with a good shot of acidity. There is a light texture, with crispness at the end. Drink now.",La Colonge,Bret Brothers
"Made with Frappato and Nero d'Avola, this bright ruby-hued wine opens with red berry and earthy aromas of tilled soil and forest floor. The straightforward palate offers a fleeting Morello cherry flavor that's lightly dusted with white pepper.",Victorya,Casa di Grazia
"Smooth and bright, this fruity Sauvignon Blanc offers vanilla and tropical coconut, with medium levels of acidity and weight. The finish revisits the sun-kissed tropical theme.",,Dealy Lane
"While the wine shows strong acidity at this stage, it also has enough jammy fruits to give it potential richness. Berries go with plums and ripe tannins to indicate a wine that will age well. Drink from 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Domaine Jean Petitot et Fils
"Vines in Brochon, on the edge of Gevrey-Chambertin, produce this bright, light wine with good acidity and attractive berry fruits. Perfumed and only lightly structured, it's ready to drink from 2015.",,Domaine René Bouvier
"Richly concentrated with ripe tropical melons and mangoes, this juicy, fruity, off-dry Riesling is a straightforward yet undeniably tasty pick. It's zesty and fresh, with tart tangerine acidity that wraps the finish up crisply.",,Hosmer
"This blend of 34% Merlot, 26% Cabernet Sauvignon, 21% Syrah and 19% Cabernet Franc is dark violet-red in color. The nose offers a fruity and spicy mélange, like baked blueberry pie. Tannins slightly overpower flavors of blueberry, cherry, clove, anise and thyme.",Merlot-Cabernet Sauvignon-Syrah-Cabernet Franc,Selendi
"Light in color and body and modest in alcohol at 12%, this is a curiously intriguing Grenache, tightly wound in freshly picked strawberries and an undeniable earthiness. Aromas lean toward roses with a heavy hint of menthol. A touch of pepperiness on the finish completes the wine.",Ceja Farms,Sheldon
This spicy wine offers peppery strawberry flavors and plenty of citrusy acids. It's still a little disjointed and could benefit from additional bottle age.,Solare,Sol Stone
"This wine opens with aromas of plum, smoke, game, toast and espresso. The dense, extracted palate offers blackberry, coffee, licorice, oak, black pepper and spearmint alongside aggressive, astringent tannins.",Centomoggia,Terre del Principe
"Here's an earthy wine that opens with aromas of tilled earth, ripe berry and game. The palate offers black cherry, ripe raspberry, plum, fig and coffee, with a note of bitter nut on the finish.",,Terredora
"Here's a wine that opens with aromas of fragrant white flowers, lemon zest and tropical fruit. The straightforward palate offers yellow peach, apple and pineapple alongside refreshing acidity.",,Terredora
"This sparkling red Lambrusco opens with a touch of pungent apple skin backed by red berry and even a touch of leather or spice at the back. This is indeed an amiable expression, so expect tangy sweetness in the mouth.",Amabile,Cantina di Sorbara
"Intensely ripe, this is a straightforward wine with upfront cherry jam and oak flavors. Not much else going on, but it's fine for a party.",,Spellbound
"Toasty oak that smells like sawdust is dominant and covers up any fruit that might want to escape. A clunky, raw-feeling palate is home to herbal, oaky flavors and not much fruit. Burn and bitterness come up on the finish.",,Rio Perdido
"A little unripe, with a vegetal tug that pulls down the score. Beyond hints of steamed broccoli you'll find some raspberry and cherry fruit, with lots of sweet, toasty oak and keen acidity.",,River Road
"Has the silky weight and flavors of a nice Pinot Noir, with pleasant orange rind and sour-cherry candy notes. But there's a green scouriness that cuts through the palate like a sharp knife.",Dante Reserve,Michael Pozzan
"This is a very simple Prosecco brut with straight lines of citrus and peach backed by foamy perlage. The wine opens with a bright, luminous color and fresh acidity.",Brut,Zonin
"Executed in a dry style, this bubbly Lambrusco has the acidity and heft to pair with tortellini in melted butter sauce and grated parmigiano cheese. The wine opens with a bright purple color and raw flavors of black cherry and grape juice.",Opera 02,C_ Montanari
"Described as medium-sweet on the label, this light white wine offers tones of peach nectar, honey and white flower. It is a simple and one dimensional wine with a subtle touch of sweetness on the close. Pair it with salty appetizers.",,Canti
"Oxidized cherry and strawberry aromas settle on heavy and candied upon airing. This is thick and plump stuff, with sweet red-fruit flavors and seemingly a lot of residual sugar. This needs more spine and structure.",Cursi,Hacienda La Lomita
"This wine is quite stemmy from the first sniff to the very end. There just isn't the fruit to offset a hard, bitter, medicinal finish.",Estate,David Hill
"This is tart to the point of being outright sour, with flavors of lemon, green banana, and a hint of cracker. Overall the wine just does not come together. Two bottles tasted.",,Anne Amie
"This is a reliable Cabernet, and the price makes it especially attractive. Gets the job done with full-bodied flavors of blackberries and sweet, toasty oak.",Wildcreek Canyon,CK Mondavi
"Bright and fruity, this dayglo pink wine is dominated by acidity, though the strawberry flavors offer a riper core. It's for drinking this summer.",Monte Mayor,Adega Mayor
Tart and slightly bitter flavors segue to creamy foam and a dry mouthfeel. This sparkling Lambrusco feels thick and plush in the mouth with loads of intense blackberry and raspberry on the finish.,Rosso all'Antica,Bertolani
"This wine smells like an ice cream sundae, with scents of mint-chocolate chip and cookie dough, plus touches of strawberry and cherry sauce. Light to medium bodied, it has a malleable midpalate, but the tannins gain astringency on the finish. As the wine sits in the glass, the fruit seems to fall away, and the palate becomes more brittle feeling.",,Miracle Valley
"Made from organic grapes, this is a cheerful Prosecco with apricot, honey and butterscotch delivered in a simple and uncomplicated manner. The mouthfeel is thin and sharp.",Fields Brut,Pizzolato
"Here's a foamy, frizzante rosato made with organically-farmed fruit from a little-known wine region in northern Italy. Wild berry and raspberry open the bouquet and although there is a trace of sweetness the wine could otherwise be classified as dry.",Querido Rosé Frizzante,Tenuta Villa Tavernago
"This lightly oxidized Chard is powdery but not entirely fresh, as it shows aromas of pool water and mealy melon. The palate is chunky and just O.K. in feel, while fleshy flavors of melon and peach end briny and mildly bitter.",Urban Uco,O. Fournier
"Here is a very simple and bright Prosecco with citrus, dried hay, grapefruit and melon. The sparkler is thin and easy in the mouth with perky perlage.",Brut,Colutta
"Made from the Chambourcin grape and aged in Bourbon barrels from the A. Smith Bowman Distillery, this fortified red wine has bold notes of baguette, blackberry and brown spice, plus a mushroom inflection. Medium to full bodied, an oxidative tone of apple juice surfaces on the palate and predominates with time. The alcohol becomes fiery on the second half of the palate.",1762,Philip Carter
"Leathery, herbal aromas suggest compost. A full, hard, tannic palate is home to rubbery flavors of herbal blackberry and pepper, while a medicinal dark-berry character controls the finish. This is a decent wine with mild weediness.",,Tarantas
"There's a vein of sourness, astringency and thinness in the mouth followed by bright berry fruit and plump cherry. This is a light and straightforward bubbly Lambrusco that offers a good introductory view of this traditional Italian bubbly red wine.",Gibe,Tenuta Pederzana
"Tastes like toothpicks, with buttered toast, butterscotch and vanilla flavors dominating everything else. Somewhere underneath is some tangerine and mango fruit.",Proprietors Reserve,Trinitas
"This odd blend of Barbera, Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Sirah and Zinfandel is earthy and mulchy on the nose, with coffee and compost aromas. It never finds much freshness as the flavors suggest compost and leafiness.",Estacion el Porvenir Vino Tinto,Unión de Productores del Valle (UPVG)
"This Chardonnay is a touch volatile on the nose, which deals some gym sweat and brine. Eventually things break down to dusty, soft white-fruit aromas. Flavors of banana, papaya and white pepper end with tropical notes. This is just good enough.",Xikbal,Vinicola Urbana
"A tropical Chardonnay with a full-bodied personality and aromas of vanilla and caramel. Priced fairly, it'll please California Chardonnay fans who like a bigger style.",,Vinum Cellars
"A blend of 85% Chenin Blanc and 15% Viognier, this white is part sweet and part sour, with honey and peach coming through a murky cloud of wood. Still, enjoy it with Asian food slathered in spice or as the first sip on a hot day.",,Vinum Cellars
"This lightly sparkling Lambrusco delivers a deep purple color with aromas of wild grapes, forest berry and ripe black cherry. There's a sweet and slightly raw element to the mouthfeel.",Le Tenute Bocciolo,Medici Ermete
"This is dark in color and leafy smelling, with aromas of forest floor and herbal black fruits. The mouthfeel delivers a hard belt of acidity and not much else, while flavors of oaky spice and tart berry fruits are adequate but unspecial.",Black Label,Las Moras
Canella's Prosecco Superiore shows a heavier style with aromas of apricot and peach syrup follow by honey and butterscotch. The wine feels waxy and creamy on the close.,,Canella
"This Acciderba shows elegance and intensity, and it offers notes of oak-derived spice, dried herb, blackberry and clove. On the palate, this blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Sangiovese delivers firm tannins and tangy barbecue and teriyaki notes.",Acciderba,Serni Fulvio Luigi
"More commonly found in the Dão region to the north, the Alfrocheiro grape seems to have found a good home in the sandy soils of Lagoalva de Cima. Rich, fruity and age worthy, this has dusty tannins and a texture that hints of mineral.",Grande Escolha,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"Full and ripe, this wine's dark plum fruit is lined with toast from the nine months it spent in new wood. It has a smooth, polished texture, and the finish bears sweet tannins and a touch of eucalyptus. Age this for 2_3 years.",Alma Grande Reserva,Caves Velhas
"With only 6,000 bottles produced, this limited-production selection might be tricky to find, but it's well worth the effort. Layered and nuanced, ripe fruit provides a perfect backdrop for accents of game, spice and oak. The silky texture is complemented by black cherry and plum-skin flavors, and the finish ends on a black tea note that lingers. Drink now_2017.",The Chosen Ruby,Binyamina
"The extra concentration of low-yielding old vines is apparent in this dark, brooding wine. The minerally texture and firm tannins are all destined for long-term aging. Made from fruit that's sourced from the foothills of Portugal's highest mountains, this has a distinctly structured and dense finish.",Vinhas Velhas,Casa da Passarella
"With fruit selected from a single-vineyard site, this riserva does a nice job of portraying a fresh cherry flavor within an elaborate framework of oak spice, leather and tobacco notes. The wine is propped up by tight wood-derived tannins, which gives it a firm structure. It could use a few more years of cellar aging",Bellezza Riserva,Castello di Gabbiano
"This 80-20 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc shows a bright cherry aroma, with spice, leather and tar notes in the background. It shows a soft, plush feel, with good balance.",,Ferrari Iris e Figli
"The Te Muna Road section of Martinborough is the same region exploited by Craggy Range and Escarpment, so Cobblestone's American owners are in good company. Only the second release of this wine, the 2010 is a plush, sexy example, featuring a combination of fruity and savory components. Black cherry fruit pushes through complex notes of smoke, sous bois and shiitake mushrooms. Drink now_2020.",Te Muna,Cobblestone
"A blend of 47% Cabernet Sauvignon, 34% Merlot, 15% Cabernet Franc and 4% Malbec, this is supple and substantial, and it breathes lush notes of plum, cassis, black olive, raw wood and mineral, plus a dash of caramel.",Walter Clore Private Reserve,Columbia Crest
"This focused effort features fresh-cut apple and pear flavors that are spicy and tightly wrapped with a Bourbon-barrel-like accent. Delicious now, but it can be cellared for a decade at least.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Januik
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Syrah, this shows savory spice, smoked meat and tobacco notes, followed by black-berry, dark cherry and cola. The palate is fresh and clean, but it has enough heft to be paired with grilled meat.",Guado al Tasso Il Bruciato,Marchesi Antinori
"There's much to admire in this full-bodied, authoritative Sangiovese. It has the varietal's leafy tartness, with tangy red and purple fruits that are bound by zippy acids and tongue-tingling phenolics.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Kaella
"Polished and balanced, this masterpiece shows restraint and it's already drinkable. With its great acidity and its fine intermingling of spice and red fruit flavors, this wine will appeal to lovers of Gamay and Pinot Noir.",Méthode _ l'Ancienne,Navarro
"Fruity and rounded, this has attractive, citrus-like acidity that cuts through the caramel and apricot flavors. There is a delicious, forward orange-juice flavor that adds to the fresh feel of the wine. It's ready to drink, although it will also age.",Sentier du Clou Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This is a superrich, smooth wine. The acidity is what keeps the ripe yellow-fruit flavors in order, and it has a lemon-like edge to the tropical mouthfeel. Age this for 3_4 years.",Sous le Dos d'Ane Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Lush and round, floral and fruity, this only hints at residual sugar. The acidity makes for a bracing palate that offers highlights of clover and honeysuckle, plus rich notes of stone fruits.",,Pacific Rim
"Striking aromas of cassis, tobacco and fresh-ground coffee introduce this excellent new edition of JRG. The grapes were sourced from the excellent Alder Ridge, Klipsun, Canoe Ridge, Champoux and Seven Hills vineyards. It has a full midpalate, which is buoyed by juicy acidity. It could age for another five years or more, but drink it young to enjoy it best.",JRG,Pamplin
"Following in the footsteps of Tuscany's best Brunellos, this wine shows delicate tones of dried ginger, chopped rosemary, cola, leather, prune and dark berry. Sangiovese is an acidic grape, and its freshness gives the palate some pop.",,Renieri
"While this doesn't quite rival the great 2007, it is superior to the 2008. Rich, concentrated and structured, this has forward black-cherry, chocolate, anise and sandalwood flavors that are wrapped in firm but smooth, supple tannins. It should develop in the bottle over the next six years, but it can also be consumed now.",Reserve,Rutherford Hill
"Forward and delicious, this offers waves of blackberries, cherries, currants, anise and cedar that are wrapped in firm yet supple tannins. Drink now_2016.",Little Sister Proprietary Red Wine,Wallis Family Estate
"Dark golden in color, this late-harvest Riesling, which was allowed to develop botrytis after two October 2011 storms, has knockout, sweet honey and apricot goodness from start to finish. It's round and concentrated, and it has 12.9% residual sugar. Incredible on its own, this will also pair well with peach- and pineapple-based desserts, foie gras and blue cheeses.",Cluster Select Late Harvest,Navarro
"Initially smooth and rounded, this wine opens to reveal a structured character. A note of tangy lemon zest cuts through the pear and quince flavors, which creates a balance between richness and tautness. Ready to drink in 1_2 years.",,Olivier Leflaive
"An elegant yet ripe wine, this comes laced with citrus acidity, and the yellow fruit and melon flavors give it a sense of richness. It's lively and crisp, and it has a toasty base. Age it for 3_4 years.",Clos Saint-Marc Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This shows power and muscle, but the delivery is surprisingly soft and supple. The wine's overall roundness is further reinforced by the irresistible tones of soft chocolate, cigar tobacco and black cherry, which lift straight out of the glass.",Modus,Ruffino
"Saint Clair's Pioneer Block wines are always worth trying for their expressions of Marlborough's subregional characters. This one, from deep clay soils at the foot of the Dry Hills, features a bold cherry aroma and flavor, backed by ample vanilla and baking spice notes. It's big and slightly chunky in style, but it seems likely to smooth out over the next 12 months as the dusty tannins subside.",Pioneer Block 22 Barn Block,Saint Clair
"Smoky aromas of hickory-laced dark fruit lead the way, easily sliding into boysenberry and bacon notes on the palate. The flavors are meaty and savory, not simply fruity, while the texture is lush. One of the best examples of Peg Bay Pinot Noir in memory, it finishes long, framed by supple tannins. Drink now_2020.",,Pegasus Bay
"Full and complex, this Syrah-dominated Rhône-style blend includes Grenache and Mourvèdre, and it's cofermented with a splash of Viognier. The luscious cranberry and raspberry flavors are annotated with citrus, red licorice and wet stone accents. Suggestions of tropical fruits, such as papaya and pineapple, add more interest.",QED,Rasa
"Made from fruit sourced from the well-known Paragon Vineyard, this 100% Albariño is smooth and spicy, and its brilliant acidity highlights the green apple, citrus and vanilla flavors. Try this as an alternative to Pinot Grigio or Sauvignon Blanc.",Vinho Blanco,PasoPort
"This is a lovely example of the vineyard's strengths: It has ripe, mouth-filling flavors of cherry and cassis, which are set in an iron-like framework and accented by chalk and clay notes. It's balanced, and it will benefit from cellaring for up to a decade.",Tapteil,Cadence
"A study in balance, this wine has dark berry and tobacco aromas that are elegant rather than overly intense. The palate reveals polished tannins and firm fruit flavors.",,Carpineto
"This has aromas of tobacco leaf, fig and plum. The palate shows rich blackberry and raspberry flavors, with some spice notes. Pair this with rich pasta dishes or mildly seasoned cheeses.",Il Bugiardo,Buglioni
"This high-octane Amarone offers aromas of prune, almond and spirit-soaked cherries. The lumbering palate delivers ripe plum, raisin, oak and vanilla flavors, but above all alcohol, which dominates. It's one dimensional, lacking both complexity and finesse.",Torre d'Orti,Cavalchina
"This has aromas of raisin, fig and espresso. The palate shows blackberry, prune and evident oak flavors, with a hint of carob. This shows the heat of the vintage, with evolved tannins and rather low acidity, so drink soon.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"Here'a a rather simple but well made and enjoyablewine. It has mouthwatering black-cherry flavors, with hints of bitter almond and espresso. This is easy to drink, so enjoy soon.",Torre del Falasco,Cantina Sociale della Valpantena
"Named after a mountain in Washington's North Cascade Range, the barrel notes of toast, sawdust and char are out front on this 100% Tempranillo. It's rich and chocolaty with firm, dry tannins.",Black Peak Tempranillo StoneTree Vineyard,Elevation Cellars
"A sound, everyday Zin that has extra features lifting it above the ordinary. It's terrifically spicy and slightly overripe, with sweet raisin and current flavors, edged with smoky oak. It's a bit rough in the mouth, but rich, fatty meats and cheeses will balance that right out and allow it to express itself.",,Ancient Peaks
"This vibrant wine has a bright cherry bouquet, with a hint of plum cake. The palate delivers black cherry and bitter almond flavors, along with a hint of graphite. It's ripe but balanced, and would be perfect to pair with seasoned cheeses, rich pastas or red-meat dishes.",Villa Novare,Bertani
"This is old reliable as far as Washington Pinot Gris is concerned. Mouth-filling flavors of tart apple, citrus and pineapple are set in juicy acids. The addition of small amounts of Sauvignon Blanc and Gewürztraminer heighten the aromatics.",,Hogue
"A delightful wine, softly round and mellow, with flavors of apricots, peaches, limes, honey and minerals that are accented with just-in-time acidity.",La Cruz Vineyard,Keller Estate
"This Bordeaux-style blend_57% Merlot, 40% Cabernet Sauvignon and 3% Cabernet Franc__hows California ripeness, with blackberries, cherries and currants co-starring alongside sweet, smoky oak. It's a good wine for drinking now.",,Kirkland Signature
"One of the two main cuvées from La Chablisienne, the wine is fresh, fruity while having a tight, mineral character and a cool, fragrant feel. It could age for a few months, but is a wine to drink soon.",La Pierrelée,La Chablisienne
"At about four years of age, this Syrah's blackberry and cherry fruits are starting to dry out, yielding to notes of mushrooms, beef jerky and sweet herbs. Lots of tannins and acids suggest pairing soon with steak or lamb.",Family Reserve,Joullian
"Very floral, fragrant wine, its acidity a foil for the ripe tropical and white fruits. There is a definite mineral texture here, with just a hint of sweetness that will make this wine great with Asian food. Screwcap.",Côté,Domaine du Tariquet
"Fruity and ripe, this is a tight, very fresh wine. The crispest apples and brightest lemon give a refreshing shock to the palate. The wine should probably age for a few years, so drink after 2014.",Cuvée René Dopff,Dopff & Irion
"Here's a rather ambitious expression of Lugana that offers citrus, white peach and evident oak aromas. The palate delivers lemon and banana flavors, along with vanilla and toasted oak sensations.",Sergio Zenato,Zenato
"Earthy, herbal accents of forest floor and garrigue complement the black-fruit core of this solid, ripe wine. The palate is juicy and rich, and although it's a bit straightforward, it's balanced, attractive and enjoyable nonetheless.",Si Mon Père Savait...,Bernard Magrez
Here's an enjoyable Soave from one of the Veneto's most renowned Amarone producers. It shows a pretty fragrance of white spring flowers and melon while the palate boasts juicy cantaloup and pear. It finishes fresh and crisp.,,Allegrini
"A dusty drink of blackberry, lean and structured with resolved tannins and a clean finish.",Estate,Jason-Stephens
"This is a simple, clean, well-balanced, all-purpose Chardonnay. Light streaks of honey, lemon and vanilla run through crisp, apple-flavored fruit. Nothing fancy, but solid and reliable.",,Hogue
"Feels a little off in the mouth, with edgy tannins that give it a sandpapery texture. But it's interesting in flavor, showing everything from black cherries and currants to tobacco, pepper, salted charred beef fat, persimmons and cola. The multi-variety blend includes Zinfandel, Sangiovese and Merlot.",Native Son,Kuleto Estate
"This Amarone opens with slightly rustic but not unpleasant aromas of earth and farmland that burn off to reveal dark fruit and spice notes. The palate shows ripe black cherry, plum and raisin flavors, spiced with a black pepper accent.",Podere Le Marognole,Le Bertarole
"Aromas of nearly overripe black fruit mingle with accents of exotic spice. The palate delivers a flavor reminiscent of raspberries soaked in spirit, along with hints of cinnamon and white pepper. This offers lovely fruit, but it's a bit shy on length.",I Corsi,Le Marognole
"This has aromas of ripe__ust shy of overripe__lack fruit that recall plum preserves. The palate is rich, with flavors of mature black cherry, prune and chocolate bar. This lacks complexity and restraint, but is big, lush and decadent.",Pergole Vece,Le Salette
"Here's a bright and aromatic selection, with forward aromas of red plum, cherry and raspberry. Mouthwatering and inviting, ripe and juicy fruit flavors flood the palate. This is fresh, lively and extremely approachable now.",,Domaine Mirabau
"This doesn't have a very expressive nose, but black fruit and raisin aromas do unfold. The palate shows restrained black-cherry and nutmeg flavors, along with fresh acidity. Pair with savory pastas or risottos.",,Domenico Fraccaroli
"This blend of Malbec, Bonarda, Syrah and Cabernet Sauvignon is oaky and minty up front, with pencil lead and exotic blueberry aromas. In the mouth, this has a fast pulse, while flavors of Middle Eastern spices, cassis and blueberry finish briny but short.",Colosal,Don Miguel Gascón
"So ripe and sweet in raspberry jam, cherry pie and plum sauce flavor, it makes it hard to appreciate the other qualities of this Syrah. It also has lovely, soft tannins and a long, spicy finish. Doesn't leave much to the imagination, but it sure is a tasty wine.",,Eponymous
"Made from Petit Manseng__he grape that is used to produce the sweet wines of Jurançon in southwest France__his has dense scents of apricot, white currant and tea. The zest acidity cuts through this wine's sweetness and flesh, which keeps the finish feeling lively and fresh.",Raepheus,Glen Manor
"Soft, sweet and robust, with upfront cherry pie, red currant and plum flavors. Lots of spices, too, ranging from cinnamon and anise to black pepper. Easy to like this Cab with a juicy filet mignon.",,Greg Norman California Estates
"Scents of marshmallows and spun sugar are twined around flavors of lemon, candied orange peel and English Breakfast tea. It's off-dry, brisk and lively.",,For a Song
"Toast, espresso and mocha aromas lead the nose while the bracing palate offers raw red berry, anise, coffee and a hint of chocolate. Grainy tannins provide firm support but leave an astringent finish. Wait another few years for the tannins to soften a bit then drink up.",,Giribaldi
"Plum, cassis, herb and spice aromas make for a full, pleasant bouquet. This shows a thick tannic plodding palate along with quick-hitting berry and cassis flavors. Lasting acidity on the finish creates welcome freshness and length.",,Nieto Senetiner
"Crisp stony lightly herbal plum aromas are moderately smoky. This feels flush and pleasant, with a full body and flavors of plum, cassis and tomato sauce. A controlled composed finish benefits from lasting acidity.",Reserva Barrancas Vineyards,Pascual Toso
"Macho grapy aromas are offset by spunky raspberry scents. Fruity and a bit narrow and grabby across the palate, this delivers Mendoza's patented black-fruit flavors wrapped in chocolaty oak. Spice and oak remain present on a full finish.",Serie A,Zuccardi
"This is a great find in this category. Gentle, floral notes of honey and apple mark nose and palate. The light body gives a charming, almost delicate character to this well-balanced and refreshing sweet wine.",,Mirassou
"Leesy fleshy papaya aromas come with a touch of sulfur and harshness. This feels solid, albeit modest in bubbles. Flavors of apple and green melon are lasting and steady on the finish.",Brut Natural Reserva,Albet I Noya
"Rich, fruity and textured, this expresses freshness with its acidity and red-currant flavors. These cut through the tangy texture, giving a tight aftertaste. The wine can be drunk immediately for its crispness or held until late 2016 to let it soften.",Brut Rosé Premier Cru,Aubry
"The aromas of wild strawberries, spice and sarsaparilla are immediate in their appeal. The palate is light bodied and elegant, with mouthwatering acids and flavors that linger. This wine is delicate but brings a lot of enjoyment.",Unconditional,Battle Creek
"This wine offers clean, slightly dilute raspberry fruit, along with lovely aromatics and a persistent, engaging finish. In spite of the lightness, it holds your interest.",Cattrall Brothers Vineyard,Big Table Farm
"Oak, almond and nutmeg represent the rounder, lusher aspects of the 10% Sémillon in this Sauvignon Blanc-based wine, complemented by creamy pear, peach and melon. The two work together well, providing soft layers of crisp goodness in a glass.",Dissonance,Blackbird Vineyards
"Aromas of exotic spice, plum, violet and a whiff of chopped herb lead the nose. The firm palate delivers tart red cherry, espresso, anise, vanilla and coconut alongside brisk acidity and grainy tannins.",,Broccardo
"Notes of cinnamon and peppercorns adds complexity to the cranberry-pomegranate fruit and slate minerality on the nose of this single-vineyard expression. It's more reserved in its palate, which offers cranberry tang with an herbal sagebrush quality, proving a reliable, straightforward take on the grape.",Erwin Vineyard,Clos La Chance
"Aromas of plum, blackberry, violet and exotic spice jump out of the glass. The bright, polished palate offers black cherry, raspberry jam and black pepper alongside fresh acidity. It's made for immediate drinking pleasure so enjoy soon.",Vignota,Conterno Fantino
"Soft and buttery, this drink-now style is as smooth as a polished stone. The fruit is fairly generic and light, but the penetrating punch of popcorn and nut oil carries it along nicely.",Estate Reserve,David Hill
"This wine is tightly wound yet intense, ripe and tart in cherry, rose and lush earth. Baking spices make their way through the density of fruit, while the texture struggles to find balance. Let this powerfully built wine open in the glass.",,Della
"Sun-kissed grapefruit and tangerine flavors are accented by darker notes of bramble and lime zest in this crisp, cutting Riesling. Off-dry, juicy yet refreshing and light-footed, it's an everyday wine with a touch of flair and elegance.",Oppenheimer Kabinett,Dr. Heyden
"Fresh yellow cherries and greengage plums perfume this spry but lushly textured Riesling. It is dry in style, but has a comforting clinginess that enriches the finish. Drink now.",Dry,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Waxy aromas of lanolin, dried apple and cheese set up a plump well-balanced palate, with plenty of body weight and adequate acidity. Peach, apple and melon flavors are moderately stony and minerally, while this varietal Garnacha Blanca finishes with good length.",Selecció,Edet_ria
"This opens with somewhat rustic aromas of overripe fruit, truffle, game and a whiff barnyard. The round, accessible palate is already evolved, showing dried black cherry, mocha, anisette and a confectionary note alongside smooth tannins. Drink sooner rather than later.",,Fontanafredda
"Ripe and full, this comes from a producer based just south of the Côtes de Blancs. Yellow fruits are cut with citrus to give a rich, while refreshing wine. Smooth with an orange-zest texture, it is ready to drink.",Blanc de Blancs Premier Cru Brut,Forget-Brimont
"The nose on this widely available bottling is vivacious and juicy, with strawberry, strawberry blossoms and raspberries laid across a pencil-lead frame. It tightens on the palate, with lots of graphite and pencil shavings, showing just a bit of pomegranate fruit.",,Gainey
"Aromas of orange peel and orange essence are oily and bring softer notes of melon, apple and tropical fruits. This is bright but basic on the tongue, with cutting acidity. Tropical flavors of green melon and mango are ratcheted by citric acidity, while the finish is citrusy and pithy.",,Gotas de Mar
"Well made, well rounded and well balanced, this medium-bodied wine has tasty fruit aromas and flavors. Spicy accents accompany a firm, layered texture and lasting finish.",Old Vine Kazmet Vineyard,Graziano
"Apple and peach aromas are clean and pure. This feels round yet compact, with orange, nectarine and pithy flavors. Green-apple tartness and malic acidity push a pure finish that doesn't balk.",Uhin Berdea,K5 Argiñano
"Pine forest and tart, lean drops of cranberry, rhubarb and pomegranate combine for a complex, savory and compelling vineyard-designate. A strong presence of tannin marks the finish.",La Cruz Vineyard,Keller Estate
"Aromas of red berry, grilled herb, oak-driven spice and a balsamic note lead the nose on this. The palate is still tight and closed but eventually gives up raw cherry, strawberry, sage and espresso alongside assertive, raspy tannins. Let the tannins soften a bit and then drink up before the fruit fades.",San Biagio,Luigino Grimaldi
"The fruit is the star here, ripe and round. Flavors are a nice mix of orange, apple and pear, with a light dusting of baking spices. This is drinking at its freshest peak.",,Mahonia
"Rustic leathery aromas are capped and low on vibrant fruit scents. In the mouth, expect tannic scratchiness. Flavors of plum, cassis and toasty oak come across as mildly baked, while a narrow finish with notes of earth, loam and chocolate is solid. Drink now.",Reserva,Marqués de Vitoria
"Raisin and prune aromas indicate full ripeness, while jammy fig notes come in later and confirm this wine's warm-vintage DNA. A clampy palate with big tannins offers inky flavors of plum and prune, while an oaky concentrated finish feels jammy. Drink through 2018.",Barranc Dels Closos,Mas Igneus
"Tropical fruit aromas are suggestive of bath soap and body oil. This feels obtuse, with depth and an oily sensation to the palate. Chunky, ripe, oily flavors of melon and orange finish loud and ripe, with a deeper set of tropical fruit flavors than your average Argentine Torrontés.",Petite Fleur,Monteviejo
"With a sense of tannic structure and a dry background, this is a firm wine. It has some weight, although the texture and the black currant fruits are light and stylish rather than dense. Drink from 2016.",,Château les Ancres
"This wine is fresh without being too herbaceous. Sauvignon Blanc controls crispness with flavors of almonds, citrus and quince. The tangy, steely aftertaste will soften from the end of 2015.",,Château Taussin
"Although obviously still young, this fruity wine will develop fast. It benefits from the ripe fruit of the vintage, sweet black currants and berries that are given a crisp edge by the acidity. Already balanced, it will be drinkable from 2016.",Premium,Château Taussin
"A ripe wine that is almost off dry, this has a ripe cherry character, rich in the mouth and with a full texture. The aftertaste brings out spice and tannins. Bordeaux Clairet lies between rosé and red in color and in taste.",,Château Timberlay
"Tropical fruit, passion fruit and lime aromas are a bit sweaty and suggestive of pine resin. This is low on spine and verve, meaning it's a touch flat and flabby. Briny nectarine and tarragon flavors finish with green notes of scallion and lime.",,Emina
"Softly sweet, this brings bright Fuji apple and Anjou pear aromas and flavors. It charms with fresh fruit character and stays away from the dry balance of more serious wines.",,Gen5
"In this near-equal split between the two varieties, both show themselves on the aromas and flavors of overripe pear, peach and flowers, with the alcohol evident throughout.",Couplet Conner-Lee,J. Bookwalter
"This shows a bright yellow-gold color and light lemon and butter aromas. Pronounced butter, lemon and almond flavors almost overwhelm the lean texture. Tart in taste and light in texture, it refreshes the mouth.",N 76,JCB
"This was aged but three months in oak, but it smells and tastes woody. Char, resin and toasty blackberry and black plum aromas lead into a resiny palate with charred flavors of black cherry and plum. Burnt, bitter notes rise up on the finish.",3 Meses en Barrica,Nacido del Quórum
"Not too big and not too lean, this strikes a middle ground where generous strawberry and plum aromas and similarly soft flavors make it easy to drink. The texture is smooth and light, and the finish is short.",,Rebusity
"This is a perfumed wine with aromas of fresh flowers, orange peel and citrus. It drinks dry with a broad, fleshy feel, falling a bit flat on the finish.",Estate Grown,San Juan Vineyards
"This bombastically brawny Merlot is blended with Syrah and Malbec. The grapes have been sourced from some fine vineyards, including Hudson, Stagecoach and Antica, as well as the cooler Trefethen in Oak Knoll. Juicy blackberry veers into syrupy territory, a thickness that never lets up, accented in smoky oak and vanilla.",,Thorn
Aromas of ripe apple and poached pear are accented by spice. It drinks medium sweet with mandarin-orange flavors that linger.,,Two Vines
"Stalky, mulchy aromas of compost and underripe fruit are a low point on this otherwise decent high-end Rioja from a poor vintage. Hard and grating across the palate, this tastes stalky, burnt and raw, with oak for cover.",Reserva,Valenciso
"A blend of 90% Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo, this forward wine opens with aromas that recall scorched earth, blue flowers and baked plum. The evolved, rather rustic palate offers black cherry, cured meat and game alongside fleeting tannins.",Redi,Vecchia Cantina di Montepulciano
"Raspberry and red-plum aromas are light and generic. This feels a touch rough and rubbery, with acidity that stands out. Plum and berry flavors taste rustic and burnt, while the finish is fresh but rugged.",Canchales Vino Joven,Bodegas Riojanas
"This is a bit herbal and sweaty, even a little boxwood-pungent. The herbal, leafy flavors are light and refreshing, vanishing too quickly on the finish.",Awatere Valley,The Crossings
"For the price, this delivers exactly what you should expect: clean winemaking; varietally true aromas and flavors of white grapefruit, nectarine and tomato leaf; and a clean, refreshing finish.",,Zeal
"A ripe, red-fruited wine with a rich character, this offers vanilla as well as citrus and berry fruit flavors. It is just off dry, fresh and brightly fruity. It makes for a delicious, crisp summer rosé.",,Château de Sours
This is a soft wine that is round and with a fat texture. It is rich with soft crushed strawberry flavors. The acidity does come through at the end to ensure a fresh aftertaste.,Classic,Château Lauduc
"Simple aromas of apple cider come with a hint of match stick and brine. This feels round and fleshy, like an unfiltered apple cider. Flavors of generic citrus and apple juice finish pulpy and round. Drink now.",,Arrumaco
"Chunky aromas of apple cider, pineapple, pine and juniper are challenging. This feels juicy, with sharp acidity. Nectarine is the lead flavor, while apple and pithy bitterness push the finish.",Xión,Attis
"This simple wine opens with subdued aromas of blue flowers, red berry and a whiff of menthol. The informal palate offers raw, red cherry alongside hints of mint and anise. Brisk acidity and rather fleeting tannins lead to a short, drying finish.",,Brancaia
"Crisp and tangy, this is all about acidity, red currant and a refreshing, bright aftertaste. It's lively on the palate, a wine that will be just right with summer food.",,Château Pilet
"This caramel- and red-fruit-flavored wine is fresh with red berries and balanced acidity. A food style of rosé, it's round with just a light tang of orange zest at the end.",Réserve,Château Rauzan Despagne
"Crisp and very fruity, this offers bright and intense acidity. There is a light, tangy texture and a bright, poised aftertaste. Drink now.",,Château Timberlay
"This delicious, fruity wine is full of acidity and crisp fruit. Light, bright and dominated by green and citrus fruits, it is ready to drink now.",,Château Vircoulon
"This well-made wine in a rich style smells like ripe pears and melted butter, and tastes soft and almost sweet, resembling pear and peach juice. The texture is smooth and soft and the body is medium, so it's easy to enjoy.",,Dark Horse
"Fruity aromas of fresh, dark cherry and a whiff of leafy underbrush lead the nose of this blend of Sangiovese, Colorino and Merlot. The soft, simple palate delivers juicy black cherry and a gamey note alongside delicate, fleeting tannins.",Sorrettole,La Querce
"Leathery, horsey lead aromas include hints of licorice, baked plum and green herbs. This Garnacha has a saucy, tomatoey feel and leafy red-berry flavors that finish with a hint of sweet caramel and herbal overtones.",Aldeya,Pago Aylés
"Subtle aromas and flavors of crisp apple and cherry, a dry composition, fine texture and crisp finish make this rather reserved and well balanced. This reliable standby is the kind of bubbly to have on hand for spur-of-the-moment occasions.",Brut,Korbel
"Blackberry and cassis aromas are limited by a grassy, green element on the nose. In the mouth, this is loud, edgy and tannic. Flavors of saucy tomato, stewed blackberry, coconut and vanilla finish ripe and full, but a little stewy. Overall this wine is strong and generous but shows some gaps in its composition.",Marques de Casa Concha,Concha y Toro
"Oak, roasted coffee bean and coconut aromas lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, exotic spice, oak extract and espresso alongside astringent wood tannins that dry out the mouth. There's not quite enough fruit richness to stand up to the oak.",Vigna del Gris,Conterno Fantino
"Coming from a reliable vineyard in the Los Alamos Valley, this wine presents aromas of dried violet, blackberry, leather and espresso. Brooding dried-cherry fruit directs the palate, which benefits further from roasted game and crushed oregano and thyme. The tannins are still prominent.",Black Oak Vineyard,Coquelicot
"This 100% varietal is completely made with fruit from Red Mountain Vineyard. Brightly aromatic, the wine offers notes of cherry cordial, black licorice and vanilla, with the volatiles amped up but just in check. It's rich, high-octane and liquorous with abundant cranberry flavors.",,Corvus
"This savory red features aromas and flavors of violet, juicy blueberry, blackberry, plum and a whiff of cake spice. Firm but fine-grained tannins give support. While it's full-bodied, it's also easy to drink. A licorice note signals the close.",Sasseo,Masseria Altemura
"The bouquet of this wine takes time to fully open, but eventually reveals a lush mélange of pineapple, honeydew, yellow apple, buttered popcorn and orange creamsicle. Ample acidity keeps the mouthfeel fresh and the palate lifted, giving levity to the ripe fruit flavors. A hint of flintiness lingers on the close. Drink now.",,Meerlust
"The oak, a mixture of French and American, vies with the fruit for attention. Notes of vanilla and woodspice get out in front of the variety's cranberry and raspberry aromas and flavors. It's tart, puckering and fruit-filled, with a chalky feel to the tannins.",,Mercer
"A blend of seven different varieties, this wine is aromatic and fruit forward, recalling blueberry pie and cocoa with a citrus top note. It's plush but still deft in feel with soft tannins and abundant blue-fruit flavors.",Brothers' Blend,Milbrandt
"Aromas of scorched earth, underbrush, spicy plum, allspice and graphite lead the nose. On the palate, notes of cracked pepper and clove accent the mature blackberry, raspberry and fig flavors. It's balanced with well-integrated tannins and finishes on a note of bitter almond. Drink through 2016.",Curtirussi,Mocavero
"The intensely floral nose suggests wild rose and violet. The bright palate delivers wild cherry, raspberry and licorice alongside a note of medicinal herb. Firm but fine-grained tannins frame the savory flavors.",La Tradizione,Montalbera
"Light and crisp, this wine offers the freshness of orange rind and lemon, both aromatically and on the palate. It's refreshing and not overdone.",,Dominican Oaks
"Floral jasmine opens this wine aromatically, followed by a bite of sweet, softly layered vanilla custard and honey. Restrained in sweetness, the layers go increasingly soft, ending smooth and creamy,",Staten Family Reserve,Field Stone
"This warm, brawny wine opens with aromas of tilled soil, underbrush, plum and ripe, dark berry. The dense, spicy palate delivers prune, raisin, licorice and ground black pepper alongside velvety tannins. The heat of evident alcohol dominates the finish.",Il Rosso di Vespa,Futura 14
"The aromatic notes of vanilla, tire rubber, cocoa and woodspice don't seem in harmony. It's a shame because the rich cranberry and raspberry flavors serve up plenty of enjoyment.",,Gordon Estate
This wine brings a very Washington Malbec profile of plum and green herbs along with barrel accents. The flavors are straight down the fairway with vanilla notes lingering on the finish.,,Hamilton
"A very approachable and ready-to-drink nonvintage red blend, this has about eight varietals in the mix. Aromas suggest buttered cherry soufflé served atop a plank of smoked cedar. There's a woody sense to the palate as well, with espresso and cherry liqueur.",Repertoire,Harmony Cellars
"Pure varietal and surprisingly light for this often tannic grape, this leads with pretty raspberry and cherry fruit set in sweet baking spices, and finished with a lick of chocolate and a frame of toasty oak. It's balanced and proportionate, though definitely on the lighter side.",,Tinhorn Creek
"Delicious and straightforward, this vibrant wine conveys aromas of wild berry and a whiff of clove. The savory, easy-drinking palate doles out juicy black cherry, crushed raspberry and a hint of black pepper alongside supple tannins. There's no complexity but it's perfect for everyday fare. Or chill it down for a refreshing summer red.",,Tormaresca
"Aromas of smoke, underbrush, espresso and grilled herb lead the nose on this blend of Nero di Troia and Aglianico. The palate offers dried black cherry, anisette, coffee and toast alongside chewy tannins.",Bolonero,Torrevento
"This wine is made from a single clone grown in a single vineyard, then aged sur lees in French barrels. It starts with a complex bouquet perfumed like a Gewürztraminer, the palate crisp and lowly impacted by oak.",Three Roses,TR Elliott
"This directly appealing wine features subtle notes of mineral, lime leaf, flowers and white peach. It drinks off dry (10.49g/L residual sugar) with mouthwatering stone fruit flavors.",,Trust
"This barrel selection offers aromas of peach, apple and lime sorbet, with a sharper sense of dried herbs as well. The palate delivers high-tone flavors of chopped dill, tart apple, lime peel and cut grass. A lean and focused wine.",Vintner's Select,Summerland
"Unusual for the Russian River, this 100% Cab is earthy and robust in chalky tannin accented by milk chocolate and juicy cassis. An edge of forest floor plays throughout, with the wine exhibiting more dry tannin on the finish.",Estate,Tara Bella
"This aromatic wine carries notes of movie theater buttered popcorn, peach and lees. It's full bodied with buttery stone fruit flavors that show a considerable amount of creaminess and elegance.",,Telaya
"The main nonvintage wine from Veuve Doussot is soft, creamy with plenty of ripe, fresh fruits. Pears and apricots come to the fore and are attractively cut by the lime acidity. Around this fruit, there's good mineral tightness and finishing acidity.",Tradition Brut,Veuve Doussot
"Smoky aromas lead to a lightly structured wine that is all about red fruits and spice. Light bitterness, fresh acidity and tannins support the natural crispness of this still-young wine. Drink now, chilled, or wait until 2016 for a more mature flavor.",Cuvée Voluptance,Vignoble de la Jarnoterie
"A ripe, fruity wine that is bone-dry but so full of red fruits that it seems soft. It's a delicious, lightly textured wine with a good touch of minerality at the end. Drink now.",Domaine des Clairneaux,Vignobles Berthier
"With small percentages of Merlot and Malbec, this Cab offers distinct herbal notes, its body medium in weight and acidity. Clove and fig round out the profile.",,Whitehall Lane
"Graphite-laced minerality meets with raspberry-blackberry liqueur on the nose of this wine. Licorice, black coffee and creosote dominate the palate, which is quite heavy with tannins. This could use cellaring until 2016_2017 to become an even stronger wine.",Black Hawk Estate,Wild Coyote
"From a small family-run operation that is 100% estate, this Cab is thick in blueberry and blackberry, almost syrupy rich. With a big juicy backbone, it offers a full-figured body and leathery texture, ending explosively with notes of black licorice and toffee. Cellar through 2020.",Emily Kestrel,Summit Lake
"White flowers and pine fronds perfume crisp yellow peach and apricots in this delicate, yet intensely concentrated Riesling. Zesty, cutting and spry, it's a bright star for Riesling in a region traditionally not known for the variety. Made from __irgin_ seedless berries known for their intense aroma and flavor concentration.",Virgin Berry Dry,The Grapes of Roth
"Subtle, spicy oak influences mingle beautifully with tasty Bing cherry and persimmon flavors in this medium to full bodied wine that has a silky texture, crisp balance and fine-grained tannins. Good balance and interesting complexity propel it more than fruit intensity.",Wentzel Vineyard,Waits-Mast
"This perfumed Riesling entices with lifted white floral notes against a backdrop of cool, foresty green notes. It's forward and juicy, boasting honeyed yellow peach and apricot flavors. Yet it's also elegantly structured, marked by zesty citrus notes and a cool, mineral finish that lingers endlessly. Drink now_2020.",Semi Dry,Silver Thread
"This is the inaugural release from this project that pairs Chateau Ste. Michelle with Rhône stars Michel Gassier and Philippe Cambie. Coming from a variety of vineyards across the Columbia Valley, it offers aromas of black cherry, smoke, incense and cocoa. The flavors are plush in feel with a finish that lingers__n impressive first offering.",The Pundit,Tenet
"This wine is 73% Cabernet Sauvignon and a whopping 27% Petit Verdot, with the fruit coming from Yellow Bird and Tokar vineyards. Brooding aromas of freshly tilled soil, dried flowers, herbs and cherry lead to a richly flavored but well-balanced palate. It should age well.",Coalescence,Tulpen
"Nearly 75% Syrah with the rest Cabernet Sauvignon, this features aromas that pop, with black plum, blackberry seed, pencil lead and milk chocolate. It's sensuous and palate-coating in feel, with layered fruit flavors that show purity and richness.",2 Spires,William Church
"All varietal, this wine delivers with aromas and flavors of plum, Asian spices, coffee and fresh herbs. Flavors are plump in feel with the oak (51% new French) providing accents.",Gamache Vineyard,William Church
"Fragrant and fresh, this offers scents of blue flowers, wild berry, moist earth, chopped herbs and a hint of baking spice. The vibrant, supple palate doles out juicy black cherry, crushed raspberry, white pepper and star anise alongside fresh acidity. It's made to be enjoyed young so drink through 2016.",Brichet,Ca' Viola
"Vines with an average age of 30 years give this wine good intensity that balances the firm, dark tannins. It's a powerful, concentrated Merlot-based wine, big and generous. Ripe plums and berries show strongly through the tannic structure. Give this wine until 2017 before drinking.",Cuvée des Capucins,Château des Arnauds
"This is the second wine of Château Pibran, whose vineyard is situated close to those of the the first growths of Mouton and Lafite. Structured and dense, this is a solid, powerful wine, packed with juicy black currant fruits and generous tannins. Give this wine until 2018 before drinking.",Château Tour Pibran,Château Pibran
"Tight, young and tangy, this wine will be delicious when it all comes together. The elements are all there, with the quince and pear fruits, intense acidity and the crisp texture that is so refreshing. Drink this ageworthy wine from 2017.",Sec,Domaine de la Gaverie
"Aromas of herb, cedar, mushroom, anise and cherry are reserved on this Cabernet Sauvignon-dominant blend. It's supple in feel, with well-balanced dark-fruit flavors and tart acidity that draws out the finish.",Estate Grown and Bottled,Hedges Family Estate
"Intense aromas of summer blackberries and cherry preserves waft from the nose of this rich, fruity, yet elegantly structured red. The palate is classic in style marked by ruffles of peppery spice and fine-grained tannins. A streak of menthol lingers through a long, black cherry finish.",,Hermann J. Wiemer
"The inaugural release from this négociant winery is a blend of Mourvèdre, Grenache and Syrah. The aromas pop with notes of black pepper, marionberry and herbes de provence. Flavors are fleshy and fruit-forward with a snap of acidity that pulls it all together.",Vin de Table,Les Trouvés
"This opens with aromas of dark berry, forest floor, dried rose, new leather and a balsamic note. On the palate, notes of white pepper, coffee and clove accent a core of crunchy red berry. Racy acidity and assertive tannins provide the framework. Drink 2018_2023.",Cannubi,Marchesi di Barolo
"No punches are pulled on this hedonistic wine with its aromas and flavors of blackberry, chocolate and barrel spice. It's rich and high octane but maintains a sense of balance.",The Estates Northridge,Milbrandt
"The fruit for this 100% varietal wine comes from Cold Creek, Klipsun and Anna Marie vineyards. Herb, dark fruit, toast and raspberry aromas lead to tightly wound fruit flavors with a buttery top note. Its best days await. Enjoy after 2018.",,Northstar
"Aromas of dark-skinned fruit, underbrush, mocha, spice and a balsamic note lead the nose on this structured Dolcetto. The full-bodied palate doles out mature blackberry, dried black cherry, licorice and ground pepper alongside chewy tannins. A note of bitter almond signals the close.",Bricco Botti,Pecchenino
"Talk about a composed wine; this opens with pure, subtle scents of raspberry, cherry and licorice. Next up is a young but clean palate housing choppy, bright acidity. Wild berry, herb and carob flavors finish with breadth and grab; drink this varietal Monastrell through 2020.",Uno,Rafael Cambra
"From the producer's estate ranch, a coveted source of Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, this is a 100% stainless-steel wine, low in ripeness, that's enthusiastic in watermelon, cherry and strawberry, smelling like summer. Dark pink-red in color, it's crisp, light, tangy in acidity and everything you want in a quaffing wine.",Rosé of,Charles Heintz
"Aromas of mixed black fruits, spice and earth are deep, thorough and integrated. This blend of 40% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Carmenère, 20% Malbec and 10% Cabernet Franc is tight and taught, with austerity and tannic grip. Flavors of toast, coffee and plum finish peppery, dry, tight and herbal, with a chocolaty note added in for good measure; drink through 2022.",D,Casa Donoso
"This may not be as potent or complex as Colombier's Cuvée Gaby, but it comes close, which makes it an excellent value. Meaty, savory notes are ideally suited for accompanying autumn game or winter stews, yet the tannins are supple, making it approachable already.",,Domaine du Colombier
"Leathery cherry and plum aromas offer a hint of tobacco as well as a burnt, roasted note. This is healthy in feel, with lively, snappy acidity. Flavors of herbs, vanilla, tomato, tobacco and red currant finish wiry and high-toned, with moderate tartness and plenty of length. Drink through 2023.",Gran Reserva Tempranillo-Graciano,Bodegas Ontañón
"Made from Syrah grapes with purpose, not as a saignée, this is an alluring wine, its aromatics exuberant in wild strawberry and rhubarb, with a pithy, textured vibe. With just the right amount of power and body, it's vibrant and yet has body and weight, retaining substance through the long finish.",Corallina,Cornerstone
"Offering deep complexity, this bold, brazen wine is decadent in caramel and toffee aromas and flavors, with a foundation of ripe Gravenstein apple and hazelnuts. The oak is pronounced but it adds more than it subtracts. Cellar through 2018.",Star Vineyard,D.R. Stephens
"Ripe fruit flavors and a gorgeously rich texture make this full-bodied wine difficult to resist. It smells like Pippin apples and toasted almonds, tastes more like Bosc pears with a layer of cream on top, yet it's dry and well balanced.",The Choir,Atrea
"Fresh ripe raspberry aromas are cut with cranberry-skin tartness in this wine by Josh Baker and Matt Brain. They have also managed to sneak blood, pencil shavings, eucalyptus and vanilla stick into the nose of this appellation blend. It's lively and tasty with ripe, tart red fruits once sipped, juicy yet cut with chaparral scrub elements.",,Baker & Brain
"From an unusual appellation for the grape, this wine offers a whisper of rose on the nose. A substantial layering and weight of black cherry and raspberry pounce the palate, with a back beat of oak. Savory and smoky, it remains balanced and well structured, keeping up through a lengthy finish.",Bowland Ranch,E16
"Dwelley Vineyard provides most of the fruit for this Merlot. Toasty barrel aromas are at the fore followed by exotic spices, milk chocolate and cherry. The flavors are plush and jammy, lingering on the finish.",,Barrister
"Intense, earthy aromas suggest truffle and leather. Smooth and fresh flavors focus on delicious berry and spice. Big, velvety tannins are uplifted by energizing minerality, delivering a finish with fantastic length. Drink 2015_2028.",,Il Paradiso di Manfredi
"Lifted, lemony freshness mixes with lime zest on the nose. Underneath some pungent arugula also dances on the palate, where pepperiness and fresh acidity guarantee pleasure with this concentrated but toned white.",Gaisberg Reserve,Eichinger
"At this point subdued, this wine promises future pleasures with a ripe, rounded but precise character. Right now, it's citrus that shows, with ripe lemon zest and some grapefruit. Underneath riches of red apples, yellow peaches and apricots await. Purity and minerality are a bonus. This is a keeper; drink as of 2018.",Heiligenstein Reserve,Eichinger
"Red-cheeked apples, juicy pear and Mirabelle plums comes out to play here, tightly held by brilliant acidity. The undertone of herbal savoriness is glimpsed and will come to the fore as this ages. Drink as of 2016.",Ried Achleiten Smaragd,Josef Jamek
"Ripe peach, dried sultana and a touch of dried fig suggest superripe grapes. Nonetheless, the dry and mineral palate creates a firm, dry frame for all that fruit. Austere discipline contrasts with opulent fruit, and the tussle will please the lucky drinker. The length is astonishing.",Wieland Reserve,Mantlerhof
"One of Montalcino's most sought-out wines, this 2008 is an outstanding effort. It opens with earthy notes of black berries, tilled soil, underbrush, leather, tobacco and prune. The succulent palate reveals juicy wild cherry and black raspberry energized by notes of white pepper, licorice and thyme. Still young and tannic, it should develop beautifully. Drink 2015_2028.",Vigna Schiena d'Asino,Mastrojanni
"Pear, arugula, white pepper and apricots take turns in dazzling nose and palate. A serious, concentrated and mineral vein of power also courses through this sleek wine, which holds even more future promise.",Gaisberg Reserve,Allram
"Seductive notes of fragrant, red-cheeked peaches come together with notes of honeysuckle. The palate displays the same beguiling aromatics and is slender but deep. Concentration and finesse spell a great future.",Silberbichl Reserve,Stift Göttweig
"Another impressive effort from the celebrated Ornellaia estate. it opens with aromas of black berries, plum, blue flower and hints of balsamic herbs. The rich palate delivers a core of fleshy black cherry accented with notes of licorice, black pepper and mocha alongside bracing but refined tannins. It's still young so give it time to fully develop. Drink 2016_2031.",,Ornellaia
"Tightly coiled aromas of lemon and grapefruit peel on this seemingly delicate but in fact steely wine. Grown in ancient rocks this Riesling presents dryness, poise and purity. Drink as of 2018.",Wunderburg,Pichler-Krutzler
"This is powerful and concentrated, with the high proportion of Cabernet Sauvignon in the blend standing out firmly. It is dark, rich, packed with ripe black fruits and sweet tannins. Drink from 2018.",,Château Figeac
"As so often with Montrose, this is a powerful, concentrated and very structured wine. Dense tannins are paired with rich black fruits, although at this stage the wine also has a sense of austerity. Power, severity and complexity all make for a wine for long aging. Wait until 2019.",,Château Montrose
"A spark of flint leaps out of the glass, followed by green plums and Conference pear. That stony touch also tempers the concentrated body and runs from start to pleasantly long finish, ending in a pleasantly bitter sting. Drink as of 2016.",Von Stein Berglagen Reserve,Salomon-Undhof
"Tight and slender on the palate, it has green and yellow citrus flavors in the foreground. Lime and grapefruit peel appear first, followed by stirrings of pink grapefruit flesh. It all adds up to a wine that offers concentration and depth plus exquisite purity.",Heiligenstein Reserve,Schloss Gobelsburg
"A pure and spicy lift of bergamot promises refreshment while the palate whirls with peach, mandarin and blood orange. All are backed by a steely, mineral poise that cuts through the palate like a comet, shimmering with purity, deliciousness and length.",Heiligenstein Reserve,Allram
"This Pinot seems to float weightlessly on the palate, yet the flavors sink in instantly and dazzle. Suggestions of raspberries and red cherries come spiced in white pepper and cinnamon, with richer levels of Dr. Pepper cola, mocha and red licorice, all highlighted with the most perfect acidity. It's easy to fall in love with this wine and drink it now, but it can develop interesting complexities through 2020. The winery is Oregon-based and has a good history with Willamette Valley Pinot Noir.",La Cruz Vineyard,Lachini
"This is a new, low-production designation, a selected barrel reserve, from Laurel Glen's new owners. The wine shows an exuberance resulting from the influence of consulting winemaker David Ramey. Massive blackberry, cassis and dark chocolate flavors, wrapped into Sonoma Mountain's strong tannins, make the wine an ideal cellar candidate. Drink 2018 and beyond.",The Laureate,Laurel Glen
"The wine blends Merlot, Syrah, Cabernet and Sangiovese in equal parts. Aromas of cedar, ripe black berries and plum almost jump from the glass. The juicy fruit carries over to the creamy palate together with black cherry, mint and mocha alongside soft, round tannins that give a velvety texture.",Piastraia,Michele Satta
"A perfect balance between Syrah and Petite Sirah from Calaveras County-based Prospect 772 this new offering hits it out of the park in terms of its dark, near-black color and subdued leather saddle and blueberry aromas. With rounded tannins, this is an intense wine with a distinct sense of personality, concentrated, savory, earthy and ready to age until 2019_2029 or decant awhile before settling into your glass.",Bro Black Tie Charlie Cuvée,Prospect 772
"With each new vintage of Cuvée Elena, the blend of grapes and vineyards grows more complex, the vines older, the flavors more compact and captivating. A sophisticated and penetrating mix of strawberry and raspberry preserves, highlights of herb and spice, a dash of clean earth, and a lingering and detailed finish make this a wine to savor immediately while tucking away a few bottles to watch it evolve.",Cuvée Elena,Syncline
"Tightly closed like a fist, the only intimation of flavor is the seam of lemon-zest acidity. Purity and precision are stony straightjackets that this wine will never escape, but its aromatic development will yield ample pleasure for the patient. Drink as of 2017.",Steinertal Smaragd,Tegernseerhof
"Antinori's blend of 55% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Merlot and 15% Cabernet Franc creates a vibrant, structured wine that shows tension and energy. It opens with aromas of black cherry, black currant, dark spices and leather that carry through to the palate alongside firm but refined tannins and vibrant freshness. It already has nice depth but give it time to develop complexity. Drink 2015_2030.",,Guado al Tasso
"Firm and very structured, it has depth plus some spice from wood aging, along with a dry core that still dominates the fragrant red berry fruits. Don't drink before 2018.",,Château Calon
"Thanks to having some of the highest vineyards in Montalcino, Biondi Santi was able to make a stunning Riserva in the hot and forward 2007 vintage. It opens with aromas of forest floor and dried rose petals. The palate showcases concentrated wild cherry and cinnamon-spice flavors alongside bracing tannins. The wine already boasts impressive depth and structure as well as remarkable freshness for the vintage, but give it time to fully develop. Drink 2017_2037.",Riserva,Biondi Santi
"This brilliant wine is dry and tart in acidity, minerally, and supremely refined in Meyer lemons, pears, limes and tart apples. It's not one of those fat Chardonnays that melts in the mouth, but instead has firm texture and elegant complexity. It makes a beautiful accompaniment to grilled salmon, crab cakes, or a simple but glorious roasted chicken. Don't drink it too cold.",Ashley's,Fess Parker
"What to remark on first: those hints of mellow, luscious ripeness of plum, peach and apple, or that zesty, breezy lemon acidity? Together they make a complete and contrasting picture that focuses on full fruit expression and slender but concentrated linearity.",Heiligenstein Reserve,Jurtschitsch
"Herbal touches of chervil and dill combine with grapefruit zest and a slender but muscular body. Shades of pepper spice are revealed on the tight palate that culminates in a long, delicious and savory finish. Drink as of 2016.",Loiserberg Reserve,Jurtschitsch
"Perfumed green pears, overlaid with the floral charm of summer blossom, characterize this concentrated yet lithe wine. Nonetheless, it is based on a firm core that suggests the ancient rocks where the vines grew. Little by little, a miso-like saltiness also reveals itself.",Steinborz Smaragd,Lagler
"This is Steven Kent's fourth vintage of Lineage, his blockbuster Bordeaux red from carefully tended Livermore fruit. Predominantly Cabernet Sauvignon (65%), it includes 16% Cab Franc, 15% Merlot, 3% Petit Verdot and 2% Malbec. Layered in coffee and herbal cassis, and finely structured, it is an elegant, herbal-kissed, slightly coy wine, enjoyable now with a big meal or ready to sleep in bottle until 2024_2029.",,Lineage
"This is definitely on the plumper, richer side of Riesling. Almost overwhelming peach fruit beckons on the nose. The palate is rounded but dry and tempered by freshness. It is rich and has intimations of dried sultana but remains dry and versatile. With all its spicy allure and long-lasting finish, the impression is almost exotic.",Steinmassl Reserve,Loimer
"Evaluating young Eden Valley Rieslings isn't easy, as they often don't show their full potential for several years. The 2012 Bin 51 is tight and linear, crisply focused and a bit one-dimensional at this age. But the lime-driven fruit is potent and the finish beautifully clean and long. It should develop well over the next 7_8 years or more.",Bin 51,Penfolds
"A subtle, herbal wine, this offers cool vintage flavors of cucumber, jicama and green apples. Complex notes of almond, mineral and fresh herbs extend the palate impression. Baking spices and a streak of caramel roll on through the finish.",Reserve,Lemelson
"This is serious, structured Blaufränkisch. It has ripe berry fruits, a solid structure and bright, juicy acidity that give the wine potential to age well. Cellaring should bring out the bloom of rich cherries and ripeness, so drink from 2016.",Hochäcker,Weninger
"This is a single-vineyard Riesling that is both perfumed and rich. It has a ripe feel, but also fine layers of acidity, fruity currant notes, and a strongly textured, mineral character. This is a wine with a good future, so drink from 2016.",Edelschuh,Wohlmuth
"Mineral tones reverberate through this delicate, light-footed kabinett. It's sweet, with sun-ripened peach and apricot flavors, but ever-so-dainty on the palate, with refreshingly tart tangerine acidity. Drink now for its fresh, revitalizing feel with spicy Thai or Vietnamese fare.",Bernkasteler Badstube Kabinett,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"This approachable yet complex wine features scents of menthol, marinated beef, mocha and blackberries. It's medium to full in body and a bit creamy on the palate without being overly soft, while the fruit flavors turn plummy yet retain a savory edge. Gently structured on the finish, it should continue to drink well through 2020.",The Gypsy,Earthworks
"Whiffs of honeycomb lend a minerally touch to ripe papaya and mango notes on this off-dry, yet intensely tropical Riesling. Soft grapefruit acidity brightens a palate that's moderately full, laced with honey and a delicate bristle of lemon pith. Drink now through 2016.",Charta Kabinett,Baron Knyphausen
"Selección is proving itself to be a consistent modern Malbec (the last four vintages have rated 89 or 90 points). This rendition shows graphite, inky berry notes and savory spice aromas such as cumin and cardamom. It's rich and full bodied, with tobacco, coconut and baked plum and berry flavors. A smooth finish is neither tannic nor overpowering.",Selección,Alamos
"The Vintner's Select is the winery's reserve-level Pinot Noir, and shows the most complexity. An aromatic mix of tea and dried roses leads into detailed flavors of tobacco, sassafras, cola and clean earth. The fruit is a tart blend of rhubarb and raspberry, and the balance is right on. This should drink well over the next 5_7 years.",Vintner's Select,Arbor Brook
"Here's a delicious blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Sagrantino. It delivers high-tone aromas of pressed violets, red berry and spice. The palate offers succulent black cherry and creamy raspberry flavors that are brightened by white pepper and cinnamon accents.",Riserva,Arnaldo Caprai
"This 75-case production of Pinot Noir explodes with flavors of cherries, cola, pomegranates, persimmons, exotic spices and toasty oak. Fine acidity reins all the flavor in, leading to a dry, refined finish. The wine is sourced from grapes in the southern Santa Lucia Mountains. Drink now_2028.",Barrel Select,Asuncion Ridge
"This is the first, and least expensive, of the winery's 2010 Cabs. For $20, you get a dry, smooth, opulent wine, filled with classic black currant, tea and oak flavors.",,Benziger
"This is a wine with potential. It has weight and ripe berry fruits balanced with solid tannins and a dense texture. Behind the structure, the fruit and acidity promise good things. Drink from 2016.",,Château Camelot la Chapelle
"Still showing too much wood, this is a wine that needs a lot of time to outgrow its austerity. It's all structure at the moment, with black currant fruit obscured in the background. There is a mineral edge that promises to soften in a few years as well. Drink this wine from 2018.",,Château Croizet-Bages
"Smooth wood and spice flavors give this wine immediate attractiveness. It has weight and richness, ripe fruit flavors and a spacious feel to the texture. With its complex structure, it's a wine for aging, so drink after 2016.",,Château de Macard
"This is an open, juicy wine with attractive fruit framed by firm but tamed tannins. The wine has a feeling of lightness, with black currant flavors that are lifted and fresh. This is a wine for medium-term aging. Drink from 2015.",,Château Gloria
"While the wood aging is prominent, it doesn't take away from the complex, ripe fruits and acidity. In a word, this is balanced. It has good potential, as the toasty wood integrates over the next two years. Drink from 2015. Screwcap.",Intense,Château Lamothe-Vincent
"Ripe and toasty, this is a rich, full-bodied and juicy wine. It has ripe berry fruits, touches of black currant and balancing acidity. Wood aging supports the palate and adds considerable potential. Drink this fine wine from 2016.",,Château Sainte Marie
"There is an earthy, animal element to this wine that adds complexity to ripe fruit flavors. Currently, it's a wine that is all potential, sweet and dense with a finish of intense acidity. Drink from 2017.",,Château Sigalas Rabaud
"At first this wine seems rather light, with pretty flavors of bramble and wild strawberries. A light dusting of baking spices ensues, and slowly (over many hours) more details come into focus__resh herbs, chocolate and cherries. There is more here than meets the eye, for those willing to give it some extra time.",Lia's Vineyard Unfiltered,J. Christopher
"__o oak/No malo_ the label proclaims, as if to challenge you to like it anyway. What's not to like? Fresh, leesy notes cleanse the palate, and set up the palate for the mix of melon, blood orange and pineapple that defines the flavors. Without any oak or buttery malo, what persists is the vivid, supple acidity.",Cuvée Lunatique,J. Christopher
"From what is sometimes described as Blaufränkisch-land, this is a classic Mittelburgenland wine. It has weight, richness and an exotic edge of paprika and pepper. There is a fine juicy aftertaste. Screwcap.",Goldberg,Johann Heinrich
"This wine has just enough residual sugar to take it to the upper threshhold of dry. It's quite full flavored with a thirst quenching mix of citrus, apple and pineapple. Crisp acidity enhances the freshness and contributes a tangy, lemony kick to the finish.",Dry,Lemelson
"This is a well crafted, aromatic reserve, crafted in a pretty style that brings scents and flavors of fresh raspberries and candied cherries to the fore. Streaks of cola and clean earth add some depth to the finish.",Lia's Vineyard Jory Bench Reserve,Longplay
"This opens with aromas of oak and espresso. The palate is more interesting, with ripe blackberry and spice in the forefront followed by a warm palate accented with menthol and white pepper notes. It's powerfully structured with noticeable warmth.",,Rocca di Fabbri
"Rounded and rich, with a pepper and spiced apple character, this is a warm, full-bodied wine. It has a fine texture, but dense structure. From vines just above the castle in Stein, it is still a young wine, so don't drink before 2015. Screwcap.",Berglagen Vom Stein Reserve,Salomon-Undhof
"Sourced from vines over 103-years old, this wine has unusual concentration of flavor, in the form of black and red raspberries and Dr. Pepper. The wine showcases Zin's briary, brambly spiciness, as well as firm but drinkable tannins. Drink now_2016.",Dolinsek Ranch Old Vine,Portalupi
"Credit the complex flavors of this wine to the blend, which consists of Zinfandel, Grenache and Syrah. One-third new oak lends a buttered toast note to flavors of raspberries and mocha. High alcohol brings a pleasant buzz of heat. Delicious for drinking now.",,Proulx
"Dry, with dusty tannins and ripe fruit, this is a wine with considerable potential. The berry fruits have a balanced, juicy element, fine acidity and a strong texture. The wine is rich and full, while remaining fresh. Drink from 2015.",,Domaine de l'A
"From 50-year old vines, this wine shows good concentration and a pepper character that shoots through the acidity and apple fruitiness. It's a complex wine with a dry edge, that should be served with food rather than as an apéritif. Screwcap.",Alte Reben,Ebner-Ebenauer
"This young Aglianico is still closed but the palate eventually reveals black plum and black cherry accented by notes of black pepper. It has a brooding character, with bracing tannins that leave a drying finish. Drink 2016_2022.",,Villa Raiano
"Along with the Lonesome Spring Ranch Sangiovese, the blend includes 25% Cabernet Sauvignon. It's still pulling itself together and needs some airing out, but shows accents of rose water along with strawberry-flavored fruit. The tannins are astringent and the acids tart and citrusy.",,Wind Rose
"A blend of 80% Primitivo and 20% Aglianico, this dense wine opens with aromas of toasted oak, spearmint and spice alongside ripe black fruit and prune. The one-dimensional palate serves up mature__lmost overripe__lackberry layered with hints of vanilla extract, bitter prune and sugared coffee.",Vino e Anima,Ager Falernus
"Made with native grape Piedirosso, this wine opens with berry, spice and mineral aromas along with a whiff of smoked ham. The palate offers fresh acidity and a black cherry flavor that's accented by black and white pepper.",Per e' palumm,Agnanum
"Aged for nine months in neutral oak, this is a no-frills take on Cabernet Franc. Cranberry and raspberry fruit and a distinctive mineral streak lead into quite astringent tannins. The overall structure is balanced, but the minimal ripeness suggests drinking this by 2017.",,Animale
"Silky in black and red berry fruit, this young Zin from a great, dry-farmed eastside Dry Creek vineyard offers notable acidity amidst a still-grippy mouthfeel. Layered, it would make a luxurious pairing for grilled ribs in an Asian-spiced glaze.",Maple Vineyards,Armida
"Tight, light and layered in freshly baked bread and firm cherry and cranberry, this is a soft, rounded Pinot from an inland Sonoma Coast site that's balanced, food-friendly and ready to enjoy now through 2016.",Parmalee-Hill Vineyard,Armida
"This Sémillon-Sauvignon Blanc blend hits the nose with near-petrol scents, and then slides into a slightly sour orange juice zone. On the palate, that citrusy intrigue continues into a lime zest finish. It's a vibrant, refreshing sipper, though it leans on tingling acidity more than overall balance. Serve with cacio e pepe pasta, raw oysters, or anything needing a lemony boost.",Happy Canyon Vineyards,Barrack
"Dusty berry aromas come with hints of lemon peel and sawdust. For the most part, this is a nice but basic wine with a forward outlook. Juicy flavors of raspberry and plum are backed by a loamy, slightly over- ripe tasting finish.",Crianza,Lágrimas de Maria
"Early aromas of wet cement and rubber transition to leafy, herbal and mildly green. This feels tight, drawing and unforgiving. Flavors of leafy, roasted plum and berry are slightly stalky, while the finish is juicy in feel and herbal in flavor.",Hado,Pujanza
"Hints of cedar add spice and warmth to aromas of ripe red plums and cherries on this sprightly Cabernet Franc. The palate is tart with cranberry acidity but builds in richness and body, finishing with a fringe of velvety tannins.",,Fox Run
"Whiffs of smoke and earth meld into pretty aromas of white flower, apple and lemon on this ripe, richly bodied Chardonnay. Layers of cream and stone fruit build on the palate, but are balanced by a brisk lemon-toned acidity. Drink now while young.",Cecil,Atwater
"Hints of bramble, vanilla and spice accent aromas of ripe red berries and cherries on this bold, richly concentrated Merlot. The palate is crisp with sour cherry flavor, but nuanced with savory touches of cedar and earth. It's a nicely composed wine that finishes elegantly with a touch of savory herbs.",,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"For people who like wines that speak a little softly, try this very moderately priced Chardonnay. Subtle aromas and flavors of green apple, honey and almond build slowly as you enjoy the light to medium body, smooth texture and a finish that hints of sweetness.",,Leaping Horse
"Wood shows strongly here, giving a smoky, toasty character. Some good fruit balances the wood, giving rich weight. Although it could age, it is really ready to drink.",,Maison Champy
"This structured wine has tight acidity as well as dry tannins. It shows potential for more generous fruitiness as it matures, but is likely to remain structured and firm. Drink from 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Manuel Seguin
"This blend of Aglianico and Piedirosso opens with mature plum and prune aromas as well as whiffs of hazelnut and chestnut. The robust, warm palate delivers ripe blackberry, stewed prune, licorice and espresso notes alongside aggressive tannins that will need years to tame.",Ariepetrina,Masseria Felicia
"This blend of Syrah (56%), Cabernet Sauvignon (22%), Cabernet Franc (12%) and Mourvèdre saw just a trace of new oak (10%). It delivers them all with notes of berry, coffee, raw meat, herbs and tar, with lighter-styled fruit flavors and tart acidity.",Bombing Range,McKinley Springs
"This is a big, brawny, tight mix of 51% Grenache, 25% Syrah and 24% Mourvèdre. Zin-like raspberry compote flavor, notes of stone fruit and strong-walled tannins are at the forefront. Musky and earthy, the finish is smooth and long-lasting.",Tenacity,Pangloss Cellars
"This is golden-tan in color. The nose is gaseous and smells of ham and yeast. The palate is distinctly foamy, while flavors of briny apple finish mild yet heavy.",Blanca Cusine Gran Reserva Brut Nature,Parés Balt_
"This is a crisp, medium-bodied example of Saint-Joseph. Aromas of creosote, black olives and roasting meat receive an infusion of brighter, fruitier flavors on the palate, adding cherries to the savory mix. Drink this mouthwatering wine over the next few years.",,Duvernay
"There's a deep mineral tone that persists throughout this plush, velvety Meritage, accenting ripe cherry flavor with granite, and hints of savory herb with dust and clay. The palate cuts rich berry flavors with brisk acidity and ruffles of soft tannins that extend the finish.",Reserve,Sheldrake Point
"Made with the native grape Piedirosso, this opens with aromas of red berry, cracked pepper and a hint of orange peel. The palate delivers plum, black cherry, toast and espresso alongside drying wood tannins that cut the finish short.",Frupa,Sorrentino
"Nuanced in amped-up ripe pineapple, stone fruit and toasted honey, this is a balanced Chardonnay, well made from good fruit. It offers a taste of vanilla cream on the full-bodied finish.",Winemaker's Reserve,Souverain
"Here's a well-priced Chardonny from Sicily that boasts golden apple, citrus and pineapple sensations, with a hint of yellow peach. It's easy drinking, with crisp acidity that gives it a refreshing, clean finish.",,Stemmari
"This dense wine opens with blackberry, plum, toast, earth and leather aromas. The palate is overwhelmed by oak, showing espresso, toast, spearmint and vanilla while licorice and blackberry sensations remain in the background. It lacks the fruit richness to support the heavy oak influence, and astringent wood tannins dry out the mouth.",Ambruco,Terre del Principe
"Made from a blend of native grapes Nero d'Avola and Frappato, this opens with aromas of toasted oak, coffee and black fruit. The robust palate delivers blackberry, vanilla, espresso, oak and cinnamon.",Maskaria,Terre di Giurfo
"Tropical fruit and citrus aromas take center stage on this bright, refreshing wine. The juicy palate delivers lemon-lime and pineapple alongside crisp acidity. A note of white almond signals the close.",,Terredora
"Plum, spice and cedar lead this spicy red. The wine offers bright but balanced flavors of red and black cherry, cedar and warming spice. The finish has a clean, mineral edge. Pair this with strong cheeses and dried meats.",Uranos,Thymiopoulos
"Anise, cherry and a floral note on the nose give this wine an elegant start. On the palate, it offers a refined balance of smoke, cherry, kirsch and olive. It's generous and likeable but still clean and fresh, with good tannic structure. Tobacco on the finish adds character.",Driopi Classic,Tselepos
"With an orange-pink color, this is really a rosé wine. It's sweet and sugary, with raspberry and watermelon flavors that are balanced by cleansing acids.",Willow Springs White,CK Mondavi
"Raw grapes and wild berry describe the nose. This sparkling Lambrusco shows some bitterness followed by very lively fresh fruit flavors. The bottle is closed with the traditional spago (or string) and delivers thick, purple froth when poured into the glass.",La Luna Spago,Cantine Ceci
This is a light pink sparkling wine that shows tones of wild berry and sweet grapefruit. There are no complications here and a touch of sweetness on the close makes it perfect for afternoon sipping.,Brut Rosé,Colutta
"Chunky berry and cured meat aromas turn sweaty and herbal with airing. In the mouth, this is wholly basic. Flavors of soupy, herbal berry fruits lack definition, while the finish deals molasses and peppery bitterness.",Phebus Reserva,Fabre Montmayou
"Aromas of blood, nori and worn leather compose the nose, with a touch of charred bread that adds a subtle bitterness. Light to medium bodied, the palate feels pliant at the start, but the acids spike and tower over the tannins as the wine spreads across the palate. A flavor of tart raspberry marks the finish.",,Autumn Hill
This fun and expressive sweet sparkling wine opens with fragrant tones of peach blossom and tangerine backed by almond paste and honey. The close is sticky and sweet.,Sparkling,Bella Bollè
"This aromatic wine has notes of raspberry jam, seabreeze, green olive and smoked meat. The flavors are light and lacking in structure and definition.",Estate Grown,3 Horse Ranch Vineyards
"Shows green, peppery flavors with a strong touch of gooseberry. The combination of acidity and ripe flavors tastes like a lemon candy cough drop. Good, but simple.",,Frog's Leap
"This lightly aromatic offering of Viognier that doesn't appear entirely ripe, with notes of lemon curd and herbs. It's medium bodied, with a bitter streak that runs from head to tail.",,Indian Creek
This pure expression of the Fiano Minutolo variety opens with candied aromas of peach syrup and butterscotch. Honey and sweet fruit flavors fill the palate.,Cré,Vetrère
"Taranta is the name of a modern Tarantella dance crazy sweeping across southern Italy at the moment. With this inspiration in mind, this bright rosato offers cheerful tones of bright flower, white almond and a touch of citrus. There's a sweet, heavy note in the mouth.",Taranta,Vetrère
"Lightly sweet, this is a soft, gently fruity wine with a prickle on the tongue and fruit-drop acidity. Screwcap.",Casal Garcia,Aveleda
"Pretty dark for a rosé, and heavy and rich, too. Tastes like a raspberry Newton cookie.",Reserve Lot 14 Grenache,Loken Cellars
"All this Merlot asks is to be paired with something simple, like a hamburger. It's straightforward and easy drinking, with juicy blackberries and cherries showing their ripeness.",,Heavyweight
"Lafarga's wines are expensive and shoot high, but they are awfully rustic in general. This Syrah is earthy and rubbery on the nose, then hard as rocks on the palate due to clamp-down tannins. Flavors of dark fruits, plastic and oak finish with heat.",Equinoccio,Lafarga
The IGT appellation is Ravenna (in the Emilia-Romagna region). Il Beneficio opens with bitter fruit notes followed by sweet tones and dark spice. The wine is slightly disjointed and very intense overall (in terms of alcohol too).,Il Beneficio,Costa Archi
"From the Treviso area of the Veneto, this fragrant and floral Moscato sparkling wine offers sweet and chewy tones of peach syrup and ripe fruit.",,Rivani
"Blended with 10% Malbec, this has notes of Maraschino cherry, red vines, and Band-Aid. The tannins are dry and gruff; the concentration is wanting.",,Silvan Ridge
"Brachetto is an easy dessert wine with a mild ruby color and intense aromas of raspberry and blueberry. The wine is exceedingly simple and straightforward with loads of fresh berry fruit, bitter almond, and not much else.",,Prima Mazzo
"There's a soapy, fragrant quality to this brut sparkling wine that is backed by slightly muddled aromas of simple citrus and peach. It's perfect for very informal drinking occasions.",Ville D'Arfanta Brut Millesimato,Vinicola Serena
This is a fresh and fun rosé sparkling wine that offers subtle tones of cranberry and wild berry backed by touches of mint and sweet almond. Its personality is good natured and simple.,Rosé,Zonin
"This oaky wine opens with a huge pop of toasty, burnt aromas. It's resiny feeling, with a creamy palate. Hard time spent in Hungarian barrels has resulted in flavors of toasty apple, cinnamon and peppery spices. This lacks harmony.",,Emevé
"This basic Prosecco is perfectly quaffable thanks to its simple, straightforward delivery. There's a touch of almond or caramel behind the apricot and melon. Drink now, the wine doesn't have long to go.",Lellè Extra Dry,Fattoria Giuseppe Savini
"Mulchy, leafy aromas lead to a pinchy palate with salty, hard berry flavors that lack cushion. This is a rough wine with saltiness and bitterness on the finish.",Zagal,Hacienda del Plata
"A simple wine, it tastes overoaked and thin in oranges and apricots, with brisk acidity.",,Jacella
"This is a simple wine with candied raspberry, mint and toasted oak notes.",Blend 175,Bridlewood
"Sweet, sparkling and pink, this no-fuss dessert wine would pair with strawberry shortcake or frozen yogurt with wild berries. The wine is soft and plush with creamy foam at the back.",Pink,Bella Bollè
"This is a one-dimensional wine, and it offers confected raspberry and club soda notes that rule the nose and palate. It's light bodied and sweet tasting.",,Veramar
"From the Murgia Tarantina high plains of the Salento in the deep south of Italy, this thinly-composed Fiano-based sparkling wine opens with oddly matched aromas of lemon curd, yeast and toasted hazelnut.",Aureo Brut,Vetrère
"With an astonishing 1.5 million cases produces, this historic red sparkling red wine from central Italy offers a sweet palate with easy raspberry and cherry aromas.",,Cantine Riunite
"This is a pretty, light-copper hue, from a small percentage of the grapes being kept on the skins. Fruity flavors of pear and apple dominate, while the acids conjure up suggestions of orange juice.",,Omero
"Sourced from 35-year-old Wente clone vines, this offers bright apple with hints of peach. It's medium bodied and streaked with flavors of caramel and butterfinger candy.",French Creek Vineyard,Panther Creek
"This is a blend from Aÿ on the Montagne de Reims and from the Côte des Blancs. It is intensely perfumed, with weight from Pinot Noir and crispness from Chardonnay. If it seems not quite integrated at this stage, it will hopefully come together over the next few years to reveal a ripe and rich wine. Drink from 2017.",Cuvée Paradoxe Premier Cru,Pierre Gimonnet et Fils
"As its name implies, the wine comes from chalky soil, giving this wine its mineral edge. The fruit is ripe and tropical in its generosity, full of yellow fruits, pineapple and mango. There is a fine floral aroma which, along with acidity, give the wine a bright aftertaste.",Quinto Elemento Reserva Chão Calcário,Quinta do Arrobe
"Offering fine flavor for the price, this release emphasizes spice over fruit, with a sharp, slightly herbal edge. Crisp apple and pear show ginger highlights. Drink this lightly chilled with some spicy Thai food.",,Rainstorm
"A streak of wax and honeycomb glazes through this otherwise brisk citrusy Riesling. Off-dry and concentrated in apples and tangerines, it finishes moderately long with lingering touches of tea leaf and honey. Drink now.",Prüm Blue Kabinett,S.A. Prüm
"Plum and berry aromas are infiltrated by touches of leafy green and leather on the nose of this texturally sound, herbal-tasting Malbec. Flavors of plum and spice are a touch weedy, while baking spice and clove notes take over on the finish.",The Angel Oak Reserva,SignoSeis
"This is a rich wine dominated by ripe Alicante Bouschet that gives some firm tannins as well as juicy red berry fruits. It is ripe, well balanced and likely to age well over the next few years. Drink from 2017.",Bátoreus Selection,Terra Silvestre
A ripe and warm wine full of yellow fruits and a full-bodied texture. It's rich and creamy with a fine balance between exotic fruit and the crispest citrus. The wine is ready to drink.,Terra d'Alter,Terras de Alter
"Unoaked, and instead fermented for 10 months in both stainless steel and concrete egg, this white remains light-bodied and crisp, touched by aromas of honeysuckle and refreshing flavors of pear and quince.",Sons and Daughters Ranch Estate,Thomas George
"Honeyed red-apple slices, ripe papaya, honeysuckle and honeydew aromas are nicely cut by wet-cement minerality on this nose of this 71% Viognier and 29% Roussanne blend. It's tight and reserved on the palate, tart with lime and apple-juice flavors.",,Two Arrowheads
"Leesy white fruit aromas open this blend of 80% Albariño with Loureiro and Treixadura. In the mouth, it's all citric acidity and stoniness. The body doesn't register. Flavors of blood orange and lemon are also minerally, while the finish is persistently linear.",O Rosal Davila,Valmiñor
"Blending Cabernet Sauvignon with Merlot and Syrah, RTW is somewhat classical in its black olive and dried herb, yet also rich and concentrated, with tannic bite and a taste of clove. It finishes like vanilla cola.",RTW,VinRoc
"This cuvée reflects the lean vintage with modest alcohol and slightly dilute fruit flavors. Pretty aromatics suggest rosewater and sandalwood, and the wine fades gracefully with plum and cherry fruit.",Dundee Hills Vineyards,Winderlea
"Ripe rustic woody aromas of berry fruits and cedar introduce a raw rugged drawing palate with oaky baked lightly medicinal flavors of candied berry fruits. Grabby tannins, heat and spicy flavors push the finish on this firmly structured Garnacha. Drink through 2018.",Particular Viñas Centenarias,Bodegas San Valero
"Aromas of black cherry, ground pepper, clove and chopped herb jump out of the glass and carry over to the vibrant, easy-drinking palate. Racy acidity and round tannins support the juicy fruit. It's made for sheer drinking pleasure so enjoy soon.",Fisetta,Ciabot Berton
"Black-skinned fruit, blue flower and Oriental spice aromas come together in the glass. The bright, savory palate doles out black cherry, blackberry jam and black pepper alongside soft tannins and fresh acidity.",Superiore,Arbéta
"Despite opening with a yellow color and waxy oily peach aromas, this benefits from zesty lemon-like acidity. Flavors of quince and apple are oaky, while effusive acidity keeps this Verdejo fresh on the finish, which is otherwise big and full. Drink now.",Parcela 52,Finca Constancia
"Aromas of baked plum, spirits, baking spice and a whiff of blue flower lead the nose on this robust wine. The hearty palate offers dried black cherry, raw cranberry, leather and licorice alongside firm tannins and racy acidity. You'll also detect the warmth of alcohol on the finish.",,Giacomo Grimaldi
"Leathery stalky berry aromas come across as being baked and rough. This is full and grabby on the palate with cooked blackberry and prune flavors that end dark, and spicy with notes of licorice and herbs.",,Los 800
"Aromas of black cherries marinated in spirits, menthol, leather and chopped herbs lead the nose on this brawny wine. The hefty palate shows the heat of the vintage, offering dried berries, licorice, tobacco and mocha alongside the warmth of evident alcohol and jarring tannins. Give it a few years to let the tannins soften up a bit but then drink before the fruit dries up.",Monvigliero,Sordo
"This easy-drinking wine has a bouquet of honeydew melon and lime juice. Flavors of lemon, tangerine, guava and white peach with a soft hint of baking spice continue into the finish, which is marked by flavors of stone fruits and nutmeg.",Fifth Generation,1848 Winery
A tangy textured wine that is impressively fresh for such a hot region as Alentejo. It has a crisp texture that is balanced by a touch of vanilla as well as freshened with citrus and green apple flavors. It is fresh and very drinkable at this young stage. Wait a year until 2017 and it will be even better.,Montes Claros Reserva Branco,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Light straw in the glass, this wine has aromas of pineapple and lemon zest. Refreshing on the palate, it offers flavors of clementine, lemon, orange rind, and honeysuckle. The finish features a lasting sense of brightness.",Classic,Barkan
"Floral berry and plum aromas are touched up by notes of thyme and cardamom. Fresh grippy acidity keeps this lively, while flavors of berry and plum are spicy and suggestive of tomato sauce. Saucy, herbal flavors rise up on a high-acid finish.",Catena,Bodega Catena Zapata
Crisp apple and pears are streaked with earthy tones of saffron and bramble in this brisk invigorating Spätlese. It's concentrated and fruity on the palate with a clingy honeyed touch that extends the finish.,Piesporter Goldtröpfchen Spätlese,Bollig-Lehnert
"Aromas of black raspberry, violet, baking spice and a whiff of game lead the nose. The chewy palate offers juicy sour cherry, ground pepper and licorice alongside racy acidity and round tannins. It's meant to be drunk young so enjoy soon.",Montebruna,Braida di Giacomo Bologna
"Aromas of mature plum, espresso, toast and Asian spice lead the nose while the dense palate delivers dried black cherry, red currant, licorice and ground pepper. Tangy acidity and close-grained tannins give it a mouth-puckering finish.",Balmet,Caldera
"Wood fermentation still allows the Arinto grape to retain its natural crispness. At the same time, it gives it a perfumed spicy character that enhances the juiciness of the wine and brings out the zesty texture. It's fruity, fresh and ready to drink.",Branco Barrica,Campolargo
The chalk subsoil of the Bélingard estate gives this wine its textured character. The wood aging smoothes out the crisp acidity of Sauvignon Blanc and Sémillon and adds a light layer of toast. It is still a young wine and will be better from late 2016 or even 2017.,Réserve,Château Bélingard
"A 65-35 blend of Sangiovese and Cabernet Sauvignon, this is bold, opulent and elaborate. This expression has perfumed notes of incense and exotic spice, lavished over tones of ripe cherry and blackberry.",Acciaiolo,Castello d'Albola
"This is a structured, fruity wine that has ripe strawberry and red plum flavors. Its tannins are condensed at the core, and the finish is marked by refreshing acidity. The vineyard is wholly owned by Faiveley.",Clos de L'Ecu Premier Cru,Domaine Faiveley
"This 100% Cabernet Sauvignon has massive waves of blackberry, black currant and chocolate flavors that take over the palate, plus a sweet note of toast from the oak. It's very tannic, which gives the mouthfeel an astringent hardness, so try giving it 6_8 years in a cellar, and it may even show well in 12_15 years.",Yewell Vineyard,Corley
"Rich, elegant and classic, this wine is made from fruit sourced from old vines__ome as much as 70 years old. It has a tannic structure, but the dominant elements are the dense red- and black-plum flavors, which are supported by the wine's acids. Age it for 5_6 years.",Les Longeroies,Domaine Bruno Clair
"There is a fine mineral-driven backbone to this ripe, concentrated and fruity wine, which gives its dense apricot and pineapple flavors great structure. It needs to age for at least four years.",Château de Rully Saint Jacques Cuvée R. de Ternay,Antonin Rodet
"This 80-20 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot opens with milk chocolate, cherry, exotic spice, blackberry jam and crème de cassis notes. The mouthfeel is chewy, rich and plush, and the supple tannins are followed by loads of dark berry fruit.",Renzo,Antonino Tringali-Casanuova
"Rugiens,  which is named after its red soil, is located in the south of Pommard. Dense, structured and powerful, this is a brooding wine that has concentrated tannins and fruit that is offset by a tight line of acidity. This is a wine that demands aging.",Domaine du Pavillon Rugiens Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"Bright and high in acidity, this has a lively cherry flavor, plus a layering of earthy mushroom. It's silky from start to finish.",Manchester Ridge Vineyard,La Follette
"A blend of wines from a number of Chambolle's premier cru vineyards, this is a rich and generous wine, with spice and red berry flavors, plus sweet tannins and a firm feel on the finish.",Premier Cru,Joseph Drouhin
"This is an amply endowed, round wine, with no hard edges. The ripe cherry fruit is dusted with hints of dusty earth and ground cinnamon that linger on the finish. It's a lush, harmonious mouthful of Pinot pleasure. Drink now_2020.",Reserve,Villa Maria
"At the heart of the Chianti Classico region, this estate is responsible for some of the most elegant and traditional expressions of this fabled wine. A bright cherry flavor is framed by oak-driven tones of vanilla spice and mocha.",Riserva,Volpaia
"Made from fruit that's sourced from the Buçaco Mountains in the east of Bairrada, this wine is rich and elegant, and its juicy fruit provides a counterbalance to the structure. With its youthful fruitiness, this is worth aging for another 2_3 years.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"A red-fruited wine, this is fragrant of wood and strawberries. The palate has a smoky, wood-laden character, a ripe plum flavor and a fine line of acidity. A fresh red-currant note marks the finish.",Telhas,Terra d'Alter
"Made from organic fruit, this Syrah opens with intense aromas of chopped mint, ginger, cola, black pepper and dried berry. The wine's complexity is impressive, and so is its freshness and persistence.",Alice,Stefano Amerighi
"Thick and foresty, this Pinot Noir embodies the extremes of the Perli Vineyard. It bursts with dark blue and earthy red fruits that are tempered by a savory undertone. This wine takes time to reveal itself, so age it for 5_7 years, and pair it with stews, risottos or seasoned braised lamb.",Perli Vineyard,Arista
"This Syrah is rounding into its prime drinking window. Purple and black fruits abound, with teasing streaks of anise, clove and espresso. Lush and precise, this has excellent length, and although it's drinking beautifully right now, it can age further.",,Helix by Reininger
"For its youth, this is surprisingly forward and fruity. It is concentrated, and it offers a ripe plum flavor, sweet tannins and attractive acidity. The structure sits behind the delicious fruit, which suggests that this wine is only for the medium term.",,Maison Champy
"A blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet, this shows weight on the palate, and it offers velvety tannins and bright fruit and spicy flavors. The aromatic delivery is immediate and clean.",Guidaccio,Marchesi Torrigiani
"This Syrah shows ripe blackberry, mulberry and currant flavors, plus notes of smoked meat, charred bone, anise and black pepper. With firm tannins and fine minerality, this clonal Syrah has great structure. It's terrific to drink now after some time in a decanter, and it can also age for 6_8 more years.",Colson Canyon Vineyard Clone 877,Brander
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot, this opens with drying mineral tones of granite and campfire, and it has austere, dusty tannins. The fruit is bold, pulled together by notes of cherry, cassis, leather and spice.",Ruit Hora,Caccia al Piano 1868
"Made from estate-vineyard fruit, this is a blend of three-quarters Cabernet Sauvignon, with Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot. Each new vintage seems to bring a bit more depth to the wine, and the flavors of berry and plum remain fresh, with a gentle kiss of new oak.",Cara Mia Vineyard Camerata,Cadence
"Rich and full, this wine shows some sense of structure. It has considerable acidity and flavors of cherry and red currant. With the dry tannins coming through on the finish, it will need some years to soften.",Brouillards Premier Cru,Domaine Jessiaume
"A blend of eight different Syrah clones and a splash of Grenache, this is dark and sappy, with dense veins of citrus oil, licorice, coffee liqueur and black tea that are anchored by a solid black-cherry flavor. This should drink well for a decade or longer.",Red Willow Vineyard Clonal Block,Eight Bells
"Federico Primo is a consistent expression of Cabernet Sauvignon that doles out generous layers of plum and blackberry, backed by spicy tones of pipe tobacco and juniper. The oak-derived nuances add extra dimension and length to the finish.",Federico Primo,Gualdo del Re
"Made in a tart, juicy style, this well-structured Cabernet Sauvignon should be decanted. The acid-driven berry flavors carry a hint of gun metal. A few more years of bottle age would be advisable.",Artisan,Foundry Vineyards
"Luca D'Attoma, the proprietor of Duemani, is a strictly biodynamic winemaker and a leading figure in Italy's natural wine movement. This wine shows pristine red fruit notes, backed by delicate, spicy tobacco and leather touches.",Cifra,Duemani
"Give this Pinot Noir a few hours in the decanter before drinking it. Right out of the bottle, it's tight and brittle, but air brings out the core notes of cherry, vanilla, red currant and cedar, and makes it develop a drink-me-now appeal.",Estate Grown,Dierberg
"Smooth and round, this wine is made from grapes that were sourced from the southernmost vineyards of the Côte d'Or. It has a soft, rich and fruity character that shows citrus and white peach flavors, plus a pineapple hint. As it opens, it becomes opulent and full bodied.",Les Charmes Dessus,Domaine de Bellene
"This wine is concentrated and full in the mouth, and it bears a minerally texture and intense acidity. It's packed with flavors of sweet peach, lime, ripe Rocha pear and spice from the wood maturation. This promises to age for several years.",,Domaine de Bellene
"This wine is perfumed, with delicious notes of plum and spice that are balanced by light tannins and fine, elegant acids. A touch of mineral marks the finish.",Clos Rousseau Premier Cru,David Moreau
"Aromas of leather, undergrowth and cedary spice mesh with notes of blackberry and dark cherry. Medium to full in body, this Chambourcin is built with dusty tannins and balanced acids. Touches of toasty oak and blackberry mark the palate, and it finishes with tenacity.",,Cooper Vineyards
"This presents overripe, black fruit aromas and nail varnish notes, but the palate is somewhat better. It reveals ripe blackberry, white pepper, licorice and hot cinnamon flavors, along with evident alcohol. Overall, this is warm and one dimensional, although it does boast rich fruit.",Gli Archi,Corte Archi
"A bit rough in texture, but otherwise pretty flavorful, with vanilla, lime, strawberry and yeast flavors. It's a great sparkling wine for everyday.",Reserve Brut,Chandon
"Honey-sweet flavors of raspberries, pink grapefruits and guavas, along with hints of vanilla and yeast mark this salmon-colored blush. Try with sushi, smoked salmon, mushroom risotto.",Rosé,Chandon
"This classic Champagne blend of Pinot Noir and Chardonnay is dry and crisp with raspberry, orange and leesy flavors. It's quite a good brut, but slightly rough in texture. Drink up.",Brut,Collection 35
"There's a slight warmth throughout this wine, complementing the amazingly ripe and lush black plum and cherry notes. Accents of leather and tobacco leaf add depth to the medium-weight palate, transitioning into flavors of chocolate and toasted spice on the close.",Château les Pines,Vignobles Dom Brial
"While this wine is pleasantly dry, it's also fruity and spicy, with a bite of acidity. Made from the Charbono grape, it will pair well with grilled tuna or garlicky pasta.",Rosé,Summers
"Ever have a cherry cola? That's what this Pinot tastes like, along with toasty oak, the sweet heat of alcohol and peppery spices. It's a translucent ruby color, with a light, silky body. Drink up.",,The Forager
"This vibrant wine offers floral and fruity aromas of iris and just-crushed black grapes laced with spice. The palate is both structured and fresh, with black cherry, white pepper and cinnamon flavors.",Caparbio,Piccoli
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Tempranillo comes from four estate vineyards. It's direct and appealing with plump, juicy notes of coffee bean, herbs, dried cherries, and vanilla.",Roadside Market,Roza Ridge
"Notes of Meyer lemon and orange blossom meld with accents of fennel, spice and glazed apple. The medium-bodied palate feels glossy, and comes with balanced acidity. A delicate wet-stone minerality marks the finish.",Barrel Fermented,Naked Mountain
"Vanilla cream, honey and tropical-fruit flavors mark this Chardonnay, which was fermented and aged in stainless steel. It's a straightforward wine, for drinking now.",New Generation Unoaked,Passaggio
"This is a nice, drinkable red from Red Mountain, though it does not have any varietal focus. There's light red fruit, some sense of minerality, and balancing acidity.",Monastrell AKA Mourvèdre,Michael Florentino
"This opaque, thick-looking wine opens with crusty, toasty aromas on top of an array of ripe berry notes. This is a blocky, saturated blend with flavors of herbs, tomato sauce and salt. A solid feeling finish with mild heat and burn is the lasting impression.",Malbec-Petit Verdot-Cabernet Franc,Melipal
"A vibrantly aromatic wine with notes of freshly peeled tangerine, sliced apricot and white flowers. It's off-dry (23g/L residual sugar) with zippy acidity keeping it all together.",,Waterbrook
"Lightly oaked Chardonnay, full of yellow fruits, spice and a floral character that gives the wine a lift. Softly textured, juicy with tighter final acidity. Screwcap.",,Domaine du Tariquet
"Dominated by tannins, this is a firm, solid and chunky wine. Black plum skins, juicy blackberries are layered over a dry, dark core. There is a hint of the 12 months' wood aging, but the wine is more about the rich fruit. Drink from 2014.",Le Mignon,Domaine les Hauts de Riquets
"Warm, peach and pear flavored wine, full of ripe, juicy fruit with a great streak of acidity. Fresh, perfumed, the wine has a lively touch of crisp fruit at the end. Drink from 2014.",Domaine de la Garenne,Domaines Devillard
"Well balanced between fruitiness and spice, this is a young, crisp wine. Its apricot and pear flavors are lighted by fragrant acidity and considerable freshness for a Pinot Gris. It is ready to drink, but will be better in 1_2 years.",Cuvée René Dopff,Dopff & Irion
"Full and ripe with rich fruit, fresh acidity and delicious layers of citrus and green plum flavors. It's a textured wine, showing fruit skin tautness as well as dense structure and the potential for aging. Drink from 2016.",Vieilles Vignes,Cave des Grands Crus Blancs
"Picking the grapes at night gives extra freshness to what is a rich wine. The acidity is very present, with ripe yellow fruits and pineapple. Fruity, textured and needing a year to age.",Le Sec du Clos Vin de Lune,Jean-Luc Baldès
"A single vineyard wine, with light soil producing a fruity style of Riesling, fragrant and fresh. It has currant and spiced pear flavors, with a bright texture. It is ready to drink.",Lerchenberg,Jean Becker
"This is a light, bright wine, certainly with sweetness but that is poised over delicate honeyed and citrus flavors. Attractive and lively, ready to drink.",Beerenauslese,Zantho
"This is a rich, robust bubbly. The palate is marked with honey-infused limes and Meyer lemons, with the bread dough sourness of lees. The mouthfeel is a little rough, though.",Reserve Blanc de Blancs,Chandon
"Boysenberry, blueberry and black cherry aromas lead on the nose of this wine, with a touch of warmth and chocolaty sensation following behind. The palate veers more towards red-fruit flavors, with a thin midpalate and an astringent close.",Pur Sang,Château de Corneilla
"Fragrant wine, ripely perfumed, its tannins bringing out red berry fruits and a shapely structure. It also has a fresh feel to it from the intense acidity at the end. Age for a year, but drink now.",Le Renard,Domaines Devillard
"Gritty aromas of saddle leather, horse hide and pickled berries filter into a choppy feeling palate with briny and herbal flavors. There's also notes of berries and salt. A chewy finish has weight, structure and saucy, pickled flavors of savory berry fruits.",Reserva,Don Miguel Gascón
"This is an extracted wine that has very ripe aromas of prune and raisin, along with a hint of burned rubber. The palate shows blackberry, fig, spice and licorice flavors, along with a hint of orange peel and a warm midpalate. A bit one-dimensional, but enjoyable.",Gli Archi,Corte Archi
"Strawberry, cherry and generic red-fruit aromas lead a standard, healthy feeling palate. This wet, fresh but simple rosé offers peach, raspberry and slightly bitter finishing flavors.",Vivanco Tempranillo-Garnacha,Dinastía Vivanco
"This blend of multiple varieties, some of them rare in California, can be described as rustic. It's dry, tannic and moderate in alcohol, with pretty cherry, red currant and pepper flavors. Needs food, especially cheese, to tame it.",Acorn Hill Alegria Vineyards,Acorn
"A 100% Merlot aged 18 months in French oak, this hearty wine is rich in cinnamon toast, bittersweet chocolate and dark, black fruit. It's walled in tannins, so let it open a bit and it'll reveal subtle herbal tones.",,Reign
"A strong percentage of Petit Verdot (14%) marks this wine, a mouthful of sanguine cranberry and lightly ripe red fruit that's high in acidity and balanced by a richer dollop of milk chocolate, particularly on the finish.",Reserve,Round Pond
"Light lemon-lime aromas and fresh fruit flavors make this refreshing, crisp and lively. Not at all heavy, it's well-balanced, has good acidity and tastes dry.",,Paul Dolan
"With small percentages of Merlot and Malbec, this Cab offers distinct herbal notes, its body medium in weight and acidity. Clove and fig round out the profile.",,Whitehall Lane
"Graphite-laced minerality meets with raspberry-blackberry liqueur on the nose of this wine. Licorice, black coffee and creosote dominate the palate, which is quite heavy with tannins. This could use cellaring until 2016_2017 to become an even stronger wine.",Black Hawk Estate,Wild Coyote
"Pure varietal and surprisingly light for this often tannic grape, this leads with pretty raspberry and cherry fruit set in sweet baking spices, and finished with a lick of chocolate and a frame of toasty oak. It's balanced and proportionate, though definitely on the lighter side.",,Tinhorn Creek
"Delicious and straightforward, this vibrant wine conveys aromas of wild berry and a whiff of clove. The savory, easy-drinking palate doles out juicy black cherry, crushed raspberry and a hint of black pepper alongside supple tannins. There's no complexity but it's perfect for everyday fare. Or chill it down for a refreshing summer red.",,Tormaresca
"Aromas of smoke, underbrush, espresso and grilled herb lead the nose on this blend of Nero di Troia and Aglianico. The palate offers dried black cherry, anisette, coffee and toast alongside chewy tannins.",Bolonero,Torrevento
"This wine is made from a single clone grown in a single vineyard, then aged sur lees in French barrels. It starts with a complex bouquet perfumed like a Gewürztraminer, the palate crisp and lowly impacted by oak.",Three Roses,TR Elliott
"This directly appealing wine features subtle notes of mineral, lime leaf, flowers and white peach. It drinks off dry (10.49g/L residual sugar) with mouthwatering stone fruit flavors.",,Trust
"The bouquet of this wine starts off subtle and dainty, needing time to become more expressive and reveal scents of cured meat, sweet smoke, violet and small red berries. Gamy notes are at the forefront of the medium-weight palate, with underlying flavors of red cherry and currant. A smoky, savory and spicy selection; drink now_2017.",Appellation Series,Boschendal
"This is a well-priced example of Barossa Cabernet, laden with characteristic notes of chocolate, mint and berry fruit, wrapped in a layer of toasty oak. It's full bodied, yet easy to drink because of the soft tannins and mouthwatering finish. Probably best between now and 2020.",Grand Barossa,Château Tanunda
"The main nonvintage wine from Veuve Doussot is soft, creamy with plenty of ripe, fresh fruits. Pears and apricots come to the fore and are attractively cut by the lime acidity. Around this fruit, there's good mineral tightness and finishing acidity.",Tradition Brut,Veuve Doussot
"Smoky aromas lead to a lightly structured wine that is all about red fruits and spice. Light bitterness, fresh acidity and tannins support the natural crispness of this still-young wine. Drink now, chilled, or wait until 2016 for a more mature flavor.",Cuvée Voluptance,Vignoble de la Jarnoterie
"A ripe, fruity wine that is bone-dry but so full of red fruits that it seems soft. It's a delicious, lightly textured wine with a good touch of minerality at the end. Drink now.",Domaine des Clairneaux,Vignobles Berthier
"On this well-made wine, a dark-fruit-driven bouquet emphasizes black cherry and blackberry aromas. This feels solid, a touch creamy and slightly resiny. Dark berry flavors come with mild heat as well as mint and sweet oak notes.",Reserva Espiritu de Los Andes Estate Bottled,Santa Alicia
"Heady potpourri and rose-petal perfume announce this ice-style Gewürztraminer, leading to an unctuous palate brimming with caramel and honey-dipped apples. Soft, lemony acidity lends a cheerful, sunny feel to the finish.",Ice,Standing Stone
"With Merlot softening the power of Brau-col, this is a full-bodied while rounded wine. Juicy acidity gives a fresh character, and red berry fruits dominate the firm tannins. Balanced and concentrated, it will repay some good aging. Drink from 2017.",Vieilles Vignes,Domaine du Moulin
"Tight, streamlined and slender, this lemony, fresh Grüner has a cheeky hint of pepperiness on the refreshing finish.",Erdenlied,Dürnberg
"The aromatic lift of spring blossom, honeysuckle and citrus zest characterizes this light, zesty, fruity and easy-drinking wine. The extended, zippy lemon finish adds real refreshment. Drinks as soon as there is a sunny day, this is not one for keeping.",Falko Cool Climate Cuvée,Dürnberg
"This attractively balanced, ripe wine offers rich fruitiness and soft acidity, with apple, pear and greengage flavors. The full mousse brings a creamy character to this ready-to-drink wine from the Aube, the southern part of Champagne.",Sélection Brut,Gremillet
"Very nicely balanced and complete. A slightly minty aroma, generous black cherry flavors and a polished texture make it sophisticated and graceful. The acidity and tannins are just present enough to lend a lively mouthfeel without taking over.",,Greystone
"This kitchen sink-style blend brings appealing notes of cranberry, black plum, dark flowers and licorice. It's elegant in style, with soft fruit flavors and minimal new oak influence.",Exhibition,Fall Line
"This succulent wine opens with an intensely spicy nose of white and black pepper accented with ripe berry. The sleek, savory palate delivers juicy black cherry and cooking spice framed in solid but refined tannins. It's made to be enjoyed young and paired with everyday fare.",,Giuseppe Cortese
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon (52%), Syrah (24%), Merlot (19%) and Malbec, this appealing single-vineyard wine suggests vanilla, freshly ground coffee, dark fruit and spices. It's sweet and richly flavored, with a firm squeeze of tannins.",4 Boys Les Collines Vineyard,J & J
"Toasted oak, wood chips, roasted coffee bean, espresso and prune aromas follow through to the palate along with dried black cherry, vanilla and a confectionary note. The palate is supported by astringent, drying tannins.",,Josetta Saffirio
"Mineral and wet stone are a pleasant entry into this wine, which continues into flavors of pretty pear, melon and citrus. The presence of oak on both the nose and palate is not overwhelming.",Kalaris Family Vineyard,Kalaris
"This bottle is quite unusual for a Washington Malbec with abundant notes of freshly squeezed Meyer lemon, plum and herbs. Still, it's well constructed with tart, plush plum flavors that keep you coming back to it.",No. 10,Ded.Reckoning
"Sweetly exotic in fresh-squeezed pineapple aromas, this wine might be trying too hard to be light and restrained, employing very little oak in the process. Pear and lemon stay on the palate the longest, the finish brisk in acidity.",,Kobler
"Coming from Louis Lucas and former judge Royce Lewellen's premiere vineyard in the heart of the Santa Ynez Valley, this offers scents of black cherry, leather and cigar box. The heavily structured wine is thick and heavy on the palate, with strong but slick tannins, heavy black spices and extracted plum-blackberry fruits.",Valley View Vineyard,Lucas & Lewellen
"This opens with an aromatic note of wet dog along with wild berry and plum. The palate is spunky, jumpy and lively, while flavors of plum, raspberry and berry skins finish short and simple.",,Acentor
"Prune and raisin aromas are dominant and suggest overripeness. Following that lead, this is chunky and heavy on the palate, with pounding tannins. Baked blackberry, prune and savory flavors finish long and dense.",Ballad,Ignacio Marín
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Cabernet Franc, this nonvintage wine displays aromas of vanilla, green pepper, woodspice and herbs. The sweet chocolate and cherry flavors are accented by light meaty notes.",Sadie,Jacob Williams
"Bright pink in color, this rosé is full in the mouth with red berry flavors and intense acidity. A touch of bitterness gives a sharp aftertaste.",Audace Brut Rosé,Jean Josselin
"Aromas of tilled earth, leather, ripe black-skinned fruit and a gamey note set the stage for this funky wine. The overripe palate displays fleshy black plum, dried blue flowers and bitter barnyard sensations set against a backdrop of soft acidity. Drying, astringent tannins cut the finish short.",Riserva,La Cignozza
"This shows fresh, crisp apple and lemon-cream aromas, with clean appley flavors and buttery accents. Medium bodied, it tends toward the soft, rather than crisp, side. Lively fruit flavors make it refreshing.",,Leese-Fitch
"Slightly sour elements of lemon and lime meet with a riper nectarine tone on the nose of this wine. There is good citrus-driven acidity on the palate with limeade flavors, though it trends a bit sour and wipes up with not much finish.",San Lucas Unoaked Pure,Lockwood
"Aromas of pear, stone fruit and lees lead to peach and floral flavors. The concentration is light and elegant.",,Telaya
"Generic peach and apple aromas are light and easy. This blend of Merseguera and Macabeo feels pulpy and citrusy, while pithy flavors of peach and orange finish fresh, but with limited complexity.",Alcanta,Bocopa
"Dried herb, tobacco, plum and woodspice aromas are followed by tart cranberry and cherry flavors that have a lick of dry tannins behind them. There's plenty of interest but this wine needs food to combat the tannins.",,Cana's Feast
"With no oak aging, this wine offers black currants and stalky tannins. Juicy fruitiness and a ripe character reflect the vintage. The aftertaste, with acidity, is fresh and always fruity. Drink from 2016.",Château Campot Lafont,Cave du Marmandais
"Firmly tannic, this is still a young wine. It has a dry structure with a black currant-skin stalkiness. Acidity and structure are still developing, so wait until 2016.",,Château de Piote
"Fruity and juicy, this is an attractive blend of Sémillon and Sauvignon Blanc, giving a tight, mineral-driven wine. With its pink grapefruit and crisp green apple fruits, it is young and can age, although not for long. Drink from 2016.",,Château Grand Jean
"This perfumed wine conveys attractive balance between its fruit and fresher acidity. A fresh, crisp texture still needs time to settle in. Drink from the end of 2015.",,Château Haut Mouleyre
"Cherry colored and lightly bricked, this wine offers aromas of herbs, orange peel, wet stone and cherry. It drinks dry with fleshy, boozy-seeming fruit flavors.",Ro-Sae,Cor Cellars
"Earthy blackberry flavors include carob and herbal accents. This is drawing and high in acidity, while earthy, herbal flavors of raspberry and plum are a bit green. Charred oak, clove and leafy berry flavors take over on the finish.",Selección Especial,Cruz de Piedra
"Looking more like a light red wine than a supposedly pink one, this smells like ripe cherries and boysenberries, has a luscious, smooth texture and a soft, almost sweet finish.",Estate,Drytown
"This ripe, easygoing red offers fruity yet fleeting aromas and flavors of fleshy black cherry and baked plum. It's made to be drunk young so enjoy now.",,Fattoria Petriolo
"In this straightforward quaffer, aromas of pear, melon and apple lead to off-dry fruit flavors with a full feel. The flavor concentration is light but it still provides easy drinking enjoyment.",Estate Bottled,Goose Ridge
"Hardly dry, this wine has an edge of bitterness and seems unbalanced. The citrus and red apple fruits are not in alignment with the nut and white plum-skin tanginess, leaving a sharp aftertaste.",Cuvée Céleste Extra Brut,Demarjory
"Aromas of lees, apricot, vanilla and wheat lead to full-bodied fruit and cinnamon flavors. It's fleshy in feel but the flavor concentration isn't all there.",,Hudson Shah
"Smoky funkiness permeates this wine, which is lean on the palate and mushy in terms of structure. Cherry and pepper are the most distinguishable characteristics before the quick finish.",,Stephen Vincent
This medium-sweet offering has aromas of lime leaf and jasmine that lead to apricot and floral flavors. There's not a lot of complexity but it offers easy drinking enjoyment.,,Perimeter
"Aromas of tire rubber, graphite and wet cement are oak-driven and overshadow wine's berry components. A tannic, resiny palate is expected, given the nose. Heavy oak overshadows black-plum flavors, while the finish is oaky, minty and a touch green.",Agnvs de Autor,Valdelana
"An orange tang gives acidity as well as fruit. Contrasted with this, the wine has a smoother, yeast and caramel side that doesn't balance.",,Château Haut Mouleyre
"This wine is tight and austere. It still shows the smoky wood aging that has left a bitter chocolate character in the wine. It should soften, although it will likely end up lean. The blend is 75% Merlot and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon.",,Château Taussin
"Very fruity, this is a crisp, lemon-scented and flavored wine, with grassy, herbaceous character from the green Sauvignon Blanc in the blend. The aftertaste is tight with some bitterness.",,Château de Parenchère
Touches of red fruits give this soft and creamy wine attractive acidity. Pepper and spice lead to a bitter aftertaste.,Perles Rosé,Château de Piote
"With its extra-dark rosé color, Clairet is an unusual style. This wine is juicy with some acidity alongside fresh raspberry fruits. At the end, the wine seems heavy.",,Château de Piote
"Made with 90% Sangiovese and 10% Canaiolo, this opens with earthy aromas of wet soil, underbrush and a whiff of barnyard. The simple palate offers overripe black cherry and a funky note of game alongside soft tannins.",Briccole,Villa Corliano
"Still so young, this herbal, fruity wine is as crisp as possible. It is packed with lemon, grapefruit and tight acidity, needing to age. Drink this tense, steely wine from late 2016.",Domaine des Côtes Blanches,François Millet
"A blend of Pinot Meunier and Chardonnay, this is crisp while also rounded. Fresh, tight acidity under a creamy texture brings out the sliced apple and Rocha pear flavors. There's no need to age this bottling; it's ready to drink.",Brut Tradition,H. Blin
"Sanguine and velvety, this richly derived wine made from one clone of Pinot Noir is tannic in black cherry, cinnamon and tar, with a lean, mid-length finish.",Clone 828,Halleck
"Fresh and full-bodied, this offers aromas of black-skinned fruit, underbrush and dark cooking spice. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, plum jam and black pepper alongside polished tannins and fresh acidity.",Lurei,Il Falchetto
"Aromas of ripe grapes and vanilla make for a lush, inviting nose on this fruit-forward bottling of 49.5% Sangiovese, 49.5% Cabernet Sauvignon and 1% Malbec. The juicy palate shows blackberries and black cherries as well as licorice and dark chocolate, with strong tannins giving textural balance.",Super Tuscan,Jamie Slone Wines
"This is a warm and rich wine from the southern Mâcon region. It is ripe with yellow fruits, crisp apples and a touch of minerality that gives the tangy texture. Packed with fruit as well as structured, this wine can be drunk now, although better from 2017.",,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"From one of the villages that lies behind the primary Chardonnay vineyards of the Côte de Beaune, this is already smooth, fruity and perfumed. It has attractive acidity and a rich, baked apple character that is pointed up by the layer of toastiness. Drink now, although the wine will be better from 2017.",Sous le Château,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"Not many Grand Cru wines are made into a Sec style of Champagne. This wine is more soft than sweet, with plenty of acidity as well as a touch of honey. Soft and round at the end, the wine is balanced and ready to drink.",Tendresse Grand Cru Sec,Jean Milan
"This is an open juicy and fruity wine. It has soft tannins and perfumed acidity that is already integrated into the structure of the wine. With blackberry and red plum flavors, it is easy and generous, ready to drink now.",José de Sousa,José Maria da Fonseca
"Fresh, ripe and fruity, this is a rich wine, produced from vines to the west of Reims. It has perfumed wild strawberry flavors and acidity. Attractively crisp at the end, it's a ready-to-drink wine that will be just right as an apéritif.",Premier Cru Brut Rosé,Lelarge-Pugeot
"From the producer's estate vineyard, the grapes planted on budwood from Napa Valley's famous Three Palms, this wine is bittersweet in tannin and flavor, a mix of blueberry, cedar, resin and clove. Full bodied in style, it maintains an elegance on the finish, marked irresistibly in dark chocolate.",DaKine Vineyard,Longboard
"Richly ripe in black cherry and chocolate, this is a blend of Merlot, Petite Sirah, Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah, Zinfandel and Petit Verdot. Generous tannins give way to a soft, smooth mouthfeel and a burst of blackberry and leather, finishing in spicy cinnamon and black pepper.",Cellar 1879 Blend,Markham
"This wine shows perfumed lychee on the nose, before weightier tones of melon, lemon and oak enter the picture, providing a richness of body and power. The oak and a sprinkling of nutmeg remain firm and focused on the finish.",Dutton Ranch George Vineyard,Martin Ray
"With a nose that's quite neutral, the sun-kissed, fruity flair of this dry Riesling surprises. It's a juicy, straightforward wine but briskly, elegantly composed as well. Drink now.",3 Stones Niederhäuser Dry,Mathern
"Golden honey in color and tone, this white is nonetheless crisp, adorned in orange blossom and a taste of white peach, the minerality never in question. Half of the fruit is estate grown, with 8% Marsanne blended in.",,Mounts
"Brambly berry flavors carry a streak of cola throughout this wine, 80% of which was whole-cluster fermented. The pleasant fruit is somewhat offset with chalky acids and drying tannins.",Coats and Whitney Vineyard,Omero
"Quite a solid deal from an expert Zin house, this wine shows aromas of candied cherry and pomegranate, with cinnamon, a hint of tar and a little crushed espresso bean. Dried blueberries enliven the palate, along with mineral tones and more cinnamon-based baking spice.",Westside,Peachy Canyon
"While the nose is restrained, the palate of this Spätlese Riesling abounds in sweet-tart nectarine, peach and tangerine flavors. Primary and fresh, it's an uncomplicated yet vibrantly penetrating wine. Drink now.",Graacher Himmelreich Spätlese,Peter Nicolay
"Black cherry to the eye, this wine holds back on the nose, offering restrained aromas of black currant and roasted yellow pepper. Flavors include raspberry, blueberry, violet, lavender, thyme and roasted meat. It has lightly grippy tannins and there is a distinct note of Dr. Pepper on the finish.",M-Series Edom,Psagot
"Plum, French oak, coffee, vanilla and Oriental spice aromas emerge in the glass. The concentrated palate offers mature black cherry, blackberry jam, vanilla and licorice alongside fine-grained tannins.",La Bricca,Rinaldi
"Crisp and fresh aromas of lime sorbet and iced apple flesh greet the nose on this Riboli family bottling. The palate is steely and bright, with Anjou pear flesh, a bit of smoke and some red-apple ripeness.",Estate Reserve,San Simeon
"There is no lack of dark, smoky flavors in this 100% varietal bottling. Leather, cola, cassis, tar, burnt rubber and smoke all whirl about, with an underlying impression of dried leaves. The listed flavors may not stir you with longing when named in this way, but taken all together and accompanied by a bowl of beef stew, they will satisfy.",,Silvan Ridge
"Quite a deep color for a rosé__asily confused with a light Pinot Noir__his shows blackberry, black raspberry, hibiscus and fruit punch on the nose. For such a ripe nose, the palate is quite fresh and energetic, with black-plum skins, red-apple flesh and grippy cherry-pit flavors.",,Sofia
"A youthful wine that is just packed with fruit. It is a blend of Trincadeira, Aragonez and Syrah. Juicy, ripe and rich with black plum flavors, it is a delicious wine already. Drink now.",Terra d'Alter,Terras de Alter
"Jammy black plum aromas are savory, leathery and funky, with rusticity. This feels stout and chunky, while condensed flavors of fig and prune are fully ripe. A savory but mild finish is round but missing some structural support. Drink now through 2018.",Vinyes Velles,Tosalet
"Soft and creamy, this full, rich wine brings together delicious yellow and white fruits with citrus acidity and a tight, nervy texture. It has an attractive perfumed character balanced with a crisp, tight aftertaste. Drink from 2016.",,Trenel Fils
"This dry, almost austere wine has some tasty but subtle characteristics including a toasty, slightly earthy and buttery aroma followed by subtle almond and apricot flavors. It will make a great choice with tapas or fish, and a nice change of pace anytime.",,Vie Winery
"This easy-drinking wine has a bouquet of honeydew melon and lime juice. Flavors of lemon, tangerine, guava and white peach with a soft hint of baking spice continue into the finish, which is marked by flavors of stone fruits and nutmeg.",Fifth Generation,1848 Winery
A tangy textured wine that is impressively fresh for such a hot region as Alentejo. It has a crisp texture that is balanced by a touch of vanilla as well as freshened with citrus and green apple flavors. It is fresh and very drinkable at this young stage. Wait a year until 2017 and it will be even better.,Montes Claros Reserva Branco,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Light straw in the glass, this wine has aromas of pineapple and lemon zest. Refreshing on the palate, it offers flavors of clementine, lemon, orange rind, and honeysuckle. The finish features a lasting sense of brightness.",Classic,Barkan
"With generic berry, cherry and chocolate flavors that are rich and ripe, this soft, simple red blend is O.K. for everyday drinking.",Napoleon,Frenchie Winery
"The nose smells washed out, with hazy notes of char and cassis that come with a touch of sulfur. Light to medium bodied, the palate feels slick, soft and sweet tasting, with a candied cherry note that appears on the finish.",GRV,General's Ridge
"This wine is simple and thin, with moderate notes of red cherry and plum, but it's solidly done and the winemaking is clean.",Tavernello,Caviro
"A soft mix of 67% Syrah and 33% Petite Sirah, this is slightly ill-defined, marked most by mouth-puckering tannins.",Raja Cuvée,Jigar
"Tastes sweet, with citrus, white flower and green pea notes.",Dante Reserve,Michael Pozzan
This is an extremely simple rosé sparkler with medium aromas of wild berry and red rose backed by crisp freshness and bright perlage. It is a simple and thin bubbly overall.,Vino Spumante Rosé,Zardetto
"Simple and cloying in white sugar notes. Too bad, because there's good acidity and succulent citrus and tropical fruit flavors.",Swallowtail,Truett Hurst
"Fiery, punchy aromas of red berries and herbaceous plants make for a rough start. Flavors of leafy red raspberry and plum are typical for basic Merlot, while the finish is juicy in feel, with herbal, leafy, lightly cooked flavors.",,Vinos Magbel
"This is so heavy it's nearly a solid and not a liquid. Maximum ripeness is on display at all check points, especially the palate, which is syrupy, raisiny and viscous on the finish. This is as rich and ripe as it gets, like spineless Port. Tasted twice with inconsistencies; this review more greatly reflects the better bottle.",Reserva Limited Edition,Nieto Senetiner
"Medium-intense aromas of lingonberry, cherry and legume mark the nose. As the wine progresses across the palate, the acidity subjugates the fruit, and the palate turns tart.",,Annefield Vineyards
"With sharp acidity, a hot mouthfeel and rich flavors of cassis liqueur and chocolate-covered raisins, this Cabernet Sauvignon-based blend tastes more like Port than a dry table wine. Lots of new French oak does not restore balance. Drink up.",Beau Melange,Chateau Margene
"This is yet another plump, sweaty smelling Sauvignon Blanc from this producer. This vintage is fat in the mouth but kept alive by adequate young acidity. Salty, briny flavors of citrus, particularly grapefruit, end in similar briny fashion.",Estate Bottled,Casarena
"For 10 bucks you get a decent, 10 buck wine. Nothing fancy, just fruity, off-dry and crisply drinkable.",,Cottonwood Creek
"This is a leathery, stalky type of Malbec with fierce acidity and a pinched mouthfeel. Try as you might to find richness and heft, this is going to come across acidic and narrow, with herbal flavors and a finish that tastes like tomato and sour plum. For Argentine Malbec at this price point, this needs help.",Felix,Felix Lavaque
"This is rooty and leafy on the nose, with dry raspberry and root beer aromas. There's a compost-like undercurrent to this wine that's highlighted via leafy, herbal flavors and a baked, earthy finish.",,Dubacano
"A simple wine, with some charm. The chief fault is unripeness, in the form of bell peppers and ammonia. Yet you'll also find citrus and tropical fruits, leading to a honeyed finish.",,Michael Pozzan
"A happy tradition of Emilia-Romagna, this frizzante Lambrusco opens with foxy notes of raw grapes and blackberry. There's a touch of bitter almond on the close.",Picol Ross Brut,Moro di Rinaldini
"Thin and streamlined, this fresh sparkler offers mild aromas of peach and white flower. The wine is very simple and basic with a touch of sweetness on the close.",,Gaggioli
"Not much going on in this sweet Chardonnay except toothpicky oak, vanilla and watered-down peach juice.",,Spellbound
"This is fairly hard and fiery on the nose. The palate is tough and the wine smacks around rather than flows easily. With only modest acidity, it's not that lively.",Impetu,Vinicola Fraternidad
"This rosé is quite ripe tasting, like a white-sugared tropical-fruit-juice blend, with alcohol. On the plus side is clean acidity.",Rosé of,VML
"Frizzy and fun, this red semi-sparkler offers aromas of red beet, moist earth, black fruit and cherry cola. There's an earthy quality to the wine followed by bright acidity.",,Moro di Rinaldini
"Tastes unevenly ripened, with vegetal notes alongside the berries. Also feels overly soft and hot in alcohol.",Reserve Lot 13 Tecklenberg Ranch,Loken Cellars
"Earthy aromas lead to a wine that has some greenness, with dry tannins and bell pepper flavors. It is not likely to age.",Mina Velha,Quinta de São Sebastião
"This is an offbeat Moscato-based wine with aromas of peppermint and peach syrup that somehow work in unity. The wine offers soft, creamy fizz and a touch of delicate sweetness.",Seven Daughters,Cantine dei Colli Tramonte
"Tastes rustic and harsh, with acidity giving it a sting. The fruit is drying out and turning raisiny.",Rho,Ampelos
"Stalky, slightly green aromas blend with generic berry scents to form a marginal bouquet. This is tannic and rough on the palate, with buttery oak flavors along with candied berry fruit notes.",Rojo Granrojo,Bodegas Navarro López
"The main thing to know about this blend of undisclosed varieties is that it's not dry. It will appeal to consumers who like their white wines fruity and sugary, yet it's not really sweet enough to enjoy as a dessert sipper.",Great,Acronym
"This is harsh and scoury in the mouth, with thin blackberry and caramel flavors and some vegetal notes.",Treo Winemaker's Blend,Hess Select
"With a twist of mushroomy earth upon opening, this inexpensive Cabernet is strong, hearty and a bit thin on the finish__ine but not a standout.",,Green Truck
"Oily in green apple and lime, this crowd-pleasing wine is supple and smooth, with touches of honey and vanilla, especially on the finish. With a lilting ripeness at its core, it will pair well with roasted chicken in herbs.",,Cuvée Wine Cellars
"Sweet honeysuckle and fresh-cut grass open up on the nose, before high-toned grapefruit and peach hit on the midpalate. There's a mellowness to the finish, where grapefruit comes back to the fore, sprinkled in honey.",,Cuvée Wine Cellars
"Already balanced, this is a rich, firm and elegant wine. Its fruitiness comes from plum skins and black cherries as well as the acidity. It also has a solid core of tannin.",Les Goudelettes,Domaine Antonin Guyon
"Domaine Carneros' entry-level, estate-grown Pinot is intensely earthy and herbal, grippy on the back palate, a swirl of approachable blackberry, black cherry and sweet oak.",,Domaine Carneros
"This fresh wine is vinified in tanks rather than wood to retain the bright strawberry fruit flavors. It is elegant, light and has good acidity. Drink now.",Le Clos des Topes Bizot,Domaine Chantal Lescure
"Smooth, rich and rounded, this is already deliciously drinkable. It offers firm tannins while keeping rich red fruits and supporting acidity firmly in the picture. Drink from 2017.",,Domaine Daniel Largeot
"Lemon and peach flavors combine in this ripe and fruity wine. It has a touch of vanilla and soft fruitiness, as well as a tangy texture at the end. The wine is bright, very ready to drink.",,Domaine Normand
"A blend of 55% Cabernet and 45% Syrah aged in neutral French oak, it brings notes of black currant and high-toned herbs. The fruit flavors are supple in feel with astringent tannins and a warm finish.",Pierre McKinley Springs Vineyard,Domaine Pouillon
"Here's a refreshing white made from a blend Catarratto and other white varieties that opens with delicate aromas of grapefruit and citrus blossom. The straightforward palate offers juicy white peach and Bartlett pear, with just a hint of sea salt on the close.",Anthilia,Donnafugata
This vibrant blend of Nero d'Avola and Frappato delivers juicy blackberry and black cherry sensations while subtle notes of white pepper and mineral add interest. Fresh acidity makes it extremely food friendly.,,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"Crisp and light-bodied, this refreshing Insolia offers honeysuckle, exotic fruit and bright citrus sensations, along with notes of white almond. Fresh acidity gives it clean, quenching finish.",,Feudo Principi di Butera
"This Nero d'Avola opens with delicate aromas of blue flower, black and red berries. The easygoing palate offers blackberry and black cherry flavors alongside bright acidity. Pair it with barbecue, or pizza.",,Fi_Nobile
"Quite ripe and phenolic, this herbal, peppery wine seems to have had a lot of skin contact. The fruit flavors are as expected__pples and white peaches. The finish carries some bitterness.",Lawrence Vineyards,Gård
"The Cabernet is the best of the Girly Girl wines. This herbal, honest and no-frills Cabernet would be perfectly fine served alongside a grilled flank steak.",,Girly Girl
"There's a dustiness to the nose of this bargain bottling by this Rosenblum brand, which also feature sanguine elements and ripe plum. Once sipped, juicy cooked strawberries are present, as well as a little cola and gaminess, but it fades quickly. Pair with a simply grilled steak.",,Great American Wine Company
"This vibrant wine shows the lighter side of Aglianico while offering great value. It doles out juicy wild cherry, white pepper and clove alongside bright acidity and smooth tannins. Pair it with barbecue or hearty pasta dishes.",Gricos,Grifalco
"Tilled earth, leather, game, blue flower and black berry aromas waft out of the glass when pouring this blend of Piedirosso, Sciascinoso and Aglianico. The palate delivers raw black currant and sour cherry accented by black pepper and smoky mineral. There's not a lot of fruit richness, but the acidity is racy. Drink soon.",Cratere Rosso,Cantine Astroni
"This Bordeaux-style blend includes all five grapes. It's light and seamless, with a peppery, herbal streak running under compact, tannic dark fruit.",Cuvée du Soleil,Cave B
"An aromatic wine, it has notes of tangerine and mineral. It drinks medium sweet (10 g/L residual sugar), with the sugar getting just a bit out in front of the acids.",,Cave B
"Very crisp and apple flavored, it has bright acidity and a light, gentle texture of minerality. It is ready to drink now, although waiting until 2015 will bring out more depth of flavor.",Pierrefolle,Château des Rontets
"Smooth and dark black in color, the wine offers a cacophony of smoke, leather and baloney in smell and taste. Layers of black fruit are somewhat obscured by the darker, more savory overtones. Pair carefully with wild boar dressed in chanterelles.",Vagabond,Bacio Divino
"Solid and textured, this rich wine is showing as much tannin as fruit. But its warmth promises a wine with attractive red fruits and a generous future. Drink from 2016.",,R. Dubois et Fils
"Meaty, smoky and leathery, it provides plenty of pepper on the palate. The 15% Grenache blended in softens the wine somewhat, a taste of gamey cold cuts coming back into the fold midpalate. The tannins are mellowed and layered.",,Cuvée Wine Cellars
"Made from organic Nerello Mascalese grapes, this robust wine has sensations of mature black cherry that are accented by hints of balsamic herbs. It's not complex, but the ripe fruit offers easy-drinking pleasure.",,Di Giovanna
"Made from a blend of organically farmed Chardonnay, Grillo and 5% Viognier, this opens with delicate aromas of honeysuckle and stone fruit. The bright palate offers white peach, golden apple and a hint of citrus alongside crisp acidity.",Gerbino Bianco,Di Giovanna
"Epineuil is a region between Burgundy and Chablis, producing light, fruity Pinot Noir. This perfumed and dusty wine does show some firm tannins. It is bright with red currant and raspberry fruits, with a fresh aftertaste.",Côte de Grisey,Domaine Dominique Gruhier
"Mineral in texture, this wine is steely and firm. LIvely acidity comes from the citrus flavors and crisp apples. The wine is totally fresh and crisp. Drink now.",,Domaine Faiveley
"Very buttery aromas lead to a wine that is ripe, rounded and full in the mouth. The acidity is masked by the richness, leaving apricot rather than citrus as the dominant character.",La Roche,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"This straightforward blend of Nero d'Avola, Syrah and Merlot opens with aromas of mature black fruit, graphite and dark baking spice. The palate offers prune, black currant and intense black pepper supported by tight tannins. Pair this with pizza or hearty  pasta dishes.",Sed_ra,Donnafugata
"This fruity blend of Frappato and Syrah opens with pretty aromas of blue flower and rose. The round, fresh palate offers juicy black cherry and strawberry accented by black pepper.",Calanica Frappato & Syrah,Duca di Salaparuta
"Ripe, smooth and rich, this bears flavors of milk chocolate, blackberry jam, molasses and black licorice. The tannins are thick and supple, yet the mouthfeel remains firm. It finishes dry and spicy. This can be consumed now with roasted meat or beef stew.",Cinghiale Vineyard,Del Dotto
"Meditazione bursts out of the glass with a musky, vanilla-spice character that permeates the nose and palate. Fermented in oak with extended skin contact, this is an amber-hued wine that has bold, tea-leaf-like tannins and a gorgeous acidic edge. It's a fascinating effort to be enjoyed over the course of a long, meditative evening.",Meditazione,Channing Daughters
"This dark and attractive Shiraz shows excellent balance and a satiny texture. Notes of brambly raspberry and cherry mingle with seductive hints of sweet smoke, game and pepper. Hints of spicy mocha and forest berry linger on the finish. Approachable now, but should hold well and develop additional complexities through 2016.",Kayoumi Single Vineyard,Carmel
"Bold, ripe fruit and chocolate notes open the nose of this blend of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. The wine is layered and rich, with lingering tones of tobacco and sweet spice.",Mosaico,Casa di Terra
"Delicate and subdued, this wine shows forest fruit, savory spice and mild tobacco notes, backed by bright acidity and an extremely fine and polished mouthfeel. It's a testament to the elegant and ethereal 2006 vintage.",Riserva,Renieri
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc exemplifies the Terlato style, which is classic, complex and drinkable early. It has rich, thick tannins and flavors of blackberries, mocha and cedar. The finish is long and spicy.",Cardinals' Peak,Terlato
"It's important to not drink this Merlot right out of the bottle, because it's pretty tannic, and thus it's hard to appreciate the wine's beautiful fruit. Give it some time in a decanter to reveal the complex flavors of blackberry, cherry jam, grilled prosciutto, cassis, red licorice, cola and spice. It's unclear if this will age for a long time, but it can certainly be enjoyed over the next five years.",,Shafer
"The raspberry and cherry flavors are a bit obvious at first, but then the balanced tannins and acids become apparent, and the tasteful application of sweet, smoky oak surfaces. This wine grows more interesting as it sits in the glass. Drink it now and over the next 3_4 years for maximum freshness.",Pisoni Vineyard,Siduri
"Classic Smith-Madrone Riesling, this is dryish and clean, with mouthwatering acidity and hints of citrus, Asian pear, green apple and honey. It shows balance and elegance that is rare in California Riesling. Enjoyable now, and it should slowly develop nuances over the next eight years.",,Smith-Madrone
"This is the winery's first Petit Verdot, and it's a beauty. Firm and muscular, it has plenty of blackberry and black cherry flavors hanging on its tannic bones. The finish shows a smack of dark chocolate, and the overall structure suggests that this will age for 15 years or more.",Sharilee,Spring Valley Vineyard
"A high amount of toast currently dominates this wine. Texturally, it is minerally, citric and tight, and its grapefruit and toast notes mingle with its intense acids. Because of its structure, this needs to age for at least three years.",En Remilly Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Made from fruit that was sourced from Central Otago's Bendigo subregion, this is a ripe and concentrated wine that still manages to show a surprising degree of elegance on the finish. Black cherry fruit is framed by maple syrup and brown sugar timbering. The wine seems chunky and full at first, but it smooths out and turns supple by the finish. It should drink well for the next five years or more.",Golden Terraces Vineyard,Mud House
"One of the top offerings from Saint Clair is invariably its Omaka Reserve. The 2010 features blackberry and cola notes that are accented by a hickory smoke tone, a harmonious and supple texture and a moderately long finish. Ready to drink now, the wine should easily last another few years.",Omaka Reserve,Saint Clair
"A classy Cabernet, this wine shows the potential of this emerging San Benito County appellation. It's dry and smooth, with firm but supple tannins that provide grip to the blackberry, cherry and black currant flavors.",Ezio,Donati
"Biodynamic winemaker Luca D'Attoma ages this 50-50 blend of Merlot and Cabernet Franc in cement vats. Delicate and feminine, this wine has notes of berry, white cherry, bramble, plum cake and sweet spice. Bright tones of blueberry and cherry drive the refreshing finish.",Altrovino,Duemani
"This tastes like melted dark chocolate, blackberry essence, blackstrap molasses, black currant and black pepper. It's bone dry and dramatic, with chewy tannins. This is not a longterm ager, so drink it over the next 4_5 years, and let it spend a few hours in a decanter.",Larner Vineyard Clone 3 Reserve,db Winery
"Made in fairly modest quantities, this Merlot bears dark fruit that shows a pleasing, dusty quality. The blend includes 11% Cabernet Sauvignon, which keeps it in the Bordeaux-style camp. Firm and concentrated, it finishes with a tasty mix of cocoa, coffee grounds and Asian spices.",Canoe Ridge Estate,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"With its upfront, ripe apple and pear flavors, this wine is immediately attractive. Behind the fruitiness, there is a firm, structured character of minerality and a steely edge, which makes this a Chardonnay to age for 3_4 years.",Mont de Milieu Premier Cru,Domaine Charly Nicolle
"This shows the structure of the vintage as well as delicious red-berry and spice flavors. Hints of wood aging are apparent and need to integrate, so give this concentrated selection at least four years.",Les Hauts Jarrons Premier Cru,Domaine de Bellene
"This blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet, Syrah and Merlot strikes a beautiful balance between its hearty black-fruit aromas and spicy oak-driven nuances. The palate shows persistence, and it comes with bright berry intensity.",D'Amare,Diadema
"Rich ruby in color, this firm, concentrated wine shows minerality and solid tannins. There is a sense of power in this black-currant- and black-cherry-flavored selection. Keep it for at least seven years.",Aux Cras Premier Cru,Domaine Champy
"This single-vineyard 100% Cabernet Franc is firm, juicy and focused. It has a phenolic bite at the back end, along with lemony acids. The concentration of fruit and herb flavors is excellent, which makes it a fine steak wine and also a bottle to stow away for a few more years.",Conner Lee Vineyard,Arbor Crest
"Bright apple, pear and orange notes lead the nose of this well-balanced Chardonnay, with secondary accents of toast, sweet spice and nut. The vibrant mouthfeel is full but not flabby, with an attractive peach-pit flavor that carries through the long finish. Delicious now, but also should age well through 2017.",Yarden Odem Vineyard,Golan Heights Winery
"Clean, tart and expressive, this has flavors of Asian pear, orange, lime, vanilla and gooseberry. Bright and zesty, this would make for a fine apéritif, and it would also pair well with Asian fare.",,Flocchini
"Cranberry and cassis flavors meet in this tightly wound, bright and bold Bordeaux-style blend. It's comprised of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Petit Verdot and 10% Merlot, but the Petit Verdot does not dominate as is often the case. There's a tongue-tapping tang to the juicy young fruit, and the finish is clean and precise, with hints of tar and graphite.",Artisan Blend,Foundry Vineyards
"Powerful and finely structured, this rich wine has swathes of red plum and red berry flavors that balance the core of solid tannins. It shows the ripe fruit and structure of the vintage. Age this for 2_3 years.",,Jaffelin
"Rich, round and complex, this is full of ripe red-berry flavors. The acidity drives the solid tannins and firm structure. The wine has the approachability of Beaune, but it can also be aged for 4_5 years.",Les Cent Vignes Premier Cru,Jaffelin
"This Southern Rhône-style blend of Mourvèdre, Grenache and Cinsault opens with a lovely nose of violet and blue fruit scents. The fruit flavors are joined by a layer of wet stone, which adds some heft to the wine's foundation. Sleek and tangy, this can be consumed young, or it can be aged for several more years.",Stone Tree SoRhô,Helix by Reininger
"This vineyard-designated Vino Nobile shows concentrated notes of prune, cassis, tobacco and leather. The mouthfeel is linear, and it has a dusty, almost gritty texture. The wine's density feels good on the palate.",Vigneto Poggio Sant'Enrico,Carpineto
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Petite Sirah, Petit Verdot and Malbec, this is bone dry and full bodied, and it strikes the palate with rustic tannins. It has a complexity that's hard to define, and it will pair well with grilled meats or stews.",Oyster Ridge,Ancient Peaks
"A Petite Sirah abundant in black pepper and cinnamon spice, structured, ripe and leathery. The tannins show promise for aging 5_7 years, the wine's black fruit waiting to burst forth.",Blessings,Aver Family Vineyards
"This blend of Petite Sirah and Syrah is soft, rich and heavy. The alcohol is high, and the wine has some heat in the mouthfeel, with jammy raspberry, cherry and sweet oak flavors.",Faith,Aver Family Vineyards
"Soft and sweet for a Howell Mountain Cabernet, with one-dimensional red currant, mocha, cola and new oak flavors. Hard to see it going anywhere, so drink up.",,Howell Mountain Vineyards
"Made from 100% Sauvignon Blanc, with a light touch of oak, this is an easy-drinking wine with crisp acidity and ripeness making it a natural partner for Asian fare. It has intensely ripe apricot, orange, peach and vanilla flavors, with a note of gooseberry.",Soliloquy Vineyard,Flora Springs
"$14 is a pretty good price for a Chardonnay that shows such ripe, succulent fruit. It's rich in oranges, pineapples, limes and mangoes, brightened with crisp acidity. Entirely unoaked, the finish is dry, pure and clean.",Whiplash,Jamieson Ranch
"A soft, nicely oaked Merlot with flavors of baked plum and ripe blackberry. Full-bodied in every sense of the word, with just a sprinkling of spice on the finish.",Estate,Jason-Stephens
"This is undeniably an oaky wine with a prominent layer of buttered toast and butterscotch, but the underlying orange, guava and lime flavors are pristine.",Lewis Vineyard Reserve,Frank Family
"Here's a Pinot to drink now. It's a little on the soft, simple side, but tasty, with raspberry and cherry jam, cola, oak and spice flavors.",Julia's Vineyard,Cambria
"Sharp in acidity, cherry__nd raspberry__ie filling, this Zin has a sweet-and-sour taste. Don't look for subtlety, just grab the barbecue and pair it with this spicy, lusty wine.",Jackson James,Blanchard Family
"Waxy apple and melon aromas are basic but fresh. A plump and melony mouthfeel offers enough acidity to lift up flavors of honeydew, papaya and green banana. A round, regular feeling finish is clean and cleansing.",Conde de Valdemar,Bodegas Valdemar
"This is a straightforward but enjoyable selection, with black cherry aromas and whiffs of bitter almond that carry over to palate alongside a hint of black pepper. Enjoy this with savory pastas.",Le Poesie,Cantina di Soave
"This has initial aromas of raisin and underbrush, followed by hints of toasted oak and espresso. The palate shows evident alcohol sensations, with black cherry, fig and coffee flavors relegated to the background.",Le Poiane,Bolla
"This is an easy-drinking Cab for enjoying now. It's soft and fruit-forward, bursting with ripe, oak-tinged cherry and raspberry jam flavors.",,Bonneau
"Kana's Workingman's Red has turned into a southern Rhône style blend of six grapes, the only outlier being a splash of Tempranillo. Toasty, round and easy-drinking, it's a good, all-purpose barbecue red, with a smoky, espresso-scented finish.",Workingman's Red,Kana
"A light but nonetheless attractive Pinot Noir for drinking now. While it has little depth or complexity, it's likable for the silky texture and soft, approachable cherry, cola, rhubarb and green tomato flavors.",,MacMurray Ranch
"This blended white from Friuli has pretty white flower and exotic fruit aromas. It has pineapple, pear and banana peel flavors, although it finishes a bit short.",Pino & Toi,Maculan
"This earthy wine has almost overripe fruit sensations alongside rustic notes that eventually blow off in the glass. The palate shows very ripe plum, black cherry and spice notes. Drink soon.",,Le Bertarole
"Mirabelle is akin to Schramsberg's second label, but this brut is pretty good. Made from Chardonnay and Pinot Noir, it's rich and scoury with flavors of oranges, strawberries, limes and vanilla.",Mirabelle Brut,Schramsberg
"A hint of sulfur quickly gives way to aromas of Meyer lemon, mineral and yellow nectarine. Silky in texture, the wine feels lax on entrance but the acidity brightens toward the finish.",,Valerie Hill
"Matured on its lees for eight months in barriques, this wine offers aromas of crushed tomato vine, evident oak and vanilla. The palate boasts cantaloupe and green melon flavors, along with vanilla and bitter wood sensations.",Vieris,Vie di Romans
"Made from the Trebbiano di Lugana grape or Turbiana as it's now known, this white offers tropical-fruit sensations of pineapple and banana peel, along with a lingering ripe-fruit flavor on the finish.",Le Fornaci,Tommasi
"This is big and fruity on the nose, but there's also a stalky, roasted quality to the bouquet. This feels round, grabby and on the soft side, while mulchy flavors of rubber and blueberry hollow out quickly on the finish.",Roble,Torrederos
"This is still surprisingly fresh considering the age of this wine. It's simple and enjoyable, with mouthwatering cherry flavors layered with mint and white pepper accents. Pair it with rich pasta dishes.",Terra del Cereolo,Trabucchi d'Illasi
"Light, fruity, packed with strawberries, this is an attractive Pinot Noir. The only spoiler is the over-excited use of wood which is masking the fruit and will always be an important factor.",Clos Saint Landelain,René Muré
"Coming from the cool 2011 vintage, this is a distinctive wine with notes of petrol and herbs. It's lighter in style with tart fruit flavors. Tasted twice with consistent notes.",Biodynamic Wallula Vineyard,Pacific Rim
"Here's an enjoyable selection, offering ripe raspberry and black cherry flavors supported by bright acidity. Simple but well made, pair this with mildly seasoned cheeses, cured meats or ravioli.",Capitel della Crosara,Montresor
"This is a ripe and concentrated wine that shows the heat of the vintage. The nose shows smoky, almost burned aromas.The palate is better, with dense blackberry, prune and white pepper flavors. The midpalate is warm and the wine is already evolved; drink soon.",Tenazio,Monteci
"Aromas of very ripe plum, blackberry and raisin lead the nose of this wine, with a hint of oak. The palate is warm and ripe, delivering mature black-cherry and prune flavors layered with oak, vanilla and chocolate.",Austero,Pietro Zardini
"Notes of ground coffee, cocoa and forest floor dominate this wine's aromatic profile. Supple, dusty tannins and soft acids frame the weighty palate. The finish is medium to long, but it comes with some warmth.",Single Vineyard,Vivác Winery
"A rounded, smooth and fruity wine, the latest addition to the range from Vigouroux's Château Pech de Jammes. It is an easy drinking wine, plenty of black fruits, soft tannins and light acidity at the end.",Petit Jammes,Georges Vigouroux
"This blend of 59% Syrah, 21% Mourvèdre and 20% Grenache from the Sierra Foothills tastes a bit indistinct and slightly warm on the finish. It does deliver dark fruit flavors and plenty of vanilla-tinged oak. Drink now.",Red Dirt Red,Vinum Cellars
"A strongly flavored, candied sparkling wine, made from the classic varieties of Pinot Noir and Chardonnay. Seems overextracted, like a raspberry, almond and honey power bar, with the yeastiness and bubbly sparkles of Champagne.",L'Homme Qui Ris,McIntyre Vineyards
"Made with organically farmed fruit, this bright blend of Grechetto (80%) and Malvasia offers easy aromas of citrus, grapefruit and a touch of mature pineapple. The wine is fresh, lean and compact.",Nessuno,Moretti Omero
"Floral notes of chamomile and lavender overwhelm the bouquet, with secondary notes of black plum, berry and currant taking second stage. Cured meat and sweet smoke flavors unfold in the mouth and stay into the spice-driven finish.",,Post House
"Rugged in texture and jammy-sweet in berry fruit, this is a simple, hearty Cabernet. It's completely average in quality, which makes the price excessive.",,Punch
"Opens with wild, foxy aromas that suggest wet animal fur. With time things settle, setting up a plump palate with sweet but fairly bland blackberry and blueberry flavors. Turns hot and woody on the finish.",Monteagrelo,Bressia
"Neutral on the nose except for some generic white fruit aromas and saline. Feels tight, linear and driving, with modest apple and vanilla flavors. Turns more barrel-driven and creamy on the finish. Not stellar at this price.",Lágrima Canela,Bressia
"Carpineto consistently delivers clean, territory-driven wines at competitive prices. This lively Vernaccia opens with green apple, cut grass and dried sage aromas. It would pair nicely with a heaping plate of fried calamari rings.",,Carpineto
"Emmolo has been producing decent Merlots for years, and this '09 is reflective of their style. There's nothing wrong with it, but it's not very exciting either, offering pleasant cherry and oak flavors that are a little sweet.",,Emmolo
"Part of a trio of Best Buy wines from this producer in 2010, this easy Pinot Grigio delivers the goods in a cheerful, no-fuss package. Crisp lemon is backed by peach and pear.",Vigneto Vigne dai Vieris,Di Lenardo
"A Roman classic that often appears on trattoria tables besides grilled vegetables or insalata di mare, this classic Frascati Superiore offers subtle aromas of dried hay, citrus and pear.",,Fontana Candida
"Honeysuckle aromas sing __loral,_ but otherwise it's soapy smelling. Feels heavy and chunky for Torrontés, with honeyed, candied pear flavors. Plump on the finish, with adequate acidity.",,Altos de San Isidro
"A troubled Pinot Noir. The mouthfeel is all wrong, lacking Pinot's sensuality, but marked by harshness. And the raspberry and cherry flavors have a green, minty edge. Not likely to age, so if you drink it now, give it a good long decant.",Floodgate Vineyard West Block,Alysian
"A creamy hint of white chocolate adds fullness to the soft currant, cranberry and strawberry hull flavors. The palate is mouthfilling and round with a good citrus lift to the fresh close.",Secateurs Cinsault-Shiraz-Grenache,A.A. Badenhorst Family Wines
"Vibrant and fresh citrus aromas lead on this white blend from Greece. Lemon zest, orange marmalade and spice flavors on the palate are simple but good. Pair with grilled sardines, mussels, or a fresh salad.",Domaine Hatzimichalis Kapnias,Hatzimichalis
"Fresh and fragrant, this cheerful Moscato d'Asti offers sweet tones of peach, lemon mousse and white flower backed by soft foam on the finish. It's an easy dessert wine with loads of aromatic intensity.",,Veglio
"Heavy and fruity, with soft blackberry and cola flavors. With solid fruit and a firmly dry finish, it's a good burger wine for a weeknight.",,Vinum
"Dry, silky and brisk in acidity, this is a varietally correct Pinot Noir. It's not overly rich, but has plenty of cherry and oak to get by at this price.",,Vinum
"Vernaccia Rondolino opens with fragrant aromas of citrus, green apple and passion fruit. The mouthfeel is lean and compact, but there's a nice touch of zesty freshness on the close.",Rondolino,Teruzzi & Puthod
"It's a proper Pinot Noir in the silky texture and cherry and cola flavors, which finish smooth and dry. Other than that, it's rustic and heavy.",Falcon's Perch,J. Lohr
"Luscious aromas of ripe peach and citrus are followed by balanced waves of peach, lemon curd and melon on the palate. Soft in style and approachable, this is a good everyday white that drinks very well on its own or paired with poultry, salads.",,Boutari
"A blend of Trebbiano, Malvasia and Grechetto, Donna Patrizia is a well-price, informal wine that could pair with grilled eggplant purée and fried pita wedges. Aromas include pineapple, melon and grapefruit.",Donna Patrizia,Buccia Nera
"Rounded and creamy wine. It has an edge of pepper, its acidity melding easily into the apple and pear fruit flavors. It finishes easily with a ripe pineapple note. Screwcap.",,Ecker
"This wine has the plucky character typical of Greece, but with a polished spin. The nose is allspice, cherry and cocoa, and on the palate, dried fruits, coffee, mesquite smoke and chocolate. The wine finishes spicy and clean. Good, if not a bit aggressive. Pair with meat or hearty fare.",,Estate Constantin Gofas
"If you love Chardonnay, this well-priced expression from central Italy is well worth your time. There's a floral element of honeysuckle and yellow rose backed by a soft, creamy mouthfeel.",,Farnese
"A classic go-to, this blend offers great freshness and ripe fruit flavors at a terrific price. Green melon, red apple, ripe citrus and a touch of floral character all unfold in the nose and mouth, ending with a crisp and mouthwatering finish.",White,Goats do Roam Wine Co.
"Lots of raspberry and cherry fruit in this Pinot Noir. It's sweet and fruity and crisp in acidity, with a sweet coat of vanilla oak. Drink now.",Nicky Hahn,Hahn
"Ripe, sweet pineapple and orange jam flavors mark this rather simple, forward Chardonnay. Oak brings even sweeter vanilla, buttered toast and caramel notes. It's designed to appeal to the modern style.",SLH Estate,Hahn
Here's an organically farmed Italian Pinot Grigio that opens with light nuances of lemon and peach that are smooth and well integrated. Crisp acidity makes this wine perfect for easy vegetable dishes or seafood appetizers.,Trefili,Cantine Volpi
"Not quite ripe, with a vegetal, herbal edge to the cherry and raspberry fruit. The acidity is nice and brisk, and the texture is beautifully silky, but that tug of greenness distracts, and limits ageability.",River Ranch,Renteria
"Acidity dominates this Pinot, giving it a tingly scour. While it's silky and dry, the cherry fruit is a little slender.",Cool Climate,Cline
"Jangly in the mouth, with an uneven tannin structure that makes it a bit rough. But there's plenty of jammy cherry and berry fruit. Drink now with a hearty beef stew.",,F.J. Serra
"Bright and fruity, with a tannic edge, this is a blend of Touriga Nacional and Syrah. This is food friendly, with a rich red-fruit flavor that's cut with a caramel note and strawberry acidity.",Conde de Vimioso Colheita Seleccionada,Falua
"This wine has wonderfully perfumed aromas of cherries and raspberries, but seemingly stops there. The flavors are enjoyable but simple and while the mouthfeel is ample, the finish falls off a bit.",Cuvée Sabine,Domaine du Gros Pata
"Smooth and rounded, this is a food-friendly rosé. It has a ripe strawberry flavor, with a touch of lime juice and a soft, full finish. Just a touch of tannin gives extra character.",Casa do Lago,DFJ Vinhos
"Soft and ripe, a flavor of crushed strawberries leads this wine in a fruity direction. It has notes of vanilla and spice, with attractive balancing acidity. This is a food-friendly rosé.",Portada Winemaker's Selection,DFJ Vinhos
"This has soft, ripe fruit, with notes of lime and orange zest fitting easily with the ripe peach and melon flavors. This is warm, rounded and ready to drink.",Portada Winemaker's Selection,DFJ Vinhos
"This lightly sparkling red is earthy and tensely acidic. With its red currant fruit, mouth-filling acidity and tight tannins, this is meant to pair with oily foods__specially fish.",Tinto,Adega de Monção
"This was a cool, difficult vintage, and the wine reflects that with strong flavors of tomato juice and herb. A touch of tart pomegranate comes through also.",,A to Z
"This opens with perfumed aromas of blue flower, cherry and wild berry. Soft and simple, it has a pretty floral finish of red rose and violet.",Pergola Rosso,Angelini
"A simple Sauvignon Blanc, this is dry and mouthwateringly tart. The lemon and lime flavors have a green edge of gooseberry.",,Frog's Leap
"A light style of Petite Sirah, this is softly drinkable now, offering a wealth of cherry, mocha and tobacco flavors and gentle tannins.",,Fleur
"Made in a popular style, this is a soft, slightly sweet and very fruity Cabernet. It has candied cherry, roasted almond, honey and spice flavors, wrapped in a smoothly tannic framework.",Triumph,Calistoga Cellars
"This smells a bit stalky, leathery and warm at first, but airing brings it along. While it's never all that vivid on the nose, it does smell of baked berry and plum. It feels wide and neither tannic nor tough, with lightly herbal, rustic flavors of plum and berry.",Dama de Toro,Bodegas Fariña
"Verdicchio is celebrated for its crisp, green aromas that resemble lime, kiwi and cut grass. This expression offers those notes, with an added touch of lemon candy.",,Capestrano
"Oregon Chardonnay in the low 12% alcohol range is well out of the ordinary, but it reflects the vintage conditions in 2010. This is a wine for acid lovers, with very tart green-apple fruit and a bit of spice.",Her Silhouette,Amalie Robert
This is a crisply fruity dry rosé from the vineyards of Fronton. It has raspberry and citrus flavors and refreshing acidity. The finish is light and fresh.,Villa La Vie en,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"This is a pretty nice wine for drinking with every­day fare, and at this price, it's a real value. It packs a punch, with solid blackberry and licorice flavors that finish dry and spicy.",Mischief,Lost Angel
"Tight, acidic and a little green, this lacks the generosity and opulence you expect of a Pinot Noir from this famous vineyard. The cherry fruit is laced with mint and tobacco leaf notes. Drink now.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Stephen Ross
"Easy, slender and fresh, this bright Chianti (85% Sangiovese with Merlot) reveals green notes of olive and herb followed by wild berry and spice.",,Straccali
"There are good blackberry and black currant flavors in this dry Cabernet, with an elegant coating of smoky oak, but it lacks some concentration.",Lot #10,Tangley Oaks
"Seemingly sweet cherry, mocha and oak flavors mark this ripe Cabernet. It offers plenty of fruity pleasure.",,Napa Cellars
"Clean, dry and light on the nose, this has a smoky, leafy accent. While it's not superlively on the palate, it offers nice grapefruit, cherry and nectarine flavors, with a dry, smoky and tasty finish.",Brut Rosé,Segura Viudas
"Some unripe vegetal notes mar what is otherwise a fine, silky Pinot Noir, with flavors of raspberry cream and cinnamon spice. Give this lots of breathing before you drink it.",Tondre's Grapefield,Sonnet
"Easy, fresh and simple, this opens with aromas of dried hay, stone fruit and honey, offering a thick, creamy feel on the palate. There's a touch of fruit on the close.",Poggio al Tufo,Tommasi
"Very dark in color, this jumps out at first because it's showy and high in alcohol, with seemingly sweet overtones that might appeal to lovers of brawny red wine.The oak, green pepper and olive undertones take over on the finish.",Reserve,Rigg Estate Vineyards
"Fresh and simple, this iconic Chianti from Piccini boils the Tuscan red wine experience down to its easiest and most genuine state. This is a crisp, lean wine with a ruby color and bright berry aromas.",,Piccini
"At first the nose is high toned and jumpy, but with time it falls into a good place with a medicinal berry note at the fore. Solid, tannic and nervy, it has plum and noticeable young-oak flavors. This turns herbal tasting and choppy on the finish.",Joven,Martín Berdugo
"This is a pleasant, fruity Vinho Verde with the right fresh lemon flavor. There is a light prickle to add to the crisp character.",Grande Escolha,Quinta de Gomariz
"The packaging stands out with its tiny grape cutting that's tied to the bottle's neck. This is a bright wine that's redolent of lemon soda, chalky candy (like Pez) and apricot.",Dal Tralcetto,Cantina Zaccagnini
"A big, bold wine that is full of dense fruit and sweet berry flavors. It has weight and richness, the structure stuffed with pure, ripe Malbec fruit that has not been in wood. Delicious and worth aging 2_3 years.",K-Or,Clos Troteligotte
"Very rich and ripe, marked by pure, intense flavors of cherries, blueberries and spicy cloves. It displays the balanced elegance and thoughtful winemaking of this winery. Young and juicy now, it should develop in the bottle for a year or two, but some sharpness in the finish will ultimately limit ageability.",Dutton Ranch,Dutton-Goldfield
"There's a dark, savory quality to this richly concentrated wine that is reminiscent of aromas of air-dried beef or spicy bresaola. You'll also get ripe fruit and blackberry jam and there's a textured, gritty quality to the firm but ripe tannins.",Marina Cvetic',Masciarelli
"Here's a lush, fruity Cabernet, brimming with blackberry, black currant and flashy oak flavors. It straddles that line between a tannic young wine you can drink now after decanting, and one to age. Probably best opened by 2015.",Cañon Creek Vineyard,Midsummer Cellars
"Tense and tannic, it's very dry initially, before opening up to show its rich blackberry and plum flavors. The structure is impressive with wood spice layered with tight fruit tannins. Worth aging for 3_4 years.",Grande Escolha,Mouras de Arraiolos
"A potent, dark style of Syrah, with aromas of black cherry, generous oak, leather and vanilla. Shows overdrive on the palate, with forceful tannins and concentrated flavors of blackberry, graphite, black licorice and wood resin. Fruity and long on the back end; drink now through 2013.",Gran Reserva,Morandé
"Made from equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, this wine is flamboyantly rich and opulent in fruit. The cherry pie and blackberry tart flavors finish sweet, with a bracing scour of tannins and acidity. Should hold in the bottle for some years in a good cellar.",Mernet,Keenan
"Though just 12% alcohol, this wine is ripe and vibrant, with a thrilling bouquet of violets, cranberries and fresh herbs. Light and delicate, perfectly balanced and complex, with a whiff of chocolate in the finish.",Carter Vineyard,Ken Wright
"An attractive and slightly hedonistic wine. The intense black fruit core of boysenberry, blueberry and raspberry fruit preserves are spiked with spicy notes of garrigue, violet, faint pepper and soft sweet smoke. Rich and thick on the palate, the creamy mouthfeel is balaned by medium tannins and a long, gripping finish.",Grand Terroir Syrah-Grenache-Mourvèdre,Gérard Bertrand
"By its very name, this is the top wine from this estate in the Tarn region, which is close to Gaillac. It is powerful, with a medicinal and bitter chocolate edge. The fruit is firm, darkly tannic, rich and worth aging.",Grande Réserve,Domaine D'en Ségur
"Sweet, lush and harmonious, with almost decadent honey, apple and citrus flavors balanced by scents of crushed stone and just enough acidity to keep things vibrant.",Bernkasteler Badstube Spätlese,Peter Nicolay
"A new venture from Dirk Niepoort, who has chosen the crisp and fresh Loureiro grape as the base for this tantalizingly refreshing wine. It is dry, dancing lightly on the palate with a lively citrus and grapefruit character.",Dócil,Niepoort
"If you're used to soft, ripe Napa Valley Cabernet, this one, grown just over the Lake County border, will strike you as dry and unyielding. The tannins are pronounced, giving it a hard bite. But it's rich and deep in crème de cassis, the sort of wine that seems ageworthy. Take a gamble and put it in your cellar for 6_8 years.",Obsidian Ridge Vineyard,Obsidian Ridge
"An impressive Pinot Noir that brings out plenty of the varietal's characteristics: the strawberry fruit flavors, the structure and the acidity. It is from the region north of Lisbon, which has a cool maritime climate, giving the wine its depth of flavor. Age for two years.",Q de Sant'Ana,Quinta de Sant'Ana
"The top wine from Quinta Nova is hugely rich, rather extracted and over the top. Chocolate, rather than fruit, dominates, giving a bitter edge and bringing out the wine's dark tannins. It's certainly impressive, and will soften in 3_4 years.",Referencia Grand Reserva,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"Pungent and precise, with a textbook mix of green aromas, tropical fruits and lushness. Feels lively and juicy, with lime, lychee, green apple and pineapple flavors that settle on passion fruit come finishing time.",Q,Quintay
"Made from Pinot Noir, this is a sophisticated and soft wine, its acidity cutting through the richness. There are lemon and green apple flavors followed by a red fruit aftertaste. A delicious, high quality sparkling wine.",Bruto,Murganheira
"Still retaining its fruitiness, this smooth aged tawny offers red-fruit and caramel flavors, layered with notes from wood aging. Drier than some aged tawnies, it has a smoky character to go with its ripe feel.",10 Year Old Tawny,Taylor Fladgate
"Here's a full, rich Taurasi that opens with a slightly raw note of fresh cherry, exotic spice and milky chocolate. The mouthfeel is plush, long and velvety.",,Vesevo
"Spelt is a mature and richly extracted Montepulciano d'Abruzzo, with deep tones of black tobacco, ripe berry, prune, plum and spicy rum cake. It exhibits soft texture and a plush, rich finish.",Spelt,La Valentina
"Hovering easily between red-fruit flavors and a more mature wood-aged taste, this is a smooth Port. It is dominated by a rich texture, both juicy and spicy with a smoky hint.",Colheita,Niepoort
"A smooth and beautifully ripe wine that is full of rich red fruits, in a Burgundian style. Opulent and deliciously rich, its tannins are enveloped in a plump velvet cushion. It can age longer, but is almost drinkable now.",Charme,Niepoort
"An impressively structured blend of Tannat and Cabernet Franc, this wine boasts a concentrated structure, with dense tannins to go with the flavors of black plum skin and black currant. Age for 3_4 years.",Château de Crouseilles,Producteurs Plaimont
"Darkly tannic, Tannat-dominated wine. The structure is formidable, its rich fruit layered with the dry spice, fruit cake flavor and a powerful texture. Think of this wine with a stew, but also age for a few years.",Cuvée 1907,Producteurs Plaimont
A brilliantly crisp wine that combines both the creaminess and fruit of Arinto and Chardonnay. Wood aging has added a rounder character. Ready to drink in a year.,Reserva Branco,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"Starts off with promising aromas of struck flint, lime and passion fruit, then delivers flavors that are sweet and succulent. The ripe tropical fruit notes seem to lack the intense acids of some 2010 wines, making this a lush, easygoing wine to drink over the next few years.",Josephshöfer Spätlese,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"Very rich and opulent. You can taste how the grapes had a long season to grow enormously ripe, delivering flavors of pineapples, pears and golden mangoes. Yet the cool vintage also preserved vital acidity. A delightful young Chardonnay for drinking now with upscale fare.",,Buena Vista
"Shows much in common with past vintages of this bottling. It's dry, tart in acidity and somewhat earthy, with a nice balance of cherries, herbs and cedar. Feels complex and distinguished, in a dry, elegant style.",de Villiers,Calera
"This vineyard bottling is very vintage driven. The cool 2009 harvest has made it ripe and tart in cherry pie flavors, but also rather tannic. It's aloof, revealing little of its soul, beyond the primary fruit and oak. Needs time in the cellar. Could really be interesting over the next decade.",Mills,Calera
"A little reticent on the nose, but opens up generously in the mouth. It's off-dry (3% residual sugar), with a flavorful, round mix of citrus, tangerine and nectarine fruits. Full-bodied and lingering, it sails into a clean, tangy finish.",,Colter's Creek
"A lush, decadent style of Muscat de Beaumes de Venise, this is ripe and viscous, filled with honeyed apricot and tangerine flavors. The merest hint of bitterness on the lengthy finish helps to balance the considerable sweetness.",,Vignerons de Beaumes de Venise
"A similar but bigger version of the Whistle Stop Red, this is made of all Cabernet, bearing rather hard tannins and flavors of coffee and clean earth. It's a good choice to pair with grilled cuts of beef.",Reserve,Snoqualmie
"Guidalberto is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot, with soft tannins and a lingering spice flavor on the finish. The bouquet is marked by cherry, blackberry, leather and tobacco notes. The intensity is present but not overdone.",Guidalberto,Tenuta San Guido
"Familar aromas of cherry, plum and berry are on the money. This is tight as nails on the palate, this and nevertheless thrusts with boysenberry, blackberry and a hint of amaro. A wall of finishing tannin carries flavors of chocolate and black spice. Big, ripe and serious.",Reserve Barrancas Vineyards,Pascual Toso
"Intense on the nose, this has spice, leather and ripe berry aromas. It feels clean, plummy, juicy and bright, with lifted red and black fruit flavors. Showing chewy tannins and additional juiciness on the finish, it's very nice and delivers the goods.",Reserve Barrancas Vineyards,Pascual Toso
"This medium-dry wine is rich and rounded. It has concentrated flavors of spice, mango, crisp lime and ripe apple. Full-bodied and rounded, it has a good shot of acidity.",Réserve,Meyer-Fonné
"There's a touch of spice in this rounded, ripe wine. It's dry, with flavors of baked apple and cinnamon. Full, rich and flavorsome.",,Domaine Ernest Burn
"This is a delicate Pinot Gris, medium-sweet in style, taking its cue from the baked apple flavor and fragrant acidity. A touch of spice gives a counterpoint to the refreshing aftertaste.",Marckrain Grand Cru,Domaine Michel Fonne
"There is little of the Chasselas grape left in Alsace today, which is a shame when you taste the wine from these 60-year-old vines. It has a crisp apple flavor, with pepper and spice adding complexity to the character. The finish leaves a warm glow of ripe, lightly sweet fruit.",Vieilles Vignes,Domaine Schoffit
"Ripe berry, mild raisin and overall clarity define the bouquet. This offers a full, complete mouthfeel, with structure and layers of roasted berry, spice and integrated herb. It's sturdy and long on the satisfying finish.",Crianza,Burgo Viejo
"Villa Antinori offers the elegance and excellence of a great Tuscan producer, with the informality of a family dinner wine. Notes of cherry, blackberry, spice and leather give it softness and persistence.",Villa Antinori,Antinori
"Gorgeous violet and spiced red-cherry notes are fragrant on this harmonious Pinot Noir. Elegant and brisk, this has tart, sour fruit flavors that are accented by loads of fresh green herb and a crushed-stone minerality.",Vintner's Select Unfined & Unfiltered,Bloomer Creek
"Still in its infancy, this should be cellared for at least another few years to fully integrate and better express the nuances of spice root, black tea and cocoa nib. The black cherry and plum flavors are plentiful and vibrant, and the gripping tannins linger long into the close.",Rimage,M. Chapoutier
"Dark fruits like blackberry, raspberry and black plum lead the bouquet, with supporting aromas of milk chocolate and purple flower. Balanced and approachable, it has a crushed velvet texture that's complemented by the skin-driven fruit and dusty cocoa flavors on the palate.",Rimage,M. Chapoutier
"A veneer of spicy oak overlays the nose, accenting aromas of mocha, chocolate and dark fruit. The palate tastes like a tar pit, with a subtle flavor of grilled meat that gives this wine a savory edge. The muscular tannins are well manicured, creating footing for the expressive and commanding finish.",,King Family
"This is dry and firm__ts tannins immediately noticeable. There are hints of juicy acidity in the background, but this solid, dense and serious wine is unlikely to soften much more. Pair with winter stews and rich meat dishes.",Chevalier Reserve,Iby
"Fiery at first, this also has mint and toast notes to the otherwise black-fruit-scented nose. It feels tannic and drawing, but strong boned. Flavors of roasted black fruit are bolstered by olive, chocolate and spicy toast accents. Finishes savory and firm.",Single Vineyard Reserva,Lamadrid
"Bramble, smoke and charred wood notes add rusticity to the subtle red-cherry and plum flavors. The full-bodied palate is earthy, with tones of dried mushroom and leaf that are marked by big, chunky tannins. It finishes surprisingly sweetly, with a bright red-raspberry note.",,Sutor
"It's deep garnet in color, made solely from Muscat _ Petits Grains Noir, with unique aromas reminscent of pomegranate and cherry, and a slightly peppery note. Medium-bodied and silky in texture, it has a long finish that hints at leather, earth and cocoa.",Rouge Venise,Vignobles de Balma Venitia
"This smooth, wood-aged wine demonstrates the acid of Zweigelt, plus complex toast, red cherry and dark chocolate flavors. The wine is rich, ripe and full-bodied, finishing with fresh juicy acidity.",Edition Chremisa Sandgrube 13 Barrique,Winzer Krems
"Solid cherry and berry aromas are smooth and appealing, while a spot of pinched leather adds character to the nose. This feels tight and good, with racy acidity leading a red plum flavor to a dry, tight finish. Nice in a no-nonsense way.",Crianza,Viña Mayor
"Well balanced and 100% varietal, this is a mix of berry, plum and cassis flavors that are annotated with notes of licorice, tar and coffee. Moderate in length and clean, this has polished tannins to keep it all in balance.",Mule Skinner Estate Grown,Spring Valley Vineyard
"The name is a clever pun on the two vineyard sources__ineen and Meek. Smooth and supple, this varietal wine has a round, pleasing, full-flavored and full-bodied quality that keeps the fruit front and center, while bringing in plenty of coffee and chocolate highlights.",Dynamique,Palouse
"Part of the natural wine movement, this blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon comes from organically farmed fruit. There's a touch of heat on the palate, with aromas of cherry liqueur, jammy blackberry and exotic spice that drive the bold and masculine mouthfeel.",Emineo,Paniole
"This is a mature and toasty vintage, showing notes of yeast, croissant and toast flavors. The fruit is still there, with notes of quince, pear and green plum partnered with acidity. It is balanced, ripe and ready to drink now.",Vintage Brut,Pannier
"Scents of waxy lemon peel, lanolin, fresh herb and fennel entice on this wonderfully dry Riesling, with penetrating lemon and white peach flavors. Brisk and vibrant, it has a refreshing crushed-stone minerality.",RTR Vineyard Dry,Red Tail Ridge
"For many years, Red Willow Cabernet was exclusively produced at Columbia Winery in a style that emphasized rather green, stemmy flavors. This is the polar opposite. It's roasted, earthy and tannic, with a mix of prune, fig and compote, along with a highlight of cinnamon spice. The finish turns lighter, with a leafy component typical of fruit from this vineyard.",Red Willow Vineyard,Adams Bench
"Ripe to the point of smelling like Port, this is a wine for those who relish sweet flavors of raisin, cooked fig, and ultraripe tree fruit in their Cabernets. This has so much fruit it almost seems to have some sweetness. Drink this soon, while some youthful freshness remains.",the V,Adams Bench
"Showing dryness in its pepper and spice characters, this is a full-bodied, weighty wine. Dried fruit and lychee combine with a toasty, almond-flavored edge. Worth aging a year.",,André Kientzler
"Tobacco and clove aromas ride high on the mildly leafy bouquet. It feels round, juicy, tannic and tight, with mature berry, spice, earth and leather flavors. It remains earthy and mature on the finish, which fades to a blackened, spicy expression with notes of tomato and spice.",Gran Reserva Tempranillo-Graciano,Bodegas Ontañón
"Like most barrel-fermented Viuras from Rioja, this smells oaky but low on fruit. Round and resiny on the palate, this tastes mostly of saucy oak and briny citrus. The finish is sound in feel but challenging in flavor.",Conde Valdemar,Bodegas Valdemar
"This is good and grapy from the fresh berry aroma to the juicy, slightly sweet cherry flavor, to the soft texture with just a hint of crispness. An accent of smoky spiciness in the aromas and the aftertaste adds extra interest.",RedVolution,Bota Box
"Light in color, this gently fruity wine offers a touch of caramel as well as red currants. It's made to drink young and fresh now.",Fleurs de Belcier,Château de Belcier
"This wine is bone dry, very crisp and fruity. It presents a bright and lively character plus orange peel tang. The acidity at the end is very fresh, with just a touch of caramel.",,Château de l'Aubrade
"Heavy and fat, this dark-colored rosé has a bitter character along with vanilla and spice flavors. The almost-sweet texture is round and soft at the end.",,Château Lamothe-Vincent
"The wine misses fruit, although it does have a firm structure and tannins. A fresher character at the end gives a lift of acidity.",,Château Turcaud
"Totally fresh, crisp and with great acidity, this wine is all abut fruit. Citrus and crisp green apple dominate. The end conveys a bright, tight, mineral texture.",Le Bord'eaux,Clos des Moiselles
"A sweet version of Riesling, this offers fresh apple and strawberry aromas, sweet melon and cucumber flavors, a soft texture and light body.",Estate,Drytown
Light volatile notes distract from the aromas. It's a shame because the tart dark cherry flavors provide plenty of enjoyment.,,Hard Row To Hoe
"This moderately colored wine offers an unusual assortment of cherry, smoke, green wood and medicinal notes. The strawberry, cranberry and mesquite flavors are elegant, with a chalky feel.",Underwood Mountain Vineyard,Jacob Williams
"This informal red opens with aromas of leafy underbrush, wet soil and dark plum. The simple palate offers up tart cherry, black raspberry and an earthy note of game alongside brisk acidity. Angular but fleeting tannins give it an abrupt finish. Drink now.",,Lanciola
"This wine has a dark chocolate character that shows how it has been extracted, masking the juicy fruits and giving dark, dry tannins. It should soften, although a wine like this should be more about fruit than structure.",Lestruelle,Maison Bouey
"A slightly earthy aroma leads to lean citrus aromas, attractive kiwi and apple flavors and a somewhat tangy texture. Overall it is light-bodied and modest in flavor.",Blue Quail,McFadden
"A generic expression of the variety with some notions of ripe plum, dark cherry and black pepper, this straightforward wine is ready to drink now. It takes on full tannic strength on the finish.",Classic Collection,Napa Cellars
"A distinct candied sweetness announces itself on the nose, a Jolly Rancher strawberry high-toned ripeness. Beyond that, expect fierce, as yet unresolved, tannins and a peppery finish.",,Rippey
"Fresh, clean and rather soft in balance, this shows easy-to-like aromas of pear and apple, slightly sweet flavors of honey and pear juice, and an almost syrupy, soft mouthfeel. It's agreeable and sweet.",Jam's Blend,Tortoise Creek
"Heavily roasted, leathery, earthy aromas slightly override the fruit tones. This has a grabby, tannic palate and burnt, herbal, earthy black-fruit flavors. Saltiness and blackened notes are to be found on a clampy finish.",Dolmo,Vicente Gandia
"This totally acidic wine is crisp and shockingly tart. Fruit has been overtaken by acidity that gives the wine a very fresh, very tangy character.",,Château de Lardiley
"Light, ripe and fruity, this wine is bursting with black currant fruits supported by a firm base of dry fruit tannins. It can be drunk now in its youth, but will be better from 2016.",,Château Grand Jean
"This is a perfumed wine, fresh with floral character. An attractive crisp edge makes it ready to drink now.",Esprit,Château la Caderie
"This caramel-flavored, lightly pink wine is soft and full in the mouth, with a light touch of tannin in the background. Drink now.",,Château Maison Noble
"Herb, medicine cabinet, leather and dried cherry aromas precede an unusual mixture of sweet and tangy flavors. It all creates a somewhat uneasy mix in the glass.",Blend 31,Barnard Griffin
"This is an informal wine that offers hints of raw red cherry, strawberry and a dash of cinnamon. Brisk acidity and fragile, fleeting tannins give it an abrupt finish.",,Artimino
"Peach and melon aromas are simple and clean. This has a wide but diluted mouthfeel and no real sense of direction. Citrus and white pineapple flavors are mild and limited, while the finish offers a touch of nectarine before fading out.",,Conde Bel
"Leathery cedar and ripe, almost baked blackberry and blueberry commingle in this generously tannic wine, which has a note of bitterness at its end.",,St. Francis
"Light cherry colored, this wine displays aromas of herbs, cherry and melon. It drinks off dry (6.6g/L residual sugar) but lacks the acid to support the sugar.",Sangiovese,Waterbrook
"This is a spunky, jumpy Tempranillo with horsey aromas of cherry and plum. A light, fresh palate delivers lightly herbal flavors of plum and pie cherry, with an earthy twist. Mild and hollow on the finish.",White Label,Faustino Rivero Ulecia
"The variety is hard to find on this wine with aromas of tire rubber, barrel spice, green pepper and herb in the lead. It's medium bodied in feel, with soft tannins.",,Kennedy Shah
"This wine is lightly herbaceous, with a crisp while creamy texture that emphasizes perfumed green fruits and refreshing acidity. It is light, fruity and ready to drink.",,Ginestet
"Earthy, grassy, cherry aromas are lightly medicinal in front of a slightly narrow, almost citric palate that comes with a note of vinegar. Black-plum flavors are simple on the midpalate, while modest notes of plum and berry show on the finish.",Angelitos Negros,La Casa Maguila
"Quite a deep color for a rosé__asily confused with a light Pinot Noir__his shows blackberry, black raspberry, hibiscus and fruit punch on the nose. For such a ripe nose, the palate is quite fresh and energetic, with black-plum skins, red-apple flesh and grippy cherry-pit flavors.",,Sofia
"A youthful wine that is just packed with fruit. It is a blend of Trincadeira, Aragonez and Syrah. Juicy, ripe and rich with black plum flavors, it is a delicious wine already. Drink now.",Terra d'Alter,Terras de Alter
"Jammy black plum aromas are savory, leathery and funky, with rusticity. This feels stout and chunky, while condensed flavors of fig and prune are fully ripe. A savory but mild finish is round but missing some structural support. Drink now through 2018.",Vinyes Velles,Tosalet
"Soft and creamy, this full, rich wine brings together delicious yellow and white fruits with citrus acidity and a tight, nervy texture. It has an attractive perfumed character balanced with a crisp, tight aftertaste. Drink from 2016.",,Trenel Fils
"This dry, almost austere wine has some tasty but subtle characteristics including a toasty, slightly earthy and buttery aroma followed by subtle almond and apricot flavors. It will make a great choice with tapas or fish, and a nice change of pace anytime.",,Vie Winery
This supple medium-bodied Pinot Noir is ready to drink. Predominantly earthy notes of leather and dried spices are harmonious and complex without being overly demanding.,Omrah,Plantagenet
"This is a pale colored wine, a blend of local grapes and deliciously fresh. It is rounded and smooth, touched by citrus and fresh tangerines. Ripe and fruity, it is ready to drink now.",Premium Branco,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"This ripe, rounded and fruity wine hails from vineyards at the western end of the Marne Valley. Its yellow fruit and soft apple flavors are only lightly marked by minerality. The acidity is fragrant, refreshing and with just the right crispness to balance all this soft fruit.",Esprit Brut,Baron-Fuenté
"Aromas of scorched earth, mature black-skinned fruit, blue flower, toast and Oriental spice lead the way on this full-bodied wine. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, espresso, licorice and ground pepper set against a backdrop of fine-grained tannins.",Sovrana,Beni di Batasiolo
"Hints of yuzu citrus and smoke entice on the nose of this puckery tangerine-inflected Riesling. Off-dry in style, it's enriched by luscious streaks of honey and sweet grapefruit on the midpalate. Finishes moderately long on a kiss of blossoms.",Piesporter Kabinett,Bollig-Lehnert
"Aromas of baked plum, scorched earth, mint and menthol come together in the glass. The firm palate offers dried black cherry, raisin, ground pepper and a hint of Oriental spice accompanied by close-grained tannins. A licorice note closes the finish.",,Caldera
"This medium-bodied red opens with aromas of mature blackcurrant, toasted oak, exotic spice, coconut and menthol. The firm palate doles out dried black cherry, blackberry jam, anise and chopped herb alongside grippy, close-grained tannins. It ends on a note of roasted coffee bean.",Cavalè,Cantine Sant'Agata
"From a particular block with limestone soils, this is indeed a light, steely and minerally white wine, given nine months in French oak, only 17% of it new. It takes on that oak with subtle concentration, offering a touch of baked pineapple, peach and vanilla, ending in a bittersweet bite of Meyer lemon.",Coteau Blanc,Chardenet
"Pretty, pale and poised, this offers light pear flavors with a touch of cinnamon. Snappy acidity and a clean, fresh finish all contribute.",,Château Bianca
"Montée de Tonnerre, just to the south of the Grand Cru slope, gives rich wines like this with density and ripeness. From the warm vintage of 2013, this is a ripe, apple- and pear-flavored wine that has just the hint of a tighter, mineral texture. It can be drunk now.",Montée de Tonnerre Premier Cru,Domaine Gérard Duplessis
"An effusive wine, this shows potent, almost sweet aromas and opulent flavors with hints of mint and rosemary. It has a medium body, fine tannins that add nicely to the texture and a lingering finish.",Helluva Vineyard,Donkey & Goat
"A whiff of fresh brioche against a backdrop of sunny grapefruit and plum flavors makes this forward fruity off-dry Riesling especially inviting. While lively and crisp, its juicy, quaffable style makes it an easy pleaser. Drink now.",,Dr. Heidemanns-Bergweiler
"Jolts of honey, lemon and lime introduce this animated Spätlese. It's forward and approachable with sunny tangerine and peach flavors, but maintains a nervous tension of acidity. The finish is brisk and tight.",Bernkasteler alte Badstube am Doctorberg Spätlese,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"An unusual blend of Syrah, Tempranillo, Petite Sirah and Mourvèdre, this tasty wine keeps its focus, offering up a palate-pleasing mix of plum and blueberry. There's a dash of pepper and pleasantly earthy tannins. All in all, this is a fine, out-of-the-ordinary pizza and burger wine.",Passive Aggressive,Folin Cellars
"This yellow-gold wine is packed with bright floral and citrus scents and flavors. It's a mouthful of lemon-drop goodness, with the rough edges smoothed by a percentage aged in neutral oak. The finish features light honey, with a slight burn.",Estate,Folin Cellars
"Fresh and fruity, this wine comes from Grand Cru vineyards in Oger in the Côte des Blancs. With its soft texture and ripe character, it's an attractive wine with bright citrus and pear flavors. The mineral streak, though, seems to be missing.",Blanc de Blancs Grand Cru Extra Brut,Jean Milan
"This is a steely wine, tight with acidity and lemon fruits. It has a mineral, tangy texture that is still calming down, which suggests a young wine that needs time. Certainly the fruit is all there, if with a nervy character. Drink the wine from 2018.",Les Plantenays,Louis Max
"Underbrush, spiced plum, vanilla and French oak are some of the aromas you'll find on this full-bodied red. The dense palate offers dried black cherry, toast, coconut, licorice and oak-driven spice alongside round tannins. A walnut note closes the finish. Drink soon.",Vigna Basarin,Luigi Voghera
"A showy nose of violet perfume and grape candy emerges from this bottling. Similar flavors persist on the palate, along with a touch of licorice. The wine is not overly complex, but it's quite easy to quaff.",,Lusso Della Terra
"From estate-grown Merlot (78%), Cabernet Franc and Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine is shy on the nose and full bodied in flavor, offering ripe, fleshy blackberry, tar and espresso.",Nuestra Sangre,Madrigal
"From a high-altitude vineyard in the heart of the Douro, this is a fruity while well textured wine. With a strong mineral character that comes from the lees stirring during fermentation, it has both bright citrus fruits with acidity and a more tropical character. Drink now.",Tom de Baton Branco,Magnum Vinhos
"This is infused with engaging scents of red berry, crushed violet, rose and a balsamic whiff of eucalyptus. The linear palate is tightly wound, offering dried wild cherry and a note of light baking spice accompanied by rather austere tannins. Drink after 2018.",Bric Volta,Malabaila
"Luminous and linear, this medium-bodied red offers scents of blue flower, rose, perfumed berry and a whiff of chopped mint. The vibrant palate delivers red cherry, strawberry and licorice alongside fine-grained tannins. Enjoy through 2017.",,Matteo Correggia
"Black cherry, blueberry jam, volcanic rocks, river stones and a mace spice show on the nose of this wine. The palate is thick with black fruit and dark chocolate, the tannins showing lots of structure and flavors of purple flowers giving depth. It needs more time in the bottle to reach full potential.",Nebula,Midnight
"Delicate aromas of red rose and wild berry lead the nose while the taut palate offers raw sour cherry, anise, cinnamon and mocha. Bracing tannins lead to a firm, drying finish.",,Morra Diego
"Soft and heavy, tasting like the syrup of a cherry-cola drink. Ready for drinking now.",,Sutcliffe
"With an eye for all the commercial sweet-spots, this is a Rosato sparkling wine made primarily with the fragrant Moscato grape (with 15% Malvasia). The wine is sweet in a saccharine, artificial way.",Pink Moscato,Tosti
"This sparkling Chardonnay from central Italy offers charred aromas of toasted almond followed by a thin, watery mouthfeel and a strong citrus aftertaste.",Principessa Brut,Luretta
"Marred by unripe asparagus notes, this Syrah is tough to like despite its smooth tannins and some good blackberry and chocolate fruit.",,Firestone
"This is dark but somewhat green on the nose, with currant, raspberry, beet and green herb aromas. The palate feels tight to the point of abrasive, with herbal plum flavors. A minty, forceful finish registers as hard and tannic.",,Real Compañia de Vinos
"This is a tough wine, marked by hard acids and tannins, and an absence of the fruit to stand up to it. It's bone dry and severe, with thin cherry-skin and cola flavors.",Hopkins Vineyard,River Road
"An everday wine, this is silky and crisp, with ripe raspberry and cherry flavors.",,Opolo
"The white wines from Garza do not equal their reds. This Chardonnay is muddled on the nose, with corn and oxidized apple aromas. Earthy flavors of bland fruits are saved by a respectable mouthfeel.",,Viñas de Garza
"A Chardonnay with sweet, simple flavors of white sugar and pineapples. Tart acidity gives it the taste of a sweet-and-sour sauce for Chinese food.",Paragon,Edna Valley Vineyard
"This is a hot, earthy Malbec with cover-up oak on the nose. A high-acid palate is drying and hard, with narrow, salty berry flavors and a peppery tasting, scratchy finish.",Reserve,Las Moras
"This is bright in color and loud on the nose, where it's distinctly medicinal and minty, with a strong green component. The palate doesn't differ; it's gritty and heavy in feel, with forced, jammy flavors of mint, grass and bitter black fruits.",Urban Uco,O. Fournier
"A boxed wine, this blend of Pinot Noir and Merlot is exceedingly simple and one-dimensional but could be served at an outdoor baseball game. The mouthfeel is watery and thin.",Pinot Noir-Merlot,Duca del Frassino
"Scratchy, dusty red-berry aromas are decidedly sweet yet hollow. This semisweet Garnacha tastes of gummy red fruits. A flat, cloying finish with candied flavors confirms its sweet status.",Sweet Torito,Cosecheros y Criadores
"Soft, and rich with glycerine and alcohol, this Zin is almost a Port wine on the palate. Drunk on its own, it's simple and awkward, but paté is kind to it.",Mountain,Opolo
"Overripe and syrupy, Gen7's 2008 Road to Zanzibar__art Zinfandel, part Cabernet Franc and part Carignane__s big and soft, with the fruit in decline.",Road to Zanzibar,GEN 7
"Overripe, with raisiny flavors, and hot in alcohol. Tart acidity gives it cut.",Summit Creek,Opolo
"Tastes tired and flabby, with sweet oak and alcohol flavors and not much else going on.",Apprentice,Trinitas
"Cherry Chap Stick and strawberry jam notes dominate the nose on this rosé of Merlot and Chardonnay. The palate is soft and sweet tasting, and the finish is lightly textured.",Cobbler Mountain Red,Miracle Valley
This warm climate Primitivo opens with subtle tones of dried herb and light spice that give it a very Mediterranean feel. But there's also a touch of warm rubber that distracts from the overall picture. The high alcohol adds extra heat on the close.,,Terra Jovia
"This rusty, light-bodied Cab may be from the current vintage but it looks, smells and tastes like something left over from the past. The bouquet is raw, leathery and leafy, with few pleasantries. A dilute palate with dry, leathery cherry flavors is fresh and light, but strained.",,San Huberto
"Way too high in alcohol, giving it the ripe, hot, raisiny taste of a simple Port.",Reserve,Opolo
"A scent of sulfur marks this New Jersey wine from the get-go, but it subsides to reveal intimations of honeysuckle, lime and white apricot. On the palate, the acidity is severe and distracting, with a razor-sharp quality that seems to slice away the fruit flavors.",Cuvée Blanc Chardonnay-Pinot Gris-Sémillon-Sauvignon Blanc,Heritage
"Made from partially fermented grape must, this sweet (slightly effervescent) ruby red wine would pair with spongecake or strawberry shortcake. The mouthfeel is watery and thin.",Rosso e Dolce,Stella Mia
"This is herbal, burnt and stalky smelling, then raw and herbal tasting, with weedy notes and a scratchy finish.",Estate Bottled,Quara
"This is the third release of Figgins, a single wine produced by Leonetti's Chris Figgins from his Figgins Estate vineyard. Intensely aromatic, it explodes from the glass with baking spices and deep cassis fruit. Over the course of three days it opened into a sleek, stylish, complex mix of purple- and black-berries, dried herbs, bark, dusty cocoa and a streak of caramel. Long and lush, it's a wine to cellar for a decade or more.",Estate,Figgins
"A new bottling from the winery. The vineyard is in the Petaluma Gap, a cool area south of the Russian River Valley, toward San Francisco. The vintage was cool, too, so the wine is brisk in acidity and low in alcohol, but it still tastes amazingly ripe and complex. The wine dazzles with waves of black raspberry jam, sweet olive tapenade, sautéed brown mushroom, root beer, moo-shu plum sauce and mocha. If those flavors sound like they don't go together, just try the wine. It's seamless and compelling. Drink now_2020.",Terra de Promissio Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This wine could easily be mistaken for French Chablis. It's notable for the tight, nervous feeling that acidity and minerals combine to stimulate, and the finish is very dry. There is, fortunately, a great heart of sweet tropical fruit, like the purest golden mango purée, ripe and succulent and honeyed. Terrific now, but such is the balance that this could be one of those Chardonnays that changes in interesting ways over the next 5_6 years.",Quail Hill Vineyard,Lynmar
"While the winery's regular 2010 Diamond Mountain Cab is a barrel selection, this Estate Vineyard selection consists of __nly the darkest, most extracted lots,_ from the winery's various vineyards, according to the winemaker. That's exactly what you get, an inky wine, it's huge on the palate with blackberries, currants and dark chocolate, augmented by plenty of new French oak. It is absolutely delicious now, but the tannin structure guarantees to develop for 10_20 years.",Estate Vineyard,Von Strasser
"Lucky Failla gets to source grapes from this vineyard that most winemakers would trade their left arm for. It's lush, ripe and amazingly generous in raspberries and cherries, yet retains an elegant balance, as well as fine, mouthwatering acidity. Part of the attraction is low alcohol, which lets the stones and earthy complexities of the wine shine through. This is really a brilliant wine__ight, delicate and powerful. If you want to age it for eight years or so, you won't be sorry.",Keefer Ranch,Failla
"This is an enormous Cabernet, as packed with intensity and power as anything in Napa Valley. The vineyard is Von Strasser's highest on the mountain, which maximally exposes it to the sun, and you can taste the solar ripeness in the intense essence of black currants and dark chocolate. The tannins exhibit classic Diamond Mountain potency. This is a dense Cabernet that needs serious time in the cellar. Hold until 2019, and it will continue to develop for many years afterward.",Sori Bricco Vineyard,Von Strasser
"This Nero d'Avola has aromas of earth, black currants, game and a note of grilled bell peppers. The palate offers fleeting black cherry and black berry, accented by black pepper and a green note of dried sage. It finishes on a bitter note.",Nero Capitano,Fi_Nobile
"This wine begins with a clean and cool nose featuring green banana and other subdued tropical notes as well as salty seaspray. Once sipped, the tropical side emerges more, with papaya and guava, as well as overripe peach. Altogether, the alcohol feels a bit high.",,Firestone
"Wisps of smoke and earth lend a dark, mysterious tone to flavors of fresh apple, melon and pineapple on this delicate off-dry Riesling. Lemon-lime acidity pierces the palate, driving a long, honey-kissed finish.",Semi-Dry,Fox Run
"Intense notes of crushed stones and wet rocks lend a minerally tone to fresh apples and pears on this crisp, puckery medium-dry Riesling. Refreshing and elegant, it's a versatile wine for everyday entertaining.",,Hazlitt 1852 Vineyards
"Crisp apple and pear flavors are touched with white floral notes on this nervy, light-footed Chardonnay. A juicy, ripe apple flavor makes it a widely appealing, easy quaffer.",Unoaked,Heron Hill
"This jammy wine doles out overripe plum and mature dark-berry fruit, layered with a melted chocolate sensation. Warm and evolved, it has an almost sugary-sweet palate that's shy on freshness.",Bosco Faiano,I Capitani
"Stony mineral notes lend a stately feel to this off-dry Riesling bursting with ripe peach, tangerine and quince flavors. It's brisk and bright on the palate with a lingering finish of lime and lemon zest.",Semi-Dry,Lucas Vineyards
"Extended aging in Hungarian oak lends spice and vanilla tones to this crisp, delicate Blaufränkisch (also known as Lemberber). Sour cherry and red currant flavors on the palate are bright but a bit demure, and laced with a sheen of minerals on the finish.",Reserve,Heron Hill
"There's a lavish spray of cherry blossom perfume amidst notes of sour cherries and plums on this tart, elegantly structured Cabernet Sauvignon. It's concentrated with crisp red-berry flavor but balanced with a racy, invigorating acidity that stretches out the finish. Drink soon to maximize its fresh, perfumed character.",King's Cab,King's Garden Vineyards
"The wine has good acidity, crisp green and white fruits, and a bright citrus element. Fresh and fruity, it's ready to drink, with a light mineral texture already well integrated.",Climat Les Quarts,La Soufrandière
"This tight wine is full of acidity and green fruits. It is very textured, densely packed with minerality and structure. These elements suggest a wine that needs to age, so don't drink before 2016.",,Louis Latour
"Attractive red fruits and freshness combine to produce a lively, elegant wine with a light structure and complete fruitiness. Drink from 2017.",,Maison Champy
"This hearty young red offers aromas of stewed black fruit, oak and espresso. The brooding palate delivers sugary black plum, ripe blackberry, tobacco, coffee bean and chocolate alongside massive tannins. Drink after 2019.",Etichetta Bronzo,Masseria Felicia
"The smell of tart green apple frying in butter introduces this bottling from Dan Lee's historic winery. On the palate, lemon-lime spritzer and pear flow into a saline minerality in the midpalate, with acidic tartness emerging on the finish. This is a very tight and focused Chardonnay.",Highland,Morgan
"The blend is 60% Grenache from the Stone Tree vineyard, the rest Syrah from Stillwater Creek and LVdM vineyards. It's forward, fragrant and fruity, with notes of tanned leather. Bright berry fruit shines through into a finish with moderate tannins.",Una Notte,:Nota Bene
"Complex and structured, it has hints of the generous nature of Savigny, but these are embedded in the firm tannins that bring a smoky character to the wine. Wood flavors show through with a bitter edge that needs to soften as it ages. Drink from 2017.",,R. Dubois et Fils
"Aromas of ripe, rich cherry preserves perfume this plush, fruit-forward Cabernet Franc. Bold in body and texture, it's richly concentrated with red berry and cherry flavor. Finishes brightly with a streak of sour cherry acidity.",Savina and Catherine Vineyards,Rooster Hill
"This easy-drinking wine boasts sensations of tart green apple, ripe Bartlett pear and juicy pineapple. The succulent palate is supported by crisp acidity that gives it a clean, refreshing finish.",,Sallier de la Tour
"Hints of potpourri and spice waft over aromas of ripe blackberries and bramble wood on this punchy, concentrated Cabernet Franc. Aged four years in French oak, it has a nuanced complexity that shows itself in shades of earth, toast and smoke that accent its tart red-fruit flavors. Finishes long with a hint of herbaceous green.",,Shaw
"Pear, peach and limestone on the nose are followed by elegant flavors of lemon blossom, pear and wet stone. Balanced and fresh, it will pair well with delicate salads, poultry and fruit.",Georges Skouras,Skouras
"Here's a bright and fresh expression of Nero d'Avola that offers succulent black raspberry, sour cherry and ripe blackberry sensations, all accented by hints of cinnamon and spice. This easygoing style is made for sheer drinking pleasure, so enjoy now.",Alhambra,Spadafora
"Bright, tart and scented with citrus candle and peach skin, this is quite dry and feels a bit compressed. But the flavors linger and the extended finish is generous with lime-infused acidity.",Estate Grown,StoneCap
"Aged in barriques, this Sicilian Chardonnay is dominated by wood. It opens with aromas of oak extract, toast, vanilla and butterscotch that all carry over to the warm palate alongside warm notes of lemon drop, yellow apple skin, walnut.",Grand Cru,Tenuta Rapital_
"This blend of Aglianico and Montelpulciano opens with slightly funky aromas that include nail polish remover, stewed prune and oak. The palate offers toasted oak, vanilla, sweetened coffee and sugar plum alongside astringent wood tannins.",Pignanera,Tommasone
"This robust blend of 85% Aglianico and 15% Pallagrello Nero has aromas of toasted oak, stewed prune and baked plum. The palate offers bracing tannins and a blackberry core alongside notes of black pepper, vanilla and graphite.",Concarosso,Vestini Campagnano
"A blend of Primitivo, Piedirosso and other native grapes and made with no added sulfites, this dense wine offers mint, eucalyptus, oak, fig and cinnamon spice sensations. It could use more fruity richness, and astringent tannins mark the close.",Cecubo,Villa Matilde
"Sourced entirely from the Les Vignes de Marcoux Vineyard, this is a solid, rather safe style of Washington Syrah. Light, tart, clean and simple berry fruit flavors show a hint of barrel spice from aging in mostly new French puncheons.",Limited Edition,William Church
"Ripe, oaky aromas settle on prune, raisin and baked plum. As the nose indicates, this is a ripe, plump wine, although a shock of acidity keeps it balanced. Flavors of creamy oak and vanilla transition to semitart plum and raspberry, while the finish reverts to heavy and baked, both in flavor and feel.",Cardela Crianza,Bohórquez
"Sage and pomegranate form the fragrant nose on this wine from the Santa Maria Valley's longtime producer Byron, now owned by the Jackson Family Wines. It is still made by Jonathan Nagy, who's been there since 2001. On the palate, sour cherry and cinnamon have a tannic backbone that will allow the wine to stand up to roasted meats as well as lighter fare.",,Byron
"Steely with lemon fruit, this wine takes some coaxing to reveal itself but is satisfyingly mouth-coating and viscous once it does, layered in citrus and a finish of honey. Balanced in acidity it'll pair well and widely with food.",,Cambridge California
"This is Swanson's top Cabernet, which includes a splash of Merlot. As always, it's rich, tannic and dry, and it possesses a deep core of blackberry and black currant flavors. It seems more tannic and sharp than in previous vintages, which suggests its ageability. Try holding it until 2015.",Alexis,Swanson
"This is pure Mourvèdre from Heart of the Hill and Ciel du Cheval vineyards. The Red Mountain terroir is on display in the form of a spicy cherry-pie flavor that is set off by minerality and dense, earthy tannins. A kiss of chocolate seals the deal.",,Syncline
"This silky blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot shows balanced aromas of black fruit and plum, plus spicy layers of toasted nut and black pepper. Firm tannins give the finish momentum.",Villa Donoratico,Tenuta Argentiera
"Rich and ripe, this has liberally oaked flavors of blackberry jam, black currant, dark chocolate and anise. It shows Napa Valley pedigree, but it's tannic now, with mouth-numbing astringency. Try holding this until 2016, then give it a decanting.",,Napa Angel by Montes
"Made from Kiona Vineyards fruit, this Red Mountain Cabernet Sauvignon has the dark fruit and the dense tannins one might expect. But that meaty power is leavened by natural acidity. A highlight of orange peel accents the deep flavors of cassis and smoke. It turns a little chalky at the tail end.",,Native Sun
"This limited-production wine is complex and savory, and it features notes of beets, sous bois and cherries, layered with touches of creamy cocoa and coffee. It's on the full-bodied side of things, but it remains supple and shows great focus on the lengthy finish. Drink now and over the next few years.",Four Barriques,Nautilus
"A wine that is currently closed, this shows hints of bright green- and white-fruit flavors. The toast influence and acidity cover this complex, potentially impressive selection. With its crisp finish and minerally texture, this has excellent aging potential.",Chatenière Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"This is an elegant, rich and round Volnay, with a red plum flavor and juicy acidity. With its fruitiness, this is already drinkable, although the tannic core does promise medium-term aging.",,Olivier Leflaive
"Villa Maria's upper-level Pinot Noirs have always been big and bold, but with this release the wines seem to have taken a turn toward more finesse and elegance. The 2010 Cellar Selection features a plushly textured palate, refined aromas and flavors of cherries, earth and cedar, and a long, softly dusty finish. Drink now_2018.",Cellar Selection,Villa Maria
"This bright expression of Sangiovese is smooth and polished, and it offers notes of cassis, blueberry, almond paste and pressed violet. Pair it with fettuccine and porcini.",Castello di Monna Lisa Riserva,Villa Vignamaggio
"This Chardonnay has plenty of ripe pineapple, pear and tropical fruit flavors. Having aged in 100% new French oak barrels, it offers rich notes of vanilla and buttered toast. Like all of Smith-Madrone's wines, this has great acidity and minerality, and even some tannins. Give this some time, and see how it is after 2017.",Estate Bottled,Smith-Madrone
"Round and supple without being excessively weighty, Spy Valley's 2010 Pinot Noir delicately balances smoky, bacony notes against those of dust-coated ripe cherries. It's a winning combination that finishes long and elegantly. Drink now_2020.",,Spy Valley
"Tohu is a wine company owned by New Zealand's indigenous peoples, the Maori. The wines have been mixed over the years, but this is an excellent bottling. It boasts a full, ample mouthfeel and plenty of supple tannins. Black cherry fruit marries well with complex savory notes, while hints of pomegranate brighten the aromas. Drink now.",Single Vineyard,Tohu
"Late harvest fruit and 12 months of oak aging give this wine a deep, full and sophisticated personality. It exudes notes of apricot, lemon curd, vanilla and white almond paste.",Vento Forte,Terre di Talamo
"Savigny-lès-Beaune often shows the softer side of Pinot Noir. This wine has juicy red-cherry and raspberry flavors that balance the gentle, dry tannins. The low-yielding old vines from which the fruit was sourced give this selection extra concentration. This will benefit from medium-term aging.",Vieilles Vignes,Roche de Bellene
"Made from DuBrul Vineyard fruit, this has lush strawberry and raspberry flavors that dig deep into the core, supported by a base of minerality. The tightly-focused finish includes echoes of toasty barrel-derived flavors.",DuBrul Vineyard,Owen Roe
"Hats off to the Mazzei brothers for crafting this rich, pleasurable wine that mirrors the sunny warmth and softness of the region. The unusual blend is Sangiovese and Alicante, and it's redolent of lively red cherries, tobacco and chocolate fudge.",Belguardo Serrata,Mazzei
"Aromatic, with notes of black tea leaves, sandalwood and incense, this smoky Georgian amber wine boasts delicate orange rind and blossom flavors, swathed in bristling, chestnut-skin-like tannins. There's a wonderful textural richness attributable to the wine's prolonged maceration in traditional Georgian qvevri.",Dry Unfiltered Amber Wine,Pheasant's Tears
"Give this Pinot Noir some time to breathe and mellow in a decanter. Right out of the bottle, it's tough, tannic and jammy in raspberry and cherry flavors. But it doesn't take long for it to pick up some complexities. This wine's rich, sweet oakiness will pair well with steaks, lamb chops and mushroom risottos.",Kashaya,Relic
"The cherry fruit that defines this wine is almost too bright, too pure__t verges on being confected in character. Yet it's reined in by a leash of vanilla oak and a reasonably firm structure of acids and tannins. The wine is merely too young at the moment, so give it a few years to mellow and gain complexity.",Pioneer Block 16 Awatere,Saint Clair
"Le Corti is a bright, slender expression of Chianti Classico compared to Principe Corsini's more austere Cortevecchia Riserva. This selection shows mild touches of tobacco and chocolate set over rich notes of red fruit and cherry. To maintain its freshness of fruit, this is partially aged in oak barrels, with the rest kept in cement vats.",Le Corti,Principe Corsini Fattoria Le Corti
"This Cabernet has rich blackberry-jam and black licorice flavors, and it also has a funky bacon note. The oak provides a pleasant backdrop of sweet toast. This shows how well Cabernet can perform on the far Sonoma Coast, which is now  more oriented to Pinot Noir.",Mohrhardt Ridge,Wellington
"Full bodied and softly tannic, this wine's fruit is front and center, wrapped in a subtle jacket of sweet oak. It dazzles with blackberries, cherries, raspberries, currants and chocolate flavors. Drink now for its sheer lusciousness.",,White Oak
"Big and black-colored, this is a blockbuster in both looks and mouthfeel. It's dense, concentrated and packed with juicy fruit that's touched by a note of pepper due to the alcohol. It needs a few years to age, although it will always be an in-your-face wine.",Andrez Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"Pure and fruity, this wine has structure as well as a velvety texture. Opulent flavors of red berries and a touch of earthiness are laced with soft tannins and acidity.",,Domaine Pavelot
"This 100% Syrah shows intense blackberry, crème de cassis and plum sauce flavors, plus hints of charred bone and black pepper. It's dry, and the tannins are firm but supple. The alcohol is high, but it's balanced with the wine's fruit.",Cuvee Christine,Donelan
"Dumas Station draws its fruit from the excellent Minnick Hills Vineyard. This 100% Syrah takes no prisoners: Its superconcentrated flavors of blackberry syrup, maple syrup, espresso, dark chocolate and vanilla rock-and-roll across the palate, propelled by the high alcohol.",Estate,Dumas Station
"Dark ruby color in color, this Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot blend opens with bright tones of forest fruit, lead pencil, cola and crushed mineral. It is bright and firm, with a polished, dusty mouthfeel.",Adèo,Campo alla Sughera
"Elyse has emerged as one of the most dependable producers of Zinfandel in California. This wine shows some overripeness in the raisin flavor, but there are plenty of blueberry jam, chocolate, baking spice and sandalwood notes. The tannins are firm yet supple.",Korte Ranch,Elyse
"L'Aspetto is an oak-aged blend of Sangiovese and Canaiolo that exhibits modern touches of Indian spice and dark chocolate behind fruity tones of cherry and raspberry. Clean and bright, this wine has a long mouthfeel and impressive persistency.",L'Aspetto,Fattoria Fibbiano
"Accents of flint and charred apple skin mingle with the orange rind and pear flesh notes on the nose and mouth. Round and flabby on the palate, with a short but clean finish.",,Robertson Winery
"We love fresh, zesty Italian whites because they pair so well with the healthy, international cuisine offered on our menus. This expression is especially delicious with tonic aromas of chopped sage and stone fruit that build in momentum.",,Rocca delle Macìe
"This easy, screwcap Chardonnay from northern Italy opens with fresh lemon, honey and cut grass aromas. It's a crisp, sharp wine that would cut through cheese or creamy cracker dip.",Berrò,Pico Maccario
"Shows plenty of oak influence, wrapping around tropical fruit notes. It's richly textured if somewhat low in acid, giving it a weighty feel on the palate. Drink now.",White Elephant,Vinum
"A sweet, soft wine, very ripe, almost porty. The blackberry and chocolate flavors have an edge of raisins, which makes it slightly bitter.",,Chain Gang
"Tropical fruit aromas quickly fade to bubble bath and soap. Has good acidity, with sweet, almost artificial tasting orange flavors ending with some heat and oily aggression, a frequent pitfall of the variety.",,Gauchezco
"Sweet buttered toast, vanilla, pineapple jam and cinnamon spice flavors mark this simple little Chardonnay. It's made in the popular style that's delicious at first, and then palls.",Nicky Hahn,Hahn
"Hard and like a match on the nose, with sulfur and peach pit aromas. Has a good mouthfeel to support pithy peach and green melon flavors. Finishes creamy, but with a mild bitterness.",,François Lurton
"This is a simple, one-dimensional Pinot Grigio that drinks easily and would pair with salads or grilled tuna. The wine is redolent of citrus, green apple and a touch of white almond.",,Caldora Vini
"Sweet orange soda, vanilla and buttered popcorn flavors mark this one-dimensional Chardonnay. It's fortunately brightened with crisp acidity.",,Lucky Star
"You can't beat this price for a Pinot Grigio with natural freshness and pristine aromas of stone fruit and citrus. The nice thing is that it tastes Italian made, and not like many of the commercial, generic Grigios on the market today.",,Kirkland Signature
"There's a generous, sunny quality to this Italian Pinot Grigio that comes across with ripe aromas of apricot, melon and Golden Delicious apple. There's a fullness to the mouthfeel as well with soft, slightly sweet fruit flavors at the end.",,La di Motte
"Crisp up front, but not overly aromatic or fruity. Feels kind of thick and chewy, with gummy, sweet berry flavors that suggest cherry and plum. Feels a little cloying and cooked on the finish, especially for a young 2011.",Rosé of Malbec,Maipe
"This stainless-steel Chardonnay from above Malibu starts out light, tasting of grapefruit and orange, and is fairly crisp with a nice dollop of anise, but finishes too tart, almost sour as if it's been oddly acidified.",,Malibu Rocky Oaks
"Fruity and rustic, this blend of Zin and other grape varieties has forward berry, cherry, currant, mint and spice flavors. Fully dry, it has an everyday quality that suggests sandwiches, chicken and simple Italian fare.",Mo Zin,Spann Vineyards
Albana di Romagna is a little-known white wine from central Italy that offers much of the same fresh appeal of more popular and commercial Italian whites like Pinot Grigio. This expression is bright and crisp with pear and stone fruit.,Vinchi,Tenuta Valli
"This is not a particularly successful vintage for this estate vineyard bottling. Rough and tannic, it seems more like a Lemberger than a Pinot Noir, and the bitter, herbal finish may or may not smooth out with further bottle age.",Pataccoli Family Vineyard,Redhawk
"Lots to like in this Sauvignon Blanc, from the brisk acidity and clean, minerally finish to the citrus and tropical fruit flavors. The problem is that it's too sweet. Tastes like a sugared fruit juice drink from the supermarket.",,Rutherford Hill
"Shows the sweet fruitiness and bite of citrusy acidity of raspberry and cherry jam, a simple Cabernet to drink now.",,Wheelhouse
"Light and simple, with piercing, grassy scents that suggest minimal ripeness. Flavors of straw and unripe pear quickly fade.",,Erath
"A nice everyday white wine, crisp and zingy in acidity, with slightly sweet flavors of apricot jam, pineapples, oranges and peppery spices. Nice at a picnic with cold cuts.",Valley Oaks,Fetzer
"Crisp and clean with medium aromatic intensity and an easy finish, this Pinot Grigio would wash down with chicken or tuna salad. Citrus and stone fruit appear as zesty endnotes.",Villa del Borgo,Forchir
"Made from Cabernet Sauvignon, this is a caramel-dominated rosé, the red berry fruit some way behind. It is fresh, with some attractive acidity. Screwcap.",,Haut Marin
"There's an overripe, saturated element to this Trebbiano that is reflected in its deep golden color and its aromas of melon, apricot and honey. The mouthfeel is soft and sticky.",Ancilla,Ciavolich Giuseppe
This informal white wine (a pure expression of floral Viognier from sunny Tuscany) shows aromas of yellow flower and passion fruit followed by heat and power.,Camposegreto,Castello di Poppiano
"Kind of mulchy and leafy, with a brown color that doesn't suggest freshness or vitality. Tastes of roasted berry and cocoa, with a spicy, dry finish. Decent but comes across heavy and more oaky than fruity.",Reserva,Bodega del Fin del Mundo
"If your love of animals knows no bounds, then this is the wine for you__erene is named after a dog. Caravintas supports animal shelter, service and rescue groups so the cause is good. The wine? It has a cordial cherry liqueur or Schnapps flavor; its acidity is disheveled.",Serene Rose of Tempranillo,Carivintas
A bit muted and easy-drinking with soft notes of tart green apple and lemon peel throughout. It's brisk and prickly on the tongue with a fleeting finish; drink up.,The Ruins,Bon Cap
"This wine starts with aromas of black pepper, anise and grape candy followed by a combination of wild cherry, cocoa and pepper on the palate. A soft character with a slight kick. Pair with poultry, cheese, pork.",,Kouros
"Earthy in aromas, with notes of leafy tomato and red plum. Feels narrow and compact, with herbal, slightly tart flavors of red berry mixed with peppery barrel spice and green herbal tinges. Light, then toasty and spicy on the finish.",,Lagarde
"This is a smooth, rounded rosé made mainly from Négrette. Along with its youthful crispness, it also has a more creamy side and a crushed strawberry flavor, all lightened by balancing acidity.",,Château Plaisance
"Soft and gentle, this has pear and ripe apple flavors, with a light touch of creamy acidity. It's a food-friendly wine__ound and ready to drink.",Galeria,Caves Aliança
"New oak stands out in this slightly sweet Chardonnay, giving a butterscotch taste to the pineapple and fig fruit. It has pleasant acidity.",Estate Bottled,Chamisal Vineyards
"This smells roasted, leathery and earthy, with a mouthfeel that's solid if a bit scratchy. It delivers an intense wild-berry aroma and some of Cafayate's signature complex herbal character. Oaky vanilla and dill notes accent the finish.",Reserve,Altos de San Isidro
"This blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot has some oak flavors on top of the jammy blackberries and cherries. It's simple and direct; ideal for drinking now.",,Decoy
"Despite its light touch, this is fruity and full, with its blackberry fruit dominating the warm spice note and acidity. Soft tannins keep the wine together. Drink now. Screwcap.",Coreto,DFJ Vinhos
"Cabernet specialist Baldacci tries their hand at Pinot Noir, and what do you know? It's a Cabernet-esque Pinot, which means its heavy and full bodied. There's plenty of savory blackberry essence, but the challenge is to bring grace and lightness to this variety.",Elizabeth,Baldacci
"Very aromatic, this has flavors of lychee and lemon. It has a spicy feel to it, giving it a soft, rounded texture. Ready to drink.",,Barros
"There is a light prickle to this freshly crisp and dry rosé. It bursts with raspberry and red currant flavors, tangy acidity and a lively finish.",Muralhas de Monção,Adega de Monção
"This opens with lightly perfumed red-fruit aromas of raspberry and plum, with a bright palate that shows mostly red plum, raspberry and cherry flavors. This is a basic, clean wine comprised of 75% Garnacha and 25% Tempranillo.",Castillo de Fuendejalon Crianza,Bodegas Aragonesas
"Call this Toro Nuevo in the same vein as Beaujolais Nouveau__he grape juice becomes finished wine in just six weeks. Look for a jammy nose with licorice and blackberry aromas and a simple palate that pushes plum and berry flavors, with little structure or stuffing.",Vino Pr1mero,Bodegas Fariña
"Seemingly sweet and oaky, this has buttered popcorn, buttered toast and caramel cream flavors. The fruit suggests pineapples and pears.",Kinneybrook Vineyard,Kunde
"Fresh and fruity with creamy green and white fruits, this is a soft, ready to drink Chardonnay. Attractively fruity, the acidity finely cuts through the wine.",Bourricot,L. Tramier & Fils
"Aromas of hay and sweet grass are offset by notes of apple and melon. It feels healthy and easy, with white peach, nectarine and apple flavors. It's good and uncomplicated, with a touch of corn flavor on the finish.",,Maximo
"This Merlot has good plum and cherry flavors up front and is straightforward enough to pair with just about any food, but the finish falls a bit flat.",Small Lot Blend,Parducci
"This is a pleasantly quaffable Viognier, with restrained apricot and melon aromas and flavors. It's medium bodied, without much texture, but a clean, refreshing finish.",Secret de Famille,Paul Jaboulet Aîné
"Overripe, juicy and soft, this has baked fruit flavors, like blackberries and cherries in a pie. Oak adds to the sweetness with sugary caramel. It's rich, but it lacks complexity and ageworthiness.",Rancho Salina,Muscardini
"Robust and lusty, spicy and fruity, this has sweet berry and cola flavors. Drink it with savory fare, like pizza and barbecue.",10 Year Old Vines,XYZin
"Ripe to the point of being overripe, this has a sweet raisin and prune note to the blackberry flavor. It's clear that the winemaker was trying to make a flashy, opulent Cab, but this one carries it over the top. Not likely to benefit from age, so drink up.",,Pine Ridge
"This is a cheerful white from Lazio with abundant aromas of white flower and honey. It's easy going, slender and slightly tart on the finish.",,Principe Pallavicini
"Dry and tart in sour cherry candy and cola flavors, this Pinot has hints of mint and tobacco that suggest the grapes weren't completely ripe. Drink now.",,Stomping Girl
"Distinguished by its bottle with a black label in the shape of a giant exclamation point, this fresh Verdicchio shows simple lines and lively flavors of citrus, peach, dried hay and stone fruit. It's a light-bodied wine with tart acidity.",Exclamation Point,Umani Ronchi
"This is a slightly herbal, well-structured Cabernet with upfront tannins and flavors of ripe cherry and vanilla. It finishes with a taste of marshmallow.",,Vigilance
"Although it's not especially rich, it does offer basic Pinot Noir characteristics, with a silky mouthfeel framing sour cherry-candy flavors that are brightened with acidity.",,Villa Mt. Eden
"This is sharper and more rustic than most other expensive Rutherford Cabernets, with a cut of citrusy acidity that dominates the cherry and herb flavors. While it's tough and hard to appreciate now, you never know if these aggressive young wines will develop with time. This one doesn't seem like it will benefit, so drink up.",,Riboli
"Here's a simple rosé, dryish and tart in acidity, with savory flavors of cherry skin and rose-hip tea, with a squirt of honey. Ham sandwiches and sausages come to mind as food companions.",Rosé of,Santa Barbara Winery
"Light and slightly spicy, this spent 15 months in one-third new French and American oak barrels, yet it comes across as a bit mild and one dimensional.",,RoxyAnn
"Very fruity and smooth, this has a ripe strawberry flavor and balancing acidity. It shows some richness while remaining crisp and fragrant.",Padeiro,Quinta de Gomariz
"This Lodi-grown blend of 65% Chardonnay, 25% Sauvignon Blanc and 10% Viognier smells of marshmallow, coconut and bubble gum.",The Other,Peirano
"This opens with ripe aromas of candied fruit and sweet prune. There's a touch of crisp cherry cola, with a general tartness on the finish.",Riserva,Angelini
"Beautifully fruity wine, bright, citrus and yellow fruit dominated. Packed with crisp acidity, light floral flavors and a steely texture. It's for drinking now. Screwcap.",Classic,Domaine du Tariquet
"Intensely peppery as well as fruity, this is a tight, crisp wine. It has creamy acidity as well as a more nervy, mineral character that shows a tangy texture at the end.",Vieilles Vignes,Boeckel
"With some richness as well as fresh fruit, this is an open, warm wine. Black cherries, soft tannins and the acidity typical of the vintage, this is a wine to drink now or keep for 1_2 years.",Château de Souzy,Signé Vigneron
"This simple but well made wine offers ripe red-cherry, black pepper and licorice sensations, backed up by fresh acidity. Enjoy this accessible selection with risottos or rich pasta dishes.",,Musella
"A gentle ramble through Alsace, this wine is rounded and soft, with a touch of spice. This is a true easy-drinking wine, its light pear and crisp apple flavors complementing each other. The wine is ripe, light and refreshing.",Tradition,Kuentz-Bas
"Light and fruity, this is a strawberry flavored wine that is soft, open, ready to drink. It has attractive acidity, gentle tannins and a rounded finish.",,Domaine Poulleau Père et Fils
"Here's a simple ripasso, with aromas of raspberry and black pepper. The palate is a bit lean but offers bitter cherry, licorice and white pepper notes. This will match well with gnocchi in cheese sauce or mushroom risotto.",,Ca' Rugate
"This selection opens with aromas of blackberry and black pepper, along with whiffs of oak and vanilla. It has a chewy palate, with well-integreated oak and a black-cherry core accented by a hint of chocolate. The finish is somewhat abrupt.",,Giuseppe Lonardi
"Feels soft and creamy in the mouth, with forward raspberry and cherry pie and toasty oak flavors, brightened by punchy acidity. Not an ager, but fine for drinking now.",,Bennett Valley Cellars
"Coming from a single block on the winery's estate vineyard, this Malbec also includes a small percentage of Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot. The sweet cherry flavors and plump tannins are accented by notes of cola and brown licorice with oxidative notes providing distraction.",Estate Grown Block 20 Destiny Ridge Vineyards,Alexandria Nicole
"Lean and tough, but not without a certain charm, this Cab's blackberry and currant flavors are wrapped in hard, edgy tannins. The sweet core of fruit will wake up when paired with rich beef dishes.",,Brander
"Rounded and rich, this Blanc de Blancs has both a smooth texture, delicious white fruits and an intense line of acidity. It's clean, fragrant, very fresh.",Perle d'Ivoire Blanc de Blancs Brut,Louis Bouillot
"Thin at first sip, this opens up in the glass with an interesting mix of scents__ody powder, tart cherry, dried herbs. It's a southern Rhône style blend, more than two thirds Mourvèdre. It carries some of that green character on through the finish.",Scarlet Fire Reserve,Kana
"Medium sweet (listed at 24g/L residual sugar), this includes 7% Gewürztraminer in the blend. Lime and lime skin are the first sniff responders, with more citrus and wet stone flavors following. Despite the sugar, it's a rather tart tasting wine, suitable for a wide variety of spicy Asian fare.",,Hogue
"A big and heavily oaked, warm-climate Syrah thick in bacon toast and baked bread that's juicy and uncomplicated.",6th Sense,Michael David
"The nose on this traditionally molded Rioja is murky and clipped, with leafy accents to mild dried-fruit scents. This feels lean despite showing a layer of creamy oak, while the flavors are light, classic in nature and focus on dried plum, raspberry and vanilla. Drink now.",Crianza,Marqués de Vitoria
"Good price for an everyday Cab this savory. It's juicy in blackberries, cherries and peppery spices, wrapped into firm tannins.",Split Oak Estates,Morro Bay
"Apple and pear aromas are fresh but basic. The palate on this Cava revolves around citric acid and light bubbles, while flavors of lemon-lime and white stone fruits finish tangy and fresh.",Gran Zinio Brut,Zinio
"Fruity wine, packed with red berries, lightweight tannins and a stalky black currant fruit character. It's not for aging, it is a wine that has friendly acidity and an open, generous nature. Drink now.",Les Loges de Carlat,Château de Chambert
"A fruity wine, made to be drunk young, ripe and forward. It has bold tannins as well as ripe berry fruits and soft acidity. Certainly drink now, but better age for 2_3 years.",Triguedina Petit Clos,Jean-Luc Baldès
"Soft, fruity wine, an unoaked Chardonnay, this is ripe with apricot and green plum flavors, and crisp with acidity. It's smooth, rounded and ready to drink.",,Rieutort
A hint of veggie limits the score. It shows up as a bell pepper and jalapeño note to the cherries and currants.. High alcohol gives it some burn. Drink up.,,Sanguis
"A grassy, green wine, although with some weight and richness filling out the fresh fruitiness. It's soft, showing lemon and red apple fruits but with a crisp final taste. Screwcap.",,Domaine du Tariquet
"With sweet and sour grapefruit, peach, white flower and orange flavors, this wine has lots of acidity that makes the mouth water. It finishes a little off-dry, making it perfect for salty tapas dishes.",,Bodega de Edgar
"Coming from the cool 2011 vintage, the aromas of herbs, apple and spice are light. It's medium bodied and creamy in feel with a lemony finish.",Zephyr Ridge Estate Bottled,Swiftwater Cellars
"This has mild, one-dimensional scents of apple and Meyer lemon. The medium-bodied palate has fresh acidity, and shows a touch more depth than the nose with the added note of glazed white apricot.",Estate Club Reserva,Veramar
"This is called a __hite from Malbec_ because it spends little time on its skins during maceration. The color is translucent pink, and the nose is pure wood smoke and minerals due to six months of barrel fermentation and aging. As a result of this unusual methodology, wood resin, sawdust, vanilla and creaminess cover the nose, mouth and finish, while fruit characteristics are hard to locate.",Blanc de,Vicentin
"A creamed apple wine, soft and open. There is just a touch of vanilla to go with the ripe white fruits and light acidity. Ready to drink.",Bourgogne,Vignerons de Buxy
"This has aromas of overripe black cherry and spice. The palate reveals mature black fruit, raisin and pepper notes. This is very warm and shows the heat of the vintage, so drink soon.",Campo San Vito,Villa Monteleone
"A tough, dry, tannic wine, with a gritty mouthfeel. The flavors are ripe in black currants, plums, black cherries, sweet oak and earthy, tobacco notes. Seems best consumed over the next three years.",,Stags' Leap Winery
"Marmalade, raisin and a hint of tropical fruit are balanced by the dry botrytis of this rich wine, which is based on the same grape varieties as Sauternes. It is elegant and ageworthy, but is also ready to drink now.",,Château K
"This elegant and detailed Pinot Gris offers fresh floral accents around spicy, toasty, well-mixed fruit. Pear and orange fruit flavors carry just a slight hint of honey, and the concentrated finish extends into a long, clean fade-out.",Estate,Carabella
"Great acidity and minerality in this elegant young wine. Doesn't show the rich concentration of De Loach's single-vineyard Chards, but then again, it costs far less. It's actually a good value for a dry, minerally and complex Russian River Chardonnay. Don't drink it too cold.",Cool Coastal Vineyards,De Loach
"Opi Riserva is a dense wine (in a heavy bottle) that would pair with spicy barbecue sauce and succulent grilled meats. The wine is redolent of mature fruit, blackberry jam, exotic spice, clove and cinnamon. It's a soft, sticky expression with long spice flavors on a slightly sweet finish.",Opi Riserva,Farnese
"Passo del Lupo Riserva delivers personality and surprises thanks to its extremely polished aromas of Indian spice, red berry, natural rubber and cola. The wood integration is lovely, and the wine is both spicy and fresh on the close.",Passo del Lupo Riserva,Fazi Battaglia
"Taurasi is one of the great red wines of Italy (sometimes dubbed __he Barolo of the South_), and this expression delivers amazing intensity both in terms of its bouquet and mouthfeel. Its aromas include ripe, chewy blackberry, pipe tobacco, toasted espresso and crushed granite. The mouthfeel is plush, rich and firmly textured, with polished tannins and a smoky aftertaste.",,Feudi di San Gregorio
"Thirty bucks may seem like a lot for an entry-level Riesling, but this is an exemplary example. Aromas of wet stones, moss and spring flowers are mouthwatering, and then are followed by a complex array of nonfruity flavors, like stones and greens carried along by a mouthfeel that's light as a feather. Tart pineapple emerges on the long finish. Drink anytime over the next 10 years.",Scharzhof,Egon Müller
"Forward in jammy raspberry and cherry fruit, this Pinot's ripeness is balanced with crisp acidity. It's a flashy wine, quite typical of the vineyard, for drinking now and over the next six years.",La Encantada Vineyard,Fontes & Phillips
"Dark in color and flavor, the Crannell brings ripe fruit flavors of black cherry and prune. Smooth and full-bodied, with an easy-drinking roundness to the mouthfeel, it finishes softly with all components well integrated.",Crannell Single Vineyard,Amity
"The fruit shines here__ears and apples aplenty__ith textural notes of citrus rind. Balanced, with medium length, it's a young, clean, lip-smacking style, with more density than most Oregon Pinot Gris.",,Adelsheim
"A firmly tannic wine, bursting with the herbs of Provence, layers of new wood and pure sweet plum and blackberry fruits. The balance of this maturing wine is just right, giving an intense flavor.",L. Robert Milan 57,Henri Milan
"Just released after nearly eight years, this wine still tastes lively and timely. It's marked by complex waves of blackberries, mocha, currants, cola and spices, although the fruit is beginning to move into drier, secondary characteristics. It's delicious, and fully ready to drink now. Give it a decanting, and watch as it changes in the glass.",,Indigené
"To call this anything other than modern in style would be incorrect. It's soft and silky and direct in blackberry and cherry jam, chocolate and caramel flavors, although the finish is technically dry. Delicious and fancy, and will appeal to fans of ripe, sweet fruit, but it doesn't have the structure for aging.",Beckstoffer Georges III,Keating
"One of the most pleasurable Syrahs now on the market. Really hits the spot, with soft, lush tannins framing ripe flavors of black cherries, milk chocolate, pepper, cloves and sandalwood. Drink now.",,Joseph Phelps
"V. Sattui has been making some pretty good Cabernets, and here's another one. It's classic Napa, with smooth, polished tannins, fine acidity and ripe, full-bodied flavors of blackberries, black currants and cedar. Might even develop additional bottle complexity over the next 6_8 years.",,V. Sattui
"There's no oak on this delightfully dry wine, although you'd never know it from the rich streak of vanilla and smoky butter that accompanies the orange, apricot, lime and honey flavors. It's a brilliant success, bright and zesty in acidity, and one of the most satisfying Pinot Gris on the market.",Paragon Vineyard,Tangent
"A voluptuous wine packed with almonds, a handful of herbs and citrus aromas and flavors, this big-boned, dry, barrel-fermented Roussanne finishes with a swirl of lemon. Available in 2013.",Monarch Mine Vineyard,Terre Rouge
"Fruit is the star of this crisp wine. It bursts with pineapples, tangerines, limes and honeysuckle flowers, with a savory touch of vanilla and buttered toast. Best of all is the brisk acidity that highlights the richness.",,Stickybeak
"Graphite, deep black fruit, earth and cola aromas make for a full-force, inviting entry. The palate feels lifted and healthy, with a thorough blend of tobacco, herb, barrel spice and ripe berry flavors. Toasty, spicy and long on the finish. High quality for $20 Cabernet.",Reserva de Familia,Santa Carolina
"This wine's calling card is its electric acidity, which provides a poignant counterbalance to the wine's plump feel on the palate. Ripe citrus notes of pineapple and orange offer plenty of flavor to go along with the superb length. It's ready to drink, yet should prove capable of aging at least 5_6 years.",Vom Schiefer Trocken,Ansgar Clüsserath
"A nice Cabernet, on par with the winery's equally fine 2008. Shows plenty of class, with rich blackberry, currant and cedar flavors. Earns points for sheer elegance. Ready to drink now.",,Louis M. Martini
"Here's a carefully aged expression of Montepulciano from Abruzzo that offers sultry aromas of spice, currant and dried raspberry, along with notes of leather, tobacco and smoke. It finishes with dry, polished sensations of wet river stone and root beer. Drink now.",Margae,Il Feuduccio Di S. Maria D'Orni
"A somewhat pale wine, at first reluctant to show much aroma, it ultimately reveals itself to be elegant and surprisingly deep. Varietally expressive, with light cranberry and strawberry fruit, dusty tannins, toast, caramel and a whiff of incense. Complex and lovely.",,Illahe
"Concentrated and earthy up front, with aromas of blackberry, boysenberry, graham cracker, leather and a whack of robust oak just for good measure. Feels big and chewy, with broad, oaky flavors of black fruit, herb, tea and exotic spice. Finishes heavy but gentle in feel. Drink now through 2014.",Reserva,Koyle
"This is a pretty expression of Primitivo, showing a nice balance of ripe fruit and blackberry set against savory tones of spice and tobacco. That balance continues onto the palate, where the wine is plush, rich and slightly sweet.",Jèma,L'Astore Masseria
"The Shea is a bit of an anomaly at 13.7% in a vintage where the other Ken Wright Pinots float around the 12_12.5% mark. Not surprisingly, the fruit is thicker and the midpalate more full and broad, with pleasing cherry-berry flavors framed in chocolaty oak. Though not as aromatically complex as its companions, it offers plenty of rich fruit flavor.",Shea Vineyard,Ken Wright
"A beautiful, bargain-priced blend of Tinta Roriz (aka Tempranillo), Touriga Nacional, Touriga Francesa and Alvarelhão. Violet and jasmine perfumed, this wine is so, so pretty with just a stunning nose. In taste, there's raspberry, strawberry and lilting layers of pepper and herbs. An intriguing wine well worth trying, made by Morgan Winery Winegrower Dan Lee.","Rio Tinto, Silvaspoons Vineyard",Lee Family Farm
"A lightly wooded wine, with a good depth of black fruit flavor that comes from the Malbec and the perfumed Cabernet Franc in the blend. With its ripe tannins and delicious mint and berry flavors, this can age for 2_3 years, but is also drinkable now.",Le Mignon,Domaine les Riquets
"Ripe and peachy in style, with accents of brine, honey and cinnamon. It's round and voluptuous in the mouth, then gains focus and crispness on the finish, finishing without an excess of sugar. Try it anytime over the next 6_8 years.",H,Dr. Hermann
"A complete wine that starts with lemony oak-based aromas that come with notes of herb, spice and dark-berry fruit. Feels layered, ripe and fresh, with full, sweet flavors of brown sugar, herb and baked berry and plum. Chocolaty and smooth on the finish. Drink now through 2014.",Limited Edition,Echeverria
"Trebbiano grapes are aged in oak barrels for up to 30 months to create this thick, creamy white that's accented by notes of stone fruit, pineapple, custard cream and a touch of vanilla. The smoothness and intensity are its most beautiful qualities.",Traibo,Cantina Novelli
"The region of Lazio is making promising inroads into quality wine production. The Cesanese d'Affile grape is a protagonist of this new promise, offering unique aromas of raspberry, dried herb, oregano and Christmas spice.",Tenuta della Ioria Superiore,Casale della Ioria
"Rounded and honeyed, this is a wine that shows a sweeter side of Pinot Blanc, buoyed by fresh, juicy white-peach flavor. Full, rich and dense, this is fruity, yet it has a complex structure.",,Domaine Zind-Humbrecht
"This is rich and concentrated, spice as well as pear and melon flavors. It is complex, with almond and nutmeg notes, balanced by the taut acidity that completes a full, ripe wine.",,Domaine Zind-Humbrecht
"This is a ripe, spicy and pepper-flavored wine. It has pear and green plum notes that give a crisp edge to the rich texture. There is a mineral touch that brings out the acidity to balance the opulence. Age for 2_3 years. Screwcap.",Terrassen  Smaragd,Domäne Wachau
"Here's a wine that is rich and full bodied, tending toward dryness while still retaining all the ripe, spicy Pinot Gris character. It has apple, lychee and mango flavors, nicely mingling together, leaving a fresh, crisp finish.",L'Hostellerie,Emile Beyer
"Despite its description as __xtra dry,_ this is in fact sweeter than a brut. This is fresh and fruity, with an attractive apple-purée flavor, balanced by crisp acidity and a light, bright finish.",Carte Blanche Extra Dry,Louis Roederer
"This pure estate-grown Cabernet shines. It's tight and somewhat earthy, with nuanced notes of bark and stem. The fruit is medium bodied, firm and clean, showing good balance.",,Goose Ridge
"Garrigue and savory dried-herb hints accent the ripe, rich black-cherry and plum notes on the nose and palate of this brawny, yet lusciously concentrated, Merlot. Big, chunky tannins are piercing on the palate, but these should smooth considerably over the course of an evening.",,Kabaj
"The sweet fruitiness and citrus-driven acidity of raspberry and cherry jam mark this savory, young wine. Its pedigree is impressive, ranging from the winery's historic Bosché Vineyard to Atlas Peak and Mount Veeder. It's insanely rich, if a little obvious in its appeal, so drink over the next few years.",,Freemark Abbey
"This is the winery's stainless-steel-fermented Sauvignon Blanc. Dry and racy in acidity, it shows lemon and lime flavors, with a rich hint of tart kiwi.",,Gainey
"This Zweigelt is soft and fruity, showing the delicious cherry flavor of the grape along with perfectly textured tannins. It is full, fruity and delicious now.",,Kracher
"With some earthy aromas, this is a rich wine. It has weight, layers of wood and attractive strawberry flavor. The fruitiness is contained within a firm tannin shell that suggests the wine could age.",Clos de la Faille,Domaine Albert Mann
"Zinfandel has been a Forgeron specialty for the past decade. Done in a ripe, though not too Porty style, it's more like a Dry Creek wine. Flavors of red and blue berries are annotated with a note of sweet grain, giving it a California twist, with Washington verve and acidity.",,Forgeron
"Blended with the classic Bordeaux varieties, this is dominated by Cabernet Sauvignon's blackberry and cassis liqueur flavors. Lots of sweet oak gives a buttery, toasty richness. Drink now.",Winemaker's Reserve Blend,Provenance Vineyards
"With its flavors of spice, dark fruit and a hint of herb, plus its touch of rusticity and tense acidity, this is classic Blaufränkisch. Its juicy berry flavors emerge through the tannic texture, revealing a final flavor that is elegant while also rich. Screwcap.",Edelgrund,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"Sourced from Les Collines Vineyard in Walla Walla and Wallula Benches Vineyard in the Horse Heaven Hills, this engaging Syrah features firm, ripe fruit, brown spice and a strong streak of cola. It's drinking quite well and is fully integrated, so enjoy it soon rather than cellaring it for later.",,North by Northwest
"Although this Zin has a touch of overripeness in the form of raisins covered in chocolate, followed by a lot of blackberry and foxy mulberry. The wine is dry, smooth and balanced, with plenty of complexity.",,Occidental Road Cellars
"Give this wine some time in a decanter, because right out of the bottle it smells a little dusty. After a while, that recedes into the background, and the flavors are very nice, suggesting ripe cherry and cola. Fine tannins and classic coastal acidity provide good balance.",Jenkins Ranch,Patz & Hall
"This is a blend of Malvasia, Ribolla and Welschriesling that balances flavors of fennel, smoked nut and black tea with delicate orange blossom and apple notes. Luscious, with a slightly waxy texture, it finishes on a sweet cream note.",Burja,Sutor
"This is the second label for Col Solare, the Ste. Michelle-Antinori collaboration on Red Mountain. Except for a splash of Syrah, it's a Bordeaux-style blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and three other Bordeaux grapes, mostly sourced from the recently planted estate vineyard on Red Mountain. Mixed black-fruit flavors come dusted with baking spice, plus notes of olive, cedar and coffee.",Red Wine,Shining Hill
A significant expansion in the case production of this wine suggests that fruit from newly planted vineyards is now in the mix. This is a pure expression of pretty boysenberry with a red licorice highlight. A firm foundation of juicy acidity keeps it lively and fresh.,Nina Lee,Spring Valley Vineyard
"While sultry and rich with ripe black-fruit flavors, this concentrated Pinot Noir is surprisingly multidimensional on the nose and palate. Green herb and brisk acidity add freshness. Hints of mushroom and wet soil, along with penetrating, chewy tannins, add depth and balance.",Proprietor's Special Reserve,Millbrook
"Buttercup and fresh pear aromas are friendly and inviting. It feels full and correct, with good acids and minerality. Flavors of pears, melons and lees are very nice, while the finish is simultaneously flowery, crisp and salinic.",Peitán,Nora
"Black and thick, this Petite Sirah delivers on all the variety's attributes in warm-climate California. It's blisteringly gregarious yet rounded, with smoky dark-fruit flavors that are initially hard to capture and tannins that verge on puckering. But time rewards__his wine hits its stride after being allowed to open and swirled around a few times. Enjoy it with a rich risotto or rack of ribs.",King Vineyard,Olabisi
"The green fruit and subtle, yeasty hay aromas are inviting. It feels nice and not abrasive, with notes of dried apple, citrus and rich, toasty yeast. It perks up on the finish, with dryness, zest and complexity. Very nice for $15.",Cuvée Henri Reserva Limited Production,Loxarel
"Initially fruity, this attractive, pink-colored rosé subsequently shows a definite texture. There is a bite of lemon juice and a sharp, edgy acidity that give the wine an mouthwatering freshness. Age this for a few months.",Rosé Brut,Charles Ellner
"This is a rich, intense wine, its spice and pepper characters mingling with ripe tangerine and peach notes. It is full, round and concentrated. The pure fruit character is delicious, though it could age a year.",Réserve,Domaine Fernand Engel
"Grown on the east side of the Salinas Valley, opposite the Santa Lucia Highlands, this Chardonnay shows excellent Monterey acidity and dryness. The pineapple, green apple and peach fruit flavors are nice and streamlined, making the wine elegant and food friendly.",West Pinnacles Vineyard,Darcie Kent Vineyards
"Pencil lead and rubbery, mature berry aromas open this wine. The palate is driven by energetic, pounding tannins and flavors of black cherry and tomato, which become more prominent as the tannins and acid rebound. This is an indication of how Argentine Cabernet Sauvignon ages.",FLM Gran Reserva,Finca Los Maza
"Earthy, grassy, cherry aromas are lightly medicinal in front of a slightly narrow, almost citric palate that comes with a note of vinegar. Black-plum flavors are simple on the midpalate, while modest notes of plum and berry show on the finish.",Angelitos Negros,La Casa Maguila
"This wine is herbaceous, crisp and lively. Tangy acidity envelops the citrus and green apple flavors, while the aftertaste is all about the tight, steely acidity.",,Château des Antonins
"Light and fruity, this is a crisp, fresh wine. Hints of red apples and yellow fruits are cut with lemon zest. The wine is perfumed and ready to drink.",,Château Grand Jean
"Pure fruitiness, this wine is full of black currant flavors and a stalky, dusty texture. Without wood aging, it has acidity, fruitiness and some dry tannins. Drink from the end of 2015.",,Château Haut Vieux Chêne
"It would seem like other varieties must be in the mix on this perfumed wine with its notes of apricot, grapefruit and flowers. The flavors are lighter in style with a fresh feel.",,Acre Twenty-one
"There's a bitterness within this wine, a taste of tobacco and tomato leaf that lords over subtle blackberry, black cherry, plum and a healthy dose of cinnamon and pepper. Medium bodied, it finishes flat.",Canihan Vineyard,Canihan
"Dry and crisp, this is a fruity, red currant-flavored wine. Bright acidity and a light texture give a final bite of structure to an otherwise soft and ready to drink release.",Duprais,Cave de Rauzan
"Made with 90% Sangiovese and 10% Cabernet Sauvignon, this opens with funky aromas of leafy underbrush, scorched earth, toasted oak and a whiff of barnyard. The rustic palate displays game, leather, dried black cherry and bitter prune alongside astringent tannins.",Briccole Riserva,Villa Corliano
"This has aromas of yellow peach and butter. Straightforward flavors faintly resemble peach, with more of the buttery richness that seems unusual for this variety. It's a good, basic, full-bodied white wine.",Limited Edition,Chacewater
"This easygoing wine smells mellow and plummy, tastes more like brown sugar than fruit and has a soft texture and medium body.",,Oak and Vine
"This opens with funky aromas of leather, game, overripe plum and a whiff of barnyard. The aromas all carry over to the rustic palate along with dried black cherry while raspy, fleeting tannins give it an abrupt, astringent finish.",,Poggio Bonelli
"A straightforward wine, this has aromas of light spices and stone fruit. The flavors are lighter in style with the concentration a bit wanting but it still provides easy drinking pleasure.",,Two Vines
The aromas of guava and other tropical fruits are faint while the flavors seem washed out. There's enjoyment to be had but it all needs to be dialed up.,,Voila!
"Despite its youth, this wine seems dried-out with aromas and flavors of medicine cabinet, leather and raisinated black and blue fruit. Drink now.",,Barnard Griffin
"Soapy, floral aromas are wan, with no distinct fruit notes. This feels heavy as it stumbles around aimlessly. Plum and peach flavors are adequate, while the finish is mildly bitter, with sugary cherry notes.",Castillo de Alicante Gran Selección Monastrell,Bocopa
"With a light tan color and yeasty, briny aromas of vanilla and nectarine, this blend of Macabeo (Viura) and the obscure Merseguera grape delivers a wet, simple palate with citric and malic acid. Pithy citrus flavors of grapefruit and tangerine finish long for a basic, unoaked wine.",Conde de Alicante,Bocopa
"A bold pink color suggests the richness of this vanilla-flavored wine that misses out on a truly refreshing character. It is full and soft, with a touch of bitter acidity at the end.",,Château des Antonins
"Light colored and light flavored, this has just hints of fruitiness along with the acidity. It is a crisp wine, very dry in character, bright and tangy at the end.",,Château Haut Bessac
"Still dominated by wood and toast aromas, this wine is certainly too young to drink. The wood needs to smooth out and allow room for the fruit. It will age, with its fresh fruits and acidity, so drink from 2017.",,Château Jean de Bel Air
"Lightly herbaceous, this is a fresh, obviously youthful wine. It is only lightly textured, the main character coming from yellow fruits and pear juice flavors. Drink now, although it will age and improve until 2016.",,Château Moulin de Vignolle
"Deep pink in color, this gently fruity wine has too much caramel flavor. It offers red currant fruit at the end and attractive acidity.",La Rosée de Ramage,Château Ramage la Batisse
"If pink could have a taste, this is the wine. From hand-picked 100% Cabernet Franc, it is all about bright fruit and red berries. Soft with touches of caramel, it delivers good acidity at the end.",,Château Roquefort
"Dusty, jumbled aromas of fleshy melon and stone fruits are not terribly defined. This has a soft mouthfeel and flavors of papaya, peach and bitter citrus pith. Drink immediately; contains 10% Viura.",Rueda,Emina
"This wine is soft, ripe and fruity. It is made to be drunk young with only hints of tannins and sweet black fruits. It's an easy, barbecue-style red wine that is rounded and ready.",,Ginestet
"Aromas of melon, grapefruit and herbs lead to sweet tropical fruit flavors. The concentration isn't all there and the acid seems a bit wanting.",,Goose Ridge
"Aromas of tomato sauce and red-wine vinegar create sharpness on the nose. Plum and raspberry flavors run short, with a fresh, basic finish.",,Trencalòs
"Dried fruit flavors give a Port-like character to this full-bodied, mature and dry red wine. It smells like cherries and prunes and tastes juicy and ripe.",Helwig Vineyard Reserve,Winery by the Creek
"Light and juicy, this cool, bell pepper-flavored wine has intense acidity. There is little in the way of tannin, it's all fruit, very crisp and lean.",Château Pierrouselle,Ginestet
"This wine is soft, watery and misses out on character. It is gentle, but with a bitter almond aftertaste.",,Château du Cros
"Light in color, this is a wine with flavors that seem to have been stripped away. It is crisp and only lightly fruity, with some bitter acidity at the end.",,Château Goudichaud
"Currant and spice aromas are subdued and solid. A strapping tight palate with strong tannins delivers roasted plum, cassis, spice and chocolate flavors prior to a dry spicy finish that holds its own.",Famiglia Bianchi,Valentin Bianchi
"This elegant red offers aromas and flavors of toast, raspberry, sour cherry, espresso and white pepper. Firm, fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Drink through 2019.",,Valfaccenda
"Dark plum and berry aromas are fairly full and concentrated, with a boost from spicy oak. A medium-bodied palate offers up tannic rub, while cherry, black plum and oak-based spice flavors finish creamy, dry and spicy, with a hint of tobacco along with mild heat.",Pago Malarina,Vallobera
"Earthy aromas of raspberry and plum are familiar for Rioja. This feels fresh but also full and meaty. Balsamic raspberry and plum flavors finish warm, with chocolaty notes and a sense of competence and quality.",Raiza Reserva,Vicente Gandia
Jammy blueberry and boysenberry aromas include graphite and ink notes. This feels jammy to the point of being sluggish and heavy. Syrupy but not sweet flavors of herbal black fruits finish with a lasting gamy note.,Q,Zuccardi
"Toast, espresso, coffee bean and dark berry aromas emerge on this firmly structured red. It's still very much on its oak, showing unripe sour cherry backed up by oak-driven spice including vanilla and coconut alongside grippy tannins.",Ascheri,Ellena
"Delicate aromas of red rose and wild berry lead the nose while the taut palate offers raw sour cherry, anise, cinnamon and mocha. Bracing tannins lead to a firm, drying finish.",,Morra Diego
"In this soft, elegant mix of almost 75% Merlot with Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, briny black olive finds balance against softly restrained layers of black cherry and cassis. The finish is dusted in cinnamon.",Padlock,Picayune
"This is a big ripe wine full of juicy sweet plum flavors and dark dense tannins. It is still young with a bitter edge from the toasty wood aging. The wine, with its structure and firm texture, will need more time so drink from 2017.",Quinto Elemento Reserva,Quinta do Arrobe
"Sanguine, this Merlot-dominant blend is juicy with well-toned structure and length. Smaller percentages of Syrah and Malbec provide succulence and softness, while also offering a density of black cherry and berry, finished in dark chocolate.",Barrel Select,Rutherford Hill
"This is nice and hints at greater things, but ultimately it's more modest and fluffy than substantive. Aromas of oak resin, baked apple and vanilla introduce a palate with mild acidity and not much structure. Vanilla, caramel, banana and honey- dew flavors finish soft.",Encuentro,Rutini
"Fresh-pressed blackberry aromas leap out of the glass of this wine, along with asphalt and a touch of purple flowers. The palate is a study of density and thickness, with black plums, coffee and espresso showing most out of the deep, black flavors.",,Siot
"From 100% Charbono, this offers hints of raspberry, cherry and orange on the nose, amid dense cherry and strawberry flavors that are concentrated and yet doesn't overwhelm the acidity. Medium body and weight make it a nice option for sipping and at the table.",Rosé of,Summers
"Broad aromas of seared lemons, white peach and nectarine are given nuance with a bit of quinine on this entry-level bottling. Stewed lemons and apple-custard flavors show on the plush and pillowy palate, cut with an acidic sizzle.",Cuvee Los Gatos,Testarossa
"Fresh pear, white peach and fig aromas, a rich texture, and generous vanilla and layered almond flavors describe this tasty wine that stays fresh and fruity through the finish. It offers a medium body and nice balance.",Terra Alta Vineyard,Von Holt
"This blend of Jaén, Alfrocheiro, Touriga Nacional and Tinta Roriz is ripe and juicy, with black fruit tones. It does have a structure that will allow the wine to age for a few years, so drink from late 2016.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"An ancient variety now seen rarely, this Códega do Larinho has produced a wine that has a steely texture and tangy citrus flavors. It is bright with acidity, lime and grapefruit fruits and so crisp. It is ready to drink.",Lua Cheia em Vinhas Velhas Andreza Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"Honeysuckle and white peach show on the nose of this bottling from the region's longtime Rhône producer. It's a simple and straightforward take on the grape, with dried white peach, lemon-lime candy and apple-peel flavors, wrapped up with buzzing acidity and grippy texture.",,Zaca Mesa
"This is a pale colored wine, a blend of local grapes and deliciously fresh. It is rounded and smooth, touched by citrus and fresh tangerines. Ripe and fruity, it is ready to drink now.",Premium Branco,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"Aromas of stewed fruit, prune and toast lead the nose. The firm palate is still rather closed but reveals dried black cherry, fig, black pepper, clove and coffee alongside astringent, grainy tannins.",La Villa,Fratelli Seghesio
"A whiff of crushed chalk lends some complexity to this crisp refreshing Riesling full of fresh apple, tangerine and lemon flavors. Off-dry on the palate, it's a juicy widely appealing wine for youthful consumption.",Jahrgang,Moselland
"Mild tannin leads to integrated oak and a burst of juicy red cherry and pomegranate, laced in aromas of roses in this light-bodied wine. It finishes quick and lean.",,Renteria
"Wild berry, iris, toast, coffee and vanilla aromas come together in the glass. The dense palate shows more oak influence, offering roasted coffee bean, toasted oak, coconut and dried black cherry alongside astringent tannins that give it an abrupt finish.",Conca,Revello Fratelli
"This opens with aromas of coffee, coconut and black-skinned berry. The tightly wound palate isn't very expressive but eventually reveals dried cherry, toasted oak and espresso alongside bracing tannins. Give it another year or two for the tannins to unwind and then drink sooner rather than later.",Bricco Manzoni,Silvio Grasso
"Swirls of honeysuckle lend a delicate sweetness to this silky, off-dry Gewürztraminer. It's honeyed and plush in peach and apricot flavor, but zesty lime acidity lends a stately appeal. Drink now.",,Von Der Leyen
"Richly intense, this wine wraps thick textures of caramel and toffee around tropical mango. The full body celebrates ripeness while finding enough restraint.",Baker Ridge Vineyard Estate,Thomas George
"Sunny yellow peaches, apples and nuts perfume this bright lemon-fresh Weissburgunder, or Pinot Blanc. A whisper of herbs lends savoriness to crisp apple, pear and citrus flavors on the palate. It's a straightforward yet refreshing and elegant wine.",Trocken,Thörle
This easy-to-enjoy wine from the family of Silver Oak has lots of vanilla and fruit flavors and a broad but soft mouthfeel. Hints of cinnamon and red cherries come out on the palate and linger on the finish.,,Twomey
"Still tightly wound, this pure varietal wine spent 15 months in one-third new oak. Waxy plum fruit is supported with plenty of acidity and a hint of leather. The wine is young and fresh, with some years of development ahead.",,Upper Five
"Softly floral and sculpted in red berry and leather, this extracted and somewhat reduced wine may need time in the glass, if not the bottle, to open. The brawnier tendencies reign in full dominance and weight.",,VGS
"This is a great Merlot that's intensely concentrated and dazzlingly rich__verything you want a Merlot to be. It's power packed with black cherries, cherry liqueur, cocoa and sweet oak, with firm, hard tannins. That is, of course, the Nickel & Nickel style. It shows classic Oakville structure and a hard-to-define elegance, making it one of the best Merlots of the vintage.",Harris Vineyard,Nickel & Nickel
"Pure blackberry, cola, licorice and vanilla aromas form the base of an alluring, impressive bouquet. A layered, tannic palate is next up, followed by complex flavors of toast, mocha, black fruit, licorice and pepper. Density and firm tannins drive the finish, which tastes like bitter chocolate and espresso. This powerful Toro will be at its best from 2015_2020.",Alabaster,Teso La Monja
"Leonetti's 2010 Reserve includes 52% Cabernet Sauvignon, 30% Merlot, 9% Cabernet Franc and 9% Malbec__ more complex blend than the 2009. It opens with a lovely floral aroma__ bouquet of clover and white flowers__hen heads for the dark side, with black cherry and cassis. It's a big, tannic wine, beautifully crafted, and clearly differentiated from the winery's regular Cabernet bottling.",Reserve,Leonetti Cellar
"This is a heavy-duty Cabernet, big in every way, with rich black cherry and cassis fruit, and dense, dark tannins. The long, slightly grainy finish reinforces the impression of raw power, yet the wine retains perfect proportion and is nicely differentiated from the other 2010s crafted by winemaker Chris Figgins.",,Doubleback
"This is a dazzling Pinot Noir, so gorgeous to drink for its rich, complex deliciousness. Yet appealing as it is now, there are multiple subtleties waiting to be discovered, and the wine has a fine future. Like all of Marimar's Pinots, it's a big wine__ich and extracted and dense in weight. The flavors veer towards ripe pomegranates, black cherries and sweet licorice, with hints of dark chocolate, orange peel and even the umami of charcuterie. Despite the weight, it magically remains lithe, like a ballerina leaping into the air. Drink now_2019, as it gradually ages.",Mas Cavalls Doña Margarita Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"The 2009 Bully includes 10% Petit Verdot. It's seamless and complete, a firm, muscular, dark, smoky/earthy Cab with substantial tannins. The deeply powerful black fruits have a vivid presence and a slightly roasted character. This is a big bruiser, but beautifully proportioned.",The Bully,Gorman
"This is a 40-40 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Petit Verdot, with the balance consisting of Merlot. It's a barrel selection of the winery's best lots, from its various vineyards, and has been aged in 100% new French oak. Yet it's not oaky at all, with the wood bringing only additional sweet, smoky richness to the red currants, cherries, dark chocolate and spices. This is a superb wine, delicious right out of the bottle, but it should develop and, depending on your tastes, improve over the next 20 years.",Reserve,Von Strasser
"Dense and extracted, this dark, loamy Pinot Noir is concentrated and challenging. The fruit is black, compact, and sheathed in flavors of loam. Layers are tight and a bit unyielding. There is depth and power here, but it must be extracted over time and with a bit of patience.",Appassionata,Dr. Loosen & J. Christopher
"This is a barrel selection, presumably limited in cases. It's an extraordinarily rich, concentrated 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, made in the modern cult-style of massively extracted blackberries, black currants, cassis liqueur and chocolate, with oak bringing the usual sweet toast and vanilla complexities. This deserves its high score for sheer opulence and great Napa structure. Delicious now, and could easily age for at least 10 years.",Limited,Silverado
"This exceptional wine was made by the late David Lett to celebrate the birth of his granddaughter. It's drinking beautifully, and has the color and scent of a mature wine, though Eyrie Pinots can often live longer than those who bet against them. Delicate and subtle, it nonetheless shows surpassing power and length. Mature, fully-evolved dried fruit and herb flavors are highlighted with notes of cinnamon and brown sugar.",Marguerite,The Eyrie Vineyards
"VML is one of the newest wineries in Sonoma County. They took over the site previously occupied by Belvedere, in the heart of the Middle Reach of the Russian River. High ambitions have been realized with this beautiful bubbly. It's really an exceptional wine__ichly textured and creamy__ith hints of strawberries, lees, toast and vanilla, and none of the coarseness that can characterize lesser sparkling wines.",Blanc de Noir,VML
"From vineyards close to the romantic ruins of Dürnstein castle, this is a steely, tight, nervy wine, full of citrus fruits, taut acidity and a a crisp texture. It's still very young, a wine that needs several years to really age properly.",Ried Schütt Dürnsteiner Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"Capture continues to make progress in interpreting their vineyard located in this new appellation, a high elevation overlooking Alexander Valley. Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this Bordeaux-style blend is young now, with hard tannins that interfere with the fruit. The fruit is intensely concentrated with cherry compote and cassis flavors, while new oak's vanilla and toast are proportionate to the wine's volume. A worthy followup to the 2009, and a wine to cellar for 8_10 years, if not longer.",Harmonie,Capture
"The trick with getting a Chardonnay this honeyed is to keep it balanced and make it finish dry. Lynmar accomplishes these tasks with dexterity. Partly because of the acidity, partly the stony, crystalline minerality. The wine is terrifically rich in tropical fruits, melons, sweet Meyer lemons and ripe summer peaches, with all the buttered toast you could ever want from oak. In lesser hands, it would all be too much.",Susanna's Vineyard,Lynmar
"This tastes like a more concentrated and sweeter version of Stottle's dry Viognier from the same vintage and vineyard. Deeply concentrated, complex and creamy, it's loaded with citrus and stone fruits, honey and butterscotch, yet remains lifted by defining acidity.",Lucille Late Harvest,Stottle
"Black and viscous, this gorgeous Petite Sirah is intriguing in every way. Opening with aromas of just-muddled mint and freshly baked bread, this wine tastes as if wildflowers and brambly blackberry stems were placed carefully in a leather satchel. No doubt this Petite will get even more interesting with age.",Eaglepoint Ranch,Sirius
"A delicately structured, low-alcohol Pinot from the Sonoma Coast that shows winemaker Ehren Jordan's increasing fascination with this part of Sonoma County. The wine is light in texture, with savory wild cherry, licorice, sweet tobacco, mocha, bacon and spice flavors. That sounds like a wild assortment,  but somehow it all comes together, in a wine of singular focus and discernment. Drink now_2020.",Whistler Vineyard,Failla
"This is a best-of-barrels blend from different vineyard sites. It's a very good wine that grabs your attention with sheer Chardonnay dazzle. The tropical fruits are incredibly ripe and intense, with sweet, smoky oak adding supportive richness, brought into focus by crisp acidity. There's a core, like the nucleus of an atom, that holds everything together. Might even age for half a dozen years.",La Serenité,Lynmar
"All Leonetti wines are 100% estate-grown fruit, mixing Seven Hills, Mill Creek Upland and Loess vineyard grapes. The 2010 Cabernet Sauvignon includes 12% Merlot, 8% Petit Verdot and 4% Carmenère in the blend. Young and chewy, with a hint of herbaceousness, this shows lovely balance and a mix of raspberry, black cherry, cassis, coffee and cacao. It's a young, deep and powerful wine that will certainly reward cellaring.",,Leonetti Cellar
"Perfumed on the nose with heady yellow florals and stonefruit, this is one stunner of a Riesling. It's powerfully concentrated on the palate with flavors of honey and sweet peach tinged with lanolin and wax. Penetrating and pure in focus, yet remarkably delicate in texture, it finishes long with layers of crushed-stone minerality.",Zeltinger Sonnenuhr Auslese,Markus Molitor
"Among Kiona's strengths, the dessert wines are right at the top. This wine__omparable in many ways to the Single Berry Select from Eroica (which costs more than twice as much)__eatures Chenin Blanc rather than Riesling, and why not? It's a seductive, delicious bottle that expresses the condensed essence of the grape. Even at 274 g/L of residual sugar, it does not translate to a cloying or super-sweet wine; rather it is buoyed by supporting acidity, while filling the mouth with candied fruits, flowers, and buttery pastry notes.",Single Berry Select Botrytised,Kiona
"This very interesting wine treads a delicate balance between exuberantly ripe persimmons and cherries, and earthier notes of red tomatoes. But those tomatoes are rich and satisfying, like summer heirloom varieties picked fresh off the vine that are sweet as a peaches. Veteran Stemmler, who can usually be depended on to turn out serious Pinot Noir, has succeeded here, giving us a delicious wine for drinking now, but one whose balance should protect it for 6_8 years.",Estate Grown,Stemmler
"Insanely rich and opulent, brimming with apricot and tangerine jam, green-apple butter, pineapple tart, vanilla, honeysuckle, buttered toast and spice flavors. Somehow, the mass is reined in by a tight framework of acids, minerals and oak tannins. This shows the pedigree that comes from this famous vineyard, as well as the Williams Selyem signature of extreme class and deliciousness. Drink over the next five years.",Olivet Lane Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Voluptuously textured and intensely juicy on the palate with rich peach, melon and citrus notes, this remarkably dry Riesling is a showcase of balance and finesse. The palate tingles with tangerine acidity kissed with hibiscus nectar and savory, crushed slate.",Graacher Dompropst GG,S.A. Prüm
"If there's one California Pinot Noir you cellar this vintage, make it this one. It's a stone-cold guarantee. Light and silky in the mouth, with brisk acidity, it shows rich raspberry, cherry, red currant and sandalwood flavors that are deep and long. Has all the necessary balance to evolve many years, and should start showing bottle development after 2018.",Selleck Vineyard,Calera
"What a great follow-up to the 2009 vintage. You can put this in the cellar with entire confidence that it will age for likely 10_20 years, and actually improve. At nearly three years of age, it's rich and vibrant with black currants, blueberries and dark chocolate, and a big hit of sweet oak. But the tannins are impossible, locking the mouth down with astringency. It's a pity that most of the 2l,064 bottles produced will probably be opened too young.",Révélation,Capture
"Extraordinarily sweet and attractive in raspberry and cherry fruit, as concentrated and pure as anything in California. The acidity is beautiful, as you'd expect from this vineyard in such a cool vintage, and it showcases Pinot Noir's silkiness and beauty. Despite the immediate flash,  it will develop bottle complexity; hold until 2016.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"Gary Farrell is one of the few wineries to obtain fruit from this coveted vineyard. As always, the wine is intensely concentrated in tropical fruits, green apples and pears, with such weight that it can easily handle lavish new French oak. The alcohol is refreshingly low and the acidity is brisk and mouthwatering. This gorgeous evocation of Russian River Chardonnay is flashy and delicious now, but the window of opportunity seems to be between 2014_2017 before the fruit starts to fade away.",Rochioli Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"Ignore its generic Oregon AVA__his is King Estate's top wine, a rich reserve-level Pinot Noir redolent with Asian spices, saffron, cumin and more. Nuances of dusty cocoa powder lead into a thrilling wine with a spine of steel, focusing its ripe, fleshy fruit through a long, cellar-worthy finish.",Domaine,King Estate
"Shows the Von Strasser signature all down the line, with incredibly extracted blackberry jam, cassis liqueur, dark chocolate and new French oak flavors, wrapped into hard tannins and brightened with fine acidity. Only the second release from this young vineyard, it's an intensely interesting, complex wine that will reward cellaring. Best after 2019.",Vineyard 2131,Von Strasser
"This internationally-styled Taurasi opens with aromas of oak extract, sawdust, coffee and whiffs of black fruit. The palate offers blackberry, sour cherry, bitter cocoa and espresso alongside excruciatingly astringent wood tannins that dry out the mouth.",Albertus,Cantine di Marzo
"Ripe white peach and pear notes are juicy and penetrating on this bright, juicy Chardonnay, with surprising depth on the palate. It's robustly structured with a rich, full body that's cut by zesty lime acidity. It finishes moderately long.",Gold Seal Vineyards,Charles Fournier
"This wine opens with aromas of toast, black berries, espresso, balsamic herbs and black spices. The extracted palate offers up ripe black cherry, chocolate, coffee and licorice alongside bracing, drying tannins.",Alta Valle,Colli di Castelfranci
"This pure Cabernet does not have the sweet, forward, jammy aromatics of many red wines from this ripe vintage. It's stiff and tight, tannic and herbal, with a structure suited to play off a thick, juicy steak.",Runway,Airfield Estates
"Still sorting itself out, it matches tart cranberry fruit to an astringent, tannic finish with highlights of espresso. More time in bottle may soften up some of the rough edges.",Runway,Airfield Estates
"Cedar, cinnamon and black cherry aromas offer friendly and generous appeal here. The wine is fruit-forward and friendly with blueberry, black cherry and pepper on the palate. An easy drinking but elegant choice.",Reserve Vieilles Vignes Unfiltered,Alpha Estate
"A blend of Grillo, Chardonnay, Inzolia and Catarratto in equal parts, this vibrant and enjoyable wine opens with aromas of stone fruit, citrus and pineapple. The juicy palate delivers white peach, yellow apple and a hint of almond alongside bright acidity.",C'D'C',Baglio del Cristo di Campobello
"Milk chocolate and oak aromas blend with lightly herbal berry scents. This is fresh and choppy on the palate, with red-fruit flavors of plum and pie cherry. Aggressive and slightly herbal on the finish, this comes around with airing.",,Filón
"This full-bodied wine shows evidence of oak maturation in its notes of light toast and baking spices. Those elements are supported by pleasant citrus flavors, but the result isn't completely convincing.",Amour de Dieu,Jean-Luc Colombo
"Spunky, lively red-fruit aromas of raspberry and plum are the foyer to a healthy, juicy, fresh Tempranillo with simple red plum and raspberry flavors. A clean finish confirms this basic Rioja's drinkability factor.",,Lágrimas de Maria
"This wine is 100% varietal and fermented and aged in stainless steel. It starts out quite reductive before opening to reveal perfumed notes of rose petal, lychee and spice. The palate is off dry (16g/L residual sugar), broad and oily in feel.",Jewett Creek Vineyards,Domaine Pouillon
This is a ripe and juicy wine. It has ripe wild strawberry flavors that go with the full-bodied feeling and the warm tannins. It's rich and developing well. Drink from 2016.,Les Charmes,Domaine Roger Belland
"The wine is quite tight in character, but shows some richer potential. It is generous, full-bodied and packed with apricot and apple skin flavors. Give it until 2015.",,Dominique Cornin
"This blend of 60% Nero d'Avola and 40% Merlot has a pretty fragrance of blue flower, black berry and baking spice. The simple palate is less expressive, offering fleeting wild cherry flavors.",Calanican Nero d'Avola & Merlot,Duca di Salaparuta
"The grapes for hail from both Carneros and Oak Knoll and have undergone both barrel and stainless steel fermentation. The result is a medium-weight to fuller-style of clean, crisp lemon and pear flavors, a swirl of tropical vanilla on the finish.",,Educated Guess
"Made from organically farmed fruit, this easygoing Nero d'Avola offers juicy blackberry and sour cherry lightly framed by a white pepper accent. It's simple but well-made, with bright acidity. Pair it with summer salads or pizza.",Purato Made With Organic Grapes,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"Sagebrush aromas lead off this bottling from the newish Fossil Point label, which is connected to the higher end Center of Effort brand. On the palate, spice, tar and pomegranate accompany some fairly weighty tannins, meaning that this will probably emerge as a better wine by 2016.",,Fossil Point
"This wine seems a bit reduced right out of the bottle. Give it plenty of oxygen, and light blueberry fruit flavors emerge. The aging in 60% new French oak brings in a lot of barrel flavors that seem mismatched with the light fruit.",,Foundry Vineyards
"Intense in lemon and silky, it shows a touch of effervescence from the bright acidity and is textured from the time spent in barrel. The finish and lingering aftertaste steer sweet, into the land of butterscotch and caramel.",Estate Grown and Bottled,Gloria Ferrer
"Fresh lemon, tangerine and apricot notes abound in this juicy, easy-going Chardonnay. Lack of oak aging highlights its youthful, primary character. Racy lemon acidity and zesty lemon-skin reverberate on the finish.",Ingle Vineyard Unoaked,Heron Hill
Aromas of fresh apricots and pears meld with lavish florals on this off-dry Pinot Gris. The palate is textured and bold with flavors of pressed apple that linger on the finish.,Reserve,Heron Hill
"A fruit bomb of a Cabernet that has a lot of the things we love about Zinfandel. It has a deep, saturated color, jammy aromas, very ripe cherry flavors laced with maple syrup and a seemingly sweet finish. Juicy and delicious on its own or with casual meals.",,Ironstone
"Rich, ripe scents of cherry pie and cherry cola waft from this profoundly aromatic Merlot. It's boldly alcoholic and full bodied, but the palate shows restraint with crisp red berry flavors highlighted by a streak of acidity. Soft, furry tannins coat the finish.",,King's Garden Vineyards
"Fresh and fruity, this simple Chardonnay shows crispness as well as white fruits, orange zest and a lively lemon aftertaste. Drink now.",,La Soufrandière
"Crisp, very light and fruity, this is an attractive, ready-to-drink wine. A touch of acidity at the end gives freshness.",,Les Héritiers du Comte Lafon
"Fresh cherry and spice aromas start this cheerful Agiorgitko. Easy red fruit, vanilla and spice are in balance, with medium tannins. A good everyday choice for red meat, pork or robust cheese.",,Mediterra
"It tastes lush, slightly sweet and full-on fruity, but has a lavish oak overlay. The aromas are sweet cherries and maple syrup, the fruit flavors come out as just-crushed grapes and cherries sprinkled with the brown sugar of new oak. Not heavy in texture and not as full-bodied as the flavors would make you think.",,Campus Oaks
"This ruby hued Nero d'Avola opens with earthy aromas of mature red and black berries, underbrush and a whiff of white pepper. The lean palate isn't very expressive, showing raw red cherry and a hint of roasted coffee bean. It finishes on a green, bitter note.",Gradiva,Casa di Grazia
"A blend of Sémillon (79%) and Sauvignon Blanc (21%) it conveys abundant notes of fig, herbs and spice. It's full bodied, with the fruit flavors seeming almost sweet without the acid to stand them up.",Cuvée Blanc,Cave B
"A tight, mineral-driven wine, it has both great fruit and acidity. It is tangy, pushing forward crisp lemon and apple skin flavors and a touch of peach. Drink now.",Les Vignes de Joanny,Collovray et Terrier
"Lots of ripe blackberry and cherry jam flavors in this soft Merlot. It's really too sweet for comfort, but plenty of consumers will like it. Production was 65,000 cases.",Los Osos,J. Lohr
"This wine has a feminine, floral quality from start to finish. Rounded fruit is soft on the palate and offers a more delicate touch. The finish is rounded with a touch of melon.",,My Big Fat Greek Wine
"So sweet in pineapples and oranges despite a crisp spine of acidity, it quickly palls, making it hard to take a second sip. But lots of Chardophiles will like it.",,Napa Creek
Light and drinkable with faint red cherry and strawberry fruit flavors. Light weight with a short but clean finish. Drink now.,,Snow Mountain
"Waxy to the max, with baked apple, dry spice and plenty of oak on the bouquet. Thick and mouthfilling in terms of texture, with creamy melon and sweet apple flavors. Turns pithy, stalky and bitter on the finish.",,Ricardo Santos
"Forceful on the nose, with red berry aromas leading to an angular, high-acid palate with zesty, almost sour flavors of raspberry and red currant. Tastes herbal as well, as the wine's scouring acidity makes for a long but not very flavorful finish.",Yauquen,Ruca Malen
"Lots of sweet red and blue fruits in this simple, forward Cabernet Sauvignon. Caramelized oak, too, makes it taste more like a dessert wine than a properly dry table wine.",,San Simeon
"On the sweet side, and the bubbles are scoury and rough. Still, this is a pretty nice sparkling wine, clean and refreshing in citrus fruits and yeast.",Brut Cuvée,Barefoot Bubbly
"Too oaky. Vanilla, buttered toast, caramel and sweet oak aromas dominate, and the wine turns sweet and extracted in the mouth. There are some decent blackberry and cherry flavors, but this is a pretty common wine.",Silver Label,B.R. Cohn
"Dilute and watery on the bouquet, with a touch of lime and air freshener. Feels oily and chunky on the palate, with citrus and not too much else to ponder. Lemony and tangy on the finish, with pithy bitterness.",,Camino del Inca
"Valcolomba is a pure expression of Vermentino from Maremma in southern Italy with ripe aromas of melon, peach and passion fruit. The mouthfeel is smooth, easy and creamy soft.",Valcolomba,Carpineto
"A light and easy quaff with fresh notes of green apple, underripe peach and orangey citrus. Balanced and clean with a short finish. Drink now.",,Ernst Gouws & Co.
"This dry Pinot Noir is a little ungenerous, offering modest sour cherry candy and wintergreen flavors. It's also a little bitter, tasting almost like press wine.",,Inception
"An okay, light- to medium-weight Zinfandel that veers into stewy flavors and aromas before falling a tad flat on the finish.",,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"Reedy and green on the nose, then choppy and clipped on the palate. For a full-priced Malbec, this is lacking in ripeness, body and finesse; it's prickly and limited, with green bean, rhubarb and cranberry flavors. Not bad but underwhelming for $33.",Reserva,Ksana
"A distinct green streak shines throughout this wine, with aromas of green bean and plantain and flavors of grass and pepper. Light weight but a bit round in the mouth, with a medium-length finish.",,Helderberg Wijnmakerij
"Good blackberry, herb and cedar flavors in this ultra-dry wine. But it's hard in tannins that don't seem likely to age out.",,Penman Springs
"Smells like fresh berries and perfume, which is good. In the mouth, it's weighty and sticky, with just enough acidity to keep it pumping. Tastes cranked up and wild, with plum and nectarine flavors leading the charge. Sugary on the finish, with a slightly cloying feel.",Malbec,Tapiz
"Gazza Ladra is a chalky, but almost sweet smelling expression of Fiano from southern Italy with aromas of candied lemon and honeysuckle. It's thin and compact with a bright touch of acidity on the close.",Gazza Ladra,Santa Lucia
"Simple and bright with clean lines, this easy-drinking Soave Classico offers citrus, white peach and talc powder aromas. Pair it with fried finger foods or spicy Thai spring rolls.",,Santa Sofia
"This inexpensive Pinot Grigio is perfectly fine for sipping, with decent acidity but not a lot of length on the finish and an interesting baked fig aroma.",,Redtree
"A prickling sensation provides a lively mouthfeel to this easy-drinking Chard, with light flavors of apple flesh and sweet citrus. Drink now.",,Robertson Winery
"A great value wine to pair with deviled eggs, stuffed mushrooms or fried shrimp. This Orvieto Classico represents a blend of Trebbiano Toscano, Malvasia, Grechetto and Drupeggio and opens with crisp green apple, dried hay and stone fruit.",,Rocca delle Macìe
"Foxy aromas come with notes of rubber, creamy milk chocolate and vanilla. It's hot and fiery in the mouth, with herbal plum and cassis flavors. Functional as a fruity, red berry wine but there's not much going on beyond the basics.",,Zolo
A very minty old vine Zin from organically farmed grapes that tastes of not-quite-ripe strawberry jam and is otherwise smooth and peppery.,Old Vine,McFadden
"A pale salmon color, this rosé shows ripe notes of cocoa-dusted cherry and strawberry alongside sweet citrus oil. Creamy and full in the mouth, it's a richer rosé that can stand up to heartier fare.",Fantail Pinotage,Morgenhof
"Like a fruit juice drink, with sugary pineapple, mango and orange flavors. The acidity is bright, but this Chardonnay is more like a dessert wine than a dry table wine.",,Laurier
"Simple and jammy, with sharp flavors of raspberries, cherries, gingersnap cookies and spices. Tasty and sweet, but lacking the structure to contain all that richness.",,Lava Cap
"A blend of equal parts Vermentino, Fiano and Chardonnay, Le Zere offers thick aromas of honey, yellow fruit and butterscotch. A sour, spicy flavor moves the wine forward over the palate.",Le Zere,Pieve Vecchia
"A big, sweet wine, heavy in the mouth, with fabulously ripe blackberry, cherry and chocolate flavors. Bring on the lasagna and cheeseburgers. The blend is Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Petite Sirah.",Reserve Winemaker's,Red Rock
"With 18 months spent in oak, the wood influence is certainly apparent, but it's balanced by the deep black plum and cherry notes. The mouthfeel is lush but lifted, with dense black-fruit flavors on the palate that persist through the close. Vanilla and sweet smoke flavors lend a decadent feel to the finish.",Yarden,Golan Heights Winery
"The Helix Chardonnay is a lush offering of pineapple flavor, plus a leesy, mineral-soaked midpalate that is supremely refreshing. It has terrific acidity and persistence on the palate.",,Helix by Reininger
"Part of a Limited Release series, this Syrah is made from fruit that was sourced from the Wahluke Slope, and it's co-fermented with 5% Viognier. Solid and substantial, it offers clear flavors of coffee, licorice, herb and earth, plus a deep, saturated note of blackberry syrup. A touch of dark chocolate infuses the finish.",Boreal Red Wine,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Fruity, rich and tannic, this wine has flavors of blackberry, molasses, dark chocolate, licorice, bacon, smoky oak and pepper. It's a dry, full-bodied effort that should provide pleasant drinking over the next six years.",Larner Vineyard Estrella Clone Reserve,db Winery
"This pure Merlot is made from fruit that was sourced from Bacchus, Conner Lee, Dionysus and Klipsun vineyards. Sappy, spicy and loaded with black fruits, this delivers plenty of flavor across the rich midpalate. Notes of black cherries, coffee grounds, licorice and smoke all come into play.",Four Vineyards,Arbor Crest
"Located on a high slope in Marsannay, the Vaudenelles Vineyard creates structured wines. This selection has a beautiful perfumed character, and it offers delicious red-berry flavors and lively acids that are striated by minerality.",Vaudenelles,Domaine Bruno Clair
"Citrus and orange zest flavors and bright acids characterize this wine. It's a refreshing selection, and it has a tight texture and pear juice flavor. Age it for 1_2 years.",Les Combottes,Domaine Champy
"This selection is from Terravant Wine Company, a custom-crush facility in Santa Barbara County. Dry and tannic, it shows classic Cabernet Sauvignon character. It has a smoothness often associated with Napa Valley wines and flavors of blackberry, black currant and oak.",,Barrel Ranch
"Rich and concentrated, this has great depth of flavor, which is sustained by wood influence. With its powerful structure and flavors of dark plum skins and ripe berries, it is certainly a wine for aging at least 4_5 years.",Reserva,Casa da Passarella
"Cellar this young wine for 5_6 years to let it mellow. Right now, it's aggressive in tannins and acids. The core of cherry, black raspberry, rhubarb and plum flavors is strong, which suggests that the wine will age.",Morelli Lane Vineyard,Lost Canyon
"This wine emits details of iron and citrus rind along with somewhat stark, tight fruit flavors that are often associated with Red Mountain Syrah. Racy and bracing, this will improve with 1_2 more years in the bottle.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard,Kaella
"As this is tight and currently aloof, it lacks the generosity of the 2009 vintage, but it may prove to be more ageable. It has deep, earthy flavors of red currant, cola and balsam, and it could blossom into something even more complex after 2016.",Primo's Hill,Kazmer & Blaise
"Big and bold, this Chardonnay is made from fruit sourced from the winery's estate vineyard in the new Fort Ross-Seaview appellation. This underwent barrel fermentation, malolactic fermentation and lees aging, and the result is a rich selection that offers flavors of lemon and tropical fruit, buttered toast and cream. Almost too assertive now, it needs a year or two to resolve.",Estate,Hirsch
"While this Chardonnay has rich tropical fruit and citrus flavors, with a light touch of oak, the acidity and minerality make it taste clean and balanced. Don't drink it too cold, and be sure to enjoy it with Dungeness crab and buttered sourdough bread.",Estate Verna's,Melville
"Bone dry and hinting at a sweet herb flavor, this wine backs away from the fruitiness found in most domestic Chenin Blanc. It offers complex details of yellow fruit, lemon verbena and beeswax.",Old Vine The Brasher Block,Merriman
"Perfumed with scents of dried flowers, figs, cherries and tea, this round, voluptuous Ribolla is luscious and fruity. It's dry, with a tea-leaf astringency that builds on the palate, and it finishes with a flurry of rose petals and caramelized honey flavors.",Ribolla,Movia
"This Cabernet-based wine__ith splashes of Malbec and Cabernet Franc__omes off assertively oaky at first, but as the earthy, black fruit aromas unfold, it works its way into a better balance. Medium weight with moderate tannins, the lush mouthfeel is complemented by flavors of ripe berry-pie filling but then countered by hints of green pepper and ash on the close. Drink 2014_2018.",,Yatir
"The beauty of this wine is that it shows seductive power and personality. Nothing is over the top. Cortevecchia Riserva doles out carefully measured aromas of forest fruit, spice, toasted nut and tobacco. It feels linear, bright and tight, but it is also elegant and soft.",Le Corti Cortevecchia Riserva,Principe Corsini Fattoria Le Corti
"Stolpman grows its Sangiovese in an area of the Santa Ynez Valley where most producers specialize in Rhône varieties. The result is often one of the most interesting California interpretations of the great Tuscan grape. Give this a long decanting because right out the bottle it's acidic and closed, but then the rich, spicy cherry flavor surfaces.",Estate,Stolpman
"New French oak and lees aging give this wine richness in the form of creamy, yeasty, toast and vanilla flavors. It offers ripe, forward flavors of oranges and tropical fruits, and the acidity plays a vital role in creating balance and a clean finish. Try this as an alternative to Chardonnay, and enjoy it with fish or poultry in cream sauce.",L'Avion,Stolpman
"Here's a big, ripe and dry Cabernet with flavors of blackberry, molasses and dark chocolate that seem almost overripe due to a touch of raisin. Tannic and full bodied, it's too robust to drink now, so give it 6_8 years in a cellar.",Mohrhardt Ridge,Wellington
"For maximum enjoyment, drink this almost all-Merlot blend now. It shows ripe, lush black-cherry, red currant, plum and bacon flavors that finish spicy and sweet tasting. The tannins are thick but smooth.",Angels' Peak,Terlato
"This is a tight, currently closed wine, but it has the potential to exude intense fruit and balancing acidity. It has weight and a taut, minerally texture, and the finish is fresh and lively. It will age over the medium term.",Grande Montagne Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Although this wine is currently a bit firm and closed, it has the stuffing for great evolution and shows promise for a long future. Dark, ripe raspberry and strawberry fruit characters are laced with touches of Asian spice, reduced balsamic and wild game. The medium-weight mouthfeel boasts chewy tannins that persist long into the finish. Drink 2014_2018.",Reserve,Recanati
"This blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon offers excellent fruit and shapely oak tones of spice, chocolate and sweet tobacco.",Le Sughere di Frassinello,Rocca di Frassinello
"A Zinfandel of sheer power, this is demonstrative of Rock Wall's style. The alcohol is very high, which brings heat and sweetness to the flavors of ripe blackberries, currants, anise and pepper. A touch of oak adds a mellow toastiness. Drink this now with rich stews and barbecued meats.",Monte Rosso Vineyard Reserve,Rock Wall
"This exceedingly rich wine is produced from fruit grown in the cool-climate Laetitia Vineyard, which is better known for Pinot Noir than for Syrah. The maritime influence can be tasted in the acidity, which is bright and citrusy, and it provides a firm backbone to the ripe black-cherry, red currant, licorice, bacon, black pepper and cedar flavors. Drink this over the next five years.",Laetitia Vineyard,Peloton
"This LBV could be aged. It has a real youthful feel, and its ripe black-fruit flavors are full of complex sweetness and edged with tannins. It has weight, richness and a generous mouthfeel.",Late Bottled Vintage,Ramos-Pinto
"A structured, mountain-grown Grenache, with 20% Syrah in the mix, this features cherry cola, black tea and meat flavors, plus oak tones and docile tannins. It's ready to drink, but it's built to age for another 3_5 years.",,Andis
"The 2009 vintage seems to have pushed the alcohol up a notch in many of the Ste. Michelle reds yielding dense, fruit-driven wines that are on the verge of being jammy. This hefty bottling delivers tons of flavor: The cassis note comes saturated with barrel-derived accents of coffee and smoke.",Ethos Reserve,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"A rounded wine, benefiting from the fruitiness of the year to give soft tannins, ripe strawberry fruits and an attractive acidity. The wine is ready to drink, although could age a few months.",Réserve,Nuiton-Beaunoy
"This offers scents of black fruit, prune and underbrush, followed by blackberry, raisin and chocolate flavors. It doesn't have much complexity, but the simple and straightforward style is enjoyable.",Solane,Santi
"Standard lemon-lime aromas open this quaffable Cava. In the mouth, it's creamy and soft but not mushy, with candied mango, papaya and vanilla flavors that finish sweet.",Brut Reserva,Segura Viudas
"The sweetness of the cherry pie filling and rum punch flavors persists into a sugary finish, giving this Merlot a candied, simple taste. It's also a very tannic wine, with an astringent mouthfeel. Not going anywhere, so drink up.",,Sequoia Grove
"Coming from the newly minted Ancient Lakes appellation, it's a jumble of apple and tropical notes. It leans toward medium sweet with tart acids pulling it back on the finish.",,Jones of Washington
"Red-currant jelly aromas and a floral character are followed by a soft-textured, caramel-flavored wine. It has a ripe feel, that's gentle and rather too easy.",Vintage,Quinta do Portal
"Earth, rubber, leafy notes, spice and plum aromas carry the nose on this 50/50 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Tempranillo. The mouthfeel is full and tomatoey, with snappy acidity pushing minty, herbal flavors of red plum, currant and raspberry. A light, medicinal flavor defines the finish.",Vertus Wine Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Bodegas Iranzo
"This has bright aromas of red currant, cherry and red pepper. The palate isn't very expressive, but it does show some prune and raisin notes, along with a hint of chocolate. It could use a bit more freshness and length, and you'll detect the alcohol. Drink soon.",Domini Veneti,Cantina Valpolicella Negrar
"This is a bright and approachable wine, with forward notes of blueberry, plum and wild strawberry accented by hints of garrigue and vanilla. Swaths of mocha and sweet spice add richness to the palate and linger on the medium-length finish.",Odyssea,Domaine Grier
"Cline's Oakley is more than halfway made up of Syrah, with smaller smatterings of Petite Sirah, Barbera and Cabernet Franc. The tinkering in the cellar works, the wine refreshing in strawberry jam, soft and rich with an herbal presence and kiss of vanilla on the finish.",Oakley 82,Cline
"Oak-infused fruit dominates this wine. It's strong in blackberry and plum jam, with a cola-mocha richness sprinkled with anise and sage. On the finish, high alcohol contributes a hot, peppery note. Doesn't seem like an ager.",Bartolucci Vineyard,Honig
"A bit on the light-bodied side, but nice and dry, with plenty of personality. The flavors are of briary, brambly wild blackberries, raspberries and blueberries, dusted with black pepper and cinnamon.",,Maddalena
"Strong, candied flavors of cola, cherries, rhubarb pie and persimmons mark this Pinot Noir. While it has a good structure of acids and tannins, and the alcohol isn't too high, it would benefit from greater subtlety and restraint.",Home Vineyard,Manzoni
"The fruit is the story here, fresh, clean and loaded with flavors of apple and pear. This is a simple, well-made Sauvignon Blanc, neither grassy nor complex, just forward, fruity and ready to drink.",,Mercer
"Dark and intriguing, this wine offers notes of dried sour cherries and plums, plus touches of pink roses, chocolate and brown spices. Medium to full in body, the flavors come across a touch wooly, and the palate feels soft, pliant and polished. A hint of tart black-raspberry candy marks the finish.",,Molliver Vineyards
"Dusty apple-driven aromas are simple but true to what brut Cava is about. This feels citric but a little flat, with pithy orange, tangerine and lime flavors that finish clean, crisp and short.",Cordon Negro Brut,Freixenet
"A great value in Cabernet, showing lots of varietal character. It's dry, full-bodied and crisp in acidity, with black currant, cola and cedar flavors for drinking now. Easy to find, with 10,000 cases produced.",,Discoveries
"Scents of blackberry pie filling, dark cherry and baking spice come streaked with notes of ripe raspberry and leather. This medium-bodied wine is supple and polished on entrance, but the fine, firm tannins gain traction toward the midpalate. It finishes with a bright cherry refrain.",Reserve,Pollak
"With juicy blackberry and cherry fruit flavors, accented by an herbal touch of nettles and chamomile tea, this Cab is easy to pair with everyday food, like tacos or an upscale pizza. It has soft acidity and gentle tannins, and is at the peak of its drinkability now.",,Sebastiani
"Estate-grown in the San Juan islands, this did well in 2012, a relatively warm year in western Washington. Ripe grapefruit, mint jelly and a bit of cotton candy combine to craft a pleasant quaffing wine.",Estate Grown,San Juan Vineyards
"An enjoyable, easy drinker with notes of ripe red apple, apricot and granulated sugar. It's broad in feel, drinking a touch off dry.",,WildHaven
"Textured, mineral and tight wine, its crisp acidity a refreshing feature. It's very fresh, terroir-driven, a wine that shows its origins right up front. Apples and citrus add to the bright, fruity nature of this wine.",Minéral,Cave des Grands Crus Blancs
"Made from 100% Cabernet, this is a great house wine for the price. It's dry, full-bodied and tannic, with proper black currant, blackberry, mocha and oak flavors. Easy to find, with 20,000 cases produced.",,Alias
"A light, easy Pinot Blanc, rounded, creamy and with just the right balance of fresh acidity. It's simple, attractive now, ready to drink.",Bouquet de Printemps,Jean-Marc Bernhard
"Roughly 50/50 Roussanne/Marsanne, this barrel-aged blend registers just 11% alcohol. Yet, it remains quite dry, with a soft, buttery mouthfeel that suggests it went through complete malolactic fermentation. Thin hints of melon and citrus are more or less buried in the buttery flavors.",,Sinclair Estate Vineyards
"A spicy Sylvaner, soft, ripe and fruity. It has a rich texture with spiced apricots, a rounded character and touches of acidity. Not for aging, so drink now.",Steinstuck,René Muré
"Firm and structured, this is a solid wine, laced with mineral acidity and tight tannins. It has a juicy, blackberry fruit component cutting through the texture. Drink this still young wine from 2014.",Les Comtes Cahors,Georges Vigouroux
"It's easy to like this affordable Moscato. It's low in alcohol, high in sweetness and brisk with acidity, along with intense flavors of oranges and vanilla honey.",,Moscato Bella
"Bright red cherry fruit marks this dry, tartly crisp Merlot. It has additional flavors of cola and sweet toasty oak. Easy to drink now and should pair well with weeknight fare, like burgers, tacos and pizza.",,Muirwood
"This pleasant Sauvignon from Friuli shows typical varietal aromas of tomato vine and cantaloupe. The palate offers green melon and spice flavors and has a crisp, clean finish.",Sauvignon Terre Magre,Piera Martellozzo
"Food friendly, informal and bright, this easy-drinking Pinot Grigio opens with bright citrus, stone fruit and melon. There's a touch of white almond paste on the close that recalls the warm Tuscan sunshine.",Le Rime,Banfi
"There is a healthy pop as you open this lightly sparkling, just off-dry Vinho Verde. It has a citrusy lemon-sherbet tang of acidity, combining with a light dancing touch.",Aveleda,Aveleda
"From the far northeast region of Tras-os-Montes, this is an attractively fruity wine. It has a core of tannins that are a fine complement to the blueberry and damson fruits.",Terra Boa,Caves Aliança
"Made from organically grown grapes, this crisp white flirts dangerously with herb and grass tones__hat is often called gooseberry__efore settling down. It's quite drinkable, if a bit heavy on the finish.",,Chacewater
"White currant is the dominant flavor of this herbaceous, tangy wine. It also has notes of has green fruit and pink grapefruit, with a tight, zingy finish.",,Château le Raz
"On the nose, raspberry and plum aromas come with a slight brambly note. The palate is juicy and fresh, with flavors of plum, cherry and a touch of spice. This finishes steady, with focused flavors.",Vertus Wine Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Bodegas Iranzo
"You can call this wine country-style because it's a simple little Zin, but it has a certain charm. Drink it with a nice pizza or meatball hoagie and enjoy the black raspberry and pepper flavors.",,Crooked Path
"This shows a certain richness, with black currant, cola and cedar flavors. It's easy to drink with just about anything that calls for a dry, full-bodied red.",,Daglia Canyon
"Sweet and direct, this has blackberry, cherry jam, mocha and spicy sandalwood flavors. There's plenty of charm, but not much complexity. Drink now.",,Decoy
"Rides the wave of the Moscato craze in America, offering sweet, honeyed flavors of tropical fruits, oranges and peaches. Zesty acidity provides just the tartness needed to balance all that richness.",,Lost Angel
"Crisp white-fruit aromas come with a touch of green grass. It feels regular, with briny lime and tart apple flavors.",Glaç Brut Nature,Maria Casanovas
"Toasty, caramelized oak and sweet heat from high alcohol dominate this wine. The blackberry and cherry fruit flavors are very ripe. Drink now.",Silverwood Vineyard Mountain Grown,Miro
"This tastes a little vegetal, but it's dry, crisp and creamy, with decent orange and peach flavors.",Suzanne's Blend,Gracianna
"This is refreshing, with herbaceous hints as well as a warm yellow-fruit character. It's ripe, full of youthful fruitiness and ready to drink. Screwcap.",La Petite Perrière,Guy Saget
Crisp acidity gives this off-dry Riesling just the edge of tartness it needs to balance out the sweet citrus and flower flavors. It's the perfect inexpensive summer picnic white wine.,,Hacienda
"This is a pure and herbaceous Sauvignon Blanc. Crisp, citrus driven and refreshing, it has a clean character and a delicious zesty texture that acidity to the fruitiness. Screwcap.",Fumées Blanches,François Lurton
"Notes of crushed leaves, leather and tobacco leaves on the overt nose indicate the first signs of evolution, with aromas of mulberry, black cherry and black raspberry also evident. Full bodied with balanced alcohol and lightly dusty tannins, the wine overcompensates in structure with its lightly tart acidity. Already evolving, this will drink now and up to 2_3 years longer.",Les Sigillaires,G. Moulinier
"This is tastes stalky, with a red fruit flavor. It has acidity along with a vegetal, herbal character. With taut acidity and a dry, tannic finish, this is a real barbecue wine.",Cuvée Spéciale,Domaine de la Sanglière
"Packaged with an appropriate nautical theme, this bright Vermentino from coastal Tuscany offers easy aromas of citrus, peach, pear and grapefruit. There's a crisp touch of spice and dried sage on the close.",Vermentino della Costa,Principe Corsini Fattoria Le Corti
"The nose is big and rubbery, with aromas of bacon, tar and black plum. It feels young and choppy, with a lightly herbal berry flavor that turns more roasted in character as the wine opens. This gets the job done despite showing a roasted flavor throughout.",,Señorio de Uñuela
"This is the kind of easy Italian white that would taste delicious at an outdoor barbecue or on a hot afternoon. The wine is light, lean and loaded with fresh citrus flavors.",,Rocca delle Macìe
"Cassis and black cherry aromas lead into similar, but somewhat light fruit flavors. The mouthfeel is soft, but the tannins a bit green and hard. It has not really become integrated.",,RoxyAnn
"Earthy and warm on the nose, this has compost and leafy raspberry aromas. It shows good feel and balance, with light plum, cherry and citrus-infused tea flavors. The finish is good and solid, concluding with a tobacco note.",Oak Cask,Trapiche
"This very dry Cabernet feels rugged and gritty in the mouth, with too much acidity that lends bite. The austerity is relieved by black cherry and sweet tobacco flavors. Drink up.",Madrone Ridge Vineyard,Muscardini
"Orange and nectarine aromas carry the nose to a wide, fairly acidic palate that still manages to fall a little flat in terms of character. Mid-tier notes of orange and stone fruit set up a finish with similar flavors.",Brut Rosé,Vilarnau
"This is solid stuff for the price, with berry and pencil eraser aromas. It feels more soft than hard, with a jammy mouthfeel and grabby tannins in front of berry and plum flavors that turn medicinal.",Crianza,Viña Decana
"Leafy and smoky smelling, this has lean cherry and raspberry aromas in the backdrop. This is a tight and linear wine, with strawberry and raspberry flavors that pick up speed. Overall it's juicy, jumpy and legit, but nervy. This may benefit from more bottle aging. Only 512 cases were produced.",Gran XV,Pulenta Estate
"A little heavy for a rosé, this has jammy raspberry and cola flavors. But it's nicely dry, with crisp acidity. Try with tempura or a juicy ham­burger.",Rosé of Pinot Noir,MacPhail
"This offers tonic citrus and kiwi aromas followed by a thin, no-fuss mouthfeel. Simple, fresh and bright, it's an easy-drinking Orvieto Classico that would pair with appetizers or fried finger foods.",,Rocca delle Macìe
"Get a case of this and make it your house wine for easy drinking. It's dry and spicy, and has enough cherry, berry and cola flavors to satisfy your tastebuds.",,Lost Angel
"This is a ripe and spicy wine, with great touches of lemon and acidity that partner with the rich quince and mango flavors. The wine is ripe and full bodied, a fine expression of a more complex side of Pinot Blanc.",Rosenburg,André Blanck et ses Fils
"This ripe Cabernet has an expressive roasted aroma, and the sweet black-cherry and kirsch liqueur flavors are wrapped in thick, toasty tannins. Earthy and smoky through the finish, and tannins ultimately turn a bit rough and drying.",Mays Discovery Vineyard,Adams Bench
"Packaged in a lovely, Champagne-like bottle (but without a cage), this is very pretty, with a hint of cherry candy. The palate is round, full and forward. This is a wine to set on the table for a special occasion__ut don't wait too long.",Lawrence Vineyards Grand Klasse,Gård
"This big, ripe, fruity wine balances its fruit with a core of firm tannins. It's dense, with a dusty texture, a sweet blackberry-jam flavor and final acidity.",Domaine Jean Descombes,Georges Duboeuf
"For a wine labeled merely Zweigelt, this is anything but simple. It has plenty of fruit, which is counterbalanced by complex tannins and dark texture. A spice note and acidity add to this wine, which should be aged for another year. Screwcap.",,Judith Beck
"Aromas of cedar cigar box, subtle flower, spice and dry berry form a good bouquet. Searing acidity creates some sharpness, while the primary flavors of berry and plum are offset by red tomato and dry spice. Roasted, dry, spicy and slightly bitter on the finish.",Reserva,Valdubón
"This wine's aromas are strongly citrusy, with a squeeze of lime zest that gives it a lively sensation, but the flavors are more sedate and ripe, veering gently into apricots and melons. The texture is plush and luxurious, while the finish is undeniably sweet and decadent.",Château Baroncelli,Vignobles de Balma Venitia
"Big, upfront flavors mark this Cabernet, providing big blackberry, black cherry, mocha, vanilla and toast notes. It's very dry, tannic and a little aggressive at this time. It could develop bottle complexity over the years.",,Bell
"Apple and other white fruit aromas come with hints of sea foam and clam shell. The palate is tight, mineral-driven and citric, with some spritz. Flavors of apple and pithy citrus lead to a long, speedy finish, with generous acidity.",Esencia Diviña,Adegas Gran Vinum
"This has a scent of baked apple, and in the mouth, it seems just as much a still white wine as a Cava, with a soft bead that indicates that it's starting to lose steam. Flavors of melon, citrus and pineapple finish with vanilla and chunky weight.",Gran Reserva Brut Nature,Agustí Torelló Mata
"This medium-dry wine layers attractive spice and lychee notes with a soft, warm texture. There's a spring in the stride of this fragrant wine, its acidity adding just the right sharp edge.",Nature'S,Louis Sipp
"A mature Gewürztraminer like this shows the richness of the grape and how the spice mellows as it ages. This is intense and rounded, with a streak of acidity adding freshness. Ready to drink now.",Jubilée Hugel,Hugel
"Ripe and creamy, this is an apple- and pear-flavored wine that's rounded and rich. It's fresh and full bodied, while preserving attractive acidity. The finish has a touch of spice. Screwcap.",Charming,Laurenz V.
"This is a richly sweet wine that's honeyed and ripe. Featuring notes of apricot, spice and an opulent texture, this is full and round in the mouth. It's a wine to pair with spicy foods or blue cheese.",Cuvée Alexandre,Domaine Schoffit
"Made with organically farmed fruit, this blend of Sangiovese, Cabernet Sauvignon and Colorino opens with an inky, dark color and savory aromas of ripe fruit, prune, plum, leather, tobacco and exotic spice. It's firm and well structured, with a velvety feel to the tannins.",Murtas,Fattoria San Michele a Torri
"Rusty and light in color, this has earth, compost and root notes, with dry leather aromas. It feels good, with an easy, mature flow and light flavors of dried fruit, spice, pepper and vanilla. Lengthy, it features tobacco and toast flavors on the finish. Drink now.",Conde de los Andes Gran Reserva,Federico Paternina
"The best wine in the current Corvus lineup, this opens with a fresh boysenberry scent and flavor, leading to a darker core of cassis and black cherry. Whiffs of smoke and a streak of graphite create added interest through the midpalate.",,Corvus
"Berry and dark plum aromas accompany tobacco, spice and baking spice notes. This feels mostly fresh and vital, with drying tannins and a firm build. It tastes deep and earthy, with berry and herb notes and flavors of coffee and black tea. It turns peppery and chocolaty on the finish.",Crianza Selected Harvest,de Restia
"Big, smoky and charred, with a rubbery blackberry note lurking in the background, it feels chewy, thick and dense, with a roasted black-fruit flavor, a baking spice note and a toasted, rooty aftertaste that suggests root beer.",Cosme Palacio Vendimia Seleccionada,Bodegas Palacio
"Caparzo delivers a killer Rosso di Montalcino from one of the most anticipated vintages of the past 10 years. It is intense and clean, with polished berry aromas of black cherry and red currant that are backed by savory spice and leather.",,Caparzo
"The vineyard is on the Napa side of Carneros, and the wine shows ripe flavors of blackberry and black currant, with sweet vanilla and toast from new oak barrels. It's a dry wine that gives the impression of sweetness, and might benefit from a few years in the cellar.",,Truchard
"A mix of Cabernet and Merlot, with small amounts of four other grapes, this is a soft red, with red and black fruit flavors. It's smooth and accessible, offering plenty of cocoa and sweet baking spice notes.",Proprietary Red,Swiftwater Cellars
"Hints of smoke and roasted nut add a savory tone to the zesty lemon and pear flavors on this structured Chardonnay. Lusciously textured, with a touch of lemon curd and zingy tangerine acidity, it's a powerful wine with a long finish.",,Sutor
"Another good bubbly from Sonim, this red-colored sparkler is dry on the nose, with cherry and cassis aromas. It feels round and full as it shows off bright raspberry and plum flavors in front of a healthy, smooth finish. Much darker in color than most rosé Cavas.",Brut Rosé,Sonim
"This is punchy and full of potent black-fruit aromas that turn jammy upon airing. It feels lush, thick and chewy, with ripe, dense berry flavors that come with plenty of young oak. Creamy in feel, it features vanilla and resin flavors on the finish. Modern and chunky in style.",Halo de Secreto,Viña Mayor
"Showing sweet toasty oak, brisk acidity and pure flavors of citrus fruit and apricot, this is a very rich, dry Chardonnay, although all of its parts haven't quite come together. While it's not an ager, it will benefit from holding until mid-2013, but not any longer.",Horseshoe Bend Vineyard,Occidental Road Cellars
"This dry Pinot Gris is lightly smoky, with fine acidity and rich, spicy fruit. It has a dense texture and full mouthfeel, with a concentrated finish that's marked by passion fruit and lychee notes.",Tradition,Domaine Schoffit
"There is some steeliness here, with a great burst of white currant, fragrant apple and a twist of lemon. This is crisp and fruity. Screwcap.",,Domaine Zinck
"A blend of Pinot Noir, Chardonnay and Pinot Blanc, this is a delicious, apple-flavored wine. It's fruity, very crisp and fresh, with an orange zest edge and lively mousse. It's a fine apéritif sparkler.",Brut,Domaine Zinck
"White peach and flower petal notes on the nose gain rich honeydew and fresh herb flavors on the palate of this refreshing, concentrated Malvasia. Bright acidity and a lovely saline touch keep the finish brisk and balanced.",,Coronica
"Off-dry, this succulent wine has you smacking your lips rather than puckering them. The natural acidity buoys up the sweet fruit, a mix of peach and apricot principally, and the wine has an excellent focused core that trails off into suggestions of honeycomb and lemon custard.",Estate Grown,Girardet
"This wine presents an old-fashioned style, marked by hard, numbing tannins that frame ripe flavors of blackberries, licorice, cherries, mocha and black currants. Hard to tell where it's going beyond the next six years, but give it a proper decanting and drink with roasted or grilled meats.",Estate Grown,Grgich Hills
"The most forward of Cristom's 2009 single-vineyard Pinots, this shows flavors of strawberry preserves and candied orange, suggestive of marmalade. It has a streak of root beer and pleasing spice, with a quick finish.",Marjorie Vineyard,Cristom
"Chewy, rich and dense, this is redolent of ripe blackberry, plum, prune and moist pipe tobacco. There's also a pretty floral tone that gives the wine an almost feminine personality. It's tight and firmly structured as well.",Aldiano Riserva,Cantina Tollo
"This is a full-bodied wine that belies the notion that Oregon always makes a sleeker style of Chardonnay. Here are ripe, round flavors of peach and mango, wrapped in naturally vivid acidity, with a warming sensation in the finish. Best enjoyed soon, while fresh and young.",Dijon 76 Estate,Carabella
"Sharp, tart and focused, this bright and well-defined wine offers raspberry and black cherry fruit flavors with some bite on the back end. It shows good concentration and length, with the depth and polish to age nicely for a decade or more.",Olalla Vineyard,Torii Mor
This top-shelf wine from Umani Ronchi has shown great improvement over the past two or three years. There's a rich layer of chocolate and ripe cherry that gives this red blend extra lift and intensity.,Cúmaro Riserva,Umani Ronchi
"Cabernet specialist Venge brings its vision of big, bold wines to Chardonnay, with mixed results. The wine is huge and fruity, with massive pineapple, pear, crème brûlée, buttered toast, caramel and vanilla spice flavors, in which oak obviously plays a part. Yet it's almost too much of a good thing. It earns its high score for sheer power, but you find yourself wanting greater subtlely and finesse.",Maldonado Vineyard,Venge
"Tre Saggi, or three wise men, is a terrific wine at a realistic price. This luscious vintage shows bright fruit nuances of black cherry and currant backed by soft, oak-inspired aromas of spice, leather and tobacco.",Tre Saggi,Talamonti
"Shows the fantastic power and extracted fruit that this vineyard is famous for. Just massive in apricots, tangerines and pears, it's enriched with sweet smoky oak, which adds vanilla bean and buttered toast to the richness. Fortunately, brisk acidity and minerality provide balance.",Logan Sleepy Hollow Vineyard Estate Grown,Talbott
"This grand wine, with its heavy consistency, tannic backbone and aromatic intensity, should pair well with aged cheeses or grilled red meat. The elegant bouquet opens with thick black fruit, crushed stone, asphalt and dried tobacco. The mouthfeel is equally huge and bold.",,Tenuta del Portale
"Supple and muscular, with appealing bacon fat aromas, this round and spicy effort. A tightness in the midpalate suggests that further bottle age is in order.",Domaine Danielle Laurent,Soléna
"A finely balanced wine that combines rich red fruit flavors with acidity, a slight tang from the spirit and a feeling of warmth and roundness. It finishes with an almond note and fresh acidity.",10 Years Old Tawny,Niepoort
"Dense, dusty tannins show the concentration of this wine from the southwest region of Armagnac. The wine has power and a solid, chunky character. Dark plum, cranberry and wood flavors combine well.",L'Empreinte de Saint-Mont,Producteurs Plaimont
"A serious, structured wine that packs a punch of black-cherry and spice flavors, with edges of wood and fine acidity. This is full of ripe fruit, and the tannins take on a supporting role of tension and power.",Quartilho,Quinta do Casal Branco
"It's classic Alexander Valley, soft, rich and thick in melted tannins, and elaborate in tiers of briary wild berries, milk chocolate, black pepper and sweet charred oak. Easy to drink with everything from burgers and steaks to tacos and teriaki beef.",Family,Sausal
"High in alcohol, but Rockpile Zins wear it well. The peppery heat is perfectly in keeping with the variety's briary, brambly personality. Enjoy the wild blackberry, spice and dark chocolate flavors now for maximum freshness.",Rockpile Ridge Vineyard,Mauritson
"Cedarville takes a lot of pride in its Cab, and this definitely screams mightily of its mountain, granite-soiled origins, with a rich mouthfeel and rocky minerality. Fully fruity, though restrained, this Cab has plenty of leathery plushness in the midpalate ending with a finale of dense, dark chocolate.",Estate,Cedarville Vineyard
"An early freeze shut down the vineyards in 2009, and produced wines that are less immediately generous than the ripe, fruit-driven 2008s. The vanilla wafer aromas from barrel aging show prominently here, with the wild berry fruit being tart and so compact as to be almost invisible at first. But patience is rewarded, as the wine fills in gracefully with nuanced notes of herb and dried leaf, as well as balanced acids.",Jerusalem Hill,Domaine Serene
"Full and wood-aged, this wine is smoothly textured. It's ripe and spicy, with apricot fruit and some minerality. Rich and worth aging for 2_3 years.",,Clos des Terrasses
"Perhaps because of its slow, natural fermentation in large casks and the resulting lees contact, this wine shows a bit of toasty, mealy character and a slightly creamy texture. It's a weighty Riesling (for the Mosel, anyway), with ripe notes of peach complementing citrus fruit and a dry, stony finish.",Steinreich Trocken,Ansgar Clüsserath
"This clean and leesy Chardonnay was fermented half in stainless, half in neutral oak. Its flavors are apple, melon and celery, with a lightly beery, textural mouthfeel that refreshes and lingers. Just a hint of toast comes up on the finish.",Estate,Blakeslee
"Piercing on the nose, with aromas of cola, graphite, juniper and blackberry. Feels thick, with meaty flavors of blackberry, boysenberry, herb and flower notes. Layered and relatively long on the finish. Impressive for under-$20 Chilean Syrah, with complexity and sauvage notes.",Terroir Selection Gran Reserva,Casas del Toqui
"This has the classic flavors of many Oregon Pinot Noirs, a balanced mix of tangy red fruits, mineral, earth and more than a hint of stem. It's full bodied and detailed, with excellent balance, weaving threads of site and grape into a complex finish.",Reserve,Kudos
"This is a softly appealing single-vineyard wine to drink now. It shows fine Napa Valley structure, with gentle tannins and cleansing acidity framing cherry, sandalwood and sweet tobacco flavors. With such elegance, it will be a fine partner to steak.",Two Fourteen,Lang & Reed
"From four acclaimed Mendocino County vineyards, Winemaker Jon Grant's Straight Line Pinot is heftier than his single-vineyard bottlings from sister label Couloir. A dense style of Pinot, this has smoke and oak to it, plenty of strawberry and plum, its tannins not resolved, yet it still exhibits a lush fullness and well-rounded elegance.",,Straight Line
"Tre Saggi is steadily becoming a representative wine for the Abruzzo region in central Italy. It shows loads of ripe fruit and blackberry, with shadings of spice and leather. That tight, bitter close would pair with succulent grilled meats.",Tre Saggi,Talamonti
"A perfumed, floral white, its citrus character is laced with flavors of apricot and green plums. This is a summer day's wine with a cool, refreshing feel to its smooth and ripe texture.",Tiara,Niepoort
"An excellent pizza or pasta wine, San Lorenzo delivers soft tones of black cherry and chocolate, backed by crisp acidity and a well structured mouthfeel.",San Lorenzo,Umani Ronchi
"The 2009 DTR Syrah won't be available until 2013 and is appropriately still tight, waiting to resolve itself into the superbly structured, bone-dry, savory wine it will become. There's a lot of minerality lurking between walls of black fruit and white pepper spice.",DTR Ranch,Terre Rouge
"Bubblegum aromas send this wine in a candied direction. It is soft, not quite dry, with ripe strawberry flavors. It tastes confected although the acidity at the end does keep it fresh.",Prestige,Château de Lardiley
"Floral aromas of lychee are indicative of basic Moscatel. This feels soft, with no angles or aggressiveness. Pithy, green-leaning flavors of lychee and lettuce finish with lychee notes and lasting sweetness.",Marina Alta Gran Selección Blanco,Bocopa
"This wine smells yeasty, a character that follows through on the palate. It is soft and round, conveying ripe red fruits without freshness. It reveals bitter acidity at the end.",,Château Recougne
"A blend of Riesling and Muscat with a pinch of Gewürztraminer, this wine offers vibrant aromas of orange peel, fresh flowers, spice and jasmine that don't entirely meld. It drinks dry with light concentration and a slightly bitter finish.",Auntie Meredith's Picnic Blend,Kennedy Shah
"This wine's fruitiness comes from stalky black currant flavors that have a green edge. It shows tannins, bitter chocolate and considerable acidity.",Château Maison Blanche,Maison Bouey
"This is a soft wine, fruity without great definition. A ripe, red fruit character contrasts with a bitter acidity. It is ready to drink. The blend is 50/50 Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon.",,Château Taussin
"This offers smoky, toasted oak and herb aromas, full candied cherry and plum flavors, low acidity and fairly firm tannins.",,Table No. 7
"This is a green, lean and somewhat sour wine, with an herbal personality that lies atop a world of smooth tannins.",,Rutherford Hill
"This smells a lot like mustard, with short, bitter flavors of red apple skins. Sweet touches of caramel and cocoa can be found on the finish.",Rosat,Garbó
"Leather, mint and wet-dog aromas along with an overriding burn drive the nose toward a resiny, raw palate with snappy acidity and lots of oak. Buttery as well as briny red-fruit flavors are salty and taste mostly of wood resin.",Cachito Mio,La Casa Maguila
"This bright, pink-colored wine is full of caramel and vanilla flavors that give a fat, dull character to the taste. It is dry, touched by bitter almonds and with a sharp aftertaste of acidity.",,Les Hauts de Lagarde
"Baked pear and ripe tropical guava and papaya muddle their way between high-toned aspects of lemon and sheer acidity, which veers into sour territory on the finish. The dueling personalities give this wine a sense of imbalance.",,Stephen Vincent
"A disappointing effort from a normally reliable producer, this wine shows entirely too many rubbery, chemical aromas and flavors. Some decent strawberry and citrus fruit peeks through on the finish, so it may be worth decanting and seeing if that helps.",Réserve Grand Veneur,Alain Jaume et Fils
There is a rosé here struggling to get out. This wine has strawberry fruits combined with tannins in a way that does not work. Bordeaux Clairet lies between rosé and red in color and in taste.,,Château de Marsan
The wine is neither very fruity nor fresh. It is clean with a crisp aftertaste although the character or the interest are not there.,Le Rosé de Floridène,Clos Floridène
"Gritty aromas of raisin and dusty earth are jumbled. This has a heavy, somewhat awkward palate, while raisiny flavors finish chunky, candied and slightly bitter.",Selección Braille,Valdelana
"Diluted and ultrasimple, this delivers weak sensations of cooked black-skinned fruit. It's already tired and has an extremely short finish.",,Fattoria il Palagio
"A rather flat nose with just a hint of pear leads to a rather dilute, incongruous palate where the chief marker is unbalanced acidity.",Windspiel,Fritsch
Aromas of pear and yellow apple are at the fore. It drinks off dry with full feel. There's enjoyment to be had but the varietal is hard to discern.,Shorebird Conner Lee Vineyard,Westport Winery
"Vanilla, apple juice and banana aromas comprise the nose on this flat feeling, sugary tasting Cava that claims to be __ry_ but tastes anything but. Flavors of ripe banana, vanilla and papaya taste like powdered sugar on the finish.",Bubbles by Lobetia,Dominio de Punctum
"Smoky, with traces of cherry and vanilla, this is a heavily tannic version of the variety, seemingly aged in full-strength oak. Aromas are elusive and the finish brief.",,Ghost Pines
"Bready, stalky aromas run low on fruit while showing odd, unwelcome scents of peanut and sulfur. Gaseous, mealy flavors of yeasty citrus fruits finish heavy, with an oxidized quality.",Brut,Clos La Soleya
"A soft, simple wine without great character, this is soft, gently fruity and ready to drink.",,Château Haut Bessac
"Juicy fruit aromas lead to a palate conveying tangy flavors and mandarin zest. This is a fruity wine that is not quite balanced, and likely to remain with fruit and texture out of kilter.",Prestige,Château de Lardiley
"An extremely rich texture, like pear juice, and sweet flavors of ripe pear, peach and pineapple give this wine a big personality. It has no apparent crispness to balance it out and keep it lively. All that sweetness and richness suggest a good pairing with salty cheeses.",,401K
"Loamy, earthy aromas of raspberry and raisin fall flat as this breathes. A heavy palate is low on freshness and acidity, while prune, cherry and cassis flavors veer toward raisin on a finish that quickly loses clarity and snap.",,Ressò
"Funky earth and a diluted body make for a generic experience with this wine, which simultaneously offers a large tannin profile plus a weedy, dried herb component.",,Robert Goyette
"Juicy blueberry and ripe blackberry dominate nose and palate on this easy-drinking, fresh-faced and fruit-forward red. The tannins are barely there and while the body boasts ample fruit, there is no heaviness. This is Zweigelt as it's meant to be: fun!",,Salzl Seewinkelhof
"Watery, candied aromas of fruit salad are bland. This has a chunky, low-acid feel and modest flavors of melon and green herbs. Green melon and lettuce notes carry the finish.",Javier San Pedro,Vallobera
"Mostly Sangiovese, this wine appears to have seen some oxygen exposure that interferes with its blue fruit and herb aromas. It drinks quite sweet with a mixture of chocolate and cherry flavors.",Smoky Nor'wester Red Willow Vineyard,Westport Winery
"Spicy berry, chocolate and bitter greens are in play, though slightly muted. The components smooth out and surf into a broad, easygoing finish. Drink up.",Hyland Vineyard Reserve,City Winery of New York
"This appellation blend shows buttered toast with lemon marmalade on the nose, with a growing sense of tropicality. The palate is plush and smoky, with vanilla and cream flavors cut by just enough citrusy tang to keep it serious.",,Comartin
Jammy aromas of blackberry and cassis start out gaseous and muddled but find their way with airing. This feels wide and low on zest. Flavors of prune and stewed berry end with toasty oak but also heavy ripe prune and berry flavors. Drink now.,Baltos,Dominio de Tares
"In this gold-colored wine, green-apple skin and nutmeg-ginger spice wrap around a full-bodied build, with a preponderance of ripe peach within its makeup too. Decadent, and nutty from the oak, it brings a fulsomeness of crème brûlée to the finish.",Barrel Fermented,Eco Terreno
"Stalky aromas of leathery berry fruits suggest animal and earth. This is raw, tannic and hard on the palate, with saucy berry flavors that fall off towards stalky and stewy. A dense tannic finish is structured but tastes herbal and stalky.",Prodigo Reserva,El Hijo
"This ripe, stylish and attractively textured nonvintage has plenty of fruit, apples and citrus dominating. A mineral, tight acidity gives the wine a crisp, crunchy character.",Premier Cru Brut,Forget-Brimont
"Showing the heat of the vintage, this opens with aromas of stewed fruit, scorched earth and a whiff of nail varnish that carry over to the extracted palate along with fleshy black cherry. A green note of powdered sage closes the finish. Drink 2018_2026.",Panerole,Franco Conterno
"This medium-bodied red offers aromas of stewed black-skinned fruit, pressed blue flower, menthol and clove. On the forward, chewy palate, notes of licorice and ground pepper accent a black cherry core while fine-grained tannins provide the framework. Drink through 2019.",Come un volo,Gabriele Scaglione
"Exotic, warming spices like turmeric, saffron and coriander seem to accent this sweet-savory Riesling. The palate is citrusy and bright, calibrating sunny tangerines and orange peels against a backdrop of stark lemony acidity. The finish is brisk and clean.",Spätlese,Heinz Eifel
"Heady notes of gingerbread and molasses mix with concentrated pomegranate, raspberry and slate on this pleasant nose. The palate tightens around iron and graphite with a dense hibiscus and pomegranate fruit character.",,Inception
"Ripe blackberry, wild herb, menthol and a whiff of exotic spice lead the nose. The dense, full-bodied palate offers dried black cherry, vanilla, toast and espresso alongside the warmth of alcohol and round tannins.",La Castella,La Fusina
"This is a dense wine with firm tannins and a solid structure. The black currant fruits are stalky and still developing, along with the acidity. It's a lean wine and needs to age for a few more months to fill out, so drink from 2017.",Maria Mora,Magnum Vinhos
"Balsamic notes, leather, menthol and red berry aromas take center stage. On the firm palate, tightly wound tannins frame black cherry and a hint of anise. Give this another year or two to unfold then drink up.",,Monpissan
"Earthy rooty aromas of aged dry berry fruits and tobacco are scratchy while hinting at complexity. In the mouth, this Gran Reserva is drawing and tight. Herbal raspberry and dried cherry flavors finish with raw tannins and oaky vanilla flavors. Drink now through 2020.",Gran Reserva,Montecillo
"Produced as a wine that is ready to drink young, this comes from the 100-year old Mouchão winery. It is fresh with red fruits along with a dry structure, although it is the fruits that win out. Fresh and bright, it will be ready to drink from 2017.",Dom Rafael,Mouchão
"This is an eclectic collection of white Rhône varieties, beginning with equal parts Roussanne and Viognier, supported by Grenache Blanc, Picpoul Blanc and Marsanne. A combination of honey and dried apricot are the standouts, aligned with a lilt of fresh peach and salty caramel.",Verah,Mounts
"Vivid aromas and flavors of apricot define this blend of seven white varieties as something different, tangy and delicious. While very fruity in flavor, the wine remains dry, and an ever-so-slight bitterness adds an appetizing snap.",The Whip,Murrieta's Well
"Floral scents float above a chunky, cherry-fruited, single-vineyard wine. It's quite refreshing, with appealing texture and underlying minerality that compensates for the overall impression of palate lightness. Drink now through 2018, while the freshness remains at its peak.",Kalita Vineyard,Panther Creek
"Dried red raspberry and pomegranate fruits mix with a persistent leathery character and spicy nutmeg on the nose of this wine. Cranberries and cooked berries show on the tart palate, which is driven by graphite, minerals and slightly chunky tannins.",,Pianetta
"This is open and generous, a soft wine that will be ready to drink soon. It still has some firm structure although that serves as a support to the blackberry fruit flavors. The aftertaste is juicy and fresh.",Coroa d'Ouro,Poças
"A wood- aged wine that is ripe and smooth. It has only the barest hint of toastiness, the wood serving more to fill out the rich fruitiness. It does need to age, so drink from 2017.",Reserva Branco,Poças
"Stewed plums and strawberries partner with lilacs, sagebrush and hard cinnamon candy on the nose of this bottling, which is boosted by 12% Grenache, 7% Syrah and 6% Petite Sirah. Juicy, rich cherry and blueberry flavors meet with a rocky, black-slate character on the palate.",Willow Creek Farm,Proulx
"A ripe and juicy wine, this is rich with black fruits. Soft tannins and a stalky backdrop make it very approachable when young. So drink this full fruity wine now.",Pinto,Quinta do Pinto
"Aromas of dark berry, cooking spice, chopped herb and a whiff of violet lead the nose. The racy palate offers sour cherry, cranberry, espresso and sage alongside brisk acidity and close-grained tannins. A hint of clove closes the finish.",Sagrin,Raineri Gianmatteo
"This new cuvée takes its name from the fermentation practice of mixing whole berries with grape-cluster stalks__ust stalks, not whole clusters. Herbs and pine needle flavors dominate brambly berry fruit. It's quite young and raw, and will benefit from further bottle age.",The Stalker,Roco
"The winery's entry-level bottling, this offers turned earth, juniper, cola and ripe red cherries on the nose. The cherries carry to the palate, where they meet with tangy cranberries, oregano-thyme herbs and grippy plum skin tannins that last into a solid finish.",,Rusack
"Richly intense, this wine wraps thick textures of caramel and toffee around tropical mango. The full body celebrates ripeness while finding enough restraint.",Baker Ridge Vineyard Estate,Thomas George
"Sunny yellow peaches, apples and nuts perfume this bright lemon-fresh Weissburgunder, or Pinot Blanc. A whisper of herbs lends savoriness to crisp apple, pear and citrus flavors on the palate. It's a straightforward yet refreshing and elegant wine.",Trocken,Thörle
This easy-to-enjoy wine from the family of Silver Oak has lots of vanilla and fruit flavors and a broad but soft mouthfeel. Hints of cinnamon and red cherries come out on the palate and linger on the finish.,,Twomey
"Still tightly wound, this pure varietal wine spent 15 months in one-third new oak. Waxy plum fruit is supported with plenty of acidity and a hint of leather. The wine is young and fresh, with some years of development ahead.",,Upper Five
"Produced from four vineyards throughout the valley, this Cabernet shows the art of the blend. It's softly tannic and frankly delicious, with dazzlingly rich blackberry, cassis liqueur, anise and mineral flavors. Hard to describe how attractive this wine is now.",Four Soil Melange,Sequum
"Essenz is the style of wine given to sick emperors as the ultimate medicine. It certainly has a life-giving character, the distillation of noble rot berries, honeyed and intensely texture. The wine has a pure feel, sustained by final acidity. Drink now or age for many years.",Saziani Essenz Trockenbeerenauslese,Neumeister
"This is McCrea's top cuvée, and the 2008 is as good as it has ever been. Co-fermented with 8% Viognier, it starts out tight and compact, with crisp marionberry fruit and a generous wash of coffee liqueur. The acids are citrusy and fresh, and the wine has depth and an emotional range that reaches almost symphonic power.",Cuvée Orleans,McCrea Cellars
"This precisely crafted wine lifts Carneros Chardonnay to a whole new level. Yes, it's pricey, but so complex and decadent, it's worth it. The alcohol is refreshingly low, the acidity is bright, and there's a lick of steel to balance the nectarine and mango fruit, buttered-toast and cream flavors.",Hudson Vineyard,Failla
"The Dijon clones (667 and 777) used in this wine yield unusually pure, intensely clean flavors of raspberries, cherries and anise, at a moderate alcohol level. The vineyard location and cool vintage must have contributed to the acidic bite. It's a very fine wine__legant and noble__ut immature. You'll want to cellar it for 5_6 years to allow it to show its stuff.",Hallberg Vineyard-Dijon Clones,Gary Farrell
"This wine is unabashedly forward with sweet, juicy, stonefruit intensity, yet remarkably composed. Delicately structured, it's anchored with piercing citrus acidity and a bristle of crushed-stone and slate minerality on the finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Classic Howell Mountain Cabernet. The fruit is intense and concentrated in black currants and cocoa, the tannins are strong and hard, the acidity is perfect, the finish is entirely dry, and there's a firm minerality. So deliciously elegant now, it's hard to resist, but this Cab will surely reward cellaring through at least 2017.",,Bjorn
"This wine was made from very specific Pinot Noir clones planted in a small block of the estate vineyard. It's exceptionally ripe with raspberry and cherry flavors, and plenty of new oak. A big wine, it's dark in color and impressive in weight, yet maintains a complex lightness of being. Drink now_2017.",Chico's Run Doña Margarita Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"A precise, detailed and thoroughly exemplary Viognier. It's both thick and racy, loaded with ripe, rich tree fruits, with lemon drop citrus and a lick of lightly honeyed butterscotch. Luscious and lingering.",Elerding Vineyard,Stottle
"This inky, jammy smelling Toro is overflowing with blackberry and blueberry aromas. In the mouth, grabby tannins rise up with power, creating a rugged mouthfeel. Flavors of blackberry, charred oak, burnt meat and blackened spices finish dark, toasty, peppery and slightly bitter. Talk about a serious Toro with massive flavors and pounding tannins; drink from 2014 through 2019.",Victorino,Teso La Monja
"Any warm California region can ripen fruit to this degree, resulting in blackberry, cassis and chocolate flavors. But Napa's special magic concerns the wine's structure. Here, you'll find fantastically firm tannins and quite a bit of acidity. Both give the wine the architecture to house all the richness. Drink now, after decanting, and over the next 10 years.",Estate,St. Supéry
"This is a lovely Pinot Noir, with a translucent ruby color. It's dry, delicately structured, moderate in alcohol and complex. The cherry, pomegranate and persimmon flavors have a pleasant tea-like bitterness, along with earthy notes of mushrooms and sweet wild herbs. At this price, it's one of the greatest bargains on the market. Unfortunately, only 800 cases are in circulation.",,Reaper
"There's a delicacy to this Pinot that makes it a welcome alternative to the big, clumsy style. The color is translucent, and the alcohol is relatively low, giving it a nice, bouncy mouthfeel. The depth of flavor is impressive, suggesting ripe forest raspberries and cherries, and a hint of mushrooms. It would be a pity to drink this wine before 2017.",Jensen Vineyard,Calera
"Fantastic fruit, tantalizing acidity and overall balance mark this Pinot. It's ripe with cherries, pomegranates, rhubarb and persimmons, while plentiful new oak is perfectly in keeping with the underlying power. Drink now, after proper decanting, or age over the next 5_15 years, as it gradually reveals different sides of itself.",Rochioli Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"This is 100% varietal Merlot, aged 15 months in new and neutral French oak barrels and botti. It's tangy, sleek and supple, with a spectrum of fruit from cranberry on through blackberry. Tannins are polished and mouth-coating, with substantial power. The finish brings hints of herbs and black olives.",,Leonetti Cellar
"This is a very expensive Cabernet, but it also tastes dramatic and powerful. The chocolate, blackberry, currant and oak flavors are massive, while the tannin-acid structure is just about perfect. Feels as lush as California Cab gets, but never loses integrity or balance. Should age well for the next 10 years.",,Linked
"The XY Reserve from Stevens is the best of an outstanding lineup of cellar-worthy, Yakima Valley red wines. Both elegant and powerful, it opens with a well-finessed bouquet of funk, fruit and flowers. The mid-palate brings compact black fruits, beautifully-structured with firm acids and fine tannins. This may be decanted and enjoyed immediately, or cellared indefinitely.",XY Reserve,Stevens
"Kudos to vintner Eddy for holding this back for nearly six years. It's still fresh, with rich blackberry, cherry, mocha and oak flavors. The tannins are gorgeous, and the acids are soft enough to permit drinking now. Good as it is, all indications are that it will evolve in bottle complexity. Hold until 2018.",,Tom Eddy
"Extraordinarily rich, ripe and flashy, this is a delicious wine to drink now, although it has the tannic structure to age. It's softly approachable with black cherry, mocha and sweet oak, with exceptional purity and refinement. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc. Will continue to evolve positively over the next 5_6 years.",Alliance,Capture
"A powerful, wood-aged rosé that shows great richness, density and structure. Treat this as a fine wine and you'll appreciate the texture, the mature berry fruits, the spice and vanilla flavors. Weighty and full in the mouth, this could even age well for another year or two.",Garrus,Château d'Esclans
"As in the past, Leonetti's 2010 Sangiovese was co-fermented with Syrah (11%), and sourced from Seven Hills, Pepper Bridge and Mill Creek Upland vineyards. It's flat-out delicious from the first scents of barrels and fruits, right on through a lush palate rich in flavors of berries, rum-soaked cherries and exotic spices. A long finish, with a smoky/earthy cast, is supported with tart acids.",,Leonetti Cellar
"An awesomely rich Pinot Noir, this is a big wine that's darkly colored and intensely layered with raspberry, chocolate, spice and mushroom notes. Lots of new oak shows up, but it's balanced against the wine's power. Delicious now, but should reward aging over the next eight years.",Stony Block Don Miguel Vineyard Unfiltered,Marimar Estate
"This is a marvelous wine, both elegant and complex, with intriguing scents of bacon, butter and chocolate woven around rich cherry fruit. The fine tannins and overall balance proceed through a lingering finish that carries a pleasing suggestion of well-tanned leather.",Old School Vineyards,King Estate
"The Chardonnays from this Farrell bottling are always very fine and among the most consistent across vintages. The 2010 shows ripe, concentrated tropical fruit and green-apple flavors, brightened with crisp, Russian River acidity. Deft, firm and delicious, it will provide great Chardonnay pleasure over the next 4_5 years.",Rochioli-Allen Vineyards,Gary Farrell
"As Chilean Carmenère goes, this is one of the best and most true to the grape. Dusty, dry, earthy aromas of spiced berry, herbs and cocoa lead to a lofty palate with both creamy oak and driving acids. Oak-related flavors of vanilla and coconut sit on top of spicy, baked berry flavors, while the finish is full, woody, creamy and dense. Drink this excellent Carmenère now through 2017.",Herencia,Santa Carolina
"Tough and gritty, with hard tannins, this is definitely astringent and dry, but it does show classic Napa character. Blended with Cabernet Franc and Merlot, it's rich in blackberry, black cherry, currant and dark chocolate flavors that finish long. It would be a mistake to drink this wine too young. Cellar it until 2018, and it should provide mature beauty well beyond.",,Redmon
"At nearly seven years in age, this 100% Cabernet is still offering ripe, fresh blackberry, cassis liqueur, dark chocolate and oak flavors. It feels young, with firm, hard tannins, but very fine and complex. Just at the beginning of its journey, it will easily reward further cellaring. Hold until 2015, at the very least.",Meteor Vineyard,Tom Eddy
"Enormously concentrated in blackberry and cherry llqueur and currant flavors, wrapped into hard tannins, this is a classic Von Strasser Cabernet. Hard to describe the richness except to say that few Cabs are this potent. Yet the wine is thoroughly dry, and the balance is exceptional. Needs plenty of time. Best after 2019.",Post Vineyard,Von Strasser
"This is a big, vital, dramatic Pinot Noir that shows its fine terroir with enormously concentrated raspberry and cherry fruit, balanced by fine acidity, subtle tannins and a bite of cherry-pit bitterness. It's a great wine that will benefit from 6_8 years in the cellar.",Quail Hill Vineyard Block 10,Lynmar
"The Boushey cuvée_100% varietal__eally delivers the goods. Cassis and blueberry, cherry and plum, high acidity and nuanced notes of toasted nuts, graphite and smoked meats are all in play. Complex and balanced, it's a delicious bottle right now, but could certainly age at least another five years.",Boushey Grande Côte Vineyard,McCrea Cellars
"The blend includes a half-dozen grapes, principally Mourvèdre and Syrah. It tastes muted, as if the mélange of fruit sources more or less cancelled each other out. It's a quaffable, generic red with orange peel highlights and tart acidity.",Virga,Convergence Zone
"Unusually aromatic with notes of preserved cherries and plums accented with honey and brine, this is a rich, slightly rustic example of Cabernet Franc. The palate is ruddy with flavors of dried cherry and fruit compote wrapped in layers of grippy, coarse tannins. Finishes with a touch of spice. Drink now.",,Shalestone
"A straightforward, nicely priced wine offering mid-weight texture amidst grapefruit, lime and peach flavors and aromas. It's an easy-to-like quaffer for summertime or to enjoy before meals.",,St. Francis
"Juicy and dense in blackberry fruit, it offers lingering notes of cedar and cassis with a lingering finish of wood.",,Pangloss Cellars
"Floral aromas are airy and fun. This is lean, bright and high in acid. Flavors of stony lime and white pineapple finish minerally and fresh, with a light, long, acid-driven finish.",Blanc de Pacs Organic Farming Parellada-Xarello-Macabeu,Parés Balt_
"This funky white from the island of Mallorca is 50% Premsal and 50% Callet, and if you've never heard of those grapes you're not alone. The nose is a bit harsh and strange, while the palate is on the flat side. Flavors of ham, pithy citrus and nectarine finish jumbled. This is more of a unique oddity than great white wine.",Quíbia Falanis,_nima Negra
"Here's a light, sweet and aromatic pink wine with a definite Moscato flavor. A slight spritz and welcome acidity keep the texture lively, and the floral, candylike flavors last on the finish. Should go well with appetizers or dessert.",,Barefoot Refresh
"John Shaw and Lisa Cuevas Shaw run this boutique-sized, Bordeaux-minded winery, which offers this Sauvignon Blanc alongside their higher priced reds. This wine starts with lemongrass, crushed rock and white flower aromas, then indulges in some tropical guava on the palate, which is very soft and full.",,Alma Sol
"Cherry, spicebox, pepper and some vegetal aromas are followed by flavors of blueberry, toast and cherry. This is an approachable Greek red with bright fruit and good acidity. A spicy finish adds to the appeal. Pair with game and pork.",Hedgehog Vineyard,Alpha Estate
"A hint of nail polish or paint thinner prevents this wine from scoring higher. It's full-bodied, with ample dark fruit, but that slight off note strips some of the texture from the midpalate. The finish is warm, with a hint of black licorice.",Cuvée Réservée,Château de Ségriès
"A deeply golden Chardonnay from E & J Gallo's Edna Valley brand, this wine starts with a tightly wound nose, faintly offering tart apple, lemon rind and a slight herbal character. An elegant but brief flavor of perfumed pear washes away quickly without much finish.",Fleur de Edna,Edna Valley Vineyard
"Barrel flavors of toast and chocolate cover light strawberry fruit. It's pleasant enough, but the flavors have not yet jelled. Give it until 2016 to age.",Red Willow Vineyard,Eight Bells
"This Aglianico opens with aromas of new oak, vanilla, chocolate and overripe black fruit, all of which carry over to the one-dimensional palate. It seems tired, and the sugary sweetness, dense concentration and evident alcohol give the wine a lumbering character.",Terre di Rivolta Riserva,Fattoria La Rivolta
"With rubbery, smoky aromas and mild berry scents, this light-framed Tempranillo is bright on the palate and easy to quaff. Berry, plum and a touch of bitter chocolate are the flavors.",Ayrum,Felix Solis
"Waxy white florals perfume fresh lemons and apples on this dry Pinot Grigio. It's not deeply concentrated with fruit flavor, but the rich mouthfeel is balanced nicely with streaks of zippy lime and lemon acidity.",,Goose Watch
"A fresh and fruity nose of lemon, white flowers and peach give this Assytriko a more feminine edge. On the palate, it's smooth but spicy, with lemon blossom and brine dancing on the palate. Good and easy to drink.",,Greek Wine Cellars
"Mild, innocuous aromas of white fruits are pleasant but undefined. This feels round and benefits from acidic lift, while flavors of orange and nectarine finish in a friendly manner. This is mostly Viura with some Verdejo and Sauvignon Blanc.",Blanco,Hedonismo
"Ripe, fruity while also rich, this is a soft wine that's developing quickly. It has some smokiness, gentle tannins and a juicy texture. Drink this already easy wine from 2015.",Les Champs Claude,Henri de Villamont
"Fermented and aged in stainless steel, this single-vineyard wine brings notes of yellow apple and lees accented by tart acidity. While it provides some interest, it doesn't seem like all of the pieces have quite come together.",Celilo Vineyard,Jacob Williams
"This gentle, ripe wine is immediately attractive. Ripe pear and peach are cut with acidity. Drink now.",Domaine des Chanzelles,Jean-Marie Challand
"Freshly pressed apples and pears are touched with honey on this juicy medium-sweet Riesling. Brisk, brash lemony acidity jolts the midpalate, extending to a sweet kiss of peach on the finish. Refreshing and quaffable.",Semi Sweet,Keuka Spring
"This unassuming red mixes six grapes together, with Tempranillo and Sangiovese comprising almost two-thirds of the blend. Nicely spicy and balanced, it has enough substance for the transition from late summer to early fall meals, and could carry into November-centric holiday meals as well.",,Lone Birch
"Fresh, light and fruity with attractive red fruits and soft tannins, it's ready to drink. The aftertaste is fresh and fruity.",,Louis Latour
This fruity wine features strawberry and bitter cherry flavors. A lightly tannic structure accompanies a very fragrant and smoky character. Wood shows through at the end. Drink from 2015.,Réserve,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Spritzy, lively and quite dry, this mixes citrus rind phenolics with apple and pear fruit. It's simple, fruity and searingly tart.",,Buddha Kat
"This Aglianico opens with aromas of roasted coffee bean, toast and black fruit. The oak-driven palate offers espresso, black pepper and black cherry flavors, but it lacks fruit richness and ends on a note of drying wood tannins.",Cantine Storiche,Cantine di Marzo
"This wine from longtime Santa Cruz Mountains producer Cinnabar offers a very subtle nose with slight, brisk minerality. Once sipped, the flavors remain subtle, though are nicely rounded with a bit of guava-based tropicalitythat emerges toward the finish.",Central Avenue Vineyard,Cinnabar
"The wine is soft, fruity and ready to drink, with attractive fruitiness, soft acidity and a touch of wood. With a crisp aftertaste, it offers freshness as well.",Clos des Rocs Monopole,Clos des Rocs
"A broad-based wine with rich fruit, it also has a crisp edge. Ripe yellow fruits are cut with citrus and acidity. With a tangy end, it could well age, so drink from 2015.",Les Vignes de Joanny,Collovray et Terrier
"The previous vintage of this sweet Pinot Gris was finished at 30 g/L residual sugar; this drops it down to half that. It's a sugary, spritzy wine that has not quite jelled the way the 2012 did, though time may help to pull it together. Right now it's just simple and sweet.",Ciel du Cheval Vineyard Drizzle,Convergence Zone
"A lean wine, its tannins dominant. There is a barnyard character along with red cherry fruit and acidity. An edge of wood and toast comes through at the end.",Classic,Château Bouissel
"Smells wet and salinic, with a slightly acrid note coming on late. Feels tangy, tight and zesty, with oily lime and lychee flavors. Finishes hard, nutty and mildly bitter.",,Cas'Almare
"There is fine red berry acidity here, with a caramel note, the wine feeling rich, hinting at pepper and bitter almonds.",,Domaine du Gouyat
"This is a sugary-sweet Sauvignon Blanc, with the flavor of a pineapple, pear and orange fruit drink. It's a little on the soft side, which accentuates the sweetness.",,Donovan-Parke
There's a mature note of apricot or cantaloupe melon that opens the nose of this golden Trebbiano-based wine from central Italy. That ripe fruit element is backed by a drying touch of talc powder or crushed mineral.,,Farnese
"This Agiorgitiko and Syrah blend is an earthy mélange of pepper, blackberry and cherry aromas and flavors of black fruit, red cherry and vanilla spice. Balanced and focused, it's a wine for sipping and pairing with food. Think pork or lamb.",Mediterranean Red,Elios
"This white blend of Malagousia and Moscholfilero starts with aromas of bright citrus, tropical fruit and a hint of musky spice. On the palate, it's a creamy blend of tropical fruit and peach, though slightly clumsy. The wine finishes with a spicy spin.",Oenodea,Domaine Costa Lazaridi
"Tastes overworked and sweetly heavy, with super-extracted pineapple jam, orange tapioca and butterscotch flavors. A heavy hand has been applied here.",Westwise Farms Clone 4,Alysian
"Not really pink, more of a salmon color, and quite sweet, with tangerine jelly and vanilla flavors. Good acidity and super-clean winemaking make it balanced and zesty.",Pink Moscato,Barefoot Bubbly
"Basic apple and vanilla bean aromas carry the nose to a plump, round palate with tropical flavors and banana. Feels peachy and tastes yeasty and sweet on the finish. Highly regular as a whole.",Unoaked,Zolo
"A 50-50 blend of Bombino Bianco and Chardonnay, this oak-aged white blend from southern Italy delivers bright acidity from the first grape variety and smooth vanilla, butterscotch and peach from the second.",Bacca Rara,Torrevento
"Irregular tannins and acidity give this wine a harsh mouthfeel. On the plus side, it's fresh in berry fruit, even though it's more than four years of age. Drink up.",,San Simeon
"This is proof that vintage variation is alive and well in Argentina. Reflecting a hot year, this is stewy and heavy. It smells of licorice, mint and black fruit, while the palate is syrupy. Prune, raisin and stewed blackberry flavors are front and center.",Libertad Vineyards,Benegas
"Seems like we're catching this wine late in its cycle. It's not very expressive on the nose, and even though there's still life to the palate, it's dealing only mild apple and citrus flavors followed by heat and acidic scour on the finish.",Andes,Argie
"A pretty standard Pinot Noir, dry, thin and acidic, with pleasant raspberry jam and spice flavors.",Lindsay's,Lincourt
"A wine that is dominated by the perfumed Colombard, leaving the more herbaceous Sauvignon Blanc to one side. It is soft with just a light lemon zest edge. Screwcap.",,Haut Marin
"There's too much of everything in this Cabernet. The fruit is massively extracted and sweetly jammy. The oak is a heavy plaster of sweet caramel. The result is impressive for sheer size, but unbalanced. Unlikely to improve with age.",Hillside,Hensley
"The varietal mix of this wine, which is undisclosed on the label, doesn't matter. All you need to know is that it's slightly sweet, soft and simple in citrus, pear and honeysuckle flavors.",,Kumbaya
"Black Label Gavi from the historic La Scolca winery offers zesty freshness backed by crisp aromas of grapefruit and crushed white mineral. The boasts beautiful, clean simplicity.",Black Label,La Scolca
Soft notes of toasted red apple skin and cedar plank enhance the peach and sweet citrus core of this white. Zippy and somewhat prickly with a mouthwatering finish.,,Excelsior
"Trebbiano, Roscetto and Malvasia are blended to produce a clean and simple wine with sharp, clean lines backed by lively aromas of citrus, pear and Golden Delicious apple.",,Falesco
"This well-priced Pinot Grigio (in a screwcap bottle) is simple and clean with crisp aromas of lemon drop and white peach backed by a tight, bright feel in the mouth.",,Cortenova
"If this wine were more concentrated in fruit, the score would be much higher. On the plus side is great sweetness and a velvety texture. But the blackberry flavors fall apart almost immediately, revealing a stalky unripeness.",Sweet,David Fulton
"Here's an easy, no-fuss white wine from central Italy (made with native Passerina grapes) that offers subtle aromas of peach and citrus over a bright, zesty mouthfeel. Pair this wine with fried vegetable tempura.",,Capestrano
"This simple Chardonnay has sweet flavors of buttered popcorn, toast, orange soda and vanilla. It's made in the popular style.",,Wheelhouse
"Il Tralcetto (with a grapevine tied to the capsule of the bottle) offers a thick, creamy expression of Riesling with aromas of natural rubber and yellow flower. The mouthfeel is dense and oily.",Il Tralcetto,Cescon Italo Storia e Vini
"Too sweet in orange, pineapple and pear juice flavors. There's a nice clean hit of acidity, but the wine is sugary all the way through.",,Indulge
"This is a soft, jellied Cabernet, with sweet blackberry, cherry and caramelized oak flavors. It contains a little Petite Sirah and Syrah.",Seven Oaks,J. Lohr
"Marked by vegetal notes, as the 2007 was, this wine has an objectionable asparagus smell and taste. Other than that, sweet red cherries and oak mark it.",Exuberance,Canihan
"Easy, fresh and very informal, this is the kind of Pinot Grigio you'll want to pair with appetizers, salads or a simple ham sandwich lunch. It finishes with a dry, grassy aftertaste.",,Barone
"This has ripe black cherry and fig aromas accompanied by prune and black cherry flavors. It's simple but well made, and has nice freshness. It would pair seamlessly with ravioli stuffed with porcini mushrooms.",Cadis,Cantina di Soave
"Exotic in scent, this bears aromas of orange blossom, pear, lime and popcorn. The medium- to full-bodied palate comes with balanced acidity and an added flavor of apricot.",Mandolin,Doukénie
"Shy on the nose, this offers soft scents of dried flower and blackberry, plus touches of sandalwood, char and turned earth. Medium to full bodied, this wine's midpalate is marked by bright acids and tight tannins. Pair this with a grilled, herb-crusted bone-in pork chop.",,CrossKeys
"An easy Pinot that shows the variety's silky texture ripe, with sunny flavors of cherries and cola. It's ripe, and fine for drinking now.",,Alouette
"This well-aged Cab Franc opens with raw, scratchy aromas that can best be described as abrasive and herbal. The palate brings a hard, acidic feel and high-toned, herbal flavors of cherry, plum and rhubarb. A lactic oak flavor meshes with green bean notes on the finish.",Pasionado,Andeluna
"The warmth of the year brings out rich fruits as well as the cool structure of a wine from the Hautes Côtes in the hills behind Beaune. There is acidity, of course, coupled with red berries and an underlying ripeness.",Château de Mercey,Antonin Rodet
"This is mostly Syrah, with Grenache and Mourvèdre filling in the rest of the blend. Light and fruity, it's a mix of red apple, cherry and raspberry flavors, fresh and well-balanced with natural acidity. Some hints of green fruit and stem come into the finish.",Mustang,Airfield Estates
"Hints of garrigue herbs and bramble add depth to the bright red-berry and strawberry aromas on the nose of this wine. Juicy fruit flavors continue on to the balanced and accessible palate, alongside soft tannins and a clean, mouthwatering finish.",Mas Janeil,François Lurton
"The blend is Syrah, Zinfandel and Cabernet Sauvignon. The alcohol is very high, to the tune of 16% by volume. And the flavors are like Port, with incredibly rich chocolate and spicy red currants. This is a barbecue wine if ever there was one.",Melange One,Imagine
"Richly spicy, classically lychee flavored wine. It is fragrant, with rosewater and touches of sweetness. Very open, generous and ready to drink.",Cuvée Tradition,Pierre and Charles Sparr
"This 100% Pinot Gris is sourced from The Benches vineyard in the Horse Heaven Hills. It's fruity, offering notes of apple, mandarin orange and flowers. It drinks dry and is broad in feel, finishing a bit short.",,Waterbrook
"Ripe notes of apricot and white currant are threaded together with a delicate scent of pineapple. The palate tastes nectarous yet zesty, thanks to the uplifting acidity that gives the wine some pizazz.",Soliterre Sweet Table Wine,White Hall
"Here's a vibrant and easy-drinking selection that's loaded with cherry and black pepper sensations. It's fresh, bright and crisp, and is perfect to pair with pasta e fagioli or white-meat dishes.",Rafael,Tommasi
"There's a strong dose of green gooseberry in this wine that makes it distinct, although you'll also find riper notes of limes and grapefruits. It's quite dry and crisp with acidity, finishing with mouthwatering tartness.",River Road Ranch,Trione
"An awkward Pinot, soft and sweet in raspberry fig Newton cookie and Dr. Pepper cola flavors. The alcohol is pretty high, and shows in the form of heat. Lacks the delicacy you expect from this fine vineyard.",Gap's Crown Vineyard,Trombetta
"This has typical ripasso aromas of black fruit, raisin and baking spice. The palate reveals hints of cherry and black pepper, but it doesn't have much intensity. The fruit is already fading, so drink soon.",,Antica Corte
"This foot-stomped, Sangiovese rosé offers aromas of lush strawberries and cream, with a hint of watermelon sweetness. It's fun, forward and fruit-powered all the way.",Ruby,Airfield Estates
"This has aromas of berry, raisin and toasted oak. The linear palate reveals raspberry and cherry flavors accompanied by accents of espresso and oak. You'll also detect the warmth of alcohol on the close.",,Bolla
"A soft, easy wine to drink now. It's rich and ripe with apricots, peaches, green apples and limes, with a spray of fragrant honeysuckle. Finishes a little hot in alcohol.",,MacMurray Ranch
"This Sauvignon offers subdued aromas of cantaloup and tomato vine while the palate shows melon, mineral and citrus notes. It's linear and lean, with a clean finish.",Ferrata,Maculan
"Fragrant and fruity, this is a delicious, forward and crisp wine from south-west France. It is bright, light, full of citrus fruits and a juicy, refreshing texture. Drink now. Screwcap.",,l'Escargot
"Plenty of crisp acidity balances the citrus, tropical fruit and pear flavors in this ripe Chardonnay. There's also a strong jacket of smoky oak with its buttered toast and vanilla richness. The result will please Chard lovers at a good price.",Lot 361,Cameron Hughes
"There are lots of rich, ripe pear, green apple, tropical-fruit and buttered-toast flavors in this creamy Chardonnay. It's lush and ripe, but has enough acidity for balance.",,Frei Brothers
"A simple, rounded wine, soft and fruity. Pear and apricot flavors dominate along with a crisper, grapefruit edge. The wine is aging quickly, and will be ready in a few months.",,Domaine du Chalet Pouilly
"Dry and tannic, this wine still has a velvety mouthfeel where the blackberry and cherry flavors add a brown sugary edge, like a granola bar. Drink up.",,Hanna
"The burn of alcohol and natural black pepper spice give this wine a sting. Based on Grenache and Sangiovese, with some Zinfandel, it's rich in black and red currant and cola flavors.",Red Scarf Blend,Blanchard Family
"Here's a simple but well made wine, with raspberry, cherry and red currant nuances punctuated by a hint of white pepper. It's soft and ready to drink young, with a nice freshness. This will go well with mushroom-stuffed ravioli.",Rocca Alata,Cantina di Soave
"This has a fragrance of oak and bell pepper, with a whiff of spice. The palate shows black currant, prune and oak, but above all, very evident alcohol.",Croce del Gal,Cantine Benedetti
"All leather, no lace, this spicy Petite Sirah is rugged in tannins with pronounced flavors of coffee and baked blackberry fruit.",,Mineral Wines
"This is toasty, full and cidery on the nose, with matchstick harshness in the background. The mouth is full and round, while flavors of apple and spice carry a yeasty heaviness. On the finish, things taste dry and don't evolve.",Brut Reserva,Mont Marçal
"Part of a Limited Release series, this supple, oaky Malbec includes Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot. Made from Canoe Ridge Estate Vineyard fruit, this offers compelling blue- and black-fruit flavors that are wrapped in coffee and cream notes. It's a structured wine that can be cellared up to a decade.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"La Fornace is a dark, savory expression of Cabernet Sauvignon that shows aged tertiary aromas of dark spice, cured meat and prune. It feels rich and dense, with a gritty quality to the tannins and long endnotes of bacon, black pepper and leather. Drink now.",La Fornace,Carpineto
"This 80-20 blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Grigio shows bright stone fruit and citrus aromas, followed by touches of tangy spice and vanilla cream. The wine carries itself smoothly over the palate.",Al Poggio,Castello di Ama
"This is a smooth and polished wine, with herb and new wood aromas. It has juicy red-berry flavors, and the tannins push forward. Structured, with intense acidity, this is ready to age for at least 5_6 years.",Gravières Premier Cru,Domaine Jessiaume
"Santenay, which is located toward the south of the Côte de Beaune, is known for its wines that are accessible and early maturing. This ripe selection bursts with flavors of yellow fruit and citrus, touched by wood influence. Drink it over the next year, or age it for 3_4.",Gravières Premier Cru,Domaine Jessiaume
"Rich and smooth, this wood-aged wine shows great weight and concentration. A touch of minerality provides a counterbalance to the ripe lemon and apricot flavors. It needs a couple of years to fully reveal its structured side.",Quintessence,Domaine Sangouard-Guyot
"The most taut and steely of the wines made by Guillaume Vrignaud from Fourchaume fruit, this offers a tight, minerally texture, lively acidity and an apple- and grapefruit-like crispness. With its structure, this has the potential to age for 4_5 years.",Les Champréaux Fourchaume Premier Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"Showing the structure of Gevrey-Chambertin and the ripe fruit of the 2009 vintage, this bottling is immediately opulent and seductive. With its red plum flavor and balanced tannins and acids, this is a solid wine to drink now.",,Jaffelin
"Like all of Movia's red wines, the Modri Ceglo is herbaceous on the nose and palate, with hints of menthol and bramble adding complexity to the crisp red-fruit flavors. The palate is ripe, silken and elegantly structured, with brisk acidity and whispers of graphite, soy and brine that linger long on the finish.",Modri Ceglo,Movia
"This is one unabashedly bold, brawny wine that's full of rich red fruit and milk chocolate. Bright herbal and floral tones add an unusual freshness to this Croatian Plavac Mali. Intense, penetrating tannins frame the long, mocha-flavored finish.",,Grgi_ Vina
"This is a notable wine for its smooth, supple tannins and its intense flavors of black cherry jam, mocha, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood. It's a full-bodied selection for drinking soon, and be sure to pair it with almost anything involving cured meat.",Trenton Estate Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"This wine captures the essence of Swan's 2010 Pinot Noirs. It shows the effects of the cool vintage, and it bears an earthy, mushroomy inflection to the plummy and cherry-like flavors.",Cuvée de Trois,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"One of the best Californian Pinot Gris currently available, this is rich, creamy and complex, and it would make for a great alternative to Chardonnay. This wine traditionally ages in used oak, which imparts just a hint of wood-driven sweetness to the pear, peach, mango and lime flavors.",Trenton Station Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"This wine is powerful and tannic, firm and dense. The fruit character is still submerged by the concentrated, dry core, which suggests that this wine needs at least 4_5 years before the red berry fruits show through.",Les Grasses Têtes,Domaine Bruno Clair
"A single-vineyard wine, this is firmly structured and full of perfumed fruit. New wood aging gives the red berry fruit a smoky, toasty character. It's a rich, concentrated selection to age for five years or more.",Clos du Meix des Ouches,Domaine des Varoilles
"Rich yet structured, this village wine from Meursault is made in a taut, tight style. Its acidity pushes through the toast flavor, which creates a nervy texture. Ready to drink  in 1_2 years.",,Olivier Leflaive
"This Bordeaux-style blend is mostly Cabernet Sauvignon, with small percentages of Cabernet Franc, Malbec and Merlot. It's high-toned, and it comes with a pungency that brightens the highly extracted, sweet-tasting berry fruit. It has lots of appeal, but you must like wines that have a volatile edge.",Vintage Five,Ramseyer
"Although it's pretty tannic, with a furry quality throughout, this is pretty easy to drink. The flavors of blackberry jam, chocolate, bacon, black pepper and sandalwood are elaborate and rich. It might pick up some bottle complexity over the next 3_4 years.",Estate,Stolpman
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Sangiovese, this has dark tones of plum and blackberry, followed by accents of spice, leather and tobacco. It would pair well with grilled sausage or meatloaf thanks to the fresh acidity on the finish.",Tegoleto,Serni Fulvio Luigi
"With only 2,940 bottles produced, this is a limited-edition wine that's worth the hunt. Vanilla and oaky spice aromas immediately waft from the glass, with the core of dark berries and fleshy plum fruit following shortly after. Heavy and bold on the palate, the firm structure complements the concentrated blackberry and cherry flavors. Nuances of cocoa powder and tea leaves linger on the close.",Reserve Wild,Recanati
"This wine's acid-tannin balance is beautiful, which lends structure to the raspberry, cherry, red currant and vanilla flavors. It shows the elegance associated with the vintage. Drink now.",,Siduri
"This Chardonnay has ripe, rich tangerine, pear and pineapple flavors. It wasn't aged in oak, and the malolactic fermentation was blocked. The result is a clean, vibrant and mouthwatering selection.",Zotovich Vineyard,Transcendence
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc, this has a polished, elegant side, and it offers bold fruit tones that are followed by barbecue sauce and stone accents. It feels zesty and perky on the finish thanks to the boldness of the fruit.",Greppicante,Tenuta I Greppi
"From one of the most acclaimed up-and-coming wineries in Italy, this wine delivers pure Sangiovese nuances of red fruit, blue flower and wet earth. It shows beautiful density and richness, and the finish offers loads of blackberry flavor.",Riserva,Terenzi
"This label has had its ups and downs over the years. The 2010 Pinot Noir is one of the successes, and it boasts an effusive nose of roses, cherries, dusty earth and mocha. It's medium to full in the mouth, delivering cherry fruit and underpinnings of earth and spice. The finish is long, spicy and firm without being hard.",,The Crossings
"This tastes bone dry, with cleansing acidity and firm minerality. It offers subtle layers of green apples, figs and tropical fruits, plus an edge of sweet vanilla.",,The Mission
"The inclusion of 11% Aligoté, which was sourced from a block planted in 1979, makes this Chardonnay unique. The Aligoté seems to thicken the core fruit, and it adds flesh and rind-like flavor, along with old-vine details of dried herb and spice. It's a pleasing mix of integrated stone-fruit, grain and citrus-peel notes.",,Upland Estates
"This Chardonnay's lemon and apricot flavors come wrapped in a tight texture. At the same time, it has a full, ripe mouthfeel, with wood-derived flavors that bring out an extra dimension of richness and ageability.",,Maison Champy
"Man O' War's 2008 Dreadnought put the winery on the map, and, although not quite as dramatic, the 2009 is a worthy successor. Aromas are lifted, peppery and cherry-filled, while the flavor nuances include smoke and pepper-cured meats. The wine is medium bodied and is marked by silky tannins and crisp acids. Drink now_2018.",Dreadnought,Man O' War
"An organic blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this offers enormous richness and concentration. The wine is soft and lush, and it exudes dark fruit flavors that are backed by touches of mineral and smoke.",Prima Causa,La Selva
"Piccini shows confidence and consistency with this best-selling value wine. Easy aromas of wild berry, blue violet and moist earth reveal its Tuscan soul.",,Piccini
"This is clean on the nose, with blackberry and plum aromas. It feels full and solid, bearing flavors of black cherry and dark plum, with a meaty undertone. Mint, spice and black fruit notes carry the finish.",Gamonal,Pardevalles
"From the Adriatic side of the Italian peninsula comes this fresh Pinot Grigio that would wash down seafood, vegetables or light appetizers. The wine is crisp, clean and redolent of citrus and green apple.",,Caldora Vini
"Spice and red plum flavors dominate this fruity, forward effort. It has some tannins, but they seem lost in the wine's easy character. For drinking over the next two years.",Foral,Caves Aliança
"Opening with a bouquet of dried apricot and almond paste, this is a full style of Sauvignon Blanc, with tons of lemon on the finish. Pair this with seafood.",,Clos du Lac
"Crisp and herbaceous, this has a citrus and green fruit character. Already drinkable, it is bright and fruity, finishing with a citrus tang.",,Château de la Jaubertie
"Aromatic and richly fruity, this has surprising weight that gives the palate a round and smooth quality. The acidity is there, although it is covered by the superrich fruit.",,Domaine de Moulin-Pouzy
"This is herbal, with black currant and thyme flavors all set in tannins. The Fer Servadou grape gives this a stalky, wild feeling.",,Domaine Laurens
"An easy Cabernet, delivering plenty of ripe, juicy blackberry jam and dark chocolate flavors. It finishes a little on the sweet side.",,Decoy
"The medicinal plum aroma comes with a note of celery as well as anise and/or licorice. It feels tight, with rough tannins, then tastes like fresh red berries and plum. This is a bit edgy and choppy feeling, but solid for the price.",Viñas Viejas,Evohé
"Baked and heavy, this has prune, raisin and jammy berry aromas. The weightiness carries onto the palate, which is chewy and smooth. Flavors of blackberry, spice and jammy syrup lead to a finish with a chocolaty tone. Tasted twice, with consistent results.",Terra de Fic 1,Ferré I Catasús
"Leathery berry aromas are earthy and suggest notes of cured meat and cheese. It gets tougher and more tannic the more it breathes, with black fruit, herb and spice flavors. Generous but rough in feel, it has a powerful, medium-long finish.",Reserva,Finca El Origen
"This expensive wine is softly tannic, earthy and fruity, with dried herb and raspberry tea flavors. From Francis Ford Coppola.",,Eleanor
"This is an attractively balanced apple- and pear-flavored wine. It is crisp, fruity and nicely creamy, with some bright acidity on the finish Drink now or age for a year.",Coreto Branco,DFJ Vinhos
"The fresh berry aromas are solid, and the palate is plucky and lively, with plenty of acidity to push the ripe, standard Malbec flavors of blackberry and spice. It shows some tartaric crispness and bite on the finish, but tastes right.",Colección,Alma del Sur
"Hard, minty, oaky and even a touch chemical on the nose, then tough as nails in the mouth. Tastes resiny and minty, with black fruit flavors and extreme tannic clamp. Chocolaty tasting on the finish, which retains the wine's hard personality. Tasted twice.",Premium,Alta Vista
"This is a solid, everyday Cabernet for drinking with simple fare. It's soft and simple in structure, but the blackberry and mocha flavors are tasty. Drink now.",,Benziger
"Once again Black Box has come out with a fine, easy-drinking Merlot that many folks will like. It's forward in sour cherry, herb and cedar flavors, wrapped into a dry, silky texture. At the equivalent of $6.25 for a regular 750-ml bottle, it's a bargain.",,Black Box
"A medium-sweet sparkling wine, this bursts with a ripe apple flavor on the palate. The wine is crisp, deliciously clean and refreshing. Think of it like Moscato.",Casal Garcia,Aveleda
"Le Rime is a very simple blend of Chardonnay and Pinot Grigio that would go down nicely with tuna salad or grilled vegetables. Lean and compact, it offers bright citrus, pear and stone fruit aromas.",Le Rime,Banfi
"Easy to drink, with plenty of charm, this shows orange, lime and tropical fruit flavors, brightened with crisp acidity.",,Bogle
"Clean, forward, simple apple and herb flavors combine. This is a serviceable, all-purpose Chardonnay, that finishes just a bit sour.",,A to Z
"Fruity and simple, this Merlot tastes like the wine equivalent of a candied dessert pastry. It may not be technically sweet, but it's so extracted in raspberries, cherries and caramelized oak that it seems sweet.",,Houdini
"Sold in individual 375-ml pouches or 4-packs, this is a dry, clean wine with lots of acidity that brightens the creamy apricot, orange and peach flavors.",,House Band
"This smells yeasty and flat, with a heavy, bready quality. The palate feels heady and plump, with a mealy citrus flavor and a lot of foam on the palate. It finishes a little green, grassy and herbal, with a lettuce-like note.",Gran Cuvee Brut,Gramona
"This is a seemingly weet rosé, with a good balance between its strawberry fruit and acidity. The wine is slightly sparkling and crisp, making it a delicious apéritif. Screwcap.",,Vera
"Spice and seemingly sweet grapefruit flavors give this light, lively and crisp wine an attractive fruity character. It dances easily on the palate, finishing with good tang.",Villa Dria,Vignobles Drieux
This blend of Sangiovese and Canaiolo is enhanced with a small percentage of Merlot. That addition heightens the wine's softness and renders a richer mouthfeel.,,Straccali
"This is a well-priced white that shows Trebbiano's easy and fresh side, with notes of cut grass, citrus and honey. Great for pairing with grilled tuna or salad.",Trebì,Talamonti
"Quite light, but pretty, with delicate cherry and chocolate flavors. There is a bit of a hole in the middle, but it's a decent quaff in a difficult vintage.",,Seven of Hearts
"Honeyed and rich without being heavy, this is one of the sweeter versions of Muscat de Beaumes de Venise, yet it maintains a sense of poise throughout. Pineapple, nectarine and citrus linger on the finish.",,Domaine de Beaumalric
"A fine, vivid, crystal-clear Pinot Gris, this offers cool cucumber and melon flavors first and foremost. It's a refreshing addition to the white wine lineup at H3.",H3,Columbia Crest
"High on the deliciousness-factor, this shows soft, seemingly sweet flavors of raspberry, cinnamon, smoky butter, sugar cookie and vanilla. It's a little one-dimensional, but that dimension is a nice one. Drink now.",,Artezin
"Mineral-driven and hard on the nose, this features toasty, smoky, chocolaty notes in addition to medicinal berry aromas. It feels juicy but also resiny and creamy, with plum and wood flavors that finish long. This is a ripe, fruity wine with plenty of oak, size and body.",Vinyes Velles Nobles Garnatxa-Carinyena,Acústic
"Here's a soft, luscious Merlot, filled with juicy black cherry, red currant, licorice and sandalwood flavors. It shows the fine structure associated with the 2010 vintage.",,Irony
"This is toasty, earthy and full on the nose, with bacon and floral blackberry aromas. It feels structured and firm, with baked, chewy flavors of roasted berry, smoked meat and coffee, and it maintains its core flavors on the finish.",Tinto Figuero 4,García Figuero
"Rich in layers of raspberry and bright cherry, this full-bodied Grenache surprises in its depth of structure. The finish dives deep into caramel and oak, rounding it out pleasantly.",,Fenestra
"Initially tight, this opens to reveal a lovely structure, with bombastic, dark flavors of blackberry and black cherry that are wrapped in leather. From a superb Lodi vineyard, this has a velvety finish.",Silvaspoons Vineyards,Fenestra
"This is a deliciously balanced, elegant wine. Its ample spice character is matched by the crisp white-fruit note and acidity. It is floral, perfumed and stylish.",Holder,Henri Schoenheitz
"Fermented with indigenous yeast and then aged in French oak, this has rose and raspberry perfumes, with deep black-plum and berry flavors. Striking acidity and bold, angular tannins soften on the palate, revealing a smooth, luscious finish.",G6,Bibich
"Power marks this gigantic Syrah. What it lacks in subtlety, it makes up for with its sheer size. Syrah doesn't get much riper in blackberry, cherry and chocolate flavors. With its thick, rich tannins, drink it soon with beef and game dishes.",Vivio Vineyard,Bodega Rancho
"This is a special bottling with a fancy new label that commemorates Korbel's 130th anniversary. It's slightly sweet and easy to drink, with rich, creamy flavors of honey, orange and vanilla. The blend is Chenin Blanc, French Colombard and Chardonnay.",Sec California Champagne,Korbel
"This pure, Columbia Valley Cabernet is blended from a variety of widely separated vineyards. The fruit is forward, pushing black cherry and cola notes to the front of the palate, layering in a streak of milk chocolate, and finishing with smooth, supple tannins.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"Solid and varietally correct, this includes 19% Grenache in the blend. Berry and bright spice are further accented by streaks of coffee and mocha. The style is smooth, accessible and seamless.",,L'Ecole No. 41
"An enticing, heavy-duty blend of 40% Viognier, 40% Petit Manseng and 20% Roussanne, this is rich, round and unctuous, with bold notes of golden stone fruit, orange Creamsicle, lemon tartlet and caramelized nut. The acidity is soft across the midpalate, but it brightens on the warm, medium-length finish. To appreciate the full spectrum of aromas and flavors, don't drink this too cold.",Honah Lee White,Tarara
"A bitter cherry flavor is balanced by the firm, tannic structure. With its appropriate weight and juicy, spicy acidity, it's attractive now but also has aging potential. Screwcap.",Heideboden,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"This is modern in style and well stocked for an affordable Rioja. It opens with aromas of gritty, roasted berry, plum and grilled beef that lead to a firm palate, with dark fruit, toast, mineral and chocolate flavors. It feels tight, warm and long on the finish.",,Obalo
"This has the pretty color of pink copper, a delicately yeasty aroma; and rich, sweet flavors of strawberry, lime and toast. It's a little scouring on the palate. The blend is nearly equal parts Pinot Noir and Chardonnay.",Mirabelle Brut Rosé,Schramsberg
"This is a very pretty, polished wine for drinking now. It has rich, creamy flavors of tropical fruit and sweet, smoky oak that are brightened by crisp acidity.",Reserve,Simi
"Delicate on the attack, with gentle orange blossom and honeyed lemon flavors, this mineral-driven Pinot Grigio builds in intensity and tangerine fruitiness on the palate. It finishes crisp, with tonic lime pith and herb notes.",Pinot Populus,Sivi
"Two things mark this Cabernet: exceptionally ripe fruit and hard tannins. The flavors of blackberry, cherry and currant are buried under a blanket of dry astringency. The question is whether the fruit will outlive the tannins. Try holding it until 2017.",The Leap,Stags' Leap Winery
"Intense, complex and full-bodied, this is a powerful Pinot Gris. It has weight and richness, providing both fruitiness and a ripe texture. Ready to drink, with the acidity lifting the finish.",,Rieflé
"This producer knows how to do Verdejo right. Aromas of citrus, mineral and apple are lucid and fresh. It feels tangy and a touch citric, but not cutting, with lemon and tangerine flavors that set up a minerally, steely, refreshing finish. Best as an apéritif or with oysters or chilled shrimp.",,Palacio de Bornos
"Most Palouse wines are purebreds, butthis is an exception. It's a blend of 40% Merlot, 30% Cabernet Sauvignon and 15% each Cabernet Franc and Syrah. Somehow the Syrah dominates, bringing forward jammy berry and dark licorice flavors, which lead into the smooth finish that has a generous coating of mocha from having aged in one-third new French oak.",Eclipse,Palouse
"Made in a rich yet dry style, this is densely packed with full, ripe yellow fruit and pear flavors. It is full bodied, generous and round.",Vieilles Vignes,Martin Schaetzel
"This Tuscan Sangiovese opens with flavors of cherry, blackberry and bold modern spice. It delivers bright acidity, balance and crispness, with a food-friendly personality.",Rubio,San Polo
"Here's a spicy, dry style of Pinot Blanc that shows considerable intensity of fruit, with its pear and apple complementing its dense texture. It has a full, rich character that's structured and needing to age for a year.",Réserve,Willm
"Crusty on the nose, this has toast, mineral, leather, berry and cherry aromas. It's concentrated, balanced and firmly tannic on the palate, which carries flavors of blackberry, vanilla and tobacco. Resiny vanilla, herb and peppery spice touches grace the finish.",Reserva,Viña Mayor
"Though listed at a rather potent 13.8% alcohol, this can only be called delicate, with flavors reminiscent of Pinot Blanc as much as Pinot Gris. Pleasing apple and pear flavors show excellent concentration and balance, with just a faint tinge of finishing heat.",,Wapato Point Cellars
"Very perfumed in character, the wine has a bright red cherry flavor, with some weight and structure. There are good tannins and a warm, soft finish. The wine could age for another year.",Château la Tour de Bief Claude de la Tour,Domaine Vincent Girardin
"Light and fresh up front, with lychee, passion fruit and wet stone aromas. Feels good and balanced as if offers a nice mix of textured fruit and minerally acidity. Flavors of green melon, passion fruit, lime and green herbs come straight from central casting. Perfect for summer drinking.",Nimbus Single Vineyard,Viña Casablanca
"Soft and gentle in texture, this Cabernet is very rich and forward in blackberry and black-currant flavors, enriched with sweet oak. It's a flashy, opulent wine that's delicious for drinking now.",,Mount Veeder
"There's a brooding quality to the smoky, diesel-fuel like aromas of this wine, but that's left in the rearview by ripe flavors of honey and baked apple once it's in the mouth. This wine is round and atypically soft for the vintage, but picks up some lively lime notes on the finish.",Scharzhofberger Spätlese,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"A sweet wine that is packed with botrytis and also intense acidity. Honey, apricot and orange peel of the Riesling are blended with spicy Gewurztraminer, giving a taut, still young wine. Keep 3_4 years.",Late Harvest,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"A good, fairly complex California Chardonnay, marked by ripe, jammy orange, pear and apricot fruit flavors. Winemaker interventions also play roles, with the malolactic fermentation adding buttery notes and French oak contributing sweet caramel.",Dutton Ranch,Dutton-Goldfield
"A dry style of tawny, bringing out wood aging as well as rich mellow fruit. The wine has an old gold feel to it, with butter toffee, butterscotch and final acidity.",Ten Year Old Aged Tawny,Croft
"Cola, blackberry and coconut aromas get this Cachapoal Malbec going in an attractive fashion. Feels good, weighty and properly tannic, with bold berry, chocolate, spice and depth to the palate. Toasty, dark, spicy and nice on the finish, but also oaky tasting.",Single Vineyard Plot: Sauco,Anakena
"Good concentration and a classic Oregon Pinot mix of herb and fruit characterize this winning effort. Dried herb, thistle, berry, cherry and a Dr. Pepper streak are all in the mix, with hints of earth and stem.",Estate,Blakeslee
"A bit lactic and green on the nose, but only at first. With time, it becomes more floral and expressively fruity. Feels compact and chewy, with dark-berry flavors offset by chocolate and peppery spice. Finishes with coffee, chocolate and crusty accents.",,Maquis
"From 40-year-old vines, this is quite tart and puckery, but ultrafresh and clean. A lemony Riesling that seems like a match made in heaven for Pacific coast oysters.",,Hyland
"Terre Rouge's yearly blend of Marsanne, Roussanne and Viognier is always a delightful wine with food. This vintage opens with a pleasant hit of pear followed by spring flowers and delves into creamy textures and layers of honeysuckle and orange rind in the midpalate.",Enigma,Terre Rouge
"A solid example of the variety, with complex red and black fruits mixing it up with additional grace notes of coffee, sweet spice, toast and licorice. It's a balanced effort, with rather delicate tannins, and a finish that quits just a little early.",,RoxyAnn
"Still a little hard and tight, with a flavorful mix of plum and black fruits, this may need extra breathing time to show its full strength. Some whiffs of smoke and coffee linger on the finish.",Sunnyside Single Vineyard,Amity
"Varius is a blend of 50% Negroamaro with Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot. The bouquet is steady and clean with pretty offerings of black fruit, spice and dark chocolate. It is rich, clean and polished; the finish shows a touch of bitter almond.",Varius,Cantele
"This is a fantastic wine should pair well with meat or pasta. Its aromas include cassis, currant, crushed mineral, cola and dark asphalt. The mouthfeel is firm and structured without being overwhelming.",Elkon,Cantine Cipressi
"Smoky on the nose, with a hint of rubber and good red-fruit purity. Feels tight, with modest tannic grab and dark flavors of baked berry, leather and earthy density. Shows complexity on the finish via tobacco and light herbal notes.",Single Vineyard,Cremaschi Furlotti
"This is a bold, bulky blend of five indigenous grapes from central Italy that shows jammy aromas of blackberry pie and raspberry preserves, followed by white button mushroom and wet earth. Tobacco and spice notes arise on the soft, succulent finish.",Edizione Cinque Autoctoni,Farnese
"A blockbuster of a wine, very dense, packed with medicinal flavors and notes imparted by wood aging. It shows the solid structure of the 2008 vintage, and certainly needs aging.",Lou Prince,Domaine du Prince
"The 50% Tannat in this blend is softened by the addition of Bordeaux grapes. It has weight and density, with the tannins giving power. The blackberries and ripe black cherries give great juiciness and sweetness.",,Domaine Laougué
"This is a delicious wine with rich layers of chocolate and sweet spice that give heft and momentum to the bright berry fruit. Finely textured and firm, the wine should be paired with grilled or stewed meat dishes.",Antrum,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"A taut wine with dense tannins and tight black-currant flavors. There is a stalky element here, although the wine's structure should soften over the next 2_3 years.",Cuvée le Clos,Clos des Terrasses
"A good value Cahors that shows delicious black fruit flavors and balancing acidity. The tannins are relatively gentle, although there is a dry core. Ready to drink.",K-Price,Clos Troteligotte
"Light, elegant and lithe on the nose, with a touch of stemminess to the core plum and cherry aromas. Feels just right, with a feminine touch and snap to the mouthfeel. Flavors of red plum, raspberry, herbs, tomato and dried spice lead to a fresh, focused finish. Top level for under $15.",Limited Selection,Montes
"Lots of zesty, mouthwatering acidity in this Chardonnay. The pineapple, crème brûlée, buttered toast and vanilla flavors are so rich that they require balance, which the zippy acidity provides. Maybe a touch too oaky, but that's a matter of personal preference.",No. 81 Sonoma Collection,JCB
"Integrated and dark up front, with aromas of raspberry, blackberry, oak resin and spice. Feels textured and resiny, with good depth and generous flavors of lemony oak, barrel spice and berry fruit. Finishes more woody than anything, but along the way it struts very good density and flavor.",Orzada,Odfjell
"A bit reduced when first opened, it throws off scents of burnt rubber, then slowly opens into a roundly fruity, lightly toasty Pinot with a firmly tannic base. Flavors of Dr. Pepper drift through the midpalate. Give it a good decanting and it's fine for near-term consumption.",Reserve,Panther Creek
"The spice and juicy fruit give the wine its intense strawberry flavor. To balance its fruit, the tannins lend a firm background structure. The wine has just the right weight, and its soft aftertaste, it's ready to drink now.",Grande Escolha,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"This is a rare dessert wine from the Vinho Verde region. It's packed with flavors of currant, lemon honey and orange peel. With its great sense of acidity, it is both sweet and deliciously refreshing.",Ameal S.H.,Quinta do Ameal
"Its Grand Escolha (equivalent to a Reserve wine) label explains why this is a young, reticent and closed wine. With its firm fruits and tight tannins, it needs several years of aging to reveal what will always be a serious wine.",Grande Escolha,Quinta Vale de Fornos
"Dense and dark smelling, with coconut, tobacco, perfumed berry fruit and leather aromas. Feels powerful and layered, with tough tannins and a rugged overall mouthfeel. Flavors of dark berry, toast, herb and spice are rewarding, while the finish is herbal and chocolaty.",Reserva de Familia,Santa Carolina
"Red fruit aromas of plum and cranberry are green and grassy, with snap. This has an edgy, grating feel and herbal flavors of raspberry and red plum that turn green before finishing short.",Honoro Vera Organic,Juan Gil
"Raspberry and plum aromas are leathery and horsey. This has a jammy, flat mouthfeel and mulchy, lightly woody flavors of red plum and raspberry. On the finish, there's little besides a red-fruit note or two and earthiness.",Altos de Tamaron,Pagos del Rey
"Earth, mint and blackberry flavors make this full-bodied and firmly-tannic wine both flavorful and eccentric. As the wine sits in the glass for several minutes the aroma become like beef bouillon and the texture on the palate is a bit astringent.",Private Reserve,Garré
"Sweetly overripe with a briny backwash of green olive, this is a plain, weighty white wine that's indistinct.",,Goyette
"Despite its slenderness, this Welschriesling (no relative of Riesling) fizzes with refreshment and verve. Its slim body carries fresh lemon flavors and treads lightly. Drink soon__or best results, on a sweltering day.",,Lackner Tinnacher
"Deep pink in color, this is a caramel-flavored, heavy wine. It is fat, very full and bitter at the end.",,Château Queyssard
"Very pale in color, this is a wine that has memories of fruitiness rather than the fruit itself. It is neutral, soft with acidity at the end and dull.",,Château Au Grand Paris
"Waxy, yeasty aromas are not very fresh. A citric mouthfeel lacks clarity and foundation, while orange and nectarine flavors are briny. This tastes pickled on the finish.",Royal,Bodegas Franco-Españolas
"Tight and sharp, this is an herbaceous wine with a strongly citrus character. The aftertaste has some spice.",Perles,Château de Piote
This wine is so soft it is almost without taste. Only the acidity remains.,La Vache,Maison Bouey
"Pickled and briny smelling up front, this semisweet wine doesn't open well. A cloying, low-acid palate is another strike against it, while flavors of candied apple, canned peaches and vanilla finish sticky.",Satinela Semi Dulce,Marqués de Cáceres
"This has sharp, tangy aromas, tart cranberry flavors, a lean texture and drying tannins that seem to coat the teeth. Difficult to enjoy on its own, it needs to pair with very rich, fatty food to tame the tannins.",Estate Grown Organic Grapes,Barra of Mendocino
"Barrel notes take the lead with aromas of char, butterscotch and spice overrunning the fruit. There's a pleasing creamy feel to the sweet fruit flavors but the variety is near impossible to find.",Evergreen Vineyard,Wedge Mountain
"A minty strangeness permeates this wine, which comes off as artificial in flavor. Rumblings of cherry grenadine try to emerge from the muddled midpalate, which otherwise lacks flavor. The quick finish is medicinal and sweet.",,Kirkland Signature
"A rustic, barnyard aroma greets one on the nose before a basic taste of stewed prunes waltzes in.",Kinneybrook,Kunde
"A burnt, reduced quality mars the fruit in this wine, made in a big style with full-bodied power and density.",Cellar Club,Sterling
"This wine shows aromas of green olive, herbs, flowers and tire rubber. Flavors are sweet with a light spritz and chalky mesquite notes.",,Voila!
"Ripe and fat, this wine is about caramel and vanilla flavors as much as fruit. It has a bitter character that lacks charm. The aftertaste is fresh, while still bitter.",Les Hauts de Massonne du Château Pilet,Château Pilet
"A bitter, caramel-flavored wine, this is tight and peppery. A lean character leaves a sharp aftertaste.",Jean Faux,Château Jean Faux
This neutral-tasting wine has little flavor. It is soft and fat.,,Château Lalande Méric
"The aromas of blueberry, milk chocolate and tire rubber are pleasant enough but the palate distracts with sweet, lightly spritzy blue fruit flavors backed by chalky tannins.",,Wild Meadows
"Heavy oak on top of cherry aromas results in a chemical-driven, woody bouquet. This feels high in acid, with an oaky, resiny offset. Sour plum, vanilla and resiny flavors finish short, lean and citric.",,Tramuz
"The aromas of this wine are gummy and candied on the nose. Weird flavors of pastry, mulched earth and clay are devoid of clean fruit and finish jumbled and flat.",Unus Old Vine,Agustín Cubero
"This wine is flawed, with rustic leathery undertones that veer into Band-Aid, and an intensely sour note. Multiple bottles tried over several months.",Carneros Estate,Peter Cellars
"This Merlot has not fully ripened, with aromas of bell pepper, green herbs and savory notes overriding any sense of variety. Flavors are faint and lighter in style, trailing on the finish.",,James Wyatt
"Rusty in color, with rubbery cherry and raspberry aromas, this is a sticky, candied rosé with a low freshness quotient. Candied, sugary flavors finish sweet and gooey.",Alone,Bocopa
"One of Italy's most iconic bottlings, the 2012 Sassicaia is drop-dead gorgeous. A blend of 85% Cabernet Sauvignon and 15% Cabernet Franc, it boasts sensations of blue flowers, cedar, juicy red currants, ripe raspberries, white pepper and a balsamic note. Structured, radiant and loaded with finesse, it delivers everything you'd expect from a world-class wine and more. Drink 2018_2032.",Sassicaia,Tenuta San Guido
"Like a pastry shop in a glass, this rare treat of a well-aged bubbly smells of cream, butter and nutmeg, and tastes like baked apples, almonds and vanilla. Although not sweet, its generous fruit, spice and nut nuances build on the crisp but smooth texture and linger on the finish. From a cool vintage that produced long-lived wines, this is irresistible now but should keep through 2020.",J. Schram 50 Late Disgorged,Schramsberg
"This stunning expression of Solaia opens with ample aromas of exotic spices, tilled soil, mature black-skinned fruit and an underlying whiff of fragrant blue flowers. The vibrant, elegantly structured palate doles out high-toned black cherry, ripe blackberry, white pepper, cinnamon, clove and Mediterranean herbs alongside a backbone of firm, polished tannins and bright acidity. Drink 2017_2032.",Solaia,Marchesi Antinori
"The best of CVNE's impressive lineup of 2010 high-end Riojas is this pure, staunch, ripe stud that's blasting with blackberry, woodspice, leather and cedar aromas. Lush, layered and deep as an ocean trench, this ultraripe, expressive wine pumps out blackberry, cassis and chocolate flavors prior to a lush, mile-long finish. Amazingly pure and delicious; drink through 2025.",Real de Asúa,CVNE
"Softly floral and sculpted in red berry and leather, this extracted and somewhat reduced wine may need time in the glass, if not the bottle, to open. The brawnier tendencies reign in full dominance and weight.",,VGS
"This bold blend has aromas like charred oak barrels and saturated flavors suggesting blackberry, black pepper and clove. It is full bodied, thick in texture and moderately tannic. For those who like obvious oakiness, it will be a treat.",Cimarron,Vigilance
"One of the more reliable, big-production brands in the market right now, this wine shows fresh white flowers, with just a dollop of vanilla butter and a touch of wet stone on the nose. There is decent verve to the evenly presented and light palate, with flavors of cooked apples and sea salt.",V Series,Vinum
"This opens with aromas of toast, oak and a whiff of coffee. The palate is still rather closed but eventually reveals raw cherry, anise, clove and ground pepper accompanied by bracing tannins and racy acidity. A note of dried sage closes the finish.",del Comune di Barolo,Virna Borgogno
"Riper notes of pink grapefruit and tangerine distinguish this dry Riesling from Georg Albrecht Schneider's other 2014 wines. The palate is cutting and crisp, showcasing tart limes and gooseberries against a blossomy finish. Drink now.",Niersteiner Paterberg Vom Kalk Limestone Kabinett Trocken,Weingut Georg Albrecht Schneider
"Stone fruit like apricot and white peach dominate on the nose of this wine that tastes slightly off dry, though no residual sugar content is listed. Hedonistic, it remains rich and creamy through the honey-laced finish.",,Wharton
"Light, clear and aromatically reminiscent of pine, this smooth, soft wine offers spicy acidity around integrated tannins and oak, finishing with a length of cinnamon.",,Willowbrook
"With the normally more northern Alvarinho in the blend, this wine has considerable freshness. That is mitigated by the wood aging that has broadened the wine and brought out tropical and yellow fruit flavors. The wine is ready to drink.",Branco Reserva,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"This wine conveys cola, root beer, dried strawberry and graphite aromas, with an intriguing twist of curry spice. It's rich on the palate with decent weight, showing Indian spice, pepper, star anise and tart yet juicy cranberry.",,Año Verde
"A bright and relatively light expression of the variety, this wine imparts more red berry than black, with seasonings of cinnamon and nutmeg. Soft, smooth and unfussy, it retains solid acidity from start to finish, with a taste of vanilla custard on the finish.",,Balletto
"This ripe Chardonnay has a soft texture and only the lightest minerality. It is fresh, tangy with lemon-zest flavors and refreshing acidity. The aftertaste with a burst of crispness is particularly attractive.",Esprit Blanc de Blancs Brut,Baron-Fuenté
"Quite yellow in color, nearing orange, this oxidative-style wine shows quinine, walnuts and preserved lemons on the very concentrated, oily nose. The texture is sticky, with flavors of seared lemons and orange oil, yet it retains a lime-skin liveliness. It's quite an interesting bottling for fans of the style.",Sierra Mar Vineyard,Bernardus
"Ripe yellow apples and yellow pears meet with a tropical sense of guava and tuberose on this bottling from a vineyard near the intersection of Highways 101 and 154. The flavors are more tart, with green-apple flesh, light pear and a much more reserved touch of tropical fruit and flower.",El Camino Vineyard,Bianchi
"Edelzwicker is an Alsatian term meaning noble blend, and is applied to any blend of white wine grapes. Here, it is Gewurztraminer, Pinot Gris and Riesling, capturing the floral aromatics and lightly oily mouthfeel of the former, along with the citrus and pear flavors from the latter two components. All in all it's an aromatic, floral, broadly flavorful and distinctive white wine.",Wirtz Vineyard Edelzwicker,Big Table Farm
"Punchy and concentrated, this off-dry Riesling juxtaposes plush, peachy fruit against a backdrop of spine-tingling lemon acidity. Its uncomplicated forward style makes it quite quaffable.",Berres Estate,C.H. Berres
"Plum, graphite, menthol and exotic spice aromas jump out of the glass. The big, round palate delivers dried black cherry, mature blackberry, licorice and vanilla alongside chewy tannins.",Bric Loira,Cascina Chicco
"This offers aromas of mature dark fruit, cured meat, cooking spice and tobacco. The extracted palate has dried black cherry, tobacco, anise and powdered sage alongside grainy tannins.",Perno,Cascina del Monastero
"Zesty aromas of just-cut apple, lemon-lime soda and tuberose meet a stony quality on the nose of this popular wine from the Edna Valley producer. It's fresh and crisp on the palate, with ripe apples, kiwi and sea-salt flavors.",Stainless Unoaked,Chamisal Vineyards
"This ripe, fruity and structured wine is still young and the tannins need time to round out. However, it is already rich, with juicy red fruits and a core of fragrant acidity. The wine is dense and worth aging. Drink from 2017.",Réserve,Château Bélingard
"Dark spicy aromas of black plum and black currant are solid. In the mouth, this is saturated and hard, with heavy overall density and strong tannins. A dark, spicy, blackened set of dark-berry flavors finishes with more spice and mint than fruit.",HD Clásico,Durigutti
"The nose on this Malbec-Merlot from Salta is raw and saucy, with more brawn and rusticity than elegance. A compact grabby palate is intense, with herbal plum and hefty berry notes that mellow on a chunky lightly herbal finish.",Ciclos Icono,El Esteco
"This full-bodied wine has an elegant bouquet that invites, before pomegranate, plum and orange peel figure in on the palate. Powerful on the finish, it features hints of coconut and vanilla around the leathery texture.",,Waterstone
"Lime zest and freshly cut grass lend a particularly invigorating cool to this dry, delicate Riesling. It's brashly mineral on the palate, finishing tightly with a bracing shower of acidity.",Hummerthal Niersteiner Paterberg Trocken,Weingut Georg Albrecht Schneider
"Plush, showy aromas of candied apples, caramelized pears, condensed honeysuckle, yellow peach, quinine and cinnamon spice show on the nose of this wine. The palate takes a sour turn, with lemon peels, pear skins and a touch of chamomile.",,White Hart Wine
"A year's barrel aging has smoothed the firm tannins of the dark berry fruits in this wine. It is still very structured with layers of tannins and a dark smoky almost bitter character. It really needs some time to open up, so wait until 2018.",Reserva,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"After five years, the Baga is beginning to soften to create a structured while generously fruity wine. It has acidity and a solid tannic base which is topped by black currant and berry fruits and followed by a richly juicy aftertaste. The crisp, crunchy aftertaste is typical of the grape as it matures. Drink now and until 2022.",Marquês de Marialva,Adega de Cantanhede
"As with tawny Ports, the other Douro fortified wine, Moscatel, is aged in wood for an average of a decade. In this 10-year old, the wine still has its fruit, but it is just starting to show old wood aging flavors that are beginning to concentrate it. There is a strongly perfumed, spicy aftertaste. Drink now.",10 Anos,Adega de Favaios
"From a vineyard known for producing powerfully ripe, dense fruit with wet-stone minerality, this wine delivers on many of those points. It offers intense, rich tastes of baked apple, graham-cracker crust and crème brûlée. Soft and layered, it ends in a statement of big fruit.",Durell Vineyard,Agnitio
"Briny, thick and gravelly, this is a blend of 42% Roussanne, 20% Grenache Blanc, 20% Picpoul Blanc and 18% Marsanne, fermented half in neutral French oak and half in stainless steel. High-toned acidity and citrus wrap around salty, herbal undertones, finishing crisp and light.",Turbine White,Anaba
"Barrel-fermented in neutral oak, this is ready to drink, softly flavorful with yellow apple and other yellow fruits, and a warm, autumnal mouthfeel. Drink now through 2018.",Old Mill,Ancient Cellars
"Totally intense, perfumed, spicy and rich in botrytis honey, this is a great sweet wine. Tropical fruits are combined with lime marmalade, the concentration balanced by formidable acidity. Keep this superb wine many years.",Trockenbeerenauslese,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"This beautiful dry Riesling highlights intense minerality against a delicate backdrop of white blossoms, lemon-peel and lanolin notes. It's richly textured with ripe tangerine and peach flavors that finish long with a steely, honed focus.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr GG Trocken,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"For price and quality, Le Dix 2010 takes things to a high level. The nose on this Cabernet-led blend is full of violet, lilac, cassis and mild oak. The palate is multilayered and has a complex feel to it, while flavors of baked berry, cassis, coffee and marzipan finish with size and length. This is one of the most balanced and complete versions of Le Dix to date. Drink from 2014_2022.",Le Dix de Los Vascos,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"There is deliciously pure fruit here, rich certainly but with a straight line to pear, sweet orange and peach flavors. Behind the fruity exterior is a more structured core, showing spice as well as density and final acidity. Age for three years and more.",Ried Loibenberg Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"Smoke and violet florals add nuance to sweet quince jelly and yellow peach notes on this vibrant, mouthwatering Riesling. It's delicate in frame, but penetrates the palate with rich, juicy fruit and a shower of orange acidity that carries a long finish.",_rziger Würzgarten Auslese,Dr. Loosen
"Delicate orange blossom and honey flavors meld with fresh, green herbal notes on this elegant, yet lushly textured, Riesling. The palate is off-dry with concentrated white peach flavors, but finishes dry on a lingering chalky note.",Hattenheimer Wisselbrunnen Auslese,Baron Knyphausen
"Deep, lush aromas of cassis, blackberry and baked plum come with herbal hints and balsamic notes. This feels full, slightly rich, creamy and focused, with toasty flavors of dark fruits, chocolate and herbs. It's a delicious wine with clarity and a satisfying finish. Drink now through 2015.",Hacienda Araucano Alka Estate Bottled,François Lurton
"Sort of a reserve version of the Zachary's Ladder, this is a 60/40 Syrah/Cabernet blend. Some of the Syrah has been barrel fermented, and the finished wine spent 21 months in new French oak. Thick and tannic, it is still settling into itself, but offers rich components__itrus, acid, spice, stem, chocolate, earth, dust and that dense black fruit core. The tannins are fine-grained and fulsome.",The Evil Twin,Gorman
"This is one of eight new 2010 Cabernet or Bordeaux-style blends from the winery, and they're all very fine wines, more alike than not. The Spaulding is mainly Cabernet Sauvignon, with some Merlot and Petit Verdot. It's moderate in alcohol, bone dry and enormously tannic, with classic black currant and dark chocolate flavors that finish complex and hard with minerals. Will develop for many years. Best after 2018.",Spaulding Vineyard,Von Strasser
"While lithe and dainty in structure, this little Riesling packs a big punch of floral and honeyed fruit flavor. It's rich and complex with notes of smoke, caramelized sugar, and layers of crushed rocks that linger on the long, orange-scented finish.",Auslese,Schloss Vollrads
"At almost five years of age, this wine is mellow, smooth and incredibly good. It shows classic Cabernet flavors of blackberries and sweet cassis liqueur. It is beautifully concentrated with ripe fruit just starting to develop interesting, aged characteristics. Just beautiful for drinking now, and should continue to evolve in the bottle for at least six more years.",Kidd Ranch,Sequum
"Exceedingly rich and sweet in blackberries, currants and chocolate, this Cab is also high in alcohol, but there's no heat. The glycerine-like sweetness is part of the enjoyable package. 100% new French oak is not out of balance, bringing sweet vanilla and toast to the package. Defines the Paso style of warmth, opulence and soft deliciousness.",Passing By,Jada Vineyard & Winery
"Intensely earthy notes of honey and wax, and just the faintest whiff of petrol, are enticing precursors of maturity within an otherwise delightfully fresh, fruity Riesling. It's delicately crisp on the palate, but ends with a long, lanolin-coated finish.",Graacher Himmelreich Auslese,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"Smoky and dark with violet and heather tones, there's a sexy subtlety to this complex, shadowy wine. The palate is bright and sunny with ripe fruit flavor, but it's quite dry in style, with an intense shower of crushed minerals and lime acidity that penetrate the finish.",Scharzhofberger GG Trocken,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"Though generally tight and backward upon release, Eyrie Pinots have an astonishing track record for ageability. This beautifully-defined effort should be no exception. Beet root, cranberry and dusty spices are hung on a crystal frame. Tasted blind, it might pass for a very fine young Barbaresco.",Original Vines Reserve,The Eyrie Vineyards
"Dry and steely in focus, yet ebulliently fruity and floral on the nose and palate, there's so much dimension to this fantastic Riesling. Intensely ripe stonefruit flavors leave an irresistible glycerine slick on the palate, but it finishes clean with a shower of crushed-stone minerality and steel.",Wallhausen Felseneck GG Trocken,Prinz Salm
"This stunning Riesling is a showcase of Riesling's incredible propensity for dimension and harmony, balancing fruit and earth notes with an array of exotic spice. It's juicy and ripe with sweet stonefruit flavor, but shines with piercing acidity and minerality.",Serrig Schloss Saarsteiner Auslese,Schloss Saarstein
"There's so much ripe, lush peach and quince flavor in this intensely concentrated Riesling, but the palate is dry and nuanced. Fruit melds into layers of crushed slate, ash, and herbal green notes, finishing long with a hint of smoky petrol.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr GG Old Vines Dry,S.A. Prüm
"This is one of Von Strasser's newer bottlings, with the grapes planted only in 2001. It is a designation to watch for its intensity, purity and longevity. Enormously focused in black currants, dark chocolate and moo shu plum sauce, it shows the hard tannins of a young Diamond Mountain Cab. The winemaker has unusually added a small percentage of Zinfandel to the blend. Should begin to blossom after 2018.",Agira Vineyard,Von Strasser
"Dusted Valley is really rockin' it in 2010, with outstanding varietal releases of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, and this yummy Malbec. A big entry brings blackberry and cassis into the palate, with peppery highlights. Nice details of herb and tobacco are found, as the wine seems to get more powerful the longer it lingers in the mouth.",,Dusted Valley
"A rare, arresting varietal bottling of Cinsault__orget for a moment that it's also vineyard designated. It boasts intoxicating notes of fresh boysenberries, cherries, herbs, and peppery spice. It's silky and fruit filled with an incredible sense of freshness and purity that is nothing short of dazzling.",Cinsaut Stone Tree Vineyard,Dusted Valley
"Originally planted by a Bordeaux grower, Vignelaure makes its top red from Cabernet Sauvignon with the addition of Grenache and Syrah. This now mature wine is a impressive, ripe and rich, with mushroom, spice and a juicy character. Drink now, or age for a few more years.",,Château Vignelaure
"Tight, bright acidity leads off this elegant, perfumed wine. With its white fruit and citrus flavors it is both rich and refreshing. A fine mineral streak runs right through this complex, certainly ageworthy wine.",Ried Loibenberg Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"The price on this wine is laughable, but the quality is excellent. Earthy aromas of lead pencil, baked plum, cassis and black cherry include chocolate and minerality. The palate is rich, jammy and a touch stewy, with herbal blackberry, cassis, chocoalte and coffee flavors. Even more chocolate and licorice rise up on the long finish. Put this away until 2015, then drink through 2024.",Viñedo Chadwick,Errazuriz
"Shows the estate vineyard's signature in the moderate alcohol, sleek, streamlined mouthfeel, bright acidity and intensity of flavor. It's laser-like in lime, mango, honey and vanilla, with minerally overtones that taste of the earth. Drink now, as it is very fine and delicious.",Estate Vineyard,Failla
"A gorgeous wine that shows delicate silkiness and complexity, with a light, airy mouthfeel. Yet it's enormously rich and concentrated in raspberries and cherries. Crisp acidity makes for a clean finish, making this Pinot worth repeated sipping.",Graham Family Vineyard,August West
"Sold through the wine club. Excellent concentration in this ripe, full-bodied Riesling. It delivers a boat-load of fruit flavors, explosive aromatics and marvelous length. Citrus, peach and pear fruit is underscored with delicate minerality. Juicy, sappy and long.",Estate,Figgins
"With an alcohol reading of only 13.3%, this Pinot offers a refreshingly light alternative to darker, heavier bottlings in California. It's silky in the mouth, despite some firm tannins, with subtle, complex raspberry, red currant, tobacco, mushroom, balsam and spice flavors. Lovely now, and should have no trouble developing in the bottle over the next eight years.",Burnside Road Vineyard Estate,Balletto
"A very nice interpretation of coastal Chardonnnay, from this increasingly well-regarded vineyard. It's rich in notes of peach smoothie, pineapple tart, buttered toast, vanilla, honey and creamy lees, yet manages to finish dry. Brightened by crisp acidity, it never loses a sense of pin-pointed focus. Drink now.",Soberanes Vineyard,Lucia
"A buzz is building around Calaveras County-based La Folia, and this lovely wine shows why. Opening with a subtle oaky aroma, it evolves to offer a lightness of color and texture, enveloped by delicious highlights of cherry and cranberry fruit. Well integrated and well structured, this Sangiovese ends with a long and satisfying finish of violet-inflected plum.",,La Folia Winery
Here's a no-fuss Pinot Grigio with aromas of peach or melon and a slightly fat or oily feel in the mouth. Pair this wine with acidic foods like lemon chicken.,,Benedetto
"Campo Gialli (from organically farmed Chardonnay grapes) opens with a deep, off-gold color and slightly oxidized aromas of butterscotch, resin and candied fruit.",Campo Gialli,La Traiana
"Way too sweet. Tastes like they took a decent, tropical fruity Chardonnay and added a bunch of white sugar.",,Murphy-Goode
"With matchstick, pith and sulfur in addition to standard melon, apple and peach aromas, the start is rough. In the mouth, it's gritty and oily feeling, with citrus and apple flavors. Then bitterness and pith come into play on the finish.",,Nice
"Typical orange, lychee and pineapple aromas set it off in the right direction. In the mouth, however, it's angular and lean, with hard, narrow flavors of tart citrus and lychee. Bites on the finish, which is oily in texture.",,N_made
"The acidity on this Pinot Grigio is almost bracing, so sour lemon in overall character as to be nearly puckering. A rich seafood pairing might help steer it right.",Blue's Creek Vineyard,Middle Ridge
"Ripe blackberry and cherry fruit flavors mark this wine, along with oak-like caramelized sweetness. It's a rustic sipper for drinking now.",,Donovan-Parke
"Sweet, grapey and candy in a glass, with blueberry aromas. Feels rubbery and jammy, with stewed berry and herbal flavors. If ganador is __inner_ in Spanish, this doesn't quite qualify.",,El Ganador
"Surprisingly flat smelling and borderline oxidized, with jammy berry aromas setting up a chunky palate with herbal berry and candied flavors. Lacks clarity and does not rise to the occasion.",Calathus Roble,Finca Don Carlos
"Gaseous, oily and flowery on the bouquet, with lemon and apple notes. Feels round and adequately acidic, with stalky, burnt flavors of lemon and melon. Short and rough on the finish.",Altosur,Finca Sophenia
"With a watery taste, this soft, simple little Pinot Noir has modest raspberry and cherry flavors.",Reserve,Angeline
"This high-alcohol mountain Zin seems to have already lost its zip, dominated by a raisiny overripeness that skirts dangerously into syrup land.",Ten Zin,Deaver
"Made from undisclosed grape varieties, this is a country-style wine, soft and frankly sweet, with ripe berry and spice flavors.",Red Rhythm,B&E;
"This golden Chardonnay from central Italy offers mature apricot, butterscotch and honey aromas backed by a thick, creamy mouthfeel. There's a nice touch of dried sage on the close as well.",Pan,Bosco Nestore
"A lot of the fruit here comes from Lodi and that would be all well and good except the initially pleasing tropical nature of this wine, its guava and mango, full mouthfeel and texture, is wrecked by the high alcohol, which is hard to not notice, as is the wine's very sour finish.",Reserve,Martin Lane Winery
"Bland and almondy on the bouquet, with an oily accent. Feels lightly spritzy but beyond that it's simply wet and acidic. Tastes lemony, sharp and bland, with a lasting citric finish.",,Solsticio
Not much fruit shows up on the bouquet but there is a bland sense of vanilla and cookies. Feels heavy but with adequate citric acidity. Tastes monotone and lemony.,,Casa de Campo
"Nana was probably a wonderful woman but this Zin is a little musky, closed off and chewy with a taste of cherry cordial and baked plum jam.",Nana's Vineyard,Deaver
"With sugary-sweet blackberry and cherry flavors and a veneer of caramelized oak, this is a pretty simple Cabernet. The official alcohol reading is astonishingly low, only 12.5%.",,Laurier
"Airy and inoffensive on the nose, with a hint of apple. It's fresh but clumsy on the palate, with a rough feel and slightly mealy flavors of cider and white pepper. Citrusy, with a touch of burn on the finish.",Extra Brut,Medanos
"Oily, with a peach-pit bitterness to the nose. Feels citrusy but dilute, with lemony flavors that fold in green apple. Wet but bland on the finish. An extremely simple wine.",Centenario Reserve,Graffigna
"Hard and capped on the bouquet, with plastic aromas, dry oak, milk chocolate and mint. Feels resiny and cloying, with wood-led flavors and resin. Tastes bland and overoaked for what it is.",Premium,Piattelli
"An old-style, rustic type of CS with earthy, leafy aromas of tobacco and dry fruit. Tastes as much of tomato as it does berry fruit, with light oak and tobacco in the backdrop. Dry and woody on the finish, with a remnant of red berry flavor.",Trumpeter,Rutini
"A rustic, tannic Zin, with sweet flavors of red berries, oranges and pepper that finish with a scour of acidity.",,Zina Hyde Cunningham
"D'Orsaria is a thick Pinot Grigio that could use a touch more acidity in the mouth. Freshness aside, it does deliver thick aromas of peach and pineapple.",D'Orsaria,Marco Cecchini
"A touch green and horsey smelling, with tomato and leafy berry aromas. Feels heavy and bullish, with a beam of acid pushing plum flavors that end in a short, simple finish.",,Noble Aconcagua
A hint of honeysuckle and orange blossom graces the red apple and juicy melon fruit flavors. Tangy and a touch astringent in the mouth with a finish of bitter citrus pith.,,Rooiberg
"Aromas of talc, citrus and flowers start this Muscat, but are somewhat strange. The flavors of flowers, lemon and tropical fruit are appealing, but overall, the wine lacks unity and focus.",Phelonoe,Petros Honas
"This wood-aged Greco (the wine matures in large oak casks) displays a deep, off-gold appearance and slightly oxidized aromas of caramel, butterscotch and candied fruit.",Tenuta Oppida Aminea Caucino,Fratelli Muratori
"As sweet and simple as an orange cream soda drink, although it's also oaky and the alcohol gives it body.",,St. Francis
"Sourced from Kiona's End of the Road vineyard, this pure Carmenère is packed with plenty of that grape's pyrazine and stem scents and flavors. A splash of Cabernet Franc was added to the final blend. Somehow flavors of mint and chocolate have been introduced, along with the quite tart, pale red fruits.",,Animale
"This thick, extracted wine is made from 70% Pallagrello and 30% Casavecchia grapes, a portion of which was overripened on the vine. It opens with aromas of leafy underbrush, oak, toast, prune and vanilla. The lumbering, monolithic palate is sugary-sweet, offering vanilla extract, toasted oak and sugar plum.",Piancastelli,Terre del Principe
"This wine opens with aromas of sawdust, oak, tire rubber, coffee and mature black fruit. The palate is also dominated by wood sensations, offering oak extract, roasted coffee bean, vanilla and espresso that smother the hints of ripe black plum that peek through.",,Vestini Campagnano
"A kitchen sink blend of white grapes, it comes together with interesting if slightly disjointed effects. There is honey and slight buttercream on the nose (likely from the Chardonnay lead). Once sipped, lush fruit comes to the fore, characterized by caramelized pear (probably the Viognier). On top of that, there is tangy acidity and slight tarriness.",Gold,Quadrant
"This is black as night, concentrated and shows aromas of asphalt, lemon peel and blackberry. The palate is round and soft, with mellow tannins. The flavor profile is very ripe and focuses on prune and blackberry, while the finish is loamy in feel, with a licorice hint.",Flores de Callejo,Felix Callejo
"The wine is closed, but has potential. At the moment, the wood and texture dominate, but there are signs of ripe apple and pear fruits that will come through in a few months. Wait until the end of 2014.",Vieilles Vignes,Collovray et Terrier
"Classically aromatic and slightly grassy, it has touches of sweet pineapple and vanilla dancing throughout the soft layers of easy-drinking acidity and crispness.",,Decoy
"This blend of 70% Nero d'Avola and 30% Syrah opens with aromas of blackberry and blue flower. The lean palate is drying out, but still offers a black cherry note and astringent wood tannins that give it an abrupt, drying finish.",Helios,Di Giovanna
"This dense Aglianico opens with aromas that recall resin, nail polish remover, stewed plum and chocolate. The meaty palate offers overripe black cherry and prune alongside aggressive tannins but it's evolved and shy on freshness. It finishes abruptly, with an astringent, tannic close.",,Sanpaolo
"Exotic strips of lemon zest mark this wine, followed by intense acidity that begs for food to tame it down. The vineyards involved are on the cooler side. Expect spice and tangy grapefruit to glide on the finish.",,Schug
"Deep red violet to the eye, this wine offers aromas of ripe cherry, pomegranate and orange zest. There is a sensation of coolness dominating fruit, with flavors of blackberry, pomegranate, menthol, clove and orange zest. It is a bit chewy on the palate; the strong tannins are crying out to be served alongside grilled lamb or beef.",,Selendi
"A wisp of smoke lends nuance to aromas of apple and white peach on this dry, refreshingly citric Chardonnay. The palate builds in bulk and body with concentrated flavors of savory apples layered in smoke and earth. Drink now.",,Silver Thread
"Fresh and fruity, this crisp wine comes from a region near Chablis. Good acidity, lively citrus and a cool feel all work well together.",,Simonnet-Febvre
"Wisps of smoke and spice lend an earthy tone to bright red cherry and plum flavors on this smooth, richly textured Cabernet Franc. The palate is velvety plush with layers of fine, soft tannins and soft berry acidity. Easy going but satisfying.",,Six Mile Creek
"This dense Taurasi opens with black fruit, toasted oak and chocolate aromas. The extracted palate shows a heavy oak influence and is framed by coffee, mocha and vanilla alongside evident alcohol and bitter, raw wood tannins.",Opera Mia,Tenuta Cavalier Pepe
"This unpretentious wine has a light fragrance of blue flower and black berry, while the simple palate offers fleeting black cherry flavors.",,TerrAmore
"A strong wood element dominates this wine. It's all toasty and juicy from wood aging rather than fruit. It does have the weight to suggest some fruit for the future, but the wood, with its bite and tang, will always be a strong presence.",Marie Antoinette,Vincent
"Fresh apple and pear are slicked with honey on this bold, full-bodied Riesling. While dry in style, it's lush and fruity with a bristle of lemon-lime acidity that shines on the finish.",Caywood East Vineyard Dry,Wagner
"A pale pink color, it brings notes of strawberry and watermelon, drinking dry with tart cherry flavors and a slightly clipped finish.",Rosé,Waterbrook
"Dark in color, this soft, leathery Zin offers tangents of blackberry, chocolate and espresso within a heavy-handed package of serious fruit and weight.",,Wilson
"This Rosé of Sangiovese is light in color and density, with fruit flavors of watermelon and a hint of peach. It's a fine, light and easy sipper.",Ruby,Airfield Estates
"The alcohol has dropped to just above 12% in this vintage, and the wine seems a tad underripe. Overtly grassy and pungent, it suggests with petrol, gooseberry and green banana. Drink it well-chilled.",,Airfield Estates
"Tight and crisp, it has a mineral character. Nervy acidity combines with lemon and apple skin flavors, giving a fresh, textured wine. Drink from 2015.",Le Chai des Platanes,Ferraud et Fils
"This informal wine opens with dainty aromas of black and red berries together with a whiff of baking spice. The simple palate offers fleeting black cherry and raspberry notes alongside the barest hint of clove. It's made to be drunk young, so enjoy soon.",,Fi_Nobile
"Tannic and earthy, it falls on the dark, herbal side, cloaking its cassis fruit in flavors of tannin and stem. It's best drunk with grilled meats, or a good, greasy pizza.",,Girly Girl
"Lemon verbena and blossom perfume this bright, fresh, medium-bodied Riesling. There's a bit of a confectionery tone to the rich, ripe honeydew and apricot flavors on the mid palate, but squeaky-clean citrus acidity wraps things up tight.",Dalrymple Vineyard Select Harvest,Glenora
"An all-purpose red, it has pretty fruit scents and flavors of strawberry and cherry candy. There's also a suggestion of café latté and a hint of cinnamon.",,Grace Lane
"Rich and soft, it offers a ripe cushion of Chardonnay and a warm, rounded personality. While it misses out on a more structured character, the yellow fruits and light spice from wood aging give immediate drinkability.",Marissou Premier Cru,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
This attractive wine has good acidity as well as attractive red berry fruits. It's ready to drink with its soft fruitiness and light tannins.,,Joseph Drouhin
"Rounded, soft and gentle, it has attractive tropical fruit flavors along with a touch of lime to give crispness. Ready to drink.",,Louis Latour
"This opens with raisin and prune aromas, punctuated by whiffs of thyme and mint. The palate offers raisin and toasted oak sensations layered with chocolate notes. You'll also detect very evident alcohol and a warm midpalate.",Acinatico,Stefano Accordini
"This delightful Prosecco shows floral aromas of white spring flowers, with hints of peach and grapefruit. The palate offers flavors of Golden Delicous apple and while it's simple, it's also well made and refreshing.",,Prima Cuvee
"Rubbery, woodsy aromas of wild berries and balsamic vinegar are spicy and suggestive of Bordeaux. Leafy flavors of plum, pie cherry and spice are herbal but not green, while this value blend's peppery, dry finish is juicy and composed.",Crianza,Príncipe de Viana
"You'll find distinct flavors of softened Dr. Pepper cola and black currants in this robust Cabernet. It has the brambly, peppery personality of Zinfandel, but with Cab's more elegant structure. Drink up.",Three Vineyards,Pedroncelli
"This has somewhat closed aromas, with hints of stewed prune and spirit-soaked cherries. The palate is better, with ripe plum, raisin and black licorice flavors.",Vigneti di Torbi,Cantina Valpolicella Negrar
"This Bordeaux-style blend is borderline sour, with tart, barely ripe fruit flavors and an herbaceous finish. Despite the cool climate flavors, it shows a bit of heat in the finish, and seems to be aging quickly. Drink up.",The Royale Red,Scarborough
"Aromas of white currant and green pear are combined with accents of pine and citrus blossom in this blend of Vidal Blanc, Traminette, Viognier and Petite Manseng. The medium-bodied palate tastes off-dry (50g/L residual sugar), and the acidity feels tempered by the sweetness. It finishes with a tropical fruit flavor, a tang of minerality and energy.",,Annefield Vineyards
"A rare Pinot Noir rosé from Washington state, this is unabashedly ripe and pink, but not at all sugary. It offers a burst of strawberry and watermelon candy flavors, like a good, long lasting taste of saltwater taffy.",Pino,J Bell Cellars
"Standard apple aromas come with hints of sulfur. The palate on this off-dry Cava is flat and easy, while flavors of nectarine and passion fruit finish grassy but also a bit citrusy.",Cordon Negro Extra Dry,Freixenet
"Whole berry pressed with 11% saignee from Syrah and Primitivo rounding out the blend, it's a very pretty, pale salmon color with notes of strawberry, watermelon and mineral. It drinks medium sweet with abundant cherry flavors.",Barbera,Gecko
"Some unripe vegetal flavors mar this blend of Zinfandel, Syrah and Petite Sirah. It's softly tannic, and what fruit there is suggests sweetened cherry pie.",The Devious Woman,JR Wine
"This Amarone has an overripe black fruit aromas, with a hint of nail varnish. The palate shows raisin and spice flavors, but is dominated by oak and evident alcohol.",Camporocco,Le Marognole
"Just a tad honeyed, but crisp acidity helps to provide balance. The apricot, tangerine, lime and vanilla flavors are easy to like.",Single Vineyard,Noble Vines
A light and fruity wine with attractive red fruits and acidity. There is just a touch of tannin to hold the friendly fruitiness together.,,Vignerons de Buxy
"Walnut and almond aromas share the bouquet with melon and apple scents. This feels fleshy and resiny, with a generic mix of white-fruit flavors and oak. A bulky, woody, creamy finish with tropical fruit flavors is kept afloat by firm acidity.",Finca Las Palmas Gran Reserva,Trapiche
"This is fresh and jumpy on the nose, with foxy berry and plum aromas. An edgy, slightly scratchy mouthfeel comes with flavors of blueberry, boysenberry and herbal notes. This standard Tempranillo finishes minty, with licorice hints.",,Paso a Paso
"Just 75% Cabernet, the rest a mix of Merlot, Syrah and Petit Verdot, this turns generic, with bitter berry flavors. There's a little toastiness backing the tannins but a short finish, overall.",,Mercer
"Pale salmon colored, this is a fairly aromatic rosé with notes of strawberry, bubblegum and cherry. It's off-dry, leaning toward medium sweet and needs a bit more acidity to stand it up.",Tempranillo,Michael Florentino
"Treads the line between off-dry and sweet, with honey, apricot, orange, peach and vanilla flavors. With a hit of acidity on the finish, it's easy to drink and the alcohol is refreshingly low.",,Mirassou
"This is one of those wines that doesn't try to be anything except an easy drinker. Made from Zinfandel and Syrah, it's filled with ripe, sunny California flavors of raspberries and cherries, and will pair well with everyday foods like pizza and hamburgers.",,Rumpus
"Light, herbaceous wine, very fruity, full of greengage and gooseberry flavors. It's tight, fresh and crisp, ready to drink.",Pigmentum Blanc,Georges Vigouroux
"A forward, fruity wine, full of apple and creamed pear flavors. The acidity is light, bright and attractive giving a wine that is fresh and ready to drink.",Le Renard,Domaines Devillard
"Although Argentina is hardly Pinot Grigio country, this is a tropical-style quaffer with good balance and enough acidity to avoid coming across heavy. Creamy aromas of melon and lychee set up flavors of nectarine and tangerine. A lasting but modest finish is fair and appropriate.",Oak Cask,Trapiche
"Pure Cabernet is on display here, offering modestly interesting flavors for the price. It's leafy and light, with strawberry and herb. Tannins are herbal and balanced.",,For a Song
"High alcohol gives this wine a distinct jalapeño chile pepper burn. It's also a little overripe, with traces of bitter raisin skins in the finish. A disappointment from this fine winery.",Ellie's,Hall
"This is scoury in the mouth, with edgy corners framing straightforward orange and lime flavors. The midpalate is marked delicately with leesy sourdough notes.",Vintage Brut,Chandon
"This wine is ripe and lush in style, but hints of tart lemons and limes add brightness and an acidic edge. The finish is a tad candied.",Rivers Ranch,Apsara
"Cline makes a lot of this wine and they do a good job with it. Soft and leathery in spicy baked plum and blackberry, this is a perfet wine to pair with a myriad of midweek meals and outdoor parties.",,Cline
"Apple and mild spice aromas precede a blocky, wide, almost thick palate that foams up with palate contact. This tastes toasty and baked, with melon and apple notes sitting on top of a full, round, somewhat flat-feeling finish.",Anna de Codorniu Brut,Codorníu
"A standard Pinot Noir, soft and extracted in cherry and raspberry pie filling. It has a nice, silky texture and good acidity.",,De Loach
"This selection opens with bold aromas of black cherry, spice, dark chocolate and tobacco. On the palate, dark berry notes dominate, accented by savory tones. The wine is fresh and extracted.",Cantalici Messer Ridolfo Riserva,L'Antica Fornace di Ridolfo
"Notes of musk, baked apple, citrus and spice are warm and mysterious on the nose of this penetrating Slovenian Pinot Grigio. Intense and fruity on the palate, this has ripe apple and pear flavors, with layers of honey, dark flower, caramel and tea that add complexity.",,Movia
"Mt. Difficulty's Pinots have resisted the trend toward ever-softer textures, even in this, the winery's entry-level bottling. Instead, the wine is firmly structured. Savory, dark-skinned plum fruit is accented by plenty of briary spice. Drink from 2014_2020.",Roaring Meg,Mt. Difficulty
"Smooth and round, this wine has bright acidity, tempered by the toast and sweet apricot flavors. It has a structured core, and it finishes with the acidity. Age this for 2_3 years.",Charmois Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"While Pernand-Vergelesses, which is located in the shadow of the Corton-Charlemagne hill, is a lesser-known appellation, it produces some attractive, crisp wines such as this selection. Carefully balanced wood aging enhances the pear and Golden Delicious apple flavors, which come with a touch of minerality. Textured and fruity on the finish.",,Olivier Leflaive
"The four-decade-old vines have lent this wine unusual flavors of forest mushroom, lemon rind and verbena. It tastes completely dry, and it has a tartness that carries through the palate. Drink this with herb-roasted chicken or pasta primavera.",Solstice Vineyard,Pacific Rim
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Petit Verdot, this delivers soft, concentrated flavors of chocolate fudge, cherry and cinnamon spice. It's an irresistible, opulent wine that promises to impress.",Volpolo,Podere Sapaio
"A cheerful blend of Alicante, Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot in equal measures, this is partially aged in oak to give the wine a zesty touch of spice behind the notes of cherry, blackberry and plum. The palate is soft, with mild structure, and it finishes chewy and fruity.",Poggio Verrano 3,Poggio Verrano
"Made from fruit that was sourced from Olsen Vineyards, this Syrah's blackberry, cherry and pepper flavors and fine-grained tannins combine to make a wine with good length and a clean finish.",,Purple Star
"Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon are blended to create a soft, luscious wine that's loaded with bright cherry, rich chocolate and mocha flavors. It would pair beautifully with steak in green-pepper cream sauce.",Pergolaia,Caiarossa
"A new brand from Campolargo, this is firmly tannic, and it shows off the Baga grape. It needs several years of aging.",Vinha do Putto,Campolargo
"This dark-colored blend of Touriga Nacional and Castelão shows intense fruitiness and concentrated structure. A full-bodied and black-fruit-driven wine, this will age over the next few years, and the tannins will round out to add more richness.",Cabeça de Toiro Reserva Touriga Nacional-Castelão,Caves Velhas
"Aromatically intense, with notes of dried peach, orange cream and vanilla, this blend of Chardonnay, Gewürztraminer and Malvasia aims to push the envelope with its rich, almost-fluffy texture, and its penetrating red-berry, stone-fruit and citrus flavors. The grapes were crushed by foot, and skin contact was employed during fermentation. This is a decadent, unusual, oak-aged orange wine.",Envelope,Channing Daughters
"This pretty riserva from the up-and-coming Montecucco area of coastal Tuscany, which is located roughly between Bolgheri and Montalcino, shows deep nuances of cherry, blackberry and cassis, followed by notes of leather and tobacco. The palate is velvety and fresh.",Riserva,Collemassari
"This riserva shows clean, polished lines, and it offers bright nuances of cherry, blackberry, leather and moist earth. The mouthfeel is crisp but powerful, and there's a lingering sensation of forest berry and chopped herb on the finish.",Riserva,Castellare di Castellina
"While this lacks some of the immediate appeal of prior vintages, it's a better structured wine, with tannins and a rich vein of acidity that gives a framework to the flavors of blackberries, roasted meats, currants and pepper. Give this 3_4 years in the cellar.",Walker Vine Hill,Donelan
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc, this offers a clean, polished feel, as well as tightly woven forest-fruit and mineral tones. There's a blast of freshness that's followed by soft cherry and tangy herb endnotes.",,Donna Olimpia 1898
"Orange blossom, apricot and honey notes give the bouquet an opulent edge. On the palate, it's a wave of lush peach, apricot and honey flavors, finished with a delicate spice note. This will pair with everything from poultry to ethnic cuisine to fruit salad.",Ovilos,Estate Biblia Chora
"High-toned aromas of dried peach, apple, spice and sandalwood in this qvevri-aged wine give way to a rich, almost silky palate that bursts with notes of yellow flowers and honey-tinged oolong tea. Bright, citrusy acids and bracing, tea-like tannins extend on the long finish.",Kvevri Wine,Antadze
"Soft and ripe, this wine has juicy pineapple and pear flavors. And with its tension between richness and steeliness, this could certainly age.",Château de Rully Cuvée R. de Ternay,Antonin Rodet
"With it's brisk acidity and tangy minerality that gird the Asian pear and tropical fruit flavors, this wine expresses its coastal origin as well as the cool vintage. It feels streamlined and elegant.",,Benovia
"This blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon and 30% Cabernet Franc shows soft tones of milk chocolate and plush cherry, backed by a tangy spice note. The fruit feels ripe and round, although the palate remains firmly structured thanks to the polished tannins.",Pe_n,Batzella
"This wine has equal amounts of ripe berry fruit and structure. There is a smoky character, wood and spice notes, balanced acidity and a leather-like touch to the texture. It is slowly developing, and it has the potential to be rich. Age this for 6_8 years.",Domaine du Clos Frantin,Albert Bichot
"This shows classic Cabernet Sauvignon character, and there's even a Bordeaux-like earthiness that grounds the cherry, currant and cedar flavors. Made from fruit grown in the winery's Alexander Valley vineyard, this is ideal for drinking now.",Block Collection Walking Tree,Geyser Peak
"This tastes bone dry, and it offers acidity that's so clean and racy, it makes your mouth feel like it's shining. The flavors of limes, lemons, hay, white pepper and vanilla are delightful.",,Geyser Peak
"Goldwater originally made its name as a Waiheke Island boutique winery, but the fruit for this Pinot Noir is drawn from Marlborough's main Wairau Valley. Its pretty cherry fruit is marked by hints of cedar, mocha and baking spices that finish balanced and  long. Drink now_2017.",,Goldwater
"This is rich and appealing now for its ripe flavors of raspberry and cherry that taste as if they were baked in a sweet, smoky pie crust. The acidity provides a pleasant tartness. It should age well over the next 3_5 years.",Bien Nacido Vineyard,La Fenêtre
"This Zinfandel's tannins are starting to resolve, which gives the palate a soft, melted quality. The primary flavors are transforming into rich, dried black-raspberry and cherry notes, with leather, mocha, dried mushroom and spice accents.",Mancini Ranch,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"Soft, fruity and spicy, this Zinfandel is starting to pick up some bottle-age notes. The currant and black raspberry flavors are joined by sautéed mushroom and charred bone accents. The rich tannins suggest pairing it with roasted or barbecued meats.",Meeks Hilltop Ranch,Wellington
"Big, robust and fleshy on the palate, this Pinot Noir is packed with cherry, cranberry and Dr. Pepper flavors. It should mellow in 6_7 years.",,Wild Hog
"This has apple and nectarine aromas that are a touch briny. It shows good acidity and mouthfeel, with flavors of apple, peach and even some green bean.",Broquel,Trapiche
"South Coast's winemaker used 100% Syrah from the 2010 vintage to make this fun, red sparkler, which was once upon a time known as Cold Duck. It takes advantage of Syrah's big, bold berry flavors, while smelling intensely sweet, like a Jamba Juice smoothie. Very foamy on opening; let it settle and drink it supercold.",Ruby Cuvée,South Coast
"Made with organically farmed fruit, this is light and easy, showing aromas of citrus, white flower and peach. The mouthfeel is creamy and slightly viscous on the finish.",,Saladini Pilastri
"Dense, heavy and meaty on the nose, this has stewed plum and earth notes. Heavy tannins make it grabby, while the flavors suggest stewed black fruits. Roasted tasting, it hits hard on the finish. Entirely different from Italian Nebbiolo.",Equinoccio,Lafarga
"Round and silky, this is a medium-bodied Saint-Joseph intended for early enjoyment. Blackberry and dusty earth shadings mingle easily on the palate, fading just a bit quickly on the finish.",,Les Vins de Vienne
"An easygoing, crisp and well-priced Chardonnay, this has swirls of smooth apple and pear.",,Cable Car
"This opens with a thick bouquet, bearing candy-like aromas of lemon soda, honey and apricot preserves. The finish is balanced with crisp freshness.",Eklektikos,Fattoria Laila
"Dry, crisp and nice, this has white fruit aromas that are familiar and friendly. It comes across medium bodied, dusty and yeasty, with an apple accent and a vanilla flavor. The finish is lightly toasted and slightly briny.",Carta Nevada Brut,Freixenet
"There's lots of sweet oak in this wine, with dominant flavors of buttered toast, buttered popcorn and vanilla. Underneath there's some nice apricot and tangerine fruit.",,Five Rows
"What this Pinot is not is ageable and dramatic, but it's a good expression of the variety: silky and dry, with savory cherry-skin and spice flavors.",,Fleur
"This is rich and smooth, with rounded and ripe fruit. Red apple, banana and lime flavors work together to yield a wine that's ready to drink.",Casa do Lago Branco,DFJ Vinhos
"Slightly sweet and heavy on the palate, this has raspberry jam and vanilla flavors.It's balanced by crisp Edna Valley acidity__ wine that will pair nicely with ham or sausage.",Estate Bottled,Chamisal Vineyards
"Earthy aromas lead to a palate that is full bodied, with notes of yeast and spice to go with the white fruit. It has attractive acidity and a tangy citrusy finish. Screwcap.",,Château Routas
"Black fruit aromas come with a dusty note and a hint of milk chocolate. This feels straightforward, with flavors of raspberry, mild herb and sugar beet. The finish is short and easy, with an approachable mouthfeel.",Lo Tengo,Bodega Norton
"This is fruity but simple on the nose, with plum and cherry aromas. It feels jammy and a touch muddled, with boysenberry, plum and blackberry flavors but not much oak character. It's grippy on the finish.",Conde de Valdemar Crianza,Bodegas Valdemar
"Made from Touriga Nacional, this is a deliciously light, crisp and clean strawberry-flavored wine. It has lively acidity and a real summer feel. Screwcap.",,Churchill's
"Tart and slightly herbal, with crisp red fruit that never really fills out on the palate. It's pleasant enough for an everyday quaff, just not particularly memorable.",,Château du Trignon
"This is a slightly sweet Sauvignon Blanc that's shy on the nose, without much depth or breadth.",Seven Brothers,Robledo
"Pungent and assertive, this budget-priced Pinot mixes wild berry fruit with accents of pine needle and herb.",,Underwood
"Tropical and friendly, this feels a little bulky and chunky, but with enough acidity for balance. Flavors of citrus and mango are medium intense, while the finish is soft. Drink soon.",Elsa,Valentin Bianchi
"Earthy, roasted scents sit atop mild cherry and raspberry aromas that carry a slight green element. It feels shrill but juicy, with red plum and raspberry flavors. It's mild, lightly herbal and snappy on the finish.",Hoya de Cadenas Reserva,Vicente Gandia
"The tea and raspberry aromas are easygoing, and that best describes this organic Cabernet Sauvignon. It's powerful enough on the palate, with a good berry flavor that tilts towards raspberry. The finish is herbal and peppery.",Organic,Vicente Gandia
"Nice and crisp in acidity, with a brisk, clean mouthfeel, this houses citrus and tropical fruit flavors. It seems a little sweet, so don't expect anything too dry.",Estate Grown,Provenance Vineyards
"This is rich and dry yet also fruity. Perfumed in character, it is full, soft and smooth, allowing the acidity a place on the finish.",Colheita,Quinta do Portal
"There's lots of zesty acidity in this ripe, forward Chardonnay. It features fruity flavors of oranges and apricots, with a touch of oak that lends a buttered toast note.",,Sean Minor
"Fragrant, fresh and fruity, this light and bright wine offers an herbal character to go with its citrus and green apple fruits. It is lively and crisp__ fine apéritif. Screwcap.",Domaine de Lamothe,Cheval Quancard
"Simple, fruity and sweet tasting, this has chocolate-covered raisin and blueberry jam flavors.",,Decoy
"This is fruity, with pear and baked apple flavors that lend a rich, spicy character. It has some weight along with an attractive touch of acidity.",Segada Branco,DFJ Vinhos
Modest orange and peach flavors are found in this oak-tinged wine. It offers the Chardonnay lover good pleasure.,Coastal Series,Arrow Creek
"A rare slip up from the talented Jaume family, this 100% Roussanne is swimming in smoky, toasty oak, with the fruit currently hidden. You could gamble on it bouncing back in 5_6 years, or just wait for the better-balanced 2010.",Domaine Grand Veneur La Fontaine,Alain Jaume et Fils
"This pure expression of Cabernet Franc is packed with black fruit, prune, sweet spice, leather and dark chocolate. There's a subtle sweetness to the mouthfeel that is fueled by those ripe fruit flavors.",Dragone,Domus Vitae
"This is a fun, creamy and rich wine made from a white grape native to Piedmont, Italy. This has intriguing tastes of sweet, tart fresh-squeezed lemonade, with a nutty, apple-driven acidity that lingers through the finish. Barrel-fermented, it would pair nicely with scallops.",,Enotria
"This expression is rich and smooth, with silky tones of melon, Golden Delicious apple and honeysuckle.",Prunar,Erste Neue
"It's intriguing to taste an aged Gewürztraminer like this. It has weight, richness and still plenty of spice. The fruit has been changed into a smooth, ripe texture that brings out sweetness, rather than freshness.",Cuvée Saint-Jacques,Frédéric Mallo
"Hugely extracted in cherry pie flavors, this Merlot makes up for the absence of subtlety with its sheer deliciousness. The tannins are soft, making it ideal for drinking now with steak.",,Frog's Leap
"Chunky, jammy and full of blackberry and boysenberry aromas, this is lively but limited in mouthfeel, with wild berry and savory flavors. It feels pointed and short on the finish, but overall it's dark, full and well made.",Tinto Figuero 12 Crianza,García Figuero
"Clean and leesy, this estate-grown Pinot Gris has a crisp mineral underpinning. Light celery and green melon flavors are balanced, showing good length and some finishing complexity.",Lawrence Vineyards,Gård
"Opening with a mouthful of dusty raspberry and cherry flavors, this Bordeaux blend of a little more than half Cabernet Sauvignon and smaller percentages of Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot offers much in the way of inviting fruit and spice notes. Its pleasing acidity lasts through the finish.",Conjugation,Fenestra
"A compelling Port-like wine made from Petite Sirah, ZInfandel and Syrah grapes aged more than 10 years to form this mix of almonds and sweet apple pie laced with caramel, smooth and easy to drink and pleasant in its Armagnac-like aromas. The almonds come back, laced in maple syrup, on the finish.",Tawny Port,Fenestra
"Clean and fresh, this features largely neutral, mineral-driven aromas that hint at white fruit and melon. Citrus, particularly white grapefruit, is the lead flavor, while background notes of pith, melon and green banana make appearances. Fresh, crisp and nice on the finish.",Single Vineyard,Finca de Arantei
"With hints of dried hay, white pepper, lemon, Asian pear and mineral that are brightened by searing acidity, this elegant, bone-dry wine will complement food__ot dominate it.",Estate Bottled,Foppiano
"Lovely scents of violet and black fruit open this dark, sappy Syrah. The mouthfeel is sleek and citrusy, with sharp acidity and a finish amplified by barrel-influenced flavors of coffee and licorice. Give this some extra decanting time and it will open up further.",,Forgeron
"A faint yeastiness subsides to expose luxurious aromas of violet, white peach and green herb on this single-vineyard Riesling. Lushly textured with flavors of yellow cherry and stone fruit, it has a steely, minerally tone that persists through the long finish.",Hobbit Hollow Vineyard,Heart & Hands
"Warm and creamy, this fills the palate with apple and pink grapefruit flavors. A touch of spice adds interest to this ripe, fruity effort that is ready to drink. Screwcap.",Falkensteiner Tradition,Dürnberg
"A full-bodied, ripe Pinot Noir that has gained concentration from the vintage, this has red plum and raspberry flavors, with smooth tannins and a dense texture. There is a smoky note from the wood.",Grande Cuvée,Cave de Ribeauvillé
"This is full of ripe raspberry flavor that is cut with lively acidity. It is a delicious, fruity, apéritif-style rosé with just a touch of zesty texture to tighten it up.",Tradition Rosé Brut,Chapuy
"Soft and ripe, smooth and creamy, this has a spicy element here the Pinot Gris in the blend, giving a piquancy to the white fruit flavor. It is warm, rounded and fragrant. Screwcap.",Gentil de Katz,Clément Klur
"Dry, spicy and rich, this is a pepper- and nutmeg-flavored wine. The ripe pear and melon flavors are concentrated and dense; the structure taut and minerally in character. It's a wine to age for 1_2 years.",Rosenberg,Domaine Barmès-Buecher
"Le Redini is predominantly Merlot, with a small component of Alicante. It opens with notes of bright cherry, leather, tobacco and spice. It shows bold roundness and soft berry nuances on the finish. It's a well-made and elegant wine with an easygoing personality.",Le Redini,Cavalli Tenuta degli Dei
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet and Refosco that's aged in French oak, this opens with bold, black intensity, bearing notes of dark fruit, ripe blackberry and sweet spice. The mouthfeel is chewy and soft, with a touch of pulpy sweetness on the close.",Soffumbergo,Comelli
"This wine displays the aggressive acidity typical of Central Coast Merlots. While it's rich and dry in raspberry, cherry and red currant flavors, with a fine note of smoky oak, the tartness is central. Pairing this with ham will help tame the acids.",Regan Vineyards Reserve,Bargetto
"Tannic and brooding in its big-boned structure, this high-elevation-grown Syrah will please Cabernet Sauvignon drinkers in its upfront oak and herb overtones. But it remains true to its varietal roots, offering bright Bing cherry, black plum and licorice, complete with loads of earthiness and ground pepper.",Canterbury Vineyard,Bell
"Metaphorically speaking, Chapoutier has put this wine right down the center of the fairway. An orange blossom aroma marks the nose, while melon and tangerine flavors take over on the palate. It's all remarkably balanced and pure, remaining long and refreshing on the palate. Try it as an apéritif.",,M. Chapoutier
"This is a dry and elegant style of Muscat, maintaining the grape's natural fragrance along with its acidity and refreshing green fruit flavor. That puts it in the food-friendly category, a wine to pair with difficult vegetables, such as asparagus or artichoke.",Sélection,Kuentz-Bas
"Hugel has always made a benchmark Pinot Noir. This has weight and richness. It does have a strong wood content that provides some bitterness, though it is rounded out by the note of ripe red plum, lifted by final acidity.",,Hugel
"__hole cluster_ refers to the fermentation practice of using intact clusters of grapes, rather than grapes that have been destemmed and crushed. This often results in an earthier, more tannic, spicier wine. This is big, rich and ripe, vast in cherry flavor, yet a little heavy.",Whole Cluster,Laetitia
"Made with 100% Grenache, this is fermented in neutral oak before being transferred to tank. It has substantial weight and spiced cherry flavor. Full bodied for a rosé, it can stand up to a variety of cured meats, pasta dishes and even salmon.",Alder Ridge Vineyard  Rosé,L'Ecole No. 41
"Although slightly unctuous, this decadent selection is hard to turn down thanks to its enticing aromas and flavors of honeyed apricot, preserved peach and quince paste. A soft accent of crushed rose petal adds depth to the nose, while a lingering gingery spice flavor freshens up the finish.",Les Petits Grains,Les Vignerons de la Méditerranée
"Applesauce, lime and mineral aromas comprise the shy bouquet on this Cava. It feels round yet alive, with crisp apple and peach flavors. Citrus-driven acidity comes out on the finish.",Brut Reserva Made with Organic Grapes,Marqués de Gelida
"Firm, gritty aromas of minerally black cherry and plum precede a palate that sizzles with bold, scouring acidity. It tastes woody, resiny and reasonably fruity, with forceful acids creating a tangy, zesty finish. Drink 2013_2017.",FA 206 Vinyes de Coster,Mas Igneus
"Once upon a time, this valley, south of San Francisco, was wine country. Today, it's Silicon Valley, but scattered vineyards still prove its worth. This is a lovely, food-friendly Pinot Noir, rich in fruit and acids, and elegantly balanced.",Estate,Sarah's Vineyard
"A nice richness and light honey note permeate the bouquet, accenting the solid core of red apple skin, peach pit and dried vanilla bean. Medium weight, with a very attractive sweet spice and charred egg-bread accented finish.",Toques et Clochers Océanique,Sieur d'Arques
"This is far and away the standout in the Wine By Joe lineup__ clean, medium-bodied, elegant Oregon Pinot Noir at a bargain price. Cherry and plum fruit is accented with light herb and cola notes, and the surprising finish lingers nicely.",,Wine by Joe
"San Calisto is a rich, pulpy and concentrated wine, with an inky black appearance and savory aromas of black pepper, clove, leather, tobacco and loads of mature jammy blackberry. The finish is smooth, velvety and bright.",San Calisto,Valle Reale
"Opens with lactic, slightly raisiny aromas that turn oakier and creamier with airing. Dense, rubbery and intense on the tongue, with dark flavors of blackberry and herb in the middle. Finishes long, earthy and slightly herbal, with tannic bite and grip. Drink now through 2014.",Nimbus Single Vineyard,Viña Casablanca
"From a top vintage year, this LBV has a fine richness and dry core to its blackberry-jelly and spice flavors. Despite being softened by wood aging, it could withstand a few more years in bottle.",Late Bottled Vintage,Niepoort
"Although this is labeled Vin de France, this is effectively a Cahors wine. It's soft and rounded, with tannins that are already integrated already into blackberry jam flavors. Rich, with a hint of dried fruit, this is ready to drink in a year.",Villa la Réserve,Lionel Osmin & Cie
"A solid, chunky wine whose tannins are still dominant. It has ripe black fruit flavors and a hint ofspice from wood aging. This is a wine that will develop well over the next 3_5 years.",Tinto,Quinta de Sant'Ana
A powerful__ossibly too powerful__ine that pushes forward with its superconcentrated black-fruit flavors. It fills the palate with richness and juiciness; this is a wine for lovers of blockbusters.,Vertice Grand Reserva Tinto,Caves Transmontanas
"A wood-dominated wine that is powerfully extracted. It is dense, with a bitter coffee character, followed by some juicy blackberry flavors. It is still all bare bones, very firm and dry.",Empyrée,Domaine le Bout du Lieu
"A fat style of white wine, with wood and ripe peach and apricot flavors. Rounded, rich and ripe, it is full of southern warmth, tempered by enticing acidity.",Collection,Domaine Vico
"An elegant wine that slides easily over the palate. Its red berry flavors have a firm edge that stiffens the initial softness. Its tannins and acidity make this a serious, food-friendly wine that could age.",Trincadeira-Aragonez,Alente
"As before, the Estate Selection is the bigger of the two Pinots from Amalie, textural and clean. Strawberry and raspberry fruit flavors hint at herb and stem, but all the details are in proportion and complement each other. Not for long aging, but drinking well right now.",Estate Selection,Amalie Robert
"More neutral than fruity or pungent, with vivacity and minerality on the bouquet. Feels lifted, medium-bodied and citrusy, with lime, tarragon, wet stone and green apple flavors. Level and chiseled on the finish.",Single Vineyard Plot: Anís,Anakena
"Earthy like a Pinot Noir at first, but bigger boned like Syrah, this Tempranillo (with 10% Graciano blended in) has brooding mushroom notes throughout, is quite savory and has a long, peppery finish. Still very young, its tightly wound tannins will let loose over time.",,Straight Line
"This shows a pretty ripeness, with tones of red cherry and blackberry that are followed by a soft, smooth mouthfeel. There's a touch of sweetness that should pair with pork and roasted fennel.",Torre Migliori,Tenuta Cerulli Spinozzi
"Pretty aromas of pure Pinot fruit, a mix of cola, earth, cherry and root beer introduce this estate bottling. Still a bit tight, perhaps even bottle shocked, it nonetheless opens up with breathing time into a balanced, elegant and stylish effort.",Olson Estate Vineyard,Torii Mor
"A blend of 50% Nero di Troia and 50% Cabernet Sauvignon, Kebir is a plush and sweet-smelling wine with layers of black cherry, chocolate, espresso, candied berry and light exotic spice. There's a playful touch of almond bitterness on the close.",Kebir,Torrevento
"This wine is held back for eight years by the winery before it is released for sale. It's named after the Fibonacci numbers, or the so-called __olden ratio_ that appears repeatedly in nature, this is a soft, almost sweet wine, with aromas of cherry and ripe raspberry. The mouthfeel is plush and velvety.","Riserva 0,618",Santa Lucia
"Emphasizes intense passion fruit aromas that grow more pungent upon breathing. Feels tangy as it dances on the palate, with passion fruit, lemon-lime and tarragon flavors. Long and focused on the finish, with tons of zest.",1865 Single Vineyard,San Pedro
"A blend of Gouveio and Verdelho, this is a spicy, perfumed wine that has fine, lively acidity to go with its honey, lemon and pear flavors. To drink now, although the mineral edge suggests aging potential.",2 Duas Castas Gouveio-Verdelho,Herdade do Esporão
"Arresting from the get-go, with a spice-driven start that rolls into a soft midpalate with nicely evolved fruit flavors of plum and spicy cherry. This isn't a big wine, but it's balanced and fruity, with moderate depth and excellent balance.",Zena Crown Vineyard,Kudos
"Salice Salentino is a historic Italian red wine made with a blend of Negroamaro and Malvasia Nera. This interpretation shows off sun-ripened aromas of prune, raisin and cherry liqueur. The mouthfeel is plush and chewy, but also marked by a firm tannic backbone and lingering cinnamon and nutmeg.",50th Vintage Riserva,Leone de Castris
"Rubbery and gassy at first, with a ton of barrel power that pushes charred aromas onto the nose. Feels correct and well-balanced, with honest Pinot flavors of red fruits, herbs and baked earth. Tastes and feels harmonious.",Wild Ferment,Errazuriz
"Made from Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, this interesting blend seems ready to drink now. It's soft and smooth in the mouth, with opulently ripe flavors of blackberries, chocolate, bacon, sweet oak, pepper and a touch of funk.",Prevail West Face,Ferrari-Carano
"One of the historic Portuguese branded wines, Serradayres continues to offer well-balanced fruit, attractive acidity and tannins that fit well into the overall ripe character of a wine that is ready to drink.",Serradayres Reserva,Caves Velhas
"With mint gumdrop, graphite and black fruit on the bouquet, the invitation is open. Feels generous but a little sticky and grabby, with black fruit flavors, char, toast and licorice on the palate. Finishes toasty and dark, with lasting grabbiness. Drink now through 2014.",Gran Toqui,Casas del Toqui
"This is a rounded and smooth wine, with attractive, ready-to-drink red-fruit flavors and soft tannins. The wine is already delicious with its dusty structure and ripe flavors. The Corbiac family has links that go back to the long-nosed hero Cyrano de Bergerac.",Cyrano de Bergerac,Château de Corbiac
"Dark and concentrated but simultaneously fresh and juicy, this blend of 65% Syrah and 35% Grenache offers heady notes of black cherry, plum and raspberry accented by hints of game and tree bark. The meaty, medium-weight palate offers a firm structure and a solid finish.",Vieilles Vignes,Château de Lancyre
"With its wood aging, the ripe and concentrated Malbec adds an extra dryness to the rich flavor of black plums. The wine is dense, balanced with toast. It could be aged, but is ready to drink now.",No 46,Château du Cayrou
"Misceo is a GSM blend, vinified in a mix of new, once-filled and neutral barrels. The woody flavors and aromas dominate, with hints of sandalwood, cocoa and dust around tart blue fruits.",Misceo Red,Folin Cellars
"This is a light, crisp white from a tremendous vineyard source. A mix of cucumber and white peach at the heart of this wine makes it seem lighter than it is. Oaky caramel vanilla closes out the finish.",Catie's Corner,Foundry
"While delicate and demure, this light-bodied Pinot Noir rosé revitalizes the palate with a crush of mineral intensity. Whispers of blossom and strawberry peek through a moderately long finish.",Schwarzer Adler,Franz Keller
"Aromas of rose, violet, sour cherry and baking spice make a promising initial impression but the palate is on the lean side offering raw red berry, clove, sage and a hint of tobacco. Grainy tannins leave an astringent finish. Let the tannins soften up for another few years and then drink to capture the remaining fruit.",San Giovanni,Gianfranco Alessandria
"An intense, mineral-driven wine, this is tight and very textured. Its dryness is mitigated by hints of riper mango and apricot that fill out the palate. The structure and the tense acidity show this wine is still young. Drink from 2017.",Les Baronnes,Henri Bourgeois
"The spritz you see in the glass translates into a tongue-tickling experience in the mouth. Fresh flavors of orange, grapefruit and pineapple are supported with moderate acidity. This is not a sparkling wine, but you'll want to drink this while it retains that refreshing hint of fizz.",,Henry Estate
This is a full and spicy wine that is rich with black plum and berry flavors. The wood comes through strongly with its cedar and pepper character. The contrast with fresher acidity gives this wine its balance. Drink now.,Mariana,Herdade do Rocim
"Crisp and fresh, this has an attractive tight texture that contrasts with the red berry fruits and lively acidity. It's a real apéritif style of wine, light and fruity.",Brut Rosé,Jean Milan
"This has a well-aged aroma plus tangy raspberry and cranberry flavors. It offers good balance between flavor, crispness and firm tannins. Most of all, it conveys a personality that mirrors this grape variety's Italian roots. It's dry, medium bodied and slightly astringent in texture.",,La Folia Winery
"Pale orange-pink in color, this is a crisp, tight and mineral-textured wine. It is fresh in the bottle, with red currant and grapefruit flavors. This fruity bottling could be held until mid-2016 to fill out the texture.",Rosé Royal Brut,Lété-Vautrain
"From 100% estate-grown fruit, this 100% varietal wine is dusty and dark with elements of pencil shavings, cedar and cassis. With that herbal and earthy intensity giving it defined character, it remains medium bodied and textured on the palate, with a saltiness to the finish.",Wulff Vineyards,Lobo
"With a touch of wood aging, this ripe and creamy wine has a light edge of toast. Crisp with lemon and ripe with apricots, it has a fresh character that is filled out and given richness with a touch of honey at the end. Drink from 2016.",Vignes du Domaine,Louis Max
"This Pinot does not shy away from some sharp, slightly bitter herbal flavors, but keeps them in balance against a core of tart cranberry fruit. It's well made and solid, with medium-long persistence.",Five Blocks Wren and Temperance Hill,Lumos
"Straightforward and savory, this easygoing red offers aromas of wild berry, violet and a whiff of dark kitchen spice. The vibrant palate offers juicy black cherry, licorice and ground pepper set in a frame of racy acidity.",,Manzone
"Well integrated in terms of barrel use (listed as 60% used French oak and 40% new), this features a robust exuberance of fruit, from Asian pear to Meyer lemon. Spicy with a touch of nutmeg and ginger, it hones a fine line of minerality throughout.",,Materra Cunat Family Vineyards
"This honeyed spicy Spätlese seems straightforward in fruit, but its racy, nerve-tingling energy is electrifying. Fresh apple and pears are revitalized by streaks of lemon, lime and grapefruit that linger through a moderately long finish.",Erdener Treppchen Spätlese,Max Ferd. Richter
"Sourced from old-vine Wädenswil clones, this effort carries the new Elkton AVA designation. Pretty raspberry and strawberry fruit is set in lightly toasty tannins. This is a lovely everyday Pinot Noir with some density.",Bradley Vineyard,Monte Ferro
"Cherry-vanilla surrounds a flank of big oak, while classic notes of baked strawberry also come into play. A brawny, full-bodied expression of the variety, given 6% Mourvèdre and 6% Syrah, it has good bones and acidity lurking beneath the power.",Estate Grown,Mounts
"Lush aromas of black cherry, vanilla, kola nut and blackberry fudge pack lots of action into this bottling. The palate confirms the complexity, with blueberry and black cherry backed by pipe tobacco, dried marjoram and a pencil lead-driven structure.",,Outlander
"This wine is a blend of De Ponte, Schindler and Kalita fruit, smooth and supple, though falling a bit flat in terms of mouthfeel. Leafy herbal components come up soonest, followed with sweet barrel notes, from 15 months in half new French oak.",Reserve,Panther Creek
"A dusty, cigar-smoke character on the nose of this blend of 52% Syrah and 48% Cabernet Sauvignon spices up aromas of strawberry fruit and rotting roses. The palate combines complex cranberry fruits with Kalamata olive, thyme and pencil lead.",Bilancio,Pianetta
"This is a delicious refreshing wine with great acidity coupled with ripe white and yellow fruits. The richness is cut by minerality, fragrant acidity and lemon curd. It is still young and will be better from 2016.",,Quinta de Soalheiro
"This is a rich, very rich wine that is packed with tropical fruits, generous apricot and peach flavors and spice. It is full in the mouth, showing some pepper from the alcohol that spoils the otherwise fruity character. The aftertaste does introduce some freshness.",,Quinta do Pinto
"Tight and tart, this entry-level bottling marries sharp fruit flavors of raspberry and cherry to a high-acid foundation. It's fruit-forward, perfect to gulp down with a favorite sandwich or football food.",Gravel Road,Roco
"Pretty in pink and orange hues, this stainless-steel-fermented charmer has a candied orange flavor that's delicious, followed by fresh, crisp strawberry and tangerine-laced acidity. Medium bodied, it ends with a burst of peach.",Rosé of,Rodney Strong
"About 30% was aged in new French oak, the rest in neutral wood. A bit closed, it offers tight, tart rhubarb and cherry fruit, with a fading wash of milk chocolate. It's a lighter style in a lighter vintage, but nicely balanced and drinking well.",,Trinity Vineyards
"Aromas of plum, pressed violet, toasted oak and a whiff of exotic spice lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, raisin, licorice, espresso and black pepper alongside fine-grained tannins.",Croere,Vite Colte
"This full-bodied wine has an elegant bouquet that invites, before pomegranate, plum and orange peel figure in on the palate. Powerful on the finish, it features hints of coconut and vanilla around the leathery texture.",,Waterstone
"Lime zest and freshly cut grass lend a particularly invigorating cool to this dry, delicate Riesling. It's brashly mineral on the palate, finishing tightly with a bracing shower of acidity.",Hummerthal Niersteiner Paterberg Trocken,Weingut Georg Albrecht Schneider
"Plush, showy aromas of candied apples, caramelized pears, condensed honeysuckle, yellow peach, quinine and cinnamon spice show on the nose of this wine. The palate takes a sour turn, with lemon peels, pear skins and a touch of chamomile.",,White Hart Wine
"The best of CVNE's impressive lineup of 2010 high-end Riojas is this pure, staunch, ripe stud that's blasting with blackberry, woodspice, leather and cedar aromas. Lush, layered and deep as an ocean trench, this ultraripe, expressive wine pumps out blackberry, cassis and chocolate flavors prior to a lush, mile-long finish. Amazingly pure and delicious; drink through 2025.",Real de Asúa,CVNE
"This impressive bubbly has apple, caramel and toffee aromas, melt-in-the-mouth Bosc pear and spice rack flavors, a rich but firm texture, and long finish. It possesses amazing liveliness, body and depth, and seems to reveal more nuances and freshness with each sip. While terrific to drink now, it can be cellared through at least 2020.",L'Ermitage Brut,Roederer Estate
"The multiple discoveries (the forgotten vines, the monks' secret recipe) behind Deborah Hall's project are fascinating enough, yet the golden orange wine is also utterly delicious. Old Fashioned cocktail-like aromas of maraschino cherry and orange rind mix with roasted nuts and a touch of brandy on the nose. Flavors of simmered honey, buttery whiskey and pear reduction entertain the palate, which benefits from remarkable acidity and grip, achieving utmost balance for a dessert wine.",Ancient Vine Angelica Marcelina's Vineyard,Gypsy Canyon
"While this is the top wine of a major Cahors estate, it is impressive how restrained it is. Sure, the wood and dense brooding black fruits are there, but they have been subtly controlled by the freshness of the wine and its great balance. With its richness, still youthful fruit and its structure it will need aging. Drink from 2020.",GC,Château du Cèdre
"Rich and unctuous in concentration, this powerful auslese is chock full of honeysuckle nectar and yellow peach flavors. Striking lemon-lime acidity and a deep, dusty mineral vein lend gravitas and complexity.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Auslese,Robert Weil
"Pure Petit Manseng harvested in November has given the essence of Jurançon. Superbly ripe, botrytised fruit is perfectly balanced with layers of freshness, apricot juice and a crisp, nervy texture. It's a young wine and really should not be drunk before 2018.",Symphonie de Novembre,Domaine Cauhapé
"This incredibly tasty wine seems to melt in the mouth. Classic aromas of cinnamon, black cherry and cedar becomes more chocolaty on the palate as layers of cocoa, dark plum and toasted baguette unfold. Its texture is so velvety that the fine-grained tannins seem to dissolve as you sip, while still providing a slight grip that counteracts the richness and full body. Tempting now, it will be best 2022_2032.",V Block,Liparita
"A standout amidst a stellar lineup of 2013 Rheingau auslese, this deeply concentrated, complex Riesling is a kaleidescope of sensory offerings. Pretty white floral notes perfume swathes of marmalade and crushed minerals. It's unctuous yet spine tingling, lithe yet endlessly penetrating on the finish.",Rosalack No. 398 Auslese,Schloss Johannisberger
"One of the special cuvées from du Cèdre, this impressive wine combines intense black fruit freshness with a powerful structure. It is full of cidity, ripe fruits and a core that is immense. It deserves considerable aging and certainly should not be drunk before 2020.",Le Cèdre,Château du Cèdre
"CVNE's top wines from 2010 are outstanding across the board. This sun-baked wine is bursting with black cherry, blackberry, spice, vanilla and cedary aromas. A tight, exact and fresh palate blends richness and balance, while ripe blackberry, cassis and black pepper flavors finish with a pure feel, a touch of buttery oak, and nuances of licorice and herbs. Drink this modern beauty through 2025.",Pagos de Viña Real,CVNE
"The Sigrid never fails to deliver lush fruit and hedonistic barrel flavors. However in cooler years, when the alcohol falls below 14%, it has something extra when details of skin and flower emerge as well. This is a wine of power and finesse, with juicy pear and peach, supple acids, brioche and toasted biscuit, underscored with refreshing minerality. Drink now through 2025.",Sigrid,Bergström
"An all-encompassing and earthy richness on the nose of this wine blends dried strawberry, Bing cherry and sour cherry fruits with damp herbs like dewy sagebrush and dark chocolate bars. It's thick once sipped, with ripe raspberry and dried cherry fruits. Spicy fennel and cardamom arrives on the midpalate, finishing with a zing of Sichuan peppercorn and shiitake mushrooms.",Stone Corral Vineyard,Kynsi
"Dusty earth and mineral tones lend contrast to sweet, sunny tangerine and caramel in this feather-light TBA. The palate is persistent and pristine, awash in stone fruit flavors that pierce with laser-like brilliance. Delectable now for it's youth and fruitiness, but likely to develop mineral complexities for decades to come.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Trockenbeerenauslese,Robert Weil
"Perfumed florals mingle curiously with deep, dusty mineral notes on this bracing TBA. Sunny nectarine and tangerine flavors are mouthwatering and juicy, struck with acidity, then plunged into pools of sweet honey and nectar. It's a delightful sensory roller coaster that feels endless on the finish.",Kiedrich Gräfenberg Trockenbeerenauslese,Robert Weil
"Blue flowers, wild berries, leather, dried herb and tilled soil are just some of the aromas you'll find on this stunning wine, along with a balsamic note. Made entirely with Sangiovese, the smooth, structured palate delivers layers of black cherries, crushed raspberries, white pepper, clove, dried mint and sage inside a framework of velvety tannins. A tobacco note tops off the lingering finish. Enjoy through 2020.",Cavaliere,Michele Satta
"From one of three estate-farmed vineyards belonging to the producer, Bone Ash is dry-farmed and planted to old vines in volcanic soils, the minerality of which is divinely present in this wine. High-toned, balanced in acidity and softly structured, it offers a range of fruit, from sharp cranberry to jammy blackberry, changing in the glass over time. Complex and layered, it will cellar well through 2022.",Bone Ash Vineyard,Venge
"Here's a structured red with lots of finesse. It opens with alluring aromas of fragrant blue flowers, red berries, baking spices and exotic herbs while the firm, vibrant palate delivers black cherry, crushed raspberry, clove, orange zest, licorice and a sprinkling of white pepper. It's still young but well balanced, with tightly woven but polished tannins and fresh acidity. Drink 2017_2024.",Tignanello,Marchesi Antinori
"Wet slate and chalk penetrate through silken layers of honey, fig and dried apricot in this decadent beerenauslese. It's intensely concentrated in fruit, but also racy and taut, finishing with a flair of rose petals and pink grapefruit. Stunning now, but structured enough to develop beautifully for decades.",Hochheimer Kirchenstück Beerenauslese,Domdechant Werner
"Bold but sophisticated, this has classic, concentrated Napa aromas and flavors. A luscious, velvety mouthfeel through to a lingering finish. The aroma combines cedar and spice-rack notes with fresh berries and black currants. Flavors are influenced by suave, spicy oak accents that weave in and out of the compelling ripe fruit. It's beautiful to drink now, but will improve through at least 2022.",,Hoopes
"Complex, classy winemaking is evident from the first sniff to the final sip. Savory notes of green tea and clean earth complement a terroir-driven wine. The notes and nuances pile on__lowers and fruits, cherry and cassis, with a whiff of barnyard and undergrowth. The lingering, expressive finish is already boggling, and seems sure to continue to evolve gracefully through 2025_2030.",Arcus Estate,Archery Summit
"The most impressive of the fine range of wines from this producer, the wine is structured and dense without ever losing sight of balance, fruit and acidity. That makes for a wine that has a dusty texture coupled with a dry center of fruit and wood tannins. The acidity and the juicy berry fruits give freshness. Everything is ready for long aging. Drink from 2019.",K-2,Clos Troteligotte
"This is a rich wine that still retains intense freshness. Botrytised grapes were harvested in early December, giving rich honey and spice flavors. White peach and spiced pears give freshness as well as rich texture to this young wine. Drink as its opulence comes into its own, from 2019.",Noblesse du Temps,Domaine Cauhapé
"Aromas of graphite, black currant, plum, cedar, blue flowers and tobacco emerge from this full-bodied red. Made with Cabernet Franc and a drop of Petit Verdot, the structured palate offers blackberries, licorice, clove and a toasted note alongside velvety tannins. It shows great finesse, especially for the torrid 2011 vintage. Drink 2016_2026.",Lodovico,Tenuta di Biserno
"Refined, sleek and supple, this wine mixes trim fruit flavors of apple and papaya, firmly supported by medium-strength acids. There's a streak of baking spices, and a finish laden with buttered nuts, all in proportion, with nothing dominant. In short, this is a super-long, exceptional wine.",Capriccio,DanCin
"A very intriguing nose from winemaker Brian Loring is reminiscent of ripe red cherries stewed in a béchamel sauce laced with cinnamon sticks. The palate dives deep into blackberries, black tea, beet juice and all sorts of cherries (red, black and sour), lifted by freshly crushed anise seeds.",Cargasacchi Vineyard,Loring Wine Company
"Aromas of baked dark-skinned fruit, cedar, cooking spice and a balsamic note unfold in the glass. A blend of 75% Cabernet Sauvignon, 20% Sangiovese, and 5% Cabernet Franc, the firmly structured palate delivers ripe black currants, dried black cherries, clove, mint, tobacco and anise alongside tightly woven but fine-grained tannins. Give this time to unwind and fully develop. Drink 2017_2023.",Solaia,Marchesi Antinori
"Made with Cabernet and Merlot, this offers scents of cedar, black currant, graphite and aromatic herb. Notes of licorice, ground pepper and tobacco accent the core of crushed blackberry and black cherry while polished tannins provide the framework. The lingering finish ends on a tobacco note.",Giusto di Notri,Tua Rita
"This wine hails from six Napa Valley vineyards, including the producer's Calistoga-based estate Bone Ash, as well as Beck stoffer Georges III in Rutherford. It opens in mouthfilling black licorice and blackberry, juicy and soft with the backbone to age. Dried herb provides a savory component, while a fresh vibrancy offsets the wine's denseness. Cellar this concentrated wine through 2022.",Silencieux,Venge
"From one of the top estates in Cahors, this complex, dense wine is both structured and packed with great fruit. At the moment, the tannins are in charge, big, bold and dense. Over the next few years the opulent black fruits will come out strongly, bringing richness along with impressive concentration. Drink from 2019.",Cèdre Héritage,Château du Cèdre
"This superripe and supersmooth wine packs in extra layers of flavor of boysenberry and anise between stacks of blackberry and ripe strawberry, all while staying supported by fine but firm tannins and vibrant acidity. Very full in body, it is still appetizingly dry, balanced for serving at a special meal, and very rewarding to drink now through 2022.",Grand Wren,Renwood
"This Pinot does not shy away from some sharp, slightly bitter herbal flavors, but keeps them in balance against a core of tart cranberry fruit. It's well made and solid, with medium-long persistence.",Five Blocks Wren and Temperance Hill,Lumos
"Straightforward and savory, this easygoing red offers aromas of wild berry, violet and a whiff of dark kitchen spice. The vibrant palate offers juicy black cherry, licorice and ground pepper set in a frame of racy acidity.",,Manzone
"Well integrated in terms of barrel use (listed as 60% used French oak and 40% new), this features a robust exuberance of fruit, from Asian pear to Meyer lemon. Spicy with a touch of nutmeg and ginger, it hones a fine line of minerality throughout.",,Materra Cunat Family Vineyards
"This honeyed spicy Spätlese seems straightforward in fruit, but its racy, nerve-tingling energy is electrifying. Fresh apple and pears are revitalized by streaks of lemon, lime and grapefruit that linger through a moderately long finish.",Erdener Treppchen Spätlese,Max Ferd. Richter
"Sourced from old-vine Wädenswil clones, this effort carries the new Elkton AVA designation. Pretty raspberry and strawberry fruit is set in lightly toasty tannins. This is a lovely everyday Pinot Noir with some density.",Bradley Vineyard,Monte Ferro
"Cherry-vanilla surrounds a flank of big oak, while classic notes of baked strawberry also come into play. A brawny, full-bodied expression of the variety, given 6% Mourvèdre and 6% Syrah, it has good bones and acidity lurking beneath the power.",Estate Grown,Mounts
"Lush aromas of black cherry, vanilla, kola nut and blackberry fudge pack lots of action into this bottling. The palate confirms the complexity, with blueberry and black cherry backed by pipe tobacco, dried marjoram and a pencil lead-driven structure.",,Outlander
"This wine is a blend of De Ponte, Schindler and Kalita fruit, smooth and supple, though falling a bit flat in terms of mouthfeel. Leafy herbal components come up soonest, followed with sweet barrel notes, from 15 months in half new French oak.",Reserve,Panther Creek
"A dusty, cigar-smoke character on the nose of this blend of 52% Syrah and 48% Cabernet Sauvignon spices up aromas of strawberry fruit and rotting roses. The palate combines complex cranberry fruits with Kalamata olive, thyme and pencil lead.",Bilancio,Pianetta
"This is a delicious refreshing wine with great acidity coupled with ripe white and yellow fruits. The richness is cut by minerality, fragrant acidity and lemon curd. It is still young and will be better from 2016.",,Quinta de Soalheiro
"This is a rich, very rich wine that is packed with tropical fruits, generous apricot and peach flavors and spice. It is full in the mouth, showing some pepper from the alcohol that spoils the otherwise fruity character. The aftertaste does introduce some freshness.",,Quinta do Pinto
"Tight and tart, this entry-level bottling marries sharp fruit flavors of raspberry and cherry to a high-acid foundation. It's fruit-forward, perfect to gulp down with a favorite sandwich or football food.",Gravel Road,Roco
"Pretty in pink and orange hues, this stainless-steel-fermented charmer has a candied orange flavor that's delicious, followed by fresh, crisp strawberry and tangerine-laced acidity. Medium bodied, it ends with a burst of peach.",Rosé of,Rodney Strong
"About 30% was aged in new French oak, the rest in neutral wood. A bit closed, it offers tight, tart rhubarb and cherry fruit, with a fading wash of milk chocolate. It's a lighter style in a lighter vintage, but nicely balanced and drinking well.",,Trinity Vineyards
"Aromas of plum, pressed violet, toasted oak and a whiff of exotic spice lead the nose. The palate offers dried black cherry, raisin, licorice, espresso and black pepper alongside fine-grained tannins.",Croere,Vite Colte
"This opens with earthy aromas of scorched earth, overripe plum and a whiff of game. The straightforward palate offers juicy wild cherry, raspberry jam, coffee and vanilla alongside zesty acidity and fine-grained tannins. Drink through 2017.",Suri di Mu,Icardi
"Aromas of sawdust, stewed plum and chocolate unfold in the glass. The forward palate doles out blackberry extract, fleshy cherry, toast, anise and espresso alongside velvety tannins. Drink through 2021.",Castelletto Riserva,Malabaila
"Piercing choppy aromas of balsamic plum, tobacco and cherry lead to a tannic, scratchy palate with saucy, oaky berry flavors that come with a baked overtone. This Rioja from a poor vintage runs long on the finish, with an oak-based vanilla flavor and residual balsamic notes.",Reserva,Marqués del Puerto
"French oak, vanilla, coconut, menthol and berry aromas lead the nose and carry over to the bracing palate along with close-grained tannins that leave a rather astringent finish.",Printi Riserva,Monchiero Carbone
"Aromas of Middle Eastern spices, pencil eraser, oak grain, red plum and cherry make for a complete nose. This Tempranillo offers good body and a fair amount of oak on the palate along with spicy plum fruit that tastes more oaky and lactic on the finish.",Crianza,Raiza
"Rubbery slightly grassy berry and plum aromas give way to a fresh and fair palate that works. Oaky cherry and berry flavors are standard but well presented, while the finish is mild, with leftover plum and berry notes.",,Ruta 22
"Showing earthy aromas, very full body and impressive tannins, this wine has flavors full of smoke, black pepper and blackberry. The thick, dry texture coats the mouth with tannin and dark color. It's a big wine, and should taste great with dishes like slow-cooked ribs.",True Grit Reserve,Parducci
"Big, blocky black-fruit aromas are reduced and potent. This is quite chunky and extracted in feel, with jammy gritty blackberry and plum flavors that are mildly herbal and simmer with heat and heft on the finish.",Barrel Select,Bodega Norton
"This is a soft, open wine, lightly flavored with red fruits and with attractive acidity. A bright, lively mousse gives a lift to the palate, finishing with an orange-zest tang.",Rosé Dolores Brut,Baron-Fuenté
"This big, firm wine offers serious tannins as well as rich blackberry fruits. It's a structured, dark wine, spicy from wood aging and ripely concentrated. Drink from 2017.",,Château du Caillau
"Scents softly suggest rose petals and milk chocolate, leading into a wine that seems to hit a hard stop midpalate. A clear flavor of cold steel resonates against a counterpoint of tart berry fruit.",Oregon,Coeur de Terre
"Why, at the northern limits of Burgundy, there should be a small village producing Sauvignon Blanc is a curiosity, as the name of the wine suggests. This ripe, tropical fruit and crisp green plum-flavored wine is tightly textured and ready to drink.",Curiosité de Bourgogne,Domaine Céline et Frédéric Gueguen
"This is a soft, rounded wine full of yellow fruits, pears and red apples. It is textured with minerality and tangy lemon zest. The acidity at the end is still fresh and the wine could do with some more time before drinking. Wait until late 2016.",,Domaine Vrignaud
"Pressed apple and pears are dusted in pollen and saffron in this earth-toned Spätlese. Delicately sweet honey tones brighten the midpalate, accompanied by bracing lemonade acidity. The finish is moderately long, marked by a lingering touch of dried herbs.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Spätlese,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"Aromas of lemon, green apple and wet stone make up the nose on this quaffable Godello that's solid on the palate, with some pithiness. Flavors of melon, apple and green banana finish with notes of lees, citrus pith and bitterness.",,Encanto
"A strong wood element dominates this wine. It's all toasty and juicy from wood aging rather than fruit. It does have the weight to suggest some fruit for the future, but the wood, with its bite and tang, will always be a strong presence.",Marie Antoinette,Vincent
"Fresh apple and pear are slicked with honey on this bold, full-bodied Riesling. While dry in style, it's lush and fruity with a bristle of lemon-lime acidity that shines on the finish.",Caywood East Vineyard Dry,Wagner
"A pale pink color, it brings notes of strawberry and watermelon, drinking dry with tart cherry flavors and a slightly clipped finish.",Rosé,Waterbrook
"Dark in color, this soft, leathery Zin offers tangents of blackberry, chocolate and espresso within a heavy-handed package of serious fruit and weight.",,Wilson
"This Rosé of Sangiovese is light in color and density, with fruit flavors of watermelon and a hint of peach. It's a fine, light and easy sipper.",Ruby,Airfield Estates
"The alcohol has dropped to just above 12% in this vintage, and the wine seems a tad underripe. Overtly grassy and pungent, it suggests with petrol, gooseberry and green banana. Drink it well-chilled.",,Airfield Estates
"Minerally raspberry and cherry aromas come with a touch of latex and rubber. This is lively and scratchy on the palate, with spicy, oaky, peppery flavors of red-berry fruits that lead to a dry, juicy finish.",La Muria,Pago de Valdetruchas
"This oak-driven Aglianico opens with aromas of coffee, toasted wood, espresso and black fruit. The dense, extracted palate offers oaky vanilla and sugar-plum alongside drying and astringent wood tannins.",Jumara,I Capitani
"Made with the native grape Gaglioppo, this soft, friendly rosato from Calabria has delicate raspberry, cherry and strawberry sensations accented by a hint of cooking spices. Pair it with appetizers, grilled vegetables or cold cuts.",Rosato,Librandi
"Warm spice and oak tones accent fresh apples and lemons on this full-bodied Chardonnay. It's not subtle with a dense slick of caramel that extends along the midpalate, but a kick of lemon-lime acidity on the finish adds some levity.",Reserve,McGregor
"With a dark red violet color and aromas of black cherry and fennel, this wine has flavors of black cherry, mint and clove. The scale tips in the direction of cooling herbs over fruit, and the warm finish is a bit one-dimensional.",Marom Series Shamai Single Vineyard,Or Haganuz
"Apple, lettuce and celery aromas are a bit hard and green. This is plump and solid in feel, with orange, grapefruit and generic minerality. A citrusy finish confirms the wine's fruity status.",,Pagos del Galir
"Here's a simple, straightforward Nero d'Avola that offers concentrated blueberry and blackberry jam sensations along with a note of evident alcohol. Pair this with everyday fare like pasta topped with a hearty ragù sauce.",,Sallier de la Tour
"An unusual wine with notes of milk chocolate, green olive and arugula. It's light in style and seems hard to put a finger on any particular variety or place.",,Samson
"Mellow, luscious Chardonnay from a new brand. Butterscotch aromas and flavors and a rich, soft texture make this flavorful and easy to swallow. Warning: Your head may spin looking at the holographic label.",,Spin the Bottle
It's rich enough to satisfy our craving for fruit flavor and firm enough in texture to pair well with roasts and filling pasta. It seems to have benefited from more time aging in a cellar than most red wines at this price do.,,Stomping Ground
"This extracted, dense and one-dimensional Taurasi delivers mature black fruit, fennel, black pepper, licorice, toasted oak and coffee bean sensations alongside drying wood tannins. It finishes abruptly.",La Loggia del Cavaliere Riserva,Tenuta Cavalier Pepe
"This tangy rosé opens with a burst of tart strawberry fruit, and rolls into a lightly creamy midpalate. It's in the peppery, tannic style of rosé, making it a good match for more substantial foods.",Rosé,Three Rivers
"This extracted wine opens with aromas of toasted wood, coffee, mushroom, chocolate and vanilla. The dense, one-dimensional palate offers thick, jammy black fruit and oak extract.",,Vesevo
"Kyklos offers aromas of vanilla, cherry, menthol and tobacco. On the palate, dried cherry fruit, spicebox and cedar give it a refined edge. The finish is touched with smoke and pepper.",Kyklos,Voyatzis
"This well-integrated wine delivers intoxicating aromas of jasmine, tangerine and peach. These intertwine citrus-y minerality with a candied sweetness, especially on the finish.",,White Oak
"A juicy blend of Nero d'Avola and Nerello Mascalese, this wine offers blackberry and black cherry flavors in a friendly, easy-drinking style. It's perfect for everyday dinners and informal occasions.",Rosso,Corvo
"Made from organically grown grapes, this opens with earthy aromas of tilled earth and ripe black fruit. The simple, one-dimensional palate delivers mature blackberry and plum alongside a fleeting note of black pepper. Enjoy soon.",Poggionotte,Di Giovanna
"Attractive red fruits dominate this light and fruity wine. Good acidity and bright flavors are smoothed by wood, while the aftertaste brings back the fruit. Drink now.",,Domaine Faiveley
"This small domaine in the Mâcon region has produced a soft, ripe wine with attractive strawberry fruits. It's rounded, with just light acidity over the fruit flavors. At the end, it feels warm and ripe. Drink now.",,Domaine Olivier Merlin
"This ripe wine has tropical fruits, pineapple and apricots as well as a fresher lime character. The wine is rounded with a crisper edge. Drink now.",,Bouchard Aîné & Fils
"Showing its wood strongly, this toasty wine seems to have lost the fruit. Some attractive acidity at the end helps compensate. Drink now.",Les Mûres,Bret Brothers
"Light pepper, cassis and a hint of leather form the nose on this wine from a brand founded in 1994 specifically to deliver quality wines at affordable prices. The palate offers grilled meat and roasted root-vegetable flavors. Fairly gripping tannins mean that this wine could survive through 2017.",,Castle Rock
"Lightly flavored with red fruits, it's pleasant but rather generic. It carries some alcohol heat through a thin finish.",,Cave B
Wispy hints of cherry and clove kick off this good deal wine. Tastes range from juicy red fruit up front with some crushed purple flowers to a very tight vanilla-laced finish.,Red Cedar Vineyard,Clayhouse
"This starts out appealing. Licorice, spice, coconut and vanilla aromas are entirely inviting. On the palate it delivers a tight deck of lemony oak, raspberry fruit, spice and vanilla. This finishes fiery and with a sinewy structure. Drink this Cabernet-led, five-grape blend through 2019; 500 cases made.",Axel Primero,La Playa
"With complex aromas of cedar, tobacco, tree bark, herbs and blackberry, this lush, tightly packed Syrah gets off to a fine start. A mouthfilling palate with baked but controlled flavors of boysenberry, leather and chocolate finishes long, minty and with classy herb flavors. For a modern, oaky Syrah, this is excellent. Drink now through 2017.",Edicion Limitada Single Vineyard,Lagar de Bezana
"A rounded style of Sauvignon Blanc that has a full feeling to it. Yes, there is plenty of herbaceous and citrus character but this is just a part of a rich medley of riper fruits all in a steely texture. Worth aging for 2_3 years.",Klausen,Neumeister
"Everything about this Chardonnay speaks of class. It's dry and superbly structured in acids and tannins, and shows a chalky minerality that lends substance to the tropical fruit and honeysuckle flavors. Two Sisters is assembling a great track record with this bottling.",Courtney's Vineyard,Two Sisters
"A mix of rose petals and cherry blossoms wafts up from the glass, introducing a delightfully silky Pinot Noir that adds layer upon layer of interest as it runs across the tongue. Polished, slightly dusty, with pretty cherry fruit at the core, this adds highlights of cinnamon and cocoa powder through a long, smooth, elegant finish.",Durant Vineyard,Owen Roe
"California rosé is awfully hard to get right. It's usually too sweet, too heavy or both. With this Grenache-Cinsault blend, Minassian-Young knocks it out of the park. The wine is dry, delicate, modest in alcohol, and complex, with subtle peach, rosehip tea, orange zest, watermelon and spice flavors. A great bargain, but only 64 cases were produced.",Grenache-Cinsault,Minassian-Young
"This is an intensely minerally, dry Riesling that showcases an array of crushed stone and earth elements against a backdrop of heather floral and yellow stonefruit flavors. It's richly textured and finishes long with a feathery touch on the palate.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr GG Old Vines Dry,S.A. Prüm
"Everything about this dry, voluptuous Riesling is intense and penetrating. The palate is concentrated with stonefruit and yellow flower notes, and bristling with lemon-lime acidity. Rich layers of crushed stone and mineral oil linger deliciously on the finish.",Wallhausen Johannisberg GG Trocken,Prinz Salm
"This is a pretty Pinot that's light and silky on the palate, and comforting in its moderate alcohol and spicy, exotic flavors. It offers waves of wild forest berry pie, baking spice, sweet-and-sour persimmon and sandalwood flavors that are intriguingly complex. Absolutely delightful now.",,Williams Selyem
"While this is the most tannic of Envy's wines, it's also made in the house style of soft, fruity approachability. Forward and lush with blackberry jam, currant and spice flavors, it shows an impeccable balance. Wonderful now and over the next 3_4 years.",Estate,Envy
"Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this Bordeaux-style blend will make you take a second look at Paso Robles. It's softly tannic and enormously complex, offering waves of black cherries, currants, licorice, mocha and sweet oak. Really beautiful to drink now, and should develop bottle complexities over the next six years.",Soul of a Lion,Daou
"Though De Loach's Lake County Zinfandel__ regular in the producer's line-up of prominent wines__s a departure of form in its big-boned nature, it is entirely in keeping with its sister wines in terms of balance. Fragrant and spicy, with a depth of blackberry fruit, the finish is long and satisfying. This is a fine food-pairing wine.",Nova Vineyard,De Loach
"Spice and lanolin notes are curious and enticing on the nose and palate of this sunny and sweet, but impeccably balanced Riesling. Juicy, supple, apple jelly and quince flavors are offset by striking acidity and steely minerality that reverberate on the finish.",Erbacher Michelmark Auslese,Baron Knyphausen
"This is one dark, intense Ribera del Duero with loads of lush black-fruit aromas matched against minerality and fine French-oak scents. It is tight as a drum on the palate, with wiry acidity and rocky tannins. Flavors of oak-driven coconut and cream sit on top of blackberry and cola, while the finish ends abruptly, with hardness. Drink through 2024; 150 cases made.",Clave de Tábula,Bodegas y Viñedos Tábula
"One of the best Russian River Pinots you can buy at this price. Shows classically rich pomegranate, persimmon and cherry fruit, enhanced with sweet oak, with a silky texture and a long, spicy finish. Kudos to winemaker Ed Kurtzman for bringing it all together.",,August West
Lovely aromatics introduce this subtly powerful Pinot Noir. Floral highlights lead into tart cherry fruit that seems to gather strength as it flows across the palate. There are hints of mineral and a splash of coffee in the lingering finish.,Hyland Vineyard,King Estate
"This is a huge wine, that's insanely rich and concentrated. It tastes like the ripest summer blackberries, still warm from the sun, mashed and drizzed with crème de cassis and chocolate syrup. The estate vineyard is on Paso Robles' west side, and quite high in elevation in the southern spur of the Santa Lucia Mountains. The wine is ungainly now, and needs time to develop. Better after 2017.",Jack of Hearts Petit Verdot,Jada Vineyard & Winery
"This is a ripe, rich blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Petit Verdot and Syrah that opens with blackberry, blueberry and earthy leather aromas. It's full bodied, lifted by nice acids and layered, with toast, meaty blackberry, licorice and roasted flavors. A chewy, smooth, deep finish functions as the final chapter. Drink through 2018.",Emeritus,Marques de Griñon
"The blend of these four Rhône white grapes_47% Grenache Blanc, 32% Marsanne, 16% Roussanne, 5% Picpoul__utshines their individual bottlings. Some sort of magic accrues. The Sirocco is supple, creamy and packed with aromas and flavors of citrus blossom, flesh and rind. It's got a peaches-and-cream mouthfeel, and a lick of butterscotch in the lush finish.",Boushey Vineyard Sirocco Blanc,McCrea Cellars
"Quite a good Cabernet, pure and intense in varietal characteristics of black currants, but balanced and elegant. The tannins are smooth, the finish complex and long in spices. Delicious as it is now, your best bet is to cellar this Cab for 6_8 years, and possibly longer.",,Peters Family
"This new vintage is sourced from a single block from the Dineen vineyard, and aged in 50% new French oak__he most ever. Black fruits abound, along with licorice, tar and a whiff of iodine. It's a tightly wound Syrah, with the stuffing and style to age for a decade or longer.",BlackTongue,Stevens
"Shows the usual Williams Selyem Chardonnay profile of huge fruit and flashy oak. This opulent wine would be over-the-top except that it's balanced by crisp, lemony acidity, and somehow retains a tight core with a gravitational tug that keeps the richness focused. Impressive now for sheer power, and should hold well for another 5_6 years.",Heintz Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"This proprietary bottling from Shafer is always a huge wine. The 2010, which contains a splash of Petite Verdot, is gigantically packed with blackberry jam, black currant, dark chocolate and sweet oak, courtesy of 20 months in 100% new French oak barrels. The wine is a bit of a bully now, but it has the balance to age. Give it until 2018.",One Point Five,Shafer
"Though it's not mentioned on the label, the Malbec is sourced from the Pepper Bridge vineyard, and compares favorably with high end Argentine versions. Yummy and deep, its sweet berry flavors are matched to firm, polished tannins, and finished with a touch of pretty toast.",,Reininger
"A rich, velvet textured wine, full of dense, dusty tannins and sweet black Merlot fruits. The wine is concentrated, ripe and powerful, with a dark texture that is both impressive and ageworthy. Give this wine at least 5_6 years.",Caractère,Château de la Grave
"As usual, this is one of Calera's lightest bottlings, in both color and texture. It's deceptively simple, showing softened cola and raspberry jam flavors that finish impressively long and spicy. It would be a mistake to dismiss it for early drinking. Give it a good six years in the cellar, and it could be stunning in 2020.",Reed,Calera
"You can almost read through the translucent ruby color of this wine, but there's nothing light about it. Rich with cherries, it offers lots of pleasure now, but with moderate alcohol, fine acidity, and minerality that gives the wine a foundation, it should hold in  the cellar until 2018, at least.",Ryan Vineyard,Calera
"This is every bit as good as the winery's Clave de Tábula, which costs twice as much. An aromatic opening of fig, prune and blackberry comes with graphite, cola and attractive oak notes. This is intense and shows powerful acidity in support of blackberry, toast and dark, spicy flavors. A medium-long finish with toast and licorice is proper and not overdone. Drink from 2014_2022.",Tábula,Bodegas y Viñedos Tábula
"Rich, dense, soft and incredibly concentrated, this Cabernet gives wave after wave of blackberry jam, chocolate, licorice and cedar flavors. Feels elegant, complex and fine. Drink now_2016.",Reserve,Daou
"With some extra weight, this is a solid, red currant and berry driven wine. Its fruit is right up front, backed by a mineral acidity that cuts through the richness. It's definitely a food wine, and equally an impressive wine that needs to age for up to a year.",Château Romassan,Domaines Ott
"Frankly sweet, tasting like a sugared fruit juice blend of tangerines, pineapples and mangoes. Still, it's clean and streamlined in acidity.",,Maddalena
"Clean and dry, but a rather uninteresting Cabernet despite its Napa Valley address. Shows diluted blackberry and currant flavors. Pricey for what you get.",,Main & Geary
"A very woody, oddly chemical Cabernet Sauvignon.",,Brass Tacks
Here's a Falanghina (a native grape of southern Italy) that offers aromas of pear and dried apple skin with touches of passion fruit and candied pineapple.,Tenuta Oppida Aminea Caracena,Fratelli Muratori
"An uncomfortable wine. The acidity tastes unnaturally tart for a wine this sweet, while the citrus fruit flavors have a white sugary finish. Yet there's a tug of unripeness.",The Fumé,Murphy-Goode
"Gassy smelling and just not that fresh from head to toe. Feels fleshy but clumsy, with bland melon and almond skin flavors. Narrows on the finish and teeters on bitter, with a lemony wash.",XIV Alto Agrelo,Pulenta Estate
"Heavy and inert, with simple cherry Lifesaver candy and spice flavors and an aggressive texture. But it is dry.",,Donovan-Parke
"Bone-dry and not quite ripe, with a stubbornly vegetal undertow. That accentuates the tannins, making them astringent. You will find very modest cherry and cola flavors.",Vin d'Eliza,Courtney Benham
"Mulchy and green smelling, with soft berry aromas underneath. Feels full and chunky, with herbal flavors, tomato notes and a weak foundation of blackberry and cassis. Minty and herbal on the finish.",La Florencia,Familia Cassone
"This blend of Savatiano and Roditis is very popular in Greece and perhaps a bit too exotic for mainstream palates, but it's easy drinking and priced well. Aromas of citrus and melon are followed by peach and honeydew melon flavors. Simple but friendly.",Demestica White,Achaia Clauss
"Pretty ordinary wine here. It's dry and simple, with some off smells, but on the plus side you'll find silky flavors of cherries.",,Angeline
"Raisiny smelling and short on freshness. Full in feel but tasting roasted, stemmy and a little bitter. Finishes baked and earthy, with a lasting leafy quality.",,Caitec
"As sugary as jelly, and with a harsh cut of acidity, it tastes like a Chinese sweet and sour sauce.",,B&E;
"For the price, this is not a good effort. It's overoaked and horsey smelling, with a heavy, overripe palate that tastes herbal and like hickory-infused blackberry. Flat and stewy on the finish.",Reserva,Cas'Almare
"Sugary sweet and simple, with buttered popcorn, pineapple jam and vanilla flavors.",,Main & Geary
"A simple Merlot, sugary sweet and jammy in cherries, with harsh tannins and a bizarre slice of acidity.",,Napa Creek
"A heavy, dull wine, with sweet blackberry and vegetable flavors.",,Main & Geary
This Zin is too sweet and simple. Tastes like raspberry tea with a couple spoons of white sugar.,Old Vine,Zin 91
"Not a successful vintage for Voss. The wine is dry and green, with a sour, vegetal edge to the citrus fruit.",,Voss
"Moscato-like with its jasmine and lychee aromas, but things fall apart in the mouth. It's overly foamy and active, with bland flavors that lack the powdery, floral elements that can make Torrontés good. Gaseous on the finish.",Sustainably Farmed Sparkling,Spirit of the Andes
"Dark in color for a rosé and full-bodied, this blend of undetermined varieties is way too sweet in sugary raspberry and cherry flavors. You could classify it as a dessert wine.",,Rutherford Hill
"Rusty in color, with rubbery, chemical aromas. Feels tight, tannic and clampy, with hard, compromised flavors and bitterness to the finish. Astringent and just not that appealing.",Libertad Vineyards,Benegas
"The price is affordable, but this isn't a very satisfying wine. Despite fruity flavors, it's rough and bubble-gummy.",,Bogle
"A hard wine, tough and tannic, and overripe, with raisiny flavors, including some bitterness from shriveled grape skins.",,Donovan-Parke
"Tastes unnatural and manipulated, with sugary sweet orange and apricot jam fruit flavors, highlighted by uncomfortably sour acidity.",,Frog's Leap
"Straw and hay aromas come with apple and spice notes. The palate is extra foamy and bubbly, with a roughness to it. Tastes of dry peach and bitter melon, with a peppery finish.",Toso Brut,Pascual Toso
"This wine has an element of candied watermelon and cherry in the aromas that gives it a rocky start, but on the palate, bright cherry, watermelon and spice are a bit more becoming. A simple wine with a fruity kick.",,My Big Fat Greek Wine
"This one's heavily about the oak. Comes out with spiced-up, minty aromas. Next up is a full and biting palate with buttery lead flavors followed by bitter black fruit. Flashes by quick on the finish.",,Tilia
"A hot and dark wine with raisiny notes of plum, date and kirsch. The tannins are firm and the finish gripping.",Passioné,Mont Destin
"So sweet. With sugary tangerine and pineapple flavors and plenty of caramel, it quickly palls.",,Rued
"Dusty apple and melon aromas are clean and simple. A solid, fleshy mouthfeel supports melon, yeasty vanilla and powdered sugar flavors. A soft and easy finish is fine but doesn't take things to any new levels.",,Lágrimas de Maria
"This is half Merlot, one third Syrah, with a bit of Cabernet and Petit Verdot as well. It's a very light, fruity wine, with no particular focus. Fine for near-term quaffing.",Sharp Sisters,Mercer
"This Cabernet-based blend is reminiscent to an old-fashioned Paso style that's soft, ripe and simple. It has candied cherry and blackberry flavors. Drink up.",Mare Nectaris Reserve,Midnight
"Off-dry and minty, with a strong streak of wintergreen, this simple, fruity Riesling offers fruit flavors of green apple and a bit of waxy lemon.",,Mercer
"Pastry notes of caramel, vanilla and mint chocolate are the lead aromas of this Cabernet Franc, but savory touches of wood smoke and thyme surface with air. Fine, tight tannins grab at the back end of the medium-bodied  palate before finishing with a sanguine-like tang.",Carter's Mountain Vineyard,Michael Shaps
"Unexpectedly aromatic in jasmine and rose, Parducci's True Grit is otherwise big with a coated mouthfeel of leather, amidst a wall of toned tannins.",True Grit Reserve,Parducci
"Big, bold and fruity wine, boasting deliciously ripe black fruits and a smooth, just tannic texture. All fruit, this is the perfect barbecue wine: rich, open and generous. Drink now and until 2016.",Gouleyant,Georges Vigouroux
"Designed as a fruity vision of Malbec, this is a ripe, lightly wood aged wine, laden with berry fruits, soft tannins and an open texture. It's ready to drink, a fine barbecue style, friendly wine.",Pigmentum Rouge,Georges Vigouroux
"High alcohol gives this blend chili pepper heat behind the black cherries, mocha and currants. It's a robust, heady wine that wants rich stews and roasts to pair with.",El CabRhône,Bodega de Edgar
"A small wine region close to the city of Lyon, Coteaux du Lyonnais produces the wine for the city's bars. This is soft, rounded, a delicious cherry flavored wine. It has a light structure and attractive final acidity.",Fleurieux,Signé Vigneron
"This is a bit of a disappointing follow-up to the outstanding 2009. It moves past flavors of ripe berry and on to scents and flavors of raisins. Tannins are stiff and drying, and the high alcohol carries heat through the finish. It's a bold style, but drink soon as it's not likely to age.",Far Away Vineyard,Trio Vintners
"Big, rich, jammy Shiraz, soft and sweet in blackberry and cherry jam, cola, caramelized wood and bacon flavors. This lusty red wine will be a good companion to barbecue.",,Wattle Creek
"This Bordeaux-style blend of 40% Merlot, 30% Cabernet Franc and 30% Cabernet Sauvignon offers a trio of plum, leather and char aromas. Although the wine feels slack and broad on entrance, the fine tannins strike on the midpalate, which gives it a sense of muscularity. A black raspberry note surfaces on the bright finish.",Voyage de Rouge,Rockgarden
"The residual sugar is a hefty 54g/L. Soft flavors of canned peaches and apricots fill the mouth immediately, then turn watery as the wine quickly slides into a lighter finish.",Les Vignes De Marcoux,San Juan Vineyards
"Waxy and a touch volatile on the nose, this wine offers broad aromas of tropical fruit and barrel. The palate is lithe and medium bodied, bearing kiwi and papaya notes. It finishes with a minerally tang and vital acidity.",,Rappahannock Cellars
"A touch of mushroom and vegetable unripeness runs through this Pinot. It's not entirely unpleasant, but it does interfere with your enjoyment of the fruit. Drink this silky, dry wine now.",BIN 6410,Bennett Valley Cellars
"This is the companion wine to the equally-flirty Buxom Blonde White. Here the blend includes Cabernet, Merlot, Syrah and Sangiovese. It has substantial scents and flavors of fig and prune, earth and espresso. Done in a dark, soft, ready-to-drink style, it's fine for drinking with any barbequed meats.",Bodacious Brunette,Calendar Girl
"A robust, rustic red wine for drinking now with stews, burgers, vegetarian rice and bean dishes in red sauce. The winery doesn't tell us the varietal blend, but it's ripened to the limits of raisins, and high in alcohol, with a resulting glyceriny sweetness.",Lot 348 Field Blend,Cameron Hughes
"To call this wine easy for the price is no insult. For 10 bucks, you get a soft, dry, full-bodied Cab with pleasurable cherry and currant flavors. Perfect for everyday red wine fare.",,Lost Angel
"A blend of 50% Grenache Noir, 40% Mourvèdre and 10% Grenache Gris, this medium-weight rosé offers aromas and flavors of cherry, nectarine and watermelon rind. The acidity keeps the palate fresh and the finish slightly tart and biting.",,Le Cirque
"Fruity aromas of nectarine and red plum lead to a citrusy palate with flavors of pink grapefruit and red apple. A chalky, grippy finish is basic in its citrusy, pith-driven character. Drink this refresher as soon as possible.",,Marqués de Cáceres
"Hits the popular Chardonnay sweet spot right down the middle, with honey, orange, apricot and oak flavors, with a creamy, buttery mouthfeel.",Estate,Midnight
"There's lots of brisk, mouthwatering acidity in this Chardonnay. It shows clean, pure apricot, orange, tropical fruit and lime flavors, with a touch of honey and buttery oak.",Reserve Zanetta Vineyard,Muirwood
"Hailing from the newly approved Ancient Lakes appellation, this wine has notes of lime, peach and minerality. It's frizzante, drinking medium sweet with a tart lick of acidity.",,Jones of Washington
"The notes of herbs and citrus are quite light. It's medium bodied and drinks just a hair off dry, thinning out toward the finish.",,Jones of Washington
"This fruity wine is a sugary mix of bubble gum, mint and syrupy peaches. It consists of bold flavors, but lacks the delicacy that Riesling can show in many vintages.",Katie Mae Zillah Ranch Vineyard,Kana
"There's tremendous fruit on this Zinfandel, mostly of the red and black forest berry type. It's also spicy, showing Zin's cinnamon, nutmeg and white pepper notes. The criticism is that high alcohol makes it feel hot and finish glyceriney sweet.",,Frei Brothers
"This is 100% varietal from an excellent vineyard. For those who love PV for its earthy, tannic, somewhat rustic flavors, this wine will be spot on. It's hard and dark, with char and smoke around light red fruits.",Olsen Vineyards,For a Song
"The oak on this wine is heavy-handed, and it comes in the form of fresh dill, turmeric and vanilla aromas. On the palate, the wine is supple and slick, with a dark cherry flavor and more heavy oak influence. It finishes tangy, and the note of dill lingers.",Founder's Reserve,Shenandoah Vineyards
"This Pinot Grigio has an intriguing copper color thanks to prolonged skin contact. It's dominated by assertive oak notes, with light fruit flavors that take second stage to the astringent wood sensations.",Dessimis,Vie di Romans
"Fleshy black plum and berry aromas open the bouquet of this vibrant wine, and follow straight through to the juicy palate. Hints of tobacco and sweet yet peppery spice add nuance to the medium-weight mouth, while the structured tannins keep the ripe fruit flavors grounded. Drink  now_2016.",Secret Reserve,Shiloh Winery
"This is a blend that's based on Cabernet Sauvignon, and it has some Petite Sirah in the mix. It's dry and tannic, and it offers deep, ripe flavors of blackberry jam, black currant and cedar, as well as a salty grilled-meat note that's reminiscent of charred beef fat. This will pair well with grilled steak.",Signature Series,Tiedemann
"This is high in alcohol, but it will easily pair with barbecue. It's made from fruit grown in the warm Larner Vineyard in Santa Ynez Valley as well as from the cool Lafond Vineyard in Santa Rita Hills. Rich, dry and complex, it offers brisk, citrusy acidity to offset the ripe blackberry, currant and sandalwood flavors.",,Transcendence
"Based on 50% Sangiovese, but blended with an assembly of international grapes, this is clean and polished, and it offers bright notes of berry and cherry, plus mild touches of nut and tobacco. The palate is supple and velvety.",Rosso dei Notri,Tua Rita
"This Syrah is aged for 21 months in 100% French oak__alf of which was new. Spring Valley Vineyard has had a dramatic expansion, which has allowed it to increase production without damaging quality. Soft and smooth, this offers a pretty raspberry flavor that's lightly peppery, with a hint of sweet grain and a side note of orange peel that rides on the tip of the tongue. It's a pleasure to drink already, although it can be cellared for another 6_8 years.",Nina Lee,Spring Valley Vineyard
"This Cabernet Franc-based blend has rich flavors of red and black cherry jam, cherry liqueur and tobacco. The oak influence shows in the form of toastiness and wood spiciness. With its smooth tannins, this wine will drink well now with a great steak.",Devils' Peak,Terlato
"Packed with ripe black- and red-fruit flavors, this wine is dense and concentrated. The rich, generous fruit comes with a complex minerally edge, and it shows the wood influence in the form of a spice note. Age this at least six years.",Domaine du Clos Frantin Les Murots,Albert Bichot
"Typical of Volnay, this wine has a velvety character that surrounds the firm tannins. The acidity is palpable through the warm red-berry flavors and firm edge. It is certainly a wine for aging, although it is also likely to be drinkable in 2_3 years.",Domaine du Pavillon Les Santenots Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"A blend of Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc, this opens with rich, concentrated aromas of black fruit and milk chocolate. There are savory notes of dark pipe tobacco, clove and cardamom. The palate is masculine and powerful, with firm tannins.",Lagone,Aia Vecchia
"This is clean and brisk in lemony acidity, and it offers concentrated, complex flavors of honeyed pineapples, limes, oranges and mangoes. It's dry and finessed.",,MacRostie
"Made from fruit that was sourced from this excellent vineyard in the Horse Heaven Hills, this Cabernet is dense and muscular, and it bears deep berry and cassis flavors at its core. The polished tannins are wreathed in a whiff of smoke and streaked with accents of anise and herb. This is a wine to cellar for another 5_10 years.",Phinny Hill Vineyard,Helix by Reininger
"Smooth and rich, this generous selection is full of ripe fruit and balanced tannins. It shows the elegant side of village wines. With delicious acidity on the finish, this wine can be consumed soon, although it will also age well for several years.",,Joseph Faiveley
"A blend of fruit drawn from the Awatere and Brancott subregions, this is a lively, fresh example of Marlborough Pinot Noir. Judiciously applied notes of vanilla and cinnamon accent flavors of cherry and herb that finish long, while the medium- to full-bodied wine's tannins are ripe and impart a creamy texture. Drink now and over the next couple of years.",,Jules Taylor
"A blend of equal parts Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Sangiovese, this shows an impressive jump forward in terms of its intensity and complexity. This wine is generous, full and round, and it offers flavors of cherry, leather and chocolate.",Grale,Le Grascete
"An old-vine wine, this is powerful, concentrated and impressively dense for a Marsannay. It is full of red plum and berry flavors, plus firm tannins that suggest this could age for several years.",L'Ancestrale,Domaine Sylvain Pataille
"Honey, pear, peach and mineral notes open the bouquet of this fragrant blend of Vermentino, Viognier and Petit Manseng. The palate is smooth, crisp and silky in texture.",,Donna Olimpia 1898
"The Escarpment style is always one of ample ripeness, weight and structure, and the 2009 measures up to the winery's previous successes. Plummy fruit is tinged with a dark chocolate note, while the palate is richly textured, and the finish is long and velvety. Drink now_2018.",,Escarpment
"Although it has a delicate structure, that feels almost lace-like on the palate, this light-bodied Riesling bursts with concentrated ripe peach and apricot flavors. Semisweet in style, this has vibrant acidity and an oyster-shell- and stone-like minerality that lingers on the long finish.",Riesling 11 Lake Dana Vineyard,Fox Run
"Ripe and creamy in texture, this wine offers mango and pineapple flavors and crisp, citrusy acidity. It's an age-worthy selection, with minerality and a fine texture.",Montmains Premier Cru,Garnier et Fils
"Distinctive notes of black cherry, chopped mint, rosemary oil and eucalyptus open the nose of this Merlot. The lush, chewy and rich palate shows a lot of personality and pairing potential. Try drinking this with grilled steak with green peppercorn sauce.",Erminia,Fornacelle
"A red cherry flavor and a rich texture show the ripe side of this plump wine. It has tannins and a touch of bitter chocolate. It's already full and generous, but it does need to age for at least six years.",Les Champs Pimont Premier Cru,Domaine Champy
"Craggy's Pinot style has been trending away from overt fruitiness and toward this sort of complex umamifest of meat, parsnip and mushroom, with just enough black cherry fruit to support all of these components. This 2010 has a firmly structured core surrounded by plush tannins and ample length on the finish. Drink now_2023.",Te Muna Road Vineyard,Craggy Range
"Five of the Bordeaux grapes were used in this wine, and two-thirds of the blend is Cabernet Sauvignon. Most of the grapes came from the excellent Canoe Ridge Estate Vineyard, and the rest were sourced from Cold Creek Vineyard. Dark, saturated flavors of black cherry and cassis are balanced against ripe, firm tannins. It's full bodied and flavorful, and it displays plenty of power.",Artist Series Red Wine,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This is pure, superripe Sangiovese, and it bears fruit flavors of strawberry preserves and cherry pie, plus a dash of dark chocolate and accents of mint and vanilla. It's big and a bit blocky, but it's loaded with fruit.",Bonatello Riserva,Tre Nova
"Vignavecchia hits its stride with this successful wine, which reveals spicy, exotic flavors enhanced by vibrant tones of incense and moist pipe tobacco. Fresh fruit lends the palate a plump, soft and rich feel.",Riserva,Vignavecchia
"Always extremely popular, this Southern Rhône-style six-grape blend is especially noteworthy in 2011. It's a powerful wine that has a broad array of red and purple fruits, plus penetrating focus. This is juicy, forward and immediately delicious, and it also has the structure to age, perhaps surprisingly well.",Subduction,Syncline
"Threads of licorice, steel, earth and smoke weave through the proportionate strawberry and raspberry flavors, offset by hints of herb and baking spice. It's a seamless, complex wine of moderate length.",Spilya Vineyard,Tapteil Vineyard
"This blend of 70% Cabernet and 30% Merlot shows pristine, lively accents of cherry, blackberry and prune. Spicy leather and tobacco tones bring up the rear, which give the palate extra girth and density.",Pietracupa,Tenuta Moraia
"Rich and full-bodied, this has the weight of a barrel-fermented, lees-aged wine. This 100% Pinot Blanc has plenty of orange, cream, brown sugar and brown butter flavors. Try it as an interesting alternative to Chardonnay.",Sierra Madre Vineyard Estate,Sierra Madre
"Full, rich and round, this is packed with ripe yellow-fruit flavors, layered with toast. It bears a spice note, delicious acidity and a concentrated, open finish. Let it age for 2_3 years, but it is also enjoyable now.",Bouchères Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Light and crisp, this offers a subtle prickle on the palate. The lively apple and grapefruit flavors are right up front along with a light sweetness.",Casal Garcia Branco,Aveleda
"A simple Chardonnay, this seems sweet in pineapple and peach jam notes, with buttered toast and honey flavors from oak. Flashy, but one-dimensional.",,Hess Collection
"Made to appeal to the modern taste for sweetness, this blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Chardonnay and Viognier is simple in jammy apricot, citrus and tropical fruit flavors. It has bright acidity, which helps balance it.",,LoveThisLife
"This has thin fruit aromas, with scents of herb and candied milk chocolate. It's a solid wine for $8, with zesty acidity and standard raspberry and plum flavors. The lightweight finish turns lightly herbal.",Marqués de Chivé Crianza,Vicente Gandia
"This is oakier and more expensive than prior Trapiche Chardonnays, but it's not necessarily better. It smells like a rubber band and a barrel, bearing resiny flavors of mango and melon, with lots of sweet oak and vanilla tones.",Finca Las Palmas,Trapiche
"This opens with standard cherry and berry aromas before transitioning to a juicy palate with red berry, plum, herb and grass notes. It finishes a little hot and aggressive, but for $4 who's complaining?",,Terrenal
"Overtly simple and drying, this has crisp acidity and oily flavors of popcorn and tart white fruits. It finishes with citrus and astringency. This would likely be better with seafood or salad than on its own.",Emblema,Paralelo
"With an attractive fresh prickle on the palate, this is a crisp wine with a red fruit flavor, acidity and a soft, sweet finish.",Filigrana,Parras Vinhos
"This blend of Mourvèdre and Counoise is soft and sweet. It tastes like the wine version of a milk-chocolate candy bar, infused with blackberry essence and alcohol.",Field Blend,Minassian-Young
"Smoky, oaky and peppery up front, with balsamic berry aromas and tree bark notes. It feels thick, creamy and a little awkward, with heavy oak flavors, related spice and savory, stewy notes. As it unwinds it's chunky and heavy, with a sweet molasses note on the finish.",,Monte Xanic
"Packed with jammy fruit and sweet raspberry flavors, this easy rosé would make a great partner to cocktail appetizers. The finish shows flavors of wild berry and bitter almond.",,Masciarelli
This is a fresh and fragrant rosé from the Vinho Verde region. It has light acidity and a red fruit flavor. The lightest prickle gives just that extra lift.,Espadeiro,Quinta de Gomariz
"Crisp and herbaceous, this is a green-fruited wine that's light on the palate, offering delightful refreshing acidity. This is very fruity and ready to drink.",Clemens Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"Made from Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Zinfandel, this is a simple wine. It has cherry and spice flavors, with a cut of acidity.",Blend 175,Bridlewood
"Made in a popular style, but this is seems sweet, like a Starbucks blackberry and mocha drink. It's overripe, with a raisiny finish and some heat. Drink now.",Triumph Reserve,Calistoga Cellars
"This is soft and simple, with mild cherry, spice and cedar flavors. It's not very rich, but it's nice and dry.",,Geyser Peak
"Guenoc and Langtry, its parent company, have made some great Sauvignon Blancs in their time, showcasing Lake County's good fortune with this grape. This is a good effort, with a prevailing pineapple note.",,Guenoc
This is a rough-edged wine that has some dry tannins and red berry acidity. It's light on the palate with a fresh character. Drink in a year.,,Domaine de Moulin-Pouzy
"Lightweight, with smooth red fruit and acidity, this is soft and round. The berry fruit neatly merges with the gentle tannins.",Vista,Caves Aliança
"Almost rosé-like in color and personality, this light, Sangiovese-based wine delivers bright acidity and layers of wild berry and pink flower.",,Angelini
"Oyster shell and matchstick aromas come with distant peach and melon notes. Feels good but rudimentary, with peach and papaya flavors that end soft and easy. Drink this immediately for maximum zest and freshness.",Sustainably Farmed,_rido
"Simple and strongly flavored, this is powerful in pear, vanilla and buttered toast notes. There's not much subtlety, but it will satisfy fans of this style.",,Chime
"This is a very nice Riesling for drinking with today's ethnic fare. Although it's softer than you'd expect from this normally tart varietal, it's clean and spicy, with citrus, flower and honey flavors. The sweetness level is off-dry.",,Black Box
"A touch of minerality on the nose comes with apple and lemon aromas. It feels fleshy, with pulpy white-fruit flavors that end with honeydew and papaya notes. Drink now.",,Bodega Norton
"This has ripe blackberry and oak flavors. It's dry, full bodied and tannic enough to cut through a rich, ketchup-strewn cheeseburger.",,Lost Angel
"From Bacio Divino, this Sangiovese-based blend is curiously soft. While it has forward cherry, cocoa and spice flavors, it simply lacks structural integrity.The alcohol is evident on the warm, dry finish.",,Pazzo
The mouthfeel has sandpapery tannins and some green peppercorn notes alongside riper flavors of blackberries and sweet currants. It's a rustic Zin to drink with barbecue.,Old Vine,Plungerhead
"Dry and acidic, this has flavors of green mint and sour cherry candy. Not likely to improve with age, but give it an hour in the decanter to let it soften.",,Stephen Ross
"The nose opens with animalistic scents of leather, compost and barnyard. This has an average mouthfeel, with somewhat herbal plum and berry flavors that finish short with a mild leafy character.",,Tempus Alba
"There's an unripe, green edge to this Zinfandel that detracts from its appeal. Yet it has some good blackberry fruit, and it's nicely dry and tannic. Pair this with rich meats and cheeses to coax out the sweetness.",Mounts Vineyard,V. Sattui
"Miraflores continues to make a compelling case for El Dorado Petite Sirah with this yeasty, vanilla cream- and blueberry molasses-infused wine. Its tannins smoothed out a bit, but they'll still coat the sides of your mouth, with notes of oak and milk chocolate surfacing on the finish.",Estate,Miraflores
"Shows all the hallmarks of the modern, exclusive style of Cabernet, with massively ripe blackberry and cassis flavors, aged in the best toasty oak, and structured with rich, softly complex Napa tannins. Drink now.",Private Reserve,Spoto
"Shows the firm tannins and full-bodied richness of Petite Sirah, but it's not an ager because it's a little too low in acid for the long haul. So enjoy it now for the wealth of blackberries, cherries, anise and mocha.",Estate,Vina Robles
"This single-variety wine from Alorna has a sophisticated quality that's found in the estate's other cuvées. It is structured, with spicy wood accents balancing the black currant flavors. A bitter chocolate note lends an edge to this finely made wine.",,Quinta da Alorna
"This blend of 50% Syrah, 40% Grenache and 10% Carignan starts off tight and firm, but with time it reveals attractive aromas and flavors of small red berries and plums accented by garrigue and a hint of sweet woody smoke. It's firmly structured, with gripping tannins and a faint cocoa accent to the dry finish.",Coste d'Aleyrac,Château de Lancyre
"Starts off with wet stone and lime aromas, then folds in Granny Smith flavors on the palate, giving it just the right mix of mineral, citrus and apple. It's lightweight but potent, with a lean but wiry frame. Drink now_2018.",,Dr. H. Thanisch (Erben Thanisch)
"Even by De Loach's standards of enormously ripe Zinfandels, this one stands out. It's a hydrogen bomb of a wine, fantastically rich in berries and fruits that have a slightly dried quality to them. The tannins are thick, and the alcohol seems higher and hotter than the stated 14.5% by volume.",Riebli Valley Vineyard,De Loach
"Paxis is a warm, earthy wine, packed with ripe, soft and forward fruit. It does have a structure that could allow the wine to age, but there is no need as its fruitiness makes it ready to drink now.",Paxis,DFJ Vinhos
"A very successful Fiano, with bright aromas of banana, exotic fruit, pineapple and loads of honey. In fact, those beautiful honey flavors continue onto the palate and give the wine a pretty sensation of smoothness and creaminess.",,Di Meo
"Fleshy and also minerally on the nose, with green banana, peach and nectarine aromas. Feels a little gritty, with plenty of oak and ample acidity. Oak-based flavors of baked apple and peach lead to an energetic finish. Drink now.",Marques de Casa Concha,Concha y Toro
"A racy, balanced type of Cabernet with aromas of graphite, black cherry and plum. That's followed by a fit palate with Cab-related weight and tannins but also a lightness of being. Tastes lightly herbal, but with plenty of red plum and berry notes and length. Juicy and fresh overall.",Reserva,Echeverria
"A big, soft and rounded wine that shows notes of wood aging and ripe yellow fruit. There is a fine burst of acidity that offers a more citric side. Drink now, or wait for up to two more years.",Monte Cascas Reserva Branco,Casca Wines
"Spicy right from the top, with cinnamon candy highlights around cherry and berry fruit flavors. Juicy acids add vitality and lift, and the wine is clean and palate-friendly, with a lovely freshness. Good proportion and flavor all the way through the finish.",,Amity
"In the full style of an Alentejo white, this is packed with flavors of tropical fruit and yellow stone fruit. Its richness is balanced by a good crisp line of citrusy acidity that yields a harmonious whole.",Branco,Altas Quintas
"This is a very fruity wine with some of the Dão minerality lending it structure. There are red-fruit flavors, with notes of coffee and herb. Its tannins are balanced, and its acidity lends a juicy aftertaste.",Outeiro,Alvaro Castro
"Aromas of cinnamon and spice decorate the nose, leading into a wine whose mouthfeel suggests just a hint of pétillance. Light, juicy raspberry fruit is pleasant and fresh, but this does not have the density of the other 2010 Pinots from Ken Wright.",McCrone Vineyard,Ken Wright
"Clean and varietal, this firm and juicy Pinot Noir offers light, forward raspberry and plum fruit, dusted with cinnamon and cocoa. Medium concentration and length.",Signature Collection,King Estate
"A blend of 70%Montepulciano and 30% Merlot, this is a smooth and rich wine, with dark concentration and a bouquet showing notes of black cherry, cassis, blackberry pie and exotic spice. There's beautiful smoothness here, while the finish is bright and compact.",Kudos,Talamonti
"In the hands of master blender Dirk Niepoort, even a straight tawny style has depth of flavor and intensity. The wine has red fruit, layered with concentrated acidity, a hint of wood aging, and remains fresh and fruity.",Tawny,Niepoort
"Minearally and fresh on the nose, with hints of grass, lime and apple. Good and round in the mouth, with ample acidic punch and lively flavors of nopal, citrus and tarragon. Mellow and just zesty enough on the finish.",Gran Reserva,Ventisquero
"Brambly aromas are restrained and slightly floral. Feels fresh and easy to drink, with medium body weight and a mix of strawberry, raspberry, tomato and herbal-tea flavors. Finishes mellow and consistent. Very nice Pinot Noir for the money.",Reserva,Veramonte
"A firm, tannic wine that reveals the cool ocean climate of Lisboa. This wine is structured and spicy from wood aging, with underlying juicy, well-blended flavors of plum and blackberry.",Reserva,Vidigal
"Baked apple, bread crust and sweet spice abound on the nose and palate, with a solid peach-pit nuttiness that lingers on the medium-length finish. Medium weight with a lush texture, but good acidity enlivens the close.",Toques et Clochers Méditerranéen,Sieur d'Arques
"Like the winery's 2008 Pinot, this new 2009 is tart. Its acidity cuts right through the rich, ripe cherry and raspberry fruit, giving the wine a sour candy taste. Everything else about it is great.",Durell Vineyard,Three Sticks
"Creamy and oaky on the nose, with a soft touch. This blend of 68% Cabernet and 32% Syrah offers weight, density and smooth edges along with blackberry, coffee and mild medicinal and herbal flavors. Finishes dark, toasty and a touch minty.",Reserva,Oveja Negra
"With its concentrated fruit and weight, this is a wine that, as its name suggests, brings Tannat to its intense apogee. The wine is a blockbuster; with its power and density, it is on the edge of being too much.",Plénitude,Producteurs Plaimont
"The bouquet is elegant and restrained for the variety, with lead pencil, lemony notes, dark cherry and blackberry aromas. Feels lively and textured, with racy acidity setting up flavors of tobacco, coffee, chocolate, herbs and blackberry. Saucy on the finish, with menthol.",La Capitana Barrel Reserve,Viña La Rosa
"A severe wine whose tannins show no sign of softening yet. Very mineral in texture, with black currants and dark-fruit skins, it is structured and concentrated, and should pair well with rich foods.",,Domaine du Prince
"Cerasuolo d'Abruzzo (made with Montepulciano grapes) is one of the best rosé wines to come from Italy. In fact, this region was one of the first to propose a rosé and this expression is redolent of pink rose, forest berry and fragrant passion fruit.",Hedòs,Cantina Tollo
"Montepulciano grapes are aged six months in oak to render sweet nuances of cinnamon and toasted almond that rest over a dense core of jammy fruit. The wine is lush, soft and velvety on the finish.",Mekan,Cantine Cipressi
"Red fruit dominant, this has fine tannins and a juicy berry flavor. It's ripe, soft and open, with a touch of dark chocolate and an herbal finish. Glass stopper.",,Zantho
"This shows a soft, velvety personality, with loads of ripe fruit, blackberry and cherry liqueur. Leather, exotic spice and dark chocolate notes complete the picture, giving the wine a rich, generous personality.",,Piazzano
"A blend of Pinot Noir and Pinot Meunier, this is a rich, slightly sweet bubbly. It has ripe, delicious flavors of raspberry jam, cherry pie, vanilla, yeasty sourdough and buttercream. It's a little rough in texture, but a nice wine for drinking now.",Blanc de Noirs,PLR Legacy
"This is big, rich, thick wine, dripping with gooey cherry and chocolate flavors. Blended from equal parts Grenache and Syrah, it features some notable tannins, although it's voluptuous enough to drink now. Pair it with barbecue.",Larner Vineyard Cuvée Loco,Tercero
"With just 2% Syrah, this is a Bordeaux-style blend, feauturing mostly Cabernet and Merlot. The rich entry features berry, chocolate and espresso, with a round midpalate and polished tannins. A hint of tar runs through the finish.",Stella Maris Red,Northstar
"Right out of the bottle, this is tight and acidic. While it's rich in raspberry, cherry and Dr. Pepper flavors, not to mention oak, it's jammy, fresh and direct__n an immature way. Give it a few hours in a decanter and drink it with rich lamb and steak dishes.",Horseshoe Bend Vineyard,Occidental Road Cellars
"Abundant lavender and jasmine touches meld with lemon peel and waxy lanolin notes on this richly textured, slightly viscous white wine. Lemony and fresh on the palate, with brisk acidity, it finishes with a long, delicate touch of hazelnut oil.",Dry White,Sipun
"A blend of Cabernet Franc, Cabernet Sauvignon, Carmenere, Merlot and Barbera, this simple, bright red blend offers simple layers of cherry and blackberry, with background tones of black olive and cheese rind.",Vigna Santella del Gröm,Ricci Curbastro
"The main difference between this and Schramsberg's more expensive, vintage-dated brut is the texture. This feels a little more scouring, lacking the silky finesse. Made from equal parts Pinot Noir and Chardonnay.",Mirabelle Brut,Schramsberg
"This is a strongly flavored Chardonnay, with powerful notes of ripe mango, pineapple, papaya and oak. Its intensity of fruit is impressive. What it lacks in subtlety, it makes up for in sheer power.",Sangiacomo Vineyards,Ram's Gate
"A well-made, earthy Carignane, this tastes of cinnamon and plum cobbler, with subtle layers of bacon and smoke on the finish. Full-bodied, but also softly round, this is just right for hearty dishes like braised lamb or roasted pork.",Thérèse Vineyards,Martin Ranch
"Finely balanced, this has attractively honeyed aromas that lead to apricot, honey, lemon and light spice flavors. The wine is warm, yet with just the right acidity to keep it fresh.",Clos Schwendi,André Blanck et ses Fils
"Despite its maturity, this still has fresh pear and grapefruit flavors, which combine with almond, cream and currant notes, producing a round, smooth wine.",Kamptaler Terrassen,Bründlmayer
"This fascinating blend of biodynamically farmed Malvasia, Ribolla and Welschriesling balances savory smoke and toasted wood notes with sweet elements of apple, lemon and cream. Fermented with indigenous yeast, it's a richly textured wine with deep complexity.",Burja Bela,Burja
"Hints of cedar and spice accent ripe red-fruit and flower notes on this distinctly Old World-style Pinot Noir. A fresh green-herb flavor, brisk acidity and penetrating tannins drive through the long finish.",Unfined and Unfiltered,Bloomer Creek
"This showcases Viognier's rich, exotic side, with flavors of tropical fruit, orange, vanilla-cream, honeysuckle and spice. It's a big, flamboyant wine, but dry, and nicely balanced with crisp acidity and a touch of mineral.",,Bodega Rancho
"This full-bodied wine, as its alcohol indicates, has intense flavors of white fruit, spice and pepper.",Bollenberg,Château d'Orschwihr
"Roasted and fiery on the nose, this wine has red fruit aromas mixed with green, herbal notes. It feels racy and pumped up with acidity, which drives the wine's core flavors of red plum, herb and vanilla. It's fresh but slightly abrasive and herbal throughout. This is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Syrah and Tempranillo, in descending order.",Aldonza Navamarín,Dehesas y Viñedos de Navamarín
"From the cool-climate north of Italy, this fresh Riesling offers fragrant tones of lemon zest, kiwi, exotic fruit and a touch of dried basil. The mouth is silky, smooth and crisp on the finish.",Rifall,Erste Neue
"Easton blends the Musque clone with Clone One for a Sauvignon Blanc that's not overly herbaceous nor overly rich and creamy. The wine has a crisp minerality and tastes of ripe golden apple and lemon, with just the right amount of richness and a sliver of nuttiness in the background.",Monarch Mine Vineyard,Easton
"This is a creamy and very well-executed blend of Chardonnay and Ribolla Gialla that opens with exciting aromas of stone fruit, citrus and honey, plus tiny touches of candy and butterscotch (a common aromatic characteristic of Ribolla Gialla).",Vertigo,Livio Felluga
"Deep gold and richly scented with buttered toasted-nut aromas, this 100% barrel-fermented Chardonnay is a bit old-fashioned, but deliciously delectable. Superripe fruit and decent acidity elevate it above mere oak-bomb status.",,Goose Ridge
"This is a structured wine with firm tannins, showing a good balance of red berry and cherry juice flavors. It is rich and likely to soften over the next year into something warm and fruity.",Clos des Garands,Georges Duboeuf
"Just bottled, this wine is young, fruity and full of black cherry and red plum flavors. Combined with this is a firm character and a structure of tannins that demand aging over at least 2_3 years.",,Domaine de Leyre-Loup
"Earthy, inky, sweet and jammy on the nose, this brings just the right hint of raisin. It feels narrow and firmly tannic, with wide flavors of blackberry, prune, raisin and chocolate. It's loaded with flavor, but the mouthfeel is astringent and collapsed. A powerful country-style wine.",Viñas Viejas,Punto y Coma
"This starts with a startling but tangy lemon-tea flavor. Cinnamon and plum notes enter the palate, which are underscored by rather chalky acidity, and finished with a coffee highlight.",,Northstar
"Active on the bouquet, this features mint, baking spice, clove and ripe berry aromas. It feels plump and round, with a mildly candied flavor profile that includes blackberry, herb, and nutmeg. It turns a little rooty on the finish, suggesting licorice nibs. A blend of 65% Garnacha and 35% Tempranillo.",La Vendimia,Palacios Remondo
"Hearty and masculine, this has dark fruit aromas of blackberry and prune that are backed by notes of cured meat, leather and Indian spice. Those dark flavors add sensations of sweetness and richness to the overall mouthfeel.",L'Artista,Paniole
"This 100% Cabernet is a good wine, rich in blackberry, black currant and new oak flavors, and the tannins show that famous Stags Leap __ron fist in a velvet glove_ quality. It seems a little hollow in the midpalate, reminiscent of the 2006 and 2007 vintages. Drink now_2017.",S.L.V.,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"The 2009 Syrah, like its companion reds, needs plenty of breathing time to shed its hard shell of tannins and barrel flavors. Coffee and smoke are the aromas and flavors first noticed. Slowly the fruit emerges, offering pretty boysenberry that has a tangy snap.",Elerding Vineyard,Stottle
"This wine hails from six Napa Valley vineyards, including the producer's Calistoga-based estate Bone Ash, as well as Beck stoffer Georges III in Rutherford. It opens in mouthfilling black licorice and blackberry, juicy and soft with the backbone to age. Dried herb provides a savory component, while a fresh vibrancy offsets the wine's denseness. Cellar this concentrated wine through 2022.",Silencieux,Venge
"Aromas of strawberry, tangerine zest, pastry, aromatic herb and toasted walnut mingle in the glass and follow through to the creamy palate along with ripe red apple and pear. It's beautifully balanced with fresh acidity and a soft, elegant mousse.",Vintage Collection Dosage Zero Noir Riserva,Ca' del Bosco
"Bouscassé is the home estate of Alain Brumont, who also owns Château Montus. The wine may be six years old, but it is still dark and very firm. Dense tannins still show strongly over the tarry black fruits. Just wait and this wine will reveal its richness and smoothness while never losing concentration. Drink from 2018.",Château Bouscassé,Alain Brumont
"Concentrated, inky and charred on the nose, this is a ripe and heady Rioja with strong barrel influences. Blackberry, cassis and roasted black-plum flavors are appropriate given the wine's hefty build. Finishing flavors of coffee, bitter chocolate and baking spices are long and thorough. Drink this powerful Tempranillo-led blend through 2030.",7 Varietales,Dominio de Berzal
"This seems a tad more restrained than usual for La Doriane, which has typically been extremely lush and exotic in the past. The 2012 isn't as over the top, but still shows plenty of ripe apricot and tropical fruit framed by smoky oak and baking spices. The finish is long and mouthwatering, suggesting at least a few years of longevity.",La Doriane,E. Guigal
"Dark and dense upon opening, this compact, concentrated cuvée matches its muscular fruit to polished tannins. Black cherry dives deep, almost to the level of black currant fruit, and brings a streak of black olive. This impressive effort will drink well now through 2025.",Renegade Ridge Estate,Archery Summit
"This splendid effort is sourced from the Durant Vineyard, and aged in neutral French oak for seven months prior to bottling. Spicy and dense, it's a lively blend of lime, apple, apricot and pear fruits. A trickle of juicy acidity pulls the flavors through into a finish with streaks of vanilla and clove. The 20-year-old vines provide the complexity and detail that will reward another decade of aging. Drink now through 2025.",Chassé,DanCin
"A blend of 85% Cabernet Sauvignon, 10% Merlot and 5% Petit Verdot, this opens with aromas of mature blackberries, blueberries, cedar, aromatic dried herbs and black pepper. On the smooth palate, notes of exotic spice, licorice, menthol and espresso accent the core of dried black cherry. It's well balanced, with velvety tannins and surprising freshness for what was a torrid vintage.",Lupicaia,G.A. Rossi di Medelana
"Released after the 2011 vintage, this elegant wine has great presence. A blend of Touriga Nacional and Touriga Franca, if offers vibrant, structured fruit while still reserving its full glory for several more years. Ripe fruits blend with intense acidity at the end. Drink from 2017.",Reserva,Quinta da Romaneira
"The deep-gold color shows how long this wine has been aging. Smoky, toasted baguette aromas lead to very rich flavors that taste almost sweet but are appetizingly dry. The fruit notes go from ripe white cherry at the base to vivid lemon and kiwi for top notes. A lavish, long finish echoes butter and apple butter flavors.",Reserve 50 Late Disgorged,Schramsberg
"The totally delicious fruit offers immense flavors of black cherries and cassis, along with streaks of cola, coffee and chocolate syrup. It's a luscious, beautifully balanced wine with a long and thoroughly delicious finish.",Estate,Styring
"In this collaboration between Ken Forrester and Jesse Katz, Katz sources from the same site he favors for his Devil Proof Malbec, crafting here a creamy, decadent Cabernet stuffed in coconut macaroon, blueberry and black cherry fruit. Soft, rounded and yet entirely structured and lush, it is delicious right now and yet should be even more seductive in time, through 2020.",A Ken Forrester Wine,The Bridge
"This is a serious, dark and brooding wine. Powerful tannins and dense structure along with layers of concentrated black fruits all point to a wine for long-term aging. The mineral texture and pronounced acidity add to the longevity of this impressive wine. Drink from 2019.",,Château Lagrézette
"The exotic, earthy aspects of Pinot come out in this rich and enticing example. Aromas captivate with elements of rich fruit, toasted oak, wood smoke, forest floor and cola. The mouthfeel is broad and supple, the favors ripe, spicy and intricate, weaving together savory notes, dark fruits and exotic spices. All the layers linger on the long finish.",Toulouse Vineyard,MacPhail
"Rich, full and opulent, this is a honeyed, lush Condrieu probably best consumed by the end of 2015. Apricot and dried pineapple notes come across almost like a dry Sauternes, accented by lingering caramel and spice on the long finish.",,Maison Nicolas Perrin
"Highly enticing, handsome aromas of graphite, blueberry, boysenberry and oaky grit are firm and minerally. This lush, modern, stately Tempranillo is pure, plump and deep on the palate. Flavors of blackberry, cassis and fine oak come together like paint on Dalí's canvas, while the finish is loamy and complex, with flavors of tobacco folded into silky smooth depth. Drink through 2024",Finca El Rincón de Clunia,Clunia
"High-toned, fragrant, toasted oak nuances meld beautifully with delicious black cherry aromas and flavors in this well-balanced, abundantly proportioned wine. It is full bodied, opulent in texture, with enough fine-grained tannin and acidity to support the high level of ripeness. It keeps demanding another sip.",Anderson Creek Vineyard,MacPhail
"Initially faint whiffs of saffron, tangerine and blossom catapult with intensity on the palate of this auslese. It's finely framed, but flavors of preserved peach, mango and honey are dense and concentrated, and cut with a long, linear streak of lime. Gorgeous now, but sure to intensify for decades to come.",Rosalack Auslese,Schloss Johannisberger
"A Bordeaux-inspired blend of 54% Cabernet Franc, 28% Merlot and 18% Cabernet Sauvignon, this is a tightly woven wine with buoyant minerality and a baseline of complexity, dry and balanced in cranberry, graphite, herb and tobacco leaf. It is composed and layered, enjoyable now and over time, through 2022.",Denary Cuvée,Blackbird Vineyards
"A thrilling wine, this impresses instantly with its detail and definition. Vividly fruity with a mix of melon, apple and stone fruits, this tangy, toasty effort has nuanced notes of herb and mineral as well. Drink now through 2030.",,Brittan Vineyards
"With fruit sourced from the excellent Hyland Vineyard, this blends a pair of Dijon clones and was aged in half new French oak for 15 months. Black cherry and cola syrup flavors combine in a sappy, concentrated midpalate. Highlights of underbrush and balsamic add flavor interest, and the dry, polished tannins frame the flavors perfectly. There's every reason to believe this can age well, but why wait?",Melodia,DanCin
"This is an absolutely stunning wine, thick and dense with an array of candied fruits, caramel, marmalade, butterscotch and more. With 189g/L of residual sugar, a little sip or two will go a long way.",Afterglow Estate Dessert,Styring
"Ripe blackberry, crushed plum, black raspberry, sweet baking spices, orange zest and dark chocolate are some of the aromas and flavors you'll find on this creamy, full-bodied blend of Petit Verdot, Cabernet Franc and Cabernet Sauvignon.  Velvety tannins provide the smooth texture and framework. Enjoy through 2020.",Monteti,Tenuta Monteti
"At first this profoundly compelling wine seems rather light, but as it pirouettes on a base of cherry and sassafras, it constantly shifts and sends up shafts of previously undetected flavors. Popcorn, saffron and just the faintest hint of barnyard emerge__uddenly it becomes a full-throttle cherry bomb that can best be described as yummy.",Freedom Hill Vineyard,Elizabeth Chambers
"Richly buttered Bing cherries, plums, licorice, black pepper and a loamy mud minerality show on the nose of this bottling by winemaker Scott Shirley. The palate truly shines, with flavors of chocolate syrup-covered cherries rolled in fresh mint, espresso beans, charred pine and tannins that wake up the mouth and hold its attention.",Reserve,Justin
"This deep, smoky, minerally wonder is full to the brim with ripe blackberry, tobacco and fine-oak aromas. In the mouth, this Tempranillo-led blend is rich and jammy but not out of shape. Blackberry, prune and toasty flavors finish lusty, with a touch of heat and burn that should settle in due time. Drink now through 2023.",Baron de Chirel Reserva,Marqués de Riscal
"Grande Reserva represents the very best selection from a vintage. This concentrated, dark wine has a brooding quality that shows both its quality and its aging ability. It is packed with plum and berry fruits that are still integrating with the solid tannins. It needs to age, so drink from 2018.",Grande Reserva,Quinta dos Aciprestes
"Brambly cherry fruit carries a generous amount of vanilla and clove highlights, along with a lightly smoky aroma of Earl Grey tea. Such details bring the wine to a deliciously satisfying finish.",Archery Summit Estate,Archery Summit
"You'll find it difficult to keep your hands off this gem, a block selection from the estate vineyard. The name, notes the winery, comes from an ancient Greek dance. Dark, smoky and toasty, this gripping wine is tight-knit and packed with raspberry and black cherry fruit, set against sweet baking spices. The balance is perfect, and this will drink well now through 2030.",Trata,DanCin
"This includes grapes from the winery's Jerusalem Hill vineyard in the Eola-Amity Hills AVA, in addition to the Dundee Hills sites, hence the more general Willamette Valley designation. It was aged in 65% new French oak for 16 months. It's open and generous, offering bright berry, cherry and red currant fruit matched to defining acids, all set in a fine-tuned frame of new oak. Re-tasted 24 hours after being opened, it remained fresh, dense and satisfying.",Evenstad Reserve,Domaine Serene
"This opens with aromas of dark berry, toast, espresso and a whiff of dark cooking spice. The bracing palate offers unripe cherry, licorice, powdered sage and toasted oak alongside bracing tannins that leave an astringent, mouth-puckering finish.",,Giribaldi
"Whiffs of smoke and crushed minerals lend a savory tone to bright honey and tangerine flavors in this unusually styled Gewürztraminer. It's not varietally classic, but refreshingly brisk in acidity and quite quaffable. Drink now.",Bechtheimer Spätlese,G&M; Machmer
"This is a gentle, perfumed wine that is ripe and deliciously fruity. It does have a more herbal, green side as well as a tangy texture but the main impression is of a wine that is soft and ready to drink.",Colecção Privada,José Maria da Fonseca
"Sandalwood and a shovelful of fresh earth mark the entry of this wine aromatically. A soft, tart expression of the variety, it offers bittersweet tannin and dark cherry at its core.",El Coro,Keller Estate
"Plum, slate and cherry blossoms show on the nose of this wine, grown along the Foxen Canyon corridor. Red fruit and hibiscus highlight the top of the sip, followed by brick minerality, bright acidity and a spice that leans toward anise.",,Koehler
"Aromas of crushed dark-skinned berry, violet, clove and a hint of chopped herb lead the nose. The lean palate offers raw raspberry, sour cherry and ground pepper alongside firm tannins. A note of bitter walnut closes the finish.",,La Fusina
"Flat stewy prune-like aromas are low on life but not off-putting. This feels wide grabby and tannic, while jammy flavors of raspberry and plum finish chunky and expansive, but also tannic and wan. Drink now.",Pagos de Tahola Reserva,Larchago
"Perfumed aromas of cherry, forest floor and cinnamon bring appeal to this light-colored wine. It's delicate and airy in style, with cranberry flavors on the finish.",,Larkspur
"Black cherry, chipped slate and an earthy nutmeg character show on the nose of this stylishly labeled bottling. Medium in weight, it offers energetic and tart cranberry-cherry flavors as well as a menthol element on the palate, which is tangy throughout and wipes up clean.",,Liberated
"From Louis Max vineyards in the Côte Chalonnaise, this creamy, almost honeyed wine has a ripe character and full-bodied yellow and crisp pear fruit flavors. It's a cut above a basic white Burgundy with its generous texture and the acidity at the end. Drink now.",Côte Chalonnaise,Louis Max
"This is a light, crisp, simple 100% expression of the variety. It shines best in its aromas of honeysuckle and peach.",,Materra Cunat Family Vineyards
"A whiff of spice amidst freshly pressed apples and pears gives this bright, easy going Kabinett an autumnal feel. A swirl of honey enriches the midpalate, finishing with lemon-tea sweetness. Begin drinking now.",Mülheimer Sonnenlay Kabinett Feinherb,Max Ferd. Richter
"A rich, thick and oaky 100% varietal, this comes from the Green Valley area, and possesses power and flavor in abundance. Baked apple and pear dance around lighter remembrances of lemon soufflé, finishing in a touch of ginger and nutmeg.",,Migration
"Lots of dark-fruit aromas and fresh cherry-berry flavors keep this medium-bodied wine lively and easy to enjoy. Light spicy, nutty flavors and a touch of milk chocolate add interest, while the texture is smooth.",,Moniker
This verges on dilute flavors with alcohol not quite reaching 12%. Light scents of plum and sassafras continue with accents of lime and mineral. Try this with light fare that won't overwhelm the flavors.,Ribbon Ridge,Omero
"This seems slightly underripe, with tart fruit that has as much apple as berry character. Light hints of cola and earth fade into a lemony finish.",Fir Crest Vineyard,Panther Creek
"While a touch brambly on the nose, ripe rich tangerine and yellow plum flavors take the spotlight in this sunny off-dry Riesling. It's plush on the palate but pleasant, accessible and forward. Drink now.",,Peter Nicolay
This is a solid mineral and tannin dominated wine. It has black currant fruits which are still buried by the tense tannins and stalky texture. It therefore needs some time to develop and broaden out. Drink from 2018.,Pomares,Quinta Nova de Nossa Senhora do Carmo
"Aged two years in French and American oak, this is a dark and meaty wine, with black fruits and a hint of blood. There's a bit of a hole in the midpalate, but streaks of cola and licorice revive the finish.",Barrel Select,Sweet Cheeks
"This wine has aromas of lemongrass and apricot with a touch of petrol. It offers flavors of peach, apricot, vanilla and jasmine. It is very soft in the mouth, and the bright finish is marked by floral notes.",Mt. Tabor,Tabor
"Rose, mature berry, kitchen spice and a whiff of leather lead the nose. On the straightforward palate, notes of licorice and sage add interest to the dried black cherry core alongside firm tannins. A black pepper note closes the somewhat fleeting finish.",La Fenice,Tenimenti Famiglia Cavallero
"The wine is structured, flavored with the wood aging as much as the fruit. It has a spicy burnt character that contrasts with the more juicy black currant flavors. Drink from 2017.",,Terra Silvestre
"Iron, pomegranate and dust aromas show on the nose of this entry-level bottling from the Los Gatos producer. Bright red fruits and solid brown spice show on the palate that proves light, airy and easy as it dances across the tongue with energy.",Cuvee Los Gatos,Testarossa
"The simplest and fruitiest of the Cahors made at Gaudou, this is still a structured wine that has some firm, very young tannins that need to round out. Plenty of fruity, fresh black-currant flavor is cut by crisp acidity. The wine will need to age, so drink from 2016.",Tradition,Château de Gaudou
"The Pannell family, who founded Margaret River's Moss Wood in 1969, moved on in the mid-1990s to Pemberton, where it felt conditions were more suited to Burgundian varieties. This is a rather full-bodied Pinot Noir, with supple tannins and a long, slightly dusty finish. Light resiny notes and rooty scents add complexity to modest cherry fruit. Drink now_2020.",,Picardy
"Scratchy cherry and plum aromas are woody and minerally, to an extent. This feels crimped and hard, while heavy oak lends a hickory note to roasted medicinal red fruit flavors. A woody dry spicy finish is good despite rawness and heat.",PdM Moncayo,Pagos del Moncayo
"Jammy muscled-up aromas of blackberry show hints of spice, especially red chili flake. This feels full, round and comfortable, with moderate tannic clamp. Herbal black-fruit flavors finish bold, with a touch of dry bitter oak.",Altosur,Finca Sophenia
"Crisp almost scratchy aromas of herbal red fruits are a bit strained. This feels solid, with ample volume. Earthy flavors of tomato sauce, mixed spices, stewed plum and cassis finish long and herbal, with some grace.",,Luigi Bosca
"Mature plum, crushed violet and dark cooking spice aromas come together in the glass. The firm palate delivers dried cherry, blackberry extract and licorice alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. Drink soon to capture the remaining fruit.",Otto,Cascina Liuzzi
"Fresh and fruity, this easy-drinking red delivers aromas and flavors of black cherry, blackberry, black pepper and a hint of anise. Thanks to bright acidity, it can be paired with almost any dish.",,Castello del Poggio
"A perfumed wine, it has a smooth texture contrasting with tight acidity. It's light, fruity and still needs a little time to develop. The soft tannins don't suggest long aging. Drink from 2016.",Les Beaumonts,Arnoux & Fils
"Made with Aglianico, this simple rosé opens with aromas of sour red berries, crushed strawberry and cake spices. The casual palate offers sweet Morello cherry and pink grapefruit accented by notes of clove and sugary vanilla.",Manfredi Rosa,Re Manfredi
"Red-fruit aromas come with notes of leather, spice and stalkiness. Spiky acidity creates a sharp mouthfeel that turns earthier as the acids fade. The flavor profile is tart, with herbal leanings and raspberry. A slight bitterness and not much fruit are what you get on the finish.",Ibéricos Crianza,Soto de Torres
"Stalky aromas infiltrate schisty plum and berry scents, while in the mouth this Garnacha-led blend of five grapes is jammy feeling. Stalky, roasted berry flavors are strong, while the finish is stalky tasting and gritty in feel.",,Clos Gebrat
"Hickory, roasted black fruit, vanilla, rubber and plastic aromas set up a big but balanced feeling palate. Flavors of roasted blackberry are rubbery and come with oaky vanilla, while this feels good on the finish with an overriding oak character in the driver's seat.",Roble,Conde de Siruela
"Already mature, this medium-bodied wine offers scents of dried fruit and leather, then flavors of caramelized, roasted black cherries and more leather. It's a bit coarsely textured, then falls away on the finish. Drink soon.",,Domaine la Mereuille
"This bright wine opens with aromas of white flowers and citrus. The palate offers juicy lemon-lime and white almond alongside crisp acidity that gives it a clean, fresh finish.",,Cusumano
"Fresh and fruity, it shows crispness as well as white fruits, orange zest and a lively lemon aftertaste. Drink now.",Les Pierres Blanches,Domaine André Bonhomme
"The wine is structured and still firm, showing tight tannins and acidity over the red fruits. A cool edge elicits the fresher character of the fruits. Drink from 2016.",Les Vignottes,Domaine Jean Petitot et Fils
"Made from native grape Catarratto, this easy-drinking wine opens with aromas of white flower and stone fruit. The palate delivers white peach and lemon zest flavors alongside fresh acidity, ending bright.",Calebianche,Fazio
"This light and refreshing wine is perfect for everyday fare. It has aromas of pineapple, lime zest and a hint of Mediterranean herbs that all carry over to the palate. Pair this with light first courses or grilled vegetables.",,Feudo Principi di Butera
"Here is a steely, bright Sauvignon Blanc that's rounded in citrus, melon and herbal flavors, finishing clean and with ample acidic lift.",Estate Bottled,Foppiano
"Hints of spring ramps and earth blow off with aeration to reveal pretty floral and lemon aromas on this off-dry, single-vineyard Pinot Blanc. The palate is a bit demure in fruit concentration, but brisk lemon-lime acidity shines through the richly textured palate.",Reserve Morris Vineyard,Heron Hill
"Delicate floral and bramble notes accent bright sour-cherry and currant notes on this rich, concentrated Pinot Noir. It's fresh and fruity on the palate with a shock of cranberry flavor and just a hint of tannins that extend the finish.",,Hosmer
"This blend of Aglianico, Merlot and Sangiovese opens with aromas of ripe black plum, toasted oak, chocolate and game. The thick, one-dimensional palate is overripe, offering stewed black cherry, prune, vanilla and chocolate alongside drying wood tannins.",Emè,I Capitani
"This warm, forward wine has sensations of nail polish remover, underbrush, resin, mature black plum and overripe black cherry. The evolved palate is framed by astringent tannins that dry out the mouth.",Nero Né,Il Cancelliere
"Broad and rich, it has already developed to give ripe yellow and green fruits that have fully integrated into the fresher, mineral structure. The wine is ready to drink.",Les Vieux Murs,Jacques Charlet
"Compost, tomato leaf and gritty berry aromas control the nose on this underripe and tannic Rioja. Stalky flavors of tomato and berry fruits are definitively herbal, while the finish is toasty due to oak covering but also rough and stalky.",Gaudium,Marqués de Cáceres
"Red-berry aromas feature a hint of raisin along with oaky notes of shoe polish and lemon. A pinched, grabby, high-acid palate contains rubbery flavors of berry, plum and citrus. On the finish, oak flavors and controlled bitterness settle in.",Cantos de Valpiedra Crianza,Finca Valpiedra
"Looming in huge black fruit, this is a dark, heavy Zin intense in toasty oak and brambly, dusty amounts of ripe blackberry and strawberry jam. Dark chocolate hammers in hard on the finish, with black pepper and raisins.",,Matrix
"Sourced entirely from the Benches vineyard, this screw-capped wine shows a lot of SO2 when first opened, so plan on decanting if at all possible. Once it clears up it's a leesy, fresh white wine with flavors of apples and pears, lightly dusted with cinnamon spice.",,Nine Hats
"Whiffs of smoke, soil and dried herb lend a dark, savory tone to ripe cherry and cassis notes on this rustic Cabernet Sauvignon. The palate is juicy with fleshy red-fruit flavors but wrap up tightly in a softly tannic finish.",,Rooster Hill
"Smoke and crushed granite lend a mineral tone to bright raspberry and cherry notes on this concentrated, juicy Pinot Noir. Sour cherry and red currant penetrate the palate, extending to a slightly astringent finish. Drink now to enjoy its youthful, fruity character.",,Shalestone
"With smidgens of Viognier and Sémillon, this wine offers aromas of sweet jasmine and fig, and is bright with some heft on the palate. With suggestions of tropical fruit and apricot, the acidity is subtle.",,Simi
"This easy drinking rosato has pretty but fleeting aromas of strawberry and baking spices. The fresh, informal palate offers wild cherry, raspberry and a hint of clove. Sip this as an apéritif or pair with summer salads.",Rosato,Spadafora
"Loaded with juicy exotic fruit, mature apricot, yellow peach and tangerine flavors, this semisweet, slightly fizzy and delightful wine is perfect for Sunday brunch or picnics.",,Stemmari
"Here's a bright and easy-drinking expression of Nero d'Avola that offers sour cherry, ripe blackberry and pleasantly tart cranberry. Pair this with hearty first courses like four cheese gnocchi.",,Stemmari
"Once the sulfur aromas from recent bottling blow over, the wine shows ripe fruit with a soft texture. Pear and yellow fruits are going to come through in a few months. Drink from 2015.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"A light mix of apple, jicama and pear fruit, bolstered with plenty of acidity, carries this medium-weight, unoaked Chardonnay. It's perfectly pleasant, but teeters on the edge of generic flavor neutrality.",Unoaked,Airfield Estates
"In this Bordeaux-style blend, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot comprise a quarter of the finished wine. However, it's almost weightless, with dilute flavors of leaf, herb and lemon.",David's Block Red Willow Vineyard,Eight Bells
"Lemon cream, spice and lanolin notes add a mysterious veil to this delicate yet intensely concentrated Riesling. It's sweet on the palate with ripe, honeyed citrus, and a delicious mineral oil sheen that lengthens the palate.",Erdener Treppchen Auslese,Dr. Loosen
"Dark, smoky earth notes and savory dried herbs add fascinating complexity to intensely floral, sweet stonefruit and citrus flavors on this flavorful, yet delicately structured Riesling. Lime and tangerine acidity reverberate on the palate,  leading a long, minerally finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,Dr. Loosen
"This is a gorgeous wine that's fat and smooth in nectarines, tangerine, custard and tropical fruits, with a kiss of sweet, smoky oak. The two varieties were co-fermented in this very happy marriage of a wine.",L'Or Blanc,Clos Solène
"Big, rich wine, packed with spice, ripe peach and mango flavors. Designated a Library Wine by Knoll, it is complex, ageworthy, with a weight of both fruit and pepper to it. Keep this powerful wine for at least another 2_3 years.",Loibner Smaragd Vinothekfüllung,Emmerich Knoll
"This white blend is two thirds Sémillon, one third Sauvignon Blanc. It has continued to improve from vintage to vintage, and this is the best yet. A Washington take on Bordeaux blanc, it's dry and fresh, with golden apple and sweet grain extending across the palate and on through a lingering, lightly peachy finish.",Estate Luminesce Seven Hills Vineyard,L'Ecole No. 41
"With this bottling, Marimar Estate confirms itself as one of the two best, most consistent producers of Albariño in California, along with Longoria. The wine is brilliant, with brisk acidity, dryness, modest alcohol and complex flavors of citrus fruit and zest, minerals, white tobacco and ripe figs.",Don Miguel Vineyard,Marimar Estate
"The winery held this Chardonnay back a year later than their far more expensive Journey bottling. Hard to say why, but the consumer is the beneficiary. That extra bit of aging has mellowed the wine, giving it a creamy, buttery richness. It has good acidity, too, that gives a lift to the ripe tropical fruits.",,Matanzas Creek
"This is one of the best rosés on the market. With a pretty orange and copper color, the wine is dry, crisp and deeply flavored in fruits, yet feels delicate and subtle. The blend is Mourvèdre, Syrah and Grenache.",L'Estate,La Grande Côte
"A unique blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah, Mourvedre, Petit Verdot, Cabernet Franc, and Sangiovese with notes of sassafras, cocoa, and dried herbs. It's focused and concentrated with structured, firm tannins crafted to go the distance. Give it some time in the cellar or a long drawn out meal to see it at its best.",Marie's View Wallula Vineyard,Den Hoed
"This Bordeaux-style blend is 43% Cab Franc, 30% Cabernet Sauvignon, 22% Merlot and 5% Malbec, with no Petit Verdot in 2009. Young and muscular, it's built upon a base of firm black fruits, with plenty of cassis. The wine spent 20 months in 60% new French oak, and brings plenty of roasted coffee bean and dark cacao goodness to the finishing tannins.",424,Stevens
"Petit Verdot is normally a blending grape, but with this bottling, Stryker has produced a very interesting and very good wine. Like a fine Cabernet Sauvignon, it's dark, full bodied and tannic, filled with blackberry purée, dark chocolate and toast flavors. Delicious now, and should age well for many years.",Estate,Stryker Sonoma
"Scratch is a very promising inaugural Pinot Noir from Sabrine Rodems, who's also the winemaker for Wrath and Kori. It shows the vibrant fruit of the Highlands, with potent raspberry, cherry and persimmon flavors, yet is dry and balanced in acids and tannins, with a super-long finish. Possesses that hard-to-define characteristic of class. Great now, and you can hold it several years.",,Scratch
"Lemon rind and fresh, green herbs add a flash of elegance to this dry, intensely textural Riesling. It's lush and rich with stonefruit flavor, but bristles on the palate with lime pith and jasmine tea astringency. Sunny and bright, but brisk with acidity.",Piesporter Goldtröpfchen GG Trocken,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"Lanolin and waxy lemon-peel notes add an enticingly savory element to sweet, intensely concentrated citrus and honey flavors on this crisp Auslese-style Riesling. Shrieking acidity offsets all the juicy sweetness, leaving the finish remarkably dry.",Koberner Weissenberg Auslese,Von Schleinitz
"Unique in style and sourced__hese are the oldest Pinot Gris vines in the country__his young, yeasty, textural wine will surely continue to improve in the bottle. Give it a lot of breathing time, and complex layers of rock and fruit unfold. Jicama, cucumber, daikon radish...You get the idea. It tastes as clean and fresh as a mountain spring.",Original Vines,The Eyrie Vineyards
"Among New World Syrahs, this is an exciting, full-force wine with potent black-fruit aromas mixed with fine wood scents and tobacco. The palate is big but deft, with freshness along with natural power. Flavors of earthy, roasted berry and cassis end in a mellow, toasty, chocolaty finish. This is Apalta Syrah at its best. Drink now_2018.",Pangea Apalta Vineyard,Ventisquero
"A blend of local grapes (Zierfandler and Rotgipfler) this is impressive. Rich, perfumed, its fragrant fruits a medley of mulberry, pear and spiced apple. The acidity cuts right through, giving a wine that is both very ripe, balanced and finely textured. Screwcap.",Schell Mann in Gumpoldskirchen,Loimer
"Josh Jensen brings his restrained hand to this very fine Chardonnay. It's notable for the excellence of all its parts, and the balanced way they co-exist. You'll find tantalizingly rich tropical fruit and peach flavors, with nuances of oak, as well as the minerality that the estate vineyard brings to all its wines, white and red.",,Calera
"Cenit is a blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Carmenère, Malbec and Petit Verdot. The bouquet is meaty and dense, with deep black-fruit aromas along with herb and olive notes. The palate is loud and bangs around, then you get a lot of coconut, vanilla and ripe blackberry flavors. From a warm year, this is superripe and dark, with plenty of wood but also a lot of quality. Drink through 2017.",Cenit,Caliterra
"From a selection of vines, this is a powerful, complex wine that boasts ripe tannins, sweet acidity and a juicy black currant character. It has structure and density that certainly indicate aging, so keep the wine for at least five years.",Cuvée Jean Gabriel,Château Bel-Air
"This is an elaborate wine that's dense, complex and immensely enjoyable. It has a fleshy, meaty quality, like a buttery veal piccata, alongside ripe white and yellow fruits. There's a firm, minerally quality, highlighted by crisp acidity, and the finish is bone dry. Gets more interesting as it warms up in the glass. One of the best examples of Roussanne out there.",Essence de Roussanne,Clos Solène
"The top cuvée from Sainte Roseline, this is a wood-aged wine. That gives a strongly spicy character on top of the sophisticated fruit. The wine is smooth and complex, with red plums and fragrant acidity going well with the elegant aftertaste.",La Chapelle de Sainte Roseline,Château Sainte Roseline
"100% Cabernet Sauvignon from Wallula Vineyard, this brooding wine screams of the Horse Heaven Hills with notes of dusty earth, black currant, and bittersweet chocolate. It's tightly coiled and largely about structure with its firm tannins supporting concentrated cherry flavors. Needs time to come into its own but has the stuffing to lay down for a decade or more.",Andreas Cabernet Sauvignon Wallula Vineyard,Den Hoed
"Spicy, with a big red-fruit expression, this is a yummy Barbera that's full of bright cherry juice. It's textured, layered and complex with a leathery finish. This wine is one to store for future enjoyment or to break open now with pasta now.",Cooper Ranch,Easton
"This wine is silky and well-balanced in acids and tannins, with judicious oak influences framing complex cherry, red currant and spice flavors. Feels very rich, yet the alcohol is a modest 13.7% by volume. Coming after the high-scoring 2010 vintage, Dolina's 2011 is fine to drink now, and should develop bottle notes over the next six years or so.",Rio Vista Vineyard,Dolina
"Sourced from the oldest vines in the Willamette Valley, just two barrels were made of this wine. It's smooth, rich and elegant__ mix of pineapple and citrus__ith light hints of coconut and toast. There's good concentration in the finish, heightened with citrus rind phenolics.",,BlackCap
"An exceptionally good Pinot, from a winery that frequently gets overlooked, perhaps because they're not charging an arm and a leg. The wine is light and silky in the mouth, with alcohol well under 14%, and marked with crisp acidity and fine-grained tannins. The flavors are classic pomegranates, rhubarbs and black cherries. Should develop over the next 4_6 years. What a great value.",Estate,Balletto
"A strong, punchy Pinot Noir, ungainly now for its immaturity, showing tons of jammy raspberries and cherries. The acidity is tart, which is good in a wine this rich, providing balance, and there's also a scour of tannins. All indications suggest cellaring this wine for at least six years.",Stiling Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"A lovely wine, that's gentle, feminine and dry__ust what Cabernet Franc is supposed to be. Kudos to Kenneth Volk for holding it back this long. It's still pretty tannic, but the cherry and currant flavors have a savory hint of green herbs that lend complexity and deliciousness. This may be the perfect steak wine.",,Kenneth Volk
"Lots of sweet, smoky, vanilla-accented oak in this Cab, but the blackberry and cherry fruit is enormous, easily capable of handing the wood influence. It's a flashy Cabernet, ripe and smooth and softly delicious. Seems best now and for the next few years.",WCS,Jada Vineyard & Winery
"Harsh in the mouth, with a jagged feeling. Hot, too, from high alcohol that gives it a chile pepper sting. There's no problem with ripeness, but the wine ultimately is rustic and sweet.",Reserve,B&E;
"A Lake County blend of 45% Syrah, 41% Cabernet Sauvignon and 14% Merlot that starts sour before turning into a mouthful of caramel molasses.",Fairytale,Beaver Creek
"Tastes like orange juice with an extra hit of white sugar, sprinkled with cinnamon, vanilla and an oaky sweetness.",,Shiloh Road
"Thin and dull, with watery cherry flavors and a rustic mouthfeel. Okay in a pinch.",,Shiloh Road
"Woody and baked up front, its cooked, rubbery aromas setting set up a surprisingly sheer and sharp palate that's short on substance and balance. Tastes generic, with linear acidity resulting in little cushion or mouthfeel.",Pizzella Family Vineyard,La Posta
"A rugged, rustic wine, with sugary sweet and sour flavors of cherries. The texture is disagreeable.",,Shiloh Road
There's a grassy note of dried hay or fennel seed at the open of the bouquet that is followed by clove and sweet orange zest. The wine is disjointed and awkward in places.,Ca' Bembo,Principi di Porcìa
"Too sweet, with so much sugar it might as well be for dessert.",,Procrastinate
"An awkward wine, sweetish and sour at the same time, with apricot and citrus fruit flavors that are compromised by a severely unripe streak of ammonia.",Ariadne,Clos du Val
"A reedy, green opening tells you the story up front. The palate is reduced and scratchy, with rubbery, herbal berry flavors that don't register. Finishes bland and weak.",Reserva Made with Organic Grapes,Twigs
"Shrap, prickly and sweaty smelling, much like Sauvignon Blanc or Spanish Verdejo. The palate is reflective of the nose: grapefruit and passion fruit along with sourness. Herbal and sour on the citric finish.",Malbec,Melipal
"Rough and green in the mouth, with some cherry fruit flavors. Pinot Noir in name only.",,Lucky Star
"An opening of burnt rubber, forced hickory and mulchy tomato aromas is none too impressive. Feels tannic and beefy, with leafy, choppy red berry flavors. Burnt and herbal tasting on the finish. Underwhelming as a whole.",,Vintage Sun
"Whatever the grape varieties in this wine are, they taste sugary sweet, making the wine hot in alcohol.",Red Rhythm,B&E;
"Sweet, mushy and yeasty smelling, and never is this wine convincingly balanced. Tastes heavy, like canned fruit. Finishes bitter, with a banana-like flavor.",Alta,Callia
"Thin and simple, with unripe vegetal and twiggy flavors, but at least the label is lots of fun.",,Courtney's Angels
"Way too sweet for comfort, with sugary berry flavors. High alcohol gives it a burn.",,Maddalena
"Lively but messy, with scrambled egg, wayward yeast and lime aromas. Feels foamy, overly active and acidic, with tart citrus and green apple flavors. Lemony, sharp and hard to hold in the mouth.",Brut,Kaiken
"Upon nosing, it's sharp, funky and makes your eyes water. Feels foamy and unruly, with nectarine flavors muddled by a pithy bitterness. Finishes with a decent feel and touches of peach and other stone fruits.",Sparkling Rose Malbec,High Desert
"A stemmy, weedy wine with a chippy mouthfeel, edgy tannins and grating acidity. Balance and harmony are not in the cards here; the wine is a messy mix of buttery oak and burnt, stalky fruit. The finish is muddled and mills around with no place to go.",Grand Reserve,Graffigna
"Hard to like, with vegetal and sugared raspberry flavors.",,Forbidden Zin
"This wine has a plethora of green pepper going on, and not in a particularly pleasant way.",,Hannah Nicole Vineyards
"Barely acceptable, it's so vegetal, with a steamed asparagus edge. Saved by a hint of blackberry.",,Shiloh Road
"Smells gaseous and murky, like a compost pile. Rough and not well balanced in the mouth, with simple berry and burnt brown sugar flavors. Hot, heavy and barely acceptable.",,Alberti 154
An attractive wine with black currant fruit. It walks a tight balance between fresh fruit and dry structure. Just right for the red meats in its name.,The Pairing Collection Chops & Burgers,Barton & Guestier
"This is a bright, fruit-forward red, filled with snappy cherry fruit. It's not overly rich or complex, but instead goes down easily, ending with just a light dusting of tannins.",The Pairing Collection Chicken & Turkey,Barton & Guestier
"A soft, fruity wine with an attractive citrus character. There's also an herbaceous quality and hints of green apple.",The Pairing Collection Salmon & Trout,Barton & Guestier
"This fruity Beaujolais features hints of bananas and red berries. It's soft, rounded and very approachable. Ready to drink.",The Pairing Collection Cheese & Crackers,Barton & Guestier
"A wine that has more richness than typical for Muscadet. A candy-shop sweetness broadens out the wine's citrusy acids, leaving behind a sense of softness on the finish.",The Pairing Collection Lobster & Shrimp,Barton & Guestier
"A stupendous Pinot Noir, showing how beautifully this vineyard performs in the remote Sonoma Coast above Fort Ross. Williams Selyem's last few vintages of Precious Mountain have been extraordinary, but this 2009 tops them all. The wine is as light as a feather in the mouth, modest in alcohol and delicately feminine, like pure satin. However, few Pinot Noirs in the world achieve this level of concentration. Wild raspberries and cherries, cola, sleek minerals, dusty baking spices and smoky oak combine for flavors that are utterly delicious. After all that, it possesses an indefinable attribute of fascination. Will age well for a long time, if you can keep your hands off it. Now_2021.",Precious Mountain Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Rounded wine, softly fruity. Its attractiveness comes from ripe white fruits, soft structure and a generous feel. It's not for aging and can be drunk now.",Buissonnier,Vignerons de Buxy
"The winery turns to this Monterey appellation to up their Chardonnay games. The wine is lush and oaky, with intensely ripe tangerine and apricot flavors.",,Vina Robles
"Simple, bright white and citrus fruits give this wine a great lift from the start. There is a smooth, vanilla texture as well as a touch of minerality giving texture. The wine finishes with bright acidity.",JJ Bourgogne Blanc,Vincent
"This Amarone shows the heat of the vintage. It has black fruit and spice notes but the palate is dominated by searing alcohol sensations. It lacks richness and fresh acidity, and closes on a bitter note.",Zovo,Zanoni
"The typical Côtes de Gascogne blend of Colombard and Sauvignon Blanc, this is crisp, brightly herbaceous, hinting at peach as well as lime juice. It is fresh, clean and deliciously fruity.",,Rieutort
"A ripe and fruity wine with light tannins, red cherry fruit and a fine line of acidity. The wine is softly textured, with just the touch of dryness at the center. Drink now and until 2017.",Domaine des Perdrix,Domaines Devillard
"Sourced principally from the excellent Artz vineyard on Red Mountain, this blend of 78% Sauvignon Blanc and 22% Sémillon is ripe and lush, almost to the point of tasting sweet. No residual sugar was listed, but in terms of flavor, it's hard to ignore. If you like that richness, there is a creamy, milk-and-honey flavor, along with toasty notes.",Mistura Blanco,Michael Florentino
"The scent of ripe black fruit veers into raisin territory, but accents of wax and smoked wood add interest. The wine's core is supple, and it deals fine astringent tannins that hold the wine together. Medium to full bodied, this Merlot finishes with bright acidity and a wild berry flavor. It feels warm on the tongue despite having a modest 13% alcohol.",,Michael Shaps
"Initially this smells burnt and gritty, with leafy aromas and a whiff of tar. The mouthfeel is grabby, while flavors of roasted berry, burnt leaves and leather finish rustic and hard.",,Old Winery
"Small amounts of Riesling, Viognier, and Gewürztraminer (3% each) considerably boost the aromas giving notes of peach, dried pineapple and flowers. Coming from the cool 2011 vintage, the flavors are light in style with a lemony lick on the finish.",,Sagelands
"This blend of 30% Carignan, 40% Grenache and 30% Syrah is easygoing and approachable, with medium-intense aromas and flavors of wild strawberry, black cherry, raspberry and fresh herbs. The palate is ripe and fruity, with dusty tannins and a clean, bright finish.",Les Arcades,Les Vignerons des Côtes d'Agly
"Herbal garrigue notes take centerstage in this blend of 50% Syrah, 25% Marselan and 25% Mourvèdre. The palate is lifted and bright, with flavors of tart blackberry and plum. Not an ager, so enjoy it now.",,Caspen
"A fruity wine, just touched by some wood aging with attractive strawberry fruit flavors and acidity. It's not a wine for aging, its light minerality enhancing the fruitiness.",Le Renard,Domaines Devillard
"This smells yeasty and toasty/smoky, with mild white-fruit scents. For the most part, the palate feels clean and fresh, while papaya, white peach and melon flavors finish with sweetness.",Carta Nevada Brut,Freixenet
"Hailing from the cool 2011 vintage, it's light in style with notes of red currant, herbs and olive with little apparent oak influence. A straight-forward easy quaffer.",,Hyatt
"Dense, stewy, baked aromas of blueberry and Graham cracker lead to a blocky, flabby palate with earthy flavors of stewed berries and prune. In many ways this registers as overripe and raisiny.",Roble,Vallemon de Sardilici
"Light, fresh and fruity, this is an immediately attractive wine. Apple and citrus dominate with a tang of orange zest to add an extra refreshing character. Not for aging, ready to drink now.",Vieilles Vignes,Cave des Grands Crus Blancs
"This is a simple, jammy wine, with fresh black cherry and cola flavors, highlighted with acidity. Made from Merlot, Zinfandel, Cabernet Sauvignon and Syrah, it's an approachable everyday sipper at an accessible price.",Secret Agent,Alias
"A soft, pure fruited wine, this is rounded, full of pear and white peach flavors. The wine is soft, fruity, ready to drink, finishing with light, easy acidity.",,Jean Becker
"A light style of Pinot Gris, softly ripe and rounded. There are touches of spice, peach and peppered apples, an attractive balance of acidity to finish.",,Jean Becker
"Dominated by Sylvaner but with some fragrant Muscat also in the blend, this is a perfumed wine, fresh while soft. It's delicate, balanced, cut neatly with acidity. A great apéritif wine.",,Kuentz-Bas
"For a Chardonnay, the aromas of slate and petrol are a bit odd, but nonetheless idiosyncratic. Touches of white flower and wood smoke add further dimension. The palate feels glossy, and the acidity demonstrates a crescendo-like effect. It finishes bright, ending on a repeated note of smoky wood.",Reserve,Virginia Mountain Vineyards
"Dry apple and spice aromas accent pear and melon scents. This feels mostly right, with lightly herbal, grassy flavors of apple and citrus that finish with medium intensity.",Extra Dry,Segura Viudas
"This is a lush, ripe wine with honey, vanilla extract, orange and lime flavors that have the caramelized sweetness of oak. Crisp acidity fortunately provides balance, on this good, straightforward Chardonnay.",,Santa Barbara Winery
"A little thin and simple, but tasty, with a delicately silky texture and some nice raspberry, cherry cola and spice flavors. Drink now.",,San Simeon
"Made in the velvety-soft, rather fruit-forward wine style that's so popular these days. It's got flavors of cherry jam, brown sugar and sweet buttered toast. The blend is of Rhône varieties plus Zinfandel.",Troublemaker,Austin Hope
"With 7% Muscat Canelli boosting the aromas, it has notes of flowers and apple skins. It drinks dry with an oily, rich feel and a bitter note that distracts on the finish.",,Hyatt
"Coming in at 47g/L residual sugar, this is quite ripe and aromatic with notes of peach and flowers but doesn't have the acid to hold it together.",,Hyatt
"Piercing, jabbing aromas of wood and berry fruits lead to a juicy, acidic, fresh feeling palate with light, oaky, generic flavors of minty berry, herbs and oak. A modest, oaky finish is undistinguished.",,Lagarde
"This blend of Syrah, Mourvèdre and Grenache has some pretty raspberry, pomegranate and Bing cherry fruit flavors. Dried herbs add a nice grace note, but the finish brings a darker, roasted character that turns slightly burnt and bitter.",Dark Star,Kana
"Apple and white fruit aromas set up a balanced, reasonably full palate, with banana, creamy oak, vanilla and apple flavors. It feels solid and round, with a clean finish.",Elsa,Valentin Bianchi
"Light and fragrant, this has pear and lemon flavors. It's ripe, soft and ready to drink.",Dona Helena Branco,Wines & Winemakers
"Nice on the nose, this has a leafy note and a mellow red-berry aroma. Bouncy and rubbery feeling, it has easygoing flavors of raspberry and plum. It's candied and rubbery tasting on the finish, but good overall.",Estate Bottled,Terrenal
"There's a nice Chardonnay down underneath all the oak, but it's hard to find below the buttered toast and caramel richness. It would be nice to taste an unoaked version, to appreciate the acidity and pineapple fruit.",Unfiltered,Newton
"Here's a good, robust red wine. It's made in a country-style, with tobacco, cherry and spice flavors and a jagged mouthfeel. Drink it with tacos and burgers.",4 Grape Blend,Rare
"Simple and agreeable, this can be paired with a burger or beef taco. It's dry and clean, with pleasant cherry and cola flavors.",,Sean Minor
"A fresh prickle gives this crisp, Vinho Verde lookalike its lively lift. Semi-sweet and fragrant, this has acidity and flavors of green apple and citrus.",Filigrana,Quinta do Gradil
"This is a lively, off-dry wine with intense acidity to accompany its crisp apple and citrus flavors. Very fruity, it's ready to drink now. Screwcap.",Trevo,Quinta do Portal
There's too much acidity in this Syrah. It cuts across the blackberry flavors like a hot knife.,,San Simeon
"Soft and fruity with some sweetness, this red-fruit-flavored wine is rounded and warm, crispened by acidity.",Bistro,Barton & Guestier
"A soft, simple wine, this has flavors of cherry candy, spice and oak. It's getting a little tired, so drink up now.",,Benziger
"Crisp and intensely acidic, this has a touch of tannin that adds structure. It has red apple fruit, giving roundness and some sweetness on the finish. Screwcap,",Casal Garcia,Aveleda
"Light and stalky, this has black currant fruit and considerable acidity. With its soft tannins and fruity character, it is ready to drink now.",Casal Garcia Tinto,Aveleda
"Ripe and soft, this is made from Tinta Roriz. It is rich and full bodied, with its rounded strawberry fruit leaving just enough room on the palate for crispness. Screwcap.",Vista,Caves Aliança
"This is a ripe Chardonnay with aromas of pineapple, Golden Delicious apple and honey. It's slightly thick and sticky on the close.",,Caldora Vini
"This is neutral on the nose except for green banana and white grapefruit hints. It feels melony, with flavors that match the mouthfeel in the form of melon and nectarine. This is flabby on the finish, needing more cut and zest.",Reservado,Callia
"Black Box hops onto the popular sweet red wine train with this blend. It is, as advertised, sweet, but not too much, giving a sugary edge to the blackberries and cherries.",Sweet,Black Box
"A lot of oak hits hard, with initial scents of shoe polish and black tar. This is rubbery, big and forward stuff, with loud plum, berry, toast and oak flavors. The finish stays minty, toasty and slightly bitter.",Lote 44,Bodega Cuarto Dominio
"This is a ruggedly simple blush wine, with lots of acidity and some green tea and dried herb flavors. It's saved by a just-in-time flavor of black cherry candy.",Heritage,Curtis
"This feels very ripe, perhaps overripe, with its seemingly sweet flavor of black fruit juice and its soft structure. It's appealing and does have some tannins, but it is not for aging.",Morgado da Canita,Herdade dos Machados
"This is snappy all the way, if a touch raw and citric on the palate. Freshness is a virtue on this affordable Rioja, while red plum, raspberry and milk chocolate notes carry the flavor profile. Drink now.",Antaño,J. Garcia Carrion
"Soft, round and gentle, this has a creamed apple flavor. It has a full, ripe character, with just an edge of green herb and spice.",Boa Memória Branco,Monte Seis Reis
"This is a soft, gentle Pinot with a plum jelly flavor derived from a touch of sweetness in its fruit. Drink now.",Bourricot,L. Tramier & Fils
"Made in an old-fashioned Paso Robles style, this is pretty sweet, soft and simple. There's not much complexity, but it has plenty of ripe blackberry, cherry and spice flavors.",Matriarch,Twisted Sisters
"Light and freshly fruity, this has a red berry flavor, with a soft spice note and round tannins. There's an odd tomato flavor that creeps in at the end. Screwcap.",Reserva,Vidigal
"Vanilla and toasted almond aromas evolve into a scent of tarte tatin. Full bodied, with warm alcohol, this shows medium fruit concentration. The acidity is borderline in its balance, leaning to flabiness. The tactile heat on the medium finish is distracting.",Seigneurie de Peyrat Tradition,Vignobles Garrigae
"Briary berry and milk chocolate aromas lead to a tart, alert palate full of red berry, sour plum, vanilla and spice flavors. Juicy acidity creates a long, racy finish that brings lasting raspberry character.",Crianza,Viña Palaciega
"The waxy apple aroma seems cidery and a touch oxidized given how young the wine is. It feels flat and basic, with apricot and peach flavors, and a waxy bitterness to the palate. The finish tastes stalky, like hay or straw. Only 250 cases made.",,Luna Beberide
"With very high alcohol, this is almost a dessert, Port-style wine. It's soft and hot, with sweet blackberry jam, milk chocolate and licorice flavors.",Estate,Minassian-Young
This crisp Chardonnay has a disjointedness about it. Its aroma and flavor is most akin to Lemonheads candy.,Old Head,Matchbook
"Made from fruit that is drawn from the Bendigo subregion, this is a full-bodied, supple Pinot Noir that boasts a notably silky finish. It's smoky, violet-filled and savory, but those nuances are balanced out by the core of cherry fruit. Drink now_2020.",,Quartz Reef
"Unabashedly New World in style, Peregrine's 2009 combines lusty fruit with ample oak accents to create a moderately complex, silky-textured Pinot  Noir. The cherry fruit is accented by hints of vanilla, graham cracker and a delicate wreath of smoked meat. Drink now_2017.",,Peregrine
"This wine shows pristine aromas of cherry and forest fruit, followed by well-etched tones of spice and tobacco. This has a focused, tight personality, with supple, polished tannins.",Pian di Staffa Riserva,Poggio Stenti
"From the beautiful countryside around Pitigliano and Sovana in Tuscany's southern Maremma, this expression of organically farmed Ciliegiolo shows complex notes of dark cherry, spice, humus and rosemary. Elegance and soft tannins define the finish.",,Sassotondo
"This wine's black cherry and earth notes are enticing, and the spice and mocha finish is intriguing, but right now the tannins are still a bit firm. Give this medium-bodied Pinot Noir another year or two to mellow, then enjoy it over the next 5_6 years.",,Mt. Difficulty
"This is an aromatic, honeysuckle-tinged cool-climate white, with layers of honey and spice. Light in body and texture, this complex, Alsace-style effort is the perfect accompaniment to Thai, Indian, Korean barbecue or spicy Chinese food.",Dry Estate Bottled,Navarro
"A blend of equal parts Merlot, Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Sangiovese, Piastraia opens with tangy green hints of rosemary and curry leaf, followed by notes of ripe strawberry, cherry liqueur and blackberry jam. Touches of leather and tobacco surface on the palate, and the tannins are firm and richly textured.",Piastraia,Michele Satta
"Made from 100% Merlot, this shows the enormous fruit of Mount Veeder. The cherry and blackberry flavors are concentrated and pure, and there are liqueur-like notes of cassis and anise, plus a sweet toast accent from the oak. It's dry and quite tannic, but not to the extreme that it can't be consumed now.",Fleur de Veeder,Yates Family Vineyard
"New Zealand's best known winery does a consistently good job with the Burgundian varieties, not just Sauvignon Blanc. The chunky, medium-bodied 2010 Pinot Noir displays ample intensity, length and complexity. Its savory style shows dark cherry fruit, with hints of mocha and grilled meat. Drink now_2020.",,Cloudy Bay
"This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Sangiovese shows bright aromas of cassis and blackberry. Light touches of spice and leather lend the finish heft and determination.",Podere Grattamacco,Collemassari
"Part of a Limited Release series, this wine includes 17% Syrah, but the varietal character of the Mourvèdre shines through. Light touches of chocolate, clean earth and mineral underscore flavors of plum and cherry. There is also a streak of vanilla, perhaps from aging in French and American oak.",,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This has apricot and pear flavors, plus a nutmeg hint and intense, refreshing acidity.",Château de Rully Cuvée R. de Ternay,Antonin Rodet
"Despite the rich, buttery, toasty oak notes, this wine stands up to the barrel influence with its strong tropical fruit and pear flavors, as well as its brisk acidity and stony minerality. It's ready to drink now with rich fare like lobsters or scallops.",Ashley's,Fess Parker
"This wine starts off with an assertive aroma of brambly berry, followed shortly after by touches of warm compote and sweet spice. The tannins are structured but fine, lending support to the otherwise round palate brimming with fleshy dark-cherry and black-plum flavors. 100 cases imported; enjoy now_2017.",Reserve,Flam
"Crushed chalk and wax notes add a striking minerality to this delicately framed, semisweet Riesling. A juicy wine, it offers an abundance of ripe stone-fruit and citrus flavors, with an earthen, waxy slick that lingers on the finish.",Riesling 12 Lake Dana Vineyard,Fox Run
"This is a rich, fruity wine that has a definite minerally character. The chalky texture is laced with lemon and apricot flavors, leading to a crisp, tight finish.",Climat en Combe,Bret Brothers
"This could be labeled as Cabernet Franc, since it comprises 80% of the blend. The youthful lightness of the estate-grown grapes seems to lift the naturally tannic nature of the variety. It's clean and balanced, and it comes with an herbal underpinning. This is best for near-term drinking.",Bel Canto Cara Mia Vineyard,Cadence
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Caberent Franc, this shows pungent green tones of rosemary, bay leaf and dried herb, followed by flavors of cherry, blackberry and nutmeg. The tannins are firm and polished, and the finish is bright and fresh.",Miterre,Campo al Noce
"Rich, full bodied and smooth, this wine is driven by its black fruits and dark tannins. Acidity lines the fruitiness, which gives a juicy edge to the solid texture. It shows potential, so keep it for at least four years.",Valdazar,Campolargo
"Torricella is an 80-20 blend of Chardonnay and Sauvignon Blanc that sees some oak aging for extra intensity and smoothness. Peach, citrus and exotic fruit drive the soft, creamy finish.",Torricella,Barone Ricasoli
"Rich and broad, this is packed with dense fruit and tannins. It is ripe and full bodied, two qualities that are derived from the warm vineyard. The finish shows juicy acidity.",Les Peuillets Premier Cru,Albert Bichot
"The herbal aromas are forward on the nose of this Cabernet-based wine, which includes 7% Petit Verdot, 4% Mourvèdre and 3% Merlot. Gamy, rich red plum and cherry notes unfold shortly after, while the hefty palate offers earthy flavors of cassis and tobacco leaf. Sweet smoke and toast accents linger on the long finish. The wine is young and powerful now; try after 2015.",The Great,Alexander
"Upon opening, this intense, fragrant wine seems European in style, with Italian-like nuances of leather, fungus and tobacco. The enticing whiffs give way to a full-flavored palate that offers notes of mixed red fruits, while the finish loses some focus.",Estate Grown,Ambassador Vineyard
"This Brunello starts on the timid side and slowly reveals aromas of cherry, cassis, sweet spice, almond paste, plus earthy tones of leather and button mushroom. The palate feels fresh and tight, and the wine ends on spicy notes of clove and cinnamon.",,L'Oca Ciuca
"This Chardonnay is dry, with vibrant acidity and tangy, mineral-infused flavors of stone and earth. It shows subtle notes of Meyer lemons, limes and tangerines. Don't drink this too cold.",Gavin Vineyard,Mahoney
"A distant whiff of rubber or asphalt appears at first, followed by notes of black fruit, cherry, rum cake and licorice. This 70-30 blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc has a lean but powerful mouthfeel.",Le Grascete,Le Grascete
"A dry, light-bodied, easy-drinking Riesling, this has zesty lemon and grapefruit flavors, plus undertones of flower and spiced tangerine. The palate shows depth, and the finish is intense.",,Navarro
"Well priced for the quality, Villa Maria's entry-level Pinot Noir delivers moderately assertive notes of dried leaves, black cherries, cola and oaky spices. It's concentrated and gently mouth-filling, with a silky finish. Drink it now and over the next two years.",Private Bin,Villa Maria
"A great choice for dinners around the barbecue pit, this Morellino di Scansano delivers luscious berry and spice tones, plus the bright acidity needed to pair with hearty meat dishes. Additional flavors of black cherry and chocolate are layered over the lean, crisp mouthfeel.",Tempo Riserva,Terre di Talamo
"Fans of powerful, fruit-driven Zinfandel will exult in this monster of a wine. It is an explosion of blueberry, raspberry, plum, blackberry, chocolate-covered raisin and sandalwood flavors. This is tannic, and the high alcohol gives it a glycerine-driven sweetness.",Sven & Ole's Reserve,Rock Wall
This enjoyable blend of wood-aged Chardonnay and Fernão Pires is rich; the two grapes together lend a smooth and creamy wine.,Hobby,Exquisite Wines
"Casale Vecchio is a dark and spicy expression of Montepulciano that opens with sweet aromas of jammy fruit and blackberry preserve. Layers of moist pipe tobacco, new leather and crushed granite or mineral form a nicely integrated finish.",Casale Vecchio,Farnese
"This beautiful rosé from central Italy opens with a raspberry-pink color and bright aromas of forest berry, white cherry and crème de cassis. It's smooth and silky in the mouth with a bright, crisp finish.",,Feudo Antico
"A blend of typical Alentejo grapes, this is a firm effort, with the fruit laced inbetween the complex tannic structure. The acidity gives the wine a final lift.",4 Quatro Castas,Herdade do Esporão
"This opens pleasantly, with black cherry, cola and toast components all nicely balanced. It continues through a medium body with medium length; then a Bourbon barrel note takes over the finish.",,Cornerstone
"The core fruit flavor is pretty strawberry, with a root beer aspect often found in Oregon Pinots. There is a bit of an empty spot in the center, then a finish with light tannins and a dash of pepper.",Estate Vineyard,Amity
"Dark, luscious and inky in appearance, Antrum shows thick and juicy aromas of jammy fruit, blackberry pie and rum cake. There are hints of dark spice and leather, with a touch of sour fruit and grittiness on the close.",Antrum,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"This bottling has been consistent over the years, with the 2009 showing cherry, cola, bacon and sandalwood flavors, brightened with crisp acidity. Give it a few hours in the decanter before serving.",Klindt Vineyard Estate Grown,Claudia Springs
"Bright and jammy red cherry, strawberry and raspberry aromas flood the nose of this Syrah-dominated blend, and carry onto the palate. Medium tannins add a bit of structure, while the finish is clean, with a mouthwatering sensation.",Les Bambins,Clos des Augustins
"Strong citrus fruit and citrus-rind aromas mix lemon, lime and grapefruit in a sharply-defined, relatively moderate-in-alcohol Viognier. It's acidic and firm, nicely focused and precise. Overall, it is a very good, food-friendly wine.",,Del Rio
"Crisp and peppery smelling, with nicely chiseled raspberry and red-plum aromas. Feels tight and tangy, a direct reflection of the wine's coastal origins, with zesty flavors of citrus, plum, cherry and tomato. Finishes short and exact, with a dusting of oak-based cocoa.",Visión,Cono Sur
"From the young vines of aristocratic Tiregand estate, this is still a densely tannic wine. It has smoky black fruits and intense acidity, a directly linear structure that needs to soften, although it will always be tannic.",Clos Montalbanie,Château de Tiregand
"Pungent and herbal aromas make for a vivid splash upon entry. The wine quickly evolves into pretty cherry fruit, wrapped in cinnamon, sassafras and cocoa, then runs into gently fading barrel spices.",Estate Reserve,Blakeslee
"Baked apple, roasted corn, hay stack and buttery aromas define the nose on this full-bodied, fully oaked Chard from western Casablanca. Feels good, with weight as well as vitality. Flavors run toward baked apple, barrel spice and minerality. Finishes oaky, peppery and resiny.",Gran Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Plenty of ripe, forward fruit here: It brims with cherries, blackberries and plums. Shows its Alexander Valley origin in the softness and herbaceousness that accompany the fruit. Drink up.",,Louis M. Martini
"Huge, ripe flavors of blackberry and plum jam, mocha, black currants, anise and cedar mark this wine, grown in the rugged hills of southern Monterey County. It's quite tannic and dry, but doesn't seem to be an ager, so drink up.",,Indigené
"A big, savory Syrah from Mendocino's well-known Eaglepoint Ranch that's been aged in neutral oak but retains layers of tar and caramel on the finish. Let this wine open before pairing it with rich, meaty fare.",Eaglepoint Ranch,Stark
"This blend of 70% Montepulciano and 30% Merlot, which is aged for two years in oak, offers easy fruit nuances of blackberry and black cherry, followed by accents of rum cake and sweet spice. The wine ends with a lively touch of bitter almond.",Kudos,Talamonti
"Appropriately named __assion,_ this hearty red wine expresses itself with opulence and generosity. Bold fruit layers of blackberry and cherry liqueur are framed by spice and chewy pipe tobacco. There's a ripe, syrupy feel in the mouth, with loads of jammy fruit on the close.",Passione,Vigne & Vini
"A blend of fruit from three different sites, united by their green farming practices, this is clean, fruity and forward. A mouth-pleasing Pinot with generously juicy and pretty cherry flavors.",Verde Vineyards,Panther Creek
"Ripe stone fruit, clove-spiced whole orange and delicate toast aromas dance in the bouquet and follow through to the full and round palate. Slight char and wood-spice accents linger on the medium-length finish. Drink now.",Toques et Clochers Haute Vallée,Sieur d'Arques
"Integrated on the nose, with dark berry and crushed mineral notes and scents of herb, vanilla and earth. Feels round and full, with good balance and likable flavors of boysenberry, leather and spice. Deep, chewy and friendly overall, with coffee, pepper and spice on the finish.",Limited Edition,Rios de Chile
"Nice on the nose, with tropical aromas, ocean-based saline and mild green-fruit notes. Feels crisp and cleansing, with tangy flavors of lemon, green apple and underripe pineapple. Lime and green flavors of tarragon and grass drive the finish.",Limited Selection,Montes
"Done half in stainless and half in barrel, this soft and supple wine boasts grapefruity acids and lightly buttery pear-flavored fruit. Medium long, fresh and complex, with a parting kiss of cinnamon spice.",,Quails' Gate
"From the Canadian Okanagan, this stylish, well-balanced wine offers a focused mix of flavors__ola, cherry, tobacco and wet stone in particular. It's a fresh and lively palate, with the sort of crisp elegance found in some European Pinots.",,Quails' Gate
"On the light side for a reserve, this nicely balanced, elegant wine is from the southwest block of the estate vineyard. Red berries and pomegranate fruit, moderate acidity, smooth tannins and a full middle are the hallmarks. With a little decanting, it's ready to go.",Reserve,Abacela
"York Mountain is a little-known appellation in the western part of Paso Robles. This blend of two varieties is dry, tannic and hot, with complex blackberry, tobacco, plum and pepper flavors that are so ripe, they veer into raisins. Drink up.",Chelle Mountain Vineyard Reserve,Adelaida
"Light and elegant, with a scent of smoke winding through the pretty cherry fruit, this pleasant wine will appeal most to those who prefer their Pinots to show delicacy and nuance.",Amalie's Cuvée,Amalie Robert
"Rich, soft and extracted in blackberry jam and chocolate, this Cabernet trades subtlety for sheer deliciousness. And it certainly is easy to drink, with waves of ripe fruit, oak and spice.",,Brookdale Vineyards
"A youthful, pale straw color is the backdrop of haunting aromas of Marcona almond, dried lemon peel and hay. Zesty citrus notes on the palate are accompanied by hazelnut, baguette crust and vanilla. The vanilla continues on with the medium finish__ clear indicator of some oak influence. Round and succulent, yet balanced by fairly refreshing acidity.",Exquises Esquisses,Château Maylandie
"This includes grapes from the winery's Jerusalem Hill vineyard in the Eola-Amity Hills AVA, in addition to the Dundee Hills sites, hence the more general Willamette Valley designation. It was aged in 65% new French oak for 16 months. It's open and generous, offering bright berry, cherry and red currant fruit matched to defining acids, all set in a fine-tuned frame of new oak. Re-tasted 24 hours after being opened, it remained fresh, dense and satisfying.",Evenstad Reserve,Domaine Serene
"You'll find it difficult to keep your hands off this gem, a block selection from the estate vineyard. The name, notes the winery, comes from an ancient Greek dance. Dark, smoky and toasty, this gripping wine is tight-knit and packed with raspberry and black cherry fruit, set against sweet baking spices. The balance is perfect, and this will drink well now through 2030.",Trata,DanCin
"Honeycomb and crushed rocks, preserved peach and citrus rind mix lavishly in this creamy, feather-light TBA. A bracing strike of acidity jolts through the midpalate, but finds ease in layers of mouth coating honey and wax that meander through an endlessly lingering finish. Stunning now, but will evolve well for decades to come.",Monzinger Frühlingsplätzchen Trockenbeerenauslese,Weingut Weber
"A rich, ripe expression of one of Italy's iconic wines, this displays the heat of the 2011 vintage. It opens with aromas of red currants, tobacco, oak and exotic spice while the full-bodied palate delivers dried black cherries, blueberry extract, licorice and black pepper. Densely concentrated and tightly packed with assertive but fine-grained tannins, you'll need to give this time to unwind. Drink 2017_2026.",,Masseto
"A stunning blend of half Chardonnay and half Pinot Noir, made in a méthode traditionelle, this is a dry, minerally and incredibly smooth sparkling wine. Elegant and refined, it offers a tightly drawn curtain of mousse that lingers on the palate. The time in bottle has added complexity and sophistication, making the wine enjoyable now or for several more years.",DVX,Mumm Napa
"Deep and rich aromas of black raspberry, star anise, iodine and iron entertain the nose on this bottling by winemaker Clarissa Nagy. It's lush on the palate, with deep red fruits, but then becomes brightened by acidity and focused on an earthy, herbal line down the middle. With wild mint and anise on the finish it's quite complex.",Reserve,Riverbench
"Gorgeous aromas of toasted bread and caramel give way to a rich, buttery texture and flavors that layer ripe apple, honey, toasted almond and walnut notes on a smooth, softly bubbling background. It's showing the benefits of extra aging through the slightly nutty character, fine bubbles and seemingly sweet feel even though it's elegant and dry.",Brut Late Disgorged Blanc de Noir,Schramsberg
"This shows what extended aging can do for a vintage sparkling wine, as it gives off delicate, ripe, mellow aromas like toasted baguette, honey, toasted almonds, white tea and apple cider. The mouthfeel is elegant and smooth, while the bubbles are soft and slow. Enjoy this before or after dinner now; it's at its aging peak.",Late Disgorged Brut Blanc de Blancs,Schramsberg
"This compelling and delicious bottling has a grand bearing, sophisticated flavors and elegant texture, like something the staff at Downton Abbey would serve. The aromas are lightly smoky and spicy, like white pepper and walnuts. Flavors are subtle, dry but somehow rich, as hints of white peach, almond and dried cherry develop.",Reserve,Schramsberg
"Meticulously farmed by Ulises Valdez, Silver Eagle is intensely spicy and pamperingly lush, offering a distinct, perfumed character on the nose. Structured and almost gamy and sanguine, it's a complex expression of the grape that will benefit from further time in the bottle, through 2020, or from an hour or so in the decanter.",Silver Eagle Vineyard,Sojourn
"One of Italy's most acclaimed Merlots, this concentrated wine opens with scents of black currants, cedar, sage and espresso. The firmly structured but polished palate delivers dried black cherry, black pepper, coffee and licorice alongside a backbone of velvety tannins. Drink 2017_2022.",Redigaffi,Tua Rita
"Always a powerful wine, this vintage exudes richness and density. There is a strongly tarry character as well as firm black plum fruits and a concentrated texture. This immense wine will need serious aging. Drink from 2010 and until 2030.",Château Montus,Alain Brumont
"Aromas of ripe bluish-black fruit, crushed mint, iris and dark cooking spices lead the nose on this savory blend of 60% Sangiovese, 20% Syrah and 20% Cabernet Sauvignon. The firm palate doles out fleshy black cherries, ripe blackberries, cinnamon, vanilla, mocha and tobacco. Velvety tannins support the delicious, juicy fruit flavors. Drink through 2019.",Borgonero,Borgo Scopeto
"The 2010s are magical right now, and Norm Yost's latest reveals why. Intoxicating and sultry aromas of plums, figs and other savory fruits get a mace-powered, brown spice kick. A cherry reduction sauce flavor shows once sipped, laced with mocha, strawberries and a sagebrush element that pulls through the experience, all wrapped around still stunningly bright acidity.",Rio Vista Vineyard Dijon,Flying Goat Cellars
"Loamy berry, blackberry pie and pastry aromas are like the red carpet at a big event. This is the epitome of a lush, layered, structured Tempranillo. Borderline syrupy flavors of blackberry, coffee and mocha end with chocolate and vanilla richness as well as lusty boldness. Hold until 2018, then drink through 2025.",Paraje de Cueva Baja,Terreus
"This is a wondrously complex wine from Deborah Hall, showing roasted pork and other animal flesh on the nose along with graphite, clove extract and red rose petals__ach piece there, but hard to pull apart because it is so well integrated. The flavors meld grilled game with cooked cherries and black loam.",Trois,Gypsy Canyon
"This very complete wine displays a fine balance between its tannins, black fruits and acidity. The structure is firm, still dry while giving space for the developing fruitiness. It is almost ready to drink, although it will be better from 2016.",,L'Enclos des Braves
"If this delicious bottling is any indication, this region is prime for Malbec. Aromas of grape soda, black slate, turned loam, blueberry and purple flowers make for a nicely even nose, and the palate is rich and full with balanced tannins. The juicy flavors include black cherries, plums, cassis and blueberry extract, to which crushed, dried herbs give necessary nuance.",Thérèse Vineyards Dos Niñas Vineyard,Martin Ranch
"Concentrated and solid, this is packed with dense, dusty tannins as well as ripe black fruits. It is complex, balanced between tannins and fruit sliced by a shot of acidity. This is a wine for aging, don't drink before 2017.",Renaissance,Domaine Rotier
"This sweet, honeyed wine has a rich, unctuous character. It is perfumed, full of sweet orange marmalade and spice. The acidity keeps it together and gives final freshness. This is a wine to drink by itself rather than with food.",Renaissance Vendanges Tardives,Domaine Rotier
"This Dijon-clone wine is well defined and complex. The mixed fruit flavors bring lime and lemon, pineapple and pear together. It's supple and long, with balanced supporting acids and a pleasing goodnight kiss of toasted marshmallows.",Etoile Vineyard,Domaine Serene
"White truffle, dark chocolate, ripe plum and blue flowers are some of the aromas you'll find in this impressive Merlot. The powerful, extracted palate doles out fleshy blackberry, black cherry, clove, tobacco, licorice and cured meat. Velvety tannins wrap around the bold flavors, providing support and a smooth texture. You'll also detect the warmth of evident alcohol, which gives it a one-dimensional finish.",Palazzi,Tenuta di Trinoro
"Aromas of ripe blue- and black-skinned fruit, dried herb and cedar lead the nose on this savory blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Malbec and Merlot. The firmly structured palate doles out spiced blueberries, blackberries, mint and black pepper alongside chewy tannins. A licorice note signals the close. Drink through 2020.",Indaco,Tenuta Sette Cieli
"Aromas of black plum, pipe tobacco, cooking spice and crushed herb lead the nose of this structured blend of 50% Merlot, 40% Cabernet Sauvignon and 10% Petit Verdot. The smooth palate delivers dried black currants, blackberry extract, licorice and cloves wrapped up in velvety tannins.",Oreno,Tenuta Sette Ponti
"Sleek, elegant and refined, this is a subtle, evocative and seamless wine. Layers of plum and black cherry, cola and earth, sea salt and caramel entwine gracefully. The 18 months in oak brings in sweet baking spices. Delicious already, it should drink very well at least through 2025.",Barrel Select,Vidon Vineyard
"A blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon and 30% Sangiovese, this elegantly structured wine opens with aromas of ripe black fruit, cedar, leather and a whiff of exotic spice. The firm palate delivers ripe black cherry, plum, coffee, grilled herb and ground clove alongside firm but polished tannins.",Camartina,Querciabella
"While slightly reserved in aroma, this serious, special-occasion wine comes on steady and strong in flavor. Blueberry and black cherry notes pick up more raspberry and red cherry with each sip. In addition to fruit complexity, it has a full body, sleek texture and lingering finish. Best now through 2020.",Vineyard 1869 Old Vine,Scott Harvey
"A striking and flavorful wine, this bottling shows a little more spicy oak than most of the Renwoods, giving a slightly sweet cinnamon accent to the vivid blackberry and strawberry syrup flavors. The fruit character is powerful and delicious, seemingly seeping out of the wine in all directions. It's dry, full bodied, firm textured and will drink nicely now through 2020.",Musician's Jack Rabbit Flat Vineyard,Renwood
"This is a substantial, complete and well-balanced wine with a deep red color and brickish rim. Intensely fruity and spicy aromas incorporate elegant oak nuances, black cherries, nutmeg and cinnamon, leading to generous, ripe flavors and a smooth, velvety texture. It's quite complex and delicious.",Wightman House Vineyard,MacPhail
"Rooty blackberry, cassis, vanilla and cola aromas are vintage Numanthia. So is a saturated, tannic palate that's deep and dense. Baked blackberry is the lead flavor, and that's matched by espresso and chocolate. Heat and ruggedness need to be resolved on a rich, powerful, chocolaty tasting finish. Drink through 2020.",Numanthia,Numanthia
"Gorgeously aromatic with scents of honeysuckle, yellow stone fruit and waxy lanolin, this balances serious fruit flavor with a layer of stony minerality and a dainty, almost lacy, layer of sugar that lingers on the palate.",,Swedish Hill
"Aromas of smoke and sweet apple introduce an intensely flavored palate that's full of ripe yellow peach, waxy flower and fresh fennel. Off-dry and bold in structure, it finishes with a hint of lanolin and a lingering minerality.",RTR Vineyard Semi-Dry,Red Tail Ridge
"A witch's brew of five grapes, the Abondante is a fine wine to pair with pizza, offering interesting flavors of berry and stone fruit. What it lacks in focus, it makes up for with plenty of fruit and some unusual complexity.",Abondante,Sineann
"This brand has done well in the past few years with its value-priced Cabernet. This one performs in upstanding fashion, with clean plum, berry and cassis aromas, turning to blackberry and toast flavors on the firm palate. Dark, spicy and a touch warm on the finish.",Sustainably Farmed,Tilia
"Decidely savory on the nose, aromas of bacon, brûléed sugar, grilled herb and toast highlight the black fruit core. The palate is meaty and currently locked tight with superfirm, grippy tannins. Bone dry on the finish, this should be enjoyed with a chunk of rare beef to help tame the tannic blow.",Vintner's Reserve,Veritas
"Named for winemaker Virginie Bourgue, this entirely stainless-fermented Sauvignon Blanc has a grassy, spicy edge reminiscent of Loire Valley whites. It's also tongue-twistingly tart, a reflection of the vintage, like a lemon explosion in the mouth. In other words, this is a perfect seafood wine.",Blanc de Virginie,Lullaby
"A super Tuscan blend of Sangiovese, Merlot, Syrah and Alicante, this shows some of the cheerful, funky and lively characteristics that identify this wine with Maremma, Tuscany. This velvety effort offers notes of chocolate, blackberry, chewy cherry and tobacco.",Mirus,Mocali
"This is dense yet fresh, with dark berry and mild earth aromas. It feels lively, forceful and solidly built, with blackberry, creamy chocolate, toast and spice flavors that are all in equal, balanced portions. Long and warm on the finish.",Aldeya,Pago Aylés
"Smooth and complex, this is dry and softly tannic, with pleasant blackberry, black currant, spice and cedar flavors. Ready to drink now.",,Louis M. Martini
"Decadent and intense, this smells like breakfast toast that has been slathered with red currant jam, mango butter and apricot preserves, topped with a drizzle of honey. The mouthfeel is rich, round and unctuous, with a zing of acidity that keeps it from seeming cloying. Notes of brûléed sugar and spice decorate the finish.",El Late Harvest,Lovingston
"This shows a bold and modern personality, with spicy oak tones behind bright notes of cherry, chocolate and chewy raspberry. It shows savory endnotes of pipe tobacco, leather and prune.",,Poggio Nardone
"Whispers of charred wood, ripe bramble and earth add an elegant rusticity to this Pinot Noir's subtle black-cherry flavor. This is delicately structured, with bright, brisk acidity and a hint of dried mushroom that linger on the palate.",,Ravines
"Vibrant with acidity and a core of crisp red-plum and cherry flavors, this bright, brambly Blaufränkisch is testament to the potential of red wine in the Finger Lakes. The palate is gorgeously fruity, but focused with a vein of crushed granite that lingers on the finish.",Obscure Red Varietal Series Martini Family Vineyards,Red Tail Ridge
"A delicious aroma of creamed apple wafts from this wine, which has notes of tropical fruit, mango and ripe pear. It is opulent and rounded, with just the right amount of balancing acidity. Screwcap.",Signature,René Muré
"Light honey, lemon and grapefruit flavors blend harmoniously. The wine has good length and texture in the mouth, with a tart, pleasantly tangy finish.",Golden Pearl,Palouse
"Dark pink in color, this off-dry wine is as soft as the velvet in its name. Strawberry dominates the flavor, along with attractive acidity and a smooth, round texture. A wine for apéritifs.",Rosé Velours Sec,Pannier
"A blend of Trebbiano and Pecorino, Tenutarossa offers impressive thickness and staying power, backed by bright aromas of apricot and honey. Pair this cheese and ham quiche or fried artichokes.",Tenutarossa,Pasetti
"It's striking that this bottling packs a whopping 16.4% alcohol and is capable of managing it as well as it does. The palate is rich and hefty, with plenty of burly tannins that are deeply set into the wine's flesh. It tastes chocolaty and toasty, with an enticing maduro note that sings across the midpalate and onto the finish.",Reserve,Breaux
Honey and orange rind notes meld with a hint of waxy lanolin on this richly textured white wine. Savory hints of smoke and black tea are balanced with a touch of bright citrus rind and a delicate salinity that lingers on the finish.,Petite Burja,Burja
"This Bordeaux-style blend includes all five of the region's classic grapes, and the resulting wine has a bit more body and complexity than the single-variety offerings from the winery. Leafy and tart, it shows cranberry and rhubarb flavors, typical of this cool climate site.",Cuvée du Soleil Red,Cave B
"The wine is made in a celebratory style: it's fruity and dry, packed with apple and citrus flavors. It has a creamy mousse, and its finish is tangy and zesty.",Réserve Brut,Charles Ellner
"A new addition to the popular Indian Wells line, this consists of 60% Merlot, 28% Syrah and splashes of five other grapes. The Merlot, not surprisingly, dominates. Pretty and round, it has a soft, almost pillowy texture, with an easy, accessible mouthfeel.",Indian Wells,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This is aged carefully in large oak casks to give the wine softness, without taking away from its red fruit intensity. Wild blueberry, raspberry, licorice and dried ginger notes appear on the bouquet.",,Cantina Produttori San Michele Appiano
"Here's a simple and genuine expression of Cesanese d'Affile that offers floral aromas of red rose and violet, with background notes of dried herb and anise seed. Pair this with grilled sausage stuffed with fennel seed.",Campo Novo,Casale della Ioria
"A fine bottle at a great price, this fresh and clean-tasting Sauvignon Blanc offers a bracing mix of tree fruit, with just a touch of sweet herb. It's clearly varietal: no frills, just straightforward and very nicely made.",Two Vines,Columbia Crest
"This takes a while to open up and fully convey its rich, sweet fruit. Then the honey and rosewater flavors emerge, along with a note of peppered spice. It is rich and relatively dry__ery much a food wine.",Im Berg,Domaine Ehrhart
"Exotic aromas of wild berries, cumin and other Middle Eastern spices are interesting and inviting. This feels thick and chewy, bordering on syrupy, with stewed plum and brown sugar flavors. It hits with some burn and heat on the bullish finish.",Grande Reserve,Domaine Jean Bousquet
"This is a new brand from veteran Don Sebastiani & Sons, and it's a a bottle of easy-drinking deliciousness. Mellow and smooth, it shows cherry pie, sandalwood and white pepper flavors.",Sonoma Signature,Don & Sons
"This is voluptuous and floral on the nose and palate, with loads of sweet, ripe peach and melon flavors. Bright lemon-lime acidity and a shimmer of salinity help to keep this full-bodied wine from becoming overbearing.",Gran,Coronica
"This Cabernet-dominant Bordeaux-style blend is concisely constructed, offering an array of dark fruits. Threads of smoke, licorice and roasted espresso bean contribute to the firm, dark finish.",Cuvée Red,Corvus
"This opens with aromas of scorched earth, leafy underbrush, mature blackberry and a whiff of espresso. The straightforward palate offers ripe black cherry, toast, anise and a hint of mint alongside fine-grained tannins.",Sabri,Beni di Batasiolo
"This stainless bottling shows fresh-squeezed lemons, yellow melon and canned pear on the fresh, clean and not overly tropical nose. The palate is smooth and plush down the middle, but sharply tight on the edges, with flavors of pear, lime and apple that prove a bit sour and tart toward the finish.",Precis Unoaked,Bernardus
"There's a slightly tart funkiness of tar, dried violets, dried strawberries, marjoram and sour plums on the nose of this wine. The palate is also tart with elderberry, opening toward dark herbs in the midpalate, hanging on a very dense structure.",,Brecon Estate
"Mature plum, crushed violet and dark cooking spice aromas come together in the glass. The firm palate delivers dried cherry, blackberry extract and licorice alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. Drink soon to capture the remaining fruit.",Otto,Cascina Liuzzi
"Fresh and fruity, this easy-drinking red delivers aromas and flavors of black cherry, blackberry, black pepper and a hint of anise. Thanks to bright acidity, it can be paired with almost any dish.",,Castello del Poggio
"This blend of Sauvignon Blanc, Sémillon and Muscadelle is fruity and lightly perfumed. It has a herbal character as well, along with bright acidity and a chalk and mineral texture. It is ready to drink, although it will be better from late 2016.",Bélingard Blanc,Château Bélingard
"A hint of sweat in the nose blows away to reveal a solid core of cherry fruit, along with broad flavors of stem, coffee and earth. This wine is substantial, though that slightly funky character lingers into the finish.",,Cummins Road
"Smoke and exotic spice notes intensify from nose to palate of this delicately framed medium-sweet wine. It's a savory, rather spicy wine, but a core of honey-laced peaches and pears shines brightly on the palate. Dazzling lemon-lime acidity extends a moderately long finish.",Bernkasteler Badstube Spätlese,Dr. Pauly Bergweiler
"This offers aromas and flavors of toasted oak, espresso, coconut, vanilla and a confectionary note but it lacks fruit richness. Bracing tannins provide the framework.",Colarej,Gemma
"This estate-grown effort is almost jet black, and scented with tar, smoke and black fruits. It's dense beyond dense, and completely shut down. Even after aeration, decanting, and hours of breathing time, it remained stubbornly closed. Brief hints of tobacco and earth, cassis and coffee suggest that with more bottle age, this one could really blossom.",,Ledger David
"Whiffs of pollen and saffron lend shades of nuance to this otherwise perky sun-kissed Kabinett. Sweet yellow peach and apricot flavors are honeyed and plush, but balance out nicely through a crisp, lime-tinged finish. Drink now.",Piesporter Michelsberg Kabinett,Leonard Kreusch
"Mature plum, underbrush, spice and mocha aromas lead the nose while the warm, forward palate offers dried black cherry, blackberry extract, licorice and a hint of nut. Drink soon to capture the remaining freshness and before the fruit dries up entirely.",,Luigi Voghera
"A fresh and fruity wine that has a creamy texture and attractive acidity. It is full of lemon and crisp apple flavors with an intense juicy underlay that needs to calm down, so drink this crisp wine from mid-2016.",Flor de Maio Branco,Magnum Vinhos
"It might be a good idea to decant this to let the burnt-match aromas blow off. They tend to mask the ripe, round, fruit-driven style of the wine. Apart from that initial funk, it's a pleasant, fruity, quaffable white wine.",,Mahonia
"Inky aromas of blueberry and boysenberry are a bit collapsed and reduced. Tannic and grabby in the mouth, this tastes of leathery plum and salt. And that saltiness carries onto the finish, which tastes briny and shows tannic grip.",Gran Mascota,Mascota
Hints of bramble and earth accent pressed apple and pear flavors in this dry crisply composed Riesling. It's zesty and tight but finishes with revitalizing refreshment.,Red Rock Dry Gutsabfüllung,Mathern
"Aromas of dried berry, plum, rose and underbrush lead the nose. The easygoing palate offers raisin, blackberry jam, walnut and black pepper. Enjoy through 2017.",La Ribelle,Montalbera
"This white is a mix of tropical pineapple, tangerine and marshmallow, offering a creamy, doughy and yeasty texture on the palate. Chalky, it is medium bodied with a hint of richness, finishing more steely than stuffy.",,Myka
"Aromas of mature plum, toasted oak, menthol and dried herb lead the nose. The firm palate offers blackberry jam, dried black cherry, Oriental spice and licorice alongside grainy tannins that leave an astringent, mouth-drying finish.",,Negretti
"A positive bouquet of melon, white flowers and honey leads to a ripped acidic palate that generates tangy, almost sharp flavors of orange and gooseberry. A citrusy angular finish turns pithy and bitter as it dissipates. Drink now.",,Nora
"Darkly colored and densely concentrated this opens with aromas of dried plum, espresso and exotic spice. The evolved palate offers raisin, fig, licorice and ground pepper alongside fine-grained tannins. It's showing the heat of the vintage so drink soon before the fruit dries up completely.",Mervisano,Orlando Abrigo
"Aromas of mature plum, espresso, coconut and toasted oak lead the nose. The firm palate offers fig, blackberry jam, licorice and roasted coffee bean alongside firm, fine-grained tannins. The fruit is starting to dry up so drink sooner rather than later.",Armujan,Podere Ruggeri Corsini
"Pleasant apple and woodspice aromas are basic and limited but good. This feels balanced, with friendly melon, banana and tropical-fruit flavors. Light oak and related vanilla flavors drive the finish on this easygoing Chardonnay.",Trumpeter,Rutini
"A surprisingly fresh wine for an Alvarinho from the hot Alentejo. It shows crisp acidity, with lime and apricot flavors and a bright, crisp aftertaste.",Terra d'Alter,Terras de Alter
"Raspy cheesy fiery aromas of plum and raspberry are a bit harsh. This feels tannic and grabby, while inky berry fruit and resiny oak flavors finish hard and blocky with a mild note of schisty minerality.",Xibrana Crianza,Vicente Gandia
"Stony and mineral on the nose, this brut-style sparkling Riesling revitalizes the palate with a fine persistent perlage. Flavors of tart green apple, lemon and pear are zesty and spry. It's a straightforward but four-square sparkler at a value price.",HD,Von Schleinitz
"Still with its firm tannins in place and with layers of wood aging flavors, this is obviously a young wine. It has a background of ripe berry fruits and acidity that will develop over the next two years. It is potentially rich and full. Drink from 2017.",Pegos Claros Colheita,Wines & Winemakers
"Pie cherry and rhubarb notes make a bright impression on the nose, followed by tart flavors bundled in a mocha-tinged wrapper. The texture is almost syrupy on the midpalate, but turns dry and dusty on the finish. This is a bit disjointed at this stage, so perhaps it will improve with cellaring. Try after 2018.",Bicheno Single Site,Dalrymple
"A grassy, herbal element is up front on the nose of this Amarone-style blend done in conjunction with Allegrini of the the Veneto (Italy). In the mouth, it's round as a ball, with syrupy richness. Ripe sticky berry and plum flavors finish chewy with residual stickiness.",Enamore,Bodega Renacer
"Reduced rubbery aromas of blackberry and black currant come with a touch of mushroom. This is extracted, heavy and blocky on the palate, while baked blackberry flavors are massive but short on elegance. Bitter coffee flavors, rugged tannins and stickiness make for a heavy finish.",La Encerrada Estate Vineyard,Benegas
"This is a bit rustic, with dry oak scents and cheesy aromas that fade with airing. Choppy in the mouth, this Tempranillo shows bright acidity and leanness. Flavors of red berries and plum finish with a touch of roughness and bitterness.",Ayrum Crianza,Felix Solis
"Thin and simple, this is a direct and straightforward wine, with green apple fruit flavors and a very light dusting of cinnamon. Drink now.",,Girly Girl
"While crisp and bright on the nose with aromas of red cherries swathed with green herbs, this full-bodied Meritage is quite dense and rich on the palate. Green, tomato-leaf notes linger on the palate as well, accenting lush black cherry and berry flavors. It's softly tannic with a tart cranberry note that lingers on the finish.",,Glenora
"Very jammy in character, this is a soft, ripe wine. It seems almost too ripe, a wine that is rounded without great texture. It will be ready to drink by the end of the year.",Clos des Gatsulards,Louis Jadot
"Rich and textured, the wine is spicy with a burnt, smoky character. The fruit is quiet, just hinting at citrus.",Les Genevrières,Louis Latour
"Slightly salty, it reveals highlights of fig and oak amidst a crisp, clean, relatively low-in-alcohol profile. It'll serve well with seafood and salads and as a straightforward sipping wine on its own.",La Bise,Michel-Schlumberger
"There's an elegant spray of violet that persists from start to finish on this delicately structured Pinot Noir. Light in body with delicate swathes of red cherry, plum and earth, it finishes with a murmur of soft, astringent tannins.",Sawmill Creek Vineyard,Bellwether
"This bright, young wine is full of citrus, apples and apricots, leaving plenty of room for fresh acidity at the end.",Réserve,Bouchard Père & Fils
"Done entirely in stainless steel, it offers grape skin flavors and green apple fruit. It was.",,Samson
"This is soft and lightly scented with citrus. Aromas of lemon peel precede light flavors of citrus and green apple. It's a simple, quaffable white wine, with a bit of Riesling and Viognier in the blend.",Estate Grown,StoneCap
"Sour red-cherry and tart cassis notes abound on this brisk, slightly puckery Bordeaux blend. Medium bodied in style, it's refreshing on the palate with a cool mineral tone, but could benefit from a boost of concentration.",Optimus,Swedish Hill
"This wine opens with funky aromas of tire rubber and nail polish remover that carry over to the palate along with toast and expresso notes. It lacks fruit richness and has a green, bitter finish.",,Vestini Campagnano
"Lightly tannic, this wine is about red cherry and blueberry fruits, along with hints of banana. Fresh and fruity, it offers a balance of acidity and tannins at the end. Drink now.",Grande QV,Vignerons de Bel Air
"This is a bit thin, and mixes in a strong herbal dimension with the tart red fruit. The acids are proportionate, and the tannins carry some bitterness into the finish.",Harvest Moon,Wind Rose
"There's a layer of sweetness to this viscous wine, which exudes aromas of graham cracker and pear, finishing in a light coating of lemon.",,Pangloss Cellars
"Rubbery, herbal red-berry aromas introduce a fresh but grating palate with high acidity. This tastes a touch oaky and herbal, with generic red-fruit flavors. A crisp, slightly sharp finish is as you'd expect.",Selección Especial,Marqués de Montañana
"Already dense, this wine seems to lack fruit. The tannins dominate at the moment along with acidity. It's likely to remain quite a tight.",,Albert Bichot
"Smoke, plum jelly and a touch of violet form the aromas for this offering. The tannins are nicely thick, with prominent flavor profile of unsweetened blackberry jam. This meaty wine will improve with a bit more time in the bottle, so hold off until 2016.",,Ancient Peaks
"This wine is rather too jammy and ripe for its own good. It does have acidity, but it is also soft without the essential structure. It's not a wine for aging.",Vieilles Vignes,Domaine Michel et Joanna Ecard
"Still very young, it's full of acidity as well as bright raspberry fruits that give freshness. This light wine will soon be ready to drink.",,Henri de Villamont
"This wine is dull, soft with some redeeming acidity. It has weight and hints of a fresher character that might emerge by 2015.",La Crochette,Jacques Charlet
"This dense Cab is chewy on the palate with highlights of green olive, sour cherry and minty tobacco. It's fairly priced and approachable.",,Kirkland Signature
"This is a soft, somewhat dilute and simple white wine. Delicate suggestions of white peach and pear carry the bulk of the flavor.",,Lone Birch
"A sandalwood, light leather and raspberry nose are the most compelling elements of this wine by this E & J Gallo brand. On the palate, roasted fig and tart berry are followed by a bit of spice but no lasting finish.",,Bridlewood
"Much like the other 2011 red wine releases from Cave B, this offers thin, tart red fruit, and strong herb and stem flavors in the finishing tannins.",XXVI,Cave B
"A spicy, floral nose leads this fresh white from Mantinia. Balanced with fruity pear and lemon flavors, it's a good everyday white with a glamorous edge.",Dry,Cavino
"The wine's label sports a black and white image of a city skyline, and the wine inside the bottle might make for a decent glass pour at an urban bistro. There's a lot of vanilla flavor and some pleasant black cherry fruit.",,City Limits
"Very tangy in texture, it has spice from wood aging and a crisply fresh character. It is bright and light, and very lemony at the end.",Grand Va,Collovray et Terrier
"This opens with earthy aromas of tilled soil, underbrush, wet leaves, barnyard and mature black fruit. The muddled palate shows both sweet and bitter sensations of overripe blackberry, tart candied cherry, orange peel, vanilla, espresso and unsweetened cocoa, as well as astringent wood tannins. Panebianco, Vinity.",Siclys,Armosa
"A whiff of petrol leads off on this oaky, full-figured white, which is creamy and textured with a touch of sweetness on the finish.",Estate Grown,Rochioli
"This fresh, softly mellow and creamy wine is utterly captivating with bright summer red-berry and tree-fruit, vanilla, cherry liqueur, brown sugar and toast flavors. Absolutely delicious now, it is a silky feast for the senses and should easily negotiate the next 8_10 years.",Olivet Lane Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"As delicious and succulent as anything out there, with black currant, blueberry and chocolate flavors that are vastly deep and long on the finish. Fortunately, there's brisk acidity and fine tannins, and despite the luscious fruit and oak, it's dry on the finish. This blend of Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Cabernet Franc is fully drinkable now.",The Big Game,The Farm Winery
"The alcohol on this bottling is lower than most Fe Ciegas have been in the past, reflecting the cool vintage. The wine seems more austere than in the past, withholding a bit of the early appeal it used to show. Nonetheless, it's wonderfully structured in acids and tannins and very dry, with a judicious application of oak, and there are intricate flavors of cherries, red currants and herbs. Seems like it could shine with age, so give it six years in the cellar.",Fe Ciega Vineyard,Longoria
"Rounded, smooth, rich wine from the warm Holzspur vineyard. It has weight and structure as well, but it's the generosity of this wine that is immediately striking and attractive. It can be kept, but is ready to drink now.",Holzspur,Johanneshof Reinisch
"This is delicious now for its raspberry and cherry sweetness, accented with smoky oak and brightened by crisp acidity. It shows the elegance that Calera Pinots are known for. It's complex enough to offer lots of pleasure, but you may want to age it for 6_8 years to let it mellow.",Mills Vineyard,Calera
"Give Grüner the chance to become really ripe and you end up with luscious, rich wines like this. It may be dry, but its texture is so unctuous and soft. Its peach, lychee and kiwi fruit acidity offer the chance for drinking soon, but also promise good aging over the next 2_3 years.",Ried Schütt Smaragd,Emmerich Knoll
"This 100% Zin erupts in briary, peppery wild raspberry, blueberry and cherry flavors. The tannins are firm, and the acids crisp and savory. What a lovely Zinfandel, made in the soft, velvety style of Merlot, but with Bradford Mountain power.",Bradford Mountain Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"The vineyard is near Sebastopol and the Green Valley, and the wine shows its cool-climate origins in the brisk terroir that gives the raspberry, sweet red cherry and persimmon fruit such bite. It's enormously attractive to drink now for sheer lusciousness, but has the integrity to age for 10_15 years, perhaps longer, depending on your taste for older Pinot.",Hallberg Vineyard,Gary Farrell
"This is a lovely Cabernet Franc, polished and clean. It's wound tight, with black fruits and firm, pencil lead tannins. There's a dash of clean earth, good length, and some softening of the mid-palate from the addition of 18% Merlot.",,Dusted Valley
"A fine vintage of Bill Easton's Cabernet Franc, from the Monarch Mine Vineyard, where he typically sources tremendous Syrah and Barbera, this wine is still developing and will do nicely with time. For now it shows perfumed herbal restraint, subtle spice and a twist of oaky coffee on the finish. A savory wine that would pair well with filet mignon _ point.",Monarch Mine Vineyard,Easton
"A complex, rich and ripe wine. It shows both a tannic edge and full red fruit flavors. With acidity cutting through, this is finely balanced, a delicious and serious wine that would benefit from a few more months in bottle.",,Château Vignelaure
"Made in a fine, accessible style, this 100% Cab is delicious now with blackberry jam, chocolate and cassis flavors. It has classic Napa Valley tannins that are rich and ripe. This is a fancy wine, that's soft yet complex, and at this price, a good investment.",Elodian,Tom Eddy
"Concentrated and elusively complex in cherry, red currant and sandalwood flavors, with a hint of red tomato and bloody red meat that testifies to the cool vintage. It's a big, dense wine, but also quite tannic, and a little high in alcohol, giving it a full body. A bit ungainly now, but impressive nonetheless for sheer power. Give it six years in the cellar.",Nugent Vineyard,Stemmler
"This is a huge, complex wine, filled with currant, cocoa and dried herb flavors wrapped into dusty tannins. It's dry, elegant and even ageworthy. The richness is balanced by crisp acidity, like a squirt of lime juice that makes the dark fruit dance. Drink now_2017.",LPF,The Farm Winery
"Based on Cabernet Sauvignon, this Bordeaux-style blend is very rich in chocolate, blackberry and cherry fruit. New French oak adds notes of sweet toast and vanilla. That famous Napa structure of tannins and acids lends elegance to the ripeness. Drink now_2017.",_lu Estate Bottled Red Wine,St. Supéry
"A blend of Sauvignon Blanc and Sämling, this gold straw colored wine is about freshness and acidity as much as about sweetness. That gives this ageworthy wine a great delicacy and poise, balanced and fresh, the honey botrytis texture attractively layered through this delicious wine.",Trockenbeerenauslese Essenz,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"This is a ripe, dark but balanced Toro with pastry, prune, blackberry and vanilla aromas. The palate is fiercely tannic on the surface but not overly hard at the foundation. Flavors of burnt toast, blackberry, spice, licorice and chocolate finish warm, toasty and dark, with echoes of ripeness and hard tannins. Drink now through 2018.",Termes,Numanthia
"Ripe mango, peach and pineapple all come together in this rich, opulent wine. Round yet there's a strong ginger and spice component. This is a complex wine, textured, rich and worth aging for at least another two years. Glass stopper.",Sernauberg Erste Lage,Sattlerhof
"This intensely fruity, delicately structured Riesling showcases layers and layers of sweet stonefruit and qince jelly flavors. The attack is honeyed and rich, but balanced with a shower of citrus acidity and a steely minerality that lingers long on the finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Auslese,Markus Molitor
"This is the winery's basic Cabernet, a blend of five vineyards on the mountain. It's a smooth, elegant, classic mountain Cab, that's dry and tannic, with delicious blackberry, currant and sweet-smoky oak flavors. It's right up there with Von Strasser's vineyard-designated wines that cost nearly twice as much, which makes it a great value.",,Von Strasser
"A big, rich, vital Cabernet with immediate attraction that is deceptive. Sure, you can enjoy it now, while it's brimming in cherry jam and red and black currants with a finish of rich, caramelized oak. But it will soften and mellow over the next eight years, and maybe even longer. This is Round Pond's best estate Cabernet in years.",Estate,Round Pond
"Big, rich, dense wine, packed with dark tannins and blackberry fruits. The wine has concentration, layering wood aging with youthful acidity that shines through the structure. An impressive wine that needs aging for at least five years.",Grand Vin,Château Tour de Guiet
"Earthy dark-berry and leathery aromas are nice and convincing. The palate on this single-vineyard Tempranillo is big but balanced, with layering and firm tannins. Flavors of black fruits, creamy oak and earth finish with grabby tannins and sincerity. Drink this full-bodied wine now through 2018.",El Rincón de Clunia,Clunia
"Floral aromas of cassis and plum are open, spicy and complex, with a balsamic accent. This feels solid as a rock, with firm tannins and a lively flavor profile that includes blackberry, baked notes, spice and cocoa powder. On the finish, oak is reflected through flavors of vanilla and mocha. Drink from 2014_2022.",Don Maximiano Founder's Reserva,Errazuriz
"Dark colored wine, revealing wood aging both aromatically and to taste. That said, it also has great weight, a powerful and complex wine with its coffee, dried fruit and black plum flavors. It's an impressive, solid wine that deserves at least seven years' aging.",,Château Lestage Simon
"The high toned, aromatic reticence of the 2008 vintage is on full display in this unusual blend 37% Cabernet Sauvignon, 33% Syrah, 12% Mourvedre, 6% Petit Verdot, 6% Cabernet Franc, and 6% Sangiovese. The brooding notes of bittersweet chocolate, medicine cabinet, and cherry cola are concentrated however with structured, slightly dry tannins in a wine that calls out for steak if ever there were one.",Marie's View Wallula Vineyards,Den Hoed
"Semi-sweet in style with a ripe, intensely fruity palate, this delicate little Riesling is surprisingly complex with layers of wax, honey and lemon-pith that reverberate on a brisk, minerally palate.",Scharzhofberger Kabinett,Bischöfliche Weingüter Trier
"Big, bold, tannic wine, very spicy and leathery in character. Dark plums and a solid, chunky character are given a further boost by the dense and concentrated texture, and spice and acidity. The wine needs aging for 5_6 years more.",Cuvée G,Les Vignobles Gueissard
"Longoria brings a deft touch to this Pinot Grigio. The grapes were briefly fermented in tank, then bottled when the wine was only about four months old. The result is exceptionally fresh and lively, with tangy acidity brightening citrus, lemongrass, vanilla and white pepper flavors.",,Longoria
"Freedom Hill is one of the most-admired vineyards in the Willamette Valley, and this elegant wine does it full justice. A beguiling mix of roses, chocolate, berry and sandalwood, it tickles the nose and tongue with its precision and deceptive depth of flavor.",Freedom Hill,King Estate
"A big, powerful wine that sums up the richness of the vintage. It is densely fruity, spicy with an enormous black plum and berry fruit character to go with the acidity. It's concentrated while still showing such wonderfully pure fruit. The aging potential is immense.",,Château Latour
"The flagship wine from Quilceda Creek offers exotic scents of plum, cassis, loam, coffee and pine sap, a rich and evocative blend. The wine delivers all that is promised and more; it is deep and dense with flavor, polished, focused and persistent. Vanilla, espresso, fine tannins, luscious acids and cascading fruits.",,Quilceda Creek
"A massive wine for Margaux, packed with tannins and ripe fruit. It has more Cabernet Sauvignon than usual, giving intense black currant flavors with enticing acidity balanced by the sweetness of the fruit. Ripe swathes of this opulent fruit are also elegant and structured.",,Château Margaux
"A beautiful wine, with the firmest tannins surrounded by perfumed fruit. It is dense, of course, but this density is balanced with great elegance, blackberry fruits, sweetness and final juicy acidity. The wine is structured, a powerhouse of concentration while preserving this complete style.",,Château Palmer
"A stunning Pirouette_63% Cabernet Sauvignon, 22% Merlot, 9% Cab Franc and 6% Petit Verdot. Full and magnificently rich, it is loaded with dense and thrilling fruit flavors of black cherry and cassis. A streak of iron and a hint of citrus keep the wine evolving through a long, beautifully balanced finish. Retasted after being open for 24 hours, the wine was as fresh and thrilling as on the first day.",Red Wine,Pirouette
"Here's a __ow_ wine on every level, with incredible intensity and supple softness that builds momentum over many long minutes. A sweet cherry note at the core is surrounded by lush layers of tobacco, dark chocolate and spice, which promise to evolve gracefully over years to come.",Guado al Tasso,Marchesi Antinori
"A major success of the vintage. The wine exhibits extreme richness of the fruit, with all its sweet blackberry flavors. It also has underlying firm structure, density and solid tannins. Bring in the acidity at the end, and this is both impressive and ready for long-term aging.",,Château Léoville Barton
"Such a generous and ripe wine, with a dark core of tannins surrounded by opulent fruit. Black fruits, coffee, very concentrated flavors, a powerhouse of structure and richness. The warmth of the wine is palpable, as is the aging potential.",,Château La Mission Haut-Brion
"An outstanding wine, the best California Cabernet Jean-Charles Boisset has ever produced from any of his properties. It stands out in any tasting of its peers. Made from 100% Cabernet Sauvignon, and aged in 60% new oak, it shows satisfying, complex flavors of blackberries, blueberries, cassis, hazelnut-infused chocolate and spices. Hard to exaggerate its power and grace. Wonderful now and for a good six years, but it's difficult to predict its evolution beyond 2018.",No. 1,JCB
"The 2008 Ornellaia delivers concentrated aromas of forest fruit, raspberry and black cherry. There are beautiful elements of soft spice and chocolate at the back and the wine ends with soft, plush tannins and smooth, berry-rich flavors.",Ornellaia,Tenuta dell'Ornellaia
"A very concentrated wine with such a stylish feel. It balances ripe berry fruits with chocolate and wood flavors in the richest, ripest combination. The wine has power, without losing its poised character. It's ready for long aging.",,Château Troplong Mondot
"Recently implemented winemaker and cellar changes make this one of the best Sassicaias ever. This Cabernet Sauvignon-Cabernet Franc blend delivers thick concentration and sun-kissed aromas of black fruit, prune, dried bay leaf, black olive and tobacco. The thick, fertile soils that characterize the magical strip of coastal Tuscany at Bol-gheri help shape amazing richness and intensity.",Sassicaia,Tenuta San Guido
"A drop-dead gorgeous Pinot Noir that will satisfy everyone from Burgundy fans to diehard Cabernet cultists. Show an elegant complexity and silky texture that define great California Pinot Noir, yet with a powerful impact that emphasizes raspberries, cherries and blueberries. Brilliant acidity and tannins provide the perfect framework on this wine that's drinkable now, and will develop over the next 15_20 years.",Allen Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Beneath the surface tannins is great Merlot fruit, very ripe and full-bodied, a powerhouse of flavors. The depth and complexity of the wine is all there, along with a dark core of dryness. A wine for long-term aging.",,Château Trotanoy
"A triumph, one of the greatest Riverblock bottings in years. This always is a captivating wine, but the '09 is particularly scrumptious. Although it's quite tannic and acidic, it's forward enough in raspberries, cherries and cola to enjoy now. But it's bone dry and as elegant as California Pinot Noir gets. The balance suggests an ability to age for a good 10 years, if not longer.",Rochioli Riverblock Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Just across the road from Pétrus, la Fleur-Pétrus shares some of the same intensity. There is great fruit here, rounded and powerful with the ripest character. It is open, generous, ready to drink. The tannins lead into the purest acidity, letting the fruit sing.",,Château la Fleur-Pétrus
"An immensely structured wine, packed with dark tannins promising aging potential. It is complex, powerful, layered with new wood and concentration, finishing with dark plum fruits and acidity.",,Château Léoville Poyferré
"A dense, immense, solidly powerful wine. The ripest fruit overflows, paralleling the dark, solid tannins. As so often, Lynch-Bages is a blockbuster, dark and concentrated, with immense aging potential.",,Château Lynch-Bages
"Minty new wood aromas on a wine that shows both great tannins and sweet wood. The fruit is still to show, but promises fresh plum flavors that will be delicious and juicy. This is a ripe, concentrated wine.",,Château Beau-Séjour Bécot
"The purest Cabernet Sauvignon fruit, with dark chocolate and intense dark berry flavors. The tannins are so enveloped by the fruit and yet they promise great aging. At this stage, wood shows through the fruit, but the texture is so rich and opulent that it should easily become integrated.",,Château Mouton Rothschild
"A ripe year like 2009 is kind to the Cabernet Sauvignon of Château Figeac. The wine is perfumed with new wood and sweet fruits, delicious black currant flavors giving both ripeness and freshness. The wine has weight and impressive density. A star of the vintage.",,Château Figeac
"A huge Cabernet, in the best sense of the word. It wasn't the easiest vintage, as 2007 was, but meticulous winemaking did the job, resulting in this amazingly rich, impressively ripe wine that's drinkable now and will develop for many years. The fruits veer toward blackberries, cherries and cola, and the tannins are soft and refined. One hundred percent new French oak isn't at all heavy, lending nuances of buttered toast and sweet wood tannins. Will easily age for 15 years.",Reserve,Groth
"Solid, very structured, packed with dense and dry tannins. There is a core of acidity and darkness that gives the wine a brooding, powerful character. At this stage, it seems austere although it does have the weight of fruit typical of the year.",,Château Haut-Brion
"Here's a beautifully chocolaty and rich blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Cabernet Franc, with plush layers of sweet cherry, Indian spice, tobacco and espresso. The wine is amazingly rich and long lasting, with silky, supple tannins at the very end. Keep it in your cellar 10 years or more, or drink it now.",Argentiera,Tenuta Argentiera
"One of the peculiarities of St.-_milion's classification is that Canon la Gaffelière is not classed in the top rung. Because, as this wine shows, it produces superb wines. This is ripe while so elegant, with great intensity and sweet perfumes.",,Château Canon la Gaffelière
"A rich and opulent wine, very ripe, packed with luscious blackberry and damson fruit as well as sweet tannins. It is a fruit salad of fruit flavors given structure by a core of dryness. Already a gorgeous wine, but one that will also age.",,Château Rauzan-Ségla
"Amazing plushness and richness characterizes this impressive offering from Aia Vecchia. It's hard to match the beauty of this wine, which expresses itself as dark chocolate, cherry liqueur, black licorice, cigar box and dark spice. Soft, plush, super-rich tannins characterize the mouthfeel.",Sorugo,Aia Vecchia
"A tremendous Chardonnay. As always, the winery's '09 is bone dry, crisply acidic and minerally. You might call it austere at this point, with its tart finish of grapefruit. But a great Hanzell Chardonnay will improve for at least a decade, possible two, and this is a great Hanzell Chardonnay. The score reflects what the wine likely will be approximately eight years down the road.",,Hanzell
"Impressively weighty wine, with a fine combination of tannins, full fruit and a solid, chunky core. The wine is rich, but it also has a sweet acidity. Powerful ageworthy wine, never losing sight of elegance.",,Château Hosanna
"This is a brand-new bottling from Merry Edwards. It's her first from Westside Road, which is warmer than her haunting grounds around the southern part of the valley. It's quite a promising debut. The wine is round, soft, charming and complex, with elaborate cherry, blackberry, licorice and cola flavors. It feels important and ageworthy. Drink now, with several hours of decanting, or cellar through 2020.",Georganne,Merry Edwards
"Here's a pretty and bright Pinot Grigio with sensations of green apple and pear. This is simple but well made, and while it makes a refreshing apéritif, it will also pair nicely with pasta al pomodoro or lightly seasoned fish dishes.",,Canaletto
"Produced by the Château de Bligny close to Beaune, this soft, perfumed wine has stalky red fruits, laced with a dry core of tannin and fragrant acidity. It could age for another year.",Rouge,Evening Land
"Notes of melon, confectioners' sugar, peach and white flower mark the nose of this late-harvest Vidal. Full and viscous, the palate bears soft acidity that frames the sweet flavor of glazed golden fig.",Adieu Late Harvest,Gray Ghost
"Pushy, smoky, forceful aromas of roasted blackberry and campfire set up a sticky feeling, slightly gummy palate that's full of berry, plum and rubbery flavors. On the finish, this flattens out and becomes heavier.",Reserva,Finca El Origen
"This wine is mostly Syrah, which gives juicy blackberry, plum and chocolate-covered raisin flavors. The slight percent of Viognier brings acidity and an uplifted floral note to this easy-drinking wine.",Sixer,Coquelicot
"Shows classic Zinfandel flavors of exotic spices, ripe cherries and cola, red currants and an umami touch of bacon. The alcohol tastes high, the acidity feels low, and the finish is a little sweet with flavors of white sugar.",Heritage Selection,Bianchi
"Raisin and cassis aromas come across sweet and ripe but also flat. This feels mildly tannic and abrasive, with herbal plum and raspberry flavors setting up a finish that's lightly green and woody.",Vertus Wine Made with Organically Grown Grapes,Bodegas Iranzo
"This is a strong, full-bodied rosé with ripe, jammy strawberry and raspberry flavors that finish off dry with fruity essence.",Rosé of,Taft Street
A Zin of high-toned red raspberry and blackberry fruit and dark plum that segues quickly into oaky toast tastes.,Old Vine,Rail2Rail
"Brisk acidity gives this Sauvignon Blanc a mouthwatering quality, but it's pretty ripe, with flavors of white sugar, lemons and pineapple. Will pair well with salty, savory foods like sausages, ham or teriyaki chicken.",,Santa Barbara Winery
"The nose on this Norton is an admixture of underbrush and dark chocolate notes, coupled with blackberry, rose and vanilla accents. Medium to full in body, it has fine, dusty tannins and balanced acids. The finish comes with a hint of tobacco and a minerally tang.",Estates,Mount Pleasant Winery
"With a translucent ruby color, this wine shows nice Pinot Noir character. It has a light, silky texture and flavors of sour cherry and raspberry candy, Dr. Pepper cola and sandalwood.",,Masked Rider
"It's labeled Merlot, but the blend includes Syrah and other grapes, and the result comes across as a rather generic red wine. Soft and very buttery, it has light red fruits and some green tannins.",,Mercer
"A soft, juicy wine, slightly sweet in raspberries and cherries, but the finish is nicely dry. It's mellow in acids and tannins, so perfect for drinking now. Try with a great beef taco.",Red Dirt Red,Vinum
"The core dark-cherry and raspberry scents are set off by smoky oak, licorice and spearmint subtleties. Medium in body, this feels open and pliant, yet the acids make the finish succulent.",Divino,Vivác Winery
"Pungent, high-pitched notes of turmeric and dried flower hit the nose first, with underlying scents of tobacco, char and cassis. The palate is medium bodied and chocolaty, and it bears chalky tannins that keep the finish firm.",Single Vineyard,Vivác Winery
"A full and rounded wine, touched by caramel as well as red plum and ripe strawberries. It is generous, with a soft, open aftertaste. There is a light texture from the acidity that creeps in at the end.",Domaine Saint-Sernin Fare Saint-Sernin,Château Saint-Sernin
"Soft, fresh, just off dry, a fruity wine that is light and fragrant. Crisp acidity cuts through the wine, giving a tight, nervy edge along with bright fruitiness.",,Cave de Cleebourg
"Soft in style, with warm peach and pear flavors. There is a touch of herbaceousness and crisp acidity, but these are rounded out by an attractive fragrance. Ready to drink in six months.",,Château Bélingard
"Waxy aromas suggest haystack and dusty apple. This is on the borderline of heavy and cloying in the mouth, while oak is the main driver of the flavor profile. On the finish, notes of melon and banana are covered by a resiny oak flavor.",Broquel,Trapiche
"Tropical fruit and citrus aromas turn toward air freshener and bath soap upon airing. This feels standard for Torrontés, maybe even a bit flabby, with lychee and melon flavors that finish chalky.",Broquel,Trapiche
"A very spicy Gewurztraminer that is soft, lychee flavored and full-bodied. It is all perfume, only just hinting at acidity, off dry in style, very ready to drink now.",,Jean Becker
"This blend of Loin de l'Oeil and Sauvignon Blanc gives a crisp, lightly textured wine, floral in character with flavors of white peach and plum. Ready to drink.",Gouleyant,Georges Vigouroux
"Ripe, rich and fruity, this is Gamay from old vines that give extra concentration. The wine is full of bitter cherries, tight acidity and a light texture. Drink now.",Vieilles Vignes,Signé Vigneron
"Green grass and gooseberry flavors accent flavors of sweet spearmint chewing gum and Key-lime pie on this Napa Sauvignon Blanc. There's bright acidity, though, making it a good companion to Southeast Asian cuisine.",,Honig
"A troubled Zinfandel, the winery's least successful in years. It has some vegetal notes as well as fruity raspberry jam. That green note is especially noticeable in the finish. Ready to drink now.",,Hunnicutt
"Sulfur shrouds this wine at first, but it dissipates with time to reveal mild notes of honeyed nut, kiwi, white flower and golden apple. The palate has balanced acidity and a slight oiliness, and the flavors seem a bit muted at the moment.",,General's Ridge
"Simple and ripe, this wine highlights a fruity blend of pineapples, peaches and apricots, punched up with a warming touch of alcohol. Forward and easy drinking with a slightly cloying finish.",Barrel Select,Firestone
"The Score swings and mostly misses, despite some interested fruit (mostly Merlot) that brings a brambly berry flavor into the mid-palate. There is a fishy undertaste that wraps into the finish, along with a light hint of cocoa.",The Score,For a Song
"Green gooseberry and asparagus flavors blend with richer notes of Meyer lemons and golden mangoes. It's tart with acidity, but a honeyed finish adds balance.",,Frei Brothers
"This is a vigorous Zinfandel, fruity and soft, with berry, cola and spice flavors. Drink now with barbecue, burgers or beef burritos.",,Napa Cellars
"Imagine all of the scents you associate with a Margherita pizza and that's what this wine smells like. The nose is leafy and full of oregano, basil and leather notes, while the flavor profile is pure tomato sauce, herb and spice. A blend of 75% Cabernet Franc and 25% Cabernet Sauvignon.",Carlota,Oliver Conti
"There's lots of cutting acidity in this dry Merlot. It has pleasant cherry-pie flavors, but the tartness really needs rich meats and cheeses to soften it.",,Lockwood
"Made from a bunch of different varieties, including Viognier and Pinot Grigio, this white blend is off-dry, with a sweet edge to the orange and peach fruit.",Ruckus,Lost Angel
"A simple little Sauvignon Blanc, this is sweet and soft, with savory pineapple and lemon jam flavors. Oak brings a touch of vanilla and buttered toast.",,Pine & Brown
"Soft and ripe, this has a red fruit flavor, with richness and a round texture. There is a touch of spice, with a light hint of acidity in the background.",,Château Bélingard
"This is a lightweight, fruity and softly tannic wine. The red berry flavor is bright and breezy, and the acidity is a dominant feature. Screwcap.",Brigando,DFJ Vinhos
"Fruity and off-dry, this has light touches of sweet strawberry and vanilla to go with the orange zest acidity. Screwcap.",Pink Elephant,DFJ Vinhos
"Not bad for the price, if you're just looking for something dry, full bodied and fruity. A lot of people are, which makes this a pretty good bargain.",,Greystone
"The first noticeable aspect is that it seems to have no structure. The cherry, cola and pomegranate flavors have been elaborately oaked, but there's nothing for the mouth to grip onto.",Hein Family Vineyard,Walt
"This is nicely dry and rich in fine tannins, with classic Cabernet blackberry, black currant, cola and cedar flavors. But the wine is so soft, it lacks structural integrity.",Cellar Select,Weinstock Cellars
"If you like tart, less-than-ripe Sauvignon Blanc, you'll enjoy this one. It's acidic, but relieved by lemon, lime and honey flavors.",,White Oak
"This is for you, if you like your Zins in a sweet, soft style. It tastes like the filling from a black­berry and cherry pie, dusted with exotic spices, like cinnamon and black pepper.",,Twisted Sisters
"This gets the job done with classic varietal flavors of lemon, lime and savory green grass, as well as tart acidity to get those tastebuds watering. There's an off-dry taste of honey, but the wine is basically dry.",Vintner's Collection,Sterling
"Extracted and oaky, this will appeal to those who enjoy the popular style. It's strong in buttered toast and butterscotch flavors, with a pineapple jam note.",,San Simeon
"Made in a seemingly off-dry style, this offers simple but pleasant apricot, peach and white flower flavors, with bright acidity. It's tastes similar to Pinot Grigio in many respects.",,Jacuzzi
"Simple, dry and one dimensional, this has cola and cherry jam flavors, and a silky, delicate texture.",,Kirkland Signature
"The first bottle was off, with an unpleasant mousy aroma. A second bottle fared a bit better, showing simple citrus and sour melon flavors. It finishes a bit thin.",Left Bank,Left Coast Cellars
"There's a Porty overripeness all through this wine, like concentrated raisins and prunes. Although it's basically dry, it has a raisiny sweetness, especially toward the finish.",Weir Vineyard,Drew
"Smooth, rounded and dry, this has plum and strawberry flavors. Full in the mouth and touched by spice, this is a rosé for food.",Monte Alentejano,DFJ Vinhos
"A rounded wine, this gives pleasure with its pear and ripe apple flavors. Lightly touched with acidity, this has a soft finish.",Point West,DFJ Vinhos
"This is a dark specimen, with black-fruit and raisiny aromas that turn herbal with time. It has rubbery tannins and flavors of plum and herb. Good as a whole but sort of squeeky and hard in feel. A blend of 60% Garnacha and 40% Tempranillo.",Crianza,Coto de Hayas
"A good Chardonnay to serve at parties, this shows plenty of oak-driven vanilla and toast flavors that ride high over the seemingly sweet note of pineapple candy. It will satisfy lots of Chardophiles, at an affordable price.",,Black Box
"Jumpy and nervy smelling, with tottering aromas of jammy berry and strawberry. It feels dilute at first, but more structure and body appear as the wine unfolds. The flavor of jammy raspberry is somewhat herbal, and the finish is light.",Roble,Convento Oreja
"This seems sweet like a Port. It tastes like raspberry and cherry jam, with lots of heat from the alcohol.",1000 Vines,Minassian-Young
"Light and juicy, this has fresh blackcurrant fruit, with balanced tannins. With its fruit forward flavor, it's not a wine for aging.",The Original,Rigal
"This is a simple, soft, easy to drink Cabernet, with candied berry and spice flavors. The easiness suggests backyard barbecue, with sweetly grilled ribs and burgers on a summer evening.",Four Bears,Sean Minor
"Although this Cabernet bears a Napa Valley designation, it could be from anywhere. It's rich in tannins and has good blackberry and herb flavors that finish a little pruny.",Route 29,RouteStock Cellars
"This Syrah is bone dry, tannic and simple. The blackberry jam and pepper flavors are tasty, but unable to rise above the astringency. Drink now.",,San Simeon
"This 100% stainless-steel-aged Sauvignon Blanc has a crisp, herbal mouthfeel, with a melon-like brightness. Just a touch of green pepper and jalapeño muddle the finish.",Hybrid,Peltier Station
"Densely-colored, dark wine. Somewhat sullen and closed nose, yet on the palate, blackberry coulis aromas lead to aged and charred steak flavors. This is a moderately complex wine with a briefly lingering finish. Leather and dried earth notes suggest this wine has evolved to benefit but that it should be consumed now to 2014.",Cuvée des Dieux,Château Salitis
"Smells neither tropical nor citric as it falls somewhere in the middle of those two common denominators. Feels wet, fresh and minerally, with flavors of lime, green melon, sour apple, green herbs and mineral. Clean, well-cut and tight on the finish, with zesty length.",Reserva,Casa Silva
"A serious Cab with a medium-to-full disposition. Starts with aromas of loam, rubber and tobacco, then comes an active palate with zesty acids and a juicy overall feel. Tastes of black fruits and raspberry, with coffee, mocha and herbal accents. Thick on the finish, with tannic clamp and oaky residue.",Gran Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Blended from various vineyards throughout Napa Valley, this bone-dry Cabernet is classically rich in blackberry, cassis and cedar flavors, wrapped into ripe tannins. It's a bit aggressive in acidity.",DRII,D.R. Stephens
"This Pinot Noir may become more rich and charming in coming years, but right now it's fresh, tart and jammy in raspberries and cherries. It's also a bit heavy, almost as if a bit of Grenache found its way into the blend.",Estate Collection,De Loach
"An interesting and even somewhat eccentric wine. There are notes of green tea and herbs, but enough pure orange fruit to make it rich. Lots of zingy acidity, too.",Sierra Madre Vineyard,Fontes & Phillips
"Lightly amylic-pear drop, resin, mineral, stone-fruit and peach-skin aromas dominate the youthful nose of this wine. Very clean and mineral-focused. The medium body and vibrant acidity give the palate a firm texture. Given its short, crisp finish, it is best consumed between now and through 2013. Good by the glass or with light fare.",,Domaine la Croix Gratiot
Black tea leaves and sweet spices season the fresh black-cherry and cassis spine of this attractive red blend. A good grip in the mouth lends structure to the fruit-forward palate and gives longevity to the dry finish.,Val de L'Ours,Domaines Barons de Rothschild (Lafite)
"Neutral up front except for green apple and mineral aromas. Feels quite good and healthy, with juicy acids pushing fresh bell pepper, lime and white peach flavors. Short but fresh and citrusy on the finish.",Reserva,Chilcas
"Toasty, waxy and peachy on the nose, with nicely applied oak. Feels comfortable and apple-like, with good acidity pushing apple, green melon and green plum flavors. Bright, lively and firm on the finish, with a slightly pithy aftertaste.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Intense and black up front, with coconut, tobacco and blackberry aromas. Feels round and plump, with dark, toasty flavors of mildly herbal berry and cassis. Finishes warm, spicy, a little heavy and with tannic grip. A fun wine that's big boned and concentrated.",Marques de Casa Concha,Concha y Toro
"This is a linear and polished Montepulciano, with bright fruit nuances of blackberry and cassis, followed touches of black stone, spice and mature plum. It feels smooth and fine in the mouth, with a rich berry-driven finish.",Ripamosso,Illuminati Dino
"Fruity and dry__ut not too dry__his delightful Riesling is loaded with juicy, satisfying flavors of grapefruit and orange. It's a drink-now, thirst-quenching style, great for quaffing.",Dry,Lemelson
"The entry-level Riesling from this historic estate is a solid, satisfying wine in 2010, offering modest aromas and flavors of citrus fruit and wet stones. It's a medium-weight, almost-dry wine, with a long, crisp finish. Drink now_2017.",,Maximin Grünhäuser
"No one will ever complain that this Napa Valley-Sonoma County blend isn't fruity enough. It's deliciously explosive in jammy blackberries, cassis, cherries and milk chocolate. Oak adds notes of caramel. But flavor isn't everything, and this wine would benefit from greater restraint and structural integrity.",Encomium,Keating
"This wine heads the range of good value wines under the Monte Alentejano name. It has some weight and a tangy, structured character, and has not lost its black-plum flavors. Drink now.",Monte Alentejano Reserva,DFJ Vinhos
"An enticingly perfumed wine that has firm tannins, blackberry flavors and layers of new wood. It is concentrated and powerful, full of the dark weight of Cabernet and Merlot.",Cuvée Germain,Domaine D'en Ségur
"This ripe wine laces black fruits with a stalky texture and attractive acidity. The wine has a dry core of tannins, but are softening into a warmer character. Ready to drink.",Château de Sabazan,Producteurs Plaimont
"Couldn't get any riper, with an explosion of blackberries, cherries, currants, plums, and cola, not to mention plenty of toasty, caramelized oak. Trades complexity and subtlety for sheer power. It's mostly Merlot, with a splash of Syrah, Petit Verdot and Cabernet Franc.",The Puzzle,Newton
"A palate-pleasing, off-dry white, with a mix of peach and pear, some nice highlights of baking spices, and good texture through the finish.",Toasted Cow Vintners Blend,Oak Knoll
"Blending Riesling and Gewürztraminer, this wine benefits from the pure steeliness of the former and the spice of the latter. This wine has a honeyed character, balanced by intense acidity and dry botrytis. Great paired with berry fruits.",Late Harvest,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"Here's a nice Sauvignon Blanc for drinking now. It shows how well this variety grows in the warmer parts of the county, with citrus, apricot, peach and spice flavors. Crisp acidity provides zesty balance to this deliciously drinkable young wine.",,Straight Line
"New French oak dominates this wine, in the form of caramel and buttered cinnamon toast. Those are delicious flavors, of course, but they have little to do with the wine itself, which seems just fine, suggesting sour red cherries, red currants and licorice. Maybe it's just going through an awkward phase, or maybe it's the alcohol, which officially clocks in at 16% by volume, emphasizing the sweetness.",District Collection,Raymond
"Coconut is the lead aroma, but there's graphite, cool earth, cola, blackberry and raw oak on the bouquet. Feels structured and lush, with tight tannins and robust flavors of clove, coconut, blackberry and tobacco. Quite oaky late, with barrel-driven flavors driving the finish.",1865 Single Vineyard,San Pedro
"Strawberry fruit is mixed in with fresh, pungent herbs__ mix that nicely expresses the Chehalem Mountains terroir. Fruity, full and forward, this ripe and pleasing wine is balanced just right for near-term enjoyment.",Hawks View Vineyard,Torii Mor
"An intensely fruity Petite full of plum and aromas of strawberries dipped in chocolate. Blended with 10% Mourvèdre, the wine is soft and round, with tame tannins. It finishes long, with a taste of char and Sweet Tarts, in a good way.",,Twisted Oak
"This wine is a great example of why Riesling is so increasingly popular. Despite the __ry_ title on the label, it's actually a bit off-dry and crisp in acidity, with clean, savory flavors of limes, kiwi fruits, honey and vanilla. So easy to like, and the alcohol is relatively low.",Dry,V. Sattui
"Shy and clean on the nose, which offers up only mild grapefruit and lime. The feel is tight and stony, with pithy citrus and green apple flavors. Leans towards green and herbaceous on the finish, but never fully goes green while maintaining clarity and crispness.",La Gloria,Veramonte
"This opulent, almost sweet blend of Primitivo and Merlot shows bold fruit nuances of cherry liqueur and blackberry pie, backed by touches of leather and moist pipe tobacco. Those chewy fruit tones give the wine a soft, velvety sensation on the close.",Primitivo-Merlot,Matané
"With 15.4% alcohol by volume, this is arguably Lail's ripest, hottest Cabernet ever. It certainly has flashy blackberry and cherry jam flavors, with plenty of toasty oak, but there's a raisin-and-prune, overripe finish. Could age, but it's more likely that the heat will pinch in within six years, crushing the fruit.",J. Daniel Cuvée,Lail
"Light garnet in color, this wine has a subtle bouquet that is redolent of blue flower, almond paste, tobacco and even citrus. The palate feels tight and crisp.",Cavaliere,Michele Satta
"Ervamoira, one of the most remote of the Douro estates, produces this full, fruity 10-year-old tawny. It's already drinkable, and it offers almond, raisin and treacle flavors that are lifted by the acids. Drink now.",RP10 Quinta da Ervamoira Tawny 10 Years,Ramos-Pinto
"This is an elegant wine, with balanced fruit and tannins that make for a soft texture. It is rich and laced with fresh, raspberry-like acidity. It can age for another year, but it is also ready to drink.",Estate Bottled Vinho Tinto,Quinta do Casal Monteiro
"Despite starting off with some stalky-woody aromas and a healthy dash of hickory smoke, this wine turns fruity and approachable on the palate. Strawberry and cherry notes are accented by twig and herb touches, while the texture is supple and the finish is long. Drink now_2017.",,Wither Hills
"Made from fruit sourced from a parcel in Fourchaume, this fruity wine offers green fruit flavors that are cut by the minerally texture. It is crisp, taut and nervy, and it needs a few years to show its best.",Les Vaupulans Fourchaume Premier Cru,Domaine Vrignaud
"This Coda displays fresh and bright raspberry fruit. The acids come with a crisp snap, and there's an overall juiciness that makes it especially quaffable.",Coda,Cadence
"This white has a curvy character, with heady fruit and citrus aromas and an interplay of rich exotic fruit flavors and bright acidity. Balanced and original, this exhibits the fruit and mineral combination that Greek whites do so well.",,Estate Biblia Chora
"Alicante is making huge inroads in Tuscany. In the warm climate of central Italy this shows bright berry aromas, with touches of spice, leather, cola and menthol. The palate is bright, fresh and cleansing.",Querciolaia,Fattoria Mantellassi
"Dry and smoothly tannic, this wine is packed with complex blackberry-pie, currant, anise, herb and cedar flavors. This is nearly as good as the winery's more costly Walking Tree Vineyard Block Collection Cabernet, but it's just a little less concentrated.",,Geyser Peak
"Fresh and fragrant, this offers notes of apple, vanilla spice and lemon rind on the nose and palate. The palate of this Croatian white feels surprisingly voluptuous. Dry in style, with penetrating fruit flavors, this has lavish minerality on the midpalate that lends the finish a brisk, crisp feel.",,Grgi_ Vina
"There's a hint of violet perfume that permeates this dry yet honeyed wine. The palate is fruity, with abundant ripe cherry and grapefruit flavors, and layers of crushed chalk and stone lend a minerally complexity that builds on the midpalate.",Musar Jeune,Château Musar
"This workhorse vineyard supplies grapes to a wide variety of wines across the entire Ste. Michelle portfolio, but the vineyard-designated wines are much more limited, and they're often the best of show. As the alcohol reaches 15.5%, this selection is sappy, dense and a bit warm. There's plenty of fruit flavor and concentration, but it's difficult to pair such a blockbuster with food.",Cold Creek Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"This is a hard-edged wine, a typical trait of young Pommard. It has a firm, dry and tannic character, and the ripe, generous fruit sits underneath. Wait for at least five years for this wine to be ready.",Clos Blanc Premier Cru,Domaine A. Machard de Gramont
"A blend of Merlot, Malbec and Caberent Franc, this opens with enormous fruit purity, backed by luscious tones of oak spice and tobacco. The wine's two sensations__weet and savory__re well integrated. Fresh acidity and firm structure complete the mouthfeel.",Lenaia,Casa di Terra
"Toasted notes of almond and spice give this expression of Cabernet Sauvignon momentum and density. Blackberry, moist earth and tobacco aromas make up the generous bouquet.",Mazzaferrata,Marchesi Gondi
"Although this has a rustic edge, this is an attractive, ripe and red-fruited wine. It has a rich, jammy quality that combines with the dry tannins. The finish is dense and firm. Enjoy this now, or wait for three years.",Les Grandes Vignes Premier Cru,Jaffelin
"At first this wine seems quite astringent, closed and tight. It shows dark streaks of cassis and dried leaf, and it only reluctantly opens up to expand the black fruit flavor with a wash of Bourbon barrel.",,Januik
"Somehow, Mission Estate has managed to produce a prototypical Cabernet for a price that should leave consumers smiling. Cassis, tobacco and cedar notes pick up a mocha shading on the long, mouthwatering finish. It's a soft, supple wine that can be consumed over the next five years.",,Mission Estate
"This is a delicate but flavorful wine. It starts off with smoky, beet-like aromas, while the flavors are of pie cherries, with herb overtones. It's medium bodied, with a tart finish. Drink now_2018.",,Nautilus
"Ripe and rich in texture, this powerful Slovenian Cabernet balances a bold black-cherry flavor with loads of savory dried herb, graphite and reverberating acidity. There's a nervous quality about this wine that could smooth out with a good decant, or a few more years in a cellar.",,Movia
"This Mourvèdre has a pretty cherry flavor, with a suggestion of ripeness that borders on raisining. It also carries interesting details of dried leaf and milk chocolate.",Red Heaven Vineyard,Tapteil Vineyard
"Aromas of bresaola and baked cherry are backed by a fresh tone of blackberry. On the palate, this crisp, fresh blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Syrah and Merlot offers light spice and tobacco notes.",Poggio ai Ginepri,Tenuta Argentiera
"Inky black in hue, this wine is enormously tannic, which gives it a mouth-numbing astringency. Along with the structure, it has a gigantic, sweet-tasting core of blackberry jam and currant flavors, which breaks through the bitterness. Everything suggests ageability; it should mellow after 2015.",Karren Vineyard,Wellington
"Ripe and juicy, this has flavors of tangerine and tropical fruit, plus notes of creamy lees and smoky, sweet oak. It would feel heavy if not for the brisk acidity that provides balance and elegance.",Solomon Hills VIneyard,Vino V
"This blend is comprised of seven varieties that were sourced from nine vineyards. Despite a hint of green in the tannins and a bit of stem in the fruits, this shows good complexity. Streaks of earth, mineral and licorice mingle around notes of dried cherry and fig.",Washington State Cuvée,Walla Walla Vintners
"Although the winery is best known for top-flight aromatic whites, Spy Valley's Pinot Noir is steadily improving, and the 2011 is a notable success. Plummy fruit is accented by hints of toasty oak and damp moss, balanced by crisp acids and delivered on a soft, creamy palate. Ready to drink now, but the wine should also comfortably go another four years.",,Spy Valley
"Nottingham Cellars, which is known for producing wines from Bordeaux varieties, has produced its first set of whites in 2011. This Chardonnay is earthy, and it offers a crisp lemony character and hints of nut and pear.",,Nottingham Cellars
"This has a delicate citrus character and a tangy, minerally texture. The ripe fruits are balanced by acidity.",Les Champlains,Simon Bize
"A ripe, apple-flavored wine, this has a round feel that is pierced by crisp, citrusy acidity. Made from grapes that were sourced from the hills above Puligny-Montrachet, this is a generous selection, with yellow fruit flavors that are balanced by the refreshing, crisp finish.",Le Charmois Premier Cru,Roche de Bellene
"This is a smoky, fragrant wine that offers dense fruit and firm tannins. It has the structure of a fine Gevrey and the concentration of the vintage. This is classic and worth aging for 4_5 years.",Clos Prieur,Albert Bichot
"Full of both fruit and structure, this richly perfumed and spicy wine is impressive with solid tannins that are coming into balance with the rich black fruits. It still needs aging, so drink from 2018. The property is owned by a dedicated wine family that over the years tended the few remaining Malbec vines that survived phylloxera of late 1800s, were founders of the union to protect Cahors wines in the 1930s and helped revive the Confrérie des vins de Cahors. Alain Gayraud is the family's current owner.",Cuvée Particulière,Château Lamartine
"This is certainly powerful, maybe too much so. It has all the richness and density of ripe and perfumed Malbec, solid with structure, with dark plums and enormous concentration. It is 100% Malbec, aged in new French oak barrels, fulfilling the brand's theme of __ne family, one terroir, one grape._ No question, this is a wine to age. Drink from 2020.",Expression,Château Lamartine
"Larry Stanton patiently waits to release the wines he grows to very low yields in calcareous soils. The results are rich, in this case offering heavy, intoxicating aromas of kirsch, extracted cherries and a Bourbon-esque caramel element. Smoky tobacco and blackberry juice notes arises on the palate, with fresh laid asphalt flavors popping up on the finish.",La Terraza Bloc Reserve,Cerro Prieto
"The nose on this jet-black wine by vintner Carl Bowker is intoxicatingly appealing, with aromas of fresh blackberry jam, plum jelly, black pepper, black cardamom and allspice. It's rich and soft once sipped, unleashing an array of mission figs, black plums and black cherries, and gaining complexity thanks to graphite, black licorice, fudge and expresso.",,Caliza
"A blend of Sangiovese, Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon, this supple, delicious wine opens with aromas of blackberry, tilled soil, leather, vanilla and tobacco. The juicy palate doles out black cherry, fleshy plum, well-integrated oak and graphite. It's balanced with firm but fine-grained tannins and modest acidity. Drink through 2019.",Alte d'Altesi,Altesino
"Imperial is CVNE's most accessible and affordable top-end Rioja, and what a winner it is in 2010. Cool, toasty aromas show sweet maple and vanilla notes along with berry and cassis scents. Fresh but weighty and elegant, this deals ripe berry and loamy earth flavors in front of a mellow finish that's clean and not too demanding. Drink now through 2022.",Imperial Reserva,CVNE
"This blend combines 64% Merlot with 34% Cabernet Franc and 2% Cabernet Sauvignon to nice effect, offering cranberry and red, juicy plum around softly cradled tannins and well-resolved oak. Juicy, structured and fully balanced, the finish sparks elements of leather with tobacco.",Illustration,Blackbird Vineyards
"This cellar-worthy treasure has attention-grabbing spice, leather and smoky oak aromas. Ripe fruit flavors are heavily shaded with undeniably delicious accents of cedar and chocolate. It is bold in flavor, full in body and quite tannic in texture. Hold until at least 2018; the wine should improve even more after that.",,Hoopes
"This is a lovely wine, with flavors both rich and racy__ool minerality meets ripe lemon/lime, with a dollop of creamy custard. It's mouthfilling and smooth, with lingering, delicious flavors that resonate beautifully.",Durant Vineyard,Matello
"Two years of aging on the lees renders incredible textural dimension to this decadently silky dry Riesling. Fresh white grapefruit, lime and lemon notes shine on the palate, offsetting expansive mouthfeel, with acidity that's focused and precise. Stunning already, but should evolve dramatically through 2025.",Erdener Prälat GG Reserve Alte Reben Trocken,Dr. Loosen
"Made entirely with Sangiovese, this offers aromas of blue flowers and wild berries. The firm palate delivers black cherry, black raspberry, white pepper and clove while a note of orange zest lifts up the finish. Firm, fine-grained tannins deftly support the juicy flavors. Drink 2016_2020.",Perlato del Bosco,Tua Rita
"The fifth vintage from this cool site near Annapolis, the wine is spicy, creamy and on the fuller-bodied end of the spectrum, aromatically rich in baked strawberry and raspberry. Resolved tannins and integrated oak make for a seamless experience, the wine clean, composed and crisp on the finish.",Ridgetop Vineyard,Sojourn
"You'll find aromas of red and black berry, grilled sage, cedar and tobacco on this vibrant, elegantly structured blend of 70% Cabernet Sauvignon and 30% Merlot. The polished palate delivers red currants, black raspberries, white pepper and clove alongside firm, fine-grained tannins and fresh acidity. Drink 2016_2022.",,Petra
"Blackberry-laced chocolate syrup, black cherry extract, freshly tanned leather and sweet tobacco leaf join forces to power a remarkable wine from this winery near San Miguel, where the owning family first planted vines in 1997. The palate shows black olives, leather, tobacco, clove, black cardamom and dried black cherries, all held together by solid tannic grip.",,Pianetta
"Powerful and tannic, this is a brooding wine that will need many years aging. It is powered by its dry core, with the structured red plum skin flavors adding to the sense of concentration. Drink from 2018.",Dona Isabel Juliana,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"All types of tea, from black to nettle to Greek mountain to chamomile, show on this wine's herbally powered nose, with bits of sagebrush and wild berries thrown in for good measure. Tea elements also power the palate, along with cranberry fruit and raspberry leaf, held together with grippy tannins, at least for this grape",Cargasacchi Vineyard,Siduri
"Penetrating flavors of preserved peach and honey are nuanced by layers of saffron, pollen and high-toned acidity in this sun-kissed auslese. It's delicate in body, yet concentrated in flavor and ripples of sweet nectar seem to amble endlessly on the finish. Gorgeous now, but should develop well for decades to come.",Graacher Himmelreich Auslese Gold Cap,Joh. Jos. Prüm
"While dry in style, this effusively blossomy, peach-driven Riesling is chock full of ripe, honeyed fruit flavors. Soft tangerine acidity cuts through the lushness on the midpalate, aided by a sheen of minerals and bristling white-tea tannins.",Hochheimer Domdechaney Trocken GG Erste Lage,Domdechant Werner
"Rotier's top wine is an impressive, wood-aged example of how good red Gaillac can be. This spicy, black-fruited wine is packed with dark cherries, plums and dusty tannins. It needs to age even more, so drink this solid, long-lasting wine from 2018.",Renaissance,Domaine Rotier
"Sunny tangerine acidity showers over plump honeydew and yellow plums in this lip-smacking, opulent spätlese. Refreshing grapefruit and green floral notes kiss the long, lingering finish. It's youthful exuberance shines, but it's likely to mature elegantly till at least 2025.",Felseneck Spätlese,Prinz Salm
"This lip-smackingly complex, pure varietal wine from a prime Napa Valley location is awash in floral chewing tobacco and roasted coffee aromas. These expand on the palate into cedar and black currant, remaining softly alluring through a base of power. Decant or cellar through 2020_2022.",G3 Beckstoffer Vineyard Georges III,12C Wines
"Always in the top rank of Oregon Chardonnays, the Sigrid expresses itself with voluptuously ripe fruits, a generous mix of apples, peaches and pears. The barrel regimen holds nothing back either, sending a tsunami of baking spices, buttered nuts and toasted biscuit flavors across and through the palate.",Sigrid,Bergström
"Like the rest of the 2012 Condrieus recently tasted, this is full-bodied and rich without being overdone. Apricot and ginger aromas lead into flavors reminiscent of honeycomb, white pepper and apricot. The texture is slightly oily, but that's balanced on the finish by peppery spice.",La Combe de Malleval,Michel & Stéphane Ogier
"The nose of this light-footed Riesling is demure, showing whiffs of lemon and crushed stone. Yet on the palate, preserved rose petal and cherry blossom notes seem to explode, mingling into crisp grapefruit and honeydew flavors. Effusive yet elegant, it's a stunning dry Riesling with dramatic build and complexity.",Hochheimer Kirchenstück Trocken GG Erste Lage,Domdechant Werner
"Made entirely from Cabernet Franc, this full-bodied wine opens with aromas of mature red berry, exotic spice and a whiff of purple flowers. The elegantly structured palate doles out juicy red currants, crushed raspberries, clove, cinnamon and licorice alongside firm, silky tannins. A tobacco note signals the close. Drink through 2021.",Lavinia Maria,Tenuta Argentiera
"An estate wine from an elevated elevation, this opens in fragrant red cherry and vanilla, with a subtle trace of brambly blackberry. Soft, it features a supple mouthfeel, medium weight and a backbone of structure, earthy and enticing. Easily enjoyable now, it should take on added complexity through 2022.",Hillside Reserve,Flora Springs
"This wine explodes with a glorious mix of buttered nuts, toast, ripe yellow fruits and supporting acidity. The exceptional length proposes at least a decade of development ahead. Drink now through 2025.",,Irvine Family Vineyards
"Made entirely with Merlot, this full-bodied wine opens with aromas of ripe berry, coffee, vanilla, exotic spice and a whiff of grilled herb. The concentrated palate doles out fleshy black cherries, juicy raspberries licorice, chocolate and tobacco, while velvety tannins provide the framework. A note of dried sage closes the finish. It's already approachable but will continue to age well for several years or more. Drink through 2023.",Messorio,Le Macchiole
"Aged 100% in new wood, this is a wine produced as a joint venture between California vintner Paul Hobbs and Cahors producer Bertrand Vigouroux. It is a major, powerful statement, rich and dense. The texture smoothes out the natural structure of Cahors Malbec to give a silky wine, the tannins in suspension in the black plum fruits. It will be better from 2017.",Crocus Grand Vin,Paul Bertrand
"Ripe raspberry juice is spiced heavily with cloves rendered in butter and flashes of black pepper on this wine by Adam Lee. It's fresh and flavorful on the powerful palate, with lots of black spice, vibrant berry juice and fresh thyme on the edges. This wine is alive with energy and verve.",Clos Pepe Vineyard,Siduri
"A new effort from Long Shadows, Dance spent 15 months in French oak and shows it. Broad and smoky, it's a rich, generous, ready-to-drink wine, with just a tiny bit of unoaked 2011 wine in the blend for added lift and freshness.",,Dance
"Here's a bright, food-friendly bottling that offers raspberry, cherry and light spice aromas. The mouthful is lean and compact, and the wine shows a zesty vein of fresh acidity on the close.",,Fanti
"This intense, dry, and fruity wine is packed with citrus flavor and laced with a lime zest texture. The wine is crisp, tangy and flavorful.",,André Kientzler
"This shows the intense mountain flavors of previous releases, with dense flavors of blackberry, cherry and currant, and plenty of smoky oak. The tannins are dense but negotiable. There's a sharpness throughout that may its limit ageability.",Ami's Vineyard,Bella Vetta
"A medicinal cherry aroma is solid despite its suggestion of plastic or latex. The mouthfeel is lively and edgy, offering raw tannins. Flavors of strawberry, plum and spice end in swirls of vanilla and cream. For a fresh, traditional Rioja, this is pretty good.",Viña Pomal Crianza,Bodegas Bilbainas
"This is initially dark and earthy, with brandied cherry, leather and tobacco aromas. It feels complete and offers core acids to keep it feeling fresh. Flavors of black fruit and spice lead to a lasting finish with cola and cherry notes.",Glorioso Gran Reserva,Bodegas Palacio
"This is a firmly structured wine, but its black cherry flavor is marred by banana sweetness. Otherwise the wine is solid and tannic, with light acidity on the finish. Age for a year.",Domaine Javernière,Georges Duboeuf
"This is relatively light in color, as befits a grape supposedly related to Pinot Noir. It has a red fruit flavor and a juicy character, balanced by almond and bitter cherry-stone flavors. It's not a wine for aging. Screwcap.",,Höpler
"Rich, soft and spicy, here is a warm, now-mature style of Pinot Gris. Its ripe melon and peach flavors complement the lychee note. There is a touch of pepper that gives an edge to this rounded wine.",Tradition,Hugel
"This is a salmon-pink-colored wine. On the dry side, it has a raspberry flavor and tight acidity. It has a fine, crisp character, and is fruity and lively. A wine to drink as an apéritif or with food.",Brut Premier Cru Premium Rosé,J. Dumangin Fils
"This blend of 43% Merlot, 27% Petit Verdot, 22% Cabernet Franc and 8% Malbec continues King Family's spate of solid releases. The aromas are rich but restrained, showing layers of curry powder and dried basil, with notes of spiced blueberry compote and blackberry. The full-bodied palate kicks into overdrive, with intense flavors of black fruit and dried rose that fill in the soft core, but the tannic framework keeps them from seeming effusive.",Meritage Unfiltered Merlot-Petit Verdot-Cabernet Franc-Malbec,King Family
"While it is certainly sweet, this also shows a fine, delicate texture, with red currant, plum and honey flavors. This is a wine to drink by itself after a meal.",Auslese,Kracher
"With its dry earthiness, this is classic Jordan. It shows blackberry and black cherry flavors, with an herb note. The tannins are gentle. It will age for years, softening and gaining earthy complexities.",,Jordan
"There's lots to admire about this Cabernet. For one, it's dry and controlled, with blackberry, cassis and chocolate flavors that are balanced with earthiness. It's also very tannic, although the soft acidity makes it drinkable now.",,Veedercrest
"Vanilla and cookie crumb notes add a sweet, toasty flair to the sour cherry flavor on this bright, nervy red. The palate is tart, tangy and refreshingly tasty, with soft, chalky tannins that linger on the finish.",Izbrani,_toka
"This is like a sparking Shiraz from Australia. It's pretty much as dark in color as a red wine, with a full body and a raspberry pie flavor. The palate is a little bit scouring and sweet, along with the classic yeastiness of a sparkling wine.",Rouge de Noirs,Schug
"Bold berry aromas charge forth in a clean, pointed fashion. This feels firm and solid, with no obvious flaws and a dark flavor of blackberry that's offset by notes of rooty licorice and sweet brown sugar. Lengthy and fresh on the finish.",Roble,Toriles
"This smooth, rounded Pinot Gris has just the right spice, acidity and warm, rich texture. Drink now for both freshness and richness.",Réserve,Trimbach
"Fine and dry, this has varietal flavors of blackberry, black currant, cocoa and toasty oak. The texture is a bit uneven, and the wine is unlikely to age away its wrinkles, but it's still a pretty fancy Napa Valley Cabernet.",Estate,St. Supéry
"This has that distinctive diesel-fuel aroma often associated with Riesling; while that aroma is atypical of Grenache Blanc, this remains a successful wine. Bone dry, bright in acidity and mineral-driven, it shows a citrus flavor, in addition to that petrol note.",Camp 4 Vineyard,Tercero
"This tastes and feels a little gritty, with dry tannins. There's something old-fashioned about it, in an era of lush, sweet Cabernetss that appeal in their youth. A rich core of blackberry and black currant suggests that time in the cellar will be rewarded. Hold until 2017 or so.",,Stags' Leap Winery
"This full-bodied blend of 65% Sauvignon Blanc and 35% Sémillon doesn't try to hide its Sémillon's boldness. Tasting of lemon, vanilla and ripe peach, this is a combinaton of feminine aromatics and masculine textures, making it exotically intriguing.",Lola Ghielmetti Vineyard,Steven Kent
"This Chardonnay emphasizes structural elegance and mineral-driven acidity, rather than opulence, although you'll find good citrus and tropical fruit flavors. With a dry finish, it's a fine Chardonnay to drink with chicken, ham, salmon or pork, or a nice dish of buttery pasta with peas and Parmesan.",,Bargetto
"This is a hugely rich wine, very concentrated, yet with a light touch of acidity that gives it some crispness. It is on the dry side, though with some sweetness that comes through on the soft, rounded finish.",,André Kientzler
"This is a soft, rounded wine that has ripe tropical fruit, lychee and mango notes, accompanied by just enough acidity. While it is fruity, a more mature character is beginning to show.",Steinklotz Grand Cru,Helfrich
"In the dry Léon Beyer style, this is a dense, spice and lychee-flavored wine. It has richness, elegance and a deliciously pure acidity that cuts the ripeness.",,Leon Beyer
"This smooth, vanilla- and apricot-flavored wine is round and fruity. It is generous and full bodied, with ripe fruit that's balanced by rich acidity. Fine, warm and opulent.",Réserve,Domaine Fernand Engel
"This sparkler is 100% Chardonnay and is clearly the star of the Domaine Ste. Michelle lineup. Generously toasty, with the sort of finesse found in Champagne. The fruit is not as ostentatious as in most California bubblies, which gives it a more European mouthfeel.",Luxe,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"This is a bit sweeter than the blanc de blancs, with the addition of 12% Pinot Noir to the cuvée. Nice focus, density and length.",Brut,Domaine Ste. Michelle
"This dry Pinot Gris relies on its richness for power and concentration. From the steep, hillside Schlumberger Vineyards, this is dense and spicy; its acidity and minerality are essential to its character. Age for a year, or drink now.",Les Princes Abbés,Domaines Schlumberger
"Bracing and tightly wound, this opens with subdued aromas of pressed rose, resin and a whiff of exotic spice. The evolved palate isn't in sync with the nose, offering raisin and a touch of anise as well as aggressive, astringent tannins that give it an abrupt, raspy finish. It's already drying out so drink now.",Roggeri Riserva,Ciabot Berton
"This is a full, ripe Champagne with a lightly mineral texture. It comes from the northern end of the Montagne de Reims, giving dominance to Pinot Noir. It is a food-style of Champagne, with its dry texture and almond and citric flavors.",Premier Cru Brut,Aubry
"Blending Sauvignon Blanc with Chardonnay allows this wine to be broad, ripe and gently textured. Still young, it is bone dry, crisp with citrus and rounded with almonds and white fruits. The wine needs a few more months, so drink from mid-2016.",,Benoît Daridan
"Apple blossoms perfume pristine lemon, lime and tangerine in this invigorating off-dry Riesling. Vivacious and brisk, it's uncomplicated yet refreshingly thirst quenching. Drink now.",Off-Dry,Bischöfliche Weingüter Trier
"A full ripe and refreshingly fruity wine, this is full of grapefruit, apricot and ripe pear flavors. It has a touch of spice and a firmly mineral character. Drink now.",Vinha do Putto Branco,Campolargo
"Blossomy and perfumed, this white wine made from red Pinot Noir grapes exudes much of the variety's smoky floral flair against the backdrop of a crisp, refreshing white wine. The palate is concentrated in pressed apple and pear notes that finish briskly. Drink now.",Blanc de Noirs Rüdesheim Trocken,Carl Ehrhard
"A smooth and ripe rosé from Touriga Nacional and Tinta Roriz, this is a cherry and red berry flavored wine. It has weight and a rich texture that are balanced by the crisp raspberry and fresh apple brightness at the end. Drinkble beginning now.",O Brazileiro,Casa da Passarella
"This slowly reveals aromas of pressed rose, star anise, ripe berry and a menthol note. On the firm, straightforward palate, hints of licorice and clove add interest to dried black cherry. Give the bracing tannins a few more years to unclench and then drink up to capture the remaining fruit.",,Collina San Ponzio
"The grapes were farmed biodynamically, fermented with wild yeasts, and just two barrels were aged in new oak. The stiff berry fruit is cloaked in details of stem and earth, tart acids and a whiff of compost.",Johan Vineyards,Day
"Vanilla and bitter peach-pit aromas open this blend of 70% Garnacha Blanca with 30% Viognier. In the mouth, this is round, with healthy acidity. Waxy melony flavors are further softened by lees and vanilla notes, while the finish is creamy and a touch flat.",Via Edetana,Edet_ria
"This off-dry Gewürztraminer opens with a powerful bouquet of bergamot, violet and rose perfume that seeps into the palate. The aromatics are a bit overwhelming, but bright tangerine flavors stand up well. It's a light-footed wine that finishes briskly.",Spätlese,Fitz-Ritter
"Kiwi, peach and pineapple mark this blend of 93% Sauvignon Blanc and 7% Sémillon, providing a tropical character and personality. Medium in body and weight, it finishes moderately influenced by oak and a touch of vanilla cream.",,Heritance
Ripe butterscotch and a notable flank of big vanilla and oak greet the entry of this vineyard-designate. It makes for a luxurious wine reflective of a warm vintage and approach.,La Cruz Vineyard,Keller
"Aromas of cedary oak, vanilla and spiced berry fruits are encouraging. In the mouth, however, this old-vines Malbec is jumpy and rubbery, with high acidity. Flavors of stalky red plum taste mildly oxidized and Sherried, while the finish is herbal and tastes burnt. All in all, this just doesn't fully come together.",Primeras Viñas,Lagarde
"Clean apple, crisp pear and fresh yellow pluot aromas are lifted even more by stony chalkiness on this wine's nicely balanced nose. The palate is ripe with Japanese pear flesh and Anjou pear skins, yet the edges are bursting with tart lime, kumquat and green apple-skin flavors.",,Lion Ranch
"Whimsically feline packaging aside, this fruity and forward Pinot Grigio does a good job balancing bright luscious stone fruit against refreshing lemon-lime acidity. It's an easygoing, widely appealing dry white at a bargain price. Drink now.",,Lucky Neko
"This wine shows smooth red fruit that is light and generic, with modest weight and an earthy flavor. The wine spent a bit of time in 25% new oak, though it doesn't show up in the flavors.",The Attaché,Maison L'Envoyé
"Aromas of espresso, French oak, blackberry and exotic spice lead the way. The firm palate offers raw black cherry, coconut and oak-driven spice alongside racy acidity and fine-grained tannins. It closes on a note of roasted coffee bean.",Peiregal,Marchesi di Barolo
"This is a solid Verdejo with stony aromas of citrus fruits, grapefruit in particular. A palate with citric acidity creates a fresh platform for orange and grapefruit flavors. A round plump finish with briny citrus flavors is a good ending.",,Marqués de Irún
"Floral leesy aromas of chunky stone fruits and citrus come with a green note of lettuce leaf. This feels round and a touch oily, while briny mildly bitter flavors of citrus finish pithy.",Pazo Barrantes,Marqués de Murrieta
Touches of autumn leaves and dried herbs lend a savory feel to this dry and tightly composed Riesling. Bracing acidity and savory apple and pear flavors mark the palate.,Gutsriesling Dry,Mathern
"Fresh cantaloupe aromas, mouth-filling pear and peach flavors and a generous texture make this an extroverted wine that could make a great pairing with salty cheeses. It is full bodied, very smooth-textured and long on the finish, where honey and vanilla flavors echo.",,McManis
"This medium-bodied, understated wine has a rather light red color with brown undertones. It offers subtle earthy and smoky aromas, tart fruit flavors like cranberries, and an appropriately tannic texture. While its flavors are subtle, the balance is great and this wine stayed fresh for three days after opening.",,Noceto
"The barrel speaks loudly here, fortressing deep, full-bodied layers of vanilla, tropical guava and pineapple. Creamy and textured, it finishes in more vanilla.",,Orogeny
"Taut, young and laced with accents of bitter greens, the fruit is peppery and sharp, with plenty of backing acidity. Tannins are proportionate and well managed, while the finish is short, showing mostly acid and herbal components.",Winemaker's Cuvée,Panther Creek
This is a honeyed wine that retains fruitiness while having a rich character. The spirit used in fortifying it gives the wine a burnt vanilla flavor that is balanced with ripe apricots and fresh final acidity. It is bottled to be drunk immediately.,Abafado 5 years,Quinta da Alorna
"The fruit elements of black currant and black plum are cut by rotting roses, wet earth and other dank aromas on this bottling. There is a chalky grip right away on the sip, with the flavors holding to a rocky core. The structure is quite dense and wound up right now, so the wine needs some time to open up.",Reserve,Rotta
"Freshly snipped thyme and bramble notes are prominent, yet unobtrusive against a backdrop of honey-kissed lemon and lime in this brisk off-dry Riesling. It's a zesty sprightly wine to drink young.",Relax,Schmitt Söhne
"Fresh, forward and fruity, this brings light strawberry fruit and streaks of root beer. It's tasty and quaffable, though done in a lighter style.",,Sweet Cheeks
"Medium bodied and firm textured, this has smoke and white pepper aromas, rich tomato and plum flavors, and light herbal accents. It offers moderate tannins and a smooth mouthfeel, with a bit of tannic bite.",,Terra d'Oro
"The nose on this dry Gewürztraminer is a tad savory with hints of smoke and earth. By contrast, the palate is lavish with pink grapefruit and lychee flavors and a bright, fresh tangerine acidity. Nicely balanced in body and alcohol.",Dry,Wagner
"Aromas of tropical pineapple and lemon are buried somewhat in this mid-weight wine. Nimble in acidity and straightforward in flavor, it finishes a tad abruptly.",Gold Collection,Michel-Schlumberger
"Creamy and nutty, this wine offers ample herbaceous qualities around muted melon and citrus, finishing with ample lift and refreshment.",,Novy
"Whiffs of apple, pear and lemon scent this dry, delicately structured Riesling. It's brisk and sprightly on the palate, with flavorful streaks of lemon and melon that stretch out the finish, ending on a slightly savory mineral tone.",Dry,Lakewood
"Aromas of rubber band, smoky berry and plum come with herbal, rustic overtones. This feels grabby and tannic, while punchy acidity releases angular black-fruit flavors. A roasted, meaty tasting finish brings the heat and feels aggressive.",Roble,Vecordia
"Rusticity goes a smidge too far here, without fruit that can handle the harsh tannins. It opens nicely, with pretty berry and cherry highlights, but in the mouth it gets chewy and finishes rough.",Gunkel Vineyard Reserve,Jacob Williams
"Suddenly Washington vintners are awash in Chardonnay, many value priced such as this new one from Airfield Estates' Lone Birch project. Clean and simple, it's got moderately ripe apple flavors and no faux oak.",,Lone Birch
"The acidity is most obvious at this stage of the wine's development. It does have structure, but it feels cool and tight. A green edge at the back adds to the cool character.",Le Vaucrain,Louis Jadot
"Savory tones of pressed apple and pear contrast with pretty orange-blossom aromas on this unusually light-footed Chardonnay. A blend of equal parts oak and stainless-steel ferment, it's concentrated with pear and lemon flavors. Finishes a bit short.",Unfined & Unfiltered,Bloomer Creek
"Sharp and a bit disjointed, this is an uneasy mix of sweet strawberry fruit and stemmy tannins. The Tempranillo is blended with 25% Cabernet Franc.",,Cave B
"Black cherry, cooked fig and prune fruit flavors are set in thick tannins. There's a bitter character similar to dark roasted espresso.",XXVI,Cave B
"Scents of freshly-pressed apple waft from this crisp, easy-drinking Riesling. Refreshingly light on its feet, with sprightly lemon and lime acidity, it finishes moderately long with delicate apple and pear flavors.",Dry,Lucas Vineyards
"This smells and tastes ripe and rustic. Earthy, mulchy aromas of leathery berry fruits are telling. The palate weighs in heavy and syrupy in feel, while flavors of stalky blackberry and plum come with coffee, bitter chocolate and earthy, herbal notes.",Manon,Mano A Mano
"The aromas on this bottling from just outside the coastal town of Cambria start with slightly boozy vanilla and caramel-corn characters, followed by a bit of salinity and tart green apple. Once sipped, the alcohol heat continues, along with buttered popcorn, green apple and a tad of bitterness too. Serve with chicken or tuna salad.",Stolo Family Vineyards Creekside,Stolo
It's well-suited for supplying a big party where there are lots of different tastes to please. A soft texture and almost sweet butter and apple flavors make this a light confection.,,Twin Arches
"This starts with concentrated boysenberry and raspberry fruit, but in the mouth some off-flavors intrude. The fruit is close to raisined, and the finish carries a hint of plastic. Two bottles tasted, consistent results.",Reserve,Woodinville Wine Cellars
"Floral aromas and tropical scents are a touch heavy and oily. This blend of Viura and Chardonnay is citrusy in the mouth, with little variation on that theme. Tangerine, orange and tart nectarine flavors finish bright and juicy.",Estate Bottled Viura-Chardonnay,Ochoa
"An herbaceous undercurrent gives this fresh white character. Along with a touch of mint and fresh herb, there's a wave of floral aroma. On the palate, it's fruity and feminine. A fun everyday white.",Mono,Tsantali
"Savory tones of pressed apples and pears build in spice and concentration on the palate of this Chardonnay, layered in decadent swathes of caramel and cream. It's rich and round in mouthfeel with bold alcohol and body, but balanced with lemony acidity on the finish.",Barrel Fermented,King's Garden Vineyards
"Grippy, it has power and loads of chocolaty pepper, jammy blackberry and strawberry fruit, and a dull, toasty finish.",,Pezzi King
"Here's a simple and fruity Nero d'Avola that offers fleeting blackberry and tart red-cherry flavors alongside fresh acidity. Pair this with pizza or with other everyday, informal meals.",L'Asispadi,Privitera
"Hints of smoke and nut lend a savory tone to fresh pear and yellow peach on this dry, full-bodied Riesling. Textured and expansive on the palate, it's brightened by a splash of white-grapefruit acidity. Finishes moderately long.",Dry,Rooster Hill
"Here's an informal sparkler made with the Aglianico grape. The simple, fresh palate offers crunchy cherry, strawberry and pink grapefruit alongside bright acidity and vigorous, aggressive bubbles.",Jacarando Rosé Extra Brut,Sanpaolo
"Earth, smoke and herb tones accent aromas of red berries and cherries on this tart, delicately-framed Bordeaux-style blend. A high proportion of Cabernet Franc lends an herbal, brambly tone to crisp cranberry and sour cherry flavors. Finishes moderately long.",Blackbird,Silver Thread
Puckery lemon-lime acidity is a bright contrast to sweet honey tones on this medium-dry Riesling. Shades of dusty minerals lend a savory tone to ruddy apple and pear flavors on the palate.,,Swedish Hill
"Made from a blend of native grapes Insolia and Grecanico, this is a light-bodied but refreshing wine that recalls lemon zest, peach and green apple. Fresh acidity gives it a clean, bright finish. Pair this with vegetarian appetizers.",Bianco,Corvo
"This very fruity wine has light acidity and a fresh, crisp character. It doesn't have great depth, but is attractive now.",Clos Reyssie,Dominique Cornin
"Big and fruity, this wine is broad but without great definition. It offers weight, soft apple fruits and light acidity. Drink now.",,Georges Duboeuf
"This spritzy, sweet wine could serve well as a mixer for many hot weather punch drinks.",,Girly Girl
"The weak nose offers a bit of sour cherry, raspberry and menthol, but just barely. On the palate, there are rounded red fruit flavors and a light earthiness, but again just faint. That said, it does pair nicely with meatloaf or, assuredly, the Hitching Post restaurant's grilled artichoke.",Hitching Post St. Rita's Earth,Hartley-Ostini
"Tim Stevens showcases Yakima Valley terroir as well as any winemaker in the state. This is sourced from the DuBrul and Meek vineyards, and it is remarkably complex, though still tight and tart. The dark fruits are highlighted with toast and baking spices, along with clove and ginger. Look for this to be a 10+ year Merlot.",,Stevens
"The village of Gamlitz is dominated by the Kranachberg vineyard. The example from Sattlerhof shows the natural tropical richness from the warm soils. There is a herbal character to go with the more spicy, fruity. A mineral texture at the end gives bite. Glass stopper.",Kranachberg,Sattlerhof
"Spicy and still showing some youthful sharpness, this pure Merlot is loaded with penetrating raspberry fruit, juicy and tart. The mouth-cleaning acidity both sharpens the palate and intensifies the flavors, and leads into a finish dotted with super dark chocolate.",,Reininger
"Intensely perfumed with notes of violet petals, potpourri and herbs, this is a stunning, elegant Riesling that's also powerfully structured on the palate. It's intensely ripe with stonefruit, but quite dry in style with reverberating lime-juice acidity and a deliciously astringent lime-pith note on the finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr GG Trocken,Dr. Loosen
"Now developing into an impressive, maturing wine, this is rich and complex. It has well integrated tannins that bring out sweet acidity, spice and finely lightly roasted coffee. Ready to drink, it should certainly keep for at least six years and probably more.",,Château Laroque
"The extra year gives this wine quite different flavors from the forward fruitiness of Provence rosé. It now has a richer, more complex character and weight of ripe fruit, caramel and vanilla flavors. This is a serious, food friendly rosé.",Les Clans,Château d'Esclans
"There is just a touch of smokiness in this rich, full wine that's definitely made for food. There are red plums, some tannic texture as well as citrus and final crisp, fresh acidity.",Sélection Parcellaire,Château Gassier
"This is a cool-climate Chardonnay that's dark gold in color and tastes of ripe apple. From both the Ferrington and Savoy Vineyards, two of Anderson Valley's finest, it shows the greatness of the vintage in coastal Mendocino. Fragrant and rich in honey and toasty notes, it finishes crisp. Crab cakes with it would be ideal.",,Breggo
"They could make anything into dessert wine in Burgenland, even Pinot Noir. And this bright gold colored wine is a great success, combining the sweetness and intense acidity with just the lightest touch of tannin. Age this wine for a few more years.",Eiswein,Höpler
"Scents of tangerine peel and lanolin add a spicy complexity to intensely fruity, sweet peach and nectarine flavors on this gorgeously honeyed, yet easy-drinking Riesling. Striking lemon acidity and crushed stone notes add delicacy and nuance to the finish.",_rziger Würzgarten Auslese,Markus Molitor
"Sadly, this is the last vintage for this Klipsun vineyard-sourced Sauvignon Blanc. It's a fine send-off, a buttery, caramel-soaked take on the grape, with rich fruit flavors of Meyer lemon and light tropical. A deep and damaging freeze cut the crop by more than 80%, and the vines have been pulled.",AFinalThought,Stevens
"Luscious and opulent, this Essenz is the purest elixir. It has a rich texture, unctuous and smooth, the honey flavors laced with intense acidity. The wine tastes delicious now but all that acidity will allow it to age many years.",Trockenbeerenauslese Essenz,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"Dark, robust and earthy, with  a pronounced smell and taste of caramel, this Tempranillo develops in lovely ways in the glass, so let it breathe. Its earthy character hints at dust, and the wine is soft, light and smooth. Enjoy with paella or grilled seafood.",Reserve,Six Sigma Ranch
"With 20% Petite Sirah blended in, Andis's Barbera is juicy, balanced and perfumey. It's a beautiful wine with cranberry, vanilla and cherry aromas and flavors. Pair with your favorite pasta, pizza or grilled meats.",Cooper Ranch,Andis
"With moderate alcohol, this Pinot is silky and delicate in the mouth, with excellent acidity. Yet it's intense in sunshiney-ripe raspberries and cherries, as well as a hint of mushrooms that will become more pronounced with age. Defines the lighter style of California Pinot, in a gracious, elegant style.",Winery Block Estate,Balletto
"Juicy and dark with layers of boysenberry and blackberry fruit, with high tones of tar and brick, Cedarville's estate-grown Zin comes to life in decomposed granite soils, giving the wine a satisfying and sultry profile. Enjoy this Zin in good time (3_5 years) and pair with dark, smoky meats.",Estate,Cedarville Vineyard
"The fuller rosé of the two made at Les Valentines, this is rich, balanced and dense in character. That makes it a serious wine, its acidity finely integrated into the red plum and orange zest flavors. It's a perfect food rosé.",,Château les Valentines
"This is one of the most beautiful Sauvignons made in Italy. The cool mountainous climate of the Dolomites has shaped a fragrant and elegant wine with tons of exotic fruit, white pepper, dried sage and tangerine. There's a touch of roundness in the mouth that gives it extra staying power.",Sanct Valentin,Cantina Produttori San Michele Appiano
"Ripe and weighty, this is a rich wine from the Pfaffenberg vineyard in Krems. It has spice as well as perfumed white fruits, a sense of structure and concentration. It feels warm with peach and white fruit flavors likely to develop along with acidity over the next 3_4 years.",Ried Pfaffenberg Steiner Selection,Emmerich Knoll
"Hints of spice and pollen add dimension to ripe peach, apple and honey notes on this decadent but composed Riesling. It's lip-smackingly sweet on the attack, but sharp, steely acidity and hints of tea leaf extend long on the finish.",Rüdesheimer Berg Rottland Auslese,Dr. Nägler
"Wallywood is a Rhône-style red, with two thirds Syrah, while Grenache, Mourvèdre and Petite Sirah fill in the rest. It surprises with its elegance, despite hefty alcohol and tannic components. It's a very well-done blend, melding together flavors of plum, berry, herb, stem, earth and iron.",Wallywood,Dusted Valley
"Neither oak aging nor malolactic fermentation was used here, hence the name. But far from madness, this wine is sleek, sensual, skillful and seductive. Crisp acidity, lemony minerality, an overriding freshness and excellent depth of flavor all combine to create a wine that seems to be more than the sum of its parts. Shellfish, light seafood, poultry and even pork dishes would be fine matches.",Cuvée Lunatique,J. Christopher
"This is a beautiful Syrah that's dry and full bodied, with dense, concentrated blackberry, cassis, smoked meat and cracked black pepper flavors. It's really gorgeous, but very young, with hard tannins. Give it up to six years in the cellar, before the fruit starts to fade away.",Soberanes Vineyard,Lucia
"This is delicious, as Longoria's wines tend to be. It's dry and full bodied, and shows the firm tannins of a cool-climate Syrah. Yet it's also jam packed with blackberry, cassis, anise and dark chocolate richness. Really nice now, especially a great steak with some mushroomy additions.",Alisos Vineyard,Longoria
"This is an elegant Syrah, blended with 18% Mourvèdre and topped with a splash of Grenache. Good phenolic ripeness along with substantial sugars lead into flavors that have melded nicely. Berry, truffle, chocolate, leather, pepper and coffee are all in the mix, and the mid-palate is delicious. Only a fairly quick fade keeps the score from climbing even higher.",Amerique,McCrea Cellars
"A very fine Cabernet, showing the soft tannins and herbaceousness of many Sonoma County Cabs. At the same time, there's a sweet streak of blackberry jam and mocha. Feels fine and and balanced in the mouth, with brisk tannins and a long, complex finish. One of the better Dry Creek Cabs out there, it will provide good drinking over the next 5_6 years.",Watchtower Vineyard Estate,Gustafson Family
"A single vineyard wine with the typical spice and richness of Rotgipfler, a rare grape found only in Thermenregion, south of Vienna. Just off dry, so soft and warm in character, it has ripe pear, lychee and kiwi fruit flavors. Ready to drink, or age another year or two.",Satzing,Johanneshof Reinisch
"This rich, dark and earthy wine is pure Cabernet Sauvignon, done well and designed to appeal to those who favor dark barrel flavors along with their ripe fruit. Here, the flavors begins at licorice and runs through espresso, cacao and a finish of lightly charred tannins.",Reserve,Nodland
"This weighty, structured, dark-colored blend of Syrah, Carignan, Carmenère and Petit Verdot pours on the berry, vanilla and baking spice aromas. The mouthfeel is full, with a lot to savor, especially toasty, typically Chilean flavors of olive, herbs and berry fruits. A spicy, dry, harmonious finish closes the show. Drink now through 2015.",The Lost Barrel,Oveja Negra
"This Sauvignon Blanc impresses for subtle elegance. It's not the biggest or the fruitiest, doesn't dazzle with richness, and doesn't club you over the head with oak. Instead, it offers dryness, crisp acidity and tart green apple, lemongrass, cream and vanilla flavors.",,Rochioli
"This represents a debut vintage from a brand new estate in a little-known corner of southern Tuscany made with consultant Michel Rolland. The blend is Cabernet Sauvignon, Cabernet Franc, Merlot and Petit Verdot and the results are savory and delicious, with lingering tones of blackberry, rum cake, spice and leather.",,Monteverro
"Hugely dense, foursquare wine with great fruit and the purest tannins. Chocolate and coffee predominate at the same time as sweet tannins and acidity. A wine that combines charm with great power.",,Château Canon
"Dark and structured, this is a firm wine. It has a smoky wood character, powerful tannins over intensely ripe fruit. Acidity and sweetness balance to give a dense wine, powered with richness and destined to age for many years.",,Château Giscours
"A gorgeously perfumed wine, dominated by the ripest Cabernet Franc, combining richness and an intense structure. With its tannins, it will age well over many years. The fruit is finely textured, deliciously juicy, showing the most complex series of flavors.",,Le Dôme
"A sip is all it takes to fall in love with this potent Pinot Noir. Big tannins and crisp acidity make it hard to appreciate now, but there's a gigantic core of cherries and raspberries, with a firm minerality from the soil. Will develop bottle complexity over the years. Don't even think of popping the cork before 2015.",Flax Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Rutherford Hill has specialized in Merlot for decades, and their Reserve bottling is always one of the best. This 2007 is right up there, rich, dense and opulent. It shows massive blackberry, cherry, blueberry, anise and cedar flavors, wrapped into a fine tannin-acid structure, and the finish is dry. Perfect with the best steak you can find.",Reserve,Rutherford Hill
"Quilceda Creek's single vineyard Red Mountain Cabernet Sauvignon has the heft and structure for decades of aging; to drink it anytime soon is folly. Massively oaky, spicy and loaded with chunky ripe fruit, it's full-flavored and big-boned; a young, raw Cab with unlimited potential.",Galitzine Vineyard,Quilceda Creek
"Elegant as well as rich, this is a beautiful wine. It has great depth of flavor, the sweetest fruit, deliciously ripe. At the same time, the tannins are an underlying sustenance to the impressive ageworthiness.",,Clos Fourtet
"Deserves its high score by virtue of power and sheer flamboyant dazzle. Packed with ripe, sweet cherries and milk chocolate, with a decadently meaty taste, like beef tartare. Oak plays the usual role, adding a caramelly, buttered toast richness. The tannins are brilliant, so soft and sweet, they're like candy. Drink this flashy wine over the next six years.",Ark Vineyard,Hundred Acre
"This Cabernet is a blend of estate and purchased fruit. In a successful year, it rivals Stag's Leap's best wines, including Cask 23, and 2008 was a very successful year. Blended with 2% Merlot, and aged in lots of new French oak, the wine is, in a word, stunning. Rich, flashy blackberry and dark chocolate flavors are anchored by an earthiness suggesting cured olives and dried herbs. Delicious now, this beauty should develop additional complexities throughout the decade.",Artemis,Stag's Leap Wine Cellars
"Another great release from Sequana of this single-vineyard bottling, which hails from the golden slopes of the cool, southwestern part of the Russian River Valley. It's rich in raspberry, pomegranate and persimmon fruit, elaborated with sweet new French oak, but saved from being merely ripe by a firm minerality and brilliant acidity. Should develop interestingly over the next 10 years.",Sundawg Ridge Vineyard,Sequana
"Bursting with sweet toast from the barrel aging, this offers ripe and pretty berry fruit, deep and long, with highlights of oolong tea. The alcohol is not intrusive, and the acidity keeps it buoyed and lively.",,Sequel
"From the winery's own Westside Road vineyard, formerly called Litton, comes this grandiose, if immature, Pinot Noir. In its youth it's all about primary, jammy raspberry and cherry fruit. On the edges are fine acidity, smooth tannins and a perfect appliqué of oak. Shows the hallmarks of this great, emerging vineyard, but needs serious time to come around. Try after 2015.",Estate Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Some will critique this Pinot Noir as being too big and extracted, and lacking delicacy. But Olivet Lane Pinots are seldom delicate. You look for massive fruit and elaborate construction, and that's what you find in this fabulously exotic wine. It's a beauty, rich, dense and opulent, with complex cherry, rose petal, dark chocolate and new oak flavors, wrapped into firm, refined tannins. Just gorgeous now, with a few hours of decanting, but it will easily develop bottle nuances for a good eight years.",Olivet Lane,Merry Edwards
"Certainly the finest Grand Ciel Syrah to date, this is a full-flavored, complete wine, loaded with pure fruit flavors of berry and cassis. The details pile on__ whiff of stone, a hint of chocolate, suggestions of spice, all in perfect proportion.",Grand Ciel Vineyard,Doyenne
"Soft and ripe enough to drink now, after a decent decanting, it shows pure raspberry, blueberry and cherry fruit flavors, subtlely accented with cola and baking spices, and all of it wrapped into thick but smooth tannins. Good as it is, it will gain traction over the next 15 years.",Hirsch Vineyard,Williams Selyem
"Clos Apalta, depending on your point of view, is arguably Chile's best wine. And this vintage is outstanding! Earth, minty spice, ripe berry, minerality and smoky aromas cover the bases. It's superbly structured, with a fine texture and depth. Tastes lush and complex, with blackberry, crème de cassis, fine herbs and tobacco. Finishes classy. Drink now through 2016.",Clos Apalta,Lapostolle
"Paleo is a landmark Italian expression of Cabernet Franc that is not at all bashful in terms of fullness and richness. Bold fruit and black cherry aromas have been soften by careful oak tones of spice and leather. Structured, firm but also velvety in texture, this wine needs more years to evolve.",Paleo,Le Macchiole
"Very supple wine, with great richness and density. It is all so complete, a pleasure, powerful yet also with sweet opulent fruits layered with dark tannins. For long-term aging.",,Château Branaire-Ducru
"Mint aromas hint at the wood, but more important is the massive Merlot fruit that is an essential element in the blend. The result is a wine that blends richness and power with an initially severe character. Slowly it opens to reveal opulent blackberry jam flavors, immensely ripe.",Les Forts de Latour,Château Latour
"With its superripe, jammy fruit, this is lush and opulent. It does have a fine structure as well as bitter chocolate and dark tannins. A hugely powerful wine.",,Château Pavie
"A seductive wine, deliciously ripe with the softest, juiciest fruit over smoky new wood. The wine shows intense fruit as well as a soft Merlot core. The tannins are beautifully integrated in this ripely sweet wine.",,Château Pichon Longueville Comtesse de Lalande
"Densely fruity wine, all sweetness and richness without too much weight. It does have power, a dark core, but it is the sweet balance that is so attractive. There is a layer of acidity as well, giving freshness to the final character of the wine.",,Château Providence
"This fabulous blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot delivers loads of plush softness and succulent richness. Aromas of chocolate, ripe fruit and spice are distinct and clear, and the wine shows compelling complexity and intensity overall.",Giusto di Notri,Tua Rita
"Ninety-year-old vines produce this ink-black wine, intensely powerful and concentrated. At this stage it is very young, its superb dense fruit still developing. But the power, the rich tannins and the smooth feel from open stone fermenters still make this a wine that needs considerable aging. Give it 5_7 years and more.",Vinha Maria Teresa,Quinta do Crasto
"This unique Syrah vineyard is located at the northwestern edge of the Columbia Valley AVA. Exotic, silky and compelling, the aromas and flavors combine gorgeously sleek berry fruit flavors with a foundation of liquid rock (hence the vineyard name). Supple, authoritative and long, it gathers both strength and subtlety as it breathes.",Rocky Mother Vineyard,Nefarious Cellars
"The vineyard is in the coolest part of the valley, the southerly part Merry Edwards calls the Golden Triangle. The wine is dry, tannic, bright in acidity and insanely rich. Just floods the mouth with cherry, cola, anise, pomegranate and mulberry flavors, with an earthiness suggesting mushrooms. Just great now, with decanting, and will easily develop in the bottle through 2020.",Coopersmith,Merry Edwards
"Fresh blackberry fruits give a smooth wine, rich and with an immediately attractive fresh acidity. It does have the density of fruit along with relatively soft tannins. At the back there is a more chocolate character.",,Château Beausejour-Duffau-Lagarrosse
"A core of sweetness shows through this wine. It has juicy acidity shining prominently__t shows its fresh side immediately. Bélair-Monange is still a work in progress, although this will always be a delicious wine.",,Château Bélair-Monange
"Ripe wine, with soft tannins allied to great density. Weight and lovely, juicy, final fruit flavors meld together easily. This is solid, dense, impressive and for long-term aging.",,Château Lagrange
"As the name implies, this is a soft wine, with gentle tannins and acids. It's ripe in cherry and blackberry jam flavors that finish simple and sweet.",Liquid Velvet,Lockwood
"Pizza, burgers, tacos and similar everyday fare will go well with this Merlot. It's smooth in cherries, currants and cola.",,Lost Angel
"This soft, simple Cabernet will go just fine with everyday fare. It's dry, full-bodied and tannic, with proper varietal flavors of blackberries, currants and smoky oak.",,Maddalena
"Foxy aromas of plum and berry come with a dusting of spice and earthy accents. This feels sticky and a bit heavy, while blueberry and boysenberry flavors carry and herbal streak as well as minty notes and heat on the finish.",Made with Organic Grapes,Venta Morales
"Fresh raspberry and plum aromas are minty but get the job done. This feels raw but not scouring, with prodding acidity and herbal berry, vanilla and paste flavors. Minty, herbal finishing notes touch up against herbaceous.",,Venta Morales
"At this time, the heavy aromas of smoky wood and charred popcorn kernel subjugate the fruit. The palate feels open knit, almost flat, and it bears a blackberry flavor and more oak influence. A tangy taste of iron adds interest to the finish.",Claret,Veritas
"Whatever the grape varieties in this wine are, and the winery doesn't identify them, they're of the full-bodied type, like Petite Sirah or Zinfandel. It's an easy-drinking wine, soft and rich in cherries. Good for everyday fare, like burgers and tacos.",Gunsmoke,Masked Rider
"Jammy, with flavors of white sugar, red and black cherries and buttered cinnamon toast. Drink with simple, sweet fare, like a hamburger with smothered onions, slathered in ketchup.",,San Simeon
"This is a simple, honeyed wine with buttered toast, vanilla, apricot, orange and pineapple flavors. Nothing fancy, but will satisfy your Chardonnay cravings.",,R8
"This Pinot Gris has aromas of wax, red apple, underripe white peach and citrus. The white peach note becomes more dominant on the easygoing palate, and it leads to a mineral-like tang that lingers onto the slightly yeasty finish.",Estate Grown,Pollak
"There is an earthy, rustic quality about this wine. The dry tannins are initially hard with chocolate flavors overshadowing the fruit. That gives a wine that needs time to open up and will always be on the dry, firm side. Drink from 2015.",Château Leret Réserve,Georges Vigouroux
"A warm, fruity rosé, softly textured and full of strawberry fruits. There's a fine touch of acidity to balance and a dry aftertaste. Ready to drink.",Pigmentum,Georges Vigouroux
"A very fruity, red berry flavored wine. It has a slight tannic structure giving shape to this simple, accessible rosé.",,Dopff & Irion
"This Chard is dry and crisp in acidity, with subtle kumquat, peach and tangerine flavors, as well as hints of buttered toast. It's a little on the thin side.",,Alias
"Soft fruit and lightly spicy, the wine has a touch of acidity, lychee and ripe apple flavors. It is ready to drink, a full and gently rich wine.",Prestige,Cave de Cleebourg
"A warm and fruity wine, it is softly textured, ripe peach and apricot flavors. The acidity gives just enough freshness to a wine that is ripe, rounded and ready to drink.",Solaire,Cave des Grands Crus Blancs
"Fleshy peach and melon aromas comme off as chunky and soft. The palate is just as soft as the nose, with melon and banana flavors. A simple finish is friendly but lacks spine, so drink this Chardonnay before it loses steam.",Oak Cask,Trapiche
"This simple, rich white wine features a cheesecake graphic on the label, hence the name. The blend is a mix of Chardonnay, Sauvignon Blanc, Riesling and Gewürztraminer. Fine for sipping cold if you're in the mood for a more luscious white.",Buxom Blonde,Calendar Girl
"Citrusy aromas revolve around pink grapefruit and rose blossom. In the mouth, this is a bit flat for such a young rosé, with pithy and bitter flavors and notes of red plum and red-apple skins.",,El Coto
"elon and peach aromas create a bouquet that's nondescript. This feels solid in the mouth, with acidic cut. Flavors of nectarine run sweet, while the finish takes on a cloying feel as it delivers thick melon and peach flavors. Drink now or wait for the 2013 vintage.",Phebus Rosé,Fabre Montmayou
"The nose on this Patagonian sparkler is a stand-in for Moscato, although by all indications this is made from Torrontés. The mouthfeel is smooth, with soft bubbles. Flavors of sugary white fruits, lychee and spiced pear finish sweet and short.",Deseado,Familia Schroeder
"The winemaker really squeezed out the cherries and boysenberries in this Merlot, making it super fruity. It's not especially complex, but it will appeal to fans of jammy wines.",Reserve,Frei Brothers
"A scent of lemon-lime sorbet dominates the nose in this blend of Traminette and Vidal. Medium in body, this wine tastes off-dry, but the acids keep the palate refreshed. A note of lime zest marks the finish.",GRV,General's Ridge
"This has light scents of peach, golden apple, white flower and Bartlett pear. The palate is ripe and juicy, with the pear note dominating the flavor profile.",Frosty Dog,Chateau Morrisette
"Subtle scents of white flower and peanut shell meld with core aromas of tropical fruits. The palate feels viscous and open knit, and the residual sugar makes for a clingy finish.",Ali d'Oro,CrossKeys
"Softness of tannins makes this wine feel melted in the mouth, yet it has bright, zingy acidity, and the raspberry and cherry fruit is sweet and jammy. The result is simple.",,Maddalena
"This blend of 45% Merlot, 32% Cabernet Franc and 23% Petit Verdot has medium-intense scents of char, leather and mushroom, plus touches of dark cherry and mocha. Medium to full in body, the palate feels lax on entrance, but the acids quickly become perky and carry on through the finish.",Detour,Hume
"Dominated by oak, this simple Chardonnay has woody notes with underlying citrus, apricot and tropical-fruit flavors that are a tad thin.",Megandina,Megandina Cellars
"Oaky flavors, in the form of buttered toast and butterscotch, dominate this Chardonnay. The underlying fruit is delicate, veering toward apricots and pineapples, highlighted by crisp acidity.",,Muirwood
"A Bordeaux blend with some Tannat thrown into the mix, this is a juicy, very fruity wine. It has fresh berry flavors, a touch of spice and soft tannins. Drink now.",,Rieutort
"A delicious blend of 55% Cabernet Franc, 27% Merlot, 17% Cabernet Sauvignon and a dash of Petit Verdot opens with aromas of concentrated black plum, blackberry, blue flowers and a whiff of leather. The juicy palate doles out fleshy black cherries, crushed raspberries, white pepper, clove and grilled herb while velvety tannins provide the framework. A licorice note marks the close.",Le Cupole,Tenuta di Trinoro
"Spain's preeminent varietal Cabernet is excellent in its 40th rendition. This single-vineyard wine opens with dark, brooding aromas of rooty spice, licorice, tar, herbs, cassis and prune. In the mouth, this is wiry and tight at the core, but friendly around the edges. Flavors of currant, toast, vanilla, pepper and barbecue sauce finish with ripping acidity but also cuddly, creamy weight. Drink from 2017 through 2030.",Mas La Plana 40th Vintage,Torres
"This is locked up tight when opened, and remains massive but inscrutable for several hours. But that is not to say it isn't a killer wine. The dense weave of wild berries, Mediterranean herbs, earth and clay signals a powerful wine with serious aging potential. Drink 2018 through 2028.",Hans Clone Pommard,Vidon Vineyard
"Like the rest of the 2012 Condrieus recently tasted, this is full-bodied and rich without being overdone. Apricot and ginger aromas lead into flavors reminiscent of honeycomb, white pepper and apricot. The texture is slightly oily, but that's balanced on the finish by peppery spice.",La Combe de Malleval,Michel & Stéphane Ogier
"Elegance is a hallmark of the winery's Pinots, and even this one, registering 15% alcohol, manages to keep from tasting overblown. It's thick and rich, for sure, loaded with cherry and plum fruit, with pepper, clay, Asian spices and dark chocolate. Lazy River is one of the components of the Winemaker's Cuvée, which is a lovely comparison companion bottle.",Lazy River Vineyard,Elizabeth Chambers
"An estate wine from an elevated elevation, this opens in fragrant red cherry and vanilla, with a subtle trace of brambly blackberry. Soft, it features a supple mouthfeel, medium weight and a backbone of structure, earthy and enticing. Easily enjoyable now, it should take on added complexity through 2022.",Hillside Reserve,Flora Springs
"Made entirely with Merlot, this full-bodied wine opens with aromas of ripe berry, coffee, vanilla, exotic spice and a whiff of grilled herb. The concentrated palate doles out fleshy black cherries, juicy raspberries licorice, chocolate and tobacco, while velvety tannins provide the framework. A note of dried sage closes the finish. It's already approachable but will continue to age well for several years or more. Drink through 2023.",Messorio,Le Macchiole
"This wine explodes with a glorious mix of buttered nuts, toast, ripe yellow fruits and supporting acidity. The exceptional length proposes at least a decade of development ahead. Drink now through 2025.",,Irvine Family Vineyards
"Aged 100% in new wood, this is a wine produced as a joint venture between California vintner Paul Hobbs and Cahors producer Bertrand Vigouroux. It is a major, powerful statement, rich and dense. The texture smoothes out the natural structure of Cahors Malbec to give a silky wine, the tannins in suspension in the black plum fruits. It will be better from 2017.",Crocus Grand Vin,Paul Bertrand
"Delicate smoke and mineral tones seep into succulent yellow cherry and peach flavors in this deeply complex, structured wine. Delicate yet mouthcoating, zesty yet unctuous, it's a lingering, honeyed sip of sunshine.",Hochheimer Domdechaney Auslese,Domdechant Werner
"Extremely concentrated hibiscus aromas meet with red rose petals and cola on the nose of this blend of 49% Merlot, 42% Cabernet Sauvignon and 9% Zinfandel. More concentrated flowers show once sipped, with jasmine extract, black tea and coffee syrup combining for an intriguing flavor set. Strong tannins and acidity ensure that this will sip well for years to come.",Heritage Red Signature Series Reserve,Lorenzi Estate
"Red cherries laced with crushed allspice and cloves also benefit from dried violets, graphite and loamy soil on the nose of this rare Pinot from Paso. The palate is not quite so boisterous but quite good still, with a bit of concentrated plum juice, Bing cherries, raspberry and a tinge of sagebrush throughout.",Russell Family Vineyard,Loring Wine Company
"Juicy strawberries, raspberries and plums are balanced by wet slate on the nose of this wine from grape growing pioneer Louis Lucas and his vintner-partner, Judge Royce Lewellen. The palate shows more raspberry and a bit of boysenberry along with an orange rind tartness and woody herbs like juniper and black sage.",Goodchild High 9 Vineyard,Lucas & Lewellen
"Made entirely from Cabernet Sauvignon, this wine opens with aromas of red berries, sweet baking spice, grilled herbs and a whiff of cedar. The structured but almost weightless palate doles out ripe red currants, red raspberries, licorice, mocha and white pepper. Supple, smooth tannins weave alongside the juicy flavors. Drink through 2016_2022.",Philip,Mazzei
"One of the producer's longest-standing vineyard sources, this Hyde is gorgeously savory and lightly textured, while offering plenty of depth and complexity on the palate. Aromatically, it presents inviting orange zest, cherry and cranberry, elements that follow in taste, finished off by a flash of white pepper. Fresh and fruity, this wine also provides smooth, yet sizable tannins.",Hyde Vineyard,Patz & Hall
"Aromas of blue flowers, black-skinned fruit and whiffs of mocha lead the nose on this structured Sangiovese. The full-bodied palate delivers mature plum, fleshy black cherry, clove and Mediterranean herb alongside velvety tannins. It closes on a note of mint chocolate.",Alto,Petra
"Aromas of licorice, cedar, red currants and graphite unfold in the glass. The structured palate offers black cherries, blackberries, coffee, tobacco and black pepper alongside firm, velvety tannins that wrap around the palate. Drink 2016_2022.",Buriano,Rocca di Castagnoli
"Clear in color and texture, this is a refined and yet voluptuous wine, a blend from several of the producer's single-vineyard designates, from Ridgetop Vineyard near Annapolis to Gap's Crown within the Petaluma Gap. It works on several levels, retaining the acidity of the cooler sites while combining the deeper, more complex aspects of others. Expect dark cherry and blueberry along a foundation of earthy truffle.",,Sojourn
"Intense aromatics seduce with a pungent mix of earth, leather, truffle and tobacco. Just-ripe wild berries, tea leaves and dried herbs join the chorus, while sweet tannins frame a lingering finish that invites further exploration.",Brigita Clone 777,Vidon Vineyard
"Big in every sense, this powerful, almost black-colored wine is solid, packed with dry tannins and ripe fruit. Made from Alicante Bouschet, it is a rich, opulent wine, with a strong spice, pepper and fruit character. This blockbuster needs aging, so drink from 2018.",Companhia das Lezirias 1836 Grande Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
"This wine offers very yellow aromas of stewed lemons, pound cake, egg flour, peach blossom, ambrosia melon and even a shy bit of hazelnut on the nose. The fascinating palate shows orange sponge cake, acacia flower, dried papaya, stone fruits and a pithy minerality. Scents and flavors are altogether mysterious yet delicious.",Spanish Springs Vineyard,Aequorea
"A beautiful trio of fruit flavors__ed cherry, rhubarb and raspberry__rovides harmony in this vivid and pure-tasting wine. The freshness and clarity of the fruit elements is well backed by lively acidity and moderate tannins to keep it clean and appetizing from first sip to last.",Kite's Rest Vineyard,Black Kite
"Powerful tannins are the dominant theme of this still-young wine that is dark, brooding, very firm and young. Big and muscular, this is a wine for long-term aging. Even the black currant fruits need time to soften the intensity of their tannins. Drink from 2019.",Odé d'Aydie,Château d'Aydie
"This celebration of Tannat is a balanced while severe and structured wine. Plenty of juicy fruit is ready to come out from behind the dry, tannic structure. There is power here as well in this wine that is firm and needs to age. Drink from 2019.",Laplace,Château d'Aydie
"Named after the wife of the previous owner, this top cuvée from Château de Cénac is powered by its structure and dark tannins. The rich black berries and plums are still working through the dense texture. It's a complex wine, still showing its wood aging. Drink from 2017.",Eulalie,Château de Cénac
"As per usual, Don Melchor is singing a pretty tune. Deep, dense aromas of floral berry fruits and tarry darkness are solid and complete. Pure, elegant and confident across the palate, this delivers firm cassis, plum and cherry flavors backed by a toasty finish accented by licorice. This is rich and brawny but not heavy; drink through 2023.",Don Melchor Puente Alto Vineyard,Concha y Toro
"This has a classic, lighter red color and equally classic aromas of red cherry, sour cherry, black tea, lightly toasted oak and a touch of forest floor. Generous cherry and plum flavors are perfectly balanced with crisp acidity and fine-grained tannins. It's not a big wine, but a vivid, polished and memorable one.",Monument Tree,Couloir
"The winery's multiple vineyard designates are very good, but the blending that goes into this Winemaker's Cuvée puts it right there with the best of them. Bursting with blueberry, cherry and plum scents and flavors, this complex and complete wine piles on the details. A streak of chocolate here, a dash of cumin there, and on it goes.",Winemaker's Cuvée,Elizabeth Chambers
"This is a stately Cabernet housing classic Chilean aromas of spicy, berry fruits mixed with earth notes. It's supremely fresh on the palate, with layers of briar fruit and integrated oak. Baked berry, hard spice and exotic chocolate flavors end toasty and warm, but lively and complex. Drink through 2024.",,Enclave
"Black currants, blackberries, grilled herb, cedar and clove aromas lead the nose on this delicious, creamy wine. The smooth, savory palate doles out ripe black cherry, fleshy plum, white pepper, mint and anise. Firm, polished tannins support the juicy fruit flavors.",,Fattoria Torre a Cona
"A light style, but still stylish, with finesse and good structure. The pretty plum fruit is lightly dusted with cocoa, softening the tannins and adding spice to the finish. A gentle and beguiling wine, ready for near-term enjoyment.",,Hedgeline
"A soft, fruity wine, with spice, strawberry and currant flavors. It has a warm, open feel, with a hint of tannin. Its name refers to the winding Douro River Valley.",Twisted,Niepoort
"Nearing four years of age, this Pinot remains tannic and tight. It's dark, full-bodied and rich in cherries and currants, and quite dry. But it flirts with overripeness, which detracts from the wine's delicacy. Ready to drink now.",Clos Camille,Notre Vin
"Rich and tart, this is a delightful Pinot Noir for drinking now. Feels upscale in the mouth, with flavors of spicy raspberry, red currant, cola and sandalwood. Shows the elegance that almost always accompanies a Robert Mondavi wine.",,Robert Mondavi
"A young, tart, somewhat candied Thea's brings a mouthful of primary berry fruit flavor to bear, principally raspberries and cherries. It shows generous acidity, keeping the palate lively, and hints of light herb, though little new oak influence.",Thea's Selection,Lemelson
"Extreme juiciness gives this wine an exotic character. It has ripe red-berry fruit, a hint of sweet tomato, and is layered with wood tones and soft tannins. The acidity cuts through this perfumed wine. Not for aging; it's attractively fruity and ready to drink now.",,Quinta da Lagoalva de Cima
"Floral red-fruit aromas get heavier with airing. Feels thick and full, with soft tannins and mild acidity. Tastes oaky but not overoaked, with caramel, vanilla and standard red-berry and plum flavors. A touch stewy on the finish, with a resiny oak flavor hanging in there.",Q,Quintay
"Yume is a dark, extracted wine, with sweet spice aromas and loads of plush, ripe fruit, such as blackberry and currant. It shows soft tannins and finishes with moderate persistency.",Yume,Caldora Vini
"Opens with funky aromas of wet dog, cola and cassis. Airing allows it to roll into form, with a chewy, thick palate and solid flavors of herb-infused berry and cassis, buttery oak and coffee. Tastes oaky and creamy on the finish, with a chewiness to the texture.",Lolol Gran Reserva,Casa Silva
"Opaque in color, with herbal aromas that include graphite, tobacco, sweaty leather and mocha along with floral berry fruits. The acidity is high due to coastal origins, so the blackberry flavors run tangy, with herbal leanings. Streaky, sharp acidity is the only sticking point.",Gran Reserva,Casas del Bosque
"Leafy and loaded with sweet tobacco and earth aromas. Concentrated and lively in the mouth, with cherry, brown sugar and cocoa flavors leading to a layered, sweet-tasting, long finish. Offers a good mix of character, poise and power.",Terroir Selection Gran Reserva,Casas del Toqui
"Layers of black raspberry and cherry are intensified by a decadent mocha note in the background. The mouthfeel is round and opulent, but structured with dusty tannins. A coffee note stays through the medium-length close. Drink now.",Le Merlot du Donjon,Chateau du Donjon
"This is the entry-level wine from Château Eugénie, and it is delicious. The Malbec is softened with some Merlot, rounding out the wine. It does still preserve the solid structure of Cahors with its dense black fruits and firm tannins.",Tradition,Château Eugénie
"Initially tannic, this concentrated wine shows itself to be young, with its structure still waiting to open. A dry texture lies over the big berry flavors that will develop over the next year.",Monsaraz,Cooperativa Reguengos de Monsaraz
"A blend of Cabernet Sauvignon and Merlot in the Tarn region north of Toulouse gives a firm wine, with ripe fruit that is striated with tannin and acidity. It is still young and fruity and could age 2_3 years.",Cuvée Germain,Domaine D'en Ségur
"In a flight of Cristom single-vineyard Pinots, this blended reserve stands out as a little on the green side, with some noticeable tannic astringency. Cranberry and berry fruit, light and showing some earthiness, holds down the center.",Sommers Reserve,Cristom
"A meaty Shiraz that pulls no punches, proudly displaying its black raspberry and earthy, salumi-infused flavors around a rich, dense texture full of leather and a touch of smoke. The Temecula Valley is continuing to make strides and this is a jumbo-jet-sized example that finishes a teensy bit sweet. The Shiraz is blended with 11% Cinsault.",Reserve,Fazeli Cellars
"The big difference between this wine and the standard Novas Cab is oak; this version deals coconut, marzipan and vanilla aromas along with olive and asphalt. It's full of mocha and chocolaty black-fruit flavors, which are backed by more coffee and mocha on the finish. A weighty Cab that's woody and confected but still sturdy and serious.",Novas Gran Reserva,Emiliana
"Light pink in color and super fresh smelling. This is punchy up front, with red-berry and citrus scents. Feels zesty, crisp and steely, with tangy citrus flavors followed by a long finish that's refreshing and cleansing. Really nice for affordable Chilean rosé.",Carmenère,Apaltagua
"Exceptionally tart, with vivid green-apple and sour lemon flavors, this tangy mouthful mixes its high-acid lemony fruit with highlights of pineapple and grapefruit. Nicely delineated, but definitely for those who love acid.",Bryan Creek Vineyard,Adelsheim
"A wood-aged wine that has a round character and a mineral tang. The flavors of yellow stone fruit, pineapple and toast are rich in this ready-to-drink wine.",Monte Claros Reserva Branco,Adega Cooperativa de Borba
"This new brand turns to this increasingly respected vineyard, which is located in a tenderloin of great properties in the southern part of the appellation. Even nearing the age of three years, it's fresh, young and pure, with brisk flavors of raspberries and cherries. Could show greater depth and complexity, though, especially at this price.",La Encantada Vineyard,Kagan
"Sealed with a screwcap, this affordable Pinot offers forward, fruity flavors of red apple, fig, plum and prune. It starts out quite nicely, then hardens up a bit, and needs decanting to show its best. A streak of espresso runs through the finish; it's not an elegant wine, but a hearty one.",,Jovino
"Smooth, rounded wine with the weight of ripe yellow fruit behind its acidity and creamy character. There is a touch of pepper that gives a burst of spice. With the extra year in bottle, the wine is now ready to drink.",Via Latina,Vercoope
"Chicca is a naturally sweet wine with an inky garnet color and a dark consistency. The wine's unique characteristics require special consideration when pairing with foods. Chocolate-based desserts and rum cake could work well. Notes of blackberry and cherry liqueur are backed by a thick, sweet mouthfeel.",Chicca Vino Dolce Naturale,Vigne & Vini
"A hearty, masculine effort, with thick aromas of blackberry, espresso, black granite and pipe tobacco. It has a firm tannic backbone, with a slightly chewy quality to the fruit flavors.",Starsa,Tenuta del Portale
"This mature Syrah gets going with saucy, slightly volatile aromas that incorporate stewed berry, leather and horse hide. Feels plump, chunky and structured, with baked berry, herbal notes and chocolaty flavors. Finishes toasted and lightly herbal. for the name, Payen means __opper_ in the local dialect.",Payen,Viña Tabalí
"Big, bold and bulky on the bouquet, with a truck load of ripe blackberry and boysenberry aromas that rightly announce that a fruit bomb is coming. Feels plump, round and structured, with soft tannins and compact flavors of berries, black plums and herbs. Finishes full, with a mild herbal accent.",Crucero Reserva,Siegel
"In the context of the rest of the outstanding 2009 Pinots from Soléna, this seems the lightest. Soft, spicy fruit flavors of strawberry and raspberry, accented with rose water, set up an elegant, thinnish palate, with residual tannic flavors of green tea. This could be a surprisingly long-lived wine, but at this stage it's anyone's guess.",Zena Crown Vineyard,Soléna
"Very rich and ripe, but compromised by a mouthfeel that's simultaneously soft and yet weirdly acidic, like it has a squeeze of lime juice. Still, there's no denying the fabulous wealth of black cherries, cassis, mocha and spices.",Elivette,Spring Mountain Vineyard
"This smells a bit like asphalt and peanuts. It feels angular, with plum, berry and pepper flavors. The finish is spicy, with drying tannins and a lasting leafy flavor.",Roble,Matiz
"Ripe and fruity, this bears a red berry flavor and a dry structure. It has weight, richness and a smooth finish.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"The light prickle adds to the natural freshness of this lemon-sherbet-flavored wine. Very crisp and light in the mouth, this dances on the palate with just a touch of sweetness.",Salsus,Wines & Winemakers
"This is a floral, aromatic and dry rosé, full of red currant fruit and refreshing acidity. It's a great apéritif wine.",Samora,Wines & Winemakers
"A light style of Pinot Noir, this is dry and racy. It offers good persimmon and cola flavors, and is very spicy. A trace of green is distracting.",,Chime
"Dry and acidic, this has citrus and green peppercorn flavors that are barely ripe. If you like the lean style, this is for you.",,Decoy
"Hard and herbal, this has sour, barely-ripe fruit and chalky tannins.",,Del Rio
"This smells granular and jammy, yet it feels snappy and dry, with raspberry, red plum, tomato and briny flavors. The finish is fresh and red in style.",Antaño,J. Garcia Carrion
"This is way too soft for comfort, with soft tannins and slight acidity that leave the fruit and alcohol to star.",Mountain Cuvée,Gundlach Bundschu
"This is leathery and stemmy on the nose, with horsey plum and raspberry aromas. It feels narrow, with rubbery, herbal and roasted berry flavors. This is a rustic, roasted wine no matter how you slice it.",Luzón,Bodegas Luzón
"This is dry, with scouring tannins and some twiggy, stalky bitterness. It has just enough blackberry flavor to get by. For the price, it's fine for big parties.",Reserve,Oak Grove
"Quiet on the bouquet, this offers aromas and flavors of a wine that's in the early stages of decline. It feels mildly oxidized and tastes of hollow fruit and yeasty vanilla. The finish is mild, with a note of hay.",Blanco,Señorio de Uñuela
"This smells a bit oily and like a match, with additional aromas of white fruits and corn flakes. It feels pulpy but just crisp enough, with pithy grapefruit and sweet papaya flavors. It tastes candied on the finish.",Estate Bottled,Pascual Toso
"An everyday Chardonnay, this has buttered toast, butterscotch candy and pineapple flavors. It's clean and brisk in acidity.",,Greystone
"Scents of toast and coffee reflect some time in a percentage of new oak, but there is little else going on here. Where's the fruit?",,Del Rio
"With cherry, mocha and spice flavors, this is a good wine for drinking with a great cheeseburger. The price is fair for the quality. It's a blend of Petite Sirah and Syrah.",,LoveThisLife
"This is nowhere near ripe, with chlorophyll, white pepper and tobacco flavors. But the tannins are rich and fine, and the finish is dry. Drink with sausages to coax out the cherry flavor.",,Zinopolis
"Hot and heavy from first whiff, this has plastic and red pepper notes, with a sweet strawberry aroma. It's thick as syrup on the palate, with extracted, fully ripe flavors of blackberry and raisin. Maat means __he land_ in a native language; but it could mean syrupy sweet. Hard to believe this is just 13.5% abv.",Maat,Tres Valles
"The nose smells minty and capped with rubbery, blackened aromas. It feels tangy and tannic, with medicinal flavors of berry and resiny oak. It's powerful but rough.",Roble,Viña Vilano
"This smells like a new coat of road tar mixed with black olive tapenade and herb. It feels tannic and clumsy, with herb and stewed-fruit flavors. The cooked finish ends with roasted berry and olive notes.",Finca Valdelroble,Pago de Callejo
"This is a simple wine, ripe in orange and pineapple flavors, with fine Central Coast acidity. It seems sweet, like a cookie, appealing to those who enjoy this style.",Heritage Blanc,San Antonio
"Light and lean, this could easily be labeled a rosé. The aromas reinforce that notion thanks to the tones of rose petal, pink grapefruit and bitter almond.",Pergola Rosso,Angelini
"This is brambly, stalky and baked on the nose, and the palate is wide, tannic and scratchy. The flavor profile is all roasted plum, bacon and herb accents, finishing stalky and savory.",,Bula
"This is briny and oily on the nose, with grapefruit aromas. It feels citrusy in the mouth, with bitter nut and citrus flavors that turn pithy and more briny on the finish.",Old Vine,Martino
"This is a rounded, full-bodied rosé that also has a herbal element. It has a wild strawberry flavor, with light acidity and sweetness. Screwcap.",Coreto,DFJ Vinhos
"Mild varnish and lacquer aromas stem from the oak influence, and there's not a lot of fruit to offset those notes. It feels plump and a bit clumsy, with briny citrus flavors leading to a pickled, resiny finish.",Estate Bottled,Pascual Toso
"Simple and silky, this is fairly sweet in apricot and raspberry fruit. This is easy to drink at picnics and similar everyday occasions.",4 Grape Blend,Rare
"With lots of acidity and seemingly sweet lime, pineapple and tropical fruit flavors, this Sauvignon Blanc has a sweet-sour taste, like Life Savers candy.",Four Bears,Sean Minor
"If you like your white wines fruity and sweet, this one's for you. It has pretty flavors of peaches, honey and spices.",,Coastal Ridge
"Slightly oxidized at first with aromas of caramel and butterscotch, the wine soon opens to reveal apricot, honey and dried hay. It's an easy, genuine wine to pair with fried onion rings.",,Fattoria Laila
"Brancott's top Pinot Noir is a round, mouth-filling wine that finishes tart and long. Cranberry, mocha, roasted parsnip, mushroom and smoke notes make for a complex wine that may be enjoyed now and over the next several years.",Terraces T,Brancott
"This late-harvest dessert wine is sweet and unctuous, with ripe aromas and flavors of peaches and nectarines drizzled with honey and dusted with sweet baking spice. The mouthfeel is thick and full, but lifted with enough acidity to keep it from feeling cloying on the close.",Late Harvest Cluster Select Reserve,Binyamina
"This oak-aged Merlot, which includes 10% Sangiovese for extra acidity and brightness, opens with spice, wood shop, toasted almond and ripe cherry notes. It offers a chewy, succulent quality, and it finishes with a dark fruit flavor.",Inversus,Casaloste
"A rich effort, this offers ripe pear, citrus and tropical fruit flavors. Interesting notes of mushrooms and dried fruits are beginning to emerge, although that might indicate the wine's limited ageability. Drink over the next 1_2 years.",Cinghiale Vineyard,Del Dotto
"This oak-aged Vermentino is pristine and fresh in style, and the palate offers some heft. Nuances of exotic fruit, lemon zest, apricot and almond cream appear on the finish.",Grattamacco,Collemassari
"Bright bramble and forest floor notes are followed by black cherry and blackberry accents. Fresh and tangy, the finish shows enough structure to pair with stewed veal and baked potatoes.",Borgeri,Giorgio Meletti Cavallari
"Vibrant lemon- and lime-zest notes make this off-dry Riesling brisk and bright. Chalky minerality and a saline tone add depth, and there is a pleasantly bitter lemon-peel note that lingers on the finish.",Riesling 10 Lake Dana Vineyard,Fox Run
"Squarcialupi Riserva has shown a successful evolution over the years. This bottling opens with tangy aromas of tobacco, dark fruit, clove and eucalyptus. Small percentages of Merlot and Cabernet Sauvignon are added to the blend, but the wine's winning card comes from Sangiovese's natural acidity, which lends the wine a crisp, menthol-like finish.",Squarcialupi Riserva,La Castellina
"Quite tawny in color, this traditional Georgian qvevri wine has a high-toned apple aroma that's peppered with carmelized sugar and dried tea leaf hints. Dry and crisp, with penetrating dried-apple and orange rind flavors, it finishes long, with its powerful black-tea tannins reverberating on the palate.",Qvevri Dry Unfiltered White Wine,Dergi
"The Val di Cornia Suvereto appellation may not be recognized much abroad (or even in Italy), but it is definitely worth keeping an eye on. This blend of Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot and Sangiovese is rich, soft, and medium in intensity, and it offers great balance between the red fruit and dark spice components.",Ebo,Petra
"Made from fruit sourced from the mighty Ferrington Vineyard, this tank-fermented Gewürztraminer is crafted without oak or malolactic fermentation. The result is a light, lemony and floral wine, with moderate acidity and a note of chai tea on the finish that lends an exotic edge.",Ferrington Vineyard,Philo Ridge
"Fresh and lively, this Cabernet Sauvignon (blended with 10% Merlot) opens with aromas of forest berry, cherry, light spice and almond. It feels streamlined and crisp, and it would pair well with cheesy pasta or lasagna.",,Podere Guado al Melo
"This cool-climate Pinot Gris is balanced and light, and it offers refreshing layers of citrus, almond and peach. It will pair with goat cheese and seafood-based appetizers, and it will also be enjoyed on its own",,Navarro
"This is a ripe wine, with flavors of apple, pear, caramel and a touch of mineral that is subordinate to the fruit. It is lightly toasty, and the acidity is crisp.",Montée de Tonnerre Premier Cru,Olivier Leflaive
"Staete Landt's upscale Pinot Noir eschews dark color and extraction in favor of lighter body and soft tannins. Leather, cranberry and cocoa aromas lead the way, followed on the palate by a pie cherry note and a slightly medicinal green-herb edge. Tart and long on the finish, this wine appears to have the potential to mature gracefully through 2020.",Paladin,Staete Landt
"While this is dry in style, it exhibits all of the varietal's ebullient rose and lychee tones. It has vibrant acidity and an intense, honeyed palate that's full of rich citrus and tea leaf notes. This is full bodied, with a lingering finish.",,Standing Stone
"This Syrah reveals bright aromas of cherry and blackberry, backed by touches of cured meat and crushed white pepper. It has a unique personality, and the finish offers savory hints of earth and porcini mushroom.",,Stefano Amerighi
"Touches of bitter toast and roasted almond sit at the top of this wine, followed by smooth aromas of blackberry, prune, leather and tobacco. The palate feels tight and compact, and the finish shows lingering tones of black licorice and spice.",Greppone Mazzi,Ruffino
"The fruit for this provocatively named bottling is sourced from the lower Waihopai, or __py Valley_ section of Marlborough. It's a medium-bodied, supple wine that places the emphasis on earthy notes of beetroot and clove, and then adds in cherry fruit and vanillin. Long, savory and spicy on the finish.",Pioneer Block 15 Strip Block,Saint Clair
"The name refers to the blend of 62% Barbera and 38% Nebbiolo sourced from a pair of Horse Heaven Hills vineyards. A little high-toned on the nose, the wine eventually smoothes out in the glass, and it offers pretty flavors of raspberry and Bing cherry. Succulent and nicely balanced, this is one of the better Washington examples of these two grapes.",Nebbaro,Tre Nova
"This rich wine shows ripe fruit and a polished, smooth mouthfeel. The blackberry flavor dominates the firm tannins, which gives the palate a juicy quality. It reveals fine depth of flavor, minerality and aging potential.",Azul Portugal,Wines & Winemakers
"A typical local blend of Arinto, Fernão Pires and Chardonnay, this is smooth, ripe and creamy. It has touches of herb, honey and pineapple, which are laced together by citrusy acidity. The finish is soft.",Catapereiro Escolha,Wines & Winemakers
"Bramaluce is a blend of Sangiovese and Syrah that opens with bold aromas of ripe fruit, blackberry jam and prune. The smoky finish adds a sophisticated twist. Some of the grapes used in the blend are air-dried on bamboo mats for added intensity.",Bramaluce,Terenzi
"Plum and red berry aromas start this integrated red blend, which is released only in the best years. On the palate, plum, warm spice and oak tones create a rich but clean character. The wine is structured and has room to age.",Symbolo Grand Cuvée,Lyrarakis
"Aged for 18 months in wood, this wine has dense tannins, dark fruits and serious structure. The berry fruit and acidity suggest that his wine has a generous and ripe side. This needs at least four years of aging.",Les Basse Mezières,Maison Champy
This Syrah shows just a touch of smokiness. It has vital acids and furry tannins that structure the cherry pie flavor. Great for drinking now if you're looking for a medium-bodied selection.,Estate Verna's,Melville
"This 100% Merlot is full bodied and juicy, and it offers a sappy red-berry flavor. There's a nice dash of spice, and it demonstrates good balance overall. It needs an hour or so of airing before it really opens up.",,Helix by Reininger
"The amount of alcohol in this Syrah has increased in 2010, which will appeal to some palates. The downside is the loss of texture and subtlety. Smooth and powerfully fruity, this hits with some chewy tannins, but it stops a bit short. More bottle age could certainly be a boon to this wine.",Red Willow Vineyard Chapel Block,Owen Roe
"A delicious shot of citrusy acidity makes this a wine of great freshness. At the same time, the wood-derived flavors add some richness and a spice note. Let this intense effort age for another couple of years.",Premier Cru,Roche de Bellene
"Fruity and fragrant, this Savigny shows extra weight that makes it serious and age worthy. The wine's tannins are cushioned by the generous red fruits, which promise aging potential. Wood and spice flavors emphasize the finish.",Clos des Guettes Premier Cru,Louis Jadot
"This dry Gewürztraminer brings its spice character to the fore. It has ripe white fruit notes, with touches of almond and pepper. With its dense, firm texture, it is a strong candidate for Asian food.",Vieilles Vignes,Frey-Sohler
"This taut, structured wine achieves a balance between red berry flavors and dry, firm tannins. It has a herbal edge and a solid, dense texture. It powers through with intense acidity on the finish.",La Madone,Georges Duboeuf
"Mostly made of Cabernet and Syrah, this has strong coffee-liqueur and vanilla syrup flavors, along with a concentrated raspberry note. It has a slightly sweet impression, and there is plenty of power to the flavors.",Vireo,Goose Ridge
"Another Fenestra-Silvaspoons collaboration, Tourvanillo is a proprietary blend of Iberian grapes, predominantly Touriga, and is marked mostly by its aromatic highlights of spicy cinnamon and vibrant currant. Dense, it is interesting and intense with rounded edges and a leathery, long finish.",Tourvanillo Silvaspoons Vineyard Reserve,Fenestra
"This rich, juicy wine is bursting with red fruits that are ready to drink. This is a ripe, full-bodied, friendly wine with just an edge of tannin and acidity to hold it all together.",L'Héronde,Domaine Chasselay
"Toasty and firm, this substantial Merlot is based in powerful cassis flavor, with muscular tannins and a solid foundation of earth and extract.",Indian Wells,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"Bialla has held back this 2008 for release nearly a year after the lovely 2009. The wine is soft, complex and drinkable now, with blackberry jam and oak flavors, but it's definitely high in alcohol, which gives it a cellar-limiting heat.",Vita,Bialla
"More savory and spicy than fruity, this Sangiovese-Merlot-Sagrantino blend shows cured meat, tobacco, leather and black currant aromas. The finish is polished and firm.",Rojano,Cantina Tudernum
"Notes of dark chocolate, cinnamon, tobacco and blackberry characterize the nose of this darkly extracted, Sangiovese-based wine. The mouthfeel is smooth and supple, and thanks to its generous chocolate and cherry endnotes, it proves very easy to drink.",I Piaggioni,Mocali
"Not very Oakville-like, this Cabernet is bone dry and strong in tannins, giving it an astringent mouthfeel. It's light in body for a Cabernet, with lots of acidity. However, it does have pretty flavors of blackberry and sour cherry candy.",Villa Mille Rose Vineyard,Veedercrest
"Il Moraccio (Sangiovese with 10% Merlot) shows determined oak influences of spice and tobacco, followed by black fruit and plum cake notes. It's a thick, well-made expression, with a bold, chewy finish.",Il Moraccio,Tamburini
"A blend of Sangiovese, Syrah and Merlot, this shows black cherry, blackberry, ripe fruit, spice and tobacco. There's a note of fruity sweetness that's followed by a soft, chewy structure.",Palistorti di Valgiano,Tenuta di Valgiano
"This is a lush Syrah, smooth and rich in blackberry jam, milk chocolate and sandalwood flavors, with sprinkles of pepper and anise. So fruity, it's almost sweet, but the finish is clean and dry. Drink now.",Rodney's Vineyard La Rouge,Standing Sun
"This pure Merlot has the grip and muscle often found in Washington fruit; in fact, it's a bit tight at first. Notes of red plum, strawberry and stiff tannins carry the medium finish, with a nice hint of dried herb.",Fahrenheit 100,Thomas O'Neil Cellars
"Berry, plum and pastry aromas carry a bit of stalky sweetness. It feels juicy, textured and mildly tannic, with lightly herbal berry and resin flavors. Oaky on the finish, it has a good set of outgoing flavors and length.",Ibéricos Crianza,Soto de Torres
"Dense and concentrated on the nose, this features blackberry and black cherry aromas, with hardly any perceptible oak. It feels fresh but choppy and tannic, with roasted plum, berry and savory spice flavors. It's baked in flavor and gritty in feel as it finishes.",,Picos Pardos
"As fruity as Zweigelt can get, this is packed with ripe blackberry and plum flavors, deliciously cut with acidity. It has a dense, juicy character, with soft tannins. Screwcap.",Classic,Muenzenrieder
"Earth, cola, berry, toast and leather aromas share the bouquet. The palate is narrow and pinched by firm tannins, while the flavor profile deals a mix of herb, toast and plum. Warm, earthy and oaky on the finish, the wine carries a lemony accent and satisfying length.",Gaubança,Pahí Poboleda
"This Merlot-based blend also contains Cabernet Franc and a drop of Cabernet Sauvignon. It's user friendly, with soft, easy tannins framing ripe flavors of blackberry, raspberry, red licorice, mocha and spice. Ready to drink now.",,Palazzo Wine
"Pannier's standard nonvintage has attractive acidity, crisp apple flavor and a deliciously refreshing fruitiness. It also has a fine tang of orange zest texture that offers a crisp, bright finish. Age this for a few more months.",Sélection Brut,Pannier
"From the excellent 2010 vintage, this really shines with the characteristics that make the Sangiovese grape so wonderful. The crisp finish shows nuances of red berry, blue flower and forest floor.",,San Polo
"This medium-sweet wine has an attractively honeyed character and fragrant, spicy fruit. There's also a fine lift of acidity, giving some brightness to an otherwise rich wine.",Réserve,Meyer-Fonné
"Apart from its note of fresh apple and hint of juniper, the nose is fairly neutral. It feels clean, crisp and cleansing, with pear and nectarine flavors that finish light, with medium intensity and length. Drink right away for maximum freshness and expression.",,V&N; Cellars
"This muscular, dark and oaky wine includes 9% each Cabernet Franc and Petit Verdot in the blend. Cassis, licorice and ground espresso notes contribute still darker notes, leading into a finish that's marked by astringent, drying tannins.",Estate,Cave B
"This is a medium-sweet style of Pinot Gris from the Beblenheim cooperative. It is fruity, with a touch of spice complementing the creamed pear and lychee flavors. On the finish, acidity mingles with a honey note. Screwcap.",Baron de Hoen,Cave de Beblenheim
"The Barr Vineyards of Vincent Stoeffler produce a relatively soft, rounded Gewürztraminer. The result is an attractive, fruity, dry wine that has its spice in balance with lemon- and honey-driven acidity.",,Domaine Vincent Stoeffler
"The Horse Heaven Vineyard adds a welcome touch of minerality to the plain apple fruit flavor of the wine. It is this minerality that elevates it a notch, giving it a textural and refreshing mouthfeel.",Horse Heaven Vineyard,Chateau Ste. Michelle
"While the wine is on the sweet side of Gewürztraminer, it has an attractive level of acidity. The result is rich, but it has poise and elegance. Ready to drink.",Tradition,Emile Beyer
"This opens with thick aromas of apricot, exotic fruit, papaya and mango. The structure is also bold, making this wine a good partner to seafood or white meat.",Lailum Riserva,Fattoria Laila
"This is a blend of Merlot and Syrah, with a splash of Cabernet Franc. Some aging in 25% new French and American oak provides a backdrop of dark espresso, plus soft and pretty red fruit flavors.",Grand Estates Amitage,Columbia Crest
"Full bodied and brimming in vanilla and ripe peach, this white also offers big flavors of grass and lime zest, coming down in the middle in terms of acidity. Fermented in stainless steel, it's fresh and fruity, with a creaminess to the finish.",,The Rule
"Bramble and herb notes are prominent on the nose, but subside into succulent white grapefruit and tangerine on the palate of this cheerful off-dry Riesling. Sunny acidity adds to its approachable, easygoing feel. Drink now.",Niersteiner Paterberg Kabinett,Weingut Georg Albrecht Schneider
"Sharp acidity underscores light, quite tart cranberry fruit. This has herbal notes in abundance, and an earthy note to the tannins. But it all comes together with a clean, polished finish.",Murto Vineyard,Winderlea
"The wine has a fat fruity texture along with acidity and plenty of tannins. It is austere in character, very dry and dense and with a serious intent. There is a juicy aftertaste that is more attractive and has promise for the future.",Lua Cheia em Vinhas Velhas Andreza Reserva,Wines & Winemakers
Green-apple and honeyed aromas are more simple and anonymous than special. This varietal white Grenache has a shearing linear acidic palate that fosters tart flavors of tangerine and lemon peel. A stony drawn finish is crisp and zesty.,,Zerran
"Earthy plum and stalky berry aromas are bolstered by bold oak aromas. This feels good and healthy, with spicy oaky flavors that are dry lactic and push the wine's fruit to the background. A woody spicy, minty finish ends this. Drink through 2017.",Crianza,Ramón Bilbao
"Cedar and vanilla notes mark the nose of this wine, which boasts ample weight, modest fruit and a soft, open-knit texture. It's appealing for its oaky charm.",,Sidewood
"This wine from one of Anderson Valley's pioneers has a lighter-than-usual color and plenty of red cherry, raspberry and turned earth aromas. It offers low-level fruit flavors and good balance of acidity versus ripeness.",Estate Bottled,Husch
"Aromas of oak, toast, coconut and dark berry lead the nose and carry over to the bracing palate along with white pepper and oak-driven spice. Firm, extremely astringent tannins give this a bracing finish. Drink after 2018.",Sergentin,Fabrizio Battaglino
"Luscious honeyed tangerine and yellow peach notes are offset by a streak of minerality in this easy, off-dry Riesling. It's delicate in body yet juicy and refreshing. Drink now.",Kabinett,Dr. Volkmar
"Flirty and floral, this sunny off-dry Pinot Noir rosé (blended with a touch of Dornfelder) offers forward fruitiness in an elegant frame. With a kiss of strawberry and cherry flavors, it's an accessible, yet satisfying quaffer.",,HPSepicurean
"Raspberry and cherry aromas are mild while not stirring much excitement. This feels a bit raw and tannic, but it's got enough body to hold up. Berry and plum flavors finish with hints of spice and chocolate.",Premium Reserve,Piattelli
"Aromas of oak, toast, espresso, exotic spice, spirits, dried black cherry and coconut carry over to the warm palate. Showing the heat of the vintage, the fruit is already drying up while bracing tannins provide the framework.",,Gianni Gagliardo
"Berry aromas are a bit stalky, leathery and roasted. This Malbec is lively on the palate, with energy and good balance. A creamy resiny flavor profile is oaky and a touch hot.",Juana Larrea,Larrea
"Aromas of toast, oak, menthol and mint lead the nose. The palate shows raw red berry and dried sage alongside grainy tannins that leave a mouth-puckering finish.",Sottocastello di Novello,Le Ginestre
"Leathery, baked aromas of cheesy oak and red berry fruits are a bit lacking in pop but are reflective of typical Rioja Crianza. A full grabby palate shows earthy, buttery flavors of baked stalky berry fruits and oak. A grabby chunky finish wraps this up.",Arienzo Crianza,Marqués de Riscal
"This smells rubbery, with oaky spice, but airing allows it to expand across a lively palate. Herbal, spicy red-berry flavors are strongest in the midpalate, while peppery flavors, rubbery tannins and scratchiness define the finish.",,Tomero
"A direct blast of reedy cherry and cassis aromas leads to rough-charging clampy palate with high acidity and hard tannins. This tastes of rooty plum supported by bold acidity, while spice, tomato and a dusting of brown sugar are the closing flavors.",Q,Zuccardi
"Stalky, soupy berry aromas come up shy on elegance. This feels clampy and hard with rocky tannins. Standard berry fruit flavors are overshadowed by gritty stalky blackened accents, while the finish is grating and uncushioned but long.",Glorioso Gran Reserva,Bodegas Palacio
"Brushy aromas of field herbs blend with scents of oaky vanilla, plastic and stalky berry fruits. This feels saturated and rubbery. A salty flavor profile holds onto the bouquet's stalky character, while the finishing flavors are peppery and herbal, with a hint of sweet plastic derived from oak.",La Primera,Revancha
"Earthy slightly grassy infusions work their way onto a hot energetic bouquet. This feels racy, drawing and a bit clampy, while woody spicy flavors of rubbery berry fruits finish bold and hot like the beginning.",,Tiza
"This is a fresh, open and very accessible wine. Crisp acidity cuts through the green apple flavors and tangy, mineral texture. With juicy fruitiness, it is a light wine that is ready to drink.",,Domaine Gérard Duplessis
"This simple, fruity and rounded wine has light acidity, apricot and pear flavors and a tang of orange zest. It is full, fruity and ready to drink.",Saint-Martin,Domaine Laroche
"A blossomy, perfumed edge lends lift and vibe to earthier notes of pressed apple and pear in this light-footed medium-sweet Riesling. It's racy and sharp in mouthfeel with a finish that's brisk and bright.",Oppenheimer Sachträger Spätlese,Dr. Heyden
"Despite showing a yellow color and gritty oiliness on the nose, this feels round and complete, with tropical flavors of mango, papaya and green melon. Everything about this is mild, inoffensive and tropical. Drink now before it starts to fade.",Ique,Enrique Foster
"The wine is young, still more structure than fruit. It has firm tannins as well as juicy blackberry fruits. A blend of Syrah, Cabernet Sauvignon and Touriga Nacional, it is likely to age for a few months, so drink from the end of 2016.",3 Castas,Fiuza
"Herbaceous, lemony and a touch green, this brisk light-bodied wine is made from Elbling, one of the Mosel's little-known other grapes. Dry on the palate, it's moderately concentrated with flavors of freshly-pressed apples and pear.",Nitteler Leiterchen Novum,Frieden-Berg
"Warm and full-bodied, this opens with aromas of espresso, fig, dried berry, toasted oak and clove. The dense palate offers raisin, oak, roasted coffee bean and spearmint alongside round tannins. You'll also notice the heat of evident alcohol.",Bricco Paradiso,Il Falchetto
"Tangy and mineral, this is a crisp apple- and citrus-driven wine, full of fruitiness while also having a tight texture. Its acidity just adds to the generally ripe character of the wine. Drink now.",Réserve Personnelle,Jean-Luc and Paul Aegerter
"This is typical, textbook Torrontés with tropical aromas of lime and orange peel. Citrusy acidity creates a refreshing palate feel, while tangerine, lime and lychee flavors conclude in a cleansing, non-oily fashion.",Terroir Series,Kaiken
"The nose on this Pinot Noir is fresh and bright with scents of fresh raspberries touched with granite minerality. Medium bodied in style, the palate is marked by flavors of cherry cola and currant, wrapping up with a bitter almond finish.",Ingle Vineyard,Heron Hill
"Hard and oaky cherry aromas filter into a tangy, zesty, clampy palate. Plum and other red-berry fruit flavors finish raw and rugged, with overt oak character and a touch of minty, herbal green.",Selección Especial,Cruz de Piedra
"This quaffable white blend opens with minerally vitamin-like aromas along with touches of peach pit and apple. The palate is good in a generic way, while apple, pear, melon and mild spice flavors finish exactly the same.",Protocolo,Dominio de Eguren
"This opens with unusual aromas that recall plastic and wax. The simple palate offers fleeting sensations of tropical fruit, yellow apple and lemon zest.",Irmana,Corvo
"Freshness and a bit of tannic bite lend some character to this well-behaved, attractively fruity red wine. That touch of tannin__ery typical and welcome in Cabernet Sauvignon__ends some grip in the texture to help this wine wash down your food. The wine conveys a balanced taste impression overall.",,Crushed
"Light to the point of being watery, it has dilute red berry flavors. A toasty edge, perhaps from new oak, is not fully integrated.",Red Willow Vineyard,Eight Bells
"This wine opens with funky aromas of earth, wet leaf, black raspberry, vanilla and hints of farmyard and tire rubber. The tight palate offers tart cherry, cocoa, vanilla, espresso and oak alongside drying tannins.",Versace,Feudi del Pisciotto
"This Nero d'Avola opens with aromas of toast, roasted coffee beans and wild berries. The palate is dominated by oak, offering espresso, tar, toast and black currant alongside astringent wood tannins. It lacks fruit richness and has an abrupt finish.",Avulisi,Feudo di Santa Tresa
"From owner/winemaker Kathy Joseph, the wine has subdued tartness on the nose, and green apple and citrus elements on the palate. Stone fruit emerges quickly when poured, but the wine loses such nuance as it sits in the glass. It's a good brunch wine to serve with frittata.",Goosebury,Fiddlehead Cellars
"Soft and fruity, it is already fully developed. Crisp apple flavors accompany bright acidity and a touch of minerality. Drink now.",,Georges Duboeuf
"This Riesling is blended with both Chenin Blanc and Gewürztraminer. The residual sugar is not listed, but the flavors are definitely sweet, without  much acidity to cut through the sugary finish.",,Girly Girl
"The nose on this Cabernet Franc seduces with scents of rich, ripe berries and cherries accented with granite, vanilla and spice. The palate, however, is more reserved with a dusty, earthen tone that seeps into ruddy red-fruit flavors. Brisk and medium-bodied, it finishes moderately long.",Ingle Vineyard,Heron Hill
"This fresh, robust white starts with aromas of slate and citrus, followed by flavors of citrus, tropical fruit and mineral. This easygoing selection is a great everyday white wine for grilled fish and salads.",,Greek Wine Cellars
"Ripe peach and floral aromas waft from this sprightly off-dry Riesling. A hint of pressed apple lends a savory feel to the mid palate, but it finishes briskly with a squirt of lemon and lime.",Semi-Dry,McGregor
"Spice and earth tones accent pressed apple and preserved apricot notes in this medium-sweet Riesling. It's demure in fruit concentration, but bright and easy drinking with a shower of tart tangerine acidity on the finish.",Medium-Sweet,Rooster Hill
"Intensely ripe on the nose with scents of juicy black cherries and plums, this is an easy, softly structured Pinot Noir with moderate flavor concentration. A spray of floral notes persists through the finish adding flair.",,Silver Thread
"A soft, mid-range, medium-bodied Pinot Noir from areas including the Russian River Valley and Sonoma Coast, it imparts aromas of rosemary and herbes de Provence before delving into a world of tart cherry and cranberry. The finish is smoky.",,Simi
"This wine opens with red berry, spice and spearmint aromas. The dense palate is surprisingly sweet, with sugary black plum alongside drying, rough, wood tannins.",,Vesevo
"Fleshy and ripe with flavors of sweet yellow peach touched with honey, this is an easy going medium-sweet Riesling. There's a touch of savory smoke and spice that persists from nose to finish, but overall, it's bright and sunny with lingering lemon acidity.",Select,Wagner
"A full-bodied wine with a style that incorporates richness in the aromas and restraint in the flavors. It smells sweet and candylike, but tastes dry and oaky. A touch of walnut on the palate adds an austerity that is smoothed over on the finish with a dash of sweet oak.",,Wattle Creek
"Cigarbox, mint, balsamic and leather lead this traditionally minded Agiorgitiko from Boutari. On the palate, plum, spice and tobacco prevail.",,Boutari
The oak (20% new French) seems far out front here with vanilla overpowering the notes of fig. It drinks dry with a creamy feel and abundant vanilla flavors.,,Cave B
"Light, fruity and lemony, this wine has some weight, but it is more about crisp citrus with a touch of pear.",La Côte Blanche,Cave de Lugny
"This soft red wine discloses pomegranate fruit and a liberal amount of Mediterranean herbs. It's light and easy-sipping, and should be consumed while young.",Squall Line,Convergence Zone
"Scents of waxy honeycomb and crushed minerals waft from this off-dry Pinot Gris. On the palate, lush, ripe peach and melon flavors penetrate. It's unabashedly fruity and forward with a bold, heavy mouthfeel.",Curry Creek Vineyards,Red Newt Cellars
"Burnt caramel aromas give a wine that has weight, sweetness and packs in the vanilla. It misses out on real fruitiness, giving weight rather than freshness.",,Domaine Sophie Cinier
"Tropical in character, this wine has soft acidity and an attractive texture. With ripe mango flavor, it's full in the mouth and ready to drink.",Vieilles Vignes,Jean-Marie Challand
"The green fruit flavors dominate this very fresh, crisp wine. It has acidity as much as fruitiness, giving a steely, tight character. Drink now.",,Chanson Père et Fils
"A firm wine that is mainly tannin without a great fruit element. It is dry, tight and hard-edged.",Les Hâtes,Demessey
"Nutty aromas break up and lose cleanliness with airing. This is a wine in decline; it's mealy and fairly woody, with not a lot happening. At moments it hints at mature quality but mostly it lacks steam.",Gorvia,Quinta da Muradella
"Notes of hay, pollen and beeswax add a savory, honeyed tone to this exquisitely dainty Riesling. The palate is intensely packed with sweet citrus fruit, but it's balanced with striking acidity and a shower of minerality on the finish.",Herrenberg Auslese 21,Maximin Grünhäuser
"The Edelgrund vineyard, along the northern slopes of Lake Neusiedl gives a powerful, structured wine. It layers dark tannins, an initially stern mineral character that needs time to soften. At the same time, the juicy black fruits and tight acidity offer a more fruity aspect. Keep for 4_5 years. Screwcap.",Edelgrund,Nittnaus Hans und Christine
"All six Bordeaux grapes make an appearance in this well-oaked spicebox of a red. It's just plain delicious, from the first sniff on through. The firm mid-palate shows pretty blue, purple and black fruits, a touch of black olive, black tea, and those oh-so-tasty baking spices.",Private Blend,Nodland
"This dry, remarkably minerally Riesling highlights tones of granite and wet slate against a backdrop of fresh apple, lemon and tangerine. It's broad and textural on the palate, with sharp lime juice acidity and a hint of lemon pith and herb on the finish.",Kaseler Nies'chen GG Trocken,Reichsgraf von Kesselstatt
"Here is a great achievement for lovers of Montepulciano d'Abruzzo. Dark and thickly extracted, this hearty expression opens with an inky dark appearance and lush aromas of black fruit, plum, spice and chocolate fudge. There's balance and intensity here with enough power and personality to recall the rustic and mountainous region of Abruzzo in Central Italy. Hold five more years.",Donna Ernestina 48,Ciavolich Giuseppe
"Gold shows unexpected sophistication for the otherwise overtly bold and gregarious Sagrantino grape. Those prickly tannins you recognize from the variety are wrapped by layers of spice, cured meat and dried berry fruit.",Gold,Còlpetrone
"A powerful, firm wine, very solid and rich. With red plum and blackberry fruits, dense tannins and a touch of wood aging, the wine shows considerable potential. It is already balanced but will benefit from at least six years' aging.",,Château Peymouton
"With just the merest hint of rosé color, this beautifully dry wine has delicious acidity, refreshing red berry fruits as well as a fine depth of ripe fruit flavors. It tastes young, and would benefit from a few months more in bottle.",Grande Cuvée,Château Réal Martin
"This is a Bordeaux-style blend based on Cabernet Franc and Merlot, marked by luscious softness and ripe, forward fruit. The flavors of cherries, red currants, anise and sandalwood are delicious and savory. It's perfect for drinking now with a great steak.",Reserve Seventeen Forty,Daou
"This wine is fresh and vibrant in acidity and structure, yet penetrating on the palate with sweet, ripe stonefruit and yellow floral notes. Hints of lime pith and jasmine tea add texture and astringency on the long, mineral-laden finish.",Wehlener Sonnenuhr Spätlese,Dr. Loosen
"A bright, tart, spicy wine with plenty of grip and detail, this threads flavors of herb, stem and earth into the substantial blackberry and cassis fruit. It's nicely woven together, penetrating and punchy.",,Dusted Valley
"Rachis refers to a particular part of the grape stem, and indicates that roughly one quarter of this wine is whole cluster fermented. Very pretty cherry fruit is gently mixed with accents of Italian herbs, and the stems tighten up the tannins and add a light hint of bitterness. The finish has a tart, grapefruity kick.",Rachis,Dusted Valley
"Barbecue seems like the natural partner for this soft, tannic, fruity wine. It's enormous in fruit flavor, with tiers of blackberry and cherry jam, brown sugar, smoked meat, pepper and cedar lasting long on the finish. Gains extra points for the beauty of its balance. Will last for many years, but drink soon for freshness.",,Aaron
"Produced by Three Rivers for celebrity winemaker Geoff Tate, this new Insania is a full-on Bordeaux blend, with all five red grapes in the mix. It's a powerful wine, with heavy metal flavors of deep black fruits and thick tannins. Pair it with a juicy steak or Kobe beef burger and rock on.",Insania Merlot-Cabernet Sauvignon-Petit Verdot-Malbec-Cabernet Franc,Geoff Tate
"The first impression is of strawberry preserves, not jammy but with the texture and loose-knit fruit flavor of a fruit spread. Behind it are lip-licking veins of licorice and cola, finishing with dusty tannins. Chehalem dust? Don't rule it out.",Lia's Vineyard Unfiltered,J. Christopher
"Cyclops is 80% Red Mountain Syrah, with Grenache, Mourvèdre and some Roussanne filling out the rest. It might have been forged in steel, as it captures the core of metal and mineral, the stiff tannins, and the compact, dense red and black fruits of the AVA. Bright, tart berry fruit is underscored with light suggestions of clean earth.",Cyclops,Kiona
"Call it a __uperMarche_ wine. The blend is 50% Cabernet Sauvignon with 40% Montepulciano and 10% Merlot. It offers deep intensity with floral, almost potpourri-like tones of dried rose backed by cherry, spice and touches of chocolate fudge. It's plush and velvety with medium intensity on the mid-palate.",Pelago,Umani Ronchi
"This is a bold, fruity, muscular blend that's 100% New World in its darkness, ripeness and heft. It's earthy and full of cola and herbs on the nose, while the palate is rugged and delivers core blackberry, spice, coffee and herbal flavors. A dry, ripped, peppery tasting finish is a proper ending. Drink now_2017.",Vertice Apalta Vineyard,Ventisquero
"There's a voluptuous weightiness to this textured, floral Riesling. The palate is laden with ripe stonefruits accented with hints of white pepper and lime zest. Finishes long with a shower of lemon-lime acidity and an intensely mineral, lanolin slick.",Erbach Schlossberg Monopole Erstes Gewächs,Schloss Reinhartshausen
"Pinot Grigio doesn't get better than this. Fresh and fragrant, this lovely wine offers beautiful intensity and a soft, smooth consistency. Peach nectar, tangerine, lemon curd and white almond all appear in perfect doses.",Unterebner,Tramin
"For freshness and elegance in an unoaked wine, look no further than this leesy, smooth Albariño that shouts of its coastal origin. Sea notes, apple and peach grace the bouquet, while the plump but zesty palate offers minerally lemon, lime and apple flavors.",O Rosal,Terras Gauda
"This is dark and pointed on the nose, with graphite, mint, peppercorn and creamy oak aromas supporting herbal berry fruit scents. The palate feels lush and almost airy, with soft tannins and baked black-fruit flavors accented by chocolate and coffee. An earthy finish with licorice and mild tannins says drink this Carmenère now through 2015.",Reserva de Familia,Santa Carolina
"This is the most broadly appealing Chardonnay of Lynmar's wonderful 2011 offering. It makes all the right moves, with fine acidity and a hint of minerals giving structure to the tropical fruit, buttered toast and spice flavors. It's the kind of wine that makes Chard lovers smile. Best of all, it costs considerably less than  the winery's other Chards and is nearly as good.",,Lynmar
"This well-loved vineyard brings old vine complexity into play. The brambly berry fruit is enhanced with lighter notes of earth and compost, cola and a dash of brown sugar. The acids are bright and citrusy, with a pineapple tang.",Abbey Ridge Vineyard,J. Christopher
"This is pure Sauvignon Blanc, fermented in acacia barrels. Intense and grassy, with a deep splash of citrus and a long, tangy finish. A Sauv Blanc for those who love the grape in its most dense and unadorned expression.",Croft Vineyard _ber-Sauvignon,J. Christopher
"Dusty spice and red-berry aromas are a fine opening to this blend of Garnacha, Carignan, Cab Sauvignon and Syrah. It's fairly full bodied but not heavy, with fine balance and bright flavors of cherry and berry that come in layered waves. A toasty, dry finish with spice and good acidity closes out this easy-to-like Spanish red. Drink through 2017.",Negre,Jaspi
"A beautifully balanced wine, crisp and rich at the same time. It has the freshest red berry fruits that go right through the spicy texture, giving intense full fruitiness. Worth aging this wine  for a few months.",,Domaine Houchart
"By and large, this is a good Priorat to drink or hold, because it should still improve. Both the bouquet and palate are oaky and fiery, with cherry, raspberry and vanilla flavors. On the finish, things turn buttery before settling on rooty and staunch. The more air this gets, the more it comes around. Drink now through 2018.",Clos Galena,Domini de la Cartoixa
"White pepper and savory dried-herb notes add a dark dimension to super-concentrated stonefruit flavors on this delicate, almost gossamer-like Riesling. It's penetrating on the palate with tangerine acidity and a long, lanolin and honey-coated finish.",_rziger Würzgarten Auslese,Dr. Hermann
"Intensely aromatic with notes of orange blossom, honey and tangerines, this juicy, fruity Riesling is delicate in body with a refreshingly crisp acidity. Whiffs of lanolin and dried herbs add complexity and finesse.",Erdener Treppchen Spätlese,Dr. Loosen
"A worthy followup to the 2007, perhaps not as immediately flamboyant, but a major Pinot Noir to age in the cellar. Shows flashy cherry and raspberry fruit, with tantalizingly rich spices and a perfect coating of sweet, smoky oak. Fine and delicious now, after decanting, and should develop over this decade.",Saralee's Vineyard,Joseph Swan Vineyards
"Named for the year the vineyard was planted, this is a full-bore Barossa fruit bomb__n a positive way. Waves of lush berry fruit are framed by hints of vanilla and mint in this full-bodied, creamy-textured wine that somehow manages to retain a sense of elegance and proportion.",The Freedom 1843,Langmeil
"A wine that shows structure, richness and warmth. It has such ripe black fruits with generous tannins, concentrated texture and acidity. It is melding into a floral, spicy, opulent whole.",,Vieux Château Mazerat
"Tenuta Belguardo is one of the best wines from Maremma in southern Tuscany. It shows intense aromas of black cherry, chocolate, tobacco and spice. In the mouth, it's soft, supple, silky and shows great length.",Tenuta Belguardo,Mazzei
"An incredibly concentrated, silky blend of 80% Grenache and 20% Syrah. Nothing shy about this wine, inspired as it is by the great Chateauneuf-du-Papes and yet undoubtedly Californian. Make that mountain Californian. With baked cherry fruit and baking spices throughout and serious grip and weight, this is one heady and delicious wine.",The Brat,Prospect 772
"Old vines in this case means an average age of 70 years, from a vineyard that is a mix of different varieties. The result is impressive, very floral with sweet black fruit, licorice and the ripest of tannins. Age this wine for 5_6 years.",Reserva Vinhas Velhas,Quinta do Crasto
"Randy Dunn's Feather has an intriguing floral component, and the aromas are complex and intense, though the wine is wound up tight. Let it breathe and it delivers elegant, focused flavors, precisely defined berry and cassis fruit, with a long and harmonious finish.",,Feather
"A soft mineral note of polished river stone or wet granite appears at the very beginning, giving this 80-20 Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot blend a pristine, clean feel. As the wine spends more time in the glass, it delivers aromas of ripe fruit, leather and moist pipe tobacco. The mouthfeel is inky-thick and superconcentrated.",Guado de' Gemoli,Giovanni Chiappini
"Dazzling. Easily the best Groth Cabernet in many years, dry, full-bodied and crazily rich in blackberries, cherries, tobacco and new oak. The ripe, sweet fruit is held in check by brisk acidity and firm tannins, resulting in an exciting tension. Beautiful now, and should develop gracefully throughout the decade.",,Groth
"With Pinot Noir, the magic trick is to have it taste sweet and ripe, and yet to finish bone dry. Few wineries in California accomplish this as regularly as Hanzell, and here they come again, with this wonderful 2008. It's entirely consistent with their past history, being dry, a little tannic and tantalizingly rich in cherry, raspberry and cola fruit. Enjoyable now, with decanting, and should develop in the cellar over the next dozen years if not longer, based on the winery's track record.",,Hanzell
"Straight down the line, this wine shows fruit and acidity. The tannins are relatively soft while the fruit is forward. Blackberries, coffee and licorice notes all come together.",,Château la Gaffelière
"This is the first vintage of a wine that used to be called Laville Haut-Brion. It is ripe and opulent with exotic fruits and generosity, very open, very rich. Pineapple, yellow fruits and toast are all present.",,Château La Mission Haut-Brion
"A very great success, although it is expensive. Shows perfect Dry Creek Zinny character, with briary, brambly wild forest berry fruit, cola and spices, and a savory note of grilled meat. The finish is dry and balanced. More than half the oak barrels were new French, giving the wine a rich coat of toast. Drink this beauty now and over the next eight years.",Reserve,Ledson
"Ferrington is one of Anderson Valley's best vineyards, and Williams Selyem has done an exceptional job with this impressive young '09. It's bone dry and fairly tannic, and the cherry and raspberry fruit flavors are balanced with earthy notes of cola, grilled mushrooms and dusty Indian spices. But it needs time. Better after 2015.",Ferrington Vineyard,Williams Selyem
This wine continues the upward progression of Clerc-Milon. It has weight and density while also showing sweetness and delicious acidity. A very complete wine.,,Château Clerc Milon
"A smoky, graphite tone of ash or crushed mineral opens the nose of this densely concentrated wine. Dark chocolate, sweet cherry and fresh tobacco leaf are followed by a chewy, syrupy mouthfeel with fine, polished tannins.",Arnione,Campo alla Sughera
"Very fruity aromas hint that this is a bright wine, its tannins shaded by the red and black berry flavors. The structure is integrated, showing ripe as well as fresh fruit with final flavors of chocolate.",,Château Pavie Macquin
"A tropical- fruited wine, full of toast and apricot and melon fruits. It is deliciously ripe and soft with the acidity lost in the richness. It is opulent and already a pleasure to drink.",,Château Haut-Brion
"Ripe cherry fruit and tobacco are backed by subtle tones of toasted almond and smoked bacon fat. This Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot-Sangiovese blend delivers dense, slightly sweet flavors with a very soft, yielding texture that would pair well with succulent beef or lamb.",,Grattamacco
"Considered to be the best block of Syrah in the vineyard, here it shows a generous mix of tart berry, plum and raisin fruit flavors, with a lush middle suggesting blueberry pie and Christmas cake. But there is more__hocolate, cinnamon and on it goes into a riot of holiday pastries. Flat-out yummy.",Red Willow Vineyard Chapel Block,Owen Roe
"If you like heavyweight Tempranillo, this is a textbook rendition. It's deep and dark, with earth, leather and oak in addition to monster black fruit on the nose. Feels lush, powerful and layered, with bursting blackberry, spice, mocha and vanilla flavors. Quite black and spicy on the finish. Drink from 2012 through 2016.",Alabaster,Teso La Monja
"Tinata is a sultry blend of Syrah and Grenache, a Rhône-style blend unlike any other wine in the area. These grapes seem perfectly adapted to the little-known region of Capalbio in the southern part of Tuscany and deliver intense aromas of blackberry, leather, chocolate and cured meat. It's plush, rich and extremely long-lasting.",Tinata,Monteverro
"The second vintage of Steven Kent's lovely, lofty Lineage, impressive in its Kingly bottle, is as ambitious as last year's, a sumptious blend of 81% Cabernet Sauvignon (three different clones), 9% Cabernet Franc, 5% Petit Verdot, 3% Malbec and 2% Merlot. Its red fruit is prominent, the wine high-toned, succulent with cherry and pomegranate. Integrated and appropriately weighty, it lifts even higher on the coffee-laced finish. Give it a few years more in bottle and wow.",Ghielmetti Estate Vineyard,Lineage
"This inky wine opens with black concentration and rich aromas of mature cherry, almond paste, spice, blackberry and plum. Integrated wood tones of leather and toasted coffee complete the picture and help render soft but structured tannins. Drink after 2015.",Sapaio,Podere Sapaio
"Textbook Rioja gran reserva in every way. It's light and smoky smelling, with brown sugar, fine cologne and cedary aromas. Generous but well-cut in the mouth, with fig, mushroom, raspberry and spiced plum flavors. Fresh on the finish, with light herb flavors and good weight. Drink now through 2018.",Imperial Gran Reserva,CVNE
"Even by Dunham's high standards, this is a spectacular Riesling. A little spritz to give it a turbo start, a textural and focused entry, a broad splash of spicy apple, pear, apricot and light tropical fruit, and then a surprising streak of honeyed almonds. This wine just rocks.",Lewis Estate Vineyard,Dunham
"An impressive Cabernet, from a Yountville vineyard. Shows the ripe, pure blackberry, cherry and cedar flavors you'll find in many Napa Cabs, but with welcome structure. The cool vintage and southerly location combine for brisk acidity and a fine tannin intricacy. Delicious now and through the decade.",Maxine's,Bardessono
"So soft and sweet, it's like a melted dessert pastry. Explodes in blackberry and cherry pie filling flavors, with the smoky, buttery toast of oak barrels. Defines deliciousness. The tannins are soft enough to drink this 100% Cabernet now, and it is probably best enjoyed over the next six years before it loses freshness.",Few and Far Between Vineyard,Hundred Acre